["With fewer cutthroat trout to feed on in Yellowstone Lake, bald eagles have turned to preying on other birds, including trumpeter swans, terns, loons, and other birds.Doug Smith doesn’t remember the moment he realized that a serious ecological crisis was under way in Yellowstone National Park. But as more and more birds began to dwindle, what appeared before him was, he says, “an expanding picture of avian collapse.”One of the first signs Smith spotted presented itself on the normally tranquil Riddle Lake in 2014. There, floating upside down, was a young trumpeter swan killed by a bald eagle. The cygnet was the last of an entire clutch of five siblings eaten by the mighty white-crowned raptors, an act that in one fell swoop wiped out all of the park’s newborn swans for the year.Smith discovered other grim clues while paddling a canoe across the southern reaches of Yellowstone Lake. Littering the glassy surface were patches of waterfowl feathers. Eagles were attacking entire flocks of ducks. They also tore apart and ate double-crested cormorants and American white pelicans.While an obvious next step would be to look toward the sky for answers, culprits in this whodunit can actually be found up and down the food chain. Swapping out and replacing just one fish species for another has set off a chain of events negatively impacting bears, eagles, ospreys, and more—and, in turn, spelling bad news for many of the park’s birds. (See more in a special issue of National Geographic devoted to Yellowstone.)“For all of the attention that gets paid to this park’s geothermal features and its famous large mammals, what we’re seeing with birds is as dramatic as anything making headlines with wolves, grizzlies, and bison,” says Smith, who in addition to being the park’s leading wolf biologist is charged with monitoring its winged denizens.“We could be witnessing the complete elimination of some nesting bird species in Yellowstone,” he says.Along with swans, pelicans and cormorants, Smith adds loons, California gulls and Caspian terns to a list of birds being pressed to the edge of survival in Yellowstone. Some of them could soon vanish from the nation’s most iconic nature preserve. (Watch: "Revealing the Secret World of Yellowstone’s Wildlife.")Three converging forces have set off a lethal chain reaction: the rippling impacts of an exotic fish—lake trout—that have decimated what used to be the last major stronghold for native Yellowstone cutthroat trout; climate change altering habitat; and humans haphazardly displacing sensitive species.It’s a jarring glimpse, Smith says, into the challenges facing natural systems once thought stable. Native species that evolved in certain places are getting interrupted, pushed around, and sometimes eliminated. “The world as we’ve known it is being transformed. And if it’s happening in Yellowstone, it is happening everywhere,” Smith says.After wolves were restored to Yellowstone in the mid 1990s, the park was touted as the vanguard for an intact, fully functioning ecosystem with every major species present that was there when Europeans arrived on the continent half a millennium ago. Smith says that vaunted status is in jeopardy.Most startling is the broad pattern of “ecological mayhem” playing out at Yellowstone Lake, one of the largest high-elevation freshwater lakes in the world and the liquid centerpiece of the park. The lake is an important reservoir for the namesake Yellowstone cutthroat trout (Oncorhynchus clarkii bouvieri), but calamity ensued after exotic lake trout (Salvelinus namaycush) somehow found their way into its waters 25 years ago, park officials say.Lake trout, being voracious, deep-water-dwelling fish eaters, reduced cutthroat trout numbers by 90 percent. Todd Koel, Yellowstone’s lead fisheries biologist and author of a science assessment, wrote that in 1998 alone, the estimated 125,000 lake trout consumed between three million and four million cutthroat trout.That, Koel and Smith say, represented the first of several dominos to fall.With cutthroats barely hanging on and no longer spawning in more than 60 tributary streams, their absence in turn affected species that relied on them for sustenance, including grizzly bears, especially females with cubs in early summer.Anecdotal evidence suggests that some hungry bears shifted their summer hunting to elk calves. Grizzlies now take more young elk than wolves do. River otters, too, were affected by having fewer cutthroat trout. (Exclusive video: 'Bear Bathtub' Caught on Camera in Yellowstone.)Yet Smith says the biggest cause-and-effect correlation has involved 16 species of fish-eating birds. In the early 1990s there were 62 osprey nests documented on Yellowstone Lake, with 67 fledglings in the summer of 1994. In 2017, there were just three osprey nests and one fledgling produced.An osprey perches on a pine tree branch in Yellowstone National Park.It’s important to note, perhaps, that cutthroat and lake trout are not equal; lake trout inhabit and spawn in deep lake water and are not accessible to bears and eagles the way cutthroat are.Osprey are exclusively fish eaters, so they went elsewhere. Bald eagle nests, meanwhile, also declined around Yellowstone Lake, but they are formidable predators, and opportunistic ones.After cutthroat trout numbers fell, eagles simply turned their hunting from fish to other birds. Yellowstone Lake has small colonies of California gulls, American white pelicans, double-crested cormorants and Caspian terns on nubs of sand and rock such as the Molly Islands in Yellowstone Lake.Eagle predation and unusual weather in late spring have taken a huge toll, Smith says. In 1990, there were 28 nesting pairs of Caspian terns on the Molly Islands but no nests since 2005 and no reproduction of California gulls.Eagles also have been observed attacking adult loons and targeting young swans at Riddle Lake—one of just two locations where breeding pairs of trumpeters have successfully nested.On top of that, still another complication. In recent years, Canada geese have proliferated in Yellowstone, their young a bounty for growing numbers of eagles, which ultimately eat other vulnerable birds.The last thing Yellowstone managers are going to do is lethally control numbers of geese and bald eagles, the latter being America’s national avian symbol and ironically a bird that not long ago nationwide was on the federal Endangered Species list.Loons are another iconic species, and in Greater Yellowstone the number of loons has declined by 50 percent since 1990. Just 18 breeding pairs remain in Wyoming, 70 percent of those in Yellowstone and nine loonlets fledged two years ago.Loons have been beset by human disturbance, eagle depredation and by abnormally high water—due to precipitous snowmelt in the spring— swamping their nests.Trumpeter swans and loons contribute much to the wild ambiance of Yellowstone, Smith says. Snow-white trumpeters have the largest wing span of any bird in North America and are known for their grace in flight and on the water. With loons, their haunting crepuscular trills are as primordial as any howling lobo.The conundrum now before Yellowstone is deciding when—and if— to intervene, Smith says.For the last decade, Yellowstone, along with crucial funding from the park’s non-profit partner, Yellowstone Forever, along with Trout Unlimited and other conservation groups, have poured millions of dollars into gill-netting lake trout to reduce their numbers and allow cutthroat trout to recover. (Watch video of a trout mating frenzy in Yellowstone.)Eradicating lake trout entirely is impossible, but millions of the hulking fish have been taken. Koel says cutthroat losses have stabilized, though it could take many years—if ever—before their numbers are high enough to once again support other species as a food source.“The rule of thumb we use is if impacts are natural, then we leave things alone. But if something is human-caused, then we will take action to provide remedies to problems,” Smith says. “Introduction of an exotic species is an example of that; so is human use and climate change.”Yellowstone’s mission is to protect park wonders, but if climate change has a deleterious effect on species, it could result in managers having to perpetually try to mitigate harmful impacts—a radical departure from current protocol that favors “letting nature take its course.”“If you start to intervene, where do you stop?” Smith asks. “Do you always know what you are doing? And if you choose not to get involved and species disappear, can you live with inaction?”In 2011, when just five swans remained, Yellowstone convened a meeting of national experts to advance recommendations for how to save the resident population, warning that extirpation appeared to be imminent.One of the experts was Ruth Shea. As director of a research effort called Northern Rockies Trumpeter Swan Stewards, Shea is recognized as “the grand dame” of swan conservation in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem, having begun her conservation work in 1976.While she wants to be hopeful, the odds against Yellowstone’s swans are overwhelming, she told National Geographic.Historically, when trumpeter swans continent-wide were pushed to the precipice of extinction by market hunters who killed them for their meat and feather plumes, Yellowstone was a last refuge.“It’s a sad day to think the very place that saved them is struggling to keep them alive,” Shea says. “It’s not devastating biologically because swan numbers outside the park are increasing, but symbolically it reveals the challenges our most iconic parks are under.”Yellowstone, she notes, is confronting a constant onslaught of human recreation pressure brought by groups and individuals that want more access, not less. This at a time when the park is setting new records for visitation almost every year.Yet putting putting some areas off-limits might be what the swans need. Shea notes that a field report from as far back as the 1930s documented that human presence can drive sensitive swans from nests.To try improving their chances, Yellowstone has installed artificial nesting platforms for both swans and loons. Researchers have also tried “grafting,” hatching swan cygnets at a lab and putting them in wild nests with the hope they’ll be adopted. It has worked in some cases.Swans are long-lived, and the number of permanent residents in the park now numbers in the mid-twenties, but successful breeding remains elusive. For the second year in a row, Smith said, following an aerial survey a few weeks ago, no new cygnets are being produced.On top of that, pressure from eagles gives the birds a thinner margin. “When your population is reduced to handfuls of reproducing birds and even a smaller number of breeding pairs, it doesn’t take the loss of many before death outpaces reproduction, and eventually they just wink out,” Smith said.When a species disappears from its homeland, the loss goes far beyond lost photo opportunities. “Every species makes its contribution to a richness whose worth cannot be calculated,” Smith says.John Muir famously observed, "When we try to pick out anything by itself, we find it hitched to everything else in the Universe." Aldo Leopold, America’s forerunning ecological thinker, added half a century later in his classic A Sand County Almanac, that “to save every cog and wheel is the first precaution of the intelligent tinkerer.”The point is that, in nature, everything is interconnected. Smith says the irony is that Yellowstone has been an exemplar of that ideal, but it might also become a case study in how things can fall apart.The birds of Yellowstone carry knowledge passed along over millennia, from one generation to the next. It includes fine-tuned courses of migration that enable them to travel thousands of miles between their summer breeding grounds in Yellowstone and winter habitat around Baja, Mexico, or the Gulf; the accrued, hard-learned lessons of where to feed and successfully nest; and how to outwit predators.“Once that kind of intelligence is lost, it’s incredibly hard to bring it back again, if you ever can,” Smith says.",
"Covering approximately 360 miles, this road trip through southern Montana makes a loop from Livingston through Red Lodge, dips into Yellowstone National Park, and concludes with a scenic drive back to Livingston. As you follow the route, drive a designated All-American Road surrounded by mountain peaks. Hike on a wilderness plateau. Raft the Stillwater River. Ride Horseback in Paradise Valley. Cross state lines into Wyoming to take in the grandeur of the Grand Canyon of the Yellowstone. Take selfies at the Roosevelt Arch at the original entrance to the park. See (or scale, if you're an expert climber) 12,799-foot Granite Mountain, Montana’s highest peak. And pull off the road at least once to soak in a pool fed by bubbling hot springs.Livingston > I-90 to Columbus > MT-78 to Red Lodge > U.S. 212 Beartooth All-American Road to Silver Gate/northeast entrance to Yellowstone National Park > Exit Montana to Wyoming > U.S. 212 > Grand Loop Road > US-89 to Gardiner/North Entrance to Yellowstone National Park > Exit Wyoming to Montana > U.S. 89 > MT-540/East River Road through Paradise Valley > U.S. 89 to Livingston.Note: Portions of roads may be closed due to snow or ice; always check road conditions before taking this road trip.Bozeman Yellowstone International Airport, BozemanAll-American Roads are the nation's best of the best scenic drives, and Beartooth Highway (U.S. 212) certainly fits the bill. The road runs 68 miles from Red Lodge to the northeast entrance to Yellowstone near Cooke City and Silver Gate. The highway is open from the Friday before Memorial Day weekend to the Tuesday after Columbus Day. The drive takes you past 20 peaks of more than 12,000 feet and over the Beartooth Plateau at more than 10,900 feet. Stop at the Gardner Lake pullout for the best view of the Bear’s Tooth rock formation. Best Bet: An easy three-mile gravel road takes you up to Clay Butte Lookout, an old fire lookout tower; open July and August. Note: Beartooth Highway may be closed due to snow or mudslides; check ahead on conditions.Start this road trip at Livingston, a quiet hamlet of about 7,000 people. Sights to see: Livingston Depot Center, an ornate 1902 Northern Pacific Railway station that serves as a museum in summer and community center in winter; Gem Valley, a do-it-yourself sapphire- and garnet-hunting operation; and the Yellowstone Gateway Museum, a small-town museum (housed in a 1907 schoolhouse) that features interpretive exhibits highlighting its extensive collections and its stories of Park County and Yellowstone National Park.Trade in your car for a horse on this road trip. Paintbrush Adventures, headquartered in Absarokee, operates in the highest mountains in Montana and, on overnight trips, packs your gear up to camp so you don’t have to. Inside Tip: First-time riders usually choose horses Pudding or Molly. Experienced riders enjoy Fast Eddy, the most requested horse in the barn. Bear Paw Outfitters is a fourth-generation family-owned business operating out of Paradise Valley. They offer day trips and overnight pack excursions to places like Yellowstone and Absaroka-Beartooth Wilderness.Riding down a Montana river in a raft is a rush. Absaroka River Adventures in Absaroka paddles the Stillwater River; the lower portion has pulse-pounding challenges such as Beartooth Drop, Double Trouble, and Surprise. Paradise Adventure Company in Gardiner rows the rushing Yellowstone River in the park for 8- or 18-mile trips. Or you can opt for its gentle Scenic Float.Yellowstone Park offers some great hiking, but so does the Beartooth wilderness area around Red Lodge. The day-trip length West Rosebud Trail #19 (5.7 miles), also know as the Mystic Lake Trail, starts at the Mystic Lake Hydroelectric Plant and climbs up to majestic Mystic Lake. Inside Tip: This is the main trail used by expert mountain climbers to reach Granite Peak, the highest point in Montana at 12,799 feet. Near Roscoe you'll find East Rosebud Trail #15, also known as the Beaten Path. One of two trans-Beartooth hikes, it runs 26 miles from East Rosebud Lake to just outside Cooke City. Bear Track Trail #8 is 12.5 miles long and starts at U.S. 212, then climbs to the Silver Run Plateau, one of the more accessible plateaus in the Beartooths. Rock cairns guide travelers across the plateau until the trail drops down and connects with the Timberline Trail #12 trailhead. Inside Tip: The Forest Service website lists dozens of day hikes in the Beartooth area.Used to fend off grizzly and black bears in the local wilderness, bear spray is like insurance: You hope you never need it, but it comes in handy if you do. You don’t need to buy a can, however; you can rent bear spray from area retailers such as Bear Aware Rentals and just pay for what you use. See the People and Carnivores website for rental locations in the park.This road trip takes you into Yellowstone Park and follows the Grand Loop Road to the south. Attractions along the way include the Grand Canyon of the Yellowstone, about 20 miles long, 1,500 to 4,000 feet wide, and 800 to 1,200 feet deep; the Mud Volcano area, which smells like rotten eggs due to the variety of mud pots, fumaroles, and hot springs bubbling hydrogen sulfide; and the Mammoth Hot Springs Area, a hotbed of constantly changing geothermal formations (a terrace collapsed in the fall of 2014). Inside Tip: The Yellowstone National Park website has videos about different parts of the park. Check out Along the Upper Loop Road, which covers things to see and do on the Grand Loop Road.The original entrance (known as the North Entrance) to Yellowstone is in the town of Gardiner. The iconic Roosevelt Arch there is undergoing construction, so traffic is being rerouted around it.Lodging in Livingston includes the Yellowstone Valley Lodge, a full-service resort with only 23 cabins that's located right on the banks of the Yellowstone River in Paradise Valley. The 1904 Murray Hotel, located in Livingston’s historic district, was one of 11 hotels in downtown Livingston in the early days of Yellowstone National Park and is the only one remaining in service. It has 20 suites and five standard rooms, and the original tile floors in the lobby show the cracks from the earthquake that formed “quake lake” (Hebgen Lake) in 1959.The Pollard was built in 1893 and, at the time, was the first brick structure built in Red Lodge. Famous guests are said to include Wild Bill Hickok, Buffalo Bill Cody, and Calamity Jane. The Pollard was renovated in 1994 and features 39 guest rooms (no two are alike), a formal dining room, a casual pub, and a health club featuring racquetball courts, a full gym, locker rooms, and saunas.The towns of Colter Pass, Cooke City, and Silver Gate precede the northeast entrance to Yellowstone. Places to stay include Cooke City’s Big Moose Resort. In Silver Gate, Grizzly Lodge is a one-story hotel with three cabins on a creek, and Silver Gate Lodging consists of 29 cabins and a general store and features a view of Amphitheater Mountain. Best Bet: To view wildlife in the park up close, rent a Swarovski spotting scope from the Silver Gate Lodging general store.Xanterra Parks and Resorts operates nine lodges and five campgrounds in Yellowstone National Park, including Grant Village Campground, Roosevelt Lodge and Cabins, and Old Faithful Snow Lodge and Cabins. Inside Tip: Reserve early, as lodgings in the park fill up fast.Along the way back to Livingston, stop at Chico Hot Springs Resort and Day Spa in Pray and sample its historically healing waters that flow into two concrete, open-air mineral pools. You can stay in one of many lodging options, including the comfortable North 40 cabins, or just pay to spend the day at the mineral pools. Best Bet: Visit the hot springs early in the morning, when they first open; it's the quietest and most relaxing time.For breakfast in Livingston, head to Gil’s Goods in the Murray Hotel, a classic European café with a Montana feel. For lunch, try the Bison Bratwurst Pasta at the Sport. And for dinner, head back to the Murray Hotel to dine at the 2nd Street Bistro, owned and operated by the same people as Gil’s. Or try the Mint Bar and Grill, a classic Montana watering hole continuously operating since the twenties, or the Livingston Bar and Grille, once a place called the Bucket of Blood Saloon but now an internationally themed restaurant. Best Bet: Enjoy live acoustic music during Sunday Suppers at the Livingston Bar and Grille, when executive chef Jonathan Romans single-handedly prepares a three-course meal from scratch for patrons.The best place for breakfast or lunch in Red Lodge is Cafe Regis, which locals know is pronounced REG-is, like register. Best Bet: Order the Special French Toast, which generally features fresh, often local and/or seasonal fruit topped with house-made whipped cream and a side of pure maple syrup; favorites are the Rhubarb French Toast and Peach French Toast.If you're a beer fan, there are three must-stops in the Red Lodge area. Grizzly Bar and Grill in Roscoe, or "the Grizz" as locals call it, has been a gathering spot since the 1930s and specializes in sizzling steaks. The Bear Creek Saloon in Bearcreek is a steakhouse and bar that holds pig races every Thursday, Friday, Saturday, and Sunday night starting at 7 p.m. from Memorial Day to Labor Day. Red Lodge Ales ranks as the third largest microbrewery in Montana. Annually, it cranks out about three barrels of beer for every person in Red Lodge—a town of just 2,500 residents. Inside Tip: If you see a guy in a kilt at the brewery, shout "Hey Beerbarian!" and he'll give you all the insider tips about places to go and things to do in the area.As you enter Yellowstone National Park using the northeast entrance, stop for a bite in Cooke City or Silver Gate. Bearclaw Bakery is unique in the area because it makes everything from scratch. Best Bet: The owner starts baking at midnight, so coffee’s on when the lights are on. Start your day early by getting there at 5 a.m. for a Smothered Breakfast Burrito, Almond Crusted Bearclaw French Toast, or Fried Green Tomato Eggs Benedict. At Beartooth Café the cooler holds 130 different beers from around the world, and a crowd favorite on the menu is the Funk Burger, a half pound of ground beef mixed with butter and minced garlic. The Log Cabin Café Bed and Breakfast has been in business since 1937 and bills itself as making flapjacks from a “world-famous” pancake recipe.Exiting Yellowstone at Gardiner you have a variety of eateries to choose from. Some local favorites: The Raven Grill, which has had items such as huckleberry crème brûlée on the menu; K-Bar Pizza, which has been serving pizza across the street from the northern entrance to Yellowstone since 1953; and Yellowstone Grill, which serves a local favorite called the Yellowstone Scramble, a homemade English muffin topped with scrambled eggs; homemade hollandaise; a choice of bacon, sausage, or Andouille sausage; fresh tomatoes; green onions; and pepperoncini—all served with hash browns.The only place to shop along the Beartooth Highway (U.S. 212) is the aptly named Top of the World Store, located in the Shoshone National Forest at an elevation of 9,400 feet. The store carries supplies such as groceries, gas, camping and fishing gear, local artwork, souvenirs, clothing, ice cream, and books and maps.If you're an angler, the place to shop in Livingston is Dan Bailey's, founded in the 1930s by the legendary Dan Bailey, a New Yorker who brought his friends, including journalists, to Big Sky and is credited with starting the fly-fishing craze in Montana. Bailey, an expert on tying flies, appeared in the first edition of Sports Illustrated.For some solace and a bit of tea, stop into Red Lodge Books and Tea in Red Lodge. The store is celebrating its 30th anniversary in 2016. The book side concentrates on outdoor, nature, science, and local titles and includes children’s books and a selection of plush local wildlife such as mountain goats, marmots, bears, wolves, moose, elk, and bighorn sheep. The tea bar has more than 150 different teas in stock. Inside Tip: The store makes soft, Bavarian-style pretzels, including the Big Sky Jumbo, a 24-ounce pretzel served in a pizza box. How fast can you eat one? The record is just under eight minutes.The 4th of July weekend brings two big rodeos to enjoy along this road trip. The Home of Champions Rodeo in Red Lodge is celebrating its 85th year in 2015 with bareback riding, steer wrestling, barrel racing, bull riding, and other events. The Livingston Roundup Rodeo is the largest rodeo in Montana by purse, offering more than $200,000 in prizes to about 500 contestants.Each Labor Day, tiny Reed Point holds the Great Montana Sheep Drive, when hundreds of sturdy, Montana-bred woolies ramble down Main Street’s six blocks. The celebration includes a parade, vendors, and an evening street dance.U.S. 89 runs through Paradise Valley near the end of this road trip, but give yourself a treat and get off the crowded road and onto the less populated Paradise Valley Scenic Drive (East River Road, MT-540). Paralleling the Upper Yellowstone River between the Absaroka and Gallatin mountain ranges, the slower drive offers travelers the chance to savor the pasturelands of the lower valley, plus mountain peaks and river vistas, and provides access to public lands and lakes in the Absaroka Mountains.This road trip runs around the Absaroka-Beartooth Wilderness, known as the A-B by locals. Encompassing 943,377 acres in three states with 950 alpine lakes, the A-B boasts more than 20 peaks greater than 12,000 feet and is home to the 41 highest peaks in Montana, making it rich with opportunities for hiking, backpacking, camping, fishing, and more. Starting points for exploring the area include multiple trailheads, many off the Beartooth Highway (U.S. 212). Inside Tip: Learn about backcountry exploration and be sure to follow the rules; start with a fact sheet you can download.If you're traveling through Yellowstone with young children, get Who Pooped in the Park? Yellowstone National Park: Scat and Tracks for Kids (Farcountry Press, 2004), a fun book that helps them identify traces of wildlife in the park.The only hotel open in Yellowstone National Park with automobile access in cold weather is Mammoth Hot Springs Hotel, near Gardiner, at approximately 6,200 feet in elevation, open from December to March. The Snow Lodge at Old Faithful is also open in winter, but needs to be accessed by snow coach or snowmobile.At Greycliff Prairie Dog Town State Park, near Big Timber, prairie dogs live and play on a 98-acre protected habitat.Day One: LivingstonDay Two: Livingston to Red LodgeDay Three: Red Lodge to Yellowstone National ParkDay Four Yellowstone National ParkDay Five: Yellowstone to Livingston",
"Steamboat Geyser experiences a relatively minor eruption in a picture taken in Yellowstone National Park. Recently, the geyser set a record by erupting 32 times in a single year.The geysers in Yellowstone National Park are as breathtakingly beautiful as they are mercurial. Old Faithful is famous in part because of its predictability, since most of these natural fonts are much more inscrutable.That’s why geologists were excited when the Steamboat Geyser roared to life in 2018. Normally, this geyser has gaps between major fountaining episodes that can last anywhere from four days to half a century. But since last March, it’s been erupting as often as once a week.The Yellowstone Volcano Observatory reports that Steamboat has now set a record by erupting a whopping 32 times in 2018, a personal best for the geyser for a single calendar year. Previously, this geyser made it as high as 29 paroxysms back in 1964.Other nearby geysers have also been behaving fairly interestingly of late. Ear Spring Geyser, for example, has been pretty quiet since 1957, but it erupted spectacularly a few months back—and sprayed human garbage from the 1930s everywhere.Is this all this hydrothermal hyperactivity unusual in any way, and if so, what’s driving it? We’ve got you covered.Although Yellowstone boasts a plethora of geysers to gawk at, Steamboat is a particular standout. It’s the world’s tallest active geyser, and at the best of times it can fire water 300 feet into the air. Recently, though, it’s significantly picked up the pace of its eruptions.According to the U.S. Geological Survey, which keeps a record of all Steamboat’s water eruptions, the current theatrical sequence started on March 15, and the geyser has been pretty darn active ever since. So far, it’s erupted five times in 2019.It’s eruptions, although frequent, aren’t what you would call predictable. There were only two in July, for example, but six in September. This erratic behavior is par for the course for geysers at the park, says Michael Poland, the scientist-in-charge at Yellowstone Volcano Observatory.“It’s a good lesson in how geysers actually work,” he says. “As soon as you start to recognize a pattern, it changes.”Steamboat is just one of many gurgling pools in the Norris Geyser Basin, which the National Park Service explains is the hottest and most changeable thermal area in Yellowstone.“As geysers go, Steamboat is sort of typical in terms of having these sporadic, unpredictable eruptions,” Poland notes. “But because it’s this really tall geyser and it has this name recognition, it makes it that much more interesting.”Giant Geyser, found in another part of the park, is another good example of the generally erratic nature of geysers. Giant has been erupting more frequently than it has in the recent historical past, too.“But back in 2007 to 2008, Giant went bananas,” Poland says. “It erupted many, many more times than it had in the past year—and Steamboat didn’t do anything of the sort.”The science of how geysers work is well established. Three primary controlling factors are involved: the geothermal heat supply from an underlying magmatic source, the supply of rechargeable water, and the rocky plumbing system, says the University of Salford’s Philippa Demonte, an expert in acoustics, including those of volcanic systems. (Explore the inner workings of Yellowstone's caldera with our interactive graphic.)A good way to think of it is like a stove kettle, she says. Sometimes you have groundwater with an unrestricted pathway to the surface, and like heating water in a shallow pan, this will take longer to boil. But if you have a constricted, rock-filled pathway, comparable to water in a kettle, it boils far quicker. More heat allows you to boil things quicker, and more water means longer boiling times, but you have more water for the eruption at the end.A startling sunset reddens the Lemaire Channel, off the west coast of the Antarctic Peninsula. The continent’s coastal ice is crumbling as the sea and air around it warm. This photo originally published in “The Larsen C Ice Shelf Collapse Is Just the Beginning—Antarctica Is Melting.”You can’t generalize though, because each geyser is idiosyncratic. Lone Star Geyser is fairly predictable, erupting once every three hours. Others, like Sawmill Geyser, can be active for some time before dying down, Demonte says.“The patterns of these systems defy description,” Poland adds. That’s one of the reasons why comprehending why geysers act as they do is so difficult.Laboratory contraptions mimicking geysers also hint at how much we have left to understand. A 2014 study found that depending on how bubbles rise through the geological pipes, and depending on where the water actually boils, the same geyser can produce a weak eruption or a thoroughly effusive one, notes Helen Robinson, a geothermal expert and doctoral candidate at Glasgow University.The water chemistry is pretty vital, too, Robinson says. If it’s able to break down rocks that are high in silica or calcium carbonate, for example, these minerals may precipitate out higher up in the system as the pressure and temperature of the plumbing network changes. This might seal up the fractures that had been letting water flow and lead to the potential death of a geyser.With all this in mind, do we know what’s going on at Yellowstone? There’s been no change in the underlying heat source, and no major geological changes, Poland says.However, the last few years have been exceptionally snowy, so a change in the supply of subsurface water may be a major factor. As it happens, the second-longest earthquake swarm in the park’s recorded history took place in 2017. Research tentatively suggests that the same heavy precipitation may have provided the faults involved with plenty of lubrication, allowing them to jut forward with reckless abandon.In both cases, it’s difficult to make any definitive statements. There aren’t really any direct measurements of the subsurface water in the park, and such inferences are based on the records of surface water and precipitation. For now, Poland says, “we’re just speculating.”What absolutely isn’t worth speculating about is the state of Yellowstone’s infamous volcanic system. Any uptick in any sort of activity at Yellowstone seems to spark fears about a catastrophic eruption of the park’s huge caldera, even though such worries are unfounded.There has been no change to the underlying magma reservoir over the past few years, Poland emphasizes. Plus, the mischief of any of the park’s geysers—which operate at the very top of the crust—has no bearing whatsoever on that mostly solid magma cache many miles below the surface.",
"A skier takes advantage of the early morning light and fresh powder with First Tracks, a program at Big Sky Resort that allows guests to experience the snow before the lifts open to the public.The ultimate insider experience at Big Sky Resort is First Tracks. The draw: Get on the mountain before the lifts open to the public and make the “first tracks” in totally pristine powder. “The thing that makes this so special is absolute solitude while experiencing the very best conditions and terrain our area has to offer,” says Ben Brosseau, a ten-year veteran guide at the resort and a wilderness emergency first responder.The half- and full-day First Tracks sessions are totally customizable. Choose miles of rolling, fresh, smooth corduroy or go big on the unmatched steeps and powder off the summit. “The only people on the mountain are you, your guide, and the ski patrol," Brosseau says. "It is just acres and miles of untouched snow.”Hyalite Canyon south of Bozeman is the United States’ premier natural ice-climbing playground. From late October to the end of March, elite climbers from around the world head to Hyalite to scale the canyon’s countless frozen waterfalls. Although Hyalite is an ice-climbing mecca for experts, it’s not out of reach for anyone wanting to learn the basics. Climbing terrain in the canyon ranges from steep, crystal curtains cascading from cliffs to gentle low-angle ice suitable for beginners. “With a bit of coaching, anyone who knows how to kick [for kicking crampons into the ice] and swing a hammer [to use an ice tool] can have a fun day ice climbing,” says Sam Magro, owner and lead guide of Montana Alpine Guides. Magro offers courses designed to introduce both children and adults to what he terms the “mellower, sunny side” of the sport. “Ice climbing is similar to skiing in that there are extreme routes for experts, as well as bunny slopes for beginners,” he says. “It’s wild to climb water frozen in time. Learning with a guide is a great way to get out into Hyalite and get a feel for what ice climbing is all about.”If the “Blue Light” glows, it’s time for snow. Local skiers and snowboarders know that the turning on of the powerful strobe atop the historic Baxter Hotel—Bozeman's tallest building—signals that two or more inches of new powder have fallen in the past 24 hours at the Bridger Bowl, just 20 minutes out of town.The ski area features 2,600 vertical feet of lift-served terrain. Book a private tour with one of Bridger’s ski pros to discover secret powder stashes and hidden terrain.The deep hush of winter descends over Glacier when the park is blanketed with snow. It’s peaceful and still and, perhaps, the most magical season to be here. On the surface, all of Glacier appears to be sleeping. Venture out on a two-hour, ranger-led snowshoe walk, however, and you’ll learn and see how many animals, including beaver, deer, and squirrels, manage to remain active in winter.“This is a great opportunity to enjoy the solitude of the sparkling and glistening winter environment in the park,” says Glacier National Park management assistant Denise Germann. “Plus, searching for signs of wildlife and discovering plants on a guided walk gives you an intimate and up-close look at your surroundings.”No experience or snowshoes (rentals are available for a nominal fee) are required for the free treks, sponsored in partnership with the Glacier National Park Conservancy. Tours leave from the Apgar Visitor Center.Yellowstone has the largest collection of geothermal features in the world, but the only one you can soak in is Boiling River. The parking area is in Montana, just off the North Entrance road near Gardiner. From there follow a short, well-packed trail across the Wyoming border to the spot where a roughly 125°F underground spring hits the frigid water of the Gardner River. The hot springs are popular and can get crowded in the summer tourist season. When the snow arrives, it’s mainly locals who soak in Boiling’s natural hot tub.“In winter, it is like you are in the middle of nowhere,” says Dan Hottle, public affairs officer for Yellowstone National Park. “Sometimes you have the place all to yourself. Wolves, elk, or bison may pass by. I’ve been there in subzero temps nice and warm while my hair is frozen solid.”Rangers caution that the channels of water aren’t uniform in temperature; some places are burning hot while others are nearly frozen. And while the frosty air makes it tempting to dunk your head underwater, a sign at the site advises against it due to the possible presence of nasty organisms.",
"Unencumbered by foothills, the Tetons make one of the boldest geologic statements in the Rockies.Established: 1929Size: 310,000 acresAnnual Visitors: 3.3 millionVisitor Centers: Colter Bay, Jenny Lake, Craig Thomas, Rockefeller PreserveEntrance Fees: $30 per vehicle, $15 per personnps.gov/grteFeaturing some of the country’s most dramatic scenery, Grand Teton National Park includes spectacular snowcapped peaks, their profiles reflected in fjord-like lakes and a slowly flowing river. No matter what the season, the park presents an array of sights, smells, sounds, and outdoor activities.Without much warning, the Grand Tetons rise 7,000 feet almost straight up from the Jackson Hole Valley. The range's serrated granite peaks are so perfectly proportioned they seem born of a landscape artist's imagination rather than Mother Nature. Named by French-speaking trappers who ventured through the region in the early 19th century, they are the youngest mountains in the Rockies and certainly the most handsome, their gorgeous facades mirrored in six lakes and sinuous Snake River along their eastern edge.The Hayden Expedition of the early 1870s that brought Yellowstone into the limelight also illuminated the Grand Tetons through innovative photography and landscape paintings. But with settlement already underway in Jackson Hole, it would take more than a half century—and the substantial wealth of the Rockefeller family—to exert enough pressure on government officials and purchase enough private lands for the national park to become a reality.U.S. Highway 89 runs the length of the park between the town of Jackson Hole, Wyoming, and Yellowstone’s southernmost entrance. Along the way are numerous pull-outs with views of the peaks beyond the Snake River and Jackson Lake. Craig Thomas Discovery and Visitor Center near Moose Junction provides a great overview of the area’s natural forces and human history with a high-definition movie about the park, various ranger-led activities, and the excellent Vernon Collection of local Native American artifacts.The southeastern corner of the park boasts some of the best wildlife viewing. Beaver, otters, and moose are a few of the creatures found around Schwabacher’s Landing on the Snake River; bison, antelope, and elk are some of the animals that frequent the sagebrush-covered area on the north side of the Gros Ventre River. There are also historical relics, like the photogenic Mormon Barns and the log-cabin-style Chapel of the Transfiguration in the Menors Ferry Historic District.On the western side of the river, Teton Park Road and the adjacent biking/hiking path meanders through the heart of the park to Jenny Lake and its visitor center. Jenny Lake Shuttle provides scenic cruises and water taxi service to the western shore for short hikes to Hidden Falls or Inspiration Point or challenging ascents of the park’s highest peak: 13,770-foot Grand Teton. Jenny Lake is also a springboard for day hikes to Paintbrush Canyon and secluded Leigh Lake.Farther north, Jackson Lake offers paddle sports, sailing, water skiing, and windsurfing. Boat rentals, scenic cruises, and guided fishing trips are available at Colter Bay Marina. Day hikers can trek the Hermitage Point Trail (9 miles) from the marina to a secluded stretch of lakeshore.Grand Teton’s mountainous western half is roadless and best explored on foot along more than 230 miles of trails with varying degrees of difficulty. A stroll through the lake district along the Lupine Meadows Trail and Taggart Lake Trail (7 miles one way) is relatively flat and easy and affords amazing views. Put some oomph into the hike with steep-ascent side trips to Amphitheater Lake or Garnet Canyon.Catch a glimpse of the back (western) side of the Teton Range on two of the park’s most challenging hikes: the trail up Granite Canyon to Marion Lake (18.5 miles return) and up Death Canyon to the Static Peak Divide (16.3 miles return).No matter what you choose to do, Grand Teton National Park offers stunning views and adventure for everyone.Hotels• Jenny Lake Lodge: Rustic chic describes this upscale log cabin resort amid the Tetons; gourmet restaurant, ranger talks, live music, yoga, croquet, bikes, stargazing.• Colter Bay Village: This family-friendly log cabin and tent cabin accommodation sits near the shore of Jackson Lake; restaurants, shops, water sports, horseback riding.Camping • Grand Teton: Find developed campgrounds at Colter Bay, Gros Ventre, Headwaters, Jenny Lake, Lizard Creek, Signal Mountain.• Cross-country skiing and snowshoeing are popular winter activities in the snow-covered Tetons. Just be aware that few trails are marked and it's largely a wilderness, backcountry experience. Ranger-led snowshoe hikes are an excellent way to start.• Several private vendors are also licensed to lead guided snowshoe and ski tours through the park in winter. Check with the Park Service for details.• For an even more adventurous option, several vendors offer guided backcountry alpine skiing and climbing in the park, including instructional classes. Visit Jackson Hole Moutain Guides or Exum Mountain Guides.",
"For a memorable trip more ambitious than the popular hikes and ranger programs, look into additional tour activities offered by licensed operators. Learn kayaking basics and embark on a sea kayaking tour or relax on a rafting trip with O.A.R.S.Both Flagg Ranch Resort and Grand Teton Lodge Company offer guided horseback rides along various scenic trails by woodlands, ponds, willows, and more. Riders must be at least eight years old, but Grand Teton Lodge Co. also offers pony rides for younger kids and wagon rides to a picturesque breakfast spot for all.Wintertime offers an exciting alternative for exploring Grand Teton. There are ranger-led snowshoe tours, a variety of skiing options, and snowmobiling. Operators who lead activities in the park often provide snow gear, food, and spa treatments after a strenuous day in the snow. Other options, such as sleigh rides and dog sledding, are available. Contact www.nps.gov/grte/planyourvisit/winter.htm for more information.Right off U.S.191, Teton Park Road begins at Moose and traces the Teton Range base to Jackson Lake Junction. The 20-mile road provides a great overview, traversing a good length of the park and passing several bodies of water. To get closer to the breathtaking peaks, take a detour after 8.5 miles at Jenny Lake Road. After merging back onto Teton Park Road, enjoy the scenery for another nine miles, then climb 800 feet on Signal Mountain Summit Road for spectacular views of the Teton Range, Jackson Hole Valley, and Jackson Lake. The rest of the drive skirts Jackson Lake before hitting the scenic John D. Rockefeller, Jr. Parkway.Easy: Those who want to start off taking it slow can ease into a day of hiking with Lunch Tree Hill, a half-mile round-trip trail that can be completed in half an hour. This trail by Jackson Lake Lodge is lined with interpretive signs that will help you find your way along a route that climbs a total of 80 feet. The overlook at the top of the hill offers a great view of the Teton Range's grand peaks, as well as the willow thickets, grassy meadows, and the creeks and beaver ponds of Willow Flats.Moderate: For more of a challenge, go to Jenny Lake, off Cascade Canyon, and hike the popular five-mile round-trip Hidden Falls trail. Climb 550 feet in about three hours, taking in the sapphire waters while skirting Jenny Lake's south shore. Keep your eyes out for furry marmots as you climb to the top of the trail, then soak in the glorious 200-foot-high waterfall.Strenuous: For experienced hikers, the 12.4-mile round-trip Holly Lake trail by String Lake is an eight-hour trek that climbs 2,625 feet and winds through the wildflower-strewn paths of Paintbrush Canyon trail, before arriving at the sparkling waters of an alpine lake.Combine the Paintbrush Canyon trail with the Cascade Canyons for a hike on the 19.2-mile round-trip Paintbrush-Cascade Loop. This longer hike along the Paintbrush Divide will take about 14 hours. The hike is very strenuous. With 4,840 feet of total climbing, this journey takes you to great heights.Home to the largest bird in North America, the trumpeter swan, Grand Teton National Park also hosts the smallest bird on the continent, the calliope hummingbird, which weighs less than one tenth of an ounce. In addition to supporting a range of bird species, the park's many habitats feature over 60 species of mammals, from majestic elk to predatory wolves to small pikas. If you're near the water, there's a chance that a river otter might be splashing around.For photographers, there are several popular spots to view wildlife (at a safe distance). You'll find fish, pelicans, muskrats, and other mammals at Oxbow Bend, one mile east of Jackson Lake Junction. To catch sight of quick-footed elk and pronghorn antelope, visit Timbered Island near Jenny Lake. Cascade Canyon, west of Jenny Lake, is home to smaller creatures, like pikas, yellow-bellied marmots, pine martens, and ground squirrels.Yellowstone National Park, America's first national park, is located just north of Grand Teton park. After gazing at the peaks, valleys, and lakes of Grand Teton, shift gears in Yellowstone with up-close views of geysers and hot springs.Archaeology lovers won't want to miss a visit to Fossil Butte National Monument. A little more than 150 miles south of Grand Teton, this 8,198-acre park features sub-tropical fossils found in cold sagebrush desert. Check out more than 80 fossils on view at the visitors center, make fossil rubbings, and watch fossil preparation demonstrations.For a more lively adventure, visit the National Elk Refuge in winter for a horse-drawn sleigh ride alongside thousands of elk. Elk and bison hunting is also offered in the fall as a part of herd-size management. If you're in town the Saturday before Memorial Day Weekend, the Jackson District Boy Scouts auction off dozens of elk antlers from the National Elk Refuge and donate 80 percent of the proceeds to the U.S. Fish & Wildlife Service. Stop by the city's Town Square to bid.For hands-on learning, drive about ten miles south of Grand Teton to the Center for the Arts for dance classes and a variety of conferences. In addition to art exhibits, the center hosts a wide range of live events, from acrobats to ballet shows to music performances.",
"White-water rafters tear down the Snake River in Jackson Hole.Rise early and cruise Grand Teton National Park for a chance at spotting elk, moose, bears and other wildlife (always practice proper wildlife safety). Bison can often be found north of Jackson en route to the town of Kelly. Osprey nest on platforms on poles around town—keep an eye out on Highway 22 and the Teton Village Road.Grand Teton National Park is located just outside the town of Jackson, and it's known as "Jackson's backyard" where locals and visitors alike hike in stunning alpine scenery, revel in some of the best backpacking and camping in the world, paddle peaceful lakes, backcountry ski, pursue numerous other outdoor pursuits and, of course, watch wildlife and admire the scenery.Packed with geysers, hot springs, and other geological wonders—totaling more than 10,000 of these features—as well as incredible wildlife viewing opportunities, including grizzly bears, wolves, bison, and other animals, Yellowstone National Park was declared a UNSECO site in 1978 and continues to enchant visitors from all over the world.For a taste of the "Old West," head to the Jackson Hole Rodeo during the summer, sign up for a chuck wagon ride and dinner, or stay at one of the nearby historic dude ranches for a glimpse into the area's Western heritage.Take in bird's-eye views of Jackson and beyond from atop Snow King Mountain. In winter, this ski resort—which opened in 1939 and is the oldest in Wyoming—brings local families out to play, and in summer, its trails attract hikers and bikers. Its scenic chairlift ride offers incredible views without the exertion of hiking up a mountain.Ride the Jackson Hole Mountain Resort Aerial Tram to the top of Rendezvous Mountain for an aerial peek into the nearby mountain ranges, valley, town and more. Visitors can often spot wildlife, like moose, marmots, and even bears on the ride to the top. At the summit, Corbet's Cabin dishes up waffles and a few other eats and beverages.The Moulton Barn in Grand Teton National Park is located along the historic Mormon Row. It once belonged to John Moulton, who settled the area in 1907. The Jackson Hole Historical Society & Museum offers exhibits and displays about Jackson Hole's history and heritage.This ultra-athletic town specializes in the art of the Dawn Patrol where people rise before the sun to get in a few backcountry ski laps or miles on the trail before work. Residents also relish quirky athletic competitions like the multi-sport "Pole, Pedal, Paddle" spring tradition where teams—typically in costume—combine downhill skiing, Nordic skiing, running, biking and boating.The Town Square is the center of activity in downtown Jackson, and it's a great place to sit and people watch—the summer farmers market on Saturday mornings offers prime opportunities for observation. Watch tourists flock to the square to snap "elk antler arch" selfies with Jackson's famous arches.Meet a raptor up close at one of the Teton Raptor Center's live programs. The local nonprofit focuses on public education, research, and rehabilitation, and offers public programs at local events and at their Wilson, Wyoming facility (reservations recommended).",
"Any time of year is a joy in the Tetons. Most people visit during July and August, when it's sunny and warm, after the snow has melted in the high country. In September and October, the days are pleasant, nights are brisk, the park is less crowded, and the animals are still active. You have a better chance of seeing elk than in summer.Winter, although spectacular, can be very demanding; snowshoeing, skate-skiing, walking, and cross-country skiing are popular. The main park road, US 26/89/191, remains open all year, but snow closes Teton Park Road (the "inner road") north of Cottonwood Creek from November through April. The Moose-Wilson Road is also closed. At Teton Village, just south of the park, you'll find excellent downhill skiing.From Jackson, take US 26/89/191 north past the National Elk Refuge; the entrance station and Moose Visitor Center are at Moose. From Dubois, follow US 26/287 to Moran Junction and turn north to the Moran Entrance Station. From Yellowstone NP's South Entrance, the John D. Rockefeller, Jr., Memorial Parkway leads directly into the park. Airport: The Jackson Hole Airport is inside the park.On a one-day visit in the summer take the Teton Park Road from Moose Junction to Jenny Lake for excellent views of the Tetons and short walks or longer hikes. On the second day, go farther north to Signal Mountain and Jackson Lake. For a longer stay, consider floating the Snake River, hiking, canoeing, climbing, or attending a ranger-guided activity.Campgrounds: There are six campgrounds in the park. Full hook-ups and shower and laundry services are available on the Colter Bay and Flagg Ranch grounds, which provide nearly 300 hundred trailer and tent sites. Colter Bay and Gros Ventre can accommodate groups from ten to a hundred campers. For more information and individual rates, check www.nps.gov/grte/planyourvisit/campgrounds.htm.Lodging: Located on ten acres in the south end of Grand Teton National Park, small, family-owned Dornan's Spur Ranch features cabins with eight one-bedroom and four two-bedroom duplexes. The cabins have a cozy ambience, furnished with handcrafted lodgepole furniture. Each cabin includes a spacious living area with sofas, a dining table, and a kitchen equipped with appliances and cook- and dining-ware. Covered porches and nearby grills complete the outdoor living experience. The resort also has a grocery store, deli, two restaurants, and a bar. Open year-round.Although only open mid-May to early October, Jackson Lake Lodge brings you right into the heart of Grand Teton National Park. Soak in the panoramic views of Jackson Lake, the park's vast rolling hills, and the formidable Teton peaks through the lodge's 60-foot-wide lobby windows. Guest rooms and single-story cottages clustered outside the main building offer a variety of facilities, including queen- and king-size beds, kitchenettes, jetted tubs, and patios and balconies.The only lakefront lodging in the park, Signal Mountain Lodge offers a range of options: log cabins with twin and double beds; country rooms with fireplaces and small appliances; bungalows with kitchenettes; lakefront retreats with balconies or porches; and a three-room cabin complete with a living room, kitchen, and laundry area. This lodge is Green Seal Certified and has implemented extensive recycling and energy efficiency programs.Flagg Ranch offers the best of both worlds at its location between Grand Teton and Yellowstone National Parks. Rooms are basic and include patios with rocking chairs. The lodge headquarters also features a restaurant, grocery store, and gas service.No matter what time of the year it is, careful driving on park roads where wildlife roam is a must. Moose frequently use roads as travel corridors, and elk, bison, and mule tend to wander at night. Driving slowly and only during the day can help avoid accidents that result from hitting animals.For most seasons, rain gear is recommended because of unpredictable storms. Though the summer months of July and August usually promise warm days and cool nights, thundershowers are common in the afternoon. It's still relatively sunny from September to November, but rain and snow storms can occur in the park during these months.The winters are long and cold, so winter visits require warm layers with the additional protection of hats, gloves, and boots. Heavy snows generally fall between November and March, but at high elevations snow and frost are possible anytime of the year. Through mid-April, roads can be closed during blizzards and storms, so be sure to check the park's website before setting out. Four-wheel drives or all-weather tires are also ideal for navigating slippery and snowy roads.Valley trails can be covered with snow until late May, so prepare accordingly when taking a spring trip. Occasional snow can occur as late as June, so be prepared with layered clothing.www.nps.gov/grte",
"Teton Crest Trail  When to Go: Mid-July to Mid-SeptemberOne Way: 37 Miles, 6 DaysLevel: Moderate Backpacking TripThe signature hike of Grand Teton National Park threads its way along the interior spine of the Teton Range, joining high divides and passes, alpine lakes, and intimate looks at those iconic craggy summits. The brief hiking season coincides with a supernova burst of color—carpets of lupine, streams choked with mountain bluebells. At Fox Creek Pass you get sweeping views of Jackson Hole in Wyoming and Teton Valley in Idaho. And starting in Hurricane Pass, every view for several miles frames the three Tetons in all their glory.Insider Tip: Leave a car at trail’s end—the Leigh Lake trailhead—then ride the Teton Village tram to start the hike on the Granite Canyon Trail.",
"This pristine tropical reserve—covering almost two-thirds of St. John, plus 5,650 acres underwater—saw 133,398 visitors in 2019. Leisure travel to the Virgin Islands has been closed and reopened several times throughout 2020. Virgin Islands National Park is currently open to local visitors, who are asked to practice social distancing, even on park beaches.Since its founding on August 25, 1916, the U.S. National Park Service has assembled 419 protected units, of which 62 hold the “national park” designation. To visit all 62 of these treasures one would need to travel to 29 states and two U.S. territories.Such an extensive trip is all but impossible during a pandemic that has closed borders. But with so many national parks to visit, there are trails, craters, and lakeshores that can be explored responsibly and without crowds. Avoid the people—but not the natural wonders—at some of the nation’s least-visited national parks.How remote and uncrowded are these parks? Katmai National Park’s Aniakchak caldera is so remote that many park rangers have never visited its volcanic crater. At Kobuk Valley National Park in Alaska, quadrupeds greatly outnumber bipeds (or at least humans); the ratio of caribou to humans was roughly 33 to one in 2018.(Related: Travelers flooded these national parks with long lines and crowded trails.)Getting far away from it all has become a pandemic obsession. Although many national parks were closed this past spring due to COVID-19, most of them re-opened for summer season and have experienced a surge in visitation. This popularity brings complications. At many parks, a flood of first-time guests has left a tsunami of litter and graffiti in its wake. Visitors who do not wear masks or abide by social distancing guidelines bring the potential to infect park rangers and other guests.Yellowstone National Park, which received more than four million visitors in 2018, counted four-and-a half-million visitors in 2019—and a record-breaking number of cars by mid-August of this year. Remote native communities, which are disproportionately susceptible to viral infection, have been put at risk by visitors from all over the map; earlier this summer, the Blackfeet Nation closed off road access to Glacier National Park’s east entrances in an effort to prevent infection.(Related: With trails open, is it safe—or ethical—to go hiking this summer?)The annual recreational visitor count for all National Park Service (NPS) units increased by some 9 million—from 318.2 million in 2018 to over 327.5 million in 2019. According to Pam Ziesler, who tracks and coordinates NPS visitors statistics, many national parks are still behind in reporting their 2019 visitor statistics (likely due to complications with COVID-19 park closures, staffing disruptions, wildfires, and seasonal hurricanes). Lists of most- and least-visited parks are subject to change.(Related: Here’s how to visit national parks as lockdowns lift.)These 10 parks are ideal for social distancers—just be mindful to follow park rangers’ cautions. Avoid activities that could land you in a hospital. Last but not least, plan ahead. Many parks and associated outfitters are currently requiring permits or reservations for accommodation, activities, and transportation that would usually require less advanced notice.",
"Tempting tropical beaches, lush forests, and crystalline Caribbean waters are the hallmark of Virgin Islands National Park on the island of St. John.High green hills dropping down to enchanting turquoise bays, white powdery beaches, coral reefs, and ruins that evoke an era of sugar and a tragic period of slavery all find protection on St. John, one of about a hundred specks of Caribbean land known as the Virgin Islands.Despite its small size—19 square miles—St. John's wide range of rainfall and exposure give it surprising variety. More than 800 subtropical plant species grow in areas from moist, high-elevation forests to desertlike terrain to mangrove swamps, among them mangoes, soursops, turpentine trees, wild tamarind, century plants, and sea grapes. Around the island live the fringing coral reefs—beautiful, complex, and exceedingly fragile communities of plants and animals, which St. John's famous beaches depend upon.In 1493 Columbus sighted the large assemblage of islands and cays and named it after St. Ursula's legendary 11,000 virgins. Since then, Spain, France, Holland, England, Denmark, and the United States have controlled various islands at different times. The Danes began colonization in the 17th century, and in 1717 planters arrived on St. John. By mid-century 88 plantations had been established there; slaves stripped the steep hillsides of virgin growth and cultivated the cane. By the time the Danes abolished slavery in 1848, the sugar industry was doomed. A fallow, century-long period known as the "subsistence era" followed.Fearful that the Germans might capture the islands during World War I, the United States bought St. John, St. Croix, St. Thomas, and about 50 smaller islands from Denmark for $25,000,000. In 1956 conservationist Laurance S. Rockefeller donated more than 5,000 acres for a national park on St. John; in 1962 the park acquired 5,650 undersea acres off the northern and southern coasts. Today, though its boundary includes three-quarters of St. John, the national park owns only slightly more than half the island. Of increasing concern is the escalating pace of development on private inholdings inside its borders. It also feels pressure from the numerous cruise ships that disgorge large numbers of visitors at once, badly straining park resources. Some of the park's trails may be closed for maintenance work; ask at the visitor center.Much of St. John's vegetation is second-generation growth; most of the island was clear-cut in the colonial period to make way for sugar-cane production.",
"In 1912, an eruption of the volcano Novarupta formed the caldera and crater lake at the summit of Mount Katmai. A 2018 expedition set out to uncover traces of Katmai National Park’s history before the massive explosion.Standing on a beach in late May 2018, surrounded by her team members and gear, Laura Stelson thought, “What have I gotten myself into?”An archaeologist who started working for Katmai National Park & Preserve two years earlier, Stelson was about to lead a four-week expedition, retracing historic routes by a National Geographic explorer in the 1910s. The modern-day expedition’s goal was to find and manage evidence of the trips a hundred years ago as well as the populations that had lived in the area before it was forever changed by a massive volcanic explosion. Stelson’s expedition would cover at least 200 hiking miles, using eight different base camps along the way.The nearly 5 million acres of the combined park and preserve—more than three times the size of Grand Canyon National Park—sit about 290 miles southwest of Anchorage. There are no roads into Katmai, most of which is designated wilderness where no hunting is allowed. The only way in is by boat or float plane.1921: Members of an expedition sponsored by National Geographic come ashore in Katmai National Park. 2018: Expedition leader and archaeologist Laura Stelson, archaeologist Nicholas Triozzi, and park ranger Montana Cohn set off in a zodiac in Katmai Bay.For most travelers to the park, Katmai is mainly a chance to visit a 1.2 mile-long fishing hole for brown bears that, thanks to the Bear Cam and Fat Bear Week, has become an internationally celebrated phenomenon.(Related: Alaska is the best place to see wild bears—but this mine could threaten them.)The developed section of the park, Brooks Camp, hosts overnights in cabins and a campground, as well as daytrippers who fly in to ogle brown bears from viewing stands. Although Brooks Camp usually opens June 1, the coronavirus pandemic is delaying the 2020 opening by one month. Visitors still up for travel to the park can book day trips or overnights for July 1 and beyond.The lodge and campground are a short walk from the river where 40 or so of the park’s 2,200 resident bears bulk up for the winter. The most popular viewing area for visits overlooks the falls where bears wait around in the hopes of turning a leaping salmon into one of the day’s many meals.The 1921 Katmai expedition captured this image of active steam jets in the Valley of Ten Thousand Smokes.But the delay in opening gives travelers considering a trip to Katmai time to go beyond the bears, to find out more about the Valley of Ten Thousand Smokes, the area that inspired one scientist a hundred years ago to fight for protection for the land.Although Stelson had been preparing for months and had some previous backpacking experience, her trip through both the Katmai River Valley and the Valley of Ten Thousand Smokes was far and away the most ambitious backcountry adventure she had ever set out on, let alone led.“Certainly nothing on the scale of having a bush plane drop me off in the middle of nowhere in Alaska and having to hike my way out over three weeks. I was very overwhelmed by that prospect,” says Stelson.The team included a rotating cast of nine people, some who arrived along with new supplies by float planes.But most of the travel was by foot. While nobody sensible would label any backcountry travel in Alaska a walk in the park, Katmai’s terrain adds extra challenges—and rewards.“Katmai is a very unique place with all these different types of landscapes presented in one single park,” says Stelson. “You have coastal beaches. You have tundra. You have spruce forest, mountains, volcanoes, and you have this weird desert. So there’s just a lot of environmental diversity and diversity of experiences.”Beyond Brooks Camp, most of Katmai is truly wild. (Although even Brooks can feel very wild when rangers call out to head inside because a few sizable brown bears are racing between the buildings.) And Stelson and her team were heading deep into those wilds to repeat the route that scientist Robert Griggs followed during four expeditions 100 years earlier.“It was four years of expeditions we were trying to cram into four weeks,” she says.Griggs, a botanist, started exploring the area after the 1912 eruption of Novarupta, the largest volcanic eruption of the 20th century. Over 60 hours, Novarupta released so much magma that, eventually, the ash made its way all around the world. And it blocked all sunlight from filtering through to Kodiak Island, which sits 83 miles from the volcano, for three days.(Related: Here’s why Mount St. Helens isn’t where it should be.)On one of Griggs’ early expeditions, he noticed steam curling out of a fumarole in the area of the volcano. Then he noticed a few more. And even more.Griggs was thrilled. “It was as though all the steam engines in the world, assembled together, had popped their safety valves at once and were letting off surplus steam in concert,” he later wrote.2018: Snowmelt forms a small waterfall.The landscape so moved him that, along with the backing of the National Geographic Society, Griggs lobbied to protect the area and have it declared a national park. He called it a “living laboratory [where you] could watch life colonize this otherwise completely barren landscape” of pumice and ash, says Stelson.Stelson’s motive for exploring the area was to learn more about Griggs’ expeditions as well as the village and people who lived in the area before the eruption.“There were indigenous people that lived [there]," says photographer Katie Orlinsky, who documented Stelson and her team, but their communities were displaced and re-established away from Novarupta after the explosion.(Related: See how Alaska’s thaw reveals—and threatens—cultural heritage.)Stelson hopes one day to find the right technology to scan what lies underneath the pumice and other rock that covers the otherworldly landscape. (NASA has used the area to train astronauts for space missions.)Maps played just one role in plotting the route the group took during the trip. Traversing a landscape that has seen major shifts due to climate change and other environmental factors requires other guidance. So Stelson and her team relied on photos from Griggs’ expeditions to figure out where Griggs’ group had hiked and set up camps.“We tried to put ourselves as closely as we could to their position,” she says.Adds Orlinsky: “We were wandering around in circles, you know, trying to match the peaks of the mountains [in the photos] with the peaks of the mountains [in front of our eyes]. It was more challenging than we thought [it would be].”The team also tried to reshoot many of the photos, known as repeat photography, to document a century of erosion, vegetation regrowth since the eruption, and glacial melt.But thanks to those very same environmental changes, repeat photography didn’t make for easy navigation.“It added a lot of detouring and it put the landscape into perspective. We would hike four kilometers to the spot we thought was going to be the photo retake point, and then realize that we were still way off,” says Stelson.Along with the work, Stelson says she had the chance to see some of the most stunning places imaginable. Her favorite was Katmai Pass. The land was still covered by snow and ice. Nobody expected to find much life there.“We wound up finding these hot streams that were flowing through the snow and keeping things green,” she says. The group also saw caribou and bears. “Everything around it was this kind of splotchiness of gray and white, with this weird little thread of life cutting through.”It was details like that thread of life that pushed Stelson’s early fears away.By the time the expedition wrapped up, her relationship with the park had deepened to something that will last throughout her life. “Now I’m going back as often as I can,” she says.",
"Visitors to Katmai National Park in Alaska often come in July to watch brown bears grab sockeye salmon around the Brooks Camp waterfall. The park harbors some 2,000 protected bears.Volcanoes and bears—powerful, unpredictable, and awe inspiring—embody the wild heart of Katmai. Within the borders of the national park and preserve are 15 volcanoes, some of them still steaming, and North America's largest population of protected brown bears—about 2,000 of them.You can hike, kayak, and canoe here. You can fish waist-deep in rivers as clear as glass. And you can watch the best fish catcher of all, the great Alaskan brown bear, sometimes diving completely under the water for its prey, sometimes catching fish in midair. At the end of the day you can relax in a rustic yet sumptuous lodge on the shore of a sapphire lake and recount the day's enchantments.In 1912 a volcano here erupted with a force ten times that of Mount St. Helens in 1980. Suddenly news of Katmai, a place hardly anyone had heard of, was on front pages around the world. Ash filled the air, global temperatures cooled, acid rain burned clothing off lines in Vancouver, British Columbia, and on Kodiak Island, just across Shelikof Strait from Katmai, day became night.Leading a 1916 expedition sponsored by the National Geographic Society, botanist Robert Griggs ascended Katmai Pass from Shelikof Strait. "The whole valley as far as the eye could reach was full of hundreds, no thousands—literally, tens of thousands—of smokes curling up from its fissured floor," he wrote. The smokes were fumaroles steaming 500 to 1,000 feet into the air. Griggs, who named the Valley of Ten Thousand Smokes, spearheaded the campaign to include Katmai in the National Park System.Today, the smokes are gone from the valley. But steam vents still appear elsewhere in the park.From Anchorage, scheduled jets fly the 290 miles to King Salmon, park headquarters; from there, June to mid-September, daily floatplanes fly the last 33 miles to Brooks Camp, site of a summer visitor center and the center of activity. Air charters can be arranged into other areas. You can drive the 9 miles from King Salmon to Lake Camp, at the western end of the park on the Naknek River, then go by boat to Brooks Camp, the Bay of Islands, and other areas of Naknek Lake.June to early September. Only then, with transportation from between Brooks Camp and the Valley of Ten Thousand Smokes, are the lodges, cabins, and Brooks Camp Campground open. Bear watching, an increasingly popular pastime, is best in July when the sockeye salmon spawn (bear watching suffers a brief lull in June and again in August). Fishing and hiking are good throughout summer, but come prepared for rain. Heavy snowpack may remain in the upper elevations into July. Summer daytime temperatures range from the mid-50s to mid-60s; the average low is 44°F.If your time is short, get to Brooks Camp. People, fish, bears, boats, and planes concentrate here. Compared to the rest of the park, it's crowded. But the lodge and campground are comfortable (reservations required) and the bear viewing unforgettable. You'll find good hiking and fishing.If at all possible, take the bus or van tour 23 miles out from Brooks Camp to the Valley of Ten Thousand Smokes. Return the same day or hike into the valley and camp. You can extend your stay by boating or flying to the many other lakes, streams, rivers, and lodges in the park. Pick your area, make a safe plan, and go.Katmai National Park is home to the largest concentration of brown bears in the world. In fact, more bears than people are estimated to live on the Alaska Peninsula.",
"An Alaskan bull moose wanders across the fall-colored tundra of Denali National Park.You don't have to seek out the wildlife in Anchorage. It's all over. Giant moose stroll downtown. Black bears, bald eagles, and brown bears live in the parks, especially near the streams that teem with salmon. They sell bear spray at Costco. Go for a stroll in Bicentennial Park or Kincaid Park and you may see Spruce Grouse, fox, lynx, or willow ptarmigan (the state bird).Take a drive south of town along Turnagain Arm. This is pretty water, but it's not that friendly. It has the second-largest tides in North America (after the Bay of Fundy in Canada). Occasionally, when the tide comes back in, it forms a four to six foot tall wave called a "Bore Tide." Adventurous surfers will get in their dry suits and take their boards out to catch a 20-mile wave.Half of the country's national parklands are in Alaska. So the question isn't whether to go to the national park. It's "which one?" To the north is Denali National Park and Preserve. To the south is Kenai Fjords National Park. Also accessible by road—but a little farther away—is the nation's largest national park, Wrangell-St. Elias. It includes the historic Kennecott Mining District. Take a flight to see Lake Clark National Park and Katmai National Park, both located on the Alaska Peninsula on the other side of Cook Inlet from Anchorage.The Alaska Native Heritage Center offers an in-depth glimpse at Alaska's native people. There are sample home sites around a lake where visitors can see how tribes from a particular area lived: their food, their building material and their customs. Local guides share their knowledge of the particular region. The Anchorage Museum of History and Art has a special Smithsonian exhibit on the arctic—see clothing, artifacts and tools which have been carefully preserved. Multimedia displays feature interviews with elders and archival photos and video.It's a toss-up. Choose from a trip up to the slopes of Denali National Park or to see the huge glaciers of Kenai Fjords National Park. Take the Alaska Railroad from Anchorage on either of these getaways. Go north to Talkeetna, where you can fly with K2 Aviation up to the Ruth Glacier. Get out and spend some time frolicking on the glacier. The vast ice-and-snowscape will take your breath away, in the shadow of Denali. Or, take the train south to Seward and board a sightseeing cruise out to see the glaciers and the whales in Kenai Fjords National Park. If you have time, stop in to the Alaska SeaLife Center, a research facility which features huge aquariums and aviaries so you can see the salmon and the birds up close.Take the Old Glenn Highway to Knik River Road. Drive to the very end, about 55 miles from downtown Anchorage, and you'll find the Knik River Lodge. You will recognize it by the helicopters in the front yard, but don't overlook the restaurant's tasty offerings. You're just a five-minute flight from Knik Glacier, where you can get out and hike. Or, even better, they will take you on a dog sled tour over the glacier.Alyeska Ski Resort in the community of Girdwood, 35 miles from Anchorage along the Turnagain Arm (still is within the city limits) is popular with locals and visitors. In the summer they run the tram up to the mid-mountain Roundhouse. The restaurant, Seven Glaciers, is one of those "special occasions" locations—you can actually count seven glaciers, too.Keep in mind it doesn't get dark in the summer, so June, July, and August are like one long afternoon. But around 9:00 p.m., the sun starts to hover above Mt. Susitna, also known as "Sleeping Lady." As the sunset lingers for hours, the sun seems to slide down Sleeping Lady's slopes. Locals go out to the end of the runway at the airport at Point Woronzof to watch the show. Often, they take the dogs down to the rocky beach and enjoy the fiery show. The bonus is that big jets take off overhead, bound for points in Europe, Asia or the "Lower 48."Get a window table at SteamDot Coffee Shop inside the Williwaw complex at Sixth Avenue and F Street. The crowd that comes for coffee is interesting, but your window looks out on Town Square. There's always an interesting collection of folks enjoying the flowers and scenery of Anchorage's center.Artisan brewing has taken off in Anchorage. Several tasting rooms serve up their own creation, including King Street Brewing, Anchorage Brewing and Resurrection Brewing. Other full-service restaurants brew their own delicious beers, including Moose's Tooth Pizzeria, Glacier Brewhouse and Midnight Sun Brewing. One outlier, Double Shovel Cider Company, offers a selection of tasty ciders from their tap room in an industrial park.",
"A male brown bear, known locally as Braveheart, fishes for salmon at McNeil Falls, home to one of the largest seasonal congregations of bears on Earth. As many as 80 have been seen at one time in this spot.Katmai National Park and Preserve, AlaskaOn a sunny day in August, more than two dozen brown bears are gathered at Brooks Falls, in Alaska’s Katmai National Park, to feast on sockeye salmon. Thousands of the fish are delayed or stranded here by the six-foot waterfall, a hurdle they must leap over to return to their native spawning grounds upstream. The bears occasionally growl at each other, competing for the best fishing spots.A huge male known as Lefty, who has white scars on his flank from past battles with rivals, perches on the upper rim and snags salmon out of mid-air. Every few minutes, Lefty catches one and ambles to a wet rock to devour it, leaving behind guts and bones. After eating about 20, he retreats to a shallow spot in the middle of the river to rest, dazed from gorging himself and unfazed by the current, water dripping from his tousled coat.Rivers etch patterns in the silty shores of Chinitna Bay, a renowned brown bear viewing area in Lake Clark National Park and Preserve. The animals gather here to eat sedge grasses and clams in the mudflats in spring and early summer.At McNeil River Falls, biologists have learned to read brown bear behavior and have developed techniques to observe them safely. This has helped give rise to a thriving bear-viewing business.Mere feet away, on a raised wooden platform, dozens of people jockey for the best vantage point. Cameras and phones out, they watch, spellbound, talking over the rumbling waterfall and the shrieks of glaucous gulls fighting for leftovers.The bears don’t seem to notice.“These bears have come to agree that humans are pretty much okay,” says Larry Aumiller, who for 30 years ran the camp at McNeil River State Game Sanctuary and Refuge, to the east, where as many as 80 bears have been seen at once. People involved in bear-watching have discovered that if you’re careful and respectful, the bears view humans as a neutral presence; in turn, the animals present little danger to us, he says. Indeed, no human deaths or serious injuries have happened in the normal course of bear-viewing, adds bear biologist John Hechtel. (At Moraine Creek, to the west of McNeil in Katmai, one large male walked within 10 feet of me to reach a fishing spot, unconcerned by me and my camera-wielding colleagues.)A female known as T Bear nurses her year-old cubs in the tidal flats of McNeil River State Game Sanctuary and Refuge. Augustine Volcano, which last erupted in 2006, is in the background. Bear advocates worry a proposed mine corridor to the north could negatively affect the animals.“To see this many bears in one place is a huge testament to how pristine the entire ecosystem is,” says photographer Acacia Johnson, who’s been visiting these spots for years with her mother Leslie and father Kirk, a former dentist, bear guide, and accomplished bush pilot based in Anchorage, whom I traveled with to see the animals.On the Alaska Peninsula, a vast area nearly the size of Maine between Bristol Bay and Cook Inlet, brown bears outnumber human residents several fold. About 8,000 to 10,000 brown bears live here, a fifth of North America’s total. These bear populations, the densest in the world, are made possible by the region’s unparalleled abundance and diversity of salmon—hundreds of millions of them, including all five Pacific species, return each year from the ocean to breed in myriad lakes and rivers.Male coastal brown bears can weigh up to 1,500 pounds at their fish-fattened peak in autumn, making them among the largest in the world. Though they are very similar to grizzlies, they are bigger and also tolerate being in close quarters with each other, thanks to the fish feast, making them star attractions when they congregate to feed at places like Brooks Falls and McNeil River Falls.These unique conditions have given rise to a robust bear-viewing industry. Dozens of tour operators fly in tens of thousands of visitors to see the animals each year, bringing in $36 million a year to the region, according to a recent study.At the most popular bear-viewing spots, people know the animals as individuals. Millions around the world watch the Brooks Falls webcam, which the National Park Service operates 24/7 in summer. Many of the bears have been given names, and in October, viewers vote in the Fat Bear Week contest, to determine which bear is best prepared for winter. (Lefty was a finalist this year.)Brown bear trails create mazes through the sedge grass of Chinitna Bay. Sedges, which can have as much as 18 percent protein, are nutritious for bears. This spot is popular with tourists for day trips by bush plane.A brown bear and her three cubs observe an approaching bear at Brooks Camp in Alaska's Katmai National Park and Preserve. Here, summer visitors easily can view wild brown bears fishing for salmon at Brooks Falls.But the bears, and the sustainable industry that’s grown up around them, face a new threat. The proposed Pebble Mine, which would tap into the world’s largest unexploited deposit of gold and copper, would drastically change this undeveloped region and potentially affect the behavior, and even survival, of its unique brown bears.The mine proposal from Pebble Partnership, owned by Canadian mining company Northern Dynasty Minerals, is working its way through the federal permitting process. The project has ignited intense backlash in the Bristol Bay region, where a majority of residents oppose it, as polls have repeatedly shown. The bay and its waterways comprise the world’s largest sockeye salmon fishery, which provides jobs for 14,000 people.Many in the salmon industry are concerned that runoff from the mine and the destruction of salmon streams during mine construction would degrade the fishery. In 2014, the Environmental Protection Agency agreed, concluding the mine would present an unacceptable risk to Bristol Bay’s watershed. It would lead to “complete loss” of important fish habitat and irreversible ecosystem degradation, according to the EPA at the time.The bears at McNeil Falls are uniquely habituated to small groups of bear viewers. Summer permits to visit McNeil River are distributed via a lottery system, allowing only 10 people per day.But Alaska Governor Mike Dunleavy and President Donald Trump have both enthusiastically endorsed Pebble. After the pair met aboard Air Force One in June, the EPA announced July 30 it would no longer oppose the project. The Army Corps of Engineers, which oversees the federal permitting process, is expected to complete a final environmental review and approvals this year. Construction could begin as soon as 2024.Opponents also fear a catastrophic collapse of one of Pebble’s earthen tailing dams, which would hold hundreds of millions of tons of mining waste. Representatives for Pebble say treated runoff wouldn’t significantly impact the fish and that the dams would be engineered to prevent failure. The mine would employ an average of 850 people during its planned 20-year life.Anything that would decrease populations of salmon, the base of the food web, could affect the bears. But biologists and guides are particularly concerned about the sprawling transportation corridor that would serve the mine—and edge close to some of the best bear-viewing spots.Sockeye salmon school near a bridge at Brooks Camp. The Alaska Peninsula and Bristol Bay watershed serve as the largest sockeye salmon nursery in the world.A brown bear eats a salmon at McNeil Falls. The establishment of a successful bear-viewing camp here has challenged the belief that brown bears are always dangerous to humans.A young adult brown bear fishes for salmon underneath the visitor boardwalk at Brooks Camp, in Katmai, where in summer some 400 people a day come to see the animals. A system of boardwalks, trails, and viewing platforms makes it easy to watch the bears.The corridor would include a natural gas pipeline and 80 miles of roads that could interfere with bear movement, according to the draft environmental impact statement released by the Army Corps last February. Vehicle collisions could kill bears, and the corridor could create new conflicts between humans and bears. The animals could become more aggressive if they learn to associate humans with food, biologists say; they could also become scared of people and avoid popular bear-viewing spots. Finally, new roads in this undeveloped, remote wilderness could spur future mining, and make it easier to hunt the animals.Mike Heatwole, Pebble Limited Partnership’s vice president of public affairs, says the mining operation won’t harm bears. “It’s our view that our operation can fully function without degradation to the bear-viewing experience,” he says.“We’ve spent a lot of time on the bear issue, and I don’t see it as a significant risk from the transportation corridor,” adds Pebble CEO Tom Collier. He says the corridor is far enough away from viewing locations to have a minimal impact.In August, bush pilot Kirk Johnson flies Acacia and me over McNeil Falls in a single-engine aircraft. Even at 2,000 feet, we can see dozens of brown bears in the river, feasting on chum salmon.Visitors watch bears eat sedge grass in the salt marsh at Chinitna Bay, with the dramatic peaks of the Aleutian Range in the background.In the distance, the dramatic peaks of the Aleutian Range ring the coast along Cook Inlet, sloping down to rolling tundra and wetlands. The land is wet and green, with thousands of lakes and streams flowing through meadows and stands of pine and alder.Thirteen miles to the north of McNeil Falls, Pebble plans to build a port at Amakdedori Beach, on Cook Inlet, to transport concentrated copper and gold.Waves, wind, and storms pummel this wild coast. A massive driftwood berm created by the tempestuous weather stretches the length of the beach; extreme tides have pushed logs and other detritus miles inland. Bob Shavelson, who runs the environmental organization Cook Inletkeeper, says this is “one of the nastiest places for running a boat.” Both the weather and the shallows of Kamishak Bay, just offshore, make it “one of the most unforgiving navigational settings in the world.”Flowers bloom along Amakdedori Creek and Beach, the proposed site for Pebble Mine's industrial port. Here, barges would be loaded with containers of concentrated metals from the mine, 55 miles northwest. The barges would bring the containers to a ship anchored in the bay, which is known for shallow reefs and violent weather.Regardless, the bay could soon be a docking station for barges and ships at the end of the mine’s transportation corridor—which bear advocates worry could be more disruptive for bears than the mine itself.The corridor would begin some 55 miles northwest, at the mine site, where copper and gold ore would be turned into concentrate, creating acidic waste that would be stored there in perpetuity. The concentrate would be sealed in containers and trucked to a new port on Lake Iliamna, Alaska’s largest. From there, an ice-breaking ferry would carry the containers across the water, to another port, where they’d be transferred to trucks and driven to the proposed shipping port at Amakdedori Beach. Barges would take the ore to an ocean-going vessel anchored in the bay, and that ship would bring the concentrate to a smelter for further processing.On that last stretch of road, the 37 miles from Lake Iliamna to Amakdedori Beach, vehicles would pass every 18 minutes. The route would cut through roadless wilderness and prime bear denning territory, says Dave Crowley, a biologist who oversees the region for the Alaska Department of Fish and Game. At its closest, the road would come within less than a mile of McNeil River State Game Refuge, and it would bisect an important wildlife corridor running between Katmai National Park to the south, the McNeil refuge to the southeast, and Lake Clark National Park to the north.Many of the bears that fish at McNeil in the summer move north of the proposed corridor route to den, Aumiller says. With a road there, bears would be at risk of getting hit by cars and killed, and some deaths are inevitable, says Sean Farley, a biologist with the fish and game department.James Fueg, another Pebble spokesperson, says the company would limit driving speeds to 35 miles per hour, teach employees to avoid wildlife, report sightings, and stop traffic if necessary to avoid collisions.The draft environmental impact statement says potential consequences from the road include “loss of habitat due to land conversion, increased mortality from vehicular collisions … and behavioral changes based on avoidance of humans.” Even with this warning, the report has a major shortcoming, says biologist Derek Stonorov, who was stationed at McNeil River Camp from 1990 to 2000 and has studied coastal brown bears for more than 50 years. The assessment only considered impacts to bears within a three-mile radius of the road, which is insufficient considering they travel up to 80 miles a year, he argues.“It’s a travesty that they would want to put a road in there,” Stonorov says. “It’d be the end of that whole area.”At bear-viewing hotspots, attacks are essentially unheard of, says Aumiller. While he has been charged a couple times, he’s never had to use his shotgun or bear spray, which guides carry. “Bears have the reputation of being dangerous and unpredictable, and they are neither of those,” says Chris Day, a long-time bear-viewing guide.Brown bear tracks dot the beach of Naknek Lake, at Brooks Camp. The spot has become increasingly popular thanks to a live webcam on Explore.org, which millions around the world watch every year.A large male called Rocky rests at McNeil Falls. Bear advocates are concerned that the proposed Pebble Mine would not only hurt the world-class salmon habitat that feeds the bears but also irrevocably alter the animals’ peaceful relationships with humans.Fireweed blooms in the foreground as visitors watch brown bears walk through the edge of the McNeil River campground.Almost all attacks are caused by humans behaving badly, such as leaving food out or startling bears, says Michael Saxton, a Brooks Camp ranger. “It's very challenging to learn how to operate around large, unpredictable mammals, but somehow the bears seem to have figured it out,” he says.But this peaceful coexistence could be threatened if people traveling and working along the corridor feed the animals or leave out garbage, which could cause the animals to associate humans with food. On the other hand, non-lethal deterrent techniques, such as projectiles and noise-making devices, commonly used to keep bears away from human-occupied areas, could cause bears to avoid people and bear-viewing spots, Aumiller says.“Bears that are negatively habituated to the project, or have become food conditioned, may become a danger to the public at bear viewing areas,” the Army Corps’ statement notes. When an animal becomes “food conditioned,” it means they associate humans with treats, which can make them bolder around people and thus more dangerous.Pebble’s Heatwole says the company has a plan to “ensure this does not become an issue, and our approach to operations will be in line with [best] practice among Alaska industries.”“We will do things such as fencing off the port and ensuring safe and appropriate handling and disposal of all food and waste,” he says.Besides harmful associations, the road would create easier access for hunting, both legal and illegal, says state biologist Crowley. “Any time you open up a road in bear country, harvest and illegal killing tends to go up and reduce the bear numbers.”For Aumiller, any loss of bears that have come to view humans as a neutral, safe presence would be “beyond tragic.”“It’s like a betrayal of trust,” he says.At Brooks Falls, I meet people who know the bears like old friends. Kyle Mendel, a young man from Houston, loves to watch the webcam with his mom Kathi, who paints the bears in watercolors. He’s a fan of Otis, a bear who’s now sitting in a frothy hollow beneath the falls, stealthily feeling for salmon. Peter Brown, 80, a retired computer programmer from California, has been returning for decades. “This place kind of gets in your blood, and you want to come back,” he says.In the evening light, a brown bear called Fluffy grazes on sedge grass near the McNeil campground. Bear advocates worry that Pebble could lead to the deaths of animals that have learned to view humans as a neutral presence. That would be "beyond tragic," says Larry Aumiller, who ran the camp at McNeil River Falls for three decades.Naomi Boak, who does outreach for the park, comes to the Brooks Falls platform daily to answer questions. Originally from New York City, she learned about the bears in 2014 from the webcam.“When I started watching,” Boak says, “I couldn’t walk, I didn’t have a job, and I had to have my hip replaced.” She got hooked. Earlier this year, a job in public relations opened up at Brooks Camp. Within weeks, she got the job and found herself moving to Alaska.“I never thought I’d be here,” Boak says. “It’s the most incredible privilege.”Watching the bears helped cheer Boak up. “I just think they’re fascinating creatures. They’re resilient, they’re smart, they’re playful, they have great stories.”The Army Corps of Engineers is expected to finalize its environmental impact statement this summer. Soon after, Pebble hopes to receive a Record of Decision from the corps approving a permit under the Clean Water Act, the final major approval the company needs to move forward. Pebble would then go through state and local permitting process, Heatwole says, which takes three to four years.While I’m speaking with Boak and the Johnsons, a large blonde female bear with large ears, called 128 Grazer, climbs onto the rim of the falls next to Lefty. In spring 2016, Grazer brought a trio of new cubs here. Previously more docile, she began challenging even the largest and most dominant males for access to prime fishing spots. The gambit could’ve killed her; instead, it worked. She successfully raised all three cubs, who finally left her side in 2018.These kinds of surprises keep people coming back for a lifetime, Kirk says. “This is the gem of gems. It doesn’t get any better than this anywhere on the planet.”",
"The gaping crater of Mount Saint Helens, seen here on September 5, 2019, is a reminder of the deadly volcanic blast that rocked the Pacific Northwest 40 years ago.The frosty volcanic peaks of the Pacific Northwest stand in a remarkably straight line, rising from the crumpled landscape east of Interstate 5. But one volcano is conspicuously out of place. More than 25 miles to the west of the other explosive peaks, in the southwest corner of Washington State, sits Mount St. Helens.It’s been 40 years since Mount St. Helens famously roared to life, sending ash and gas 15 miles high, flattening 135 square miles of forest, and killing 57 people in the country’s deadliest eruption. Today, the volcano is still one of the most dangerous in the United States, and the most active of the Cascade Range.Where all this firepower comes from, however, has been an enduring mystery. The volcano’s defiant position out of line perches it atop a zone of rock too cold to produce the magma necessary to feed its furious blasts.“There shouldn’t be a volcano where Mount St. Helens is,” says Seth Moran, scientist-in-charge at the U.S. Geological Survey’s Cascades Volcano Observatory in Vancouver, Washington.Solving this puzzle is about more than satisfying geologic curiosity. The firestorm 40 years ago was a reminder of the dangers the Cascade volcanoes pose to millions of people—and a hard shove propelling volcanology into the future. In the decades since, scientists have used the extensive observations of that blast to better understand eruptions around the world, and bolster our readiness for those yet to come.“This was a fundamental leap forward in our understanding of this style of eruption,” says Janine Krippner, a volcanologist with Smithsonian’s Global Volcanism Program.Crucially, a more detailed view of the volcano’s inner workings could help researchers better track the shudders and shifts that foreshadow an eruption, potentially helping to hone volcanic forecasts and get people out of harm’s way.Four decades after Mount St. Helens’ eruption, scientists finally are unearthing some clues to its curious position. In one of the most comprehensive efforts to trace a volcano’s roots, the Imaging Magma Under St. Helens project, or iMUSH for short, used a slew of analyses to bring these subterranean secrets to light. Overall, the volcano doesn’t follow the textbook picture of a peak sitting above a chamber of molten rock. Instead, it seems, a diffuse cloud of partially molten blobs lingers deep below the surface, offset to the east of the edifice, toward the neighboring Mount Adams.A column of searing ash and gas rises from Mount St. Helens on May 18, 1980, seen here from the southwest. Less than two weeks after the eruption, some of this volcanic ash had drifted all the way around the world.On the crisp, clear morning of May 18, 1980, geologists Dorothy and Keith Stoffel were soaking up glorious views of Mount St. Helens from the air. As a special treat for Dorothy’s upcoming 31st birthday, the pair had secured permission from the USGS to charter a flight over the volcano. It had been rumbling for nearly two months, but the mountain was almost tranquil early that Sunday. When Dorothy called the USGS to check if the flight was a go, she was told: “Come on over, there’s nothing happening here.”Usually covered in snow and glaciers, Mount St. Helen’s white flanks had been blackened by the volcano’s recent burbles. The pair snapped pictures of the symmetrical peak from the windows of the Cessna 182. “It was so calm and serene, I almost felt a sense of disappointment,” Dorothy recalls. “In my mind, I thought, Oh, the mountain’s become dormant again.”A swollen bulge that protruded from its northern flank was one of the few visual reminders of its active state. Since late March of that year, the bulge had grown six and a half feet each day. As the Stoffels flew by, Dorothy spotted glistening white tracks of melted ice rolling down the volcano’s ashen face, a sign of the intense heat just below the surface. The plane then looped across the sky, eventually making two passes over the volcano’s crater.At 8:30 a.m., they decided to make one last arc heading east above the bulge. That was when the volcano suddenly unraveled.Faster than they could comprehend what was happening, a crack more than a mile long split the mountain, and the north side collapsed in the largest landslide ever recorded above water. The pair continued snapping images as the ground seemed to liquify, and more than 0.6 cubic miles of material—enough to fill a million Olympic swimming pools—churned downslope.“As a geologist, you expect volcanoes to erupt,” Dorothy says. “You do not expect mountains to instantly fall apart.”The landslide released the pressure on the magma building below—like popping the cork of a champagne bottle—and the volcano let loose. Billowing clouds of hot rock jetted northward in a massive sideways blast, the first of its kind observed in detail. Traveling as fast as 300 miles an hour, the explosion sheared the peak off the volcano, and wreaked devastation across hundreds of square miles.Swelling clouds from the sideways blast began to overtake the Stoffels’ plane. The pilot dropped into a nosedive to gain speed. “I really thought our lives were over,” Dorothy says. But by veering south, the trio narrowly escaped.As they retreated, Dorothy watched the plume of searing gas and ash billow skyward, flashes of volcanic lightning illuminating the crater. For more than nine hours, the plume towered over the volcano, blanketing the region in ash and blotting out the sun.A helicopter drops off equipment at Mount St. Helens to monitor for potential activity. The array of instruments that keep close watch on the volcano has undergone multiple upgrades since the 1980 eruption.The Stoffels’ harrowing account is a vital piece of information among the numerous observations of the explosive event recorded by both citizens and scientists. Nearly 34 miles to the east, on Mount Adams, climber John Christiansen, raised his ice ax to the sky. The air was so electric, it shocked him through his woolen mitten. Some 45 miles to the southwest, on Oregon’s Sauvie Island, artist Lucinda Parker and her husband tracked the roiling plume as their three-year-old daughter played in the sand. More than 145 miles to the east, Douglas Bird and his family were leaving for church when he spotted the approaching clouds laden with ash, unlike anything he’d seen before.The power of the blast has echoed through generations and brought researchers from around the world to Washington State to study the volcano. The iMUSH project was, in part, born from this intense fascination.Mount St. Helens is a member of the Cascadia volcanic arc, which stretches from British Columbia to Northern California. Similar to many volcanoes around the world, this simmering range is the product of a subduction zone, a tectonic collision where, in this case, a dense oceanic plate plunges beneath a more buoyant continental plate. As the slab descends, pressures and temperatures climb, and fluids percolate out of the slab, triggering the solid mantle rocks to melt. Less dense than its surroundings, this molten magma shoves its way upward through the crust, creating volcanoes.Most of the Cascade volcanoes—and others around the world—take shape above the spots where the plunging slab descends to roughly 62 miles deep, where temperatures get high enough for magma to form. But the situation is different at Mount St. Helens. Standing tens of miles to the west of other volcanoes, the infamous peak perches a mere 42 miles above the subducting plate.The iMUSH project kicked off in the summer of 2014 in part to try and solve this conundrum. To craft images of the subsurface, scientists can study the speed at which seismic waves travel and their path underground; it’s not unlike taking a planetary ultrasound. Battling flat tires and unmaintained dirt roads, dozens of researchers assembled to deploy a fleet of seismometers all over the volcano’s flanks.For one part of the analysis, the researchers detonated a series of blasts and watched the waves roll in. Another set of instruments recorded every tremble around the peak—such as the rumble of ocean waves and earthquakes on the other side of the world—for two years. Other researchers tackled the system by studying the chemistry of the rocks themselves. And still more scientists used Earth’s magnetic and electric fields to map out the conductivity of the subsurface.“As far as the group was able to do, the kitchen sink got thrown at St. Helens,” says the USGS’s Moran, who was part of the iMUSH team.The results show that seismic waves creep along slowly in a zone east of Mount St. Helens, some 10 to 25 miles deep. Differences in minerals can influence the speed of seismic waves, but magma can be another source of this sluggishness. Perhaps rocks melt as expected near the rest of the Cascade volcanoes, the analysis suggests, but some diverts westward to squeeze through the subsurface and feed Mount St. Helens.The story from the rocks themselves fits with this picture. By melting samples of erupted rock under a variety of conditions in the lab, the team revealed that the sticky gas-rich magmas that give Mount St. Helens eruptions their punch form at a depth similar to the proposed reservoir, says Dawnika Blatter, an experimental petrologist on the iMUSH team who works with the USGS’ California Volcano Observatory.The surprising offset of this magma “suggests we need to look more broadly than just right below a volcano if we’re going to understand where the magma is coming from,” says Geoffrey Abers, a geophysicist at Cornell University who was part of the iMUSH seismic analyses.After the 1980 eruption, researchers may have even caught trembles from nearby this deep melt zone, as the earth adjusted to the draining of molten rock. For nearly a year after the blast, Moran says, tremors rumbled to the southeast of the peak. Subterranean shifts in magma can produce quakes around volcanoes, so knowing whether these tremors are in fact linked to Mount St. Helens’ magma pockets could help direct future monitoring efforts.“We’ve known that the southeastern side of St. Helens is a little bit of a weak spot in the network,” Moran says. “Having insight into reasons why earthquakes are occurring out there gives more impetus to improving that side of the volcano.”The choreographer of this magmatic dance is still being debated. Many scientists see clues in the surrounding landscape, which bears scars from millions of years of tectonic jostling that could help direct the modern flow of molten rock.A volcanic plateau known as Siletzia once sat off North America’s west coast. But Earth’s continuous tectonic shifting slowly closed the gap, and some 50 million years ago, Siletzia collided with the continent. As the ocean between the two landmasses closed, seafloor sediments were scraped into a heap beneath the surface and squeezed into stone. According to the iMUSH team, this indelible tectonic suture may lie just beneath Mount St. Helens.The scientists sketched out structures from this merger using a method known as Magnetotellurics, which tracks the conductivity of rocks. Minerals that are carbon- and sulfur-rich, similar to those that might form from marine sediments, “light up like a Christmas tree,” says Paul Bedrosian, a geophysicist with the USGS and a member of the iMUSH team. Sure enough, just beneath Mount St. Helens, a swath of such illumination marks the region where ancient marine sediments were turned into a particular rock type called metasedimentary.The analysis unveiled another surprise just to the east of the volcano: A vast area of low-conductivity rock sits just above where deep magma may pond. The scientists believe this rock is a slug of now-cooled magma that formed millions of years before Mount St. Helens was born.The differences in the properties of this volcanic plug, known as a batholith, and the metasedimentary rocks of the suture zone may alter the stresses in the region and thus direct the magma flow. The batholith limits magma from rising to the east of Mount St. Helens; the metasedimentary rocks could serve as a relief valve, drawing the volcano’s sticky, viscous magma to the surface.A dense wall of rock beneath these metasediments, also revealed by the seismic array, may actually be part of this lost landscape, providing a westward stop for the flow of magma, says Jade Crosbie, a geophysicist with the USGS in Lakewood, Colorado, and part of the iMUSH team.While the iMUSH analyses help sharpen our view deep inside the planet, the picture remains far from complete, Moran says. “One of the general rules in geophysical imaging is the deeper you go, the less you know.”Today, the remains of Siletzia can be seen only piecemeal at the surface, partially buried by flows of now solidified lava and soils studded with trees. This leaves scientists debating where the suture zone—and its role in magmatic direction—precisely lies. To actually put your hand on Siletzia rocks, you’d have to travel tens of miles to the west of Mount St. Helens, says seismologist Eric Kiser of the University of Arizona, who was an iMUSH team member.As the researchers continue to sort through the sea of other data from iMUSH, many more questions dance in their heads. How does the system change over time? How quickly does the magma move? How does such a vast zone of partly melted rock focus into a volcanic pinprick on the surface? Each potential answer helps shape our understanding of how and why volcanoes erupt, which can help researchers connect what happens at one volcano to the broader picture of volcanism around the world, says seismologist Helen Janiszewski of the University of Hawaii at Manoa.Since that fateful day in 1980, Mount St. Helens has awoken multiple times, even as the population living in its shadow has grown. That confluence reinforces the need to keep close watch on this particular peak, and scientists have embraced that task.“Mount St. Helens is being monitored really well,” Kiser says. “The USGS people, they’ve got that under control.”",
"Lightning snakes through a volcanic plume, obscuring Anak Krakatau from sight during an eruption in January 2019. This image was taken just two weeks after a flank collapsed on the volcano, sending a tsunami crashing onto nearby coasts and marking the start of a six-day-long volcanic thunderstorm.In December 2018, after months of sputtering, the Anak Krakatau volcano in Indonesia collapsed. Its southwestern flank slid into the sea, shoving a wall of water into the neighboring islands of Sumatra and Java. The catastrophic event and resulting tsunami killed more than 430 people and injured thousands more.The collapse was only the start of Anak Krakatau’s fiery fit. The volcano continued to billow a gaseous plume miles into the sky, feeding a rare six-day thunderstorm that sparkled with lightning. The event offered scientists an incredibly detailed look at how some eruptions can affect local weather in remarkable ways. As described in a new study in Scientific Reports, this intense volcanic storm was supercharged by vaporized seawater that chilled to ice in the rising plume, unleashing more than 100,000 flashes of lightning.“It blew me away how much lightning was there,” says Andrew Prata, a post-doctoral researcher at the Barcelona Supercomputing Center and lead author of the study. At its peak, the volcanic lightning storm crackled with 72 flashes a minute.Billowing clouds of vaporized water shroud Anak Krakatau at the start of the lengthy volcanic thunderstorm in December 2018.Volcanologists are starting to unravel how these flashy shows could be used to track the ever-shifting dangers of volcanic eruptions, yet the specific processes that drive the lightning are just coming into focus. Another volcano, Bogoslof in the Aleutian Islands of Alaska, began a series of eruptive events in December 2016 that continued for nearly nine months, resulting in thousands of lightning strikes that scientists are also using to piece together the inner workings of volcanic storms.The latest studies of Anak Krakatau and Bogoslof emphasize the watery mechanisms that drive the varied personalities of volcanic eruptions.“We have to think broadly about the full range of eruption styles ... to use lightning in a meaningful way,” says Alexa Van Eaton, a volcanologist with the U.S. Geological Survey's Cascades Volcano Observatory and lead author of the study on Bogoslof in Bulletin of Volcanology.Whether sparked by a springtime shower or an eruption of volcanic fury, all lightning requires what’s known as a charge separation, which develops as positively and negatively charged particles accumulate in different parts of a cloud. As the opposing charges build up, they generate an imbalance that nature resolves by releasing a bolt of electricity—lightning.In an atmospheric thunderstorm, the charges form in a chaotic swirl of ice, slush, and liquid water. Collisions between these phases of water can shear electrons from the particles, leaving some positively charged and others negatively charged.In volcanic eruptions, on the other hand, ash particles play a critical role. These tiny fragments form as the rapid expansion of gases in magma shatter the molten rock into glassy shards, which gain a charge in the process. The ashier the plume, the higher the chance these particles collide and fracture within the billowing clouds, producing even more charge that might spark lightning.Researchers have long suspected that ice also plays an important role in driving volcanic light shows. Eruption plumes, even from volcanoes not surrounded by the ocean, are laden with water that was previously entrained in the magma. When these plumes rise high enough in the atmosphere for ice to form, the lightning rates and intensity often skyrocket, explains Stephen McNutt, an expert in volcanic lightning at the University of South Florida who was not involved in the new work.“It’s a really intriguing grey area of how volcanic lightning comes about,” Van Eaton says.Indonesia’s Anak Krakatau first peeked its head above the ocean waves in 1929, nearly half a century after its parent volcano Krakatau blew a massive crater in the seafloor in one of the largest eruptions in recorded history. Over the decades, Anak Krakatau has continued to reach higher into the sky, but two years ago, its ascent halted when one of its sloping sides crumpled back into the sea.Seawater flooded the system and vaporized into towering volcanic clouds that stretched as high as 11 miles, according to satellite analyses. At the lower levels, ash was likely abundant, evidenced by a hefty sprinkle of glassy shards on nearby shores. But the ash didn’t seem to reach up to the cloud tops, leaving white puffs like a run-of-the-mill thunderstorm.Infrared data and modeling suggest that the volcanic clouds were remarkably rich with ice, containing a mass of frozen water equivalent to 600,000 Asian elephants—five times the amount of ice found in non-volcanic clouds nearby. This wasn’t the most ice-rich eruption volcanologists have seen, but the storm lasted nearly a week thanks to a steady supply of seawater. The rates of lightning were also startlingly high, with an average of 8.7 flashes each minute.In satellite imagery of the event, puffy clouds and tropical thunderstorms faded in and out of view over the Indian and Pacific Oceans, but the storm over Anak Krakatau remained steadfastly in place—“right where the action is happening,” Prata says.“It’s a fantastically massive thunderstorm,” says the University of Bristol’s Karen Aplin, who specializes in atmospheric electricity and was not part of the new research.Hints of ice supercharging volcanic storms date back to the mid-1960s, when daring scientists risked their lives to study the eruptions of the Surtsey volcano off the coast of Iceland, Van Eaton says. The researchers took boats perilously close to the rumbling shores of the volcanic island and flew planes through the hazardous plumes to document Surtsey’s blasts.While much of the lightning they observed was tied to black jets of volcanic ash, the researchers spotted one period of intense electricity flashing in the sky. They suggested it could have been driven by a process similar to a meteorologic thunderstorm, which would mean it was driven by ice.Grassland birds of the Great Plains wade by the water's edge as a storm begins to take shape in the background.Decades of research since, however, have shown just how complex these icy processes can be in volcanic lightning. The patterns of lightning at one eruption don’t necessarily translate to another. For example, lightning only flashed for half of the explosions during the 2016 and 2017 eruption at Alaska’s Bogoslof volcano.Later analysis revealed that only the plumes rising above the altitude where ice forms produced strong lightning. This dramatic change surprised Van Eaton, who "previously thought about the role of ice as sort of an extra boost for lightning," she says. Instead, the presence or absence of ice was like a switch at Bogoslof, clicking the tendrils of light on and off.The pair of analyses of Bogoslof and Anak Krakatau provide a detailed peek at the complex array of factors that must unite to stir a spark. As current methods improve, researchers will likely continue to tease out more details of volcanic lightning mechanics.Van Eaton vividly recalls videos of the death-defying work at Surtsey in the 1960s: “We’re just now circling back with more modern tools and techniques to sort of show that, yeah, they got it right.”",
"Lava streams down the flanks of Anak Krakatau ("child of Krakatoa") during an eruption seen from a nearby island in Indonesia in July.A tsunami swept across Indonesia's islands of Sumatra and Java the night of December 22, just before 9:30 p.m. local time. There was no notice for the wall of water, which left devastation in its wake. Though casualties are likely to rise as missing people are located, at least 220 are confirmed dead and more than 800 are injured.The reason behind the lack of warning is the surprise source of the waves: Unlike past events triggered by earthquakes, this tsunami was most likely caused by the collapse of an offshore volcano.People sift through debris in the aftermath of the deadly tsunami in Lampung Province, Indonesia, on December 23, 2018. Hundreds of houses were destroyed and dozens of residents have been found dead.The geologic beast in question, Anak Krakatau, has been undergoing a stuttering eruption since June 18 of this year. While more detailed information about the exact sequence of events leading to the tsunami is still emerging, much of the evidence is currently pointing toward a landslide associated with the volcano's activity. A large portion of the southern flank of the volcano slid into the ocean yesterday, according to images from the European Space Agency's Sentinel-1 satellite.Such events are not unusual, notes geophysicist Mika McKinnon: “Volcanoes are just weakly glued together layers of rock, where every eruption just kind of slips more down, so you have all these layers of rock that are tilted into the direction of downhill.” It doesn't take much for a piece to break loose. And if that piece happens to be large, it can send massive waves toward shore with little to no warning.“You can think of it as being a really large and destructive cousin of throwing a pebble into a pond,” McKinnon says.When most people think of tsunamis, images of ground-rattling earthquakes usually follow. These are some of the most common sources of the devastating walls of water. Movements in the ocean crust can displace the overlying chunk of water, causing waves to pile up and crash into nearby shores.“But they're not the only way to get tsunami,” McKinnon says. Glacier calvings, landslides, and volcanic eruptions can also spark the massive waves.In this case, the most likely culprit is Anak Krakatau. If this name sounds familiar, that may be because the volcano is the product of the infamous Krakatoa volcano, which roared to life in 1883 in one of the largest eruptions of modern times. The eruption was so large it could be heard nearly 3,000 miles away on Rodriguez Island, and a resulting tsunami killed more than 36,000 people. It also could have been the inspiration for Edvard Munch's famous artwork The Scream. After the fiery storm, all that was left was a massive crater.“But it didn't die. Instead a new volcano started growing,” McKinnon says. The baby volcano was aptly dubbed Anak Krakatau, or “child of Krakatoa.”For this week's event, the volcanic source of the waves initially generated some confusion about what was happening onshore. Earthquakes can give some notice of potential tsunamis, but the landslide didn't generate regular earthquake waves. Instead, researchers picked up a low-frequency rumble around the time of the tsunami—a hint that a landslide may be to blame.Scientists have only recently started studying these low-frequency signals, but they are commonly associated with volcanic activity—like the movement of magma deep underground or the collapse of volcanic chambers—or events like glaciers calving or submarine landslides.“The signal has been found in Naypyitaw, Myanmar, as well as across Java, Sumatra, [and] Borneo,” Jamie Gurney, founder of UK Earthquake Bulletin, says via Twitter direct message. But the waves didn't stop there—they traveled as far as Arti in the Russian Urals and Kambalda in Western Australia.Modeling provides additional clues to what happened. Using the arrival times of the waves and the known topography of the region, Andreas Schäfer, a post-doctoral researcher at Karlsruhe Institute of Technology, began testing where the land might have given way. The velocity of the wave is determined by water depth and wave height related to the slide itself, allowing researchers to simulate the events.Schäfer's model suggests that the landslide traveled southeast or southwest, with waves that took between 30 to 35 minutes to arrive onshore. Right now, confirmed data suggest the waves first hit at Marina Jambu, near Anyer in Java.And at the center of it all sits Anak Krakatau.Krakatoa's child has made itself heard in recent years. It's currently sending a massive plume of steam and dark jets of volcanic material into the air as part of a six-month-long volcanic rampage.“It could be that the activity this year built up material that contributed to this probable collapse event,” Concord University volcanologist Janine Krippner says via direct message. “But it is too early to tell.”The volcanic collapse could have alternatively resulted from material that's built up over the decades. Back in 2012, researchers modeled the effects of a massive collapse of the volcano's southern flank, and they concluded that the resulting tsunami could trigger 50- to 100-foot-tall waves on nearby shores within a minute.“What this tells us is that a collapse and tsunami was a known hazard at Anak Krakatau,” Krippner says. “But even knowing this does not mean that when and how big can be predicted.”Though scientists can analyze past events to model possible future ones, it's still impossible to give much warning for these landslide-driven local tsunamis. The devastating 2004 earthquake and tsunami off the coast of Sumatra sparked a slew of studies into early warning systems for earthquake-generated waves. But this latest event, as well as another “surprise” tsunami earlier this year near Palu, Indonesia, underscore the need for more work.“With such an active volcano, the hazards may change over time,” Krippner says. “This is a complicated situation, and it does not fall under the usual tsunami warning category, as there was no earthquake preceding the event.”And then there's the need for adequate financial resources to take meaningful action, Krippner adds: “While we of course need more hazards research, we need funding, support, and cooperation to turn the research results into policy and action.”",
"A tsunami is a series of ocean waves that sends surges of water, sometimes reaching heights of over 100 feet (30.5 meters), onto land. These walls of water can cause widespread destruction when they crash ashore.These awe-inspiring waves are typically caused by large, undersea earthquakes at tectonic plate boundaries. When the ocean floor at a plate boundary rises or falls suddenly, it displaces the water above it and launches the rolling waves that will become a tsunami.Most tsunamis–about 80 percent–happen within the Pacific Ocean’s “Ring of Fire,” a geologically active area where tectonic shifts make volcanoes and earthquakes common.Tsunamis may also be caused by underwater landslides or volcanic eruptions. They may even be launched, as they frequently were in Earth’s ancient past, by the impact of a large meteorite plunging into an ocean.Tsunamis race across the sea at up to 500 miles (805 kilometers) an hour—about as fast as a jet airplane. At that pace, they can cross the entire expanse of the Pacific Ocean in less than a day. And their long wavelengths mean they lose very little energy along the way.More than 1,500 people died in Rikuzentakata, one of several towns eradicated by a tsunami that hit Japan.In deep ocean, tsunami waves may appear only a foot or so high. But as they approach shoreline and enter shallower water they slow down and begin to grow in energy and height. The tops of the waves move faster than their bottoms do, which causes them to rise precipitously.A tsunami’s trough, the low point beneath the wave’s crest, often reaches shore first. When it does, it produces a vacuum effect that sucks coastal water seaward and exposes harbor and sea floors. This retreating of sea water is an important warning sign of a tsunami, because the wave’s crest and its enormous volume of water typically hit shore five minutes or so later. Recognizing this phenomenon can save lives.A tsunami is usually composed of a series of waves, called a wave train, so its destructive force may be compounded as successive waves reach shore. People experiencing a tsunami should remember that the danger may not have passed with the first wave and should await official word that it is safe to return to vulnerable locations.Some tsunamis do not appear on shore as massive breaking waves but instead resemble a quickly surging tide that inundates coastal areas.The best defense against any tsunami is early warning that allows people to seek higher ground. The Pacific Tsunami Warning System, a coalition of 26 nations headquartered in Hawaii, maintains a web of seismic equipment and water level gauges to identify tsunamis at sea. Similar systems are proposed to protect coastal areas worldwide.A supercell thunderstorm strikes in South Dakota. Among the most severe storms, supercells can bring strong winds, hail, and even tornadoes. (See more extreme weather pictures.)",
"On the morning of November 11, just before 9:30 UT, a mysterious rumble rolled around the world.The seismic waves began roughly 15 miles off the shores of Mayotte, a French island sandwiched between Africa and the northern tip of Madagascar. The waves buzzed across Africa, ringing sensors in Zambia, Kenya, and Ethiopia. They traversed vast oceans, humming across Chile, New Zealand, Canada, and even Hawaii nearly 11,000 miles away.These waves didn't just zip by; they rang for more than 20 minutes. And yet, it seems, no human felt them.Only one person noticed the odd signal on the U.S. Geological Survey's real-time seismogram displays. An earthquake enthusiast who uses the handle @matarikipax saw the curious zigzags and posted images of them to Twitter. That small action kicked off another ripple of sorts, as researchers around the world attempted to suss out the source of the waves. Was it a meteor strike? A submarine volcano eruption? An ancient sea monster rising from the deep?“I don't think I've seen anything like it,” says Göran Ekström, a seismologist at Columbia University who specializes in unusual earthquakes.“It doesn't mean that, in the end, the cause of them is that exotic,” he notes. Yet many features of the waves are remarkably weird—from their surprisingly monotone, low-frequency “ring” to their global spread. And researchers are still chasing down the geologic conundrum.In a normal earthquake, the built-up tensions in Earth's crust release with a jolt in mere seconds. This sends out a series of waves known as a “wave train” that radiates from the point of the rupture, explains Stephen Hicks, a seismologist at the University of Southampton.The fastest-traveling signals are Primary waves, or P-waves, which are compression waves that move in bunches, like what happens to an extended slinky that gets suddenly pushed at one end. Next come the secondary waves, or S-waves, which have more of a side-to-side motion. Both of these so-called body waves have relatively high frequencies, Hicks says, “a sort of ping rather than a rumbling.”Finally, chugging along at the end come slow, long-period surface waves, which are similar to the strange signals that rolled out from Mayotte. For intense earthquakes, these surface waves can zip around the planet multiple times, ringing Earth like a bell, Hicks says.However, there was no big earthquake kicking off the recent slow waves. Adding to the weirdness, Mayotte's mystery waves are what scientists call monochromatic. Most earthquakes send out waves with a slew of different frequencies, but Mayotte's signal was a clean zigzag dominated by one type of wave that took a steady 17 seconds to repeat.“It's like you have colored glasses and [are] just seeing red or something,” says Anthony Lomax, an independent seismology consultant.Based on the scientific sleuthing done so far, the tremors seem to be related to a seismic swarm that's gripped Mayotte since last May. Hundreds of quakes have rattled the small nation during that time, most radiating from around 31 miles offshore, just east of the odd ringing. The majority were minor trembles, but the largest clocked in at magnitude 5.8 on May 15, the mightiest in the island's recorded history. Yet the frequency of these shakes has declined in recent months—and no traditional quakes rumbled there when the mystery waves began on November 11.A startling sunset reddens the Lemaire Channel, off the west coast of the Antarctic Peninsula. The continent’s coastal ice is crumbling as the sea and air around it warm. This photo originally published in “The Larsen C Ice Shelf Collapse Is Just the Beginning—Antarctica Is Melting.”The French Geological Survey (BRGM) is closely monitoring the recent shaking, and it suggests that a new center of volcanic activity may be developing off the coast. Mayotte was formed from volcanism, but its geologic beasts haven't erupted in over 4,000 years. Instead, BRGM's analysis suggests that this new activity may point to magmatic movement offshore—miles from the coast under thousands of feet of water. Though this is good news for the island inhabitants, it's irksome for geologists, since it's an area that hasn't been studied in detail.“The location of the swarm is on the edge of the [geological] maps we have,” says Nicolas Taillefer, head of the seismic and volcanic risk unit at BRGM. “There are a lot things we don't know.” And as for the November 11 mystery wave, he says, “it's something quite new in the signals on our stations.”Since mid-July, GPS stations on the island have tracked it sliding more than 2.4 inches to the east and 1.2 inches to the south, according data from Institut National de L’information Géographique et Forestière. Using these measurements, Pierre Briole of the Ecole Normale Supérieure in Paris estimated that a magma body that measures about a third of a cubic mile is squishing its way through the subsurface near Mayotte.The early period of rumbling was also overprinted with what seemed to be the P- and S- waves of tiny tremors, explains Lomax, who spotted the faint pings by filtering out the low-frequency signals. Such pings are commonly associated with magma moving and fracturing rock as it squirts through the crust. But even those signals were a little strange, says Helen Robinson, a Ph.D. candidate in applied volcanology at the University of Glasgow.“They're too nice; they're too perfect to be nature,” she jokes, although she quickly adds that an industrial source is impossible, since no wind farms or drilling are taking place in the deep waters off Mayotte's shores.Ekström thinks that the events on the morning of November 11 actually did begin with an earthquake of sorts equivalent to a magnitude 5 temblor. It passed by largely unnoticed, he suggests, because it was what's known as a slow earthquake. These quakes are quieter than their speedy cousins since they come from a gradual release of stress that can stretch over minutes, hours, or even days.“The same deformation happens, but it doesn't happen as a jolt,” Ekström says.These slow types of quakes are often associated with volcanic activity. At the Mount Nyiragongo volcano in the Democratic Republic of Congo, a similar slow earthquake and low-frequency waves were linked with a magma chamber collapsing. Slow quakes were also stunningly frequent during the most recent fiery run of Kilauea in Hawaii, which produced nearly 60 of these events between May and the end of July, sending seismic waves around the world.So what is actually causing the super-slow vibrations at Mayotte? A submarine eruption could produce these low rumblings, but evidence for such an event has yet to materialize.Most current guesses revolve around resonance in a magma chamber, triggered by some type of subsurface shift or chamber collapse. The resonance itself can be any type of rhythmic motion, like sloshing of the molten rock, or a pressure wave ricocheting through the magma body, Ekström explains. Studying the intricate features of the seismic waves could yield clues to the size and shape of the molten material lurking below.“It's like a music instrument,” says Jean-Paul Ampuero, a seismologist at the Université Côte d'Azur in France. “The notes of a music instrument—whether it's grave or very pitchy—depends on the size of the instrument.”The signal's odd uniformity could be due, in part, to the surrounding rocks and sediments, Lomax adds. Perhaps the local geology is filtering the sounds and only letting this single 17-second wave period escape.Robinson agrees with this idea, noting that the geology here is extremely complex. Mayotte sits in a region crisscrossed by ancient faults—including fracture zones from the final breakup of the southern supercontinent Gondwana. What's more, the underlying crust is somewhat transitional, shifting between the thick continental crusts and the thinner oceanic crusts. Perhaps this complexity drives the simplicity of the escaping waves, Robinson says.For now, though, the lack of data makes it tough to say more about the wiggly forms. Hicks' preliminary models hinted that the waves emanated from subsurface inflation, rather than a magma chamber draining or collapsing. But with a little additional data, the model flipped and pointed to chamber deflation instead.It also could be a bit of both, notes Robinson: “Some collapse mechanisms, you can get inflation and deflation occurring at the same time,” she says. Or sometimes they can alternate, pumping up and down like Earth's fiery lungs.“It is very difficult, really, to say what the cause is and whether anyone's theories are correct—whether even what I'm saying has any relevance to the outcome of what's going on,” Robinson says.BRGM plans to do ocean bottom surveys to get more detailed information about the region and investigate the possibility of a submarine eruption. In the meantime, the seismic sleuthing continues with the data that's available. Whether the cause is ordinary or extraordinary remains to be seen, Lomax says, but the science—and the fun—is in the chase.“Depending on what field and what time in history, 99.9 percent of the time, it's ordinary, or noise, or a mistake, and 0.1 percent, it's something” he says. “But that's just the way it goes. That's the way it should go. That's scientific advance.”",
"At night, Mount Nyiragongo boils and glows. It’s one of the world’s largest and most volatile lava lakes. In 2002, the volcano erupted onto the nearby city of Goma.Few things rattle residents of the eastern Democratic Republic of Congo. For decades they’ve lived with wars and rebellions spilling out from their jungles—all while keeping a wary eye on the mountain with a halo of smoke looming over the region.“We call him General Nyiragongo,” says a local tour guide on a recent night in Goma, the provincial capital. “Because when he comes, everyone runs.” Here one of the world’s most volatile volcanoes poses an existential threat. Every few decades, Mount Nyiragongo showers the city in lava.In the last few years, Virunga, Africa’s oldest national park, began offering treks to Nyiragongo’s lava lake, the world’s largest. On a cool morning in May, I set off with nine other visitors, two rangers, and a team of porters to summit the 11,382-foot mountain and see it for myself.We’re more than halfway there—nearly 7,200 feet—when the ranger stops at a deep crevasse cutting into the mountain. In 2002, a stream of lava burst from the side of the volcano, swept through where we now stand, and coated Goma in a layer of volcanic rock. Much of the city is still covered by this rubble, and lava has been integrated into everyday life in Goma. It’s built into walls and sold as jewelry—there’s even a United Nations base named for it.The trek starts on a serene, tree-lined path but quickly turns into a grueling, lava-coated hike.After five hours, we reach the last resting point before the final stretch: a 45-minute scramble up the near-vertical rock face. We’re high above the clouds and fog drifts in front of us. Jackets are pulled out and eyes are cast wearily skyward.I reach the top, exhausted. A dozen metal A-frame cabins cling to the mountainside, and after dropping my bags in one of them, I join the group gathered at the volcano’s edge. Mount Nyiragongo’s lava lake bubbles a few hundred feet beneath me. It seems to cannibalize itself, as pockets of fire engulf new areas. A thick fog rolls over the crater, leaving only a liquid gurgle like the sound of a waterfall.In one of the huts, the chef is stirring pots of rice and beef stew over a fire and blasting American music videos from his phone. After dinner we sit on the single bench at the volcano’s edge and pass around oversize bottles of local Simba beer. In the darkness, the lava lake turns into a veiny pit of fire, and the mist hovering around it glows red.Since the trek launched a few years ago, it has become Virunga's most popular tourist attraction. Dozens of foreign tour operators have added it to their dockets and more are coming to scout it.Sitting at the edge of Mount Nyiragongo, a group of Kenya-based travel agents say they plan to add the trek to their tour dockets. They seem confident that even luxury travelers will be lured by the adventures offered in Virunga. One agent already has plans to fly in visitors via helicopter.But life, like the bubbling volcano, is unpredictable in eastern Congo. We discuss rumors that a new rebellion brewing in the country’s center is part of a government plot to create chaos and stay in power. President Joseph Kabila postponed elections last year, and many fear he has no intention of relinquishing power. Even the world’s largest and most expensive UN peacekeeping mission may not be able to prevent another civil war.A thick mist gives the next morning an illusion of calm. The four-hour descent is punctuated by yelps and the sound of sliding rocks. Mount Nyiragongo doesn’t make it easy to leave—or to live.The volcano may be a threat, but it’s also one of the few things providing for the Congolese in this long-forgotten conflict. “He’s a good neighbor,” a local journalist explains in Goma. “He keeps our weather cool, he makes stones for us to build with, he brings people and money to our country.”Getting There: Most visitors fly into Kigali, Rwanda, and drive three to four hours to the Congolese border. You can arrange a tourist visa and a pickup at the border beforehand through Virunga.Outfitters: For U.S. $100 you can rent a backpack stuffed with a sleeping bag, blanket, fleece jacket, and overcoat. Make sure to bring extra socks.Food and Drink: A simple lunch and dinner are provided the first day, and breakfast is served the next morning. Bring extra snacks and powdered Gatorade to stay hydrated.Where to Stay: Spend the night before or after at the well-appointed Mikeno Lodge bungalows at Virunga headquarters. For a taste of Goma, Lac Kivu Lodge offers a beautiful lakeside restaurant and high-quality service.On August 1, 2017, Virunga will be opening a new tented camp, located closer to the volcano trek starting point. The new site will offer views of Mount Nyiragongo and neighboring volcano Nyamuligera.The International Women’s Media Foundation supported Nina Strochlic’s reporting from the Democratic Republic of the Congo.",
"Rescue workers look for victims at the site where a hotel collapsed after an earthquake hit near Palu, Central Sulawesi, Indonesia. As of Monday more than 800 people were confirmed dead after a tsunami triggered by a magnitude 7.5 earthquake slammed into Indonesia's coastline.On Friday, a powerful 7.5-magnitude earthquake shook the Indonesian island of Sulawesi, just after 5:02 PM Western Indonesian Time. Dramatic videos revealed the eerie growth of a mounting wave in a bay near Palu eventually crashing into the coast, sweeping away beach structures as onlookers scatter.Scientists were surprised by the strength of the ensuing tsunami. And experts suggest that the area's unique geology could be to blame for the unexpected progression of the disaster.The earthquake followed a series of temblors that began around 2:00 PM WIB with a 6.1-magnitude quake. The ground continued to roil with 27 aftershocks that eventually gave way to the intense, shallow 7.5-magnitude temblor centered about 6 miles deep, according to the U.S. Geological Survey. Since then, dozens of aftershocks continue to rock the island.As of Sunday evening, local time, the death toll had jumped to 832 people—and officials worry that number could still sharply rise since search-and-rescue teams have yet to reach many regions. This includes the regency of Donggala, home to some 300,000, where communication remains limited and landslides have severed rescue workers' access.The total damage from the powerful quakes is still unclear—but devastation appears to be widespread. According to a statement from the Badan Nasional Penanggulangan Bencana (BNPB), the Indonesian natural disaster agency, the earthquakes have caused power outages, which have crippled communication, but local agencies are working to resolve the situation. Sutopo Purwo Nugroho, BNPB spokesperson, announced via Twitter that the Indonesian army has been deployed to assist with search and rescue.Indonesian Agency for Meteorology, Climatology and Geophysics (BMKG) initially issued a tsunami warning but soon retracted it based on analyses at the time. Yet monstrous waves began crashing on shore, captured in videos that quickly began circulating on social media. According to BNPB, the destructive waves began before the warning was lifted. But the earthquake toppled telecommunications, which prevented officials from sending proper alerts, reports The New York Times.Because of this, the towering waves took many by surprise. One particular video seems to be recorded from the upper floors of the circular parking structure at the Palu Grand Mall, showing waves rushing in below. It cuts off as the crowd starts to run, seeking safety from the wall of water.Tsunamis typically are the result of the abrupt motion of large submarine earthquakes at tectonic plate boundaries. And earthquakes are not uncommon in Indonesia; the island chain sits within what's known as the Ring of Fire, a curving horseshoe-shaped chain of tectonic plate boundaries that hugs the Pacific basin. It is home to around 90 percent of the world's earthquakes.But the monster waves were unexpected for this particular quake.The 7.5-magnitude earthquake appears to be the result of what's known as a strike-slip fault, which takes place as two blocks of crust grind against one another, largely in a horizontal direction. Tsunamis more commonly follow vertical movement in the crust, which disrupts the overlying water and can generate massive waves crashing onshore.“It is definitely a surprise,” says Baptiste Gombert, a geophysicist at the University of Oxford. He notes that Indonesia's geology is highly complex. A spidery web of different types of faults cut through the region, so teasing out exactly what happened is a challenge. But preliminary results hint at a few possibilities.The tsunami might be the result of some vertical movement along the fault, Gombert says. But he finds it unlikely this could entirely explain such high waves, which were reported to stand as tall as 18 feet. “Even if there was a little vertical displacement, this is a pretty big tsunami,” he says. It's likely landslides—either submarine or from the shores—also disturbed the bay waters, causing the wave.Earthquakes are common in Japan but this 1995 Kobe quake was a standout that spelled the end of the road for a section of asphalt highway, a fleet of trucks, and even a huge crane which collapsed under the force of the temblor. The magnitude 7.2 quake was one of the worst in Japan’s long history; 6,433 people were killed and damages topped $100 billion (U.S.)It's also possible that the fault cut through a submarine slope, so the horizontal movement offset the underwater hillside, causing the destructive waves. "You can compare the Palu bay with a bath tub," says Andreas Schäfer, a post-doc at Karlsruhe Institute of Technology in Germany, via email. "When you move one half of it, the horizontal displacement of the sea floor also pushed the water away and when it returned it came back as a tsunami wave." New estimates suggest the land was displaced through Palu City and the bay area, supporting this interpretation, and Schäfer created preliminary models of the event to demonstrate this effect.The bounds of the bay itself may have also been an issue, notes Janine Krippner, a volcanologist at Concord University. “That can amplify wave height as it channels water into a smaller area,” she writes via Twitter message. New estimates of the earthquake's offset suggest that in the city of Palu, there was up to 26 feet of displacement, Gombert notes. This means that some of the waves may have formed within the bay itself, he says, "therefore closer to the city and trapped in the narrow bay."But all of the scientists emphasize that there is still a lot of uncertainty surrounding Friday's events.Indonesian agencies are directing locals to remain aware of continued dangers. “People are encouraged to remain vigilant,” said disaster agency spokesman Sutopo Purwo Nugroho, the AP reports. “It is better not to be in a house or building because the potential for aftershocks can be dangerous. People are encouraged to gather in safe areas. Avoid the slopes of hills.”BNPB put out a call on their official Facebook account for anyone with internet access to help catalog the damage in Palu city and Donggala district using the collaborative online project OpenStreetMap.",
"Earthquakes, also called temblors, can be so tremendously destructive that it’s hard to imagine they occur by the thousands every day around the world, usually in the form of small tremors. Most are so small that humans can't feel them.But every so often, a big quake will strike—most recently a 7.8-magnitude earthquake that struck southern Turkey and Syria on February 6, 2023, which scientists tell Reuters is likely to be one of the deadliest of this decade. Here's what you need to know about where earthquakes typically occur, how earthquakes are measured, and the damage that the strongest earthquakes can cause.(Learn how to stay safe during these disastrous events.)Some 80 percent of all the planet's earthquakes occur along the rim of the Pacific Ocean, called the "ring of fire" because of the preponderance of volcanic activity there, as well. Most earthquakes occur at fault zones, where tectonic plates—giant rock slabs that make up Earth's upper layer—collide or slide against each other.These impacts are usually gradual and unnoticeable on the surface; however, immense stress can build up between plates. When this stress is released quickly, it sends massive vibrations, called seismic waves, often hundreds of miles through the rock and up to the surface. Other quakes can occur far from fault zones when plates are stretched or squeezed.There are several different types of faults, including a normal dip slip fault, reverse fault, and strike-slip fault. Here's what they mean.Strike-SlipWhen portions of the Earth's crust moves sideways, the result is a horizontal motion along a "strike-slip" fault.The most famous example is California's San Andreas Fault, which stretches some 600 miles (1,000 kilometers) from southern California to north of San Francisco. The sideways motion of the fault's branches is caused by the Pacific Ocean's crustal plate moving to the northwest under North America's continental crust.Dip-SlipUp-and-down motions in earthquakes occur over so-called "dip-slip" faults, where the ground above the fault zone either drops (a normal fault) or is pushed up (a reverse fault). A normal fault occurs where the deeper part of the crust is pulling away from an overlying part. A reverse is, well, just the reverse.An example of a normal fault is the 240-mile (150-kilometer) long Wasatch Fault underlying parts of Utah and Idaho, again caused by the Pacific plate driving under western North America. One magnitude 7.0 quake along the fault perhaps 550 years ago dropped the ground on one side of the fault by three feet (a meter). The U.S. Geological Survey sees the fault as posing a risk of more magnitude 7.0 earthquakes.ObliqueFaults that combine sideways with up-and-down motions are called oblique by seismologists. The Santa Clara Valley south of San Francisco holds a fault prone to oblique motions, for example, seen in a 1999 quake.Scientists assign a magnitude rating to earthquakes based on the strength and duration of their seismic waves. A quake measuring 3 to 4.9 is considered minor or light; 5 to 6.9 is moderate to strong; 7 to 7.9 is major; and 8 or more is great.Earthquakes are always followed by aftershocks, which are smaller quakes that strike after the main quake and can continue for weeks—or even up to years in some cases. According to the USGS, some earthquakes also have foreshocks, or smaller quakes that precede a larger earthquake.The strongest earthquake ever recorded was a magnitude 9.5 quake that struck southern Chile in 1960. The Valdivia earthquake—named for the city that suffered the most damage—killed about 1,655 people and left another two million homeless. It also triggered a tsunami that spread across the Pacific and flooded coastlines in Japan, Hawaii, and New Zealand.On average, a magnitude 8 quake strikes somewhere every year, and some 10,000 people die in earthquakes annually. Collapsing buildings claim by far the majority of lives, but the destruction is often compounded by mud slides, fires, floods, or tsunamis. Smaller temblors that usually occur in the days following a large earthquake can complicate rescue efforts and cause further death and destruction.Loss of life can be avoided through emergency planning, education, and the construction of buildings that sway rather than break under the stress of an earthquake.",
"More than a third of Yellowstone National Park sits within the caldera of an active volcano.Something is rocking the massive supervolcano beneath Yellowstone National Park.Thanks to a recent earthquake swarm, the Yellowstone supervolcano has seen upwards of 200 quakes since February 8, along with countless smaller tremors. The largest earthquake was an unremarkable magnitude 2.9, and all of them have hit about five miles beneath the surface. Larger earthquakes have rocked the region in the past, some as destructive as the Hebgen Lake quake and others causing minimal damage.With this most recent swarm, scientists say there's no reason to worry. "Supervolcano" and "earthquake swarm" might seem like daunting terms on the surface, but in Yellowstone National Park, these geologic features are relatively nonthreatening.Here, we take a closer look at what's going on beneath the ground.Earthquake swarms occur when a single area experiences an increase in quakes over a short period of time without the trigger of a single, larger "mainshock." Swarms can result from changes in stress along fault lines, which can be caused by either large-scale tectonic forces or pressure buildup due to changes in magma, water, or gas underneath Earth's surface. (Related: "Why Alaska is Uniquely Prone to Earthquakes and Tsunamis")The area where this current swarm is happening—about 8 miles northeast of West Yellowstone, Montana—is under pressure from both these forces, since Yellowstone is a hotbed for seismicity. But earthquake swarms are frequent in the region, accounting for more than half of the parks' seismic activity. And they haven't triggered any volcanic eruptions yet.Last year, a swarm ten times larger than the current one rocked the same region, generating about 2,400 earthquakes between June and September 2017. This year's swarm could actually be just a continuation of last year's, since seismic activity in the area can be sporadic but ongoing.A supervolcano is exactly what it sounds like—a massive volcano that is capable of erupting with devastating global consequences. A huge magma pocket lurks below the Yellowstone supervolcano, which violently erupted more than 630,000 years ago. That burst rocked the region, spewing forth ash and rock and carving out a volcanic depression that cradles most of the national park today. (Peek inside Yellowstone's supervolcano with our magazine interactive.)Terrifying as this may sound, the Yellowstone supervolcano is not going to erupt anytime soon. It's been dormant for tens of centuries, and the most recent eruption happened about 70,000 years ago."It is not an imminent hazard," volcanologist Guillaume Girard told National Geographic in 2012. "Every study has concluded that there is no magma that is ready to erupt within any foreseeable future."Still, there's no way to tell when the supervolcano actually is going to blow. The U.S. Geological Survey puts the odds of another massive blast at about 1 in 730,000, which is similar to the chance of a disastrous asteroid collision. (Read about Italy's Campi Flegrei, one of the world's most dangerous supervolcanoes.)When it does erupt, Yellowstone's supervolcano will most likely burst in one of three parallel fault zones that run north-northwest across the park. Knowing this helps scientists know which parts of the park should be monitored for future eruptions."The most likely hazard in Yellowstone is from large earthquakes," seismologist Jamie Farrell told National Geographic in 2013.In short—no."While it may seem worrisome, the current seismicity is relatively weak and actually represents an opportunity to learn more about Yellowstone," researchers Michael Poland and Farrell write in a column for the Yellowstone Volcano Observatory. "It is during periods of change when scientists can develop, test, and refine their models of how the Yellowstone volcanic system works."Earthquake swarms are common in Yellowstone, and there's nothing to be concerned about. Of the 1,000 to 3,000 quakes that happen each year in Yellowstone, most are not felt. The largest swarm on record happened in 1985, when more than 3,000 earthquakes hit the area over the course of three months.It's worth noting that Yellowstone is one of the best monitored volcanoes in the world, closely studied by diligent researchers armed with a slew of data from sensors and satellites. Their task is to look for geologic changes in the area.As for the current earthquake swarm hitting the Yellowstone supervolcano?"It's slowly petering out, although these things wax and wane, so it's a bit difficult to say that it's ending," Poland tells Newsweek. "Yellowstone is just a very swarmy place."Mount Semeru, seen with an ash plume, is the highest volcano on the  Indonesian island of Java and has been in a constant eruption since  1967.  It lies at the southern end of the Tengger caldera, which  contains smaller volcanoes Mount Bromo and Mount Batok (both seen in  the foreground), and several others.",
"Tourists pose in front of a collapsed building that serves as a memorial to the people who died in the 2008 earthquake that struck Wenchuan, Sichuan Province, China.Earthquakes regularly rattle our planet, striking somewhere in the world every hour of every day. Such events are the result of the slow-motion march of tectonic plates that build stresses in Earth’s crust and upper mantle. Eventually the stress hits a breaking point and releases in a ground-shaking quake that can send blocks of the Earth careening out of place.Most temblors are too small for humans to feel, but every so often a whopper will rock our planet. The majority of earthquakes occur near the boundaries of tectonic plates—like the mighty San Andreas fault that runs along the United State’s west coast—but scientists still can’t say precisely where and when the next big quake will strike. So if you’re in a region prone to shaking, it’s best to be prepared. Here are some tips to keep you safe.One important way to prepare for a temblor is to try to make your home as safe as possible. For old homes, it’s a good idea to investigate whether it complies with local building codes and identify potential weaknesses. FEMA has some handy guides to help steer you through the fundamentals of earthquake-resistant design and construction.The stuff inside your home is just as important as the walls themselves. Take a tour of each room to look for things that could fall or break if the ground starts to wobble. Sometimes this can be solved with a little reorganization, moving large or heavy objects to lower shelves. Other times fixing issues takes a bit more handiwork, such as bolting bookcases to wall studs, installing latches on cupboards, and securing any large appliances like water heaters.While inspecting your home, make sure you know how to shut off your utilities. And while you’re at it, check out the connections of gas appliances; it’s best if these are flexible rather than rigid so they can bend with the rolling ground.Assemble an earthquake emergency kit that includes food, water, and other supplies for at least 72 hours. When preparing your kit, consider each member of your family and their needs—and don’t forget your pets. The Department of Homeland Security has a detailed guide about putting together a kit for many different contingencies.Search-and-rescue teams survey the rubble in Amatrice, Italy, following a magnitude 6.2 earthquake.Protect yourself as quickly as possible. In many situations that means remembering three actions: drop, cover, and hold.• Drop: Get down on your hands and knees to protect yourself from being knocked over. That also puts you in an ideal position to crawl for shelter.• Cover: Place an arm and hand over your head and neck to shield them from debris. Head for any nearby tables to shelter under until the shaking stops. If a table isn’t in sight, sidle up to one of your home’s interior walls away from tall objects and furniture that might topple. A common misconception in seeking cover is that doorways offer the best protection during an earthquake. But according to the Earthquake Country Alliance, this is only true if you are in an “old, unreinforced adobe house.” In modern homes, the rest of the house is just as strong.• Hold: Stay put until the shaking stops. If you’re under a shelter like a table, keep hold of it with one hand. If you’re out in the open, continue to shield your head and neck with your arms.If you use a wheelchair or walker, or cannot drop to the ground, there are other versions of the above protocol to follow that will help keep you safe. For example, if you are in a wheelchair, lock the wheels and then lean over to protect your vital organs, covering your head and neck with your arms.When the ground starts to roll under your feet, resist the temptation to run outside. Instead, take cover in place. But if you are already outdoors, stay outside and move away from buildings and power lines. If you are driving, pull off the road. But do not stop under an overpass or other structure that could crash down.Coastal quakes can be particularly dangerous since the shifting ground can disturb the water column and produce a tsunami. If you are on a coast when a strong earthquake strikes, get to higher ground as soon as you can.While tsunami warning systems can help give some notice, it’s often too risky to wait for the alert to get to high ground. For one, the time between the siren and the wave crashing onshore may be small. And if the tsunami is local, it might evade warning system detection entirely. For example, a surprise tsunami devastated parts of Indonesia in 2018, thanks in part to the particular geometry of the channel that funneled the water to land. What’s more, as was the case in Indonesia’s 2018 tsunami, cellphone towers toppled by the shaking can prevent transmission of potential alerts.Even after the ground grows still, the danger is not necessarily over. As the Earth settles from its trembling it can produce a series of smaller quakes known as aftershocks. On rare occasions, a second earthquake that’s even bigger than the first might follow. When that happens, the first quake is called a foreshock, and the second temblor is called a main shock. This was the case for the two large earthquakes—a magnitude 6.4 followed by a magnitude 7.1 event—that rocked California in the summer of 2019.Still, once the shaking subsides it’s time to start getting yourself and others ready for more. First, check for injuries. Sometimes people won’t initially feel pain because of the adrenaline that courses through the body during life-threatening events. Next, check the gas and electric lines, and turn them off if you can do so safely. And if you are inside a heavily damaged structure, get yourself and others out as soon as possible.If you’re trapped, stay calm. Protect your mouth, nose, and eyes from the dust and call or text for help. Make noise by whistling or shouting to get responders’ attention. But if you are outside, keep an eye out for hazards like fallen electrical lines, ruptured gas pipes, or precarious structures.Turn on the radio—perhaps one you stowed in your earthquake emergency kit—and listen for updates. Heed warnings and instructions from official organizations like the United States Geological Survey, and be careful about what you see shared on social media. Falsehoods spread like wildfire in emergency situations. To let your family and friends know all is well—or to check for the status of your own loved ones—head to the Red Cross’ Safe and Well website.The unpredictability of earthquakes is frightening, but with a little preparation, you can be ready if a big one strikes.",
"Cars lie smashed by the collapsed Interstate 5 connector just hours after California’s Northridge earthquake in the winter of 1994. While most of the quakes cataloged in the latest study are too small for humans to feel, researchers are hoping these tiny temblors can help decipher the physics behind earthquakes of all sizes.By the time you finish reading this article, two earthquakes will likely have rippled through Southern California.This estimate comes from a new study, published today in Science, that dug through seismic data between 2008 and 2017 and found that Southern California experienced a startling 1.81 million temblors during that decade. That's an order of magnitude more than previously documented, with an earthquake striking roughly every three minutes.Of course, the vast majority of these quakes are so weak they are imperceptible to humans. But this updated earthquake catalog, the most complete yet compiled, promises to help scientists better understand the basic physics behind earthquakes big and small.“With seismology, we pretty much have to sit around and wait for events to occur in order to collect data,” says study author Zachary Ross of the California Institute of Technology. Since large earthquakes are rare, cataloging the tiniest of quakes provides the researchers with a vast untapped dataset that will now allow them to dig deeper and better study the patterns and relationships between events.“It’s kind of like having a better telescope to see stars and planets in space more clearly; sharpening our view of the Earth, in this case,” adds David Shelly of the U.S. Geological Survey, who was not involved with the work.Earthquakes in California are not uncommon. The region is locked in a slow-motion tectonic collision, as the Pacific plate grinds its northwesterly path against the North American plate. These built-up tensions are occasionally released in ground-rattling quakes.It's also not exactly news that little earthquakes are much more common than big ones. That idea was first proposed in the mid 1900s by seismologists Charles Francis Richter—of the Richter magnitude scale—and Beno Gutenberg, who observed that earthquake frequency increases by roughly 10 times with each unit decrease in quake magnitude.“It’s not surprising that teeny tiny earthquakes are popping off all the time. We just haven’t been able to see them before,” says Susan Hough of the USGS, who was not on the study team.The trick is the remarkable sensitivity of modern seismometers, which pick up all manner of rattles and roars—the crash of ocean waves, the rumble of automobile traffic, and perhaps even the occasional boisterous crowd. On the lower end, telling what's an earthquake and what's just noise is far from easy.“We are now talking about events that are all the way down at the noise floor of these very sensitive instruments,” Ross says.For nearly a decade and a half, scientists have been experimenting with a method known as template matching to tease the two apart. When earthquakes initiate in nearly the same spot underground, they produce similar looking squiggles on a seismograph. Changes in magnitude may cause them to stretch up or down, Ross explains, “but the actual wiggles on the thing look almost identical.”Researchers can exploit this property to find tiny earthquakes, using a catalog of larger known quakes as a guide. Scientists previously applied this concept to small regions or short periods of time, but until now, no one had attempted template matching for such a long period across such a large region.The scientists used data collected by the Southern California Seismic Network, a joint project between Caltech and the USGS, that monitors activity from the Mexico border north to San Luis Obispo and Big Pine. The organization faithfully collects seismic information from hundreds of stations around the clock, using computer algorithms to identify earthquakes. Then, professional seismic analysts review the data.“They’re looking for everything from the very largest to the very smallest event,” Ross says. The verified data is then compiled into a catalog for the public.The previous catalog for 2008 to 2017 for Southern California contained 180,000 earthquakes and was nearly complete for events greater than magnitude 1.7. But using template matching backed by supercomputing power, the new catalog expands that number to 1.81 million events and is nearly complete for quakes as small as magnitude 0.3.“It was a heck of a lot of computational work that they did,” says Suzan van der Lee of Northwestern University, who was not involved in the study. Beyond the potential for this new pool of earthquake info in California, she sees setting up the infrastructure, both hardware and software, as an important facet of the work. “Now others don’t have to invent that same wheel.”Ross and his colleagues have already spotted some intriguing patterns in the data, such as quake clustering. If earthquake clusters are like sentences, the tiny earthquakes are the vowels. Without them, you might be able to pick out a word here or there, but it's tough to figure out if the letters form complete phrases. In this way, many past earthquakes seem like random, unrelated background events.But add in the vowels, and suddenly a whole geologic syntax emerges.“In our new catalog, a lot of that randomness is really actually clusters,” Ross says. “These are not isolated events.” While he cautions that there are still some seemingly unconnected quakes, “I think it’s going to have an impact in how we think about the evolution of these sequences.”Some large events also seem to have much more widespread influence than previously thought. This is particularly evident when looking at the magnitude 7.2 Baja California quake that gripped the region in the spring of 2010. A series of aftershocks followed, some shaking just over a hundred miles away. But in the new dataset, the researchers found that the aftershocks actually extended nearly twice as far, lighting up seismographs across Southern California some 170 miles from the earthquake epicenter.Seismologist Meghan Miller of the Australian National University found this to be the most exciting piece of the work, “just being able to see how much of an effect that large earthquake had on all of Southern California seismicity.”These earthquakes are also important for mapping faults in three dimensions throughout the region. For instance, the tiny quakes along the Coyote Creek fault revealed that, although the fault may seem linear at the surface, it's actually curved at depth. Understanding such intricacies of the fractures deep inside Earth helps scientists construct more realistic models of their movements and links to other nearby faults.“We use little earthquakes to illuminate active faults, and the more earthquakes you have, the better job you can do,” Hough says.The work does have its limits. For one, template matching requires a large enough catalog of past earthquakes in any given region. “That has actually some pretty fundamental implications for this work,” Ross says.Lava spews out of a fissure in the Virunga mountains in the Democratic Republic of the Congo. The Virunga chain is part of the East African Rift Valley system, which marks the boundary between two plates: the Nubian plate to the west and the Somalian plate to the east. The rift valley is a classic example of a divergent plate boundary.It's a problem for using the method on the San Andreas fault, a fracture that runs nearly the length of California and poses some of the greatest geologic hazards to the region. Large sections don't host such small earthquakes.For areas like the U.S. Midwest, van der Lee says, template matching is also a challenge since earthquake monitoring is scarce and quakes are relatively infrequent. Without past quake templates, many true earthquake signals are left out of the data. Even so, she notes, some of these rumbles may have similar features to known quakes. She likens these signals to identical twins and their other siblings. The identical twins are the signals included in this new catalog, but they will still have things in common with their other siblings, which means it might be possible to figure out how to include those siblings in the data.One solution to the lack of templates, Ross says, will likely be the use of artificial intelligence, which has already started to transform many scientific disciplines, from our understanding of biological life to the search for other worlds. Until then, however, this new coterie of quakes is plenty to keep scientists busy.“It’s just a really rich catalog,” Shelly says. “I think it is going to be a really exciting dataset that people will comb over for years and decades to come.”",
"Firefighters battle an electrical fire in a mobile home park in Ridgecrest, California, on July 6, 2019 following the magnitude 7.1 earthquake that struck the day before. No fatalities or serious injuries have been reported from this temblor, the largest in Southern California in more than two decades.On the morning of July 4, a magnitude 6.4 rocked Southern California, fracturing roads and sending people fleeing to safety. But that wasn’t all the Earth had in store: Less than a day and a half later, a powerful magnitude 7.1 temblor shook the region.While earthquakes are not unexpected, the two most recent temblors are the largest that have struck this area in decades. And they promise to yield fresh clues about its complex geology.The duo of quakes struck in what’s known as the Eastern California shear zone—an area east of the infamous San Andreas fault, where the Pacific Plate grinds against the North American Plate, creeping northwest at roughly two inches each year. The area extends from the southern Mojave Desert, up the eastern side of the Sierra Nevada, and into western Nevada. It’s crisscrossed by fractures in the Earth caused by the movement along the nearby tectonic plate boundary.“The Eastern California shear zone is a really interesting area,” says Wendy Bohon, an earthquake geologist at the Incorporated Research Institutions for Seismology (IRIS). “How is it working? How is it accommodating plate motion? What are going to be the big structures that come out of this millions of years down the road?”The recent events are what’s known as strike-slip earthquakes, which occur when two blocks of Earth shift side-by-side, grinding past each other. They seemed to have occurred along the same set of faults, located in an area known as the Little Lake fault zone.While no deaths or major injuries have yet been reported, the intensity of the ground movement was quite strong—enough to send goods flying off store shelves and buildings swaying. The shaking was also widespread, with reports of light ground movements as far as Chico, California, and Phoenix, Arizona.Of particular interest in these quakes is that at least the first temblor seemed to have simultaneously broken two sections of faults that cut across each other at nearly a right angle. While such complex quakes are not unheard of, recent research suggests that they may be more common than once believed, explains Zachary Ross, a geophysicist at the California Institute of Technology.“Historically, the thought has been that earthquakes occurred on individual faults,” he says. “And then over time, as the data has gotten better and better, we’ve started to realize that there’s potential for multiple faults to rupture for single events.”This shift in thinking was propelled by the magnitude 7.3 earthquake that shook Landers, California, in 1992. This temblor fractured along at least five fault segments. Subsequent earthquakes have revealed similar complex breakage, including the magnitude 7.2 earthquake in 2010 in Baja California, Ross notes. This latest quake is further evidence that this complexity is common, even for smaller magnitude events.In most circumstances, big earthquakes strike in a familiar sequence: There’s a large earthquake followed by a series of smaller events. That’s because the movement that occurs during a large earthquake causes increased strain in the surrounding region. Earthquakes are the Earth’s way of relieving this strain.But in some circumstances, such as the recent pair of earthquakes in California, a relatively large temblor might just be the forerunner for even bigger event. While the difference between 7.1 and 6.4 may seem minor, magnitude is a logarithmic scale. An increase of a unit of magnitude is about 32 times more energy, which means that the second earthquake released roughly 11 times the energy of the first temblor.Scientists think of this series of earthquakes as the foreshock, the mainshock or strongest event, and then the aftershocks, explains Susan Hough, a seismologist with the U.S. Geological Survey.“But it’s way too simplistic,” she notes.Every earthquake causes a shift in the landscape, redistributing the strain in the crust, which means all earthquakes could trigger other earthquakes. “Whether or not an earthquake itself is an aftershock,” she says, “you can think of it as a potential [earthquake] parent.”The likelihood that a big earthquake will trigger a larger event is roughly one in 20, according to Hough. That’s definitely a low risk. “But that one in 20 isn’t zero,” she says.Scientists, however, are still untangling the connection between the recent events. The magnitude 7.1 temblor seemed to break along the the northwest-southeast limb of the pair of faults that ruptured earlier, Hough notes, extending farther than the first quake in both directions.“Major scientific questions: Did part of the fault break and then break again? How did breaks compare in detail?” she writes on Twitter. Finding the answers to these questions could have important implications for understanding the hazards of these events.“This appears to be the clearest case I've seen that that did indeed happen,” she says of the same fault rupturing more than once in a short time period. “But much work is needed to sort out the details.”So far, many more than a thousand aftershocks have rippled through the region. While the frequency and intensity of subsequent temblors will wane, Southern California likely has more shaking in store. “A magnitude 7 is going to produce activity for years,” Ross says.The USGS estimates that over the course of the next week, between 240 and 410 earthquakes of magnitude 3 or higher will likely ripple through the region. These are events just large enough to feel if you are positioned close to their epicenter. As for larger earthquakes, the probability becomes increasingly small, but not out of the question.The USGS estimates that there’s a 24 percent chance that as many as two earthquakes magnitude 6 or larger could strike in the next week. But as scientists continue to analyze these events, they may adjust those numbers.Such a strong series of aftershocks is not unexpected. “Earthquakes out in the Mojave Desert traditionally have these bigger, robust aftershocks sequence,” Bohon says.She cautions, however, that all of these probabilities are forecasts and not predictions. No one, despite what some claim, can predict future earthquakes. She likens the difference to weather forecasts, which are an estimate of the probability that something might happen.“You would never predict the weather,” she says. “You can’t predict with 100 percent certainty that it [will be] raining unless it’s raining. And earthquakes are very similar.“Bohon emphasizes that it’s normal to be scared during an earthquake, which can rock the ground like a boat in rough water. But as aftershocks ricochet through Southern California, she suggests people who live in earthquake-prone regions check how prepared they are for the next event.“This was a good scenario earthquake,” says Bohon. “It was in a fairly unpopulated area, but a lot of people felt it.” Bohon hopes that means those who experienced it are getting ready for the next one.“It’s okay to be scared,” she says, “but we also have to be prepared.”",
"Earthquakes are common in Japan but this 1995 Kobe quake was a standout that spelled the end of the road for a section of asphalt highway, a fleet of trucks, and even a huge crane which collapsed under the force of the temblor. The magnitude 7.2 quake was one of the worst in Japan’s long history; 6,433 people were killed and damages topped $100 billion (U.S.)About 80 percent of all earthquakes occur where the Pacific Ocean tectonic plates abut those of the surrounding continents along the west coast of the Americas, and through a string of Asian nations including Japan, China, Indonesia, and the Philippines. Another belt of high quake activity stretches through the Mediterranean Sea region eastward into Asia.",
"Lightning crackles inside a pyroclastic flow during a 2014 eruption of Mount Sinabung on the island of Sumatra in Indonesia.The night of February 13, 2014, Indonesia's Kelud volcano burst to life with the ground-rattling energy of some 250 megatons of TNT. Its billowing ash plume shot 16 miles high, sprinkling tiny shards of rock for hundreds of miles.But that wasn't the only thing the ferocious display had in store: Hundreds of volcanic lightning strokes crackled overhead, spreading their spidery tendrils across darkened skies. Now, scientists say such lightning may be just as useful as it is beautiful. A new study, published in the Journal of Volcanology and Geothermal Research, takes another step toward the development of lightning as a monitoring tool to track the ever-shifting dangers of a volcanic eruption.“It sort of fills a niche that no other volcanic eruption monitoring tool can cover,” says study author Alexa Van Eaton, a volcanologist with the U.S. Geological Survey's Cascades Volcano Observatory.The latest work relies on data from the World Wide Lightning Location Network (WWLLN), which is run through a collaboration of over 50 universities and institutions. Using this network and satellite imagery, Van Eaton and her team showed that lightning rates tend to peak at certain times during an eruption, offering clues to how a volcano is behaving even before eyewitness reports are available. (These are the most dangerous volcanoes in the U.S., according to a recent government report.)“We're starting to use those global networks, and that gives a much sweeter perspective on these volcanoes that we would never otherwise be able to access or collect data for,” she says.A large part of scientists' clues to pending volcanic eruptions comes from a network of seismometers that measures Earth's many grumbles. But these instruments are expensive to install and upkeep, making it impossible to wire up the more than 1,500 potentially active volcanos on Earth.Instead, monitoring largely focuses on volcanoes with populations nestled nearby, but that doesn't mean the other geologic giants are hazard-free. People are taking to the skies more than ever in human history, which means remote volcanos are ever increasing risks. Flying through swollen plumes of volcanic ash can cause clogged air filters and even complete engine failure. In 1982, volcanic ash caused all four engines on a Boeing 747 to shut down mid-flight.Satellite imagery can help fill in some monitoring gaps, but no system is perfect. Clouds or nighttime darkness easily obscure satellite imagery. In recent years, infrasound has also become a promising monitoring tool to pinpoint explosive eruptions. But the paths these sound waves take as they travel hundreds of miles can affect what the mechanical “ears” pick up.These challenges were on display during a 2016 eruption of Alaska's Bogoslof volcano, which is cradled in the arm of the Aleutian archipelago. While the tiny island lies under a well-worn flight path, its shores change too quickly for seismometers there to last for long and clouds often obscure the skies overhead. When it started erupting in mid-December, it took more than a week for anyone to notice.By contrast, lightning detection is fast and can work from hundreds of miles away through haze or pitch-black night. And unlike sound, light doesn't suffer so-called path effects, Van Eaton says, making it a valuable tool in the volcano-monitoring arsenal. (See photos of people who live near active volcanoes.)Grassland birds of the Great Plains wade by the water's edge as a storm begins to take shape in the background.Lightning's usefulness is rooted in why these sparklers happen in the first place. Lightning in general comes from the development of what's known as a charge imbalance, or the stripping of electrons from particles. One important way this happens is friction—the same force at work when you rub a balloon against your head to stand your hair on end.“A volcanic plume is a perfect environment for friction,” says Corrado Cimarelli, an experimental volcanologist at Ludwig-Maximilian's University of Munich who was not involved in the new study. “You have a lot of turbulence, you have a lot of particles, [and] these particles collide with each other, and they gain charge.”Material in ash plumes can also fracture and eject electrons, generating a charge imbalance. Or, if the steaming plumes expand up toward the chilly high altitudes, ice formation can contribute to the situation. Thus, the ashier—and more dangerous—the eruption, the brighter the light show.In 2010, the WWLLN started separately tracking lightning activity around 1,563 active volcanoes to help with ash plume detection. It was this data that Van Eaton and her colleagues harnessed for the new analysis. During Kelud's 2014 eruption, the ash plume produced nearly 500 strikes of lightning, according to the WWLLN data. That's not even every crackle of light, Van Eaton notes, since WWLLN detectors only pick up the most energetic of flashes.“We’re just taking the cream off of the milk,” she says.The team combined this data with satellite imagery to monitor the plume's expansion from above, using these images to calculate the rate at which the volcano spewed molten rock and ash.“The more stuff coming out at a time, the faster that radius expands,” explains Van Eaton. What they found was that lighting peaked at six strokes a minute during the early intensification of the eruption and then tapered off as the plume reached a steady expansion.Van Eaton and colleagues observed a similar spike in lightning during a 2015 eruption of the Calbuco volcano in Chile. In that instance, the lightning peaked at the onset of a pyroclastic flow—a dangerous avalanche of hot rocks and ash. Together, the results hint that these spikes in lightning rates reflect some key change early in the eruption.“It's an interesting paper,” says Cimarelli, who calls the results encouraging but kind of simplistic. As Van Eaton and her colleagues note in the study, there's still a large amount of uncertainty associated with general estimates of mass spewing from a volcano based on satellite imagery. There's also the issue of WWLLN sensors detecting just a fraction of the lightning.“That doesn't mean that it's not without value,” says atmospheric scientist Sonja Behnke of the Los Alamos National Laboratory. “It's just, we see something, but there's really a whole lot more going on.”Cimarelli, a National Geographic grantee, replicates volcanic lightning in miniature eruptions to meticulously control each factor. Though the scales vastly differ, lightning in these lab-made eruptions similarly peaks in their initial stages. Then, the flashes become less frequent as the plume expands, likely because the distance between particles—and their ability to charge and discharge—grows ever longer, he says.“Even with these, let's say, general observations, they already seem to get something which we also see in the [lab] experiments,” Cimarelli says. Still, there's much more to be studied. For one, it's tough to tell if WWLLN-detected flashes are due to storms or volcanoes. The new study hints there may be some difference, but it seems to be small.“Further work needs to be done to fully distinguish the two types, but there is great potential here,” says volcanologist Rebecca Williams of the University of Hull.Van Eaton agrees, adding that there's a long way to go before this method can be put into popular use: “What we really have with this paper is some juicy observations. I hope that this will trigger a lot of interesting modeling work, and people who can take these observations and take them to the next level.”",
"The archaeological site of Nunalleq on the southwest coast of Alaska preserves a fateful moment, frozen in time. The muddy square of earth is full of everyday things that the indigenous Yupik people used to survive and to celebrate life here, all left just as they lay when a deadly attack came almost four centuries ago.Around the perimeter of what was once a large sod structure are traces of fire used to smoke out the residents—some 50 people, probably an alliance of extended families, who lived here when they weren’t out hunting, fishing, and gathering plants. No one, it seems, was spared. Archaeologists unearthed the remains of someone, likely a woman, who appears to have succumbed to smoke inhalation as she tried to dig an escape tunnel under a wall. Skeletons of women, children, and elders were found together, facedown in the mud, suggesting that they were captured and killed.As is often the case in archaeology, a tragedy of long ago is a boon to modern science. Archaeologists have recovered more than 2,500 intact artifacts at Nunalleq, from typical eating utensils to extraordinary things such as wooden ritual masks, ivory tattoo needles, and a belt of caribou teeth. Beyond the sheer quantity and variety, the objects are astonishingly well preserved, having been frozen in the ground since about 1660.Emma Frances Echuck and her daughter Valerie take a break from drying salmon in the village of Quinhagak. At a nearby archaeological site artifacts such as this mask are emerging from the permafrost as it thaws.The remains of baskets and mats still retain the intricate twists of their woven patterns. Break open a muddy, fibrous bundle and you’ll find crisp, green blades of grass preserved inside. “This grass was cut when Shakespeare walked the Earth,” marvels lead archaeologist Rick Knecht, a quiet, grizzled veteran of decades of digging.Knecht, who’s based at the University of Aberdeen in Scotland, sees a link between the destruction at the site and the old tales that modern Yupiks remember. Oral tradition preserves memories of a time historians call the Bow and Arrow Wars, when Yupik communities fought each other in bloody battles sometime before Russian explorers arrived in Alaska in the 1700s. Nunalleq offers the first archaeological evidence, and the first firm date, for this frightful period, which affected several generations of Yupiks.Knecht believes the attacks were the result of climate change—a 550-year chilling of the Earth now known as the Little Ice Age—that coincided with Nunalleq’s occupation. The coldest years in Alaska, in the 1600s, must have been a desperate time, with raids probably launched to steal food.“Whenever you get rapid change, there’s a lot of disruption in the seasonal cycles of subsistence,” Knecht says. “If you get an extreme, like a Little Ice Age—or like now—changes can occur faster than people can adjust.”Today increasingly violent weather has driven Nunalleq to the brink of oblivion. In summer everything looks fine as the land dons its perennial robe of white-flowering yarrow and sprigs of cotton grass that light up like candles when the morning sun hits the tundra. But the scene turns alarming come winter, when the Bering Sea hurls vicious storms at the coast. If the waves get big enough, they crash across a narrow gravel beach and rip away at the remains of the site.The Arctic wasn’t always like this, but global climate change is now hammering the Earth’s polar regions. The result is a disastrous loss of artifacts from little known prehistoric cultures—like the one at Nunalleq—all along Alaska’s shores and beyond. Ötzi, the Stone Age man whose body was found in 1991 as it emerged from a receding Italian glacier, is the most famous example of ancient remains brought to light by warmer weather. But a massive thaw is exposing traces of past peoples and civilizations across the northern regions of the globe—from Neolithic bows and arrows in Switzerland to hiking staffs from the Viking age in Norway and lavishly appointed tombs of Scythian nomads in Siberia. So many sites are in danger that archaeologists are beginning to specialize in the rescue of once frozen artifacts. They’re having to make hard choices, though. Which few things can they afford to rescue? And which will they just have to let go?In coastal Alaska, archaeological sites are now threatened by a one-two punch. The first blow: average temperatures that have risen more than three degrees Fahrenheit in the past half century. As one balmy day follows another, the permafrost is thawing almost everywhere.When archaeologists began digging at Nunalleq in 2009, they hit frozen soil about 18 inches below the surface of the tundra. Today the ground is thawed three feet down. That means masterfully carved artifacts of caribou antler, driftwood, bone, and walrus ivory are emerging from the deep freeze that has preserved them in perfect condition. If they’re not rescued, they immediately begin to rot and crumble.The knockout blow: rising seas. The global level of oceans has risen about eight inches since 1900. That’s a direct threat to coastal sites such as Nunalleq, which is doubly vulnerable to wave damage now that the thawing permafrost is making the land sink. “One good winter storm and we could lose this whole site,” Knecht says.He speaks from experience. Since the start of the excavation, the relentless action of the sea has torn about 35 feet from the edge of the site. The winter after the 2010 dig was particularly brutal. Residents of Quinhagak, the modern village just four miles up the beach, remember huge chunks of ice slamming into the coast. By the time Knecht and his crew returned, the entire area they had excavated was gone.Since then Knecht has pressed on with a renewed sense of urgency. Rain or shine, during the six-week dig season, about two dozen archaeologists and student volunteers spend long summer days on their hands and knees gently stripping away soil with their trowels.When this wooden paddle blade from Nunalleq was new, people relied on kayaks to get around. Modern Yupiks use motorboats to visit other villages, hunt sea mammals, and net fish. Mike Smith (right) waded into the Kanektok River before work to hook a few salmon, which he gave to his grandmother. “She was so happy, she put on her apron right away and began cutting them up,”
he says.On an August day that begins warm and buggy but soon turns overcast and cold, Tricia Gillam finds a common artifact that was created with exceptional artistry.It’s a women’s cutting tool popularly called an ulu—uluaq in Yupik—with a curved blade of slate and a carved wooden handle. The archaeologists often uncover a blade, a handle, or an occasional complete ulu, yet this one brings gasps from everyone. The handle has the graceful shape of a seal. But that’s only half the design, it turns out. When local carver John Smith takes a look later from another angle, he sees the outline of a whale.The artifact speaks to the fundamental Yupik worldview that nothing is a single, inflexible entity because everything is in a state of transformation. The ulu handle is a seal, but it’s not a seal. It’s a whale, but it’s not a whale. Other finds embody that same idea: A mask that’s a walrus, or a person. A small wooden box that’s a kayak, or a seal.“That dynamism is a constant part of their lives,” Knecht says. “And climate change is part of that.”If anyone’s going to survive the changes occurring in the natural world, he believes, it’s these people who have always seen their environment as something fluid, requiring adjustments and adaptations. They know firsthand the seasonal patterns of plants and animals, and if there’s a shift, they’ll shift with it.On a visit to 86-year-old Carrie Pleasant (right), Sarah Brown gets advice on sewing a beaver-skin parka. Pleasant made fur garments for all 10 of her children, but kids today usually wear store-bought clothing. “Things are changing so much,” she said wistfully. Pleasant has since passed away.The village of Quinhagak sits on Yupik land at the mouth of the Kanektok River, which winds across the tundra in wide loops before spilling into the Bering Sea. A few gravel streets run past a school, church, post office, supermarket, hardware store, health clinic, gas station, washateria, cell phone tower, and three sleek wind turbines that spin in the brisk sea breeze.Officially, 745 people live here, in metal-roofed, wood-frame houses that perch on stilts a foot or so above the once frozen ground. But on any given day the actual population may be larger, swelled by relatives who have come to stay for several weeks, and residents of nearby villages who have come to shop, visit friends, and maybe pull in a few fish.Based in an office building that also serves as the archaeologists’ headquarters, 50-year-old Warren Jones is president of the local Yupik corporation known as Qanirtuuq, Inc., managing its 130,564 acres, overseeing its businesses and financial assets, and negotiating contracts with the outside world. But he’d really rather be hunting, he tells me. Along with almost everyone else here, he follows the same cycles of subsistence as the generations of Yupiks who came before him.“Most of our diet is from the stuff we gather, hunt, or fish,” he says. “My grandpa used to say, if you don’t have wood, fish stored away, berries, birds, you might as well be dead, because you don’t have nothing.”From a traditional lookout, hunters scan the tundra for moose. Land and sea are like supermarkets for the Yupik, who know exactly what foods to search for in each season of the year. Locals’ ancestors carved the life-size mask above. Part human and part walrus, it was worn in a ritual dance to ensure a safe, successful hunt. “Even now, with rifles, going after a walrus is scary,” says Knecht.Early August, when the excavation is in full swing, is a busy season for the villagers as they tap nature’s larder. Berries are ripening across the tundra, and fat coho salmon, known here as silvers, are swimming up the Kanektok on their way to spawn. In keeping with Yupik tradition, Misty Matthew helps her mother, Grace Anaver, gather food for the winter.On the days she goes berry picking, Matthew drives an ATV deep into a flat, green landscape dotted with others on the same mission, hunched over as they fill their plastic buckets. Salmonberries ripen first, one small, sweet, orange cloud per plant. Then blueberries, with a vivid, sweet-tart flavor that no supermarket fruit can match, and low-growing black crowberries that are crunchy and subtly sweet.No one here thinks in pints. It’s gallons they need. Matthew stirs up some of her haul with sugar and fluffy shortening to make a snack called akutaq, or Eskimo ice cream. Then she makes jam in her grandmother’s old stainless steel pot, and jelly with the leftover juice. But the bulk of the picking goes into big chest freezers in a backyard shed. She opens all three to show me what her mother already has gathered. One is stuffed with berries in clear plastic bags. Another has berries, salmon, seal oil, trout, and smelt. The last holds moose, clams, geese, swans, caribou, and two kinds of wild greens.“It’s good to be fat in this village. It means you’re eating well,” she says. “You’re supposed to have three years of food stored away to get you through the lean times.”On another day, early in the morning, Matthew and her brother, David, take out their family’s motorboat to net salmon on the river. An hour later they bring 40 silvers, easily 20 pounds each, to the wooden drying racks along a quiet side creek where their mother is waiting. The two women spend the rest of the day gutting the fish, cutting fillets, and slicing strips for brining, drying, and smoking—everything done with deft strokes of their ulus.Like many people who grew up here, Matthew has sometimes left Quinhagak to find work, but the people, the tundra, and the river keep pulling her back. Yet even after years away, she can see that the natural rhythms of life are out of whack.“Everything’s two or three weeks ahead now,” she says as she cuts into a fish. “The salmon are late. And the geese are flying early. The berries were early too.”If there’s one thing everyone in Quinhagak agrees on, and talks about often, it’s all the changes brought by the weird weather.“Twenty years ago the elders began to say the ground was sinking,” says Warren Jones, as we chat in his office. “The past 10 years or so it’s been so bad everybody’s noticed. We’re boating in February. That’s supposed to be the coldest month of the year.”The strangest thing? Three successive winters without snow. On his computer, he pulls up a YouTube video made by a teacher at the village school. As the song “White Christmas” plays in the background, fourth graders try to ski, sled, and make snow angels on bare ground, in December.Even without warmer winters, the children’s lives are very different from what their elders experienced. Qanirtuuq chairperson Grace Hill, 66, sees trends that concern her—like the fading language. “When I went to first grade, I only spoke Yupik. Now the kids only speak English,” she tells me in the fluent, slightly accented English that she learned in school. And then, of course, there’s the modern technology that’s changing everything everywhere. “The kids are more into computers—and they’re forgetting about our culture,” she worries.Like other older villagers, Hill at first opposed the excavation of Nunalleq because Yupik tradition says ancestors shouldn’t be disturbed. But now she believes that archaeology can serve a greater good. “I’m hoping this will get the kids interested in their past,” she says.Henry Small has the same thing in mind one sunny afternoon when he brings his 11-year-old daughter, Alqaq, to Nunalleq to check out the progress of the dig. This is their second visit this summer. When I ask him what he hopes his daughter learns here, he responds as if the answer were obvious: “Where she comes from!”Alqaq, in a pink T-shirt, plaid capris, and movie-star sunglasses, is getting the message. On previous visits she has helped sort artifacts and sift the excavated soil for small things the archaeologists might have overlooked. She especially likes the dolls, she says, and the lip plugs. And what about the ulus, like the one her father made for her birthday, with her name carved into the handle? “It’s cool that we get to use what our ancestors were using,” she says without hesitation. Today’s visit is brief, with no work to do, so Alqaq and her father soon head up the beach toward home on an ATV.Archaeology’s potential to inspire such appreciation for the past is what motivated Jones to get the dig started. He asked Knecht to assess the eroding site, then helped convince the village’s board of directors that excavating Nunalleq was a good idea. He also got the board to fund the first two years of digging and provide ongoing logistical support. “It wasn’t cheap,” he says. “But to get the artifacts for our future generations, money didn’t matter.”At the end of each field season the archaeologists have packed up what they’ve found and shipped it to the University of Aberdeen for conservation. But all the artifacts will be sent back later this year, destined for an old school building that Quinhagak has converted to a heritage center. Jones envisions this as a place where people can see, touch, and share stories about the beautifully worked possessions of their ancestors.“I want our kids who are in college now to run it and be proud that it’s ours,” he says. And when this dream takes shape and the center opens its doors? “I want to be the first to go in and say, ‘I’m Yupik, and this is where I come from.’ ”",
"A geological oddity, sand dunes cover a large expanse of Alaska's Kobuk Valley National Park. The sand came from rock pulverized by retreating ice many thousands of years ago.Location: Alaska Established: December 2, 1980 Size: 1,750,000 acres"Now we were alone between fringes of spruce by a clear stream where tundra went up the sides of mountains," wrote John McPhee in Coming into the Country. The Kobuk Valley, said McPhee, "was, in all likelihood, the most isolated wilderness I would ever see." Located entirely above the Arctic Circle, Kobuk Valley has fewer tourist visits than any other national park. Float a river here in late August and the only other humans you're likely to encounter are Inupiat hunting the caribou that migrate through each year.Thirteen thousand years ago, when continental glaciers covered much of North America and a land bridge connected Alaska and Asia, Kobuk Valley was an ice-free refuge with grassy tundra similar to that found in Siberia today. Bison, mastodons, and mammoths roamed the valley, along with the humans who hunted them. Since then, the climate has shifted, and sea level has risen to flood the land bridge; many of the early mammals have disappeared. But today's shrubby flora harbors relicts of the preglacial steppe, and in the cold, hard ground lie the legacies of ancient animals and peoples.Here the Kobuk Valley, cordoned off by the Baird and Waring Mountains, protects the midsection of the Kobuk River, the drainage of the Wild and Scenic Salmon River, and an array of wildlife. This is where the boreal forest reaches its northern limit, and the North American and Asiatic flyways cross. Pockets of tundra blend into birch and spruce, dwarfed by blasts of freezing air. And along the Kobuk River stretch 25 square miles of active sand dunes, where summer temperatures can climb to 100°F.Kobuk Valley National Park's management plan encourages traditional native subsistence practices over tourism, so no facilities or trails lie within the park.Commercial planes fly daily from Anchorage to Kotzebue, where the park's information center is located. Planes can be chartered in Kotzebue and boats are available in neighboring villages.Summer is the best time to visit. Days are long (from about June 3 to July 9 the sun doesn't set), and temperatures in many places can reach into the 80s or higher. Ice breaks up on the Kobuk River in May and begins to reform by mid-October. Mid-June to late July is best for wildflowers. August can bring rain and September snow. In late August, the aspens begin to turn yellow and the tundra red, and the caribou migration begins.Take a combination river-hiking trip that alternates between days out on the open water with days exploring the surrounding land. That way you can paddle to different landing points, leave your gear in the canoe, and hike unencumbered. Bring everything you need; no visitor facilities exist within the park. The Kobuk River, wide and placid, is a pleasant river to travel by canoe, kayak, or motorboat. Most people put in at Ambler and take out at Kiana, both outside the park. You can also float or paddle the Salmon, a Wild and Scenic river, but it has rougher water and is harder to reach. Hiking in most places is excellent, but the park maintains no trails or river crossings. So be sure to plan your trip carefully.While in the park, be respectful of private lands, most of which are along the Kobuk River.The Great Kobuk Sand Dunes are the largest active sand dunes in the Arctic and cover 30 square miles with towering sand; some dunes reach as high as 100 feet.",
"Wearing a face mask, a park ranger patrols Grand Canyon National Park’s Bright Angel Trail on Memorial Day weekend. Although many park visitors must pass through the neighboring Navajo Nation, stricken by the highest rate of COVID-19 infection in the U.S., the park has opened for limited weekend access.As summer settles in and national parks around the United States begin to reopen, park staff, small business owners, gateway communities, and Native American tribes are wondering how to cope with a surge of travelers eager to get outdoors.Alberta Henry is one of them. Three years ago, Henry began renting tents and traditional Navajo hogans on her family’s ancestral land on the Navajo Nation, roughly 15 miles from Grand Canyon National Park. She wanted to support her family, provide jobs to her isolated community, and introduce park visitors to Navajo (Diné) culture.This year, bookings were full—until COVID-19 struck. In March, with the virus spreading and national parks across the country shutting down, Henry was forced to cancel dozens of reservations. Then she, her husband, and two of their children tested positive for COVID-19. They were sick for a month.Now, just as they’re starting to feel better, they must navigate the tricky business of welcoming outsiders back into their lives without jeopardizing the Navajo Nation, which has one of America’s highest infection rates with 4,944 cases and 159 deaths among a population of 174,000, as of May 28. “We want to reopen and start making money,” Henry said. “But I don’t want to get sick again. If it’s a slow process I’m okay with that, but I don’t want a whole bunch of people all at once.”After opening on the weekends with limited hours and access, Grand Canyon National Park plans to continue a broader phased reopening. Critics point out that many park visitors must pass through the Navajo Nation, which currently suffers the nation’s highest per capita rate of COVID-19 infection.Signs on a road leading to the East To’Hajiilee community in New Mexico warn non-residents to stay away. The Navajo Nation, of which the To’Hajiilee Indian Reservation is a part, has implemented weekend curfews for nearly two months to try to stop the spread of coronavirus.“A whole bunch of people all at once” is an apt description of the scene at many national parks over Memorial Day weekend.Despite efforts by the National Park Service (NPS) to control crowds by limiting hours of entry and keeping some facilities and destinations closed, the unofficial kickoff to summer saw popular parks packed with people. Zion National Park in Utah was full and turning away visitors by 7 a.m. on Saturday; one visitor described the scene as “hectic.”In Yellowstone, a person approached a bison and was injured, requiring emergency services. California’s Joshua Tree National Park was so packed that people were pitching tents on the side of the road and in day-use-only areas, according to local photographer Scott Klinger. Many of the license plates were from out of state, and Klinger said most people were not wearing masks or staying six feet apart on trails.(Related: This small town depends on Yellowstone tourism. Can its residents save the summer tourist season?)Another NPS employee, who asked to remain anonymous, said that parks are having an especially hard time managing the sudden crowds because they’re operating with skeleton crews. The Park Service’s budget has been slashed in recent years, leading many parks to depend on volunteers—many of whom are retirees who are choosing to stay home as the pandemic continues.It wasn’t exactly the picture that President Trump painted last month when he called for national parks to reopen. “That’s going to be very exciting; we have a lot of land to open up, too,” he said during an Earth Day ceremony. “People are going to be very happy.”Interior Secretary David Bernhardt added on Twitter that parks would “gradually reopen…in a safe manner.” But neither he nor the president offered clarity on how that would happen in places that still have state or local stay-at-home orders in place, or how park employees would be protected.In fact, park supervisors received reopening guidance from the federal government only a few days before the busy Memorial Day weekend, according to internal documents obtained by the nonprofit National Parks Conservation Association and shared with National Geographic. The documents illustrate gaps in the Park Service’s plans. One gap, said Kristen Brengel, senior vice president of government affairs for NPCA, is that parks aren’t required to consult with nearby towns or tribal communities, even though those communities are directly impacted by reopening.Another concern is that park service employees are not required to wear masks, even though they may interact with hundreds of people a day. Nor can they enforce mask-wearing or social distancing among visitors.One Park Service ranger, who works a few hours from New York City, said that as visitor numbers ramp up, these inconsistencies are leading to potentially unsafe conditions. “It felt like our park was doing the bare minimum for safety,” she said. “I was in contact with visitors all afternoon, some with masks, some without, some visitors wanting to express to me that they don’t believe masks work. Even some of the park rangers weren’t wearing masks.”The situation made her so uncomfortable that she’s considering quitting, even though that will mean losing her health insurance and being ineligible for unemployment benefits. “As a park ranger, I’m scared to be at work,” she said.Visitors take photos at Joshua Tree National Park on Tuesday, May 19. Reopening this week after a lengthy closure intended to help slow the spread of coronavirus, the park was quickly overcrowded.Despite these concerns—and questions of whether it’s premature to open parks at all—the Park Service is doing some things right. Rocky Mountain National Park is implementing a “timed entry” system to spread out crowds by giving people a specific time slot when they’re allowed to enter the park. Other parks may follow suit.Yosemite, which plans to reopen in June, is among a number of parks limiting visitors to roughly half its typical capacity. Yellowstone has spent $135,000 on sanitation, protective gear, and educational signs. The Park Service is distributing masks and gloves to employees, albeit unevenly, and trying to educate visitors on safe practices: staying six feet apart, choosing parks close to home, and avoiding traveling long distances to get to a park.(Related: Trespassing and vandalism abound at national parks that remain open during the pandemic.)Some parks, like Yosemite, remain closed, while others were relatively quiet over Memorial Day weekend. A visitor from Big Cypress National Preserve in Florida said the park was practically empty, perhaps because of rain. A hiker in Washington’s Olympic National Park, where many roads remained closed, reported seeing few crowds. A ranger at Virginia’s George Washington Memorial Parkway, which connects trails around Washington, D.C. and is administered by the Park Service, said that the people he saw hiking were mostly in small groups spaced well apart.Still, some parks just aren’t set up for social distancing. It’s nearly impossible to stay six feet apart on the boardwalks around Yellowstone’s geysers, for example, or the narrow hiking trails in Zion. That means that the responsibility to stay safe falls both to parks and individual travelers. “It’s really important for visitors to go online and check the park’s website before they go so they can make sure they’re prepared,” Brengel said. “If a park is going to be too crowded or a trail is closed, they should have a plan B.”Having a backup plan—such as visiting a less-busy national forest—is one of the recommendations of the new #RecreateResponsibly initiative, a collaboration between nonprofits, outdoor businesses, and land managers. Other recommendations include adventuring with members of your household; choosing low-risk activities to decrease the chances of needing already-strained emergency services, such as hiking instead of rock climbing; and being self-sufficient, such as packing your own lunch instead of counting on a park restaurant to be open. The #RecreateResponsibly initiative emphasizes staying close to home, because non-essential travel is still discouraged by the nation’s top health officials.Perhaps nowhere is the disconnect between local concerns and parks’ reopening more stark than in the Native American communities that abut national parks. Most people who visit Grand Canyon National Park, for instance, have to drive through the Navajo Nation, where curfews remain in place to help battle the reservation’s high COVID-19 infection rate. Navajo Nation president Jonathan Nez reportedly asked Secretary Bernhardt to delay opening the Grand Canyon to help protect people on the reservation, to no avail.(Related: Disputes over protected land still rage in the American West. So whose land is it?)Katie Boué, an outdoor advocate who worked on the #RecreateResponsibly initiative, says it’s up to individual travelers to respect tribes’ decisions to keep outsiders at bay. “I am not going to be traveling to or through the Navajo Nation or any nearby indigenous communities for the foreseeable future,” she said.Alberta Henry appreciates conscientious travelers like Boué. But when the Navajo Nation lifts its lockdown orders, possibly in June, Henry and her family will be ready to invite tourists back into their lives. They’ll continue to follow the tribal government’s orders, and space out reservations to give themselves plenty of time between guests to sanitize tents and hogans.“People are already calling to book for June,” Henry said. “We’ve got to be prepared for that—and try to protect ourselves.”",
"A photographer marvels at the Teton Range in Grand Teton National Park in June 2018. Summer is usually the park’s high season. But this year, Grand Teton is closed indefinitely due to the coronavirus pandemic.The town square in Jackson, Wyoming, is quiet. That’s not unusual during the sleepy spring “mud season” when locals usually head out of town, taking a break before the influx of summer tourists. But this year’s quiet is different. Many of the town’s 10,400 residents are here, but staying home. And there’s one question on everyone’s mind: Can the summer tourist season be salvaged?Tourism is the community’s lifeblood, but no one knows what to expect this year. Teton County—which encompasses the valley of Jackson Hole, towns including Jackson, and Grand Teton National Park as well as a major chunk of Yellowstone National Park—brought in over a billion dollars of tourism revenue last year. Many of these tourists come for the national parks. In 2019, Grand Teton and Yellowstone received 3.4 million and 4 million recreational visitors, respectively, placing them among the most popular U.S. national parks. Over three-quarters of those visitors came from June through September.Signs closed the entrance to Grand Teton National Park on April 28, 2020. Both Grand Teton and Yellowstone have been closed since March 24.Now both parks are currently closed indefinitely—and they’re anticipating significant service reductions even after they reopen.Park concessionaires have already announced they aren’t planning on opening Yellowstone’s Old Faithful Inn this summer, nor Grand Teton’s Jenny Lake and Jackson Lake Lodges (though that could change). Yellowstone concessionaire Xanterra Parks & Resorts slashed its summer lodging workforce from a typical 3,500 to a bare-bones crew of 800. One gas station and convenience store in Grand Teton is currently planning on opening in late May, and some Yellowstone facilities are scheduled to open in mid-June. The only thing that’s certain? This summer will look very different from any season that’s come before.(Related: Here’s what would change if national parks became privatized.)Just south of the parks, Jacksonites anxiously eye the calendar, wondering when and how businesses can reopen safely. Will employees feel safe enough to return to work? Will visitors feel safe enough to come on vacation—and can they afford to? Revenue has plunged for small businesspeople in Jackson, including Eric and Zarina Sakai, who own The Phoenix and the Dragon restaurant. Since the pandemic began, they’ve seen their revenue drop 75 percent. “It progressively gets worse as the days go on,” Eric Sakai says.They’ve transitioned to contact-free curbside pickup, but demand is low. “When everybody is out of work, it’s just harder for businesses that are open as well because no one has money,” Sakai says. “No one has disposable income to go out and really support the local businesses.” His restaurant is preparing for “pretty much a non-existent summer.” Which is problematic in a community so dependent on summer visitors.Paul Angiolillo worked at the Jackson Hole Mountain Resort ticketing office until the resort closed early on March 16. Two knee surgeries over the winter racked up his medical bills. “If it wasn’t for relief grants and government help, I’d be homeless,” he said.Ski gates are covered and closed for the season.“The summer season here in Jackson is really like your bread and butter,” Sakai says; it’s what “carries you for the rest of the year.”Hailey Morton Levinson is vice mayor of Jackson, and her family’s bed and breakfast, Inn on the Creek, is currently closed. She says every time a new public health or government order is put into place or the national parks push back their opening plans, her business receives “a slew of cancellations.” She says summer makes up 70 percent of their revenue. “I’m an optimist,” she says. “If we’re able to make it through the year and just break even, that would be a win.”Some hotels and storefronts are shuttered. But life goes on at the six-generation, family-owned Lockhart Cattle Company. It’s calving season. Though many of the hotels and restaurants that buy meat from Chase Lockhart currently aren’t placing orders, he has 1,000 animals to tend to and endless work to do. “You can’t really take a break or take time off because of this pandemic,” Lockhart says.On April 9, Chase Lockhart was still hard at work, counting cattle with his dog, Spud.Lockhart and his coworkers are doing their best to stay healthy, though practices like social distancing and disinfecting aren’t all that compatible with ranch life. “Ranches are dirty—they just are,” Lockhart says. “It’s tough. When you need help pulling a calf or something like that, you can’t be 6 feet apart, away from your coworker.”(Related: Meet the essential workers on the front lines of America’s pandemic response.)Seasonal workers face many uncertainties. Paul Angiolillo was laid off from his winter job in the ticketing office at Jackson Hole Mountain Resort over a month early, and he’s waiting to see what will happen with his summer job at a fly-fishing shop. He’s grateful for government benefits. “If it wasn’t for unemployment and all the government stimulus and everything, other things would be looking pretty terrible right now,” Angiolillo says.Bethany Enriquez, 16, is a high school athlete, disappointed this year’s track season is canceled. She also was let go from her lifeguarding job due to the coronavirus pandemic.Bethany’s parents, Rocio (a housekeeping supervisor) and Miguel (a kitchen manager), are recently out of work and unsure when they’ll be able to return. They have a family of four, including Rocio’s 82-year-old mother.While some Jacksonites face unemployment and no income, many are working to help the community. The nonprofit Spread the Love Commission has distributed over 2,000 “health and hygiene” packets in Teton County—where Jackson is located—and on the Wind River Reservation to the east. Jackson’s recreation center also recently opened its showers for those who need them, and Spread the Love Commission is putting together shower kits to use there.“Right now, people need running water and hygiene,” says Wren Fialka, founder and executive director of Spread the Love Commission. “The hygiene is imperative.”Locals are also banding together to support local businesses through an effort called The Hole Quarantine. The effort pools donations to purchase meals, gift cards, and more from local businesses, providing these items to healthcare workers, first responders, and people in need. As of April 28, organizer Meagan Murtagh says the group has received 470 donations totaling $51,700.When there wasn’t enough work for Carmen Gloria Rodríguez Sanzana at Blue Spruce Cleaners in Jackson, she decided to make face masks at home. In about two weeks, Sanzana made over 1,000 masks for the local hospital.Volunteers are also donating their time making lifesaving equipment. Carmen Gloria Rodríguez Sanzana, a seamstress at Blue Spruce Cleaners, still has a job and benefits, but she isn’t getting a lot of work these days. She worries about her family and finances. But she’s sewing much-needed face masks—so far producing nearly 1,500 for the hospital, 85 for a long-term-care facility, and 600 more for community members.“The pandemic is a team effort to fight against it. Everybody should be doing something. Not just healthcare providers, everyone,” Sanzana says.(Related: Here’s what you should know about DIY masks and ventilators.)Corey Milligan, owner of New West Knifeworks, began the We Are Jackson Hole campaign to encourage people to practice social distancing and good hygiene. His company also joined forces with Grand Teton Distillery to produce and distribute over 350 gallons of hand sanitizer in bottles and refill stations. They received an initial $25,000 in private donations for the project, and have raised an additional $12,000 to continue production until commercial sanitizer becomes available.When Jackson does ultimately reopen, it will be a gradual process, says mayor Pete Muldoon. “We’re not flipping a light switch on here.”He points out that the situation is quite different from the recession over a decade ago, which affected the community more gradually and gave people time to prepare. “With [the pandemic], it was almost [like] people went to bed one night and the world was normal, and the next day it was completely different,” Muldoon says. “So I think that it’s a much more kind of traumatic change for people.”A fisherman casts a line at Grand Teton’s Schwabacher Landing in August 2014. The summer season—June through September—hosts more than three-quarters of the park’s total annual visitors.Jackson—and Teton County—are also preparing for budget cuts, since a large percentage of general operating revenue comes from sales and lodging taxes. Tourism generated $65 million in state and local taxes in 2018, says the Jackson Hole Travel & Tourism Board’s annual report. Tellingly, the report also states that that year’s 3 percent unemployment rate would have surged to 30 percent without the jobs provided by tourism.A significant slowdown in tourism will ripple throughout the community. While not every visitor to Jackson Hole comes to see the national parks, many do, and if people stay home this summer, their absence will be felt acutely.“I don’t think even the most conservative, cautious businessperson would have ever predicted [it],” says Jonathan Schechter, a Jackson Town Council member. “You put away money for a rainy day, but nobody predicts the spigot is just going to turn off. That’s basically what happened to so many different businesses.”The sun rises over Grand Teton National Park on April 28, 2020.",
"The National Park Service administers 419 units and more than 500 concession contracts. One company operates lodges in Grand Canyon National Park (shown here in 2015) as well as Yellowstone and Zion.Late last year, when a high-profile proposal to privatize some services at national parks went public, the reaction came quickly.The Department of the Interior, which manages most federal land, had formed a committee of recreation industry representatives in 2017. In October 2019, the committee proposed privatizing campgrounds, limiting senior discounts, and adding expanded Wi-Fi, food trucks, and Amazon deliveries. The proposal was met with such resistance among environmental groups—and the public—that the department ended the committee less than two months later.This was merely a flashpoint in a controversial debate that’s been bubbling for decades. The cash-strapped National Park Service (NPS) is saddled with a nearly $12 billion maintenance backlog; the recreation industry has said it can manage some park services better and cheaper. And environmental groups call for close scrutiny of privatization initiatives in order to maintain the original mission of conserving parks and their resources.Meanwhile, the coronavirus pandemic is disrupting discussion—and might upend the debate altogether.Yellowstone Park’s Old Faithful Lodge is operated by a company owned by Xanterra, one of the oldest and largest parks concessioners.It’s a thorny question, sparking heated debate since the creation of the first national park.Some cases of privatization can be called successes. Oklahoma’s Tallgrass Prairie Preserve, for example, protects important plant and wildlife species in large part because the nonprofit Nature Conservancy was able to buy land from willing ranchers when NPS couldn’t finalize a deal. After budget cuts forced Alabama to close a state park in 2015, a company called Recreation Resource Management (RRM) was awarded a contract to reopen and run the park. But privatization often meets with stiff opposition: Recent plans for a massive, privately-funded prairie reserve in Montana have angered locals who feel pushed off the land they’ve worked for generations.Weighing a stance is especially complicated because privatization itself can take so many forms. There’s no single model; while some protected areas are made up of privatized land, national parks comprise public land that relies on privatized services.These services—the campgrounds, bathrooms, lodging, catering, equipment rentals, and other amenities needed to operate a park—were the focus of the Interior Department committee’s proposals.“Does [NPS] really have to operate the lodge? Does it have to operate the campground? Does it need to clean the bathrooms? Does it need to pave the roads?” asks Warren Meyer, owner of RRM, which operates about 150 recreation areas on public lands. “There’s a lot of things in there that it doesn’t necessarily need to do.”Campgrounds—NPS controls 1,421 of them—often form the front lines of the privatization debate. Meyer says that at a privatized campground, visitors could not only expect regular maintenance but also new amenities: Think glamping, tiny rental homes, and cabins.But Emily Douce, director of operations and park funding at the National Parks Conservation Association, counters that a park may want to keep running its own campgrounds in order to interact with visitors and keep an eye on operations.“The presence of a park service ranger has many benefits, from educating to seeing what’s going on and making sure that people are being responsible,” Douce says, adding that the privatization of ranger positions would be a cause for concern.“Their mandate is to make sure that the resources are protected and that the visitors are educated about that site. And so if you privatize those, there’s a concern there that some of that would be lost,” she says.Meyer agrees that while private companies could manage some tasks, removing wilderness management or park rangers from NPS hands would be almost impossible.Over its hundred-year history, Ahwahnee Hotel—the famous lodge formerly known as the Majestic Yosemite Hotel—has been managed by several private concessioners, including Delaware North and Aramark, two of the largest companies serving NPS sites.So who gets to decide? It’s up to each national park to choose what privatization measures are best for both visitor experience and resource management, says Douce. Meyer emphasizes the importance of the public’s ability to weigh in on decisions.“If the public is not going to retain management of the use and access and character of the land, then they might as well sell it,” he says. “There’s no point in giving that up because once you give that up, why do you even have the land in the first place?”The coronavirus outbreak’s influence on the debate remains to be seen.Right now, federal and state governments are focusing spending on COVID-19 responses. Douce says it’s likely that the NPS’s federal budget for the upcoming fiscal year will remain level compared to last year, though federal funding decisions are far from guaranteed. Another challenge comes from lost park revenue as a result of the pandemic, which could affect the national parks’ already lean maintenance budget.“We are working with many others to try to influence the stimulus packages [under consideration] to see if we can get the money back to the parks that has been lost and will be lost,” Douce says.Communities have called Meyer to discuss how to keep state parks open. He says federal agencies could take longer to get to that point, but he expects that financial constraints from COVID-19 will make privatizing services at national parks more enticing. “There’s going to be a lot of pressure to say, ‘Geez, us cleaning the bathrooms of national park campgrounds with civil servants is a luxury. We need to find other ways to do those kinds of things.’”But it will take time, manpower, a new contract template for concessionaires, and opportunity for public comment—presently a challenge, as such meetings are being postponed because of coronavirus.To be sure, the government should not make privatization decisions during the pandemic, Douce says. “We need people to be involved,” she says, and right now, “they’re focused on just dealing with everyday changes with the virus.”This pristine tropical reserve—covering almost two-thirds of St. John, plus 5,650 acres underwater—saw 133,398 visitors in 2019. Leisure travel to the Virgin Islands has been closed and reopened several times throughout 2020. Virgin Islands National Park is currently open to local visitors, who are asked to practice social distancing, even on park beaches.",
"At least 142 million acres of grass once stretched across the land that became the United States. Today, the Tallgrass Prairie Preserve protects 51,000 acres of what remains of that prairie.An unbroken landscape of grasses and wildflowers stretches as far as the eye can see, punctuated only by a collection of dots on a distant hill.It’s a herd of bison, my binoculars reveal. What I can’t see, as I scan for miles, is anything human-made.Before there were amber waves of grain, there were tallgrass prairies. At least 142 million acres of grass covered the territory from Ohio to Kansas, southern Texas to Canada—nearly a third of what became the United States. Today, almost all of it is gone, which is why this sight, on the Nature Conservancy’s Joseph H. Williams Tallgrass Prairie Preserve in northeastern Oklahoma, is such a treasure. Most of the grasslands that greeted westward-hoing pioneers gave way to corn and wheat and development. But here a nearly pristine remnant remains, thanks to a convergence of circumstances that resulted in the initial ownership of 39,650 acres of protected prairie.This vista is imprinted in my memory as one of the most profoundly moving in the country, and I’m thrilled to see it again. When I first visited three decades ago, there was no preserve, only the dream of one. Local ranch owners were willing to sell 100,000 acres of prime land, and the National Park Service was interested. A deal was never finalized, but in 1989, the Nature Conservancy engineered an audacious $15 million capital campaign to purchase the 29,000-acre Barnard Ranch and establish the Tallgrass Prairie Preserve. Conservation and restoration were well underway when I returned in the mid-1990s. Today, thanks to additional purchases over the years, some 51,000 acres are protected.One thing that hasn’t changed since my first visit: Harvey Payne, a rancher-attorney-environmentalist, remains one of the most dedicated advocates for the prairie, and I’m grateful to have him again as my guide, all these years after our first walks on the edge of the unpreserved preserve. After Payne spent years calling for a prairie preserve, he became its manager for 18 years. He’s retired from that duty now, but retains the title of community relations coordinator, and is happy to show me around and bring me up to date.Payne and I meet in downtown Pawhuska, population about 3,500, the preserve’s gateway town—and one aspect of the prairie experience that has changed dramatically since my first visit. Cooking-show celebrity Ree “The Pioneer Woman” Drummond has opened The Pioneer Woman Mercantile in one of Pawhuska’s historic brick buildings, and the once sleepy town now regularly sees lines of fans stretching around the block, eager to chow down in her eatery or shop for kitchen implements and tchotchkes. A ripple effect has brought new galleries, boutiques, restaurants, and lodgings to downtown Pawhuska. For many visitors, the prairie preserve is serendipity rather than the reason to visit this corner of the state.Pawhuska is also the seat of the Osage Nation, and the Osage’s story is deeply imprinted on these hills. The Osage, pressured by white homesteaders to sell their property in southeastern Kansas in 1870, purchased the hilly Oklahoma land for 70 cents an acre and relocated to the prairie. Karma kicked in when Osage County’s first oil wells began producing, circa 1900. Osage headrights—title to the land’s gas and minerals—made the Osage almost instantly among the wealthiest people in the world.As we drive north from town toward the preserve, I ask Payne to refresh my memory as to how a former cattle ranch can qualify as pristine prairie. “Well, first,” Payne says, “we can’t call it pristine. As a functioning ecosystem, the tallgrass prairie as it existed historically is effectively extinct. But this is the best semblance of the original that we have.” The prairie’s nearly natural state is due to a quirk of geology: The region is relentlessly rocky. The grassy hills are undergirded by so much limestone and sandstone that it’s difficult to walk on the prairie, let alone plow it. John Deere’s finest steel could never bust this sod.So the Osage Hills became cattle country. Cattle’s impact on the land is far less than that of agriculture—especially when ranchers are careful land managers, as the preserve’s former owners were.Still, cattle are aliens here. The prairie’s native ruminants were elk and bison. After the elk were killed off around 1830 and the bison by 1851, ranching and cattle took over. “It’s a far cry from a cow pasture to a prairie preserve,” Payne says. We only need look out the window to see that. The ranchland along the road to the preserve is lovely rolling pasture. But when we enter the preserve, the hills become a multifaceted work of art. “A tallgrass prairie is much more than grass,” Payne explains. “We’ve identified more than 750 species of flora on the preserve. Of those, 115 are grasses. The rest are broadleafs and sedges. The cattle will eat some species of grass so much that the broadleafs they don’t like take over. Then some ranchers will engage in aerial spraying to kill these broadleaf plants. Then away go the greater prairie chickens and ground-nesting birds …”Payne’s voice trails off. Greater prairie chickens are one of the avian superstars here. Their mating dances are legendary and something that Payne, an avid photographer, has documented for years. His main point is that a true prairie is varied and abundant. My days on the prairie were to become a constant discovery and rediscovery of that fact.As we continue into the preserve, it is obvious just how abundant a tallgrass prairie is. It’s early September, when warm-season grasses are at their tallest, but we’re not just talking about horizon-to-horizon big bluestem, which reaches up to 10 feet this time of year. We also see shorter Indian grass, with its feathery seed heads, and little bluestem, and some truly astounding displays of wildflowers. We pull to the edge of the road beside acres of Leavenworth’s eryngo—one- to three-foot stalks with splashy purple thistlelike flowers—and a herd of bison indifferently munching around the fringe of the field. A lone giant post oak puts a strong stamp on the scene, and meadowlarks flit all around.Prairie is the preferred habitat for the American golden plover. “Just seeing America in its most simple form possible—with green grass and rolling hills—is a sight to behold,” says Truman Pipestem, an aspiring lawyer and a member of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians who is also Osage, Otoe-Missouria, and Citizen Potawatomi.Bison tend to be scene-stealers wherever they choose to graze, and that’s only right. They’re irresistible to watch. Signs warn to keep one’s distance from the massive wild beasts, but I’ll admit to cheating a bit. Not that I’m posing for selfies with them, but I just like to stand nearby, watch, and anthropomorphize—this one’s grumpy, this one’s looking for affection, how cute is that calf, that guy … he’s huge.When I visited 20-some years ago, the preserve had around 300 bison. Today, some 2,700 of them are scattered in groups like this, freely grazing 25,000 acres in the preserve. A nearly 10-mile circular driving route in the western part of the preserve, the Bison Loop, passes through prime bison pasture. There’s never a guarantee that bison will appear near the road, but I see them every time I drive through.Bison—and cattle—stimulate growth on the prairie by grazing the land, but Payne tells me that would be for naught without fire. In a method known as patch burning, preserve managers torch about a third of the acreage every spring, late summer, and fall, mimicking ancient seasons of fire and nature’s way of rejuvenating nutritious new growth.The hirsute beast I described as huge lumbers closer. At nine years old, he’s a bit of an outlier, Payne tells me. Most bull bison are rounded up and sold at age six, keeping the total herd size constant and healthy. But a few escape that fate. We continue to watch, mesmerized, for a while. Then Payne remarks: “When the tail comes up like that, it means either charge or discharge.” We don’t wait to find out which.After our daylong reunion tour of the preserve, Payne leaves me some sage advice for the next few days: “Appreciating the prairie requires a nuanced perspective. Get out there for first light and last light. And stop. Stop a lot. Most people just drive through in the middle of the day and miss the experience.”The prairie preserve isn’t like a national park, laced with hiking trails and scenic viewpoints overlooking major landmarks. It has a pair of hiking trails that form a 2.5-mile figure-eight loop, and scattered turnouts beside 20 miles of graded gravel roads. It’s possible to drive through, tour the visitor center, and drive back to Pawhuska in a couple of hours. But I spend most of the next three days heeding Payne’s advice. Up early. Out late. Stop constantly.First light is amazing, not for any particular dazzle on the horizon, but for the soothing calm and quiet. When I cut my engine, I hear, at times, absolutely nothing. Then maybe a few early birds. Amazingly, given that this is flyover country, I never once hear an airplane above. Sometimes I hear bison grunting, coyotes howling, wild turkeys rummaging.Last light is a living elegy. The prairie feels like a long-gone relative come to life, and in the fading light, a strong sense of nostalgia comes over me. There was a time when this quality of peace, this quiet abundance, was the norm. Now it’s a glaring exception. It’s easy to feel sad for what we’ve lost. But then maybe a white-tailed deer bounds through a field of Maximilian sunflowers, or a Swainson’s hawk soars by. I feel settled. And grateful to have this opportunity. It is, after all, why I’ve come back here.Between prairie excursions, I poke around Pawhuska. The Osage Nation Museum has a fascinating exhibit of traditional wedding outfits. Across town, in the Osage County Historical Society Museum, one exhibit informs me that from 1904 to 1924, more wealth (from oil) was produced from the Osage Hills than from all the American gold rushes combined. In the decade between its first discovery well and its statehood in 1907, Oklahoma became the world’s largest oil-producing body. Pawhuska was once the site of the first Rolls-Royce dealership west of the Mississippi.I stop in at the Osage Nation headquarters to meet Chief Geoffrey Standing Bear. He tells me about the Osage’s recent purchase, from Ted Turner, of the 43,000-acre Bluestem Ranch, a cattle spread west of town that will be wholly owned and operated by the Osage.“Land is critical to our effort to rebuild our nation,” Standing Bear says. “We’ve halted the loss of our land. Now it’s up to future generations to do what they can with it.” Though he envisions an eventual bison preserve, this will be a working cattle ranch and not open to the public.Harvey Payne rejoins me for my final day on the prairie. We’re headed for the hiking loop, but first detour to pay homage to John Joseph Mathews, the Osage writer who’s been called the “Thoreau of the Plains.” His 1945 Waldenesque book, Talking to the Moon, recounts a decade spent living in a tiny sandstone cabin on a patch of prairie surrounded by blackjack oaks. The Nature Conservancy acquired the Mathews property a few years ago and offers guided tours of the cabin. The place is suitably simple and supremely tranquil. Inside, its most striking feature is a huge stone fireplace, which, Payne promises me, is “the only one in Osage County with a Latin inscription painted onto the front of the mantel.” It reads Venari Lavari Ludere Ridere Occast Vivere—to hunt, to bathe, to play, to laugh; that is, to live. A photo on the mantel shows Mathews, pipe in hand, sitting beside the fireplace, looking, well, utterly at home. The writer, who died in 1979 at the age of 85, is buried just outside, his grave marked by a modest stone.We’ve saved the hiking loop for last. The trail starts in a remarkable stand of big bluestem, at least eight feet tall. The way is marked by a mown strip—we’re walking entirely on cropped grass—then circles through deep woods beside Sand Creek.Controlled burning helps the prairie rejuvenate, creating a mosaic of diversity—patches of tender new shoots (which bison love), patches thick with accumulated thatch, and patches with multiple plant species.I’m not a particularly knowledgeable birder, but I’m an appreciative one, and there’s a lot going on. Amid a chattering of red-bellied woodpeckers is a lovely song by a Carolina wren coming from the oak canopy. On the longer portion of the figure eight, Prairie Earth Trail, we cross Sand Creek to behold a sight straight out of a Gary Larson cartoon—seven vultures perched on an old corral rail, and six more on a dead tree trunk. Then suddenly a great horned owl swoops right in front of us, aiming for the creek, and four of the vultures follow suit. Must be something tasty down there.As we leave the creek and woods and ascend a hillside, we reach a different world. Trees small, grasses tall—a sure sign of fire-managed terrain. We sit for a while on a bench, and Payne recalls a Yogi Berra saying: “You can observe a lot just by watching.” Some of the big bluestem, silhouetted against a gauzy sky, are fully 10 feet tall. Payne notices my gawking and adds a slightly mind-blowing tidbit: The root systems of prairie grasses extend the same distance as or more than the height of the plant.I think about that as we reach the apex of the trail, and the views over the hills to the west seem to extend forever. The sky appears infinite. The tallest grasses in the world wave in the breeze, yet half their growth is underground. Life runs deep on the prairie.Montana’s Glacier National Park is iconic “because of its breathtaking, glacier-carved peaks and flowing river valleys,” says photographer Emily Polar. The 10th most visited national park, Glacier welcomed three million visitors in 2018, many of them to its renowned Going-to-the-Sun Road.",
"The chestnut-collared Longspur (Calcarius ornatus) has declined by more than 80 percent in the last half century, but changes in landscape management could help improve the bird's lot.It’s a sweltering summer day in central Montana. Here, in the heart of Big Sky country, no matter how hot it gets, blue jeans and cowboy boots are the norm, to protect against the whipping wind and the threat of thunderheads that can materialize without warning on the horizon.Rancher Bill Milton surveys his land with wildlife biologist Dan Casey from a bumpy dirt road etched into the mottled green and gold landscape, 50 miles outside of Billings. Rolling through the land in Casey’s Prius, we’re on the western margin of the northern Great Plains, where shortgrass prairie once dominated the landscape. Casey points out an apple-sized bird on the right hand of the road.It’s a chestnut-collared longspur, whose males sport a glossy black breast topped with a rich brown collar. Once numerous in the short and mixed grass prairies that used to be trimmed naturally by bison and wildfire, the longspur’s population has declined by more than 80 percent in the last 50 years.It’s not just this species that’s in trouble, says Casey, who co-authored the tome Birds of Montana, as well as the state’s massive avian management plan. According to Casey, since 1970 Great Plains grassland songbirds have declined nearly 70 percent, a collapse rivaling that of insect and marine fish populations. Climate change, outdated grazing practices and urbanization are definite factors in the decline but agriculture's intensification is the main culprit.The Northern Great Plains, which encompasses this spot in Montana, spans more than 180 million acres and crosses five U.S. states and two Canadian provinces.Thankfully there’s growing recognition of the problem, and historically unlikely alliances are forming between conservationists like Casey and ranchers like Milton—which could benefit all sides. One example is the Northern Great Plains Joint Venture (NGPJV), a cohort of 15 entities that aims to protect and restore native bird habitats, which Casey coordinates. Spearheaded by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, 21 additional Joint Ventures span North America."We need more people to feel morally obligated to care about species other than humans or ones with big eyes and fur," says professor William Lauenroth of Yale’s School of Forestry and Environmental Studies.Though these birds and transient and somewhat inconspicuous, they can be spotted with a trained eye—and the economic services they provide humans include seed dispersal, insect predation, pollination, not to mention their symphony of songs.Casey explains, as we sit in the car, the differences between the left and the right side of the road. The left is dominated by non-native species like alfalfa and clover, appearing as a mix of olive, sage, and green tones. The right side, where we see much more bird life, appears more brown and wilted—but is actually healthier and more suitable for wildlife.Closer inspection of the ground on the left reveals hard and nearly bare terrain. “There are no grasses for the birds to nest in,” Casey explains. Local plant species that once sustained the ecosystem have been pushed out by exotic crops.The right side of the road, while less verdant, includes a mix of a native species like blue gramma, buffalo grass, and fringed sage. Decomposing duff from the prior season pads and protects the soil, a shade darker from the moisture it retains. Compared to the other side, this land is more resistant to weather extremes, disease, and unwanted insects—and provides more food, habitat, and serves as a storehouse of carbon, water, and important nutrients.From where we stand, the prairie feels vast. Though a shadow of its former self, its remnants span more than 180 million acres, five states, and two provinces. But from a bird’s eye view—like that of the longspur or any of the four other native songbird species NGPJV has targeted for protection—the greater landscape is a fragmented patchwork of agriculture, ranchland, and development. The critical habitat this landscape provides for numerous species and its increasing fragility often go unnoticed.“Generally there’s more awareness of the destruction of rainforests in Brazil than there is of the habitat that’s changed the most on our continent,” Casey says.Between 2015 and 2016, the Great Plains lost 2.5 million acres of previously intact grasslands to crop production. Monocultures of wheat, corn, soy, and canola are by far the biggest users of cropland, and with worldwide demand for grains predicted to double by 2030, pressure is mounting. On top of that, urban development and energy exploration take a toll.Though revered as the United States’ breadbasket, the Great Plains were never afforded the same protections as the country’s more conventional scenic attractions like forests.“It’s easy to look at an old growth and see what makes it old growth, with its big trees with lots of structure,” says Casey, describing the temperate rainforests of the Pacific Northwest. But prairies also have a high level of complexity, which allows many species to make their home there.An adult Sprague's pipit stands outside of its nest in Montana's Bowdoin National Wildlife Refuge. Like many of the region's birds, these creatures have been harmed by agricultural intensification.“The McCowan’s longspur like the grass a little shorter; the chestnut a little longer; the grasshopper sparrow even longer. You don’t get that variation with monoculture,” Casey says. That’s why modern agricultural practices are so detrimental to these landscapes and the species that inhabit them. Plus, monocultures strip the soil of nutrients and moisture, which is part of what makes their negative effects so hard to undo.“One can graze the grassland and make some management mistakes and expect to recover in a decade. But once you’ve removed surface layers of soil—it’s a process likely to take centuries to millennia to get back,” explains Lauenroth, who specializes in grassland ecology. While can grasses recover quickly the herbaceous, non-flowering plants called forbs and the soil’s nitrogen and carbon storage capacity can take upwards of a century to even begin regenerating.Migratory songbirds, also known as passerines, rely on different locales to meet their specific needs for breeding, wintering, and through travel, which make them early indicators of environmental imbalance in each of these areas. But the indications aren’t good. Northern grassland songbirds, like the Sprague’s pipit, Baird’s sparrow, lark bunting, and the longspurs, show the largest and steepest decline of any species group on the entire continent. They’ve dropped between 65 and 94 percent since the 1960s.In Chihuahua, Mexico, which serves as wintering grounds for many of these birds, grasslands are getting turned by ploughs even more quickly than in Montana. But Casey’s work on bird populations prioritizes the protection of the Northern Plains in particular.He emphasizes that birds have to produce young in order for their species to survive. “That’s what we’re putting our efforts into—the loss of breeding habitat,” Casey says. With more than 80 percent of the Northern Plains in private hands, the key to Casey’s and the NGPJV’s success is working with landowners. And their focus is on ranchers.That’s because the Plains, including its songbirds, evolved with an animal that had relatively similar grazing habits to modern beef cattle: the bison. Large ungulates, like bison, influenced the landscape through their bodily waste, wallowing, and the impact of their hooves.As ungulates moved freely across the landscape, the mosaic of vegetation that followed encouraged a diversity of bird species, each suited to a different grassy niche. And like the bison, the birds fill a critical role in the ecosystem, dispersing seeds, controlling insects, and mitigating weeds.Skillful management of cattle can mimic the salutary impact that bison—seen here roaming in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem—have on the land.When sustainably grazed and rotated through fields to give the land time to recover, cattle such as Milton’s can mimic the impacts of native bison and actually do more good than harm to the ecosystem. According to Lauenroth, data has supported this concept for over forty years, but economics, tradition and limited education has slowed the transition to more sustainable ranching methods. The NGPJV is working with ranchers to rehabilitate and further protect the health of the landscape while maintaining the viability of their livelihoods by leveraging partnerships between the U.S. Department of Agriculture’s Natural Resource Conservation Service and private funding. Meanwhile, organizations like American Bird Conservancy and their Mexican counterpart, Pronatura Noreste, have implemented similar sustainability programs on nearly 70,000 acres on ranches in the bird’s wintering grounds in the Chihuahuan Desert.As we drive past a scuffed yellow sandstone bluff, Milton slows to show where he spotted two nesting bobolinks recently, in an area where he had planted native cover crop two years prior.“To use this paddock, we’re going to have to put up temporary fencing; that’s not something everyone wants to do,” because it requires additional hard labor, says Milton, referring to one of the drawbacks of the rotational grazing system he’s utilizing.But the upside of shifting his reliance to native pastures is that Milton is not spending nearly as much money applying chemicals and can spend more time helping his calves. Most importantly, the ranch, and thereby Milton and his family’s future, is more resilient. “It seems the most efficient way to raise the animals,” he says,. “Work with the landscape and keep the business enjoyable.”Later, at Milton’s ranch, he shapes ground beef from one of his of Black Angus cows into patties, before serving us hamburgers. Milton explains that for many years the prevailing style of rangeland management was based on each pasture receiving rest two out of every three years.But beginning around the 1960s, corporate ranch owners then began to increase their intensity, grazing every year and spraying herbicides and pesticides on the vegetation to maximize production.As a result, the diversity of grassland species plummeted, leading to the degraded condition of much of the short grass prairie today. To improve the overall grazing strategy going forward, Milton says ranchers need to exercise “flexibility, adaptivity, collaboration, imagination.”Milton may as well be talking about songbirds, conservation organizations, and ranching communities alike. Implementing large-scale change takes time, energy and money—lots of it. The NGPJV helps ranchers with funding for water tanks, fencing, prescribed burns, and the conversion of cropland and non-native pastures back to traditional grasses. Not only do these measures benefit the birds, but they also help store and filter water, fortify the soil against erosion, and capture carbon.“There will be people who think you’ve sold out because you’re working with The Nature Conservancy, World Wildlife Fund,” says Milton, referring to the long-brewing undercurrent of conflict between many ranchers and environmentalists. “You’ve gotta just ignore them.”When asked what the prairie would feel like without songbirds, Milton’s already soft voice quiets even more. “Even the most abundant blue-collar birds out here—the western meadowlark or the lark bunting—they’re lovely,” he says. “What’s so sad about this time of year is it hits me, ‘Oh my God, I have to wait until March to hear this again.’”",
"A male Attwater's prairie chicken stands with his neck sac expanded in a courting display. These endangered birds are found in small numbers in southeast Texas.The first time Mike Morrow met the Attwater prairie chicken in the wild, it was the middle of the night. It was 1983 and he was a young graduate student at Texas A&M, helping another researcher. They arrived early, before sunup.“You’re sitting there in the pitch black and then all of a sudden you start hearing these birds fly in,” says Morrow, now a longtime biologist for the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service. “And then not too long after that, they start their vocalizations – their cackling, they’ll start booming. All of this is when you can’t even see them. Then, as the morning dawns and it starts to get light, you see all these antics on the booming ground in front of you.”The booming ground is a small plot of prairie, maybe an acre, where male Attwaters once congregated to strut about, slap the ground with their feet and make low hoots – or booms – while the females looked on.The Attwater is a drab, unremarkable bird for most of the year. But during breeding season, it undergoes a transformation, inflating its bright yellow pouch with each boom.There in the pre-dawn hours, Morrow marveled at the haunting scene. But not long after his first encounter with Attwaters, their population mysteriously crashed to just a few dozen animals and they were rounded up to be bred in captivity, where they still live today. Morrow has spent the 30 years since living on a small refuge, trying to solve the mystery of the disappearing chickens. It’s a whodunit that he now says he’s solved.Attwater prairie chickens, once ubiquitous on southern prairies, had at one point dropped to just 470 individuals, most of them in a small preserve in South Texas.The first thing to know about the Attwater prairie chicken is that everything eats it. Hawks and other raptors, bobcats, coyotes, owls, feral dogs, even cats – anything with teeth or claws will take a shot at the bird. As a result, its primary defenses are large numbers and large spaces.Throughout the 20th Century, the Attwater lost both, as their prairies disappeared piece by piece. By the 1960’s it was clear they were in serious enough decline to be included in the Endangered Species Preservation Act of 1966 (the precursor to the modern Endangered Species Act) as part of the so-called “class of ’67,” America’s first official endangered species.By the 1980s, when Morrow first saw them, they seemed to have leveled off somewhere around 1,000 to 2,000 individuals. Morrow ended up doing his doctoral research on Attwaters. But by the time he got a job as a biologist in 1988 at the Attwater Prairie Chicken National Wildlife Refuge, an hour outside Houston, the population was in freefall.A decade later, FWS biologists decided to start breeding the animal in captivity in facilities like the Fossil Rim Wildlife Refuge, near Dallas. Biologists like Morrow started scooping up as many Attwaters they could find, but it was nearly impossible. The only birds they could find—19 in all—were started in an emergency breeding program. Not long after they disappeared from the wild completely.What happened? Was it a disease? An unknown toxin?One theory was that the population had hit an unknown tipping point, and, like the passenger pigeon, collapsed from lack of habitat. They didn’t seem to be carrying any diseases and the fact that they were dying out across their range suggested it wasn’t anything local, like logging or water contamination.Meanwhile, they weren’t taking well to captivity. “We didn’t have a guidebook when we started this program. Everything that we’re doing now has been through trial and error,” says Janet Johnson, who runs the breeding program at Fossil Rim.For instance, initially the males were separated by dark screens so that they wouldn’t hurt themselves trying to fight. But many of the females seemed uninterested in the males chosen for them (selected to maximize genetic diversity) and laid sterile eggs. It turned out that fighting was a crucial part of getting the females’ interest. So they took down the screens and allowed a few scuffles among the males.A newly hatched Attwater's prairie chicken basks in warm light at the Fossil Rim Wildlife Center, where hundreds of chicks are raised during breeding season.Eventually it began to work. Breeders at Fossil Rim and then the Houston Zoo started cranking out chickens to be released. But once released, they didn’t breed in the wild. Something was still wrong. By the early 2000s, the future for the chicken looked bleak. But still, no one knew what was killing them. Every year, teams would breed them, raise them, and release them onto the preserve just to get eaten. It was a very expensive meat delivery service for local predators.“We pour our blood sweat and tears into doing this and it didn’t work. And we didn’t know why. It was incredibly frustrating,” Morrow says.Frustrating and obsessive. Morrow is a quiet man with a bushy mustache and glasses that make him seem like your favorite grandad. He’s friendly enough in person but there is a distance to him; a sense that he’d rather in the field with his chickens than with other people. He’s serious, dogged, but rarely enthusiastic—unless the chickens are booming.“He’s got to be the smartest person I’ve ever worked with,” says John Magera, the manager of the Attwater preserve. “I don’t think ‘passionate’ quite goes far enough. This is a lifestyle for him.”That passion finally paid off in 2005. The released birds began to survive, but their chicks would quickly die. Morrow and his team discovered they were terribly malnourished and often dehydrated.Some kind of disease maybe? The chicks seemed to be dying during a crucial time when they left the nest to forage for insects. Morrow took soil samples and discovered a dramatic drop in soil insects. Something was clearing away all the chicks’ food. Morrow consulted his wide library of books. Buried in a 15-year-old entomology paper was the answer."Fire ants!" Morrow says, in one of his rare moments of emotion. "Those things are evil. E - VIL!"One of the country’s most aggressive and hated invasive species—with a painful bite—fire ants came to Texas in 1953 and reproduced to ubiquity in the 1970s and 80s. The paper he was reading said they caused a 75 percent drop in arthropods 90 percent drop in other ants.Without anyone knowing, ants were starving the chickens. It was an odd notion, but it made sense to Morrow. Around the same time, an exotic feed company called Mazuri came up with a new pellet formulated just for Attwaters that greatly increased the breeding numbers. So he decided to test the theory. They laid out several plots – first small and then larger – removing ants and watching how the birds fared. Like clockwork, birds in treated areas bred just fine but those in ant-riddled areas struggled.Now he had a plan. He had the birds, all he had to do was treat the entire park with non-toxic ant killer and wait. In 2010, the park had a great insect year and the chicken population reached record numbers.But then disaster struck, follow by more disasters. In 2011, Texas saw a state-wide drought. Then came Hurricane Bill in 2014, followed by the Memorial Day Flood in 2015 and the Tax Day Flood of 2016. The birds struggled on, with 120 or so in the wild. Then, in 2017, Hurricane Harvey nearly wiped them all out. By 2018, only a few dozen chickens remained.“We’ve just had a series of bad breaks from mother nature,” Morrow says.Where others might see failure, Morrow is bullish. He thinks this is the year everything turns around. Good weather, a bumper crop of more than 550 birds bred in captivity, and no ants. If the Attwater prairie chicken is coming back, now is the time.Mike Morrow is at the Houston Zoo bright and early on the big day. Every other week this summer, a team of biologists has gathered birds from breeding centers, tagged them, weighed them, and disinfected them. Soon, they’ll all be released on the Attwater Prairie Chicken National Wildlife Refuge, an expanse of 10,000 acres established by FWS in 1972.Fifty-eight birds get their final checkup before they are driven to the reserve. The birds are young and squirmy in the zookeepers’ hands. Morrow inspects them like a commander surveying the troops. At best, 20 percent of them will survive the year.At the reserve, he takes each bird out of their box, as though saying farewell and wishing them luck. “I’m not an optimistic person, people will tell you that,” he says. “But we’re almost there. I really feel that way.”Fish and Wildlife officials think it’s possible the species will be fully recovered at 6,000 birds. Morrow doubts there is enough habitat for half that. By next June he’ll finally know if his theory about the ants is correct. He doesn’t have a lot of time left in this career, a few years perhaps. But before he retires he’d be satisfied with a couple hundred breeding pair in this tiny corner of Texas. A few hundred birds for 30 years of work seems a good trade. Then, one more time, he’ll go out to the prairie before dawn, set up a chair, and wait.",
"Arid pampas steppe glows in the sunshine of Glacier National Park, Patagonia, Argentina.Grasslands go by many names. In the U.S. Midwest, they're often called prairies. In South America, they're known as pampas. Central Eurasian grasslands are referred to as steppes, while African grasslands are savannas. What they all have in common are grasses, their naturally dominant vegetation. Grasslands are found where there is not enough regular rainfall to support the growth of a forest, but not so little that a desert forms. In fact, grasslands often lie between forests and deserts. (See grassland photos.)Depending on how they’re defined, grasslands account for between 20 and 40 percent of the world's land area. They are generally open and fairly flat, and they exist on every continent except Antarctica, which makes them vulnerable to pressure from human populations. Threats to natural grasslands, as well as the wildlife that live on them, include farming, overgrazing, invasive species, illegal hunting, and climate change.At the same time, grasslands could help mitigate climate change: One study found California's grasslands and rangelands could store more carbon than forests because they are less susceptible to wildfires and drought. Still, only a small percentage—less than 10 percent—of the world's grassland is protected.There are two main kinds of grasslands: tropical and temperate. Examples of temperate grasslands include Eurasian steppes, North American prairies, and Argentine pampas. Tropical grasslands include the hot savannas of sub-Saharan Africa and northern Australia.Rainfall can vary across grasslands from season to season and year to year, ranging from 10 to 40 inches annually. Temperatures can go below freezing in temperate grasslands to above 90 degrees Fahrenheit.The height of vegetation on grasslands varies with the amount of rainfall. Some grasses might be under a foot tall, while others can grow as high as seven feet. Their roots can extend three to six feet deep into the soil. The combination of underground biomass with moderate rainfall—heavy rain can wash away nutrients—tends to make grassland soils very fertile and appealing for agricultural use. Much of the North American prairielands have been converted into land for crops, posing threats to species that depend on those habitats, as well as drinking water sources for people who live nearby.Grasslands support a variety of species. Vegetation on the African savannas, for example, feeds animals including zebras, wildebeest, gazelles, and giraffes. On temperate grasslands, you might find prairie dogs, badgers, coyotes, swift foxes, and a variety of birds. There can be up to 25 species of large plant-eaters in a given grassland habitat, comprising a sort of buffet where different grasses appeal to different species.Some grass species in these habitats include red oat grass and Rhodes grass in tropical savannas, and purple needlegrass and galleta in temperate areas. When rainy season arrives, many grasslands become coated with wildflowers such as yarrow, hyssop, and milkweed. The plants on grasslands have adapted to the drought, fires, and grazing common to that habitat.Fires, both natural and human-caused, are important factors shaping grasslands. In the U.S. Midwest, for example, Native Americans set fires to help maintain grasslands for game species such as bison. Fire can also help prevent fire-intolerant trees and shrubs from taking over while increasing the diversity of wildflowers that support pollinators.",
"Ranchers herd cattle across the shortgrass prairie of Montana on their way to winter pasturelands.",
"Across the savannahs of Africa, millions of stomachs are busy converting plant tissue into animal flesh. The continent’s leaves and grasses are under constant assault from impala, wildebeest, buffalo, zebra, gazelles, and giraffes. Even acacia trees get bulldozed by elephants. There can be up to 25 species of these large plant-eaters in a given place, and many of them gather in gargantuan herds. How do they co-exist?“It’s not obvious why competition for food doesn’t whittle the number of species down to just a few dominant competitors,” says Tyler Kartzinel from Princeton University. The prevailing idea says that different species have different food preferences. Grazers like zebra and wildebeest eat grass and little else. Browsers like dik-diks and giraffes nibble on leaves and shrubs—collectively called “browse”. Some animals, like elephants and impala, go for both.Within each category, animals partition themselves in space. Zebras eat the tallest grasses; wildebeest munch the shorter ones. Dik-diks browse on the lowest leaves; impala take the mid-level; and giraffes pluck the loftiest foliage. But despite these nuances, “there’s still been this coarse distinction between grass and other plants,” says Kartzinel, “as if you partition those two resources finely enough, and suddenly there’s enough space in the savannah for dozens of herbivores.”This picture is too simple. By using DNA to actually identify the plants that these animals eat—something no one had done before—Kartzinel has shown that their preferences go much deeper than just grass versus browse.For example, the Grevy’s zebra and plains zebra—two species that live in the same places and consume almost nothing but grass—eat varying amounts of different species of grass. To them, a grassland isn’t just one uniform banquet. It’s a patchwork landscape full of different foods, with some bits that appeal to one species and others that delight another. “The appropriate question is not, ‘Does it eat grass?’ but rather ‘Which grasses does it eat?’,” says Kartzinel.“When I talk to non-ecologists, they are stunned to learn that we have never really had a clear picture of what all of these charismatic large mammals actually eat in nature,” he adds. There are good reasons for that. These animals move over long distances, and they are hard (and dangerous) to observe up-close. They often eat small plants, in the middle of the night, under cover of thick bush. “Many of these plants are also exceedingly hard to identify to the species level, even for an expert botanical taxonomist with specimen in hand — meaning that it’s literally impossible to do while looking through binoculars at an animal feeding.”To solve these problems, he and his team, led by Princeton’s Rob Pringle, turned to poo. Driving around Kenya, they tracked seven plant-eaters: elephants, plains and Grevy’s zebra, domestic cows, buffalo, and Guenther’s dik-diks. They waited for the animals to defecate, before rushing over to (carefully) collect their dung. Back in the lab, they extracted DNA from the samples, sequenced it, and used those sequences to identify the specific plants that the beasts had eaten.This approach, called DNA metabarcoding, confirmed the traditional divide between grazers and browsers, but also revealed that species which eat exactly the same amounts of either category still have very different diets. Cows and buffalo are closely related grazers, but they graze on different food. Even the zebras ate different amounts of 15 plant species, 14 of which are grasses. The Grevy’s also supplements its diet with small legumes that its plains cousin ignores. “That was the big surprise,” says Kartzinel. “We can finally see these very cryptic differences that these animals have.”He compares the herbivores to a family at a buffet: “You might all choose the same main course, but when it comes to side dishes and condiments, you have hundreds of options. It’s unlikely that you’ll all end up with the same meal.”This discovery helps to explain how the savannah supports so many plant-eaters. It offers them a buffet of riches, and each species eats only part of the full menu. The reasons for these preferences are unclear. Maybe the plains zebra just likes the taste of a particular plant. Perhaps the Grevy’s craves nutrients that only some species can provide. Perhaps dik-diks have unique gut microbes that can detoxify the poisons in plants that its competitors can’t touch. The only way of working out which of these possibilities is true is to work out exactly what these animals are eating—which is where DNA metabarcoding comes in.The team also hopes that the technique will help to reduce conflicts between farmers and Africa’s wild herds. “If people think that livestock and wildlife compete fiercely for food, they will eliminate wildlife from rangelands,” says Kartzinel. If they can show that such competition doesn’t actually exist, that pressure might abate.Reference: Kartzinel, Chen, Coverdale, Erickson, Kress, Kuzmina, Rubsenstein, Wang & Pringle. 2015. DNA metabarcoding illuminates dietary niche partitioning by African large herbivores. PNAS http://dx.doi.org/10.1073/pnas.1503283112",
"Light changes a place—from a golden sunrise blanketing the towering spires of Myanmar to a warm pink sunset following hikers to a mountain summit in Norway—our travel memories are wrapped in the light and emotions we experience. Photographers are often a dedicated group, patiently chasing golden hour light—that time of day at sunrise or sunset, when warm light blankets the world and warm, glowing images are created. We've combed through thousands of entries to the 2018 National Geographic Travel Photographer of the Year contest and collected some of the best golden hour images. Explore the glittering gallery and see which scene lights your imagination and travel plans.",
"This is one of my favourite places in the world. I felt connected!",
"Montana’s Glacier National Park is iconic “because of its breathtaking, glacier-carved peaks and flowing river valleys,” says photographer Emily Polar. The 10th most visited national park, Glacier welcomed three million visitors in 2018, many of them to its renowned Going-to-the-Sun Road.Any traveler looking to experience the United States in full would have a lot of ground to cover. The country’s 3.8 million square miles are filled with more lonely highways, dense cities, small towns, and scenic parks than can be seen in a single trip—or several.But just as there’s no singular American experience, there’s no definitive American tourist stop. From palm-fringed shores to snow-capped mountains, what’s iconic about the American landscape depends on where you’re standing.So we put a question to 22 National Geographic photographers: When you think “iconic America,” what destination comes to mind? The images they shared, inspired by their personal experiences of traveling throughout the country, showcase the nation’s diverse geographies, cultures, and peoples. For some, pristine, wild places are a defining feature of the U.S. Others chose significant Indigenous sites to reflect on our nation’s complex history. Many chose to return to sites of memory—vibrant places that impacted them as young travelers, including one story of a family’s immigration. All images were made before the coronavirus pandemic.Explore these 22 iconic destinations across the United States through the lenses of our National Geographic photographers.",
"Farm workers in California pick lemons inside the orchards of Samag Services, Inc. Agricultural laborers are essential workers in the race to maintain Americas food supply. But many farms are being criticized for not enforcing social distancing or other safety measures to protect them.On a Friday morning in early April, Heval Kelli covered himself in head-to-toe scrubs, a hair net, mask, and booties. Then he took his place as a volunteer physician among the traffic cones winding a course through a COVID-19 drive-thru testing site in the small town of Clarkston, Georgia. It was here, on the outskirts of Atlanta, that Kelli had first arrived 19 years earlier as a refugee from Syria.Now, he felt, it was his turn to return the favor. “I’m coming back during the American crisis,” he says. “Instead of being the person who needs help, I can be the person helping.”Dr. Heval Kelli (right) and Dr. Sean Lindsey (left) volunteer with the Ethne Health COVID-19 testing drive-thru in Clarkston, Georgia. Kelli moved to Clarkston in 2001 as a refugee from Syria. Now, he says, he's paying back the town's kindness.This motivation threads through a diverse range of essential workers across the United States. It drives Ana-Cara Van Dyck to prepare classwork packets for her students in a rural Alaskan town without internet. It’s shared by 83-year-old Paulette Della Volla, who works six days a week at a McDonald’s in Maryland while younger staff decline to come in. And it moves Sharmin Hoque, in New York, to run “an unofficial support group for kids of taxi drivers.”Across the United States, 316 million people are under stay-at-home orders to prevent the spread of coronavirus. The mandates, issued by 42 states, exclude “essential workers,” who provide healthcare, food, transportation, education, and other services deemed indispensable.Whether driven by a humanitarian calling or compelled by economic survival, nearly 49 million essential workers continue to show up to work across the country, despite the fact that there are now over one million COVID-19 cases in the U.S. and more than 58,000 deaths. Hundreds, perhaps thousands, of essential workers, from public transit staff to doctors, are among the dead. A new University of Washington study estimates that upwards of 380,000 U.S. healthcare workers could be killed by COVID-19.None of the four federal coronavirus relief bills have included guaranteed paid sick leave or hazard pay for essential workers. Some employers have offered additional wages and new safety measures. Many have not. Last week, workers at Amazon went on strike, and nurses protested a lack of protective equipment in front of the White House. Farm and factory employees have found their workplaces shut down after becoming virus hotspots.For those who can’t work from the safety of their homes, what is life like on the frontlines?Clarkston, Georgia, has been called the “Ellis Island of the South” for the 40,000 refugees it has welcomed in the past three decades. In 2001, 18-year-old Kurd Heval Kelli was one of them, arriving from Syria two weeks after the 9/11 attacks. Nearly 20 years later, Kelli is a cardiology fellow working at a large Atlanta hospital and as a volunteer physician in his adopted hometown during the COVID-19 response.“I came during the worst time of U.S. history as a Muslim refugee and I was welcomed by southern white Christian conservatives,” Kelli says. “Now I’m going back during this crisis and returning the favor.”In February, Kelli noticed that information about the coronavirus threat was not reaching immigrants, refugees, and the poor. He and his wife, a fellow cardiologist named Kazeen Abdullah, started translating CDC data into Kurdish and Arabic and fielding calls and texts from members of the diaspora, who relay their symptoms and ask whether they should seek medical attention.Kelli also hosts Zoom calls and a Facebook Live Q&A series with other doctors on the frontlines. So far, he says, it’s working: There are no known coronavirus deaths in the Kurdish community of Atlanta. He’s now trying to set up a similar information pipeline for the city’s Burmese population.When he was 11, Kelli had been beaten by Syrian police and watched them arrest his father. Abdullah, his wife, crossed a mountain range in Iraq to flee ethnic cleansing. “We’ve been through trauma,” says Kelli, “and feel like now we can step up and be there for Americans.”While most of the country’s classrooms have transitioned to video lessons and Zoom study groups, no one in the 400-person village a rural part of Alaska has internet at home. The 3G network is so slow “I could knit a sweater in the time it takes me to upload a two-minute video,” says language arts teacher Ana-Cara Van Dyck. (She asked her village not be named.)Teachers at the 70-student secondary school had to adapt: Every day, they go into the building at staggered times to use the internet, print assignments, and update grades. When families come to the school cafeteria, the largest communal building in town, to pick up food for students and elders, they also receive a packet of classwork and returned assignments.The assignments are light compared to a typical course load. Instead of an essay comparing two short stories, for instance, Van Dyck will assign a short prompt and five vocabulary words based on a few pages of reading. She thinks of it as a shot of brain food, and she’s gratified to get questions back from students by phone, text—even shouting at a safe distance.“We’re giving work, checking in, hearing they’re stressed, and we can’t be there,” Van Dyck says. “We can only text them and remind them: You can do this! Don't let the coronavirus ruin your hopes and dreams of becoming a pilot or nurse or whatever your dream was.”But Van Dyck is worried. Alaska has higher-than-average rates of depression among high school students and the highest per capita suicide rate in the United States. The classroom is a rare quiet place for her students to reflect and think about the lives they want, away from the aunts, cousins, and grandparents most of them live with. Without it, she fears some will give up pursing an education.“I think there’s an apathy connected to a deeper anxiety,” she says. “Realistically speaking, what can we accomplish until there’s a vaccine? For a kid in 11th grade, they’re staring down the nose of the question: What does my future look like?”And what does the future look like if students can’t get a quality education? “If you take away that empowerment ,I’m so scared of what the world will look like 10 to 20 years from now,” she says. “Our young people won’t have received what they needed.”(See how the COVID-19 death toll in America compares to past wars.)In mid-March, when the governor of Texas declared a statewide emergency, Manuel Ramirez, a homicide detective-turned-president of the Fort Worth Police Officers Association went to city officials with a request: His 1,700 officers needed to be covered for COVID-19 as for any other lethal threat.The city agreed: Any officer infected with coronavirus would be presumed to have caught it on duty. If they died, their families would be taken care of. “It’s no different than being shot in the line of duty,” says Ramirez. So far, seven officers on the force have contracted COVID-19 (all are recovering).Policing in Fort Worth today only loosely resembles pre-pandemic law enforcement. Morning roll calls are cancelled, two-person patrols are limited, and tactics that put police on the offensive are downplayed. The directive is to prioritize only the most necessary interactions with the public. Partly because of this, Ramirez says, the city’s murder rate is up 73 percent from this time last year.Ramirez says his city’s officers have started to think of the virus as just another risk of the profession. “We’ve always had a dangerous job, but your nurses, grocery store workers, truck drivers—those folks are not prepared for a dangerous job. We’re prepared,” he says. “To a certain extent.”The coronavirus pandemic has hit law enforcement ranks across the country. Officer Marc Perez (center) and his partner, Nelson Hammons (right) hand out masks and gloves in a park in Detroit, Michigan. Out of 2,800 employees of the Detroit Police Department, 186 have tested positive for the virus.Bre O’Connell’s nursing shifts at NYU Winthrop in Long Island don’t end until 7:30 p.m., so she misses the applause for health workers that echoes across New York every evening half an hour earlier. One recent night when she left the hospital, she found a voicemail on her phone: Her kids had recorded the city’s cheers for her.O’Connell’s floor, which typically cares for patients recovering from heart surgery, was converted into an 18-bed ICU in early April. Nurses arrived from Florida, Wisconsin, and Michigan to help. Patients were depressed, withdrawn, and rapidly deteriorating. O’Connell felt she was taking care of a floor of zombies. In the first few weeks, 13 of the 20 dayshift nurses she usually works with contracted the virus.“The anxiety level was through the roof,” she says. “You’re looking on social media and all you’re seeing is healthcare providers dying as a result of the virus or [lack of] access to personal protective equipment.” At least 46 nurses nationwide have died since the beginning of the crisis.O’Connell has been extremely cautious. Before entering her house, she changes into a robe in a small hut her husband built out of two folding tables. The two of them haven’t visited their parents since early March. At night O’Connell’s sleep is unsettled by “extremely detailed dreams about death.”(Read about why the pandemic is giving people vivid dreams.)In recent days, O’Connell has seen the caseload at the hospital lighten and felt the mood lift—just slightly. The majority of the hospital’s 591 beds are still occupied by COVID-19 patients, but the “COVID Today” update she gets each day shows a decline. The sick nurses on her floor have all recovered. Her colleagues rely heavily on each other for support. It’s hard, she says, for their families to understand what they’ve experienced.“This is crazy,” O’Connell says. “But the alternative of not being at work or sitting at home does not interest me whatsoever. If [someone is] going to be alone in their last few hours, and if I can help just a little bit, I’m happy to do so and I’m proud to do so.”(Read a Baltimore nurse's chronicle from the frontlines.)One evening in mid-April, when Sharmin Hoque called her father, a New York taxi driver, to share that a family friend had passed away, he started listing cab drivers who’d also died in the pandemic. Afterwards, she typed a tweet out on her phone: “My dad lost 5 friends to COVID in the last 12 hrs. Fellow cabbies & other service workers. He sounded so withdrawn on the phone. My focus is child & millenial [sic] mental health. I feel completely unprepared to deal w the devastating impact of this pandemic on our parents wellbeing.”Hoque’s father, Mohammed, had been driving nights in New York for a decade. About a month ago, the 53-year-old looked around his house in Queens, where 17 relatives live in three units, and determined that working wasn’t worth the risk. He and his brother, who takes the day shift, hung up their keys, and have tapped into their savings and applied for unemployment.After Hoque sent that tweet, the responses poured in—prayers, death reports, notes from children caring for parents. Tens of thousands of people liked the tweet. Hoque later muted the thread. Twitter, along with Facebook, had become overwhelming—an endless stream of obituaries. Queens now has more coronavirus deaths than any other county in America. “I’m grieving constantly to the point where it feels like I’m choking,” she says.Unable to mourn in the usual, communal ways, people have flocked to her phone inbox: It has become “an unofficial support group for kids of taxi drivers,” she says. Many of them have lost fathers and uncles. Nearly a quarter of New York’s cabdrivers are Bangladeshi—more than any other ethnicity.Both Hoque and her husband work in public health and serve on the board of Muslims Thrive, an organization focused on mental health in the Muslim community. The pair has become a go-to resource for Bangladeshis in Queens. Hoque frequently posts links and infographics in her family group chats, translating important information into Bengali.“Many immigrants are relying on their kids for info and resources,” she says. “We’ve been doing it since we could talk.” And she continues to offer lifesaving information to the community, she says, in honor of the “cab drivers who didn’t know they could collect unemployment and worked until they got sick, and then worked until they passed away.”When the essential worker order went out in March, Erik Nicholson saw a chance for vindication. For 30 years he has lobbied for farm workers to get their fair due. Now, as the national vice president of the United Farm Workers union, he envisioned long-deserved recognition for the men and women in the fields.It didn’t materialize. Instead, most farm workers continue to live in close quarters, travel in crammed buses, and work without access to soap and running water. In Washington state, where Nicholson is based, the coronavirus crisis has made their lives even harder: Wages haven’t increased but childcare costs have quadrupled due to school closures. Farm workers can’t take advantage of food bank and school distributions because they work during those hours. Many are undocumented, and therefore not eligible for unemployment if they lose their jobs or get sick.“That [essential worker] designation has dramatically reduced the quality of life of many farm workers,” says Nicholson. “By the mere fact that they continue to work they’ve put their lives at risk, and they’re poorer and hungrier than they were before.”As meatpacking plants shut down across the country—2,200 COVID-19 cases have been confirmed in 48 factories so far—Nicholson fears that America’s harvest is next. In May, 250,000 seasonal workers are set to arrive in the United States from Mexico, typically on buses. More than 20,000 of them will come to Washington, where they will likely live and work in close quarters without protection.Last week, the UFW sued the state to compel farms to provide protection—from enforced social distancing to improved sanitation—for workers. “We don't see them as essential like the healthcare workers and grocery store clerks. Farm workers are out of sight, out of mind,” says Nicholson.There’s no official count of farmworker coronavirus cases in Washington, but last week, all 71 employees at an orchard were tested after three people fell ill. Thirty-six people tested positive, and none had displayed symptoms. The orchard has not yet announced whether it will pause operations. “You’ve gone from 3 to 71 like that,” Nicholson says, snapping his fingers. “That’s how fast our food chain can collapse.”(Read about farm workers risking their lives to keep America fed.)Paulette Della Volla survived the German occupation of France during World War II, married a U.S. airman, moved to America, and has managed the same McDonalds in Maryland for 41 years. At 83, she works six days a week, starting at 4 a.m. She doesn’t see a reason to stop now, even though each week another staffer calls to say they won’t be coming into work. Most say their parents no longer want them exposed to the virus.The schedule has been cut in half, and only 10 staff, including Della Volla, work at a time. They wear face masks and space out the customers in line. The pace of business has slowed so drastically that she can accommodate a dwindling staff. But closing is not an option for Della Volla. If she didn’t keep the restaurant running, where would her remaining customers eat? She’s known most of them for decades. “I think it would be a big impact on them,” she says. “They don’t have nowhere to go.”And so Della Volla has no plans to wait out the pandemic at home with her dog. Her son and daughter know she won’t, she says, so they haven’t dared to ask her. She laughs at the suggestion. “Who me? No, no. When my time comes it will come,” she says. “I’m not worried at all. Not for myself.”(Read about the domestic workers in Brazil who can't afford to get sick.)Katy Johnson has lived in the 1,500-person village of Cuba, New York, her whole life, so when strangers began shopping at the independent grocery store where she works, she noticed immediately. After the Walmarts and Wegmans ran out of staples, people began driving 45 minutes to her store (which she prefers not to be named) from larger towns across the region.The head customer service cashier, Johnson knows she’s taking a risk coming to work six days a week during the pandemic. But the stream of new customers means job security. Listening to her customers share their woes about applying for unemployment, Johnson is increasingly grateful for a paycheck.It’s not just groceries that are essential during this pandemic, she says. Every morning, an elderly man comes into the store. After his wife passed away earlier this year, he started visiting daily to pick out a fresh-baked donut from the case and joke with the baker behind the counter. “Oh these damn donuts,” he’d say.When the lockdown began, the store stopped making donuts. One day, the baker asked the widower for his favorite kind. From then on, she’s whipped up a single donut for him each morning. Johnson could tell it made his day.“I'm just giving people what they need to make dinner tonight,” says Johnson. “But people need a connection to other people, too. We’re able to offer that.”(See photos of essential workers around the world.)",
"The coronavirus pandemic has been described as an invisible war, but the only comparable figures come from conflicts long in our rearview mirror. On February 6, COVID-19 claimed its first victim on U.S. soil: a 57-year-old woman in Santa Clara County, California. On Tuesday, less than three months later, the death toll has surpassed the number of U.S. soldiers killed in combat during the nine-year-long Vietnam War (not including those killed outside the theater of war).On April 11, the United States surpassed Italy to set a grim record: highest confirmed coronavirus death toll in the world. Now, there are over a million cases and 58,365 deaths—a third of the global caseload and a quarter of total deaths.An estimated 47,434 American soldiers were killed in battle during the Vietnam War, which spanned from 1964 to 1975. An additional 10,786 died in the theater of war, but out of battle, making a total of 58,220 deaths. (Conflict casualty statistics differentiate between soldiers and civilians, and between deaths in the theater of war and outside it.)(Read about the woman who discovered the first coronaviruses.)The current coronavirus death toll also surpasses the U.S. lives lost in the Korean War—36,574 Americans killed in battle and in the theater of war combined—and World War I, in which 53,402 Americans died in battle. From the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan combined, U.S. deaths have numbered fewer than 7,000.In late March, Dr. Anthony Fauci, who runs the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, announced that an estimated 100,000 to 200,000 Americans could die from COVID-19. Ten days later, he lowered that figure to 60,000—a number that is already almost obsolete.Early data shows that the virus is disproportionately affecting both men and communities of color. African Americans comprise more than a fifth of the dead, according to a study on April 27, making the mortality rate 2.7 times higher than for white Americans.(Read how the coronavirus is revealing the deadly legacy of inequality.)It’s been many decades since Americans died en masse on U.S. soil. The last comparable historic death toll was the 1918 influenza pandemic, which killed 675,000 Americans. More recently, Hurricane Katrina in 2005 left 1,200 people dead. The terror attacks of Sept. 11, 2001, killed 2,977.(See how cities flattened the curve during the 1918 flu pandemic.)If Fauci’s higher projection materializes, deaths related to COVID-19 will still pale next to the American Civil War, in which nearly a half million Americans died, and World War II, in which 291,557 died in battle. But compared to war and disasters that the majority of Americans alive today can remember, this pandemic is on pace to set deadly records.",
"Scientist June Almeida operates an electron microscope in 1963 at the Ontario Cancer Institute in Toronto, Canada. One year later, Almeida would become the first person to see a coronavirus using microscope techniques she developed.When June Almeida peered into her electron microscope in 1964, she saw a round, grey dot covered in tiny spokes. She and her colleagues noted that the pegs formed a halo around the virus—much like the sun’s corona.What she saw would become known as the coronavirus, and Almeida played a pivotal role in identifying it. That feat was all the more remarkable because the 34-year-old scientist never completed her formal education.Born June Hart, she lived with her family in a tenement building in Glasgow, Scotland, where her father worked as a bus driver. June was a bright student with ambitions to attend university, but money was scarce. At 16, she dropped out of school and started working as a lab technician at Glasgow Royal Infirmary, where she used microscopes to help analyze tissue samples.Four coronaviruses seen through an electron microscope. The spokes around the edge reminded researchers of a halo, which inspired its name corona, or crown in Latin.After moving to a similar job at St Bartholomew’s Hospital in London, she met the man who would become her husband, Venezuelan artist Enriques Almeida. The pair immigrated to Canada, and June got a job working with electron microscopes at the Ontario Cancer Institute in Toronto. There she developed new techniques and published several papers describing the structures of viruses previously unseen.The microscopy technique Almeida developed was simple, yet revolutionary for the field of virology.When working with microscopic particles, it’s hard to know exactly what to look for. An electron microscope blasts a specimen with a beam of electrons and then records the particles’ interactions with the specimen’s surface. Since electrons have much shorter wavelengths than light, this shows scientists an image with much finer, smaller detail. The challenge is discerning if a tiny blob is a virus, a cell, or something else.To solve the problem, Almeida realized she could use antibodies taken from previously infected individuals to pinpoint the virus. Antibodies are drawn to their antigen-counterparts—so when Almeida introduced tiny particles coated in antibodies, they would congregate around the virus, alerting her to its presence. This technique enabled clinicians to use electron microscopy as a way to diagnose viral infections in patients.Almeida went on to identify a host of viruses including rubella, which can cause complications during pregnancy. Scientists had been studying rubella (aka three-day measles) for decades, but Almeida was the first to see it.As her skills gained recognition, Almeida returned to London for a position at St. Thomas's Hospital Medical School. There, in 1964, she was contacted by Dr. David Tyrrell, who oversaw research at the Common Cold Unit in Salisbury, Wiltshire. His team had collected samples of a flu-like virus they labeled “B814” from a sick schoolboy in Surrey, but had considerable difficulty cultivating it in the lab. As traditional methods failed, researchers began to suspect that B814 might be a new type of virus altogether. (There are more viruses on Earth than stars in the universe. Why do only some infect us?)Running low on options, Tyrrell sent Almeida samples, hoping that her microscope technique could identify the virus. “We were not too hopeful but felt it was worth a try,” wrote Tyrrell in his book Cold Wars: The Fight Against the Common Cold.Though Almeida had limited materials to work with, her findings exceeded Tyrrell’s best hopes. Not only did Almeida find and create clear images of the virus, but she remembered seeing two similar viruses earlier in her research: one while looking at bronchitis in chickens and the second while studying hepatitis liver inflammation in mice. She had written a paper about both, but it had been rejected. Reviewers thought the images were just poor-quality pictures of influenza virus particles. With the sample from Tyrrell, Almeida was confident they were looking at a new group of viruses.As Almeida, Tyrrell, and Almeida’s supervisor gathered to discuss their findings, they wondered what to call the new group of viruses. After looking over the images, they were inspired by the virus’s halo-like structure and decided on the Latin word for crown, corona. The coronavirus was born.Almeida retired from virology in 1985 but remained active and curious. She became a yoga instructor, learned how to restore fine china, and developed a sharp eye for antiques, which she often hunted for with her second husband Phillip Gardner, also a retired virologist.Before her death in 2007 at the age of 77, Almeida returned to St. Thomas as an advisor and helped publish some of the first high-quality images of HIV, the virus that causes AIDS.Hugh Pennington, an emeritus professor of bacteriology at the University of Aberdeen, worked with Almeida at St. Thomas and describes her as his mentor. "Without doubt she is one of the outstanding Scottish scientists of her generation, but sadly largely forgotten,” Pennington said in an interview with The Herald. “Though ironically, this COVID-19 outbreak has shone a light again on her work.” (Here's why a COVID-19 vaccine could take longer than a year to develop.)Today, researchers are still using her techniques to rapidly and accurately identify viruses. Fifty-six years after she first saw a coronavirus through a microscope, Almeida’s work is more relevant than ever.",
"This scanning electron microscope image shows SARS-CoV-2 (round gold objects) emerging from the surface of cells cultured in the lab. SARS-CoV-2 is the virus that causes COVID-19.An estimated 10 nonillion (10 to the 31st power) individual viruses exist on our planet—enough to assign one to every star in the universe 100 million times over.Viruses infiltrate every aspect of our natural world, seething in seawater, drifting through the atmosphere, and lurking in miniscule motes of soil. Generally considered non-living entities, these pathogens can only replicate with the help of a host, and they are capable of hijacking organisms from every branch of the tree of life—including a multitude of human cells.Yet, most of the time, our species manages to live in this virus-filled world relatively free of illness. The reason has less to do with the human body’s resilience to disease than the biological quirks of viruses themselves, says Sara Sawyer, a virologist and disease ecologist at the University of Colorado Boulder. These pathogens are extraordinarily picky about the cells they infect, and only an infinitesimally small fraction of the viruses that surround us actually pose any threat to humans.Still, as the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic clearly demonstrates, outbreaks of new human viruses do happen—and they aren’t as unexpected as they might seem.To better forecast and prevent outbreaks, scientists are homing in on the traits that may explain why some viruses, and not others, can make the hop into humans. Some mutate more frequently, perhaps easing their spread into new hosts, while others are helped along by human encounters with animals that provide opportunities to jump species.When it comes to epidemics, “there are actually patterns there,” says Raina Plowright, a disease ecologist at Montana State University. “And they are predictable patterns.”Most new infectious illnesses enter the human population the same way COVID-19 did: as a zoonosis, or a disease that infects people by way of an animal. Mammals and birds alone are thought to host about 1.7 million undiscovered types of viruses—a number that has spurred scientists around the world to survey Earth’s wildlife for the cause of our species’ next pandemic. (Bacteria, fungi, and parasites can also pass from animals to people, but these pathogens can typically reproduce without infecting hosts, and many viruses are better equipped to cross species.)To make a successful transition from one species to another, a virus must clear a series of biological hurdles. The pathogen has to exit one animal and come into contact with another, then establish an infection in the second host, says Jemma Geoghegan, a virologist at Macquarie University. This is known as a spillover event. After the virus has set up shop in a new host, it then needs to spread to other members of that species.Exact numbers are hard to estimate, but the vast majority of animal-to-human spillovers likely result in dead-end infections that never progress past the first individual. For a new virus to actually spark an outbreak, “so many factors need to align,” says Dorothy Tovar, a virologist and disease ecologist at Stanford University.Inspectors take a blood sample from a chicken to test for avian flu in Can Tho, Vietnam.Those factors include how often a virus-carrying animal encounters humans, the means through which a virus is spread, how long a virus can persist outside of a host, and how efficiently a virus can subvert the human immune system. A wrinkle at any step along the chain of transmission could foil the pathogen’s attempt to infect a new species. Even factors that seem innocuous—like above-average rainfall, or a local food shortage—can rejigger the dynamics of how humans and animals interact.For a virus, one of most challenging aspects of transmission is gaining entry to a new host’s cells, which contain the molecular machinery that these pathogens need to replicate. This process typically involves a virus latching on to a molecule that studs the outside of a human cell—a bit like a key clicking into a lock. The better the fit, the more likely the pathogen is to access the cell’s interior. SARS-CoV-2, the coronavirus that causes COVID-19, engages with the protein ACE2 to enter cells in the human airway.For any given host, “there’s a very small number of pathogens that are able to” break into its cells this way, Sawyer says. The vast majority of the viruses we encounter simply bounce off our cells, eventually exiting our bodies as harmless visitors.Sometimes, however, a pathogen manages to slip through. More than 200 viruses are known to cause disease in humans, and all are capable of breaking into human cells. But they almost certainly didn’t start out with that ability.The host molecules that viruses glom on to, which are called receptors, tend to be highly variable from one species to the next, Sawyer says. “A key property of a virus that can accomplish a zoonosis is that it can, with a small number of evolutionary steps, adapt to use the human version of that receptor.”Viruses with a lot of genetic flexibility, and particularly those that encode their genomes as RNA rather than DNA, are well-suited to crossing the species divide. Compared to viruses and cells that rely on DNA, RNA viruses tend to be sloppy when copying over their genetic code, introducing mutations at a high rate. This error-prone process creates an immense amount of diversity into populations of RNA viruses, allowing them to adapt to new environments—including new host species—at a rapid pace, says Sarah Zohdy, a disease ecologist at Auburn University.Of the pathogens that have infected the human population in recent decades, the majority have been RNA viruses, including Ebola, SARS, MERS, Zika, several influenza viruses, and SARS-CoV-2.Some viruses can also change up their genetic code through a second method that’s a bit like sexual reproduction. When two genetically dissimilar viruses infect the same cell, they may swap segments of their genomes with each other as they replicate, yielding hybrid viruses that differ from both their “parents.” Flu viruses, which rely on RNA, are among those that both mutate independently and frequently mingle their genomes—traits that have helped influenza shuttle back and forth between an entire menagerie of wild and domestic species, including pigs, whales, horses, seals, several types of birds, and, of course, humans.Neither mutation nor viral interbreeding, however, can guarantee spillover—and viruses that lack one or both traits can still infect a wide range of hosts.A few years ago, Geoghegan and her colleagues identified a slew of other characteristics common to viruses that cause disease in humans. Their analysis revealed that viruses seemed to benefit from hiding in their hosts for long periods of time without being lethal. Lengthier infections, she says, likely give these stealthy pathogens more time to adapt and spread to new species.Many of the pathogens that jump into people do so from rodents, bats, and non-human primates, likely due to some combination of these species’ abundance, proximity to people, and biological similarities to humans, Zohdy says. And of course, viruses related to known human pathogens, such as new strains of influenza and the novel coronavirus, are always possible threats. Although many of these microbes end up being harmless to humans, a handful of genetic changes can make them compatible with our cells.Viral traits alone aren’t enough to predict pandemics. But as scientists continue to catalog the diverse viruses that inhabit our planet, knowing some of these telltale traits can help them prioritize pathogens for further study, says Tracey Goldstein, associate director of the University of California, Davis’ One Health Institute. After a candidate virus is identified in the field, it can be brought into the lab to see if it’s actually capable of infecting and replicating in human cells.Traditionally, many of these steps have been performed by different groups of researchers, with some focusing their efforts on sampling viruses in the wild, and others sticking mostly to characterizing pathogens in the lab, Tovar says. However, scientists can’t get a full picture of the pathogens that could put us at risk without surveillance in the field, and they can’t confirm which ones pose the biggest threats without laboratory experiments.“So many things need to come together, and it all matters,” Plowright says. But this complexity can work in humans’ favor: The more spillover factors that researchers identify, the more opportunities they have to intervene. Eventually, with enough information, we might even be able to stop outbreaks before they occur.“The amount of information we’ve been able to get in such a short period of time … is incredible,” Zohdy says. “That’s already giving me hope.”",
"In 2013, scientists discovered that the intermediate horseshoe bat (Rhinolophus affinis) can carry a coronavirus very similar to SARS-CoV-2, the virus responsible for the pandemic.As COVID-19 blisters its way around the globe, much of the focus has been on stopping the spread of the virus and treating those who are sick. But virologists say there’s something else that deserves our focus as well—the search for future animal hosts. Experts say that it’s possible the virus could take hold in a new species and build a redoubt for reinfecting people in the future.“As the virus is spreading around the world, it might find entirely new reservoir hosts [outside of] China,” says virologist Ralph Baric at the University of North Carolina, Chapel Hill. “We don’t know. It is something every country needs to be thinking about as the epidemics wind down.”Coronaviruses are notoriously promiscuous. Bats host thousands of types without succumbing to illness, and the viruses have the potential to leap to new species. Sometimes they mutate along the way to adapt to their new host; sometimes they can make the leap without changing.Coronaviruses are known to infect mammals and birds, including dogs, chickens, cattle, pigs, cats, pangolins, and bats. The global health crisis likely started with a coronavirus-infected horseshoe bat in China. From there, the germ possibly jumped to an intermediary species, then jumped to humans. (Read more about how that happens in this zoonotic diseases explainer.)Virologists are working to predict which species are the most likely potential reservoirs. The risk of the virus taking hold in a new species—and then those animals quietly hosting it for a while before passing it back to humans—is low, says Lin-Fa Wang, a virologist at Duke Global Health Institute in Singapore. But it’s still worth preparing for, Baric says, because the consequences could be a resurgence of the pandemic.We already know from experience that some pets can become infected with the virus that causes COVID-19. A Pomeranian and a German shepherd in Hong Kong have grabbed headlines by becoming infected; so, more recently, has a domestic cat in Belgium. A Malayan tiger at the Bronx Zoo in New York City became sick with a dry cough in late March and tested positive for the virus, the U.S. Department of Agriculture announced April 5.Researchers are interested broadly in any animal that the coronavirus could infect, whether or not it causes illness. Though the USDA and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention say there is currently no evidence that domestic or captive wild animals can spread the novel coronavirus to people, it is important to see if such a thing is possible.A Temminck's ground pangolin drinks from a puddle at a rehabilitation center in Zimbabwe. Pangolins are known to carry a variety of coronaviruses, and Sunda pangolins—native to Southeast Asia—have been found to carry a strain of the virus that's 92.4 percent genetically similar to the novel coronavirus.One way virologists can try to predict potential host species is by using 3D computer modelling. For the virus to enter a cell to replicate, a spike-shaped protein it has must bind neatly with an enzyme receptor on the surface of certain animal cells, according to a recent discovery. The receptor, called an ACE2 protein, is the doorknob, and the spike protein is the key that unlocks it. Three-dimensional computer modelling can help figure out which animals have ACE2s that can be “unlocked” by the virus’s spike protein. (See a graphic of how it works here.)By comparing ACE2 receptors, a March 2020 study identified a number of species that the virus might be able to infect, including pangolins, cats, cows, buffalo, goats, sheep, pigeons, civets, and pigs.Another way scientists are searching for potential hosts is by exposing cells from various animals to the virus, to see which species can actually become infected. This is what Baric’s lab is doing, with a focus on a variety of animal species in the United States, including livestock. One recent experiment found that cells with ACE2 proteins from humans, horseshoe bats, civets, and pigs could be infected with the virus, while mice could not.Once it becomes clear which species’ cells can become infected in the lab, it’s necessary to do tests with live animals in a controlled environment, Baric says. To that end, the Friedrich-Loeffler Institut, the German government’s research organization focused on animal health and welfare, is exposing pigs, chickens, fruit bats, and ferrets to the virus to determine whether these species can be infected and whether the virus can replicate in them. If the virus can, the animals would be considered potential reservoirs. Initial results suggest that fruit bats and ferrets are susceptible, whereas pigs and chickens are not.Heritage breeds of domestic pigs roam in Columbia, South Carolina. Pigs have been identified as one of a number of possible future hosts for the novel coronavirus.A similar study, reported this month in a preliminary paper, found that the virus replicates poorly in dogs, pigs, chickens, and ducks, but replicates well in ferrets and cats, with cats capable of spreading the virus in respiratory droplets. This was a lab study, Wang notes, and therefore it doesn’t necessarily mean it will happen in the real world.Equally important, Baric says, is getting out and testing animals in their natural environments. “Coronaviruses shift host frequently,” he says. “Ultimately you have to go out and survey wildlife.” These types of studies are very hard to do, Wang says, and currently most wild surveys are focused on finding the possible species that spread the virus in the first place, not which species may maintain it in the future.Of the animals that turn out to be susceptible to the virus, those that humans spend the most time with are the most likely to get infected, says disease ecologist Peter Daszak, president of EcoHealth Alliance. Daszak was part of a virus surveillance team that in 2017 warned about multiple SARS-like viruses in a bat cave in Southern China. More time together means more opportunities for the virus to make the jump from human to animal, he says.Even if the virus makes the jump to a new species, there’s no certainty it will colonize and persist in that animal, say virologists. There are a lot of factors that have to work out just right for an animal not only to become a host but to become a host capable of re-introducing the virus to humans.If it turns out the virus could infect a farm animal, it may cause severe illness or multiple deaths. In that case, the virus might be spotted and the outbreak contained. Or the virus may infect the animals and cause nonspecific symptoms, like diarrhea, that are associated with more common diseases. Or it may cause no symptoms at all. The virus could circulate undetected and never jump back to humans—or, in any matter of months, jump back to humans and kick off a renewed outbreak.The best approach for monitoring, says Daszak, is to strategically test key species for antibodies to the virus—a sign that the animal fought a successful battle against the virus. Luke O'Neill, an immunologist at Trinity College Dublin, Ireland, says antibody tests are cheap and easy. “It is just like a pregnancy test,” he says. “A drop of blood, you can see it within minutes if you have the antibodies or not.”It’s a “low probability that the virus will go from a sick person back into an animal,” Daszak says. But then again, he muses, “it was a low probability that it emerged in the first place.”",
"Think of the open-source project Nextstrain.org as an outbreak museum. Labs around the world contribute genetic sequences of viruses collected from patients, and Nextstrain uses that data to paint the evolution of epidemics through global maps and phylogenetic charts, the family trees for viruses.So far, Nextstrain has crunched nearly 1,500 genomes from the new coronavirus, and the data already show how this virus is mutating—every 15 days, on average—as the COVID-19 pandemic rages around the world.As menacing as the word sounds, mutations don’t mean the virus is becoming more harmful. Instead, these subtle shifts in the virus’s genetic code are helping researchers quickly figure out where it’s been, as well as dispel myths about its origins.“These mutations are completely benign and useful as a puzzle piece to uncover how the virus is spreading,” says Nextstrain cofounder Trevor Bedford, a computational biologist at the Fred Hutchinson Cancer Research Center in Seattle.This genetics-first approach to tracking the coronavirus has emerged as a bright spot among the barrage of devastating pandemic headlines. Similar science was instrumental in decoding previous epidemics, such as Zika and Ebola. But experts say the declining cost and increased speed and efficiency of genetic sequencing tools has made it possible for a small army of researchers around the world to document the coronavirus’s destructive path even faster. Those insights can help officials choose whether to shift from containment to mitigation strategies, especially in places where testing has lagged.“If we go back to the Ebola virus five years ago, it was a year-long process from samples being collected to genomes being sequenced and shared publicly,” Bedford says. “Now the turnaround is much faster—from two days to a week—and that real-time ability to use these techniques in a way that impacts the outbreak is new.”Bedford’s lab has been using genetics to track the new coronavirus, known as SARS-CoV-2, since the first U.S. cases started to multiply in Washington State in February and March. Back then, public health officials focused on tracking patients’ travel histories and connecting the dots back to potentially infected people they’d met along the way.Meanwhile, Bedford and his team turned to unlocking the virus’s genetic code by analyzing nasal samples collected from about two dozen patients. Their discovery was illuminating: By tracing how and where the virus had changed over time, Bedford showed that SARS-CoV-2 had been quietly incubating within the community for weeks since the first documented case in Seattle on January 21. The patient was a 35-year-old who had recently visited the outbreak’s original epicenter in Wuhan, China.In other words, Bedford had scientific proof that people could unknowingly be spreading the coronavirus if they had a mild case and didn’t seek care, or if they had been missed by traditional surveillance because they weren’t tested. That revelation has fueled the frantic lockdowns, closures, and social distancing recommendations around the world in an attempt to slow the spread.“One thing that’s become clear is that genomics data gives you a much richer story about how the outbreak is unfolding,” Bedford says.Nextstrain’s visualization tools have also helped engage a public that’s hungry to learn about the science of the coronavirus, says Kristian Andersen, a computational biologist at Scripps Research in La Jolla, California, whose lab has contributed more than a thousand genomes, including West Nile and Zika viruses, to the project.“I like these tools because for the longest time it was just nerds like me looking at these trees, and now it’s all over Twitter,” says Andersen. The site’s open-source ethos has also generated genome-sharing enthusiasm among researchers around the world, who offer to send viral samples to his lab or who contact him looking for specific advice on how to sequence the virus. “They see the data display and say, ‘We have patients, too. We’d like to sequence them.’”Although such charts and trees are useful for seeing the big picture of how the pandemic is unfolding, Andersen cautions random visitors against jumping to conclusions, because they can’t see the more extensive background data. Case in point: Bedford had to back-track on Twitter after suggesting that similar sequencing data from an infected German patient in Italy and a Munich patient who became infected a month earlier showed that the European outbreak had started in Germany.“The tree might suggest a connection, but there are so many missing pieces in the transmission chain that there can be other explanations of what could have happened,” says Andersen.And in places where testing and case-based surveillance are limited, Bedford says genetic data will continue to provide clues about whether all these social distancing interventions are working.“We’ll be able to tell how much less transmission we’re seeing and answer the question, ‘Can we take our foot off the gas?’” he says.In addition, the ability to reveal the virus’s evolutionary history helped researchers quickly debunk conspiracy theories, such as the one that SARS-CoV-2 was secretly manufactured in a lab to be used as a bioweapon.A March 17 article in Nature Medicine co-authored by Andersen makes this argument by comparing the genomic features of SARS-CoV-2 with all of its closest family members, including SARS, MERS, and strains isolated from animals such as bats and pangolins.First off, most of SARS-CoV-2’s underlying structure is unlike any of coronaviruses previously studied in a lab. The novel coronavirus also contains genetic features that suggest it encountered a living immune system rather than being cultivated in a petri dish.Moreover, a bioweapon designer would want maximum impact and might rely on history to obtain it, but the novel coronavirus carries subtle flaws indicative of natural selection. For instance, coronaviruses use what are known as spike proteins, which look like heads of broccoli, to bind and access cellular “doorways” called receptors. It’s how the viruses infect animal cells. Experiments have shown that the novel coronavirus strongly binds with a human receptor called ACE2, but the interaction isn’t optimal, the authors explain.“This isn’t what somebody who wanted to build the perfect virus would have picked,” Andersen says. Overall, their analysis suggests the virus jumped from an animal to humans sometime in November.In the future, genetic sequencing will become an even more important tool to identify local or regional viral flare-ups before they spread.“If a potential virus was to emerge in a community in Africa, for example, we now have the ability to get samples to the lab to do shotgun sequencing,” says Phil Febbo, a physician and chief medical officer of Illumina, the world’s largest genetic sequencing machine manufacturer, based in San Diego, California. The shotgun technique allows researchers to sequence random genetic strands to identify a virus at a faster pace, so that officials can more quickly determine appropriate containment measures to stop transmission.There’s still a lot of work to be done to create such a rapid-response global surveillance network: Labs have to be created. Governments have to get on board. Workers need to be recruited and trained to run sequencing machines and interpret results.“It’s not a limitation of technology,” Febbo says. "It’s a matter of finding the right resolve as an international community.”",
"New research finds that Sunda pangolins, like the one pictured here in Vietnam's Cuc Phuong National Park, could be possible hosts for future new coronaviruses.New research finds evidence that a small proportion of pangolins carry coronaviruses related to the strain responsible for the COVID-19 pandemic, according to a paper published March 26 in the journal Nature.This makes pangolins the only mammals other than bats known to be infected by the closest relatives of the novel coronavirus. While the work neither proves nor disproves that pangolins are linked to the current pandemic, it does indicate that they could play a role in the emergence of new coronaviruses.“If there is one clear message from this global crisis, it's that the sale and consumption of pangolins in [live animal] markets should be strictly prohibited to avoid future pandemics,” says Paul Thomson, a conservation biologist who co-founded the nonprofit Save Pangolins.Bats are the most likely reservoir of the novel coronavirus, SARS-CoV-2, according to the World Health Organization, but it likely jumped to another species before spilling over into humans.Pangolins—endangered, scaly, ant-eating mammals found in Asia and Africa about the size of domestic cats—are known to carry coronaviruses, Dan Challender wrote in an email. Challender heads the pangolin specialist group of the International Union for the Conservation of Nature, which sets the conservation status of species. It’s not surprising, therefore, that they’ve become a focus in the search to understand where the novel coronavirus came from, he says.These six Sunda pangolins were seized from a rental property in Guangzhou, China. Researchers say that the illegal trade in live pangolins and pangolin meat must be stopped to prevent the spread of disease.Although international commercial trade of all eight species is strictly forbidden, pangolins are believed to be the most trafficked mammal in the world. The scales of thousands of pangolins are smuggled every year for use in traditional Chinese medicine, and their meat is considered a delicacy by some people in China, Vietnam, and elsewhere in Asia. Because coronaviruses can be transmitted by certain bodily fluids, feces, and meat, the trade in live pangolins for food is a greater concern for disease spread than contact with scales.In China, it’s illegal to eat pangolin, but it can still be found on restaurant menus there. Pangolins were also regularly available for sale at live animal markets until January 26, when fear of the novel coronavirus spurred the government to order them all closed.The new paper finds that the genetic sequences of several strains of coronavirus found in pangolins were between 88.5 percent and 92.4 percent similar to those of the novel coronavirus.Starting with tissue samples from 18 Sunda pangolins seized in anti-smuggling operations in 2017 and 2018, researchers tested for the presence of coronaviruses. They found it in samples from five of the 18 pangolins. They repeated the process later with samples from other seized pangolins, finding coronaviruses in a portion of those individuals as well. They then sequenced the genomes of those viruses and compared them to SARS-CoV-2.Cautious in their wording, the researchers note that the genomic similarities “are not sufficient to suggest” that pangolins are the intermediate host that passed SARS-CoV-2 from bats to humans. But they don’t rule it out, either. The paper concludes, however, that pangolins should be considered as possible hosts for future new coronaviruses.“I welcome the study,” Challender wrote. “Further research is needed on these viruses in pangolins, but importantly on other species too, which may have played a critical role in the transmission of SARS-CoV-2 to humans.”",
"He’s the size of a golden retriever puppy and covered with scales.With his tail stretched out parallel to the ground for balance, Tamuda holds his little arms in front of him like a T. rex.The caretaker gently guides the young pangolin toward a dirt mound that he starts to break apart with a pick. Look, he encourages Tamuda: ants. Tamuda catches on and begins to eat, his nearly body-length tongue searching the crevices, his long claws mimicking the pick.After a few minutes of eating, it’s time to move on. Tamuda lumbers a little farther. The caretaker shows him a new ant mound. This time the pangolin isn’t interested. He flops on his side like a toddler about to throw a tantrum. He curls his body around the boot of the caretaker, who bends down and gently tries to peel him off, but Tamuda wants attention.Looking up into his human’s face, he reaches high, begging to be picked up. The caretaker tries to be strict—he’s supposed to be teaching Tamuda how to fend for himself—but the plea is too much to resist. As any good pangolin mother would do, he lifts Tamuda up and cradles him.Tamuda’s lesson was taking place at the Tikki Hywood Foundation, a rescue center near Harare, Zimbabwe, where pangolins freed from the illegal wildlife trade by Lisa Hywood and her team recover.Pangolins are trafficked both for their scales and meat, considered by some to be a delicacy. In April 2015 more than 4,000 frozen pangolin carcasses, along with scales and nearly a hundred live animals, were discovered in Indonesia in a shipping container supposedly holding frozen fish.Hywood—a fiery, compact woman prone to alternating between cooing lullabies to her rescues and vociferously condemning the cruelty of man—has rescued more than 180 pangolins since 2012. Tikki Hywood is also home to rescued sable antelope, cows, a feisty goat, and a pair of donkeys named Jesus and Mary. (Joseph is no longer with us.)Young pangolins like being up high. Until they’re several months old, their mothers carry them on their backs so the babies can observe how to behave. That’s probably where Tamuda was spending most of his time just before poachers snatched him and his mother from the wild. When a pangolin mother is afraid, she rolls into a ball, protecting her soft, peach-fuzz belly and her baby with the armor of her scales. It’s good defense against a lion, but it’s about the worst thing to do when your predator is a human and can scoop you up with bare hands.Tamuda and his mother came to the rescue center in early 2017. A Zimbabwe border patrol officer caught a man from Mozambique trying to cross into the country with them in a sack. According to the wildlife trade monitoring organization Traffic, an estimated one million pangolins were poached from 2000 through 2013—mainly for their scales, used in traditional medicine. Pangolins are believed to be the most heavily trafficked nonhuman mammal in the world.Law enforcement officers in Zimbabwe know that when they confiscate a pangolin, they should take it to Hywood. She’s one of the few people in the world who can keep pangolins alive in captivity. They’re sensitive creatures, picky eaters that consume only certain species of ants and termites, a diet that’s very difficult to replicate in captive situations.But by letting them roam for hours a day across the property with stand-in mothers for protection, Tikki Hywood has helped many pangolins, Tamuda and his mother among them, recover well enough to be returned to the wild.“Every time someone brings us a pangolin, I wonder if it’s the last one in Zimbabwe,” says Hywood, who founded the rescue center in 1994.All eight species of pangolins, four in Africa and four in Asia, are in danger of extinction driven by the illegal trade. That’s why Tamuda’s caregiver isn’t being named. He and Hywood worry that if traders know the identities of the caregivers, they might be targeted by criminals who want access to the rescued animals.Pangolins look like scaly armadillos, but they’re more closely related to bears and dogs. They constitute their own taxonomic order, and if they disappear, there’ll be nothing like them left on Earth.International trade in the four species of Asian pangolins has been prohibited since 2000. In 2017 a ban on international commercial trade in all eight species went into effect, voted in place by the 183 governments that are party to the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species (CITES), the treaty that regulates cross-border trade in wild animals and their parts.At least 67 countries and territories on six continents have been involved in the pangolin trade, but the shipments with the biggest quantities of scales have originated in Cameroon, Nigeria, Sierra Leone, and Uganda, according to an analysis by Traffic. And they’ve mainly been heading to China.“In the last decade, there’s been a massive growth in intercontinental trade in pangolins, especially their scales,” says Dan Challender, chair of the pangolin specialist group with the International Union for Conservation of Nature (IUCN), the global authority on the status of threatened species. Previously, most pangolin poaching and smuggling occurred within Asia, he says. This shift means that Asian pangolins are becoming difficult to find but that the value of scales makes it worth the extra cost to smuggle pangolins from Africa to Asia.Pangolins are eaten as bushmeat in western and central Africa and by some indigenous groups in South and Southeast Asia. Their parts also are used in Ghana, Nigeria, South Africa, and elsewhere in sub-Saharan Africa as traditional medicine. And among some people in Vietnam and China, pangolin meat is considered a delicacy. But it’s demand for their scales that’s wiping out the animals.Typically dried, ground into powder, and put into pills, pangolin scales are used in a range of traditional Chinese remedies, from treatments to help mothers with lactation to relief for arthritis and rheumatism. Scales can be found in medicine markets throughout Asia, including Vietnam, Thailand, Laos, and Myanmar.In China, where such treatments continue to be sanctioned by the government, more than 200 pharmaceutical companies produce some 60 types of traditional medicines that contain pangolin scales, according to a 2016 report by the China Biodiversity Conservation and Green Development Foundation. Every year Chinese provinces collectively issue approvals for companies to use an average 29 tons of the scales, which roughly represents 73,000 individual pangolins.China’s pangolins had become noticeably scarce by the mid-1990s, according to some reports, because of overhunting. As demand persisted, Chinese companies continued to make pangolin products, ostensibly by turning to two legal sources of scales: stockpiles amassed from pangolins hunted within China before their numbers crashed and imports brought into the country before the bans went into place.Pangolin trade records from CITES show that China imported a little more than 16 tons of scales during the 21-year period from 1994 to 2014—not nearly enough to meet the demand from pharmaceutical companies. Furthermore, the provincial governments often don’t verify that businesses are getting scales from stockpiled, rather than recently—and illegally—caught pangolins, says Zhou Jinfeng, director of the China Biodiversity Conservation group in Beijing that has been investigating the pangolin trade. He says he’s skeptical that scale stockpiles in China are big enough to fill companies’ needs more than two decades after pangolins virtually disappeared in the country.“I don’t buy it,” he says. “After so many years, they still have that many in the stockpiles?”No one really knows how many tons of pangolin scales are being smuggled each year—that’s the nature of the black market. But we do know it’s a lot, and we do know that the biggest shipments are going to China.In 2017, for example, Chinese customs officials confiscated more than 13 tons of pangolin scales, from as many as 30,000 pangolins—one of the biggest seizures on record. Last year Hong Kong authorities seized 7.8 tons of scales in a single shipment on its way to China.In all, China accounted for almost 30 percent of scale seizures globally from 2010 to 2015, according to Traffic. Keeping in mind that seizures are believed, conservatively, to represent about a quarter of actual illegal trade, these numbers suggest that hundreds of thousands of pangolins are slaughtered each year. (National Geographic asked several Chinese government agencies for comment and received no response.)Chinese companies are said to be working to breed pangolins on a large scale so they’ll have a steady supply. According to the China Biodiversity Conservation group, the government as of 2016 had issued 10 licenses to facilities to breed pangolins, ranging from rescue centers to investment companies. Another 20 pharmaceutical companies—along with businesses in Uganda, Laos, and Cambodia—launched a “breeding alliance” in 2014.The problem is that no one has figured out how to breed pangolins on a commercial scale. “There’s just no way—you cannot satiate demand through breeding,” says Paul Thomson, a conservation biologist and co-founder of the nonprofit Save Pangolins. “Pangolins stress so easily. And they don’t rebound quickly.”Most pangolins don’t survive more than 200 days in captivity, he says, let alone breed and give birth.This hasn’t stopped Chinese businesspeople from trying. In 2013 a Chinese woman named Ma Jin Ru started a pangolin-breeding operation called Olsen East Africa International Investment Co. Ltd., in Kampala, Uganda, with a provisional permit from the Uganda Wildlife Authority and, later, with backing from a government-affiliated Chinese foundation. Not long after, a company called Asia-Africa Pangolin Breeding Research Centre was also registered and licensed in Kampala.In Cameroon a young woman who runs a food stall prepares to butcher a white-bellied pangolin in the alley behind her home. Cameroonians have long eaten the animals, though their trade was recently outlawed. Pangolin scales, which once were discarded, are now sold to wildlife traders in the cities.Both companies were raided, in 2016 and 2017 respectively, by Ugandan authorities who had grown suspicious that the facilities were serving as cover for the trafficking of pangolins caught from the wild. The license issued to Olsen East Africa, for example, permitted captive breeding, but investigators suspected the companies were capturing and trading pangolins illegally—without a permit.Another Asia-Africa Pangolin Breeding Research Centre was established, in Mozambique, in 2016 and later raised suspicions among Mozambican wildlife authorities for the same reasons. In China, investigators from Zhou’s nonprofit tried to visit several of the licensed facilities, all of which denied them access.Keeping pangolins alive in captivity is a gargantuan task. In addition to their unique diet, they require special care because they’re prone to stomach ulcers and pneumonia, usually brought on by stress. Six zoos and a nonprofit in the United States imported 46 pangolins from Togo in 2016, aiming to study the animals under controlled conditions and establish a self-sustaining population. As of early March, 16 had died.Pangolins are not hard to find in Cameroon. They’re for sale at outdoor bushmeat markets, where they lie dead next to monkeys and pythons on folding tables. They’re for sale on the sides of the roads, where vendors hold them upside down by the tails for passing drivers to see. They’re a common enough sight for you to think: None of these people seem to be having trouble finding pangolins, so how close to extinction can they be?The answer is that we don’t have much of an idea how many there are in the first place. Nocturnal, solitary, and shy, they’re difficult to count. But it’s clear from data compiled by Traffic and other nongovernmental organizations that they’re being consumed in and exported from Cameroon and elsewhere in western and central Africa in alarming numbers.When photographer Brent Stirton and I went to Cameroon last summer, we called up Angelia Young. A South African living in Yaoundé, the capital, with her husband and their three kids, she was arranging to open Cameroon’s first pangolin rescue center. Young took us to a restaurant in the Bastos neighborhood, home to embassies and expats. She handed us menus. Listed above the couscous, plantains, and green beans were porcupine, antelope, and pangolin.This was an ordinary menu for any restaurant in the city, Young said. Bushmeat is popular in Cameroon, where many prefer it to meat from domestic livestock. Earlier, when we’d visited a market in a rural town where a young woman was preparing a pangolin dish to sell, I’d asked her why she cooks it.“Why not?” she’d said. “It’s good.”We didn’t order pangolin (it’s illegal to hunt, sell, or buy pangolins in Cameroon), but we were curious to see whether the restaurant had it on hand. The cook was happy to oblige, bringing out a platter of small gray frozen bodies on a tray. Playing the curious tourists, we gawked and took snapshots.Young took us back to her house, which, like all the other homes on her street, was surrounded by a tall, thick wall for security. As we pulled up, I saw a boy in a school uniform, Young’s son Nathan, walking what appeared to be a dog. He was pointing his flashlight at the space between the curb and the neighbor’s wall, keeping an eye on his pet.In Vietnam a sixth-generation traditional medicine practitioner demonstrates how he prepares herbs to mix with the dried pangolin scales his wife is grinding. Scales are believed to be helpful for a range of maladies, but there’s no scientific support for these claims.When we got closer, I realized that it wasn’t a pooch but a pangolin. The little creature was sniffing and snuffling and scratching the dirt, looking for ants. A pangolin walker, who was supervising the outing, followed close behind, keeping watch over both the animal and the boy. This pangolin was one of a few Young had rescued and was nursing back to health in her house.“I’m always saving things. Cats, dogs, birds, whatever. I ended up saving four pangolins and not knowing how to take care of them,” she said of her first rescue, in late 2016. “The only person I got to answer the phone was Lisa in Zimbabwe.”Hywood began sending Young pangolin care packages of medicine and blankets, along with health guidelines for the animals. Their conversations eventually led to the inception of the rehabilitation center Young was preparing to launch—Tikki Hywood Foundation Cameroon.Young introduced us to eight-year-old Nathan and told him we were going to take a walk to the grocery store around the corner to buy some scallions. We left the pangolin under the walker’s watchful eye, and on the way Nathan talked about how much he loves pangolins and how excited he is to help them. He was clearly proud of his mom.Next to the outdoor produce stand, a group of Chinese men and women were eating dinner. They greeted us in French, with big smiles. As we began picking over the leafy greens, Young made a small gesture with her chin to the left. Near the side door to the building, behind a low wooden fence, was a chest freezer. On top were several dozen pangolin scales, laid out to dry. Young and Nathan bought some scallions and other vegetables while I milled around to get a better look at the scales, which wasn’t hard: They weren’t hidden.“Of course it’s shocking to see—it’s in your face,” Young said later. “But for them, it’s nothing. You’ll see it everywhere.”A major stash of pangolin scales would be smuggled into Cameroon soon, investigators with the Last Great Ape Organization, an NGO, told us during our visit. The group, which helps governments with wildlife law enforcement, had been tracking these smugglers for more than a year and knew that investigators would have a chance to break up this supply chain when the men drove into the port city of Douala with their haul.Sure enough, right after I left the country, police and wildlife officials intercepted the shipment and arrested six people. The pangolin scales had arrived by truck from the Central African Republic, where it’s likely that traffickers had amassed them from many smaller-scale traders there, as well as from traders in Cameroon and the Democratic Republic of the Congo. The plan, said Eric Kaba Tah, of Last Great Ape, was to drive the shipment to Douala, where the smugglers would sell it up a level on the supply chain. Often, the next destination for the scales would be Nigeria, Tah said, then on to China, Malaysia, or Vietnam.“More and more we are seeing wildlife products leave the central African subregion, passing through Cameroon to Nigeria, where traffickers believe wildlife law enforcement is not as strong,” Tah said.It helps traffickers that Africa-to-Asia smuggling routes already exist for other wildlife products. Shipments of pangolin scales have been discovered alongside ivory, hippo teeth, and other illicit animal parts.The organized criminal networks that move ivory also move pangolin scales, according to the Center for Advanced Defense Studies, a Washington, D.C.-based research group that focuses on illicit networks, including organized wildlife crime. Such crimes are typically associated with money laundering, tax fraud, illegal arms possession, and other offenses.China is the biggest consumer of pangolin scales, but it doesn’t have to be that way, says Steve Given, the former associate dean of the American College of Traditional Chinese Medicine, in San Francisco. He has identified at least 125 herbal, mineral, and animal alternatives in the Chinese medicine pharmacopoeia, depending on what a patient needs to treat. “There’s virtually no reason that anyone needs to use chuan shan jia clinically,” he said, referring to pangolin scales by a traditional name.Western medicine so far has found no evidence that pangolin scales, which consist of keratin, the same material that makes up fingernails, hair, and rhino horn, have any physiological effects on humans. But traditional medicine texts hold that the scales can be effective at treating imbalances in the body, such as “blood stasis,” a condition that can bring on a stabbing or severe pain and may be associated with menstrual disorders, trouble with lactation, and arthritis.As long as millions of people turn to traditional medicine for relief—and that number is likely to increase because traditional Chinese medicine is set to become an official part of the World Health Organization’s medical compendium—educating health care providers and patients about alternatives will be an important way to protect pangolins from extinction, Given says.Back in Cameroon, Young said she was planning to release three pangolins into the wild and invited Stirton and me to come along. Two of the pangolins had been found in a garage, and one surrendered by a woman who received it as a gift. As we bumped along an unpaved road, I thought about the pangolins curled in boxes in the back of the car. They were getting quite a ride. The roads were too washed out to go to the regular release site, so we stopped at an open field instead.As we walked a few yards into the field, Young warned us to watch out for the biting flies that transmit a parasite that can grow into a worm in your eye. While I worried about that, she set the first pangolin on the ground. It walked into the tall grass and disappeared. We saw the tops of the grass blades rustle a bit—and that was that. Within 15 minutes, the other two pangolins also had been set free. It felt anticlimactic to say the least.On the return drive, I asked Young about a bushmeat market we’d passed on the way out. It had porcupines for sale, and there were a handful of pangolin scales drying nearby. Wasn’t it likely that the pangolins she’d just released would soon be hunted too?Yes, she said, it’s very possible. “It’s bittersweet, letting them go. There’s no security.” Nonetheless, she added, it’s a second chance. Maybe they’ll reproduce before they’re caught again, contributing a few more pangolin babies to the ever dwindling population. Every pangolin counts, she said.",
"I have come to this steaming forest to find a bird. I’m starting to wonder if it’s worth it.The terrain in Budo-Su-ngai Padi National Park in southern Thailand is so steep in places that you can reach out and touch the path in front of you. With each step on the rain-drenched ground, you risk sliding back down. Insects buzz in nose and ears, and if you stop long enough to look around, you’ll see an army of land leeches inching their wormy, blood-hungry little bodies toward you.The bird my fellow trekkers and I are after is the ancient, bizarre-looking, and now increasingly rare helmeted hornbill. The leader of our group is Pilai Poonswad, a Thai scientist known as the “great mother of hornbills.” She’s been studying the birds, and working to protect them, since 1978. Photographer Tim Laman is with us, as are a videographer, several members of Pilai’s team, and some people from the village at the bottom of the mountain who are carrying supplies and will help set up our camp. We knew it would be a slog—these birds are shy to begin with, but the growing rate of decline makes finding them something of an odyssey.When we finally reach the tree we’ve been aiming for, we hole up in a blind about 130 feet away made of camouflage fabric and bunches of branches. The tree is a dipterocarp, a tropical hardwood, maybe 180 feet tall, that towers above most others in the forest. Jutting from its side a little more than halfway up is a gnarled cavity in which a female hornbill had sealed herself a few months earlier to lay an egg. From our spot on the ground we can’t see in, but we know it’s only a matter of time before papa hornbill swoops in to deliver a meal.Hours tick by as we wait, occasionally whispering but mostly daydreaming away the giant forest ants (up to an inch long with intimidating but, I was assured, harmless pincers), those resolute leeches, and the unforgiving plywood we’ve turned into a bench. At one point a spider the size of my thumbnail drops down in front of me, clinging to its line of silk. We stare at each other for a while before it jumps at my face—a narrow miss. The sun’s still making its way upward, but already the humidity has wrapped me in a wet, clinging hug.I’m not a bird-watcher, but this must be bird-watching at its most dedicated.National Geographic is partnering with the National Audubon Society, BirdLife International, and the Cornell Lab of Ornithology to celebrate the centennial of the Migratory Bird Treaty Act. Watch for more stories, books, and events throughout the year.My reverie is broken by a rush of air overhead—Whoosh-whoosh-whoosh! The gaps between feathers in their wings make hornbills some of the noisiest fliers around.Hoo. Hoo. Hoo-hoo-hoo, Hahahaha! It’s the maniacal laughter of a helmeted hornbill. By the sound of it, this one is only a few trees away. We hold our breath. And suddenly, there it is: A living dinosaur, some four feet long (not counting its foot-long central tail feathers), perched on the protruding knot, a large stick insect dangling from its mouth, its beady eyes observing the surroundings.Everything around me hushes. The itchy heat is gone, the stomach-churning throbbing in my ankle (sprained a few days earlier back home in Washington, D.C.) ceases. There are no more bugs, no more cicadas screaming.We stare at that massive head, heavy with its red “helmet”—or casque—atop a wedge of yellow beak. We take in the featherless, wrinkled red neck, the long black-and-white banded tail feathers, the sheer heft of the bird. It’s an otherworldly vision—like seeing the Grand Canyon for the first time. Nothing prepares you for the overwhelming sense of wonder you feel when you peer over the rim.The hornbill bends over the nest cavity and passes off the stick insect to his chick through the opening. Mission accomplished, and with another whoosh of those wings, he’s gone—off no doubt to search for more food for his family.The helmeted hornbill, one of 57 hornbill species in Africa and Asia, is found only in the lowland forests of Brunei, Indonesia, Malaysia, Myanmar, and southern Thailand. Helmeted hornbills stand apart from the other hornbills because their casques are mostly solid with a thick layer of keratin, the same material as fingernails, hair, and rhino horn. Not much is understood about helmeted hornbill behavior, but they’re known to use their casques to joust while in flight, perhaps in competition for nesting sites or fruit trees.The birds are omnivorous but favor the fruit of strangler figs, which start as a seed in the canopy of a host tree and send roots downward, slowly encasing and killing the tree. Strangler figs, when fruiting, serve as the rain forest’s grocery store for the menagerie that feasts on the ripe fruit—from tree shrews, giant squirrels, gibbons, and orangutans to nearly a thousand species of birds.Hornbills are vital to the survival of Southeast Asia’s forests. As “farmers of the forest,” they disperse seeds by regurgitating or defecating them, helping to replenish trees over several square miles. It’s an especially important task now, given how much primary forest has been cleared by commercial enterprises. Widespread logging also is reducing habitat for Asian hornbill species and threatening their ability to nest.Helmeted hornbills are especially picky, requiring huge trees with a hollow cavity to nest in. Those happen to be the oldest and biggest in the forest—and are therefore highly valued by loggers. The birds are slow to reproduce, breeding once a year and raising only one chick. Because the mother and the chick live sealed inside the nest cavity for some five months until the youngster is ready to fledge, they depend on the male to feed them. If the male is killed—shot by poachers for his casque, for example—the rest of the family will likely die.Softer than ivory and easily carved, hornbill casques are in high demand in Asia, to be fashioned into beads, pendants, and intricate works of art. For a subset of China’s wealthy class, rare wildlife products such as helmeted hornbill carvings, elephant ivory, and rhinoceros horn can be a sign of money, power, and luxury.Scientists aren’t sure exactly how many helmeted hornbills survive, but it’s clear from recent research and law enforcement operations that they’re in trouble. In 2016 the more than 180 parties to the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora, the treaty that governs the international trade in wildlife, approved a proposal calling for stronger protections for the birds, which have been illegal to buy and sell internationally since 1975. In acknowledgment of this dangerous level of poaching, their conservation status recently shot up from near threatened to critically endangered, a jump of three levels and only one away from extinct in the wild. In every country where helmeted hornbills are found, they’re protected by national laws, but Indonesia has emerged as a poaching hot spot.Indonesian law enforcement first became aware of large-scale helmeted hornbill trafficking in 2012, when natural resources officers at an airport in West Kalimantan, a province on the island of Borneo, stopped two Chinese women from smuggling 96 casque pieces out of the country. Soon more confiscations followed, with some seizures of casques numbering in the hundreds. The Environmental Investigation Agency (EIA), a U.K.-based nonprofit that has been tracking seizures along with the wildlife-trade monitoring organization Traffic, says these seizures likely represent a fraction of the helmeted hornbill casques being traded.Some thousand miles south of the forest in Thailand where we watched the papa hornbill deliver a meal, there’s a storage room in a government office in the Indonesian capital of Jakarta. Behind the door are stuffed tigers and sun bears in varying poses of ferocity, the shell of a sea turtle mounted on the wall, cardboard boxes overflowing with tiger skins and elephant ivory—and suitcases filled with more than 240 neatly stacked helmeted hornbill casques, all seized from wildlife traffickers.Indonesian authorities have confiscated more than 1,300 helmeted hornbill casques in all, many seized from smugglers linked to organized criminal syndicates that traffic in commercial-level quantities of endangered wildlife parts. The government plans to destroy these caches eventually to prevent them from making their way back onto the black market. But in the meantime hornbill researcher Yokyok Hadiprakarsa is visiting stockpiles around the country to measure the casques in order to better understand the physical variations of these birds.Laman and I join Yokyok in Samarinda, the most populous city on the island of Borneo, at the regional office of the federal Department of Conservation and Natural Resources. He’s documenting the helmeted hornbill stockpile there. When I walk in, I’m jolted by an incongruous sight. It’s a typical conference room with four long tables forming a square, beige walls, and a window opening onto a view of the small coal mining operation next door. But the eye is immediately drawn to the front, where 101 helmeted hornbill casques are spread neatly on a table, each with a tracking number written in permanent marker on the bottom.“The opportunity for research for scientific purposes is very limited,” he says, because helmeted hornbills are so hard to find in the wild. “But now, look! You have a hundred here. This is a great opportunity for us to get this information, though at the same time, it’s also very sad.”One by one, Yokyok places casques on a digital scale, recording their weights in a spreadsheet. It’s Friday, and the adhan, the Muslim call to prayer, is echoing in the background. He also takes photos that software will analyze later to get three-dimensional measurements, so researchers can better understand physical variations of the species.Yokyok is also working to get permission to extract DNA samples, which would allow him to determine whether a casque is from a male or a female. Comparing DNA with casque measurements would shed light on the differences between male and female beaks and casques, something that’s never been studied in helmeted hornbills before, he says.Among the Dayaks, the non-Muslim indigenous peoples of Borneo, lore has it that the helmeted hornbill was once a man who hated his mother-in-law. His hatred grew and grew until one day, he snapped. Taking his ax, he chopped down the stilts that held up his mother-in-law’s home, with her inside. The gods punished the man by changing him into the helmeted hornbill, doomed to relive his crime again and again through his call: The accelerating hoos of the helmeted hornbill’s call are the sound of the ax hitting the stilts, and the cackling laughter is his glee when the hut comes crashing down.“When I first heard it, I thought it was a ghost,” says one young man who accompanies our team deep into the jungle of West Kalimantan to stake out a fruiting fig tree. We’re sitting in the middle of the trail, eating lunch cooked over a portable gas burner. The flies have started in on the rice, and the bees are circling the fish, but no one notices. He says his grandmother used to warn the children that the helmeted hornbill would come in the night and eat little boys’ testicles if they didn’t behave.The birds have been important to the Dayaks for at least 2,000 years. Their long tail feathers are still used in headdresses, and their casques were carved into ear pendants and other adornments. By the year 700, trade between Borneo and China was flourishing, and in 1371 helmeted hornbill “ivory” was first recorded as reaching China as a tribute gift from the sultan of Brunei. The Chinese, already skilled in the art of carving elephant ivory, transformed helmeted hornbill casques into belt buckles, buttons, bracelets, snuff boxes, and more. Sometimes intricate scenes were carved into a casque that was still attached to the bird’s skull. By the mid-1800s demand had shifted west, and the Chinese imported casques mainly to carve and sell to Europeans.Today helmeted hornbill carvings are once again in high demand in China. It’s not entirely clear why—their rarity perhaps, or novelty value—but the art pieces are popular among some newly wealthy Chinese. Yokyok was among the first to recognize the growing crisis. He says it came to his attention in 2012, when a friend sent him a photo of several hornbill heads for sale in West Kalimantan.“It was shocking,” he said. “I needed to do something.” He launched an investigation, which led him to conclude that some 6,000 helmeted hornbills likely had been killed in 2013 in West Kalimantan alone.Some helmeted hornbill poachers are opportunistic hunters who will shoot any animal they can eat or sell, says Dwi Adhiasto, who oversees the wildlife crime units of the nonprofit Wildlife Conservation Society’s (WCS) Indonesia Program. Others, he says, are supplied by organized criminal networks that provide them with guns and gear for expeditions into the forest specifically to hunt helmeted hornbills.These networks, he explains, mainly target species with a more established illegal trade—such as tigers and the world’s only truly scaly mammal, the pangolin—but they realized they can raise the bottom line by diversifying into helmeted hornbills.“Tiger fangs, pangolins, and also helmeted hornbill beaks—it’s those three that exist in the criminal networks in Asia operated by Chinese,” Dwi says. The groups typically are headed by a Chinese kingpin who controls sophisticated transnational trade and money laundering schemes, he says. The networks take advantage of the reluctance of law enforcement and the judicial system to treat wildlife crime as seriously as other types of organized crime, such as drugs and human trafficking.In June 2015 Indonesian authorities arrested two men suspected of smuggling casques in northern Sumatra, an entry point for poachers accessing Gunung Leuser National Park. They were believed to be operating with a team of 30 poachers who hunted inside the park using rifles modified with silencers, according to WCS, which assisted in gathering information. The men confessed to selling at least 124 casques over six months to a Chinese middleman, whom they would contact using a disposable cell phone to avoid detection. During the arrest, authorities confiscated 12 casques, two rifles, a digital scale, and two cell phones.We meet a hunter from the Dayak Iban ethnic group, who invites us to his village in West Kalimantan. We sit on the floor of his family living area in a modern village longhouse, where many in his community live. Traditionally longhouses are made of ironwood, which is so dense it sinks in water, but his community’s was rebuilt with concrete walls and shiny tile floors.Pinned to a mirror on a vanity nearby is a photo of him in uniform when he was as a security guard for a logging company in Sarawak, the Malaysian state to the north. He also worked as a cook at a Chinese restaurant in Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia’s capital, but he quit and came home to his village to get married and in hopes of making a better income from hunting, which gives him more freedom and independence.He can make a lot of money selling fish across the border in Malaysia, he says, and wild boars are good for eating. He insists it was his friend, not him, who shot the young helmeted hornbill whose casque sits on the floor between us, flanked by the skull of a rhinoceros hornbill and the skin and feathers of a wreathed hornbill. They’d eaten the meat of rhinoceros hornbill and wreathed hornbill, but it was too tough, he complains, like a wild chicken. When I ask about the helmeted hornbill casque, he shrugs, explaining that the buyer who comes to their village wouldn’t take it because it was too small.Before 2012, he says, no one in his community hunted helmeted hornbills—the birds had no value. But these days he and others regularly check fruiting trees, looking for birds with big casques that they lure into the range of an air rifle by imitating their strange call. At most, he says, they’ve hunted two in a day—nothing compared to the 15 or 20 a better equipped group of men he once encountered had in their possession. After they shoot a hornbill, they cut off its head and bring it home. Then they boil it in water to separate the casque from the rest of the skull.He says he doesn’t know what happens to the casques after the buyer takes them, but wildlife trade experts say the buyer probably goes from village to village, buying casques until he has a sizable collection to sell to a middleman. That person, who’s probably based in a big city, is in charge of getting them out of the country, Dwi says. According to him, casques are most often smuggled to China on commercial airlines, with Hong Kong being a popular waypoint. Each time the casques change hands, their price goes up. The final customer in China is likely paying more per gram for a helmeted hornbill casque than for elephant ivory, according to the EIA.In Budo-Su-Ngai Padi National Park, Pilai Poonswad has developed a model program for protecting hornbills. A parasitologist by training, Pilai became fascinated with the birds in 1978, after guiding a BBC film crew to search for them. She was awed by the sight of a hornbill feeding its family in a tree cavity, and soon after, she founded the Hornbill Research Foundation.In 1995 she met Asae Jaru, a poacher who would steal hornbill chicks to sell into the pet trade. Pilai realized that many others in the man’s village, which is in a predominantly Malay Muslim region of Buddhist Thailand, were doing the same thing. A man could make more money selling one or two hornbill chicks than he could in a year of farmwork.After she learned about the poaching, she came up with a plan. She would pay villagers to protect, rather than poach, hornbills. She began meeting with people in nearby villages, trying to recruit them. “I met them in person and explained to them: ‘If you won’t stop poaching now, you will have no hornbill,’” she says.Now, 23 years later, Asae is one of Pilai’s most valued assistants. His village has a grove of rubber trees, where we sit and talk. Little bowls are wired to the thin trunks, scarred by diagonal incisions to make the white, sticky latex drip out. Asae doesn’t speak Thai, so we play a version of telephone: Asae addresses one of Pilai’s assistants in the local Malay dialect. She translates into Thai for Pilai, then Pilai translates to English for me.One year, Asae recounted, he stole a chick from the nest of a wreathed hornbill. The next year, he noticed, the hornbill didn’t return to that nest. It made him sorry, he says. He wants his children to know hornbills, and he says he’s very happy to play a role in their protection. Now he safeguards the nest of a helmeted hornbill pair. If he didn’t, he says, people would steal the chick.By early 2018, 36 people in six villages—many of them former poachers—were participating in the program. They monitor tree cavities for active nests of six hornbill species, and when one’s in use, they collect data on the birds’ movements, diet, and behavior for the Hornbill Research Foundation. Those like Asae who don’t speak or write Thai draw their notes and ask a son or daughter to translate them.In Indonesia, Yokyok’s nonprofit organization, Rangkong Indonesia, is following a similar path, training and paying local assistants in a village in West Kalimantan to monitor and record hornbill data, with the goal of eventually establishing a bird-watching ecotourism program there. And the Indonesian government recently signed off on a 10-year national action plan for the conservation of helmeted hornbills. It includes research and monitoring, increased law enforcement, more partnerships with independent organizations and other governments, public awareness efforts, and funding to support it.“I put my hopes high,” Yokyok says, speaking of the potential to save helmeted hornbills. “In the beginning nobody cared about it. But now—look. It can be done.”Nowhere else in the world, aside from this limited part of Southeast Asia, is there a four-foot-long bird with a solid casque, naked neck, striped tail feathers, and crazed song that sounds like a ghost mocking you. I’m still not much of a bird-watcher, but I can tell you with confidence—that hike was worth it.",
"These seized ivory trinkets were crushed in 2015 in Times Square, in New York City. The hope is that destroying ivory will help put an end to elephant poaching.The owners of an antiques shop in Manhattan, New York, pleaded guilty on July 26 for trying to sell $4.5 million worth of illegal elephant ivory from a back room.On Thursday, some of that confiscated Manhattan ivory and more will be crushed in Central Park as part of a public event organized by the New York State Department of Environmental Conservation and various wildlife groups. They hope that the crushing of nearly two tons of ivory tusks, jewelry, and trinkets will deter people from buying “white gold” and lead to the eventual shut down of the illegal trade.At least 140,000 elephants have been lost to the ivory trade and habitat loss in less than a decade, a survey conducted in 2016 showed. International commercial sales of elephant ivory have been banned since 1990, and some countries have begun closing down domestic sales of legal ivory as well. China, the main market for ivory, announced plans to phase out domestic sales by 2018, and the U.S., another big ivory hub, limited sales of the material last year. Some U.S. states—notably California and New York—have banned sales too. (Read about how Washington, D.C., has become a new ivory hotspot).This latest ivory destruction follows the crushing of roughly a ton of ivory 2015 in Manhattan’s Times Square and six tons in Denver in 2013. More than a dozen nations, including China, France, and Kenya, which burned 105 tons last year, have also destroyed their confiscated ivory.While organizers tout the events as a powerful way to show that the material should have no worth, opinions regarding the value of destroying ivory are varied and nuanced. So Wildlife Watch asked people who are authorities on elephants, the ivory trade, or conservation to write up to a hundred words giving their thoughts about this.To most economists, destroying something of market value is anathema. But ethically, elephant ivory should have no material value, and elephant tusks should only be regarded as valuable on living elephants. Back to the economics, crushing a stockpile of confiscated ivory sends a signal to the world that ivory is not for sale. Countries tend to keep ivory in anticipation of being able to sell it in the future. This undermines the credibility of demand-reduction efforts; if the trade is likely to be legalized in the future, any current stigma associated with ivory consumption will be eroded, further fueling poaching.In some corrupt countries, ivory burns and crushes can act as a way to steal ivory because it is not all carefully recorded in its destruction. Although initially these acts made a statement as a cry for help, such as with the first Kenya burn in 1989 that helped put ivory out of fashion in the U.S. and Europe, many in Asia find destruction to be against their culture and think the ivory could be used for making an artistic monument as a long-term statement instead. It is the Asians, especially the Chinese, whose viewpoints on this issue count the most, as they are the main consumers of ivory. Ivory crushes can detract from what is really needed to save elephants: much greater efforts on law enforcement and improving ways to protect elephants in their natural habitat.Crushing confiscated ivory is such a strong signal to the world that the U.S. takes solid action to combat ivory smuggling and elephant poaching. New York is one of the leading states in the U.S. to legislate to ban its commercial ivory trade. Up to now both China and the U.S. had announced their master plans to close domestic ivory markets. I would be happy to see more governments around the world, especially the EU and Southeast Asian states to crush ivory confiscations and take solid steps to shut down their domestic ivory markets. That will be the day we can say elephants on Earth are surviving poaching for ivory.I’m skeptical. It’s a PR stunt and reduces storage costs for governments. But after many previous public stockpile destructions, how can yet another one end the poaching that feeds the persistent demand for illegal ivory? By now surely the conservation message is out? Ongoing destructions could backfire, reinforcing perceptions of ivory’s scarcity and supporting high black market prices. And doing this doesn’t generate sustainable financing for African parks, where it is desperately needed: It simply entrenches elephants as aid-dependent liabilities on a continent where they are losing ground to rapidly growing human populations, in relentless competition for space and resources.Africans thank the U.S. government for the ivory crush in New York. It is another important demonstration of success in the war against poachers. It will help maintain the unapologetic message that it is shameful to buy or use ivory. Elephants keep us in a state of perpetual awe with their intelligence and compassion. We must send a message that there will be no ivory trade now, nor ever again in the future. Only when buyers understand that there is only shame in owning ivory, will the perceived value of ivory evaporate. Traders will stop hoarding it, and killers will stop the slaughter. Only then will elephants be safe.Ivory crushes have long been viewed as bold displays of defiance against the trafficking of wildlife products, but many fail to realize the negative consequences of these events. Crushes lead to the loss of priceless forensic data that could be used to prosecute poachers around the globe, and they also often lead to increased demand for ivory around the world—leading to more poaching. If activists really want to stop poaching, they should work to increase the effectiveness of anti-poaching operations, improve law enforcement in demand countries, and reduce demand among consumers.Ivory crushes and burns are incredibly valuable. These are physical reminders of the commitment by governments, organizations, and the public to save elephants. The confiscated items that we’re destroying could have massive dollar value if sold on the market, but the crushes make clear that ivory should only be found on elephants. By crushing a ton of ivory in the middle of the world’s most famous public park, New Yorkers are sending a loud message to poachers, traffickers, and dealers who set up shop right here on our streets: We won’t stand for the slaughter of elephants.",
"Birds are the world’s quintessential travelers, free to fly at a moment’s notice without carry-on or even a passport. Some cross hemispheres to meet a mate; others gather in stupendous flocks for the sake of a little company. And in a few corners of the Earth, like in Denali, birds create avian spectacles that make its own weather.So grab your binoculars! From king penguins to melancholy woodpeckers, about 10,000 feathered species share this planet with us—and in these ten hotspots, they will take your breath away.In 1918 Congress passed the Migratory Bird Treaty Act to protect birds from wanton killing. To celebrate the centennial, National Geographic is partnering with the National Audubon Society, BirdLife International, and the Cornell Lab of Ornithology to declare 2018 the Year of the Bird. Sign the pledge to find out this month's action and share your actions using #BirdYourWorld to increase your impact.Bird expert Noah Strycker is author of National Geographic book Birds of the Photo Ark. Follow his story on Twitter.",
"Southern elephant seals and penguins gather on the shore of South Georgia Island.South Georgia, an island in the southern Atlantic Ocean, more than a thousand miles east of the tip of South America, hasn’t changed much since Ernest Shackleton sailed ashore in 1916 to arrange one of the most incredible rescues of exploration history. The island’s steep, glacier-studded mountains are rugged and forbidding, but its shores harbor a spectacular array of creatures that attract some of the world’s great polar adventurers, like photographer and conservationist Nicklen."It’s my favorite place on the planet, there’s no doubt," he says. "Looking at the Valley of Kings on South Georgia, seeing 4,000 penguins, having intimate encounters with every species there, from elephant seals to fur seals to albatross—I like full immersion in that habitat."It’s not easy to get to, it's virtually uninhabited, and it's plagued by the ungodly weather of the cold southern Atlantic. But those who venture there see sights few others ever will: unbroken colonies of thousands of seals, sharp black mountains rising from the sea, and sweeping bays that have seen only a handful of visitors—if any—since the time of Shackleton.For a good shot, Canadian photographer, diver, and polar adventurer Paul Nicklen has braved minus 40ºF temperatures, dived under Antarctic ice to mingle with deadly leopard seals, and endured soggy months in northern rain forests looking for the elusive white bears of British Columbia. His work specializes in the effects of climate change on polar regions and has garnered over a dozen awards from major press organizations.",
"A large caribou runs across the tundra in Denali National Park, Alaska.Established: February 26, 1917Size: 6,075,029 acresAnnual Visitors: 600,000Visitor Centers: Denali, Eielson, Murie, Walter HarperEntrance Fees: $15 per personnps.gov/denaVisitors to Alaska’s most well known national park, Denali, are often rewarded with sights that will stay with them the rest of their lives. A golden eagle may be seen soaring off the colorful cliffs at Polychrome Pass, or a herd of Dall’s sheep could be spotted resting along the green shoulder of Primrose Ridge. A massive grizzly bear might ramble over the tundra at Sable Pass. Maybe a caribou will pause on a ridgetop, silhouetted by the warm light of day’s end, or a loon will call across Wonder Lake.Perhaps the park’s famous—and often notorious—clouds will part to reveal the great massif of Denali itself, 20,320 feet high, the roof of North America.Larger than the state of New Jersey, Denali National Park and Preserve is a vast wilderness that is mostly untouched by human hands, save for the one park road and a few scattered services. It is known for legendary wildlife and big adventures, from backcountry camping to mountaineering. Even for those who stick to a bus tour of the park road, and its scenic overlooks, wild adventures often await to suprise and delight.Even though the park revolves around perpetually snowcapped Denali, it’s often the rest of the park that leaves a lasting impression on visitors: the boreal forest and tundra, the wild rivers and glaciers, and the creatures that wander this amazing Alaska landscape, in particular the formidable brown bears that call Denali home.Located about halfway between Anchorage and Fairbanks, Denali National Park and Preserve can be reached via the Parks Highway (Alaska Route 3), air services into McKinley National Park Airport, or the Denali Star Train.Both the airport and train station are within a very short walk of the Denali Visitor Center, open summer only. During the other three seasons, Murie Science and Learning Center (MSLC) across the street assumes the role of park visitor center. The third (and perhaps most important) of the buildings clustered near the park entrance is the Wilderness Access Center (WAC), where visitors can reserve campsites, obtain backcountry permits, hop a shuttle bus, or purchase tickets for the park’s popular bus tours.There’s plenty to do near the park entrance, including day hikes to Triple Lake (9.5 miles), the lofty Mount Healy Overlook (5.4-mile round-trip), and the relatively easy Taiga Trail to Horseshoe Lake (0.9 mile). Visitors can also pop into the Denali Sled Dog Kennels to watch a demonstration of how they help patrol the park in winter. The paved road (and private vehicle access) ends at Savage River, where there’s a campground and a 1.7-mile loop trail that crosses the river on a wooden footbridge.Denali Park Road meanders 92 miles through the heart of the park to scenic spots like the Toklat River crossing, Wonder Lake with its remarkable views of the Alaska Range and Denali’s north flank, the old gold mining town of Kantishna, and Eielson Visitor Center with its interactive exhibits and ranger-guided activities. But only the first 15 miles of the road are open to private vehicles. The only way to cruise the rest of the route is by foot, bicycle, or bus. Traveling Park Road is the best way to spot wildlife, in particular bears, wolves, moose, caribou, Dall sheep, and a variety of birds.Three narrated bus tours ply the route during the warmer months (May-September), including the Denali History Tour to the Teklanika River, the Tundra Wilderness Tour to Stony Overlook, and the Kantishna Experience to the very end of the road. Along the way, the buses stop at prime wildlife viewing spots.Backcountry hikers, campers, or those who merely want to explore on their own can hop a nonnarrated shuttle bus from the WAC to four different stops along the road.While anyone with a backcountry permit is free to hike the wilderness and camp overnight, several outfitters offer guided treks into the Denali wilderness. Alaska Alpine Adventures has guided backpack camping trips of one week or more at distances ranging from 20 to 50 miles through the park. Six companies are authorized by the Park Service to guide ascents of Denali peak and other mountains in the park, including Alpine Ascents International, which offers three-week expeditions between May and July.McKinley Airport is home base for many of the park’s scenic flight operations. A variety of aerial choices are available during the summer. Fly Denali is one of several aviation companies that offer flightseeing around the big peak, glacier landing trips, and climbing support for mountaineers. Talkeetna Air does helicopter sightseeing over the glaciers and valleys leading up to Denali’s south side.Outside the park, the Nenana River/Parks Highway corridor is also rife with outdoor activities, as well as most of the hotels and restaurants in the Denali region. Visitor services cluster in the little backcountry towns of McKinley Park, Cantwell, and Healy along the park’s eastern edge, as well as Talkeetna in the southeast.Brave the whitewater of the Nenana Gorge and Talkeetna River—rapids that range up to Class IV—with Raft Denali, which also offers a multiday, heli-rafting experience along 33 miles of river. Home to Arctic grayling and rainbow trout, both rivers are also great for angling, either on your own or with services like Denali Fly Fishing Guides.Inspired by the beauty of the Toklat River, naturalist Charles Sheldon spent nine years lobbying for legislation to create the park—the first national park in Alaska. Originally established in 1917 with the name Mount McKinley, 63 years later it would be renamed Denali or "the High One," the native Athabaskan name for the majestic peak. That same year, the Alaska National Interest Lands Conservation Act (ANILCA) enlarged the boundaries by four million acres, regrouping the land into Denali National Park and Preserve.Hotels • There are several private lodges in the Kantishna area at the end of the park road, all on private land within the national park. These include Camp Denali and North Face Lodge, Kantishna Roadhouse, Denali Backcountry Lodge, and Skyline Lodge.• Outside the park there are several options in the towns of Healy and Cantwell, or surrounding region. These include Grande Denali, Alpine Creek Lodge, and Denali Lakeview Inn.Camping • Several campgrounds can be found along Denali Park Road, including at Wonder Lake and Igloo Creek.• Outside the park, the family-owned Denali Grizzly Bear Resort and Campground offers a range of tent sites, cabins, and resort amenities.• Cross-country skiing, snowshoeing, and fat bikes are great ways to explore Denali in the winter. Roads and trails around the visitor centers are particularly popular.• Earth Song Lodge arranges dogsledding trips, as well as overnight cross-country skiing trips to Wonder Lake and Igloo Creek.• Denali Wilderness Winter Guides specializes in single-day activities like guided snowshoeing, a winter photog- raphy workshop, and a motorized “selfie tour” with park landmarks as your backdrops.• Aurora Quest offers evening “aurora chasing” tours to view and photograph the Northern Lights.• For something completely different, Alaska Cabin Nite Dinner Theatre offers gold rush-era music, comedy, and storytelling.• Riley Creek Campground remains open through the winter, and visitors are free to overnight as long as they have a backcountry permit.Over the past 30 years, Denali’s visitors have increased almost 200 percent. Accommodating them without eroding the park’s wilderness has been a struggle. Buses cut down on private cars, which aren’t allowed on most of the park road. Campgrounds are modest and unobtrusive. And the wilderness areas have strict overnight camping ceilings to prevent overcrowding and damage to the flora and fauna. Unless you plan ahead by using the park’s easy-to-use reservation system, you may have to wait a day or two to get your preferred campsite or bus reservation.",
"Tundra ecosystems are treeless regions found in the Arctic and on the tops of mountains, where the climate is cold and windy, and rainfall is scant. Tundra lands are covered with snow for much of the year, but summer brings bursts of wildflowers.Mountain goats, sheep, marmots, and birds live in mountain—or alpine—tundra and feed on the low-lying plants and insects. Hardy flora like cushion plants survive in the mountain zones by growing in rock depressions, where it is warmer and they are sheltered from the wind.Low-growing tundra vegetation displays fall colors in California's Kings Canyon National Park. Alpine tundras exist worldwide at altitudes above the mountain tree line.The Arctic tundra, where the average temperature is -30 to 20 degrees Fahrenheit (-34 to -6 degrees Celsius), supports a variety of animal species, including Arctic foxes, polar bears, gray wolves, caribou, snow geese, and musk oxen. The summer growing season is just 50 to 60 days, when the sun shines up to 24 hours a day.The relatively few species of plants and animals that live in the harsh conditions of the tundra are essentially clinging to life. They are highly vulnerable to environmental stresses like reduced snow cover and warmer temperatures brought on by global warming.The Arctic tundra is changing dramatically due to global warming, a term that falls within a wider range of trends scientists now prefer to call climate change. The impacts in this region are broad and somewhat unpredictable. Animals that are typically found further south, like the red fox, are moving north onto the tundra. This means the red fox is now competing with the Arctic fox for food and territory, and the long-term impact on the sensitive Arctic fox is unknown.This map shows the major regions where tundras are most common; tundras are in yellow. Tundras are often located near permanent ice sheets where during summer the ice and snow recede to expose the ground, allowing vegetation to grow.Other tundra denizens, such as the wolf spider, are growing bigger and thriving. Shrubs are getting taller, contributing to declines in the sensitive groups of lichen that caribou and other species depend on for food. Lakes and ponds are evaporating or draining away.The Arctic's permafrost, the literal foundation for much of the region's unique ecosystem, is deteriorating with the warmer global climate. Permafrost is a layer of frozen soil and dead plants that extends some 1,476 feet (450 meters) below the surface. In much of the Arctic, it is frozen year-round. In the southern regions of the Arctic, the surface layer above the permafrost melts during the summer, and this forms bogs and shallow lakes that invite an explosion of animal life. Insects swarm around the bogs, and millions of migrating birds come to feed on them.With global warming, the fall freeze comes later—in some places recently, not at all—and more of the permafrost is melting in the southern Arctic. Shrubs and spruce that previously couldn't take root on the permafrost now dot the landscape, potentially altering the habitat of the native animals.Another major concern is that the melting of the permafrost is contributing to global warming. The frozen ground contains about one and a half times the amount of carbon already in the atmosphere today, as well as large amounts of methane, another potent greenhouse gas. Until recently, the tundra acted as a carbon sink and captured huge amounts of carbon dioxide from the atmosphere as part of photosynthesis. That process helped keep the amount of this greenhouse gas from accumulating in the atmosphere.Today, however, as the permafrost melts and dead plant material decomposes and releases greenhouse gases, the tundra has flipped from a carbon sink to a carbon contributor. That means not only is the planet less capable of preventing greenhouse gases from accumulating, but the tundra is also contributing to their buildup. Scientists are still learning about what else the permafrost harbors, and what could be released as it thaws. Recently a study found that it is also the largest store of mercury on the planet and could release the toxic heavy metal into the environment, to harmful effect.",
"Wolf spiders are top predators in the tundra. Their activity has cascading effects on belowground food webs, decomposition rates, and soil nutrients, but these effects are different under warmer-than-usual temperatures.The Arctic tundra is teeming with predators, just not the ones you might expect: By biomass, arctic wolf spiders outweigh arctic wolves by at least 80-to-1.The eye-popping calculation, published today in PNAS by National Geographic explorer Amanda Koltz, could shape our understanding of how the Arctic will respond to future climate change.Her study reveals that at increased temperatures and population densities, arctic wolf spiders change their eating habits, starting an ecosystem-wide cascade that could change how quickly melting permafrost decomposes.Human activity, especially the release of heat-trapping greenhouse gases, is warming the planet—and the Arctic is getting hotter twice as fast as the rest of Earth.The Arctic's heat-up is particularly worrisome because as the region warms, permafrost—a frozen layer of soil and dead things—begins to melt, allowing fungi and bacteria to decompose it. Decomposition releases greenhouse gases like carbon dioxide and methane that further accelerate climate change.Koltz, an Arctic ecologist at Washington University in St. Louis, studies not only how a warming climate affects predator-prey relations, but also how changes in those relationships influence the broader ecosystem. “I really felt like the animal element was potentially missing from this story,” she says.Scientists have known for almost a decade that climate change would impact spider populations. A 2009 study showed that a warmer Arctic with earlier springs and longer summers could make wolf spiders both larger and—because larger spiders can produce more offspring—more abundant. (Read expert advice on what to do if you find a spider in your home.)Wolf spiders will eat most insects and spiders smaller than themselves, and they also dabble in cannibalism; if their populations get too dense, they’ll eat each other. But one of their favorite foods is a fungus-eating arthropod called the springtail. If wolf spiders eat more or fewer springtails, how will the amount of Arctic fungus—and the resulting rate of fungal decomposition—vary?With all this in mind, Koltz set up some five-foot-wide experimental ecosystems in the Alaskan Arctic. For two summers, she and her team monitored how temperature and the number of spiders changed the mix of organisms within these hemmed-off patches of permafrost.In higher temperatures, decomposition occurs more quickly and wolf spiders are more active, so Koltz expected that when her mini-ecosystems got warmer, their wolf spiders would drastically reduce the springtail population. But Koltz found just the opposite.Musk oxen put up a defensive ring around their young in Alaska's Arctic National Wildlife Refuge.In plots with more spiders, the spiders actually ate fewer springtails. These larger springtail populations then ate more fungus, which lowered the rate of decomposition. Among the hotter plots, the one with more spiders decomposed less than plots with almost no spiders. In a way, the spiders are helping to fight climate change in the arctic tundra. (Also see: How Scientists Taught a Spider to Jump on Demand.)The unexpected find has drawn praise from experts. “The novelty of Dr. Koltz’s paper is that it shows not only is [climate change] having direct impacts on these important ground dwelling animals but also on the complex ecological interactions between species on the tundra,” Joseph Bowden, an entomologist with the Canadian Forest Service who was not involved with Koltz’s research, says by email.But it remains unclear why high-density spiders lose their appetite for springtails. It might be that with higher populations, the spiders shifted from eating springtails to competing with—and eating—each other. Or it might be that the higher temperature led them to find a different food source. Koltz says that the next step in this line of research would be to identify exactly how the spiders' diets changed.“We tend to forget about the tiny animals because they’re not as visible as the bigger mammals,” says Koltz. “But I think it’s really neat to think about how these small animals have important impacts on the ecosystem as well.”",
"The sea ice that blankets the Arctic Ocean isn’t the unbroken white mantle depicted in maps. It’s a jigsaw puzzle of restless floes that are constantly colliding, deforming, and fracturing from the force of wind and ocean currents. Last February I stood shivering on the deck of the Lance, an old Norwegian research vessel, as it picked a path through a labyrinth of navigable fractures. A barren white plain of ice and snow extended to the horizon in every direction. The ship’s steel hull shuddered and screeched as it plowed through floating chunks of jagged ice. The Lance was seeking a solid patch of ice to attach to—the last one had shattered—so that it could resume its erratic drift across the frozen sea, charting the fate of Arctic sea ice by going with the floe.The Norwegians have done this before, more than a century ago, when polar explorer Fridtjof Nansen and the Fram were locked in pack ice for nearly three years during a vain attempt to drift across the North Pole. But the Arctic is a different ocean now. The air above it has warmed on average about 5 degrees Fahrenheit in the past century, more than twice the global average. Much less of the ocean is covered by ice, and much more of that ice is thinner, seasonal ice rather than thick, old floes. A feedback loop with far-reaching consequences has taken effect: As white ice is replaced in summer by dark ocean water, which absorbs more sunlight, the water and air heat further—amplifying the ongoing thaw.“The Arctic warms first, most, and fastest,” explains Kim Holmén, the long-bearded international director of the Norwegian Polar Institute (NPI), which operates theLance. Climate models predict that by as early as 2040 it will be possible in summer to sail across open water to the North Pole.Arctic sea ice helps cool the whole planet by reflecting sunlight back into space. So its loss inevitably will affect the climate and weather beyond the Arctic, but precisely how remains unclear. Better forecasts require better data on sea ice and its shifting, uneven distribution. “Most scientific cruises to the Arctic are conducted in summer, and this is where we have the most field data,” says Gunnar Spreen, an NPI sea-ice physicist I met on board the Lance. “The continuous changes that occur from winter into spring are a huge gap in our understanding.”On the Lance’s five-month mission its rotating crew of international scientists would investigate the causes and effects of ice loss by monitoring the ice across its entire seasonal life cycle—from the time when it formed in winter until it melted in summer.A few days after photographer Nick Cobbing and I joined the ship by icebreaker and helicopter from Longyearbyen, on the island of Spitsbergen in the Svalbard archipelago—the base for NPI’s Arctic operations—the Lance steamed to 83 degrees north, just west of Russian territory. The scientists singled out a half-mile-wide floe of predominantly seasonal ice that they hoped to study. The crew tethered the vessel to the floe with nylon ropes attached to thick metal poles driven into the ice. They shut off the main engine. Isolated and in near darkness, we began our wayward drift and our month-long shift in the ice desert.Like homesteaders, the scientists established camps on the floe, pitching tents and laying electric cables. Physicists like Spreen mapped the ice topography with lasers and recorded the thickness and temperature of the snow on top. Oceanographers bored a hole through the ice to gather data about the water and the currents. Meteorologists erected masts carrying instruments to collect weather data and measure greenhouse gases. Biologists searched for ice algae, which look like dirt and live on the underside of the ice and in the channels of trapped brine left after newly formed sea ice expels salt. In a few weeks, after the returning sun cast aside the cloak of polar night and began filtering through the melting floe, the scientists would watch the ecosystem awaken.Temperatures regularly plunged to 30 degrees below zero Fahrenheit. Scientists had to contend with numb fingers, snapped cables, and crippled electronic instruments, along with the danger of roving polar bears. “This is really extreme science,” one researcher said.In 2007 the UN Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) warned that the impacts of climate change in the Arctic over the next century “will exceed the impacts forecast for many other regions and will produce feedbacks that will have globally significant consequences.” Nearly a decade later this grim forecast is already being borne out. Probably no region has been more affected by climate change than the Arctic. Permafrost is thawing, and the land is greening, as tree lines creep north and shrubs and grasses invade the tundra. Certain populations of polar bears, walruses, and caribou have suffered significant declines. National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) oceanographer James Overland says, “The Arctic really is the canary showing that climate change is real.”Since 1979, when satellite records began, the Arctic has lost more than half its volume of ice, which has diminished in both overall area and thickness. The frozen area shrinks to its annual minimum in September, at summer’s end. In September 2012 its extent was just half the average during the 1980s and ’90s. The maximum ice extent in winter, usually reached in March, also is declining, though at a slower rate; its average thickness has decreased by half. What was once mostly a layer of 10- to 13-foot-thick ice floes that lingered for years—perennial ice—has given way to large tracts of thinner, less reflective ice that forms and melts during a single year. Sea-ice coverage has always fluctuated naturally, but there’s little doubt among scientists that man-made greenhouse gases are now accelerating its decline. “Old, thick sea ice was a global reservoir for cold, but that is now changing,” Overland says.An entire ecosystem is melting away. The loss of sea ice may take a toll on some of the photosynthesizing organisms that fuel the marine food chain—single-celled algae that live under the ice and bloom in the spring when the light returns. Changes in the magnitude and timing of these blooms, as winter ice retreats faster and earlier, may throw off the life cycle of tiny, fatty zooplankton called copepods, which eat the algae and are in turn eaten by arctic cod, seabirds, and bowhead whales. For marine mammals such as the polar bear, Pacific walrus, and ringed seal, the loss of hundreds of thousands of square miles of sea ice has already been devastating. “It’s like someone took the floor out from under you,” says Kristin Laidre, a polar scientist at the University of Washington.The assumption is that later this century, without a home field, these animals will simply lose all competitive advantage. Killer whales, for example, are likely to replace polar bears as the top marine predators, as bears retreat to the dwindling remnants of summer sea ice. Though polar bears sometimes spend time on land, where lately a few have been hybridizing with grizzlies, Ian Stirling of the University of Alberta, a leading polar bear expert, dismisses any notion that they could survive long-term on land as “wishful thinking.” Ice-free conditions are likely to draw in other competitors—zooplankton (maybe less fatty and nutritious ones), fish, seals—from more temperate waters.Ice loss is also making the Arctic even more vulnerable to ocean acidification, another effect of rising atmospheric carbon dioxide. Cold water absorbs more CO₂ than warm water does, and more cold water is now open to the air. As the water acidifies, it loses carbonate. Within the next 15 years it may no longer contain enough for animals such as sea snails and Alaska king crabs to construct and maintain their calcium-carbonate shells.The upshot of all this, as Stirling bluntly puts it: “The Arctic marine ecosystem as we know it now will no longer exist.”Warmer air above the ocean basin is projected to spill down over the surrounding coasts of Russia, Alaska, and Canada, causing feedback effects as far as 900 miles inland, including accelerated melting of the Greenland ice sheet and large emissions of carbon dioxide and methane from thawing tundra. IPCC models forecast that the total loss of summer sea ice may in itself cause one-third of the warming of the Northern Hemisphere and 14 percent of total global warming by the end of the century.How a rapidly warming Arctic will influence weather across the hemisphere is a bit hazier. Atmospheric scientists Jennifer Francis at Rutgers University and Steve Vavrus at the University of Wisconsin have suggested that people in the continental United States already may be feeling the effects of melting Arctic sea ice—especially in the past two winters in the east, which made “polar vortex” household words.The polar vortex is the mass of cold air that’s normally confined over the Pole by the polar jet stream—the high-altitude, fast-moving torrent of air that snakes around the Pole from west to east. The jet stream draws most of its energy from the contrast in temperature and pressure between the frigid air to its north and the warmer air to the south. As sea-ice loss amplifies the warming in the Arctic, the Francis theory goes, that contrast is reduced, weakening the jet stream’s westerly winds. It becomes a lazier, more sinuous river, with large meanders that extend far to the south and north. Because the meanders advance slowly across the map, whatever weather they enfold persists for a long time. During the past two winters the wavier pattern allowed Arctic air and extreme snow to beset New England and drought to linger over California. The melting Arctic may be affecting weather elsewhere too. Korean researchers have linked extreme winters in East Asia to air-circulation changes caused specifically by ice loss in the Barents-Kara Sea.It’s a neat theory, but parts of it remain “fuzzy,” Francis admits. Also, many researchers who study atmospheric dynamics aren’t buying it. A more plausible explanation for the wavier jet stream and the southward excursions of the polar vortex, some of them argue, is the influence of the tropical Pacific, which is a far more powerful source of heat than the Arctic. It will take years of data gathering and modeling to settle the debate.In any case, as the warming of the planet continues, cold spells of any kind will become less common. Even if sharp limits on greenhouse gas emissions are adopted over the next 20 years, the decline of sea ice will continue for decades. “We’re on a one-way trip and not going back,” says Overland. A further rise of 4 degrees Celsius (7.2 degrees Fahrenheit) in the Arctic is all but assured by mid-century, he says, enough to keep the ocean ice free for at least two months of the year, enough to change the seasons there—“enough to affect everything.”In late June, during the final phase of their expedition, the scientists aboard the Lance awoke to discover that the latest ice floe they’d attached to was disintegrating too. They scrambled to salvage their gear before it became flotsam. It was time to pack up anyway. The vessel by that point had spent 111 days in the ice, tethered to different floes for several weeks at a time—logging altogether some 4,000 nautical miles across the Arctic. Polar bears had crossed its path, sometimes pausing to play with the scientists’ strange-looking electronic instruments. Storms had bulldozed huge blocks of ice high against the ship, elevating it above the surface. The Lance’s crew had bested the researchers in a soccer match on the floe. Over the next couple of years the 68 scientists involved will be hunkered in their warm labs, making sense of all the data they gathered.One morning in March, under a dusky blue sky, I had joined Gunnar Spreen and another NPI researcher, Anja Rösel, on one of their periodic forays to measure changes in the ice floe’s thickness. We each wore insulated armor—jumpsuit, balaclava, goggles, gloves, mittens over the gloves. The scientists brought along a snow-depth probe, a GPS device, and an orange plastic sled carrying the ice-thickness instrument, which works by inducing an electric current in the seawater below. I carried a flare gun and a .30-06-caliber rifle: bear protection. Following a mile-long path staked by bamboo poles, we trudged over dunelike snowdrifts and pressure ridges—slabs of sea ice pushed up by colliding floes—that looked like crumbling stone walls. Every few feet Spreen stopped and plunged the depth gauge into the snowpack until it beeped to indicate that the measurement was complete.Arctic warming seemed an abstract concept that day—I couldn’t really feel my toes—but across the icescape, Spreen saw evidence of change. “This is an unusual amount of snow,” he noted. Two feet of it lay beneath our moon boots, twice the amount in a typical year. One data point doesn’t make a trend, but this one was consistent with model forecasts: As sea ice shrinks, the extra heat and water vapor released from the open water into the lower atmosphere should generate more precipitation.More snow falling on a glacier on land would be a good thing, because that’s how glaciers grow—by accumulating layers of snow so thick that the stuff at the bottom gets compressed into ice. But sea ice forms when cold air freezes seawater, and snow falling on top of it acts as an insulating blanket that slows the growth of the ice. As it happened, two weeks after my walk with Spreen, the National Snow and Ice Data Center in Colorado announced that Arctic sea ice had already reached its maximum extent for the winter in late February—much earlier than usual. It was the lowest maximum the satellites had ever recorded.",
"A non-venomous huntsman spider, Heteropoda venatoria, sits on ripe bananas in the Dominican Republic.When a reader from Belgium found a spider in her bananas, she bravely trapped it—and says she took it to the police for identification (though sadly not in four pairs of tiny handcuffs).In retrospect, she asked us: "What should I do if I have a [venomous] spider in the house?" (See "7 Bug and Spider Myths Squashed.")For Weird Animal Question of the Week, we asked spider experts Christopher Buddle of Canada's McGill University and Jo-Anne Sewlal of the University of the West Indies how to react when someone screams "SPIDER!"Chances are, it's not venomous: Few of the 40,000 known spider species can harm humans, Sewlal says by email. But it's wise to treat a spider as dangerous until you know better.Identifying a spider as dangerous can be tricky, though some can be clearly deciphered. For instance, the venomous female black widow, found in temperate regions the world over, is black with a red hourglass shape on her underside.The brown recluse spider, found in parts of the central and southern United States, is brown with a telltale dark brown "violin" on its back, according to the University of California at Riverside's Richard Vetter. (Check out his brown recluse identification guide.)Sewlal says it’s best to look up venomous spiders found in your area or areas you’re visiting and, in case of a bite, "look for specific information on how to proceed with respect to treatment."If you find a suspicious spider, it's not necessary to call the authorities, as our reader did. But if you found a spider in your fruit, you can alert the grocery store, Buddle advised by email.Buddle notes that an eight-year study published in 2014 in the Journal of Medical Entomology shows the "vast majority" of spiders found in fruits aren't dangerous. (Related: "Are Dangerous Spiders Hiding in Your Fruit?")"Spiders are our friends," Buddle says—they are important predators of insects in crops around the world."Just think of the hundreds of times you bought spiderless bananas!"In the rare case you do get bitten, it's a good idea to trap the spider so you can identify the species in case treatment is needed, Sewlal says.Isolate your leggy little tourist—along with fruit, if that's where you found it—in a plastic bag or container, Buddle says. Put that package in the fridge to slow the cold-blooded arachnid down. This makes it easier to brush it into a jar or other container, wearing rubber gloves if you like. (Also see "What Happens If You Swallow a Spider?")"Do this quickly and with confidence." (Easy for him to say.)If you're too uncomfortable, Buddle says, you can put the whole shebang in the freezer, which will kill the spider, leaving an intact specimen for identification.If you're bitten, an ice pack on the area will usually suffice for treatment, Sewlal says, but she suggests seeking medical attention if you experience symptoms such as "increasing pain, nausea, vomiting, sweating, dilated pupils, uncontrollable muscle spasms, and loss of consciousness."If you are curious about the spider's species, you can photograph it or bring the specimen to a natural history museum or a college. (See a video of the world's biggest spider.)Buddle recommends the University of California at Riverside and the American Arachnological Society as great online identification resources.In case the spider is a non-native species that got into your house via your food, don't release it outside. The animal could harm the native environment. If you found the spider elsewhere in your house, you can put it outside.If the spider did arrive in your food, "although it pains me to say this [as an arachnologist], the best course of action is to probably to kill the eight-legged cargo," Buddle says—and Sewlal concurs.Last, the experts say to relax and not worry too much about spiders. Banana daiquiris, anyone?Got a question about the weird and wild animal world? Tweet me or leave me a note or photo in the comments below. You can also follow me on Facebook.",
"These small studs, arranged in grids and honeycombs, look completely unnatural. If the image was life-sized, you might think that they’re part of a bizarre children’s toy. If they had been photographed from far away, they might be buildings in an alien city. But they are neither. They have been intensely magnified; a thousand of them could fit across a human hair. They studs are part of the skin of a tiny insect-like creature called a springtail. They’re the secret behind its incredible waterproof shell.There are more than 7,000 species of springtail, and they’re among the most abundant animals that you can still see with the naked eye. Most are no bigger than a pinhead. They crawl through soil and leaf litter on six legs, and they leap about using a spring-like tail held under their body. Once thought to be insects, they are now classified in a separate but closely related group.Unlike insects, which breathe using tubes called trachea, the springtails breathe directly through their skin. And this means that if they get wet, they suffocate. This might be a problem for creatures that move about the damp forest floor, but springtails have evolved an extraordinary skin that repels water and a variety of other liquids. Ralf Helbig from the Leibniz Institute of Polymer Research in Dresden examined the skins of 37 different springtails, and discovered that they have three tricks for keeping dry.Bristles form the first layer of defence. They trap a thin layer of air that keeps water at bay. Large droplets sit on top of the bristles without touching the skin underneath.Between the bristles, most of the springtails have small studs called ‘secondary granules’. When Helbig zoomed in even closer, he saw even smaller studs called ‘primary granules’, each just a few hundred nanometres wide. They’re shaped like squares or triangles and they are connected by thin bars, in either a grid or a hexagonal honeycomb. The grids are found on parts of the skin that need to be more elastic, while the honeycombs are sturdier.The primary and secondary granules provide the second layer of defence. They work in the same way as the bristles but on a much smaller scale, creating a network of air-filled cavities over the springtail’s entire body that keep water out.The third protective feature is, as far as Helbig knows, unique to springtails. The primary granules have an overhang all the way around their rim; in cross-section, they look like mushroom clouds. Because the overhang curves downwards, it pins a bubble of air between the granules. Consider what happens if you push an inverted cup into a full bathtub: you trap a bubble of air inside.  The overhangs do the same thing.These microscopic structures are so effective that springtails stay dry even if they are completely dunked in water, under high pressure, for several days. Water cannot force the air bubbles out from between the primary granules. Even organic liquids like alcohol or hexane can’t break through.The springtails’ studded skin prevents liquids from forming a continuous film over their skin, which would choke them to death. Instead, the liquids sit on top of the granules as almost perfectly spheres. Instead of flattening out into a film, these tiny droplets slowly merge with one another to form bigger and bigger spheres, until they eventually slide off.Liquids aren’t the only things that can’t get a hold on a springtail’s skin. Helbig found that it is extraordinarily hard to contaminate a springtail with dirt, fungi or bacteria. In fact, all the samples he looked at under the microscope were spotlessly clean. Even when Helbig exposed the springtails to massive doses of E.coli, staph and Candida (the fungus that causes thrush), the microbes couldn’t get a grip.Helbig thinks that the springtail’s skin, and especially the overhangs of the primary granules, could inspire a new generation of water-repellent, self-cleaning materials. Many scientists have already developed such materials after finding inspiration in nature. Two weeks ago, I wrote about one of the slipperiest materials yet devised, inspired by the rim of the flesh-eating pitcher plant. Meanwhile, other groups have ripped off the lotus, a plant that famously repels water using shields of air trapped by microscopic studs, much like the springtail’s skin.But the lotus-inspired materials are easily damaged, which slowly degrades the surface’s ability to stay dry. Carsten Werner, who led Helbig’s study, says, “These structures are so fragile that their anti-adhesive properties are only maintained if the leaf continuously rebuilds them. That is okay for the plant, but not for many of the synthetic surfaces based on that design concept.” It was his search for sturdier structures that led to the springtails.Their skin is more complex than any plant surface, and the structures are at least ten times smaller. They are also sturdier. The bristles can bend and flex, and the larger secondary granules protect the smaller primary ones from harm. Helbig thinks that they have evolved this way because the springtails, unlike the lotus, move about a lot. They need skin that stays waterproof even as it is jostled by debris or shaken by vibrations. Now, Helbig and Werner are trying to design synthetic materials that exploit the same shapes and have the same properties.Joanne Aizenberg, who designed the pitcher plant-inspired surface, admires the “beauty and sophistication” of the springtails’ skin. But she is not convinced that it will inspire better materials. Like the lotus, it relies on studs that trap cushions of air, and as these gradually accumulate damage, they will lose their ability to repel water.Aizenberg also adds, “The structures reported in this paper are particularly challenging, as they require the fabrication of overhangings. These surfaces would be laborious and expensive to produce, particularly at a large scale.” But Werner is undeterred. He is currently working on two ways of mimicking the springtails’ skin, the first of which should be published later this year.Reference: Helbig, R., Nickerl, J., Neinhuis, C., & Werner, C. (2011). Smart Skin Patterns Protect Springtails PLoS ONE, 6 (9) DOI: 10.1371/journal.pone.0025105",
"If you’re afraid of spiders, a new study published in the journal Nature Scientific Reports might not come as welcome news.Researchers at the University of Manchester have trained a regal jumping spider named “Kim” to leap on demand. It’s the first time a spider has been successfully trained to jump.Unlike domesticated pets like dogs, spiders typically don't eat more than once a week. This made training them to jump a difficult task because they couldn’t be as easily incentivized by food.“She would eat a cricket per week, so we couldn’t use a rewards system [to train her],” study author Mostafa R.A. Nabawy says. “And if we just gave her prey, then she would only jump motivated by the food. Then we would have to wait a week between jumps.”Instead, Nabawy and his team manually moved Kim from one platform to the other. They repeated this process until Kim was conditioned to make the jump without their assistance.(See how spiders take flight by "ballooning.")Kim’s training allowed the researchers to operate in a controlled environment with high-speed cameras and 3D CT scans that captured the precise movements of the spider’s jumps.They found that the force on Kim’s legs at take-off was five times her weight. This allows her to jump more than six times the length of her own body from a standing position. For perspective, a human can only jump one and a half times the length of their body from a stationary position.Nabawy and his team were also amazed by Kim’s accuracy.“She never missed,” he says. “She didn’t jump unless she was confident she could make the jump.”Nabawy is convinced that she has the power to jump even farther, but he suspects that her vision doesn’t allow her to see the platform clearly past six body lengths.By gaining a better understanding of the biomechanics behind Kim’s jumps, researchers can apply their findings to engineering micro-robots.“We are familiar with robots that are aimed at taking over human functions, but there are millions of insects in the world that perform specific functions that we have interest in adapting to robotics,” says Nabawy.",
"“If you break loose here, you can’t stop. You’re going into the abyss,” barks Rich Rudow. Normally he is unflappable, but as he knows too well, this is no place to let down one’s guard. We’re on a cliff roughly 3,500 feet above the Colorado River at the tip of the Great Thumb Mesa, a spectacular formation that thrusts out from the South Rim of the Grand Canyon like the bow of an immense ship. It is one of the canyon’s most remote spots, rarely seen even by the most hard-core backpackers. If you come this far out on the Thumb, there is no way to get down to the river without climbing gear, and the dwindling food in your pack won’t allow you to make the eight-day trek back the way you came. You have to move forward.Just ahead, the ledge that we’ve been walking on for the past several days vanishes into a deep indentation, or bay, in the wall of the canyon. This place is known as Owl Eyes, named for two enormous oval holes punched into the center of the cliff that looms over the middle of the bay. It’s a spooky place. Besides its ominous skull sockets, Owl Eyes is part of a tragic story. Nearly four years earlier, on a sunny February day, a beautiful young woman, a friend of Rudow’s, was crossing this passage when she fell to her death.Now we’re staring across the same terrain, in far worse conditions. A storm had lumbered in the previous evening and coated the canyon in nine inches of snow. This is not what we’d imagined when we started this venture, an end-to-end hike of the Grand Canyon.Local tribes regard the Confluence, where the Little Colorado’s blue waters merge with the Colorado, as sacred. Developers hope to build a tramway here to carry up to 10,000 tourists a day to a riverside retail and food complex.It isn’t a particularly sane thing to attempt. There is no single trail or network of trails that stretches along the entirety of the North or South Rims. The most efficient way to travel the length of the canyon is to float down the Colorado River, which winds through the canyon for 277 sinuous miles. That’s why John Wesley Powell—who led the first documented traverse of the canyon—did so by boat.After Powell’s achievement in the summer of 1869, more than a century would pass before the first known traverse by foot. During that time the canyon progressed from a forest reserve to a national monument until finally taking its place as the crown jewel of the National Park System and arguably the most recognized and beloved landscape in America. It became a vacation destination for hundreds of millions of families, its image captured on innumerable postcards. Yet nobody figured out how to walk all the way through the thing until a 25-year-old river guide named Kenton Grua completed it in the winter of 1976, some 65 years after both the North and South Poles had finally been reached, and 23 years after Mount Everest was first summited.Think about that for a moment—and consider what it says about how complicated and wild this place truly is.No one is sure of the exact distance Grua covered, but thanks to the countless bays, he probably walked more than 700 miles during his 37-day thru-hike along the south side of the river from Lees Ferry to the Grand Wash Cliffs.He never publicized his feat. But as word of what he’d done slowly spread, a new challenge opened up to a tiny community of extreme backpackers, including an electrical engineer from Phoenix named Rich Rudow. By the autumn of 2015, Rudow had completed hundreds of hikes and slot canyon explorations in the canyon and felt he was ready for his biggest challenge: a 57-day trek moving east to west across the canyon’s north side.By the time Rudow and two companions were ready to launch—almost 40 years after Grua’s thru-hike—fewer than two dozen people had approximated his feat by stringing together a chain of separate hikes along the length of the canyon, known as a “sectional” thru-hike. The number of trekkers who had completed a “continuous” thru-hike in a single push was even smaller. Before 2015 more people had stood on the moon (12) than had completed a continuous thru-hike of the Grand Canyon (eight).When photographer Pete McBride heard about Rudow’s plans, he called him and asked whether we could join his group. Pete and I had years of experience boating in the canyon, but we were woefully unprepared for what lay ahead. The only explanation for Rudow’s agreeing is that he was swayed by our primary reason for wanting to do it: to look into disturbing reports we’d been hearing about the canyon’s future, which included new tourist developments, increased helicopter flights, and a uranium mine.Since it entered the American consciousness, the Grand Canyon has provoked two major reactions: the urge to protect it, and the temptation to make a whopping pile of money from it. During the years after the Powell expedition, miners rushed into the canyon to lay claims for copper, zinc, silver, and asbestos. During the 1880s one tycoon wanted to turn the bottom of the canyon into a railroad corridor to haul coal from Denver to California. (He drowned in the Colorado, along with two members of his survey expedition.) In the 1950s a mining company tried to get rich by building a giant cableway to move bat guano from a cave and sell it to rose gardeners; that didn’t last long. There was even a government plan to build a pair of giant hydroelectric dams in the heart of the canyon, a project that would have transformed large parts of the Colorado River into a series of reservoirs whose shorelines today would undoubtedly be clotted with houseboats and Jet Skis.The successful campaign to stop those dams, spearheaded by the Sierra Club during the 1960s, established the idea that the Grand Canyon is inviolable. And yet Pete and I had heard about a range of new proposals—many of them driven by savvy entrepreneurs operating just outside the canyon’s boundaries in areas that were controlled not by the National Park Service but by the U.S. Forest Service or one of the five Native American tribes whose federally recognized reservations are located around the canyon. From every point of the compass, threats ranging from colossal tourist developments and unlimited helicopter tours to uranium mining were poised to spoil one of the world’s premier parks.It seemed to Pete and me that the best way to understand what was really at stake was to follow Kenton Grua’s example and hike straight through the heart of it all.“Dude, are you all right?” Pete murmurs, shaking me gently. “Wanna try and eat something before you totally pass out?”It’s late September, the sun is about to set on our first day of walking, and I’m splayed across the narrow patch of dirt where we’re supposed to spend the night.One of the many things that I hadn’t prepared for is that there’s nothing gradual about this initial stretch of the journey. The canyon sucker punches its challengers with some of the most punishing territory right out of the gate. Add to that our 50-pound packs and an early autumn heat wave that pushed temperatures to 110 degrees, which wrung every bit of moisture out of our bodies and had begun peeling away the soles of our hiking shoes.By the next morning Pete felt even worse than me. He had muscle cramps so intense that when he removed his shirt, it looked as if a mouse had wriggled into his abdomen and was scurrying from his shoulders to his stomach and back, just beneath the skin.On day six we acknowledged that we were in over our heads and bailed, leaving Rudow and his partners to continue. On the trek out, Pete was delirious and disoriented, and once back in Flagstaff, he was diagnosed with hyponatremia, a heat-induced imbalance of salts and minerals, which, left untreated, could result in death.In late October, intimidated but not defeated, we descended back into the now much cooler canyon and resumed our journey at the milepost where we’d pulled out three weeks earlier. Over the next several days, we threaded a route along a dizzying set of limestone ledges that dropped almost a thousand feet straight down to the river. Near river mile marker 32, we could discern the shadowy portal of the cave where archaeologists have found artifacts of the ancestral Puebloans, who inhabited this landscape for more than 10,000 years, as well as the remains of Harrington’s mountain goat (Oreamnos harringtoni) and yesterday’s camel (Camelops hesternus), now extinct creatures that flourished until the end of the Pleistocene, about 12,000 years ago.A daily pattern emerged: Each morning we would stuff ourselves with oatmeal, then set out on a 12- to 14-mile slog that usually involved hauling our packs up as much as a thousand vertical feet, descending impossibly steep slopes, or pushing through thickets of thornbushes. This would go on until the sun began to set, at which point, battered, scratched, and bone-tired, we would boil water, wolf down some rehydrated dinner, then lie back and gaze at the night sky while listening to the words of Edward Abbey on an audiobook Pete had downloaded onto his phone.The book was Desert Solitaire, Abbey’s homage to the country of the Grand Canyon’s sister parks, Canyonlands and Arches. Although I was usually too exhausted to stay awake for more than a few sentences, I often asked Pete to replay the part where Abbey warns readers not to jump into their cars next June and rush out, hoping to see some of the wonders he had attempted to evoke:In the first place you can’t see anything from a car; you’ve got to get out of the goddamned contraption and walk, better yet crawl, on hands and knees, over the sandstone and through the thornbush and cactus. When traces of blood begin to mark your trail you’ll see something, maybe. Probably not.Although that passage seemed to speak most directly to me in the moment, I always willed myself to stay awake for what followed:In the second place most of what I write about in this book is already gone or going under fast. This is not a travel guide but an elegy. A memorial. You’re holding a tombstone in your hands.Those words, which Abbey wrote in 1967, carried a disturbing prescience because the wilderness of Arches that he once reveled in is now overwhelmed by so many visitors—1.4 million in 2015—that the entrance to the park had to be closed intermittently on Memorial Day weekend last year. And due to a dam project, the wonders of Glen Canyon, said to rival the beauty of the Grand Canyon, now lie beneath the surface of a 186-mile-long reservoir named after John Wesley Powell.As Pete and I were about to discover, changes that bear a disturbing resemblance to the forces that Abbey had warned against—growth, development, and the pursuit of money—are unfolding inside Grand Canyon.Sixty-two river miles downstream from Lees Ferry, the reddish brown Colorado encounters its largest tributary within the canyon, a river known as the Little Colorado, whose waters often run a brilliant shade of turquoise. The point where the two streams merge, known as the Confluence, holds profound spiritual significance for many Native Americans whose ancestral lands lie within the canyon, including the Havasupai, the Zuni, the Hopi, and the Navajo.On the morning of November 2, we emerged on the north side of the river, inflated a pod of tiny rafts that we’d been carrying at the bottoms of our packs, and paddled across to begin an arduous 3,500-foot climb through a series of steep breaks in the cliffs that eventually delivered us to a remote stretch of the canyon’s eastern rim and the western border of the Navajo Reservation. We selected this route because it runs parallel to the path along which a group of developers from Scottsdale intend to construct the Escalade Tramway. Eight-person gondolas would shuttle tourists from the rim to near the river’s edge, where the developers plan to erect a retail complex, food court, and amphitheater overlooking the Confluence.The tramway would be capable of delivering as many as 10,000 people a day to a spot that now rarely hosts more than a few dozen people on a typical summer day, and often none during the winter. There has never been a development like it inside the canyon.The driving force behind this project is R. Lamar Whitmer, a political consultant who has persuaded a group of Navajo politicians that it would bring much needed revenue to the tribe. The opposition includes environmentalists as well as virtually every tribe in the region, including a group of Navajo who say that Whitmer and his associates tricked some tribespeople into supporting the project with misleading promises. (Whitmer denies he misled anyone.)This group calls itself Save the Confluence. When one of its members, Renae Yellowhorse, got word that Pete and I were scheduled to pop out of the canyon at a spot overlooking the Confluence, she telephoned a friend and asked him to drive her 41 miles from her home on the western edge of the Navajo Reservation, so that she could share a pot of traditional mutton stew and give us a piece of her mind.According to Yellowhorse, the reservation was now abuzz with rumors that Whitmer and his allies were assembling investors to finance the billion-dollar project while simultaneously forging new alliances with Navajo legislators in the hopes of making an end run around Navajo president Russell Begaye, a prominent opponent of the project. “We’re not opposed to development, but it’s not appropriate here,” declared Yellowhorse, a fiercely determined woman in wire-rimmed glasses and leather moccasins. “When my grandchildren come, I want them to see this place the way that my ancestors saw it. We don’t want this area developed—we do not want to see Disneyland on the edge of the canyon.”As it turned out, the friend who had driven Yellowhorse to meet us, a man named Roger Clark, was able to provide some context for that statement. As a program director of the Grand Canyon Trust, a conservation group that has spent 30 years battling an array of threats against the canyon, Clark is deeply troubled by the tramway plan. But he is even more worried that this project is part of a larger ring of threats that present an unprecedented assault on the integrity of the canyon.One of the other issues that concern Clark and many other environmentalists is Tusayan, a small town composed of a strip of modest tourist motels and gas stations two miles from the park’s main entrance at the South Rim. Tusayan has been taken over by a consortium of investors who want to transform it into a resort, with potentially thousands of new homes and millions of square feet of commercial space, including luxury hotels, a European-style health spa, and a dude ranch.All of this will require lots of water. The developers, led by an Italian company called Stilo, say they are reviewing ways to bring in water, including by train or a pipeline tapped into the Colorado River. But they also have the right to punch wells through the surface of the arid South Rim to access an aquifer that drives many of the springs and seeps deep within the Grand Canyon. These tiny pockets where water trickles from cracks in the bare rock make up less than 0.01 percent of the surface area inside the canyon, but each little oasis supports a web of complex plant and animal life. Thanks to the 6,000-foot elevation difference between the Colorado River and the North Rim, the canyon boasts five of North America’s seven “life zones”—more than any other national park. In latitudinal terms, it’s the equivalent of walking from the deserts of northern Mexico to the boreal regions of Canada, all in the span of little more than a vertical mile. Biologists say anything that might taint these springs or induce them to dry up would reverberate throughout the canyon’s biome.Clark didn’t know it at the time, but the U.S. Forest Service would soon refuse to review the town’s application for a road easement that is crucial for the project to go forward. But Tusayan’s backers already have overcome many obstacles, and if they find a way to clear this final hurdle, little will stand in their way.Tusayan, however, isn’t the only threat to the region’s aquifers. Just six miles to the southeast of the town—also outside the park—a company called Energy Fuels has reopened a mine after a bitter court fight with environmental groups and the Havasupai tribe and soon will be hauling out uranium ore. A company official dismissed the possibility of a major accident. But according to U.S. Geological Survey data, 15 springs and five wells inside the Grand Canyon area have levels of uranium that are considered unsafe to drink, due in part to incidents in older mines, where erosion and problems with containment have allowed uranium to leach into the groundwater.Meanwhile a 22-mile stretch of the river corridor at the bottom of the western end of the canyon has been opened to unlimited air traffic by the Hualapai, a tribe whose reservation borders the south side of the Colorado River. Thanks to a Federal Aviation Administration rule change requested by the Hualapai, the tribe may operate an unrestricted number of helicopter flights. These are filled with sightseers, many from Las Vegas, and fly below the canyon’s rim from sunrise to sunset. The noise they generate is so intense, and so continuous, that the area is locally known as Helicopter Alley.“When you look across this vast landscape now, it’s hard to believe that it could possibly be damaged or lost due to acts of man,” Clark said. “But each of these threats is capable of eroding a piece of the canyon’s majesty, and together they will strip the landscape of its ability to do the thing that makes it unique, which is to instill humility by demonstrating that human beings are tiny in relation to the forces that have shaped this planet, and that we are not the center of the world.”The bigger threat, Clark contends, is that Tusayan, the tramway, and Helicopter Alley have the potential to accelerate neighboring development projects. He noted that the Hualapai’s wildly successful helicopter operation has drawn interest among some Navajo, who believe that the cable-driven gondola system could be an anchor for a similar explosion of air tours along the eastern flanks of the canyon. If that vision were realized and if Tusayan’s development were to move forward, Clark said, the impact would be enormous. “You would have a mega-resort perched directly above the central portion of the canyon and bookended by a pair of massive air-tour operations, each anchored to its own new development,” he said. “In a very real sense, the entire sweep of the canyon would be transformed into something that looks less like a national park and more like an amusement park.”After Thanksgiving Pete and I headed back to where we’d ended our previous push and began hiking downstream. One hundred twenty-two miles later, we climbed back out, at the park’s South Rim entrance. Next came a 66-mile push that began just after New Year’s. Our pace each day was determined by the location of springs, which we relied on for drinking water, hopscotching from one to the next. At a place called Horn Creek, we had to bypass a large spring contaminated by an abandoned uranium mine just below the South Rim that has poisoned its water since the 1960s.At the end of January, as we were preparing for the most formidable leg of all—a 155-mile thrust around the Great Thumb Mesa—our friend Rich Rudow reentered the picture. He and his partner, Chris Atwood, had passed through the Grand Wash Cliffs in late November, becoming the ninth and 10th people to ever complete a continuous thru-hike of the entire canyon. (Their friend Dave Nally had pulled out early with respiratory problems.) Rudow had been tracking our progress via satellite texts we’d been sending and was worried about the challenges Pete and I would face on the Thumb in winter, when storms can blow in with little warning and dump several inches of snow.Rudow had decided that he needed to return to shepherd us through. Which is how, on the afternoon of February 1, we all came to be standing in almost a foot of snow at the edge of Owl Eyes, wondering how we were going to make it across.At the far end of the horseshoe-shaped bay was a massive ledge. If we could reach that flat piece of ground, we’d be OK. But getting there would require navigating directly across a steep slope of shale, hoping that if we slipped, we’d be able to stop our slide before shooting over the 400-foot cliff. It was already late in the afternoon, and if we failed to make it to safe ground before dark, we’d confront the appalling prospect of having to spend the night on the treacherously slick slopes of Owl Eyes.After more than two hours, we’d only made it to the middle of the horseshoe, where a small promontory extended out from the slope. It was no more than 20 yards long, but there was a flat space on top, and at the far end there was a small pile of stones. When we reached the stones, Rudow halted and bowed his head for a moment. Then he removed his glasses and wiped his eyes.“I’m so sorry,” he said softly. “It’s very emotional to be standing here.” Then he told us the story of what had happened to the young woman in whose memory the stones had been placed.Her name was Ioana Elise Hociota. She originally was from Romania, spoke four languages, and had degrees in mathematics and biology. She was 24, newly married, and she and her husband, Andrew Holycross, were close to completing a sectional thru-hike of the canyon.By the winter of 2012, Hociota had set her sights on the 20-mile stretch of ledges near the Great Thumb Mesa. When Holycross realized that his work schedule would prevent him from going, Hociota paired up with Matthias Kawski, a math professor and her academic mentor.They were in the middle of Owl Eyes when they stopped for lunch. Afterward Kawski headed farther up into the shale. Hociota opted for a more direct line that took her out of Kawski’s sight. A minute or two later Kawski heard a rock fall, followed by a sharp scream, and then, after a few seconds, a hollow thump. Scrambling to the edge of the cliff, he peered down, looking in vain for Hociota. He called out over and over. Nothing.The next day Hociota’s body was discovered, and a ranger tethered to a helicopter was lowered to retrieve it. When Rudow finished his story, he looked west, where the sun was angling toward the canyon’s rim. “Guys,” he announced. “We’re gonna have to spend the night here.”That night all of our water bottles froze, even though we stashed them inside the two tents that we pitched on the tiny patch of flat ground next to Hociota’s memorial. Our shoes froze too, and the next morning we had to hold them over our camp stoves to thaw them out.We broke camp and trudged the rest of the way across the snow-encrusted slopes to the flat ledge on the far side of Owl Eyes, where we dried our gear in the sun and looked back at the ground we had crossed.It was a sad and dangerous place, and I was glad to be done with it. But I couldn’t help but note that it was also quite beautiful. In the morning sunlight, even the face of the cliff down which Hociota had fallen was coated in a honey-colored glaze that seemed to glow from within. In that moment I may have glimpsed part of what Edward Abbey meant when he wrote about how it’s necessary to crawl across this terrain and bleed before you finally see something.What I saw—or rather, what I understood—was that of the many things that had drawn a math prodigy from Romania into this landscape was that the canyon is emphatically not an amusement park. It is without handrails, a place where the dangers are real. But no less real are the rewards—among them the fact that when you move through an ancient wilderness that has not been compromised, you are reminded of our species’ humble place in it and the fragility of life. Apparently Ioana Hociota understood that she needed places like that. And I suspect that the rest of us may need them too.Four days later we hiked out. And after resupplying in Flagstaff, Pete and I resumed our thru-hike in a series of pushes that, by the middle of March, brought us to within 50 miles of the end. But the canyon wasn’t through with us. One morning the thermometer on Pete’s watch hit 111 degrees, hotter than the temperature that had triggered his hyponatremia six months earlier. Thirty minutes later we started hiking out.When we began this quest, we had no way of knowing that even after flinging ourselves at the canyon on seven separate trips over the course of a year, the end would still lie before us. As you’re reading this in September 2016, it’s likely we’re back on the trail, trying to finish our thru-hike. If you’re reading this story decades from now, say in 2066, hopefully a vast Grand Canyon wilderness, in the truest sense of the word, still exists.",
"More than a hundred pangolins have been rescued alive after an anti-smuggling raid on a fishing boat off the east coast of Sumatra on October 24.Indonesian authorities arrested two men who were allegedly paid to transport the scaly mammals to Malaysia, according to a press release from the Indonesian Navy, which was tipped off by members of the community.The seizure lays bare pangolin smugglers’ changing M.O. Whereas they used to rely on large freezer shipping containers that only major international ports could accommodate, smugglers are increasingly making smaller—but more regular—shipments of live pangolins through remote seaports, says Dwi Adhiasto, a wildlife trade expert at the Wildlife Conservation Society’s Indonesia office.“After border protection by the Indonesian customs increased and more than 10 arrests with tons of frozen pangolins happened in the [major] seaports, the traffickers changed their modus,” he wrote in an email.Pangolins are believed to the the world’s most trafficked mammal, with tens of thousands poached each year. About the size of a domestic cat, they’re often called “scaly anteaters” and may have been the inspiration behind the Pokémon Sandshrew. When threatened, pangolins curl up into a ball like an armadillo—good protection from predators, but it makes them easy prey for poachers.A thriving black market for pangolins exists in Asia, especially Vietnam and China, where their meat is considered a delicacy, and their scales are sometimes used in traditional medicine, even though it has no scientifically proven curative value. There’s even a dish called pangolin fetus soup, believed to enhance a man’s virility. The scales of a single pangolin can have a street value of $2,700, according to some reports. (Read more: Pangolins just got some desperately needed help.)It’s unknown exactly how many pangolins are left in the wild, but scientists have classified the four Asian species as endangered or critically endangered, meaning they face a very high risk of extinction. Africa’s four pangolin species, which aren’t endangered but are still considered vulnerable, are coming under increasing pressure as traffickers target them more often.Four of the 101 pangolins seized from the fishing boat later died. A spokesman said the rest will be released into the nearest national park, according to AFP. Still, there’s no guarantee they won’t be captured again by poachers.Indonesia has emerged as a popular transit country for the illegal wildlife trade, which is estimated to be worth several billion dollars a year, according to the United Nations. The illegal wildlife trade in Indonesia is typically conducted by local people who poach the animals and sell them to dealers and criminal syndicates to be smuggled out of the country.The suspects arrested in this case face up to five years in jail and a fine of up to $7,300, more than half Indonesia’s per capita GDP.",
"Dock workers use cranes to off-load frozen tuna from a Chinese-owned cargo vessel at the General Santos Fish Port, in the Philippines. Tuna stocks in the South China Sea have plummeted in recent years because of overfishing.PUERTO PRINCESA, PhilippinesOne time Christopher Tubo caught a 660-pound blue marlin in the South China Sea. That was years ago, when the fishing there was good, he says. He would come home from a trip with dozens of valuable fish like tuna and a haul of other species.“Here there’s none of that,” he says, looking toward the Sulu Sea, the Philippine sea where he’s been fishing for the past four years. His two boats, traditional Filipino outriggers called bancas, float in the shallow water nearby, new coats of white paint on the decks, drying in the sun.A worker carries a line-caught yellowfin tuna at the General Santos Fish Port, which is known as the “tuna capital of the Philippines.” The South China Sea, through which tuna migrate, produces more fish than almost anywhere else, but it has been severely overfished and is nearing collapse.Tubo sits on a wooden bench in front of his home, which is perched on stilts above the bay. One of his four kids wraps an arm around his leg. Worn T-shirts and shorts flutter on clotheslines behind them.Glancing at his wife, Leah, and the other children, he says, “It’s just chance, whether or not we can feed our families now.”Tubo lives in Puerto Princesa, a city of 255,000 on Palawan, a long finger of an island that faces the Sulu Sea and the Philippine archipelago to the east and the contested South China Sea to the west. He’s one of the more than 320,000 fishermen in the Philippines who have traditionally made their livelihood from the South China Sea—and one of a growing number who are now fishing in other, less ecologically rich waters. That’s because about eight years ago China took a more assertive posture in the region, ramping up its intimidation of other fishermen and eventually building military installations on contested islands.Filipino fishermen aboard the Ninay haul in sardines and scad in national waters near the South China Sea. The territorial and maritime disputes in the South China Sea have increased competition for dwindling fish stocks of all species.It was after a Chinese coast guard vessel attacked a friend’s boat with water cannons that Tubo quit fishing the South China Sea.“One minute you’ll see an airplane, then there’s a naval boat,” he says. “If we keep going over there, maybe we won’t be able to go home to our families.”“As they see it, it’s theirs now, and Filipinos are forbidden,” says Henry Tesorio, an elected councilor for a fishing village in Puerto Princesa.The lights on the Melissa attract fish toward the boat and up to the surface. A storm later forced the boat to return to Quezon, a fishing village on the island of Palawan, in the Philippines. Fishermen from the Philippines, China, Vietnam, Taiwan, and elsewhere all fish the South China Sea.Vietnamese fishermen could say the same thing. Some 200 Vietnamese from the island of Ly Son, 15 miles off the mainland, reported being attacked by Chinese boats in 2015, according to local Vietnamese government officials.Tubo’s decision is a reflection of the rising tensions in the region, which have ignited an increasingly fierce competition for natural resources, among other things. Encompassing 1.4 million square miles, the South China Sea is of critical economic, military, and environmental significance: Some $5.3 trillion in international trade plies its waters annually. It is richer in biodiversity than nearly any other marine ecosystem on the planet, and its fish provide food and jobs for millions of people in the 10 surrounding countries and territories.Of those, seven—Brunei, China, Indonesia, Malaysia, the Philippines, Taiwan, and Vietnam—-have competing claims. If a military conflict were to break out, it could involve two world powers, China and the United States, a longtime ally of the Philippines. That’s why the dispute has commanded worldwide attention.Another serious yet less publicized threat looms: overfishing. The South China Sea is one of the world’s most important fisheries, employing more than 3.7 million people and generating billions of dollars every year. But after decades of free-for-all fishing, stocks are dwindling, threatening the food security and economic growth of the rapidly developing nations that rely on them.China asserts a right to almost the entire sea. It has demarcated a broad, U-shaped area that it says has historically been China’s but that under international law includes the waters of other nations (see map). Every other country in the South China Sea dispute, including the Philippines, bases its claims on the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea, the international pact that defines maritime zones and first went into effect in 1994.Crew members take shelter from a storm aboard the Ninay. Filipino fishermen have reported increasing interference from Chinese coast guard vessels in the South China Sea. China claims most of the South China Sea for itself.Opposing Beijing's expansionist claims, in 2013 the Philippines brought a case against China before a tribunal at the Permanent Court of Arbitration, a forum for settling international disputes, in The Hague. China refused to participate. On July 12, 2016, the tribunal ruled in favor of the Philippines on almost all its claims, declaring that China had forfeited the possibility of any historically based rights when it ratified the UN convention in 1996. China vowed to ignore the tribunal’s ruling.This dispute over the South China Sea intensifies competition among fishermen, and the resulting scramble for fish inflames the dispute. Today some waters have less than one-tenth of the stocks they had six decades ago. And high-value fish such as tuna and grouper are becoming scarcer.“What we’re looking at is potentially one of the world’s worst fisheries collapses ever,” says John McManus, a marine ecologist at the Rosenstiel School at the University of Miami who studies reefs in the region. “We’re talking hundreds and hundreds of species that will collapse, and they could collapse relatively quickly, one after another.”When coastal waters became depleted, many fishermen were forced to venture beyond national limits and into disputed areas to make a living. Meanwhile China began bolstering its claims by aggressively supporting its fishermen. It has consolidated the coast guard, militarized fishing fleets, and promoted its subsidies for fuel and better boats. There’s even a subsidy specifically for Chinese fishermen to work the waters around the contested Spratly Islands, more than 500 miles to the south of China’s southernmost point (a port on the island of Hainan).“The only reason that smaller [Chinese] fishermen go out to the Spratlys is because they’re paid to do so,” says Gregory Poling, the director of the Asia Maritime Transparency Initiative, at the Washington, D.C.-based think tank, the Center for Strategic and International Studies. This extra pressure has sped up the depletion of fish stocks, he says.A couple sits outside a home built over the water in Quezon, where most people have family members who work as fishermen. Overfishing has put the livelihoods of many Filipinos at risk.The Chinese also are building artificial islands atop reefs in the Spratlys to support military installations there. “Possession is nine-tenths of the law,” says Zachary Abuza, an expert on Southeast Asian politics and maritime security at the National War College, in Washington, D.C. “China is trying to enforce its sovereignty through the construction of these islands and by denying other countries access to natural resources.”Eugenio Bito-onon, Jr., is a former mayor of the Kalayaan municipality that includes islands in the Spratlys. An outspoken advocate for the Philippines’ claims, he has seen firsthand how China uses its fishermen to strengthen its claim to the region. I met Bito-onon in the municipality’s cramped satellite office in Puerto Princesa, where the wall of one room displays a gigantic map of the South China Sea marked up with his own handwritten labels and colored dots showing which countries claim which features.He pulled up Google Earth on his laptop and found Thitu Island, in the Spratlys known locally as Pag-asa, where some 200 Filipinos, including a small number of troops, live part-time, their presence demonstrating his country’s claim to the island. ice, clothing, soap, and other necessities must be brought in by boat or airlift, and two government-owned generators are the only source of electricity. Bito-onon pointed out just how close Chinese-claimed Subi Reef is to Thitu. So close, he said, that on a clear day residents can see it on the horizon.A Filipino fisherman wades from boat to shore with part of the crew’s catch. Fishermen who go to the South China Sea report that their catches have gotten smaller in recent years.The Navotas Fish Port in Manila is the largest in the Philippines. The markets at the port trade in seafood from freshwater farms, national waters, and international waters, including the South China Sea.Even closer are Chinese fishing boats that he says have fished the reefs empty. “For the past three years, [the Chinese] never leave,” Bito-onon said from behind his laptop, now displaying satellite imagery of reefs around Thitu. “Chinese fishing boats come and go, replacing each other,” he says, but there are never not boats within sight of the island.Gilbert Elefane, the Filipino captain of a tuna boat based in the municipality of Quezon, on Palawan, says he now sees up to a hundred boats, many Chinese, on a single two-week fishing trip in the South China Sea. Just a few years ago, he says he’d have seen no more than 30.Beijing has provided military training and sophisticated GPS and communications technology to its fishermen so they can call in the coast guard if they have a run-in with a foreign law enforcement vessel or alert the coast guard of the presence of fishermen from other countries.A dock worker uses a mallet to dislodge frozen tuna aboard a Chinese cargo vessel docked at the city of General Santos in the Philippines. The cargo vessel spends up to two months at sea with a fleet of a dozen tuna boats working to fill its freezer.In the face of China’s island building, Vietnam has done some small-scale land reclamation of its own in an attempt to bolster its capacity in the Spratlys. Its efforts, however, have been less destructive than China’s.As long as the conflict in the South China Sea continues, it will be nearly impossible to regulate fishing.A pregnant woman wades in the dirty water near the Navotas Fish Port. The Philippines' economy relies heavily on fishing and the seafood trade, as do most of the countries around the South China Sea.When one country tries to protect its fishing grounds, tensions flare. In March, for instance, Indonesian maritime law enforcement officials arrested eight Chinese on charges of illegal fishing. The fishermen were less than three miles from Indonesia’s Natuna Islands. The Natunas themselves are not in dispute, but the waters north of them, which are particularly rich in gas, have become a new flashpoint. Under international law they’re Indonesian, but they partially overlap with China’s U-shaped line claims, so China says it has a right to fish there.When Indonesia’s vessel began towing the Chinese boat back to port, an armed Chinese coast guard ship appeared and began ramming the Chinese boat to break it free. The Indonesians were forced to let the boat go and retreat.“It’s unclear whose laws you’re enforcing when you have seven overlapping sets of fisheries laws,” Poling says. “States have a vested interest in purposely violating fishing laws of other states.”That’s because abiding by another country’s fishing law amounts to accepting that nation's jurisdiction over the region, which no country has been willing to do.A fisherman at the General Santos Fish Port carries a yellowfin tuna caught in the South China Sea. Fishermen say the fish they catch now are smaller than before.Workers at the Navotas Fish Port unload and sort fish from commercial boats that have returned from the South China Sea, where overfishing has exacerbated the land and sea disputes in the region.In 2012 a Philippine Navy warship tried to arrest Chinese fishermen at Scarborough Shoal, about 138 miles from the Philippine coast, on suspicion of illegal fishing and poaching rare corals, giant clams, and sharks. A Chinese coast guard ship intervened to prevent the arrests, forcing a standoff. Ten weeks later both sides agreed to withdraw, but after the Philippine warship left, China’s ship remained, effectively seizing control of the shoal.As Filipino fishermen have seen their catches—and the fish themselves—getting smaller, they’ve increasingly been resorting to dangerous, illegal fishing methods. Blast fishing, which Filipinos call “bong bong” fishing, involves setting off homemade bombs underwater to kill dozens of fish at one time. Cyanide fishing, which involves squirting fish in the face with poison to stun them, is used to catch live reef fish to supply high-end live seafood restaurants in Hong Kong and other large Asian cities. Both practices kill coral and other fish, collateral damage that’s pushing the sea closer to an overfishing crisis.Dock workers at the Navotas Fish Port sort through mussels. If the South China Sea fishery were to collapse, it would threaten the food supply of millions.More destructive to the reefs, however, are China's island building and giant clam poaching, which account for most of the documented reef destruction in the South China Sea, an area totaling 62 square miles. Island building grinds up corals for use as foundation material, smothers reefs that become the base of islands, and creates sediment plumes that suffocate nearby reefs. Dredging to deepen ports also causes serious damage. And poaching of giant clams entails digging up entire areas of reef to get to the shells.When a reef is destroyed, the ecosystem unravels. Reef fish lose their habitat, and pelagic fish such as tuna lose an important source of food. Reef fish lose their habitat, and pelagic fish such as tuna lose an important source of food. Furthermore, reefs in the South China Sea are connected. Fish larvae from one reef ride the current across the sea to repopulate another reef. If a reef disappears, so does that source of larvae, increasing the chance that local extirpations of fish species will be permanent.Dock workers and fishermen buy food from a street vendor at the Navotas Fish Port, in Manila. Some 320,000 Filipinos fish the South China Sea, and many more work on the docks, as fish packers, and as seafood traders, among other jobs.“It’s quite possible we’re seeing a serious decline in about half of the reefs,” McManus, the marine ecologist, says. “That’s what I expect will happen, if it hasn’t happened already. It’s just total destruction.”McManus says that many of the damaged reefs will be able to recover in a decade or two—if the island building and destructive giant clam poaching stop. He champions the idea of a “peace park,” a kind of marine protected area where all countries would put a freeze on their claims and halt all activities, like island building, that bolster those claims.Experts also say cooperative regional management could go a long way toward making the South China Sea fishery sustainable. It would require dramatic cutbacks in the number of fishing boats and restrictions on fishing methods such as the use of huge fishing vessels that use powerful lights at night to attract tuna. All this would in turn mean helping fishermen find other ways to earn a living.Under a sustainable management plan, tuna and mackerel could recover 17-fold by 2045, Rashid Sumaila and William Cheung at the University of British Columbia predicted in a 2015 report. Reef fish would recover up to 15 percent, and the catch and value of reef fish would also increase. Sharks and groupers, which are also high-value fish, would make a comeback too.But Poling, of the Center for Strategic and International Studies, questions whether such a plan could be devised in time to prevent the fishery from collapsing.“What that requires is setting aside the disputes,” he says. “It’s possible—it’s just not likely. In order to have a successful joint management system, the first step is to agree on what area you’re talking about.” If China clings to its expanded jurisdictional claim while other countries base their claims on international law, agreement won’t be possible, he says.Children fish at dusk in the fishing community of Quezon in the Philippines. Fishermen here ply their trade in national waters and the South China Sea.As it now stands, the South China Sea’s most important resource—its fish—is disappearing, and countries are either passively standing by or actively encouraging their fishermen to take more.Aurora Almendral contributed to this report.Read the other story in this series: China’s giant clam poaching is decimating reefs in the South China Sea.This story was produced by National Geographic’s Special Investigations Unit, which focuses on wildlife crime and is made possible by grants from the BAND Foundation and the Woodtiger Fund. Read more stories from the SIU on Wildlife Watch. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to ngwildlife@natgeo.com.",
"A Malayan tiger at the Bronx Zoo, photographed in 2017. Five of the zoo's tigers and three of its lions have tested positive for the virus that causes COVID-19.Four more tigers and three lions at the Bronx Zoo in New York City have tested positive for the virus that causes COVID-19, the zoo announced Wednesday afternoon, following a National Geographic inquiry. This comes nearly three weeks after one tiger at the zoo was confirmed to have the virus and six other cats were said to be exhibiting symptoms.The diagnosis of the tiger, named Nadia, represented “the first time, to our knowledge, that a [wild] animal has gotten sick from COVID-19 from a person,” Paul Calle, chief veterinarian for the Bronx Zoo, said April 5. The big cats likely contracted the coronavirus from an infected but asymptomatic zookeeper whose identity is unknown, Calle says: “It’s the only thing that makes sense.” Calle says.The zoo has been closed to visitors since March 16. Initially it did not plan to test the other cats showing symptoms, because doing so would require sedation, which can be dangerous. But the U.S. Department of Agriculture subsequently updated an online database with information that a lion in New York had also been confirmed as testing positive for the virus on April 15. National Geographic contacted the Bronx Zoo seeking more information on April 22. And shortly thereafter the Wildlife Conservation Society, the nonprofit that runs the Bronx Zoo, issued a press release announcing that four additional tigers and three lions had tested positive. The zoo confirmed in the press release that the additional tests were done using fecal samples and did not require sedation.It is not clear when the additional tests on the three lions and four tigers were conducted or when the zoo received the results; a zoo spokesperson did not respond to questions about the timing. The USDA did not respond to National Geographic’s request for comment by press time.Several domestic animals have tested positive for SARS-CoV-2, the virus that causes COVID-19, including two cats in New York State—the first in the United States, the USDA announced today. A Pomeranian and a German shepherd in Hong Kong, as well as a domestic cat in Belgium, have also tested positive. The U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention today issued new guidelines on the virus for pet owners, saying that while it does not recommend widespread testing at this time, it encourages cat owners to keep their cats indoors whenever possible.Both wild and domestic cats had been known to susceptible to feline coronavirus—but until recently, it was unknown whether they could contract SARS-CoV-2. A new Chinese study has found that cats may be able to infect each other. Scientists now are rushing to learn what other species may be able to be infected by it.After developing a dry cough in late March, Nadia, a four-year-old Malayan tiger, was tested for the virus on April 2, according to Calle. At that time Nadia’s sister, two Siberian tigers, and three African lions also had coughs and a loss of appetite. When Nadia started showing symptoms, the veterinary team did a number of diagnostic tests and blood work. “Considering what’s going on in New York City, we of course did the COVID testing,” Calle said. The team took samples at the zoo, after sedating Nadia. They sent the samples for testing to the New York State Diagnostic Laboratory at Cornell University and the University of Illinois College of Veterinary Medicine Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory. It is not the same type of test that health care providers give to people, Calle said, “so there is no competition for testing between these very different situations.”The zoo has all eight cats—one of which is not showing symptoms—under veterinary care and expects them to recover, the Wildlife Conservation Society statement says. While it’s becoming clear humans can pass the disease to some animals, there is currently no evidence that animals can spread the novel coronavirus to people, both the USDA and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention say. (It’s believed the virus infecting humans likely developed from a very closely related coronavirus found in bats.)Because this phenomenon is new, Calle said, there are many unanswered questions, including whether tigers and lions are more susceptible to coronavirus than other animals. None of the zoo’s other big cats—including snow leopards, cheetahs, a clouded leopard, an Amur leopard, and a puma—are showing symptoms.Zookeepers around the country have been making extra efforts to protect great apes in their care, as great apes can easily catch respiratory illnesses from humans. Experts have warned that they may be particularly susceptible to coronavirus.The Bronx Zoo team has shared Nadia’s diagnostic information widely with the zoo and scientific community, Calle says. “I suspect that there are other cases, and now that we’re sharing this information I have a hunch other likely cases will turn up.”Dan Ashe, president of the American Association of Zoos and Aquariums (AZA), commended Calle’s team for their quick action to test Nadia. The AZA accredits more than 200 zoos in the U.S., including the Bronx Zoo. Ashe said that the AZA has helped distribute USDA information that cautions about the potential virus transfer from humans to felids, and Bronx Zoo information about increased safety measures, including wearing masks and goggles to protect animals and keeping a distance of six feet whenever possible.Ashe said that “If we’d known the keeper had COVID-19 they wouldn’t have been at work.” He said he believes human testing should be the priority because. “if [the virus] can go from people to big cats, the most important thing we can do is test the people.”Although Ashe says he’s confident that accredited AZA facilities will continue to actively monitor the threat, he’s concerned for the big cats at the many substandard roadside zoos around the United States: “Anybody who has watched Tiger King, you think a facility like that would be able to respond in an appropriate way to information like this?” The majority of those zoos don’t have veterinarians on staff, and it’s unlikely tests would be done, Ashe said. And the cub-petting and close contact offered by these facilities is “is troublesome in best of circumstances,” he says, let alone at a time when the CDC and USDA are recommending maintaining distance among humans, and between humans and cats. (Read about the difference between accredited zoos, “roadside zoos,” sanctuaries, and “pseudo-sanctuaries” here.)John Goodrich, chief scientist and tiger program director at Panthera, a global big cat conservation organization, is concerned for wild tiger populations. “Big cats like tigers and lions are already facing a litany of threats to their survival in the wild,” Goodrich says. “If COVID-19 jumps to wild big cat populations and becomes a significant cause of mortality, the virus could develop into a very serious concern for the future of these species.”",
"We heard them before we saw them.Their squawks echoed from inside the neat, ranch-style home, sounding more like parrots than tiger cubs. Then James Garretson carried Hulk into the living room, where the McCabe family waited on the couch. The kids giggled as he placed the squirming cub on nine-year-old Ariel’s lap and pushed a baby bottle into its mouth. “Hold the bottle, just like that. You got it?” She nodded.Everyone beamed, fondling Hulk’s rough, striped fur as Garretson hovered nearby. The 12-week-old, cocker spaniel-size cat clutched the bottle in his oversize paws, sucking with wild enthusiasm. When the bottle was empty, the cub wandered onto the coffee table and swatted our photo gear.Garretson lured him back with another bottle to give Ariel’s five-year-old brother, James, a turn. Then the rambunctious cub leaped off the sofa, grabbed me from behind, gripped my legs with surprising strength, and tore five-inch scratches into my thighs. He sank his claws in and held on. Garretson peeled him off, and all made light of it with nervous laughs. Playful. Just acting like a kitten.We met two more tiger cubs in a back room at the Ringling Animal Care Center in Oklahoma (which has no connection to the famous circus). Outside, we watched six adult tigers lounge in their pools or stalk one another, overweight but seemingly happy and living in clean enclosures.That was in September 2018.I later learned that seven tigers under Garretson’s care at another facility had killed a woman in 2003. Court documents noted the cats were “extraordinarily hungry” and had reached through flimsy cattle fencing to rip Lynda Brackett’s arm off “in a feeding-like frenzy.” The 35-year-old, who worked there as a volunteer, bled to death. The U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) fined Garretson $32,560 and ordered him to never again exhibit, breed, buy, or sell animals that required U.S. federal licensing—including tigers. But by 2017 he was working at the Ringling center with new cats. The center was operating under a USDA license held by his girlfriend, Brittany Medina.Four months after my visit, Garretson was evicted from the property, which was leased in his name. A team from Turpentine Creek Wildlife Refuge drove from Arkansas to rescue the six adult tigers. One, named Diesel, was too ill to stand. He died four days later of a treatable bacterial blood infection thought to be carried by fleas and ticks, says veterinarian Kellyn Sweeley, who treated him. Hulk and the two other cubs had disappeared.My visit to the Ringling center with photographer Steve Winter was just one stop during a two-year investigation into why there are likely more tigers living in cages in the U.S. than remain in the wild. We wanted to find out who owned them, what their living conditions are, how lax regulation has allowed them to proliferate, and how they’re traded around the country.Among other things, we found that most tigers in this country live in small zoos and animal attractions—known generally in the industry as “roadside” zoos—where care standards can vary widely, in some cases endangering the animals in them and the humans who visit them.Tigers are in crisis. At the turn of the 20th century, when Rudyard Kipling penned The Jungle Book, about 100,000 of the majestic cats roamed across Asia. They were wiped out by trophy hunts in India, the 1960s fashion craze for fur in the United States and Europe, the cats’ shrinking habitat, conflicts with people, and poaching. Today perhaps 3,900 remain in the wild. Tigers hover closer to extinction than any other big cat.After years of reporting on the illegal wildlife trade in Asia, I decided to look into tigers in America when I heard a talk by Carson Barylak, a policy specialist with the International Fund for Animal Welfare.She said there may be 5,000 to 10,000 captive tigers in the United States. No one, including government officials, knows exactly how many there are, and there is no overarching federal law regulating big cat ownership.Barylak showed a multicolored map illustrating a random patchwork of state laws. Some states ban private ownership. Others require a permit. Four have no statewide laws at all. In some places, it’s easier to buy a tiger than to adopt a kitten from a local animal shelter.You can get a USDA license to exhibit or breed gerbils—and then exhibit or breed any animal you want, including big cats. Entertainment drives the breeding and trading of tigers in the U.S., specifically attractions that allow customers to pet, feed, and pose with tiger cubs. Commercial breeders provide a constant supply of babies. Within some states, such commercial activities are legal if properly licensed by the USDA, which is tasked with enforcing minimum care standards for animals under the Animal Welfare Act. But we found mistreatment of animals and a range of illicit activities, including wildlife trafficking, at many facilities we visited.Tiger cubs are a gold mine, especially white ones. Tourists hug, bottle-feed, and snap pictures with adorable babies at roadside zoos, county fairs, and safari parks. A quick photo op or five-minute cuddle runs $10 to $100. A three-hour zoo tour with cub handling can run $700 a person. Guests often are told they’re helping to save wild tigers. They leave happy and post selfies on social media.(Take a look at the U.S. tiger trade)What they don’t know is the cubs’ history or future. Most are born in tiger mills where females churn out two or three litters a year, compared with one litter every two years in the wild. Cubs are pulled from their mothers soon after birth, says Jennifer Conrad, a veterinarian with expertise in tigers. Many are poorly fed; unknown numbers die. Some are sold off before their eyes open.When they’re just a few weeks old, the cubs go to work, sometimes passed around for up to 10 hours a day. The profits can be enormous. (Tax records from Wildlife in Need, an Indiana roadside zoo run by Tim Stark, showed annual revenue of $1 million to $1.27 million in recent years. Stark, who still runs the facility but is under a court order not to allow cub petting, has been cited repeatedly by the USDA for violations related to sick or injured animals and was convicted of wildlife trafficking in 2008.)At three or four months, cubs reach what amounts to their expiration date: They’re too big and dangerous to pet.Some cubs become breeders or are put on display. Others simply disappear. Cub petting for photo opportunities “fuels a rapid and vicious cycle of breeding and dumping cubs after they outgrow their usefulness,” said Representative Brian Fitzpatrick, a Republican from Pennsylvania. He and Mike Quigley, a Democrat from Illinois, co-sponsored the Big Cat Public Safety Act, a bill in the House of Representatives that aims to better protect animals and the public by prohibiting commercial breeding, public handling, and ownership of big cats as pets. The bill was introduced in the Senate recently by Richard Blumenthal, a Democrat from Connecticut.There’s evidence that some surplus tigers are killed to reduce inventory at roadside zoos and similar attractions. Dead tigers have been stuffed or sold off in parts: skins, teeth, claws, and skeletons. It’s illegal to sell or ship them for purely commercial purposes across state lines under the Endangered Species Act.Tentacles of this U.S. trafficking network have reached into Asia. In a recent case, a New York City man, Arongkron “Paul” Malasukum, was convicted of wildlife trafficking for selling lion and tiger parts. As part of his plea, he admitted to shipping 68 packages of wildlife parts falsely labeled as ceramics and toys to Thailand. Court papers listed items seized from his home, including tiger skulls, teeth, and claws, as well as elephant tusks.Captive-bred cats in Asia have fed a deadly commerce in tiger products for decades, stimulating demand that drives poaching, says Debbie Banks, a tiger trafficking expert with the U.K.-based Environmental Investigation Agency.China is the largest consumer. Its market in tiger parts for luxury items and for use in traditional medicine drives this deadly trade. The country’s tiger attractions, home to some 6,000 tigers, often double as “farms” that breed the animals to sell their parts.We wanted to see tigers in other situations, so we headed to Pennsylvania to meet Brunon Blaszak. He’s a third-generation tiger trainer who tours with one of the country’s few tiger acts. We watched him put his five tigers through traditional circus tricks in a rustic, portable enclosure at the Fayette County Fair. It was July, and brutally hot. During our two-plus days at the fair, the cats spent much of their time in five-by-eight-foot travel cages.We also met people who kept tigers as pets; some seemed to truly love them. One, Oklahoma exotic animal owner Lori Ensign-Scroggins, seemed oblivious to the potential danger of keeping such a large predator. She walked Langley, her nearly 300-pound ti-liger (a cross between a tiger and a lion-tiger mix), on a leash and sometimes took him into her home. She called him “Baby” and gave him special care, saying he’d been a cub-petting castoff. Langley had vision problems and walked with a rolling limp, problems most likely caused by hybridization.In our travels we saw cats kept under conditions that ran the gamut. We saw cats pacing the perimeters of dirty, prison-like cages as well as calm cats in large, lush habitats. Some were beautiful and well cared for. Others bore scars, were skinny or fat, were listless or covered in open sores. Some displayed symptoms of inbreeding or poor nutrition and were crippled, cross-eyed, or deformed. None seemed to be the confident, wide-ranging predator that Panthera tigris evolved to be.Highly regarded zoos, aquariums, and animal parks—236 facilities—are accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums (AZA), which does not allow public contact with tigers. The AZA—whose members include facilities owned by The Walt Disney Company, the parent company of National Geographic Partners—also allows only purebred tigers to be bred, and only for conservation purposes. Wildlife specialists say that such policies reflect some of the improvements in the care of exotic animals that have unfolded over the past three decades, as saving species and showing animals in more natural habitats have become priorities.Attractions that breed tigers for commercial purposes, allow cub petting, or both—including some of the roadside zoos and parks we visited—often are not accredited by any organization that sets specific guidelines for exotic animals. Some belong to the Zoological Association of America (ZAA), a trade association that allows cub petting.Many roadside zoos brand themselves as sanctuaries, but few meet the criteria for them, says Bobbi Brink, director of Lions Tigers & Bears, an exotic animal rescue and sanctuary in San Diego. These standards, she says, include no breeding, buying, or selling of animals; prohibiting the public from hands-on contact with them; and providing proper nutrition, care, and a lifetime home.Facilities that exhibit, breed, or deal in captive exotic “warm-blooded animals not raised for food or fiber” must have a USDA license. Some captive-wildlife experts, including Cathy Liss, president of the nonprofit Animal Welfare Institute (AWI), say that recently the USDA hasn’t done enough to ensure animals’ safety. Liss questions why the department has gutted enforcement of the Animal Welfare Act, noting that the law’s care and safety rules “are so modest that if you can’t meet them, you shouldn’t be in business.”From 2016 to 2018, new investigations into captive-animal welfare and safety issues dropped by 92 percent, from 239 to just 19. The department also wrote far fewer citations, issuing 1,716 in 2018, compared with 4,944 two years before—a 65 percent drop, according to AWI.In June the U.S. House of Representatives reprimanded the USDA for substituting “teachable moment” conversations for active enforcement, noting concern over “how the Animal Care program is being managed.” It ordered the USDA to “immediately require all its inspectors to cite every observed violation at any visit to a regulated entity.”Congress told the USDA to reinstate information that had been scrubbed from its website in 2017, which had made it impossible to monitor problem facilities for neglect, abuse, or safety issues that endanger animals and the public. The department later restored some information, but the reports are heavily redacted. I asked the USDA about this and other issues: Problems counting and tracking tigers; the welfare of cubs that are handled by the public; why venues with decades of serious violations are still licensed; and more. After repeated requests for an interview and a series of email exchanges, the USDA provided a written reply that broadly quoted regulations and offered web links, but gave few specifics. The department refused my request for an interview and declined to make someone available to address questions.Joseph Maldonado-Passage, known as Joe Exotic, poses with Lightning, a four-month-old white cub, at G.W. Exotic Animal Park in Oklahoma. Once a prolific breeder and dealer of tigers and hybrids, he is in prison after being convicted in April on two counts of murder for hire and 17 federal wildlife charges—including killing five tigers.The next time I saw James Garretson, he was on the witness stand in a federal court in Oklahoma City.It was March 2019, and he was testifying against “Joe Exotic,” a man who owned what prosecutor Amanda Green said was “quite possibly the largest population of big cats in captivity in the U.S.”His real name is Joseph Maldonado-Passage, and he’d been indicted on 19 wildlife charges and two counts of murder for hire. Garretson had known him for decades and bought cats from him. He’d taped their conversations and collected text messages that became key evidence in a trial that revealed widespread criminal activity in the U.S. tiger industry.This was the first time I’d seen Joe Exotic, though I felt like I knew him. I’d followed five of his Facebook pages for more than a year. I’d seen many online videos, interviews, and episodes of Joe Exotic TV, the low-budget online reality show he streamed from his parents’ Oklahoma zoo, G.W. Exotic Animal Park, which opened in 1999. At one time, he claimed to own 227 tigers.Joe Exotic is a showman who loves to talk and craves the spotlight. At 56, he sports a signature horseshoe mustache and dyed-blond mullet. He’s inked in tattoos depicting tigers, past lovers, and bullet holes dripping blood.He once ran cub-petting photo sessions in shopping malls, parking lots, and county fairs across the West and Midwest. He staged rudimentary magic shows with tigers as “the Tiger King,” dressed as an open-shirted, Las Vegas–style entertainer. He ran for president in 2016, garnering 962 votes, and for Oklahoma governor in 2018, when he got 664.Back home, Joe Exotic was a prolific tiger breeder and dealer. Prosecutors said he falsified tiger birth records that he showed to USDA inspectors to hide the birth and sale of cubs.Joe Exotic’s house was a tiger day care center, said his niece, Chealsi Putman, who worked at the zoo. The living room was sometimes crammed with six or seven playpens for litters of cubs.He bred white tigers, which often are inbred. They were among the most popular, drawing huge crowds to the zoo. He took greatest pride in breeding tigers with lions, “chimera” hybrids that don’t exist in nature: ligers (lion dad, tiger mom), tigons (the reverse)—and then li-ligers, ti-ligers, and more.His troubles began soon after the zoo opened two decades ago. The USDA cited him repeatedly for violations of Animal Welfare Act standards: Inspectors documented sick, injured, mistreated animals and unclean, unsafe enclosures contaminated by vermin. The agency fined him $25,000 in 2006. Major problems continued: an escaped tiger, a mauled employee, at least 22 cubs that died over an eight- to 10-month period.Then in 2011 came protests over his mall shows, sparked by Carole Baskin, founder of Big Cat Rescue sanctuary in Florida. She’d launched 911 Animal Abuse, a website that exposes mistreatment of big cats and opposes separating cubs from their mothers to use the babies as photo props.Mall chains stopped hiring Joe Exotic. He threatened Baskin on social media and sparked hate fests on Facebook against her and others he called “animal rights terrorists.” He retaliated by renaming his road show Big Cat Rescue Entertainment, even copying the sanctuary’s logo. Baskin then sued over intellectual property rights and won a million dollars in settlements in 2013. It financially devastated Joe Exotic, who took on a business partner to help pay the bills.Joe Exotic told anyone who’d listen that he wanted Baskin dead. In a YouTube video, he said, “Carole Baskin better never, ever, ever see me face-to-face, ever, ever, ever again.” Then he blew the head off an effigy of her with a revolver.The conflict grew more serious in 2016, Garretson testified, when Joe Exotic “asked if I knew somebody that would kill” Baskin and said he’d offer $10,000 to anyone who would agree to do it.Some months later, Garretson said, Joe Exotic mentioned that he’d shot some of his own tigers. Garretson decided that was enough. He’d been contacted by Matt Bryant, a special agent at the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, and he signed on as a government informant. Court documents say Garretson collected tapes and texts as Joe Exotic hired an employee, Allen Glover, to kill Baskin and then sold a cub to pay for a $3,000 deposit on the hit.When Glover disappeared with the money, Joe Exotic tried again. This time, the would-be hit man was an undercover FBI agent.Joe Exotic was arrested on two counts of murder for hire in September 2018. Federal wildlife charges were added later; those included illegally selling and transporting endangered species across state lines, falsely labeling those sales as “donations,” and killing five tigers.In court, Glover’s testimony raised shivers. He testified that he’d told Joe Exotic that he would cut off Baskin’s head with a knife. (Glover was never charged.)Baskin wasn’t physically harmed, but tigers were. Under oath, former zoo employees Dylan West and Eric Cowie described what happened in October 2017. After tranquilizing five tigers, Joe Exotic “walked up to them with the .410 [shotgun] and put it against their head[s] and pulled the trigger,” West said. Cowie testified that the victims, named Samson, Delilah, Lauren, Trinity, and Cuddles, were “dispensable” because they weren’t producing cubs.Special Agent James Markley described what Fish and Wildlife investigators unearthed a year later. Digging down five feet, “we found five tigers lined up, side by side, like hot dogs in a pack.”In April the jury convicted Joe Exotic on 17 wildlife charges (two were dropped) and the murder-for-hire counts, both felonies. He faces up to 69 years in prison.Under the Endangered Species Act, killing tigers is a misdemeanor. Joe Exotic insisted that the law was written to apply to wild animals, not those born in a zoo. In a recent email, he said he had a right to “euthanize my own property.”Environmental crimes prosecutor John Webb characterized it differently. “It was tiger execution,” he said. It wasn’t the first.Tiger trainer Brunon Blaszak puts cats through circus tricks at one of his three daily shows at Ohio’s Crawford County Fair. Tigers seen there over a three-day period were held in small travel cages when not performing. There’s growing backlash against such shows; critics say the acts are inhumane.In 2003 Illinois corrections officer William Kapp was convicted for his role in shooting 18 tigers and leopards in their cages and brokering the sale of their meat and skins to buyers. The same year, California Department of Fish and Wildlife investigators found 90-some dead animals—mostly tigers, including 58 cubs—in a freezer when they raided the home of John Weinhart, owner of Tiger Rescue, a facility in Colton, California, that billed itself as a sanctuary for animals that had worked in the entertainment industry.In emails from jail, Joe Exotic questioned why other breeders have not been charged, alleging that they have sold, illegally transported, or killed big cats—and continue to.So, he asked, “why am I the only one in jail?”The United States has been a leader in the fight against the illegal wildlife trade, a business involving international crime syndicates that analysts say could amount to as much as $20 billion a year. In 2015 the U.S. and China negotiated a near-total bilateral ban on ivory sales.But the U.S. has less credibility when it comes to protecting tigers because of its large, poorly regulated population of captive tigers. Breeding these animals for “trade in parts and derivatives” was outlawed in a 2007 decision by the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species (CITES), a treaty signed by 183 members worldwide, including the United States. Now CITES is investigating seven nations linked to possible trafficking of captive-bred tigers: the U.S., China, Vietnam, Laos, Thailand, the Czech Republic, and South Africa.Fish and Wildlife special agent Phillip Land told me that “exporting wildlife out of the United States is becoming more prevalent.” A State Department email to congressional staff last year noted that private ownership of tigers in the U.S. is “inconsistent with our stance against tiger farming and trafficking.”One U.S. official told me he was laughed at by Chinese delegates at a CITES meeting when he raised a question about China’s tiger farms. He said one of the delegates told him, “At least we know how many tigers we have.”Philip Nyhus, a professor at Maine’s Colby College, traces the massive striped cat’s arrival in the United States to the early 1800s. Crowds flocked to see exotic animals from far-flung lands in traveling menageries.By 1833 animal trainer Isaac van Amburgh was using tigers in his act, climbing into their cages dressed as a gladiator. He was criticized for his brutality; he was said to have beaten his tigers with a crowbar. Such dominance training helped embed a notion in the American psyche, Nyhus says, that these dangerous beasts must be subdued by macho trainers.When the nation’s first zoo opened in Philadelphia in 1874, it exhibited a tiger, as did many of the hundred-plus “zoological parks” and 650 circuses that sprouted nationwide during the next half century.Fast-forward to 1960. Billionaire John Kluge bought a white Bengal tiger, Mohini, from India’s maharaja of Rewa and donated it to the National Zoo in Washington, D.C. The female had ice-blue eyes, a pink nose, and milky fur slashed by dark stripes. She was one of only seven in the world, all in captivity.Mohini wasn’t an albino or a separate subspecies. Her snowy coat came from a pair of recessive genes, one from each parent. Breeding with her half brother produced the first white cub in the U.S. in 1964. The Cincinnati Zoo borrowed two of her children, which also were bred to one another. This was the start of a practice that eventually produced 91 white cubs from 1974 to 1990. The Cincinnati Enquirer reported that the zoo sold the cubs for $40,000 to $60,000 each.The Cincinnati Zoo, which is accredited by the AZA, stopped breeding white tigers after 1990. In 2012 the AZA banned the practice for its affiliates. Both did so because of numerous health problems in inbred cats and because breeding for white tigers had no conservation value.“The days of breeding white tigers in accredited zoos are over,” says Thane Maynard, director of the Cincinnati Zoo. AZA president Dan Ashe, director of the Fish and Wildlife Service from 2011 to 2017, says breeding for recessive traits “is simply unethical from the standpoint of the welfare of the population and of the individual animal.”Descendants of the early white tigers began appearing in attractions across the U.S.: Siegfried Fischbacher and Uwe Ludwig Horn bought seven whites from Cincinnati and began putting them in their “Siegfried & Roy” magic show, which dazzled Las Vegas audiences for decades and grossed up to $45 million a year. The spectacle included Roy dancing with a 400-pound cat. The show ended in 2003 when a tiger mauled him onstage.By then America had fallen in love with tigers, and they were everywhere. In 1998 Fish and Wildlife limited its captive-wildlife registration requirements to purebreds. That meant anyone could buy, breed, and sell “mutt” Bengal-Siberian or other generic mixes across state lines without a permit. It “incentivized mass breeding,” says Carney Anne Nasser, a captive-tiger expert and professor at Michigan State University.You could pet a cub at a flea market, a county fair, a mall. Tigers lived in people’s homes, garages, and flimsy cages in backyards.But when those adorable cubs grew, they tore up the furniture and attacked the kids. Many owners couldn’t handle a dangerous 300- to 450-pound carnivore or the $10,000-a-year food and vet bills that came with it. The first havens for these cast-off big cats are still open today: Baskin’s Big Cat Rescue in Florida, Pat Craig’s Wild Animal Sanctuary in Colorado, and Scott and Tanya Smith’s Turpentine Creek Wildlife Refuge in Arkansas. All are accredited by the Global Federation of Animal Sanctuaries. Craig is building a facility that will allow cats to roam in 35- to 500-acre habitats.In February 2017 we followed the Smiths on a caravan-style drive from Colorado to California. Four tigers were in the trailer they pulled behind them, the last of 74 from Serenity Springs Wildlife Center in Calhan, Colorado. They were relocated to 15 sanctuaries in a six-month marathon—the largest tiger rescue in U.S. history. The former owner, Nick Sculac, had sold Serenity Springs, citing health problems. Records left behind in his office revealed that he’d been among America’s biggest tiger breeders. The USDA had filed complaints against him in 2012 and 2015, detailing animal abuse, neglect, and safety violations. He lost his exhibitor’s license in April 2017, eight months after he sold the facility.The Smiths said the conditions at Serenity Springs were “a horror show.” The air was black with flies attracted by rotting garbage. Dead birds floated in animal pools. Enclosures were shin-deep in excrement. One tiger was missing a leg, possibly from fighting with a cage mate. Another had a softball-size tumor under its chin. Many had broken, abscessed teeth and limped from declawing; their claws had been removed by amputating the first joint of their toes.Three four-month-old white cubs, Blackfire, Rocklyn, and Peyton, were in critical condition. They could barely drag themselves to their water bowls and cried when they moved. They were rushed to the Smiths’ Turpentine Creek sanctuary for emergency care. X-rays showed each had a malformed pelvis and misshapen, nearly transparent bones so riddled with fractures they resembled a mosaic. Pulled from their mother and poorly nourished, they’d developed metabolic bone disease, says Emily McCormack, the sanctuary’s animal curator. “Every day we asked each other, ‘Can we save them?’ ”We traveled to Arkansas in September 2018 to see what had become of the cubs. Blackfire, the male, sauntered to the fence, chuffing a tiger hello. At two years old, he was magnificent. He and his sisters still limped, and McCormack said they’re on daily pain medication, but they chased and pounced like kittens in their large, grassy enclosure.Tigers are extremely dangerous and cannot be domesticated, says Tim Harrison, a retired police officer with expertise in exotic animals and public safety. A lot can go wrong with tigers in captivity, he says, if a hurricane or tornado hits, a fire breaks out, or humans simply make a mistake. Eight years ago, an incident in Zanesville, Ohio, showed what can happen when something goes horribly wrong with someone who keeps wild predators. Exotic pet owner Terry Thompson apparently set 56 of his animals loose—including 38 big cats—then shot himself. Muskingum County sheriff Matthew Lutz and his deputies had to kill most of the animals to protect the community.Edmund Kelso, Jr., a former FBI bomb expert, expressed his concern in a letter to Congress: “If I had a choice of working on an IED or responding to an emergency involving a dangerous big cat, I would definitely select the former. This should underscore how dangerous it truly is for these animals to be left in untrained hands in back yards and roadside zoos.”Nine-month-old Selah lies in her transport cage before a performance by magician Jay Owenhouse in Spokane. Shows are typically booked for two weekends a month. The rest of the time, Owenhouse’s tigers live in a two-acre compound in Bozeman, Montana.Stage manager Andrew Bradbury unloads a tiger in Spokane for the next day’s Dare to Believe! show. Illusionist Owenhouse uses two tigers in his traveling magic show, a model popularized by Siegfried & Roy’s decades-long Las Vegas act. Jay’s children, including Juliana (at left) and Christina (at right) are an integral part of the production.There’s a long list of tragic stories involving people who have lost limbs or been bitten, mauled, or killed. Among them: Haley R. Hilderbrand, 17, who was killed while posing for her senior pictures with a male tiger in Kansas in 2005; and a three-year-old boy who was blinded by his father’s tiger in North Carolina in 1995.The number of attacks is unknown: No government agency keeps records of them, and injuries often go unreported. Eight former roadside zoo employees who’d been bitten or clawed told me they’d been discouraged from seeing a doctor so no one would find out. They also said they’d received little or no training in handling big cats. In 2012, seven nonprofits petitioned the USDA to ban public contact with dangerous wildlife at its licensed facilities, citing a “welfare and public safety crisis.” By law, the department must respond. But seven years later, it has “no projected date” for doing so, the USDA said in a written statement.I spent two days at Myrtle Beach Safari, a wildlife attraction in South Carolina.Bhagavan “Doc” Antle, the owner, is known for producing white tigers. The park promotes itself on Instagram, where Antle’s son Kody posts pictures of himself shirtless, with his father’s animals and videos of their animals’ antics. He has more than a million followers.In May I joined 79 people on a three-hour “wild encounters” tour. It began in a safari lodge–style living room. TVs played loops of Doc Antle’s appearances on The Tonight Show With Jay Leno, as well as films and shows he’s trained animals for. (National Geographic has worked with Antle in the past but has decided it will no longer do so.)The tour was highly scripted. Attractive young women emceed, peppering their circus-style oratory with puns. After a lively intro, staffer Robert Johnson outlined conservation programs funded by Antle’s nonprofit, the Rare Species Fund (RSF). “You guys are part of it now. Congratulations!” he said.Terry’s Taxidermy stuffed and displayed these two tigers. The owner, Terry Mayberry, says he acquired them from an Oklahoma animal park. Because both businesses are in the same state—and the animals were not transported across state lines—this exchange was not prohibited by the Endangered Species Act.He pointed to the windows behind the crowd. Outside, Kody walked a monstrous, 900-pound liger named Hercules on a chain, a tawny, lion-ish hybrid cat with faint stripes and a massive head. All took turns posing for photos in front of him. We walked through a manicured jungle setting to a large gazebo. Inside, guests played with tiger cubs as photographers snapped pictures. Everyone was smitten. Back in the lodge, visitors gushed as they waited for pictures. No cameras were allowed, so most bought a photo package. One visitor booked a swim-with-a-tiger session for $5,000. After dark, nearly 30 joined a “night safari.” I estimated the day’s receipts at about $50,000.The tour gave customers the impression that it was all for conservation. The RSF supports some conservation projects, but staff wouldn’t say how much the fund donates each year, and some of its activities have raised questions. Among them are “educational” tiger performances at Renaissance fairs, where Antle told me he’d sold about a million photo ops with adult tigers and ligers. Antle also has delivered tigers to Thailand’s Samut Prakarn Crocodile Farm and Zoo; in June National Geographic published a story about animal abuse at that attraction.The fund’s website says it is “working to improve wildlife legislation.” In the past decade, Antle’s businesses have spent at least $1.15 million lobbying on proposed regulations on captive wildlife and big cat issues—including $60,000 to lobby against the Big Cat Public Safety Act.The future of tigers in the U.S. remains to be seen. But this much is clear: As long as tourists seek to cuddle tiger cubs and be dazzled by hybrid cats—and as long as U.S. policies make owning dangerous cats so easy—the formula for abuse will remain in place.",
"Travelers love animals. We want to get close to them and learn more about them. But the reality that many tourists don’t see is that to stay in business, animal encounters, such as elephant rides and photo ops with tigers, rely on putting wild creatures to work.Discerning the difference between ethical and problematic wildlife experiences is among the thorny issues addressed in National Geographic magazine’s feature story “Suffering unseen: The dark truth behind wildlife tourism.” For visitors to environments ranging from zoos to national parks, it can be especially difficult to determine how to observe animals humanely. To assess how facilities treat captive animals, you can refer to the “five freedoms”—internationally recognized standards inspired by a 1965 U.K. government report. Consider these tips before your next wild adventure:Look for facilities where animals appear to be well-fed and have access to clean water at all times. A facility that rates high on TripAdvisor may not be a humane one. Read one- and two-star reviews, which often include animal welfare concerns cited by visitors. (See more wildlife photos from across the globe.)Observe whether animals have an appropriate environment, including shelter, ample space, a comfortable resting area, and a secluded place away from crowds. Beware of buzzwords including “gives back to conservation,” “sanctuary,” and “rescue.” Be cautious if a facility makes these promises yet offers extensive interaction to large volumes of people.Avoid facilities where animals are visibly injured or are forced to participate in activities that could injure them or cause them pain or where enclosures aren’t clean. Being chained, performing, and interacting with tourists—giving rides, posing with them, being washed by them—are not normal for a wild animal, even one born in captivity. (Discover 10 wild experiences in national parks.)Be aware that large crowds and unnatural noises cause distress, especially for animals that have experienced fear-based training, separation from mothers at birth, or other traumas.Seek experiences that offer observation of animals engaging in natural behaviors in natural environments.The global wildlife tourism industry is entrepreneurial. Individual actions can make a collective difference, signaling to the market that consumers support ethical wildlife encounters. When travelers decide they want humane treatment of animals, the wildlife tourism market will change for the better.",
"I’ve come back to check on a baby. Just after dusk I’m in a car lumbering down a muddy road in the rain, past rows of shackled elephants, their trunks swaying. I was here five hours before, when the sun was high and hot and tourists were on elephants’ backs.Walking now, I can barely see the path in the glow of my phone’s flashlight. When the wooden fence post of the stall stops me short, I point my light down and follow a current of rainwater across the concrete floor until it washes up against three large, gray feet. A fourth foot hovers above the surface, tethered tightly by a short chain and choked by a ring of metal spikes. When the elephant tires and puts her foot down, the spikes press deeper into her ankle.Meena is four years and two months old, still a toddler as elephants go. Khammon Kongkhaw, her mahout, or caretaker, told me earlier that Meena wears the spiked chain because she tends to kick. Kongkhaw has been responsible for Meena here at Maetaman Elephant Adventure, near Chiang Mai, in northern Thailand, since she was 11 months old. He said he keeps her on the spiked shackle only during the day and takes it off at night. But it’s night now.I ask Jin Laoshen, the Maetaman staffer accompanying me on this nighttime visit, why her chain is still on. He says he doesn’t know.Photos of tourists with captive wild animals abound on social media platforms such as Instagram. With the tap of a finger, travelers post their images of exotic animals for the world to see. But often travelers and fans alike are unaware of what the animals’ lives are really like.Maetaman is one of many animal attractions in and around tourist-swarmed Chiang Mai. People spill out of tour buses and clamber onto the trunks of elephants that, at the prodding of their mahouts’ bullhooks (long poles with a sharp metal hook), hoist them in the air while cameras snap. Visitors thrust bananas toward elephants’ trunks. They watch as mahouts goad their elephants—some of the most intelligent animals on the planet—to throw darts or kick oversize soccer balls while music blares.Meena is one of Maetaman’s 10 show elephants. To be precise, she’s a painter. Twice a day, in front of throngs of chattering tourists, Kongkhaw puts a paintbrush in the tip of her trunk and presses a steel nail to her face to direct her brushstrokes as she drags primary colors across paper. Often he guides her to paint a wild elephant in the savanna. Her paintings are then sold to tourists.Meena’s life is set to follow the same trajectory as many of the roughly 3,800 captive elephants in Thailand and thousands more throughout Southeast Asia. She’ll perform in shows until she’s about 10. After that, she’ll become a riding elephant. Tourists will sit on a bench strapped to her back, and she’ll give several rides a day. When Meena is too old or sick to give rides—maybe at 55, maybe at 75—she’ll die. If she’s lucky, she’ll get a few years of retirement. She’ll spend most of her life on a chain in a stall.Wildlife attractions such as Maetaman lure people from around the world to be with animals like Meena, and they make up a lucrative segment of the booming global travel industry. Twice as many trips are being taken abroad as 15 years ago, a jump driven partly by Chinese tourists, who spend far more on international travel than any other nationality.Wildlife tourism isn’t new, but social media is setting the industry ablaze, turning encounters with exotic animals into photo-driven bucket-list toppers. Activities once publicized mostly in guidebooks now are shared instantly with multitudes of people by selfie-taking backpackers, tour-bus travelers, and social media “influencers” through a tap on their phone screens. Nearly all millennials (23- to 38-year-olds) use social media while traveling. Their selfies—of swims with dolphins, encounters with tigers, rides on elephants, and more—are viral advertising for attractions that tout up-close experiences with animals.For all the visibility social media provides, it doesn’t show what happens beyond the view of the camera lens. People who feel joy and exhilaration from getting close to wild animals usually are unaware that many of the animals at such attractions live a lot like Meena, or worse.Photographer Kirsten Luce and I set out to look behind the curtain of the thriving wildlife tourism industry, to see how animals at various attractions—including some that emphasize their humane care of animals—are treated once the selfie-taking crowds have gone.After leaving Maetaman, we take a five-minute car ride up a winding hill to a property announced by a wooden plaque as “Elephant EcoValley: where elephants are in good hands.” There are no elephant rides here. No paint shows or other performances. Visitors can stroll through an open-air museum and learn about Thailand’s national animal. They can make herbal treats for the elephants and paper from elephant dung. They can watch elephants in a grassy, tree-ringed field.EcoValley’s guest book is filled with praise from Australians, Danes, Americans—tourists who often shun elephant camps such as Maetaman because the rides and shows make them uneasy. Here, they can see unchained elephants and leave feeling good about supporting what they believe is an ethical establishment. What many don’t know is that EcoValley’s seemingly carefree elephants are brought here for the day from nearby Maetaman—and that the two attractions are actually a single business.Meena was brought here once, but she tried to run into the forest. Another young elephant, Mei, comes sometimes, but today she’s at Maetaman, playing the harmonica in the shows. When she’s not doing that, or spending the day at EcoValley, she’s chained near Meena in one of Maetaman’s elephant stalls.Meena Kalamapijit owns Maetaman as well as EcoValley, which she opened in November 2017 to cater to Westerners. She says her 56 elephants are well cared for and that giving rides and performing allow them to have necessary exercise. And, she says, Meena the elephant’s behavior has gotten better since her mahout started using the spiked chain.We sit with Kalamapijit on a balcony outside her office, and she explains that when Westerners, especially Americans, stopped coming to Maetaman, she eliminated one of the daily shows to allot time for visitors to watch elephants bathe in the river that runs through the camp.“Westerners enjoy bathing because it looks happy and natural,” she says. “But a Chinese tour agency called me and said, ‘Why are you cutting the show? Our customers love to see it, and they don’t care about bathing at all.’ ” Providing separate options is good for business, Kalamapijit says.Around the world Kirsten and I watched tourists watching captive animals. In Thailand we also saw American men bear-hug tigers in Chiang Mai and Chinese brides in wedding gowns ride young elephants in the aqua surf on the island of Phuket. We watched polar bears in wire muzzles ballroom dancing across the ice under a big top in Russia and teenage boys on the Amazon River snapping selfies with baby sloths.Most tourists who enjoy these encounters don’t know that the adult tigers may be declawed, drugged, or both. Or that there are always cubs for tourists to snuggle with because the cats are speed bred and the cubs are taken from their mothers just days after birth. Or that the elephants give rides and perform tricks without harming people only because they’ve been “broken” as babies and taught to fear the bullhook. Or that the Amazonian sloths taken illegally from the jungle often die within weeks of being put in captivity.A young elephant performs for an audience at Sriracha Tiger Zoo, in Chon Buri, Thailand. Elephants, highly intelligent mammals, are trained through fear with metal bullhooks to catch hoops, hold balloons, and balance on stools.As we traveled to performance pits and holding pens on three continents and in the Hawaiian Islands, asking questions about how animals are treated and getting answers that didn’t always add up, it became clear how methodically and systematically animal suffering is concealed.The wildlife tourism industry caters to people’s love of animals but often seeks to maximize profits by exploiting animals from birth to death. The industry’s economy depends largely on people believing that the animals they’re paying to watch or ride or feed are having fun too.It succeeds partly because tourists—in unfamiliar settings and eager to have a positive experience—typically don’t consider the possibility that they’re helping to hurt animals. Social media adds to the confusion: Oblivious endorsements from friends and trendsetters legitimize attractions before a traveler ever gets near an animal.There has been some recognition of social media’s role in the problem. In December 2017, after a National Geographic investigative report on harmful wildlife tourism in Amazonian Brazil and Peru, Instagram introduced a feature: Users who click or search one of dozens of hashtags, such as #slothselfie and #tigercubselfie, now get a pop-up warning that the content they’re viewing may be harmful to animals.Everyone finds Olga Barantseva on Instagram. “Photographer from Russia. Photographing dreams,” her bio reads. She meets clients for woodland photo shoots with captive wild animals just outside Moscow.For her 18th birthday, Sasha Belova treated herself to a session with Barantseva—and a pack of wolves. “It was my dream,” she says as she fidgets with her hair, which had been styled that morning. “Wolves are wild and dangerous.” The wolves are kept in small cages at a petting zoo when not participating in photo shoots.The Kravtsov family hired Barantseva to take their first professional family photos—all five family members, shivering and smiling in the birch forest, joined by a bear named Stepan.Barantseva has been photographing people and wild animals together for six years. She “woke up as a star,” she says, in 2015, when a couple of international media outlets found her online. Her audience has exploded to more than 80,000 followers worldwide. “I want to show harmony between people and animals,” she says.On a raw fall day, under a crown of golden birch leaves on a hill that overlooks a frigid lake, two-and-a-half-year-old Alexander Levin, dressed in a hooded bumblebee sweater, timidly holds Stepan’s paw.The bear’s owners, Yury and Svetlana Panteleenko, ply their star with food—tuna fish mixed with oatmeal—to get him to approach the boy. Snap: It looks like a tender friendship. The owners toss grapes to Stepan to get him to open his mouth wide. Snap: The bear looks as if he’s smiling.The Panteleenkos constantly move Stepan, adjusting his paws, feeding him, and positioning Alexander as Barantseva, pink-haired, bundled in jeans and a parka, captures each moment. Snap: A photo goes to her Instagram feed. A boy and a bear in golden Russian woods—a picture straight out of a fairy tale. It’s a contemporary twist on a long-standing Russian tradition of exploiting bears for entertainment.Another day in the same forest, Kirsten and I join 12 young women who have nearly identical Instagram accounts replete with dreamy photos of models caressing owls and wolves and foxes. Armed with fancy cameras but as yet modest numbers of followers, they all want the audience Barantseva has. Each has paid the Panteleenkos $760 to take identical shots of models with the ultimate prize: a bear in the woods.Stepan is 26 years old, elderly for a brown bear, and can hardly walk. The Panteleenkos say they bought him from a small zoo when he was three months old. They say the bear’s work—a constant stream of photo shoots and movies—provides money to keep him fed.A video on Svetlana Panteleenko’s Instagram account proclaims: “Love along with some great food can make anyone a teddy :-)”And just like that, social media takes a single instance of local animal tourism and broadcasts it to the world.When the documentary film Blackfish was released in 2013, it drew a swift and decisive reaction from the American public. Through the story of Tilikum, a distressed killer whale at SeaWorld in Orlando, Florida, the film detailed the miserable life orcas can face in captivity. Hundreds of thousands of outraged viewers signed petitions. Companies with partnership deals, such as Southwest Airlines, severed ties with SeaWorld. Attendance at SeaWorld’s water parks slipped; its stock nose-dived.James Regan says what he saw in Blackfish upset him. Regan, honeymooning in Hawaii with his wife, Katie, is from England, where the country’s last marine mammal park closed permanently in 1993. I meet him at Dolphin Quest Oahu, an upscale swim-with-dolphins business on the grounds of the beachfront Kahala Hotel & Resort, just east of Honolulu. The Regans paid $225 each to swim for 30 minutes in a small group with a bottlenose dolphin. One of two Dolphin Quest locations in Hawaii, the facility houses six dolphins.Bottlenose dolphins are the backbone of an industry that spans the globe. Swim-with-dolphins operations rely on captive-bred and wild-caught dolphins that live—and interact with tourists—in pools. The popularity of these photo-friendly attractions reflects the disconnect around dolphin experiences: People in the West increasingly shun shows that feature animals performing tricks, but many see swimming with captive dolphins as a vacation rite of passage.Katie Regan has wanted to swim with dolphins since she was a child. Her husband laughs and says of Dolphin Quest, “They paint a lovely picture. When you’re in America, everyone is smiling.” But he appreciates that the facility is at their hotel, so they can watch the dolphins being fed and cared for. He brings up Blackfish again.Katie protests: “Stop making my dream a horrible thing!”Rae Stone, president of Dolphin Quest and a marine mammal veterinarian, says the company donates money to conservation projects and educates visitors about perils that marine mammals face in the wild. By paying for this entertainment, she says, visitors are helping captive dolphins’ wild cousins.Stone notes that Dolphin Quest is certified “humane” by American Humane, an animal welfare nonprofit. (The Walt Disney Company, National Geographic’s majority owner, offers dolphin encounters on some vacation excursions and at an attraction in Epcot, one of its Orlando parks. Disney says it follows the animal welfare standards of the Association of Zoos & Aquariums, a nonprofit that accredits more than 230 facilities worldwide.)It’s a vigorous debate: whether even places with high standards, veterinarians on staff, and features such as pools filled with filtered ocean water can be truly humane for marine mammals.Dolphin Quest’s Stone says yes.Critics, including the Humane Society of the United States, which does not endorse keeping dolphins in captivity, say no. They argue that these animals have evolved to swim great distances and live in complex social groups—conditions that can’t be replicated in the confines of a pool. This helps explain why the National Aquarium, in Baltimore, announced in 2016 that its dolphins will be retired to a seaside sanctuary by 2020.Some U.S. attractions breed their own dolphins because the nation has restricted dolphin catching in the wild since 1972. But elsewhere, dolphins are still being taken from the wild and turned into performers.In China, which has no national laws on captive-animal welfare, dolphinariums with wild-caught animals are a booming business: There are now 78 marine mammal parks, and 26 more are under construction.To have the once-in-a-lifetime chance to see rare Black Sea dolphins, people in the landlocked town of Kaluga, a hundred miles from Moscow, don’t have to leave their city. In the parking lot of the Torgoviy Kvartal shopping mall, next to a hardware store, is a white inflatable pop-up aquarium: the Moscow Traveling Dolphinarium. It looks like a children’s bouncy castle that’s been drained of its color.Inside the puffy dome, parents buy their kids dolphin-shaped trinkets: fuzzy dolls and Mylar balloons, paper dolphin hats, and drinks in plastic dolphin tumblers. Families take their seats around a small pool. The venue is so intimate that even the cheapest seats, at nine dollars apiece, are within splashing distance.“My kids are jumping for joy,” says a woman named Anya, motioning toward her two giddy boys, bouncing in their seats.In the middle of the jubilant atmosphere, in water that seems much too shallow and much too murky, two dolphins swim listlessly in circles.Russia is one of only a few countries (Indonesia is another) where traveling oceanariums exist. Dolphins and beluga whales, which need to be immersed in water to stay alive, are put in tubs on trucks and carted from city to city in a loop that usually ends when they die. These traveling shows are aboveboard: Russia has no laws that regulate how marine mammals should be treated in captivity.The shows are the domestic arm of a brisk Russian global trade in dolphins and small whales. Black Sea bottlenose dolphins can’t be caught legally without a permit, but Russian fishermen can catch belugas and orcas under legal quotas in the name of science and education. Some belugas are sold legally to aquariums around the country. Russia now allows only a dozen or so orcas to be caught each year for scientific and educational purposes, and since April 2018, the government has cracked down on exporting them. But government investigators believe that Russian orcas—which can sell for millions—are being caught illegally for export to China.Captive orcas, which can grow to 20 feet long and more than 10,000 pounds, are too big for the traveling shows that typically feature dolphins and belugas. When I contacted the owners of the Moscow Traveling Dolphinarium and another operation, the White Whale Show, in separate telephone calls to ask where their dolphins and belugas come from, both men, Sergey Kuznetsov and Oleg Belesikov, hung up on me.Russia’s dozen or so traveling oceanariums are touted as a way to bring native wild animals to people who might never see the ocean.“Who else if not us?” says Mikhail Olyoshin, a staffer at one traveling oceanarium. And on this day in Kaluga, as the dolphins perform tricks to American pop songs and lie on platforms for several minutes for photo ops, parents and children express the same sentiment: Imagine, dolphins, up close, in my hometown. The ocean on delivery.Owners and operators of wildlife tourism attractions, from high-end facilities such as Dolphin Quest in Hawaii to low-end monkey shows in Thailand, say their animals live longer in captivity than wild counterparts because they’re safe from predators and environmental hazards. Show operators proudly emphasize that the animals under their care are with them for life. They’re family.Alla Azovtseva, a longtime dolphin trainer in Russia, shakes her head.“I don’t see any sense in this work. My conscience bites me. I look at my animals and want to cry,” says Azovtseva, who drives a red van with dolphins airbrushed on the side. At the moment, she’s training pilot whales to perform tricks at Moscow’s Moskvarium, one of Europe’s largest aquariums (not connected to the traveling dolphin shows). On her day off, we meet at a café near Red Square.She says she fell in love with dolphins in the late 1980s when she read a book by John Lilly, the American neuroscientist who broke open our understanding of the animals’ intelligence. She has spent 30 years training marine mammals to do tricks. But along the way she’s grown heartsick from forcing highly intelligent, social creatures to live isolated, barren lives in small tanks.“I would compare the dolphin situation with making a physicist sweep the street,” she says. “When they’re not engaged in performance or training, they just hang in the water facing down. It’s the deepest depression.”What people don’t know about many aquarium shows in Russia, Azovtseva says, is that the animals often die soon after being put in captivity, especially those in traveling shows. And Azovtseva—making clear she’s referring to the industry at large in Russia and not the Moskvarium—says she knows many aquariums quietly and illegally replace their animals with new ones.It’s been illegal to catch Black Sea dolphins in the wild for entertainment purposes since 2003, but according to Azovtseva, aquarium owners who want to increase their dolphin numbers quickly and cheaply buy dolphins poached there. Because these dolphins are acquired illegally, they’re missing the microchips that captive cetaceans in Russia are usually tagged with as a form of required identification.Some aquariums get around that, she says, by cutting out dead dolphins’ microchips and implanting them into replacement dolphins.“People are people,” Azovtseva says. “Once they see an opportunity, they exploit.” She says she can’t go on doing her work in the industry and that she’s decided to speak out because she wants people to know the truth about the origins and treatment of many of the marine mammals they love watching. We exchange a look—we both know what her words likely mean for her livelihood.“I don’t care if I’m fired,” she says defiantly. “When a person has nothing to lose, she becomes really brave.”I'm sitting on the edge of an infinity pool on the hilly Thai side of Thailand’s border with Myanmar, at a resort where rooms average more than a thousand dollars a night.Out past the pool, elephants roam in a lush valley. Sitting next to me is 20-year-old Stephanie, who asked not to use her last name. She’s Dutch and French, Tokyo born and raised, and a student at the University of Michigan. Her cosmopolitan background and pretty face make for a perfect cocktail of aspiration—she’s exactly the kind of Instagrammer who makes it as an influencer. That is, someone who has a large enough following to attract sponsors to underwrite posts and, in turn, travel, wardrobes, and bank accounts. In 2018, brands—fashion, travel, tech, and more—spent an estimated $1.6 billion on social media advertising by influencers.Stephanie has been here, at the Anantara Golden Triangle Elephant Camp & Resort, before. This time, in a fairly standard influencer-brand arrangement, she’ll have a picnic with elephants and post about it to her growing legion of more than 25,000 Instagram followers. In exchange, she gets hundreds of dollars off the nightly rate.At Anantara the fields are green, and during the day at least, many of the resort’s 22 elephants are tethered on ropes more than a hundred feet long so they can move around and socialize. Nevertheless, they’re expected to let guests touch them and do yoga beside them.After Stephanie's elephant picnic, I watch her edit the day’s hundreds of photos. She selects an image with her favorite elephant, Bo. She likes it, she says, because she felt a connection with Bo and thinks that will come across. She posts it at 9:30 p.m.—the time she estimates the largest number of her followers will be online. She includes a long caption, summing it up as “my love story with this incredible creature,” and the hashtag #stopelephantriding. Immediately, likes from followers stream in—more than a thousand, as well as comments with heart-eyed emoji.Anantara is out of reach for anyone but the wealthy—or prominent influencers. Anyone else seeking a similar experience might do a Google search for, say, “Thailand elephant sanctuary.”As tourist demand for ethical experiences with animals has grown, affordable establishments, often calling themselves “sanctuaries,” have cropped up purporting to offer humane, up-close elephant encounters. Bathing with elephants—tourists give them a mud bath, splash them in a river, or both—has become very popular. Many facilities portray baths as a benign alternative to elephant riding and performances. But elephants getting baths, like those that give rides and do tricks, will have been broken to some extent to make them obedient. And as long as bathing remains popular, places that offer it will need obedient elephants to keep their businesses going.In Ban Ta Klang, a tiny town in eastern Thailand, modest homes dot the crimson earth. In front of each is a wide, bamboo platform for sitting, sleeping, and watching television.But the first thing I notice is the elephants. Some homes have one, others as many as five. Elephants stand under tarps or sheet metal roofs or trees. Some are together, mothers and babies, but most are alone. Nearly all the elephants wear ankle chains or hobbles—cuffs binding their front legs together. Dogs and chickens weave among the elephants’ legs, sending up puffs of red dust.Ban Ta Klang—known as Elephant Village—is ground zero in Thailand for training and trading captive elephants.“House elephants,” Sri Somboon says, gesturing as he turns down his TV. Next to his outdoor platform, a two-month-old baby elephant runs around his mother. Somboon points across the road to the third elephant in his charge, a three-year-old male tethered to a tree. He’s wrenching his head back and forth and thrashing his trunk around. It looks as if he’s going out of his mind.He’s in the middle of his training, Somboon says, and is getting good at painting. He’s already been sold, and when his training is finished, he’ll start working at a tourist camp down south.Ban Ta Klang and the surrounding area, part of Surin Province, claim to be the source of more than half of Thailand’s 3,800 captive elephants. Long before the flood of tourists, it was the center of the elephant trade; the animals were caught in the wild and tamed for use transporting logs. Now, every November, hundreds of elephants from here are displayed, bought, and sold in the province’s main town, Surin.One evening I sit with Jakkrawan Homhual and Wanchai Sala-ngam. Both 33, they’ve been best friends since childhood. About half the people in Ban Ta Klang who care for elephants, including Homhual, don’t own them. They’re paid a modest salary by a rich owner to breed and train baby elephants for entertainment. As night falls, thousands of termites swarm us, attracted to the single bulb hanging above the bamboo platform. Our conversation turns to elephant training.Phajaan is the traditional—and brutal—days- or weeks-long process of breaking a young elephant’s spirit. It has long been used in Thailand and throughout Southeast Asia to tame wild elephants, which still account for many of the country’s captives. Under phajaan, elephants are bound with ropes, confined in tight wooden structures, starved, and beaten repeatedly with bullhooks, nails, and hammers until their will is crushed. The extent to which phajaan persists in its harshest form is unclear. Since 2012, the government has been cracking down on the illegal import of elephants taken from the forests of neighboring Myanmar, Thailand’s main source of wild-caught animals.I ask the men how baby elephants born in captivity are broken and trained.When a baby is about two years old, they say, mahouts tie its mother to a tree and slowly drag the baby away. Once separated, the baby is confined. Using a bullhook on its ear, they teach the baby to move: left, right, turn, stop. To teach an elephant to sit, Sala-ngam says, “we tie up the front legs. One mahout will use a bullhook at the back. The other will pull a rope on the front legs.” He adds: “To train the elephant, you need to use the bullhook so the elephant will know.”Humans identify suffering in other humans by universal signs: People sob, wince, cry out, put voice to their hurt. Animals have no universal language for pain. Many animals don’t have tear ducts. More creatures still—prey animals, for example—instinctively mask symptoms of pain, lest they appear weak to predators. Recognizing that a nonhuman animal is in pain is difficult, often impossible.But we know that animals feel pain. All mammals have a similar neuroanatomy. Birds, reptiles, and amphibians all have pain receptors. As recently as a decade ago, scientists had collected more evidence that fish feel pain than they had for neonatal infants. A four-year-old human child with spikes pressing into his flesh would express pain by screaming. A four-year-old elephant just stands there in the rain, her leg jerking in the air.Of all the silently suffering animals I saw in pools and pens around the world, two in particular haunt me: an elephant and a tiger.They lived in the same facility, Samut Prakan Crocodile Farm and Zoo, about 15 miles south of Bangkok. The elephant, Gluay Hom, four years old, was kept under a stadium. The aging tiger, Khai Khem, 22, spent his days on a short chain in a photo studio. Both had irrefutable signs of suffering: The emaciated elephant had a bent, swollen leg hanging in the air and a large, bleeding sore at his temple. His eyes were rolled back in his head. The tiger had a dental abscess so severe that the infection was eating through the bottom of his jaw.When I contacted the owner of the facility, Uthen Youngprapakorn, to ask about these animals, he said the fact that they hadn’t died proved that the facility was caring for them properly. He then threatened a lawsuit.Six months after Kirsten and I returned from Thailand, we asked Ryn Jirenuwat, our Bangkok-based Thai interpreter, to check on Gluay Hom and Khai Khem. She went to Samut Prakan and watched them for hours, sending photos and video. Gluay Hom was still alive, still standing in the same stall, leg still bent at an unnatural angle. The elephants next to him were skin and bones. Khai Khem was still chained by his neck to a hook in the floor. He just stays in his dark corner, Jirenuwat texted, and when he hears people coming, he twists on his chain and turns his back to them.“Like he just wants to be swallowed by the wall.”",
"In the Amazon, day trips that include wildlife interactions are increasingly popular, though they pose welfare and conservation concerns, advocates say. Here, tourists crowd in on a pink river dolphin outside Manaus, Brazil. The dolphin’s scratches are a result of battling with other dolphins for baitfish.Puerto Alegría, PeruOn a wooden platform in a tiny village on the longest river in the world, a giant anteater slurps pink yogurt from a plastic bucket as a man shoves a selfie stick in its face.A pair of blue macaws crunches on cheese puffs. A toucan nibbles a saltine cracker. Sixty tourists screech, squeal, and cackle as they paw at a menagerie of wild animals. Sloths cling to human necks. Monkeys scramble over heads and shoulders. On a bench two turtles strain for freedom under the weight of human hands.Tourists pose for photos with a caiman and a macaw in Puerto Alegría, Peru. Animals taken from the jungle are illegally kept in captivity to attract selfie-seeking tourists, but this kind of handling can be detrimental to their well-being.While animals are passed among the crowd, camera shutters click, and selfie sticks jut out at all angles. A woman holds a juvenile caiman, mouth agape, next to the head of her infant child. A teenage girl chatters as she wraps an anaconda around her torso, fodder for a selfie video.People throw tips in a bucket and head back down the platform stairs. They’ve had their fill, and manic excitement gives way to seeming indifference.Spend days, even weeks, in the Amazon jungle and you may, if you’re lucky, see a wild sloth inching up a tree or catch the glow of a caiman’s eyes on the river at night. But coming face-to-face with any one of these animals is unlikely. All of them? Impossible.Yet here atop this rickety platform on stilts along the banks of the Peruvian Amazon, such an experience is assured. This is a one-stop wildlife shop.A man poses with a giant anteater, which had been eating pink yogurt. Many of the creatures at these tourist spots are fed foods that compromise their health.Sloths are popular animals on “selfie safari” excursions. While they appear to “hug” people back, they’re really treating the body like a trunk of a tree.A couple feeds a macaw a sugary street snack. Puerto Alegríans sell food to tourists, but much ends up in the mouths of captive animals.Puerto Alegría, a town with just 600 families, sits in a sun-drenched spot on the Amazon called Tres Fronteras—the Triple Frontier—where Peru, Colombia, and Brazil meet. Every day hundreds of tourists, mostly from the Colombian side of the river, arrive by boat, walk up wooden planks from the water to the shore, and clamor to hold and take photos with as many as a hundred captive wild animals of two dozen species.The influx is an economic boon for Puerto Alegríans, at the ready with snacks and sodas, baskets for tips, and canteen shops filled with local crafts.Wildlife tourism is big business, likely accounting for 20 to 40 percent of the global tourism industry’s annual value of $1.5 trillion, according to the World Tourism Organization.Conservation and animal welfare groups agree that when an activity involving wildlife crosses the line from observation to interaction, it’s bad for the animals. In Southeast Asia riding elephants and petting captive tiger cubs, for instance, have drawn attention to the dark side of wildlife tourism.Tourism in the Amazon is still in its infancy. In the huge Brazilian state of Amazonas, it accounts for just one percent of GDP. But prospering economies in Latin America and easier access through more frequent, affordable international flights mean that tourism—especially wildlife tourism—may be poised to explode.The Amazon harbors more than 10 percent of the planet’s biodiversity—400 species of mammals, 200 species of reptiles, and 1,300 species of birds. Tourists generally have two options for experiencing this bounty: the authentic way or the quick way. To see the raw, wild Amazon, people typically embark on a jungle excursion that lasts at least three or four days and can cost hundreds of dollars. For travelers short on time and money, the alternative is a day tour. Offered by dozens of travel agencies in each port town, most of these hit several spots in one day, providing a quick taste of the jungle.What’s happening in Puerto Alegría is emblematic of a larger reality. In port towns throughout the region, local people snatch wild animals from the forest, keep them in cages, and haul them out by day for tourists to photograph and hold in exchange for tips.A squirrel monkey toys with a necklace in a Puerto Alegría shop. While captive animals are the primary tourist draw for the town, Peruvian handicrafts bring in most of the money.In September 2016 researchers with the U.K.-based nonprofit World Animal Protection began a six-month investigation into animal tourism operations in Puerto Alegría and Manaus, a major Amazon port city in Brazil. The findings are documented in a report on their website and in an article published today by the online journal Nature Conservation.In both places the researchers saw local people mistreating animals, putting their health and welfare at risk. They observed handlers gripping snakes tightly by the neck and clamping caimans’ jaws shut with rubber bands. In Puerto Alegría, investigators saw a caiman caged in a broken refrigerator, a manatee languishing in a kiddie pool, and one resident striking an anteater in the face.The effects on sloths are particularly severe. These docile, delicate animals sleep up to 20 hours a day in the wild, and the stress caused by repeated handling by hyperactive tourists can be very damaging, says biologist Neil D’Cruze, head of policy at World Animal Protection and lead author of the report. Monique Pool, a sloth specialist with the International Union for Conservation of Nature and director of the Green Heritage Fund Suriname, says that when sloths are handled by strangers, their hearts beat extremely fast, which can lead to their premature death.Brazilian and Colombian laws are clear: It’s illegal to remove any animal from the wild to keep as a pet, and it’s illegal to keep a wild animal captive without a license. In Peru it’s illegal to make money from a captive wild animal. But the laws are not always enforced, especially on the Peru side of the river. Puerto Alegríans keeping wild animals in captivity, for example, have never been the object of a raid by wildlife authorities. Peru's wildlife agency did not respond to requests for comment.Corpoamazonia, the Leticia-based Colombian governmental agency in charge of environmental protection, is aware of the exploitation of wild animals across the Peruvian border in Puerto Alegría, says Yamile Negeteye Silva. An administrator with the Amazonas division of Corpoamazonia, Silva believes some of the animals are brought to Peru from Colombia. “The river makes it easier to smuggle,” because there are virtually no border controls on the Amazon in Tres Fronteras. But the Colombian agency can’t intervene, even though the tourists mainly come from Colombia, because Puerto Alegría is in Peru.Larisa Campos is eight years old. Bright-eyed and smiley, she carries a clutch of neon schoolbooks and pencils under one arm. In the other she holds a sloth. A group of tourists has just left the platform at Puerto Alegría, and residents are gathering up their animals and heading home.The sloth is still a baby, Larisa says, and he sleeps in a little house in the trees. Like everyone else in her town, Larisa lives in a modest wooden home built on high stilts to avoid rising waters during the rainy season.Larisa Campos, 8, holds a sloth in one arm and her schoolbooks in the other as she greets her neighbor’s parrots in Puerto Alegría. Her family earns extra income by offering the sloth as a photo prop.A sloth stares out of a dark cage, found under a house in Puerto Alegría. Sloths suffer when kept for the tourist trade, given their need for up to 20 hours of sleep a day.At Larisa’s home I speak to her aunt, who’s relaxing in a hammock under the house. Like many others in the village, their family fishes for a living, she says. The sloth earns the family a bit of extra money from tourists. She too says he sleeps up in the trees; every morning, in her telling, the family calls for the sloth, and he moseys down the tree for breakfast.D’Cruze says this is unlikely. It’s common, he says, for residents who keep captive animals to engage in “greenwashing”—telling reassuring stories to put a skeptical tourist’s mind at ease.One thing about houses on stilts is that they add a whole new structural dimension: a place to string hammocks for lounging, store old furniture, stack cords of firewood—and stash cages for animals.Leaving Larisa’s house, I follow chittering monkeys down the road, across a wooden bridge, and between a row of houses on stilts. Under one, in the shadows, sits a wooden cage. An animal is moving inside. I see the glint of humanlike eyes in the darkness. Claws—three on each paw—curl around wooden slats. A sloth. The cage is stark and pitch-black.Among the many visitors I spoke to in Puerto Alegría, Manaus, and Leticia, or in transit on the river, almost all said they’d prefer to experience the jungle in as natural a way as possible but that day tours afford the opportunity to see many things in a short time.Alejandro Diaz snaps a selfie on Isla de los Micos, or Monkey Island, in Colombia. Behind him are people from the Colombian port town of Leticia, who dress up in traditional garb and pose with tourists.Alejandra Giraldo, from Cali, Colombia, said she enjoyed visiting Puerto Alegría to grasp how the people live and to get a chance to hold and observe wild animals. But, she added, she found it troubling to see a toucan with its tail feathers cut. “I imagine the community does it so that it can't escape.” She paused. “Honestly, in my heart I know it's bad because they should be in nature.”Others I spoke to admitted that although something about their tour didn’t feel quite right, the animals seem to be treated well enough on the visiting platform. Some also said they had no idea how the animals are kept the rest of the time.That’s a big part of the problem, D’Cruze says: Tourists have such a brief window into these activities. They come for an hour, take photos, and then go home. Wild animals don’t express hurt the way humans do, so “the suffering simply may not register,” he says. Because of this, he says, it’s unrealistic to expect tourists to be able to identify welfare problems, especially when a local tour guide is sanctioning or encouraging the activity.According to D’Cruze, the idea that this is a once-in-a-lifetime “when in Rome” chance helps suppress any nagging worries people might have. It just “takes someone with a polo shirt and a logo to say, ‘Yeah, yeah, everything's fine, don’t worry about it.’ And you say, ‘Oh, OK, I've just let all my apprehensions go.’”Social media, such as Instagram and Facebook, adds another dimension. Renata Ilha, a Manaus-based investigator with World Animal Protection, says tourists want to share photos of their exotic experiences—hugging a sloth or being wrapped in an anaconda. “You don’t just want to be adventurous,” she says. “You want to be adventurous and show the world that you're adventurous.” Every time people share these photos on social media, they advertise an activity that on the surface looks harmless to their network of followers.A spokesperson says Instagram has begun working with animal welfare experts and is looking at ways to inform its community about activities that can be harmful to animals, “such as posting content that may depict exploitation of wildlife and bad welfare practices.”Monkeys pile on Melissa Moreno, from Bogotá, during a visit to Monkey Island. The animals, which are not native to the island, were brought here as a tourist attraction.Alejandra Giraldo and her boyfriend Carlos Leon, from Cali, Colombia, visit Monkey Island as part of a tour package offered by an On Vacation Amazon resort. On Vacation is one of the area’s biggest tour companies, offering wildlife day trips.Maria Luisa Amaya, 7, from Bogotá, Colombia, squeals as a squirrel monkey hops off her head. The monkeys have become habituated to humans.On Vacation Amazon is a sprawling, all-inclusive resort about a 20-minute boat ride downriver from Leticia. It’s in the middle of nowhere, without any real competition. One of 25 resorts throughout Colombia run by the On Vacation hotel chain, it attracts some 2,000 guests a month, mostly Colombians looking to get a feel for the jungle without having to rough it.Hotel guests cool off in the pool at On Vacation Amazon resort on the Colombian side of the Amazon River. The resort hosts around 2,000 guests a month, mostly Colombians, and offers day tours to Puerto Alegría and Monkey Island.On Vacation Amazon's day trips are managed by a contractor called Selvatour, under the direction of Octavio Benjumea, who says the company has brought up to 150 guests to Puerto Alegría every day—the majority of the town’s visitors—since it opened six years ago.He acknowledges that the animals are often in terrible shape. “Their fur falls out, they eat human food, and they're dying,” he says.On August 8, when we spoke, Benjumea said that On Vacation Amazon had just told the Puerto Alegríans that if they didn’t stop showing animals within 30 days, the day tours would end. An On Vacation spokesperson says the company stopped offering tours to Puerto Alegría in early September and that any guests still going there are booking through other tour agencies. During the past month, however, On Vacation Amazon guests have posted selfies with captive animals on Instagram, geotagging Puerto Alegría and the hotel itself in consecutive photos.On Vacation is not alone. Between September 2016 and February 2017, World Animal Protection found that 18 major tour agencies in Manaus—a city of two million people at the confluence of the Rio Negro and the Amazon—were ferrying tourists to a rural enclave on the Rio Negro called Januari Ecological Park. More a tiny community than a conventional park, Januari is home to a dozen families who rely on tourism to make a living.On the shore of the Amazon in Leticia, people haul in bushels of plantains. Fishing, farming, and tourism are the primary industries for people living in Tres Fronteras.Here the researchers saw caimans with their mouths bound shut and sloths tied to trees. The sloths they saw in Januari at the start of the investigation were replaced by new ones within months. D’Cruze says the first sloths had probably died.Everything about three-toed sloths’ biology, behavior, and appearance makes it very hard for the average person to recognize when they’re suffering, D’Cruze says. They don’t thrash out or try to bite people holding them. “You combine that with the fact that they look like they're smiling, and people project onto them the fact that they want a hug. And that’s a killer combination. Literally."In November 2016, IBAMA, Brazil’s federal environmental agency, fined six large tour companies a total of $425,000 for bringing tourists to interact with captive wild animals in Januari Ecological Park. In one raid, agents confiscated a juvenile sloth, two anacondas, a boa constrictor, and a caiman. They returned the reptiles to the wild and brought the sloth, too young to survive on its own in the forest, to IBAMA’s wild animal rehabilitation center in Manaus.After its owner posted a photo of it on Facebook, Brazilian wildlife officials seized the toucan and took it to its rescue and rehabilitation center in Manaus. It’s illegal in Brazil to keep wild animals as pets.This monkey was being kept illegally as a pet until Brazilian wildlife officials seized it. More animals need rehabilitation than this facility, the only one in Manaus, can accommodate.José Leland Barroso, chief inspector at IBAMA, says rescued animals can exhibit lasting trauma from their time in captivity. Snakes are often blind from camera flashes, he says. Snakes, unlike sloths, can be easily returned to the wild, “but if the snake is blind, it’s going to die of starvation at some point,” he says. He also says that the perpetrators typically just go out and catch new animals. “So we stopped confiscating the animals because we were shooting ourselves in the foot.”But IBAMA’s raids have had effect. As of July some of the largest Manaus-based tour companies, such as Amazon Explorers and Amazon Day Tours, have stopped bringing tour groups to handle captive animals at Januari.A baby coati, orphaned in the wild, nips at the hand of his keeper in the rescue facility in Manaus. He’ll have to remain in captivity, as he’s too young—and too used to people—to survive in the wild.A baby sloth sleeps at the rescue center, snuggled up to a teddy bear for comfort and a chilled water bottle to keep him cool. Found abandoned in the wild, his mother may have been killed or stolen.A parrot surveys its surroundings at the rescue center. Most birds can be released back into the wild once rehabilitated.Pink river dolphins, called botos in Spanish and Portuguese, are native to the waters of the Rio Negro. Photos of them are plastered all over tourism advertisements for Manaus. Swimming with dolphins is touted as the highlight of day-tour offerings.When our tour boat pulls up to a floating dock in an inlet on the Rio Negro, a family of five local villagers is expecting us—and so are two pink dolphins already lured in with baitfish. Not quite pink, but grayish, the dolphins bob, mouths open, waiting for a snack. Because of the curve of their mouths, they seem to be smiling.The eight tourists on my boat are giddy. They strap on life jackets, hop in the water, and surround the dolphins in a tight semicircle.The handler dangles a fish above a dolphin’s mouth, pulling it away every time the animal tries to grab it. As the dolphin lifts itself out of the water, I see its badly scratched body. Our tour guide, Francisco Alvis, says these battle scars are common, the result of males fighting each other in a free-for-all for handlers’ treats. People squeal when their feet brush up against the dolphin’s body.A posted sign tells tourists not to touch the dolphins, but every person in the water pets them repeatedly. No one tells the tourists to stop.Such interactions are unsafe for both people and dolphins, says Vera da Silva, chief researcher at the Aquatic Mammals Laboratory, at the National Institute of Amazonian Research, in Manaus. The dolphins can weigh up to 400 pounds, swim fast, and dive deep. “Any accident,” da Silva says, can give handlers “reason to kill or repel them.” She says there’s also potential for diseases to be transmitted, from animal to human and vice versa.No official regulations are in place, but legislation has been drafted that would ban tourists from feeding and touching the dolphins—and from entering the water at all. But new rules alone won’t solve the problem, D’Cruze says. Education is needed too. Many involved in the tourism industry have no understanding of animal welfare.João Araújo, director of tourism for the city of Manaus, encourages swimming with dolphins if regulations are met. When I asked if he has concerns about the dolphins’ welfare, he said only that they aren’t aggressive so aren’t a danger to people.As for the captive sloths, caimans, and anacondas being used in the Manaus area, Araujo said that though he discourages handling of these animals, he wasn’t even aware that it’s illegal.Luis Humberto Coello da Silva, who goes by Belo (“beautiful” in Portuguese) is 74. He has 18 children and dozens of grandkids. When I meet him, he’s sitting in a rocking chair on his rickety dock in a secluded enclave on the Rio Negro just outside Januari Ecological Park, where he’s lived his entire life.Making ends meet is a challenge for people living in river communities on the Amazon, especially those of mixed European and indigenous ancestry—caboclos—like da Silva. Unlike the indigenous tribes who can offer tourists “authentic” experiences by virtue of their cultural traditions—their garb and ceremonies and thatched jungle homes—caboclos must find other ways to make some money.As his little dog Pipoca (Portuguese for “popcorn”) hops around his feet, da Silva reminisces about his brushes with stardom: The Jennifer Lopez movie Anaconda was filmed on his property, he says, as were several wildlife programs. He’s been approached to star in various shows himself, he claims.A guest with Amazon Day Tours poses with a young indigenous girl and her captive sloth at a village near Manaus.The girl takes a break from posing for photos with tourists. Day tours often stop at indigenous communities on the Rio Negro, where people perform traditional dances for tourists.For 50 years he’s been welcoming tourists to his home. He once had a macaw named Burguette, who, he says, loved to drink Coca-Cola. And a caiman named Baú, which supposedly would come when da Silva called his name.IBAMA agents confiscated them both and gave them to a zoo in Manaus. Da Silva says the only animals he has now are his fish, Juan and Juanita. They’re pirarucus, a famous Manaus breed, which grow to nearly 10 feet long. He keeps them in a concrete tank and lets tourists feed them for a small fee. They’ve been in this tank for 18 years, he says.He says he’s never had any other animals but is quick to point out just how easy it is to catch them. Snakes can be snatched in fishing nets, and caimans are easy to grab by hand if they’re less than about four feet long. “When it’s bigger, you have to tie it up. That’s how I captured Baú.”It’s also easy to catch three-toed sloths, he says, because they’re slow and docile. But he denies he’s ever kept sloths himself.According to Ilha, of World Animal Protection, da Silva is one of a handful of local people in the Januari park who keep captive animals for selfie tourism. She says she’s seen sloths at his place as recently as late June. On one occasion, she says, she saw a sloth escaping from a dark shed next to da Silva’s house. The sloth was squeaking. “It’s so rare to see this because they only make noise when they’re very stressed,” Ilha says, adding that one of da Silva’s daughters spotted the sloth, yanked it by a limb, and threw it back into the shed.At Januari Ecological Park, a wild sloth and her baby cling to a vine. Biologist Neil D’Cruze says keeping sloths in captivity to interact with tourists amounts to a “death sentence.”Ilha says she’s been trying to persuade da Silva to find other ways to make money from visitors, by offering bird-watching opportunities, for instance, but “he’s stuck on the idea of getting another caiman.”Alcimar Oliveira, 29, lives just downriver from da Silva. A small tour boat is tethered to his dock, and half a dozen tourists are passing a sloth around. Oliveira grips a boa constrictor by the neck as he stretches it out on the wooden dock for a tourist to photograph. Another man slaps the boa’s tail repeatedly on the ground. The snake reflexively curls it up each time.“It’s only me and Belo who have the animals now,” Oliveira says.Oliveira says the big tour agencies haven’t come as much recently because of IBAMA’s raids, but the smaller groups still come regularly. The animals are the draw, but it’s his handicrafts —indigenous masks and carved wooden animal figurines—that account for most of the $250 he makes a month.“Without the animals, no one would come here,” he says. He’d have to move to Manaus, where his crafts would look the same as everyone else’s and he’d have to pay high rent for a display table. “People from other places don’t understand how our life works, so they say bad things about us.” Oliveira complains that IBAMA often sends in agents from São Paulo or Rio de Janeiro. “They don’t know our reality,” he says.“People who are born in the community should stay here,” da Silva says. “The caboclo lives a better life in the jungle. He can build a house, raise chickens, eat fish, grow a plantation field, and live a good life.”Life in Manaus runs on the Rio Negro and the Amazon: The rivers are the people’s food source, highways, and lifelines to the rest of the world.In Colombia, just downstream and across the river from Puerto Alegría, some people have figured out how to thrive by helping animals instead of harming them.When you arrive at Mocagua, an indigenous settlement of about 650 people, you could just as easily be in Puerto Alegría: same muddy riverbanks, same rickety wooden gangplanks, same language. The Mocaguans used to hunt yellow woolly monkeys so intensely for their meat that the species nearly went extinct here.But in 2004 the Mocaguans and people in surrounding communities voluntarily agreed to stop hunting the endangered species, in partnership with the newly formed Maikuchiga Foundation and its founder, the Colombia-based primate biologist Sara Bennett. Maikuchiga, a towering wooden structure in the jungle behind Mocagua, is the first and only rehabilitation center for rescued monkeys in Colombia.Rodolfo Obregón photographs his wife, Luz Adriana Obregón, at the Maikuchiga Foundation in Mocagua, Colombia. Maikuchiga is a monkey rehabilitation facility that allows no more than six tourists to visit at a time.Gradually former hunters became guides, using their expertise on the monkeys’ behavior to inform visitors. People painted their homes with colorful portraits of wild animals, and a few modest guesthouses opened. Every visitor to Mocagua pays two dollars to the local co-op fund. The money is used for community improvement projects.Maikuchiga is now rehabilitating eight monkeys, brought here by Corpoamazonia, Colombia’s environmental protection agency, and by local people who rescued the animals from the pet trade or from poachers.Leoncio Sanchez Bolivar, born and raised in Mocagua, has handled all operations at the center since the beginning. He says the center once took in a sick monkey from Puerto Alegría, but she died after having seizures, which he believes were triggered by malnutrition.Maikuchiga charges $40 for a group of up to six visitors and depends on volunteers—often tourists who want a meaningful Amazonian experience—to help with day-to-day operations.The center is struggling financially, but Sanchez Bolivar doesn’t want to open it up to big tour operations like On Vacation. He sees them as complicit in allowing places like Puerto Alegría to thrive.At Maikuchiga, rescued pet monkeys explore their temporary home in the jungle. Once healthy, they will be returned to the wild. The facility relies on volunteers, who sleep in the monkey house.Maikuchiga displays primate skulls found in the jungle, as a reminder that local people in the area once hunted monkeys for food, nearly to extinction. Former hunters work as guides at Maikuchiga.Every home in Mocagua is painted with a colorful depiction of native wildlife, in this case an iguana.“It would be great to expand from here and offer help to other communities that need it,” he says, adding that a key is making an effort to understand the specific circumstances of each place. World Animal Protection’s Renata Ilha agrees. “It’s important to find what’s right for these people, this community, this place,” she says.But the onus is also on the tourists themselves, she says. Although IBAMA’s raids have seen a decrease in hands-on activities in Januari, as long as people in the Amazon continue to seek “fast-food tourism,” animals are likely to suffer.Mocagua isn’t the only place working to offer tourists a natural taste of the Amazon for a modest fee. In Manaus, there’s an option that doesn’t even require people to leave the city.Museu da Amazonia is a roughly 25-acre patch of jungle—part of the much larger Adolfo Ducke Forest Reserve—right on the edge of the city. Visitors can take a taxi there, pay $10, and immediately be swept into pristine rain forest.Here you might see a wild animal, or you might not. Heading in with my field guide Marina Souza, I feel as if I've been transported into the Amazon of a Percy Fawcett memoir.It’s dusk, and we arrive at a clearing where a giant steel staircase shoots up into the trees. We start to climb. The frogs are deafening. We pass hanging vines, and ferns, and treetops, which give way to taller trees. We continue up, legs burning, frogs screaming. I’m in disbelief that trees can possibly be this tall.Eventually 500-year-old trunks give way to leafy tops, and then, all of a sudden, treetops give way to sunbeams. We’re above the canopy, on a platform with a 360-degree view of the Amazon rain forest. Look out beyond the canopy, and there’s Manaus, smoke billowing from stacks, fading into the orange sky. Beyond that, the Rio Negro. What’s across the river? I ask Marina. “Nothing,” she says. Just jungle. I snap a selfie. I want to remember this moment.A steel tower in the Museu da Amazonia reserve offers visitors a soaring view of the rain forest without their needing to leave Manaus.",
"Every year travelers span the world for the opportunity to observe wildlife in natural habitats. From seals swimming through the icy-cold depths of Antarctic waters to orangutans found deep in Borneo's jungles, awe-inspiring moments reveal themselves to those seeking to connect with the nature and all its inhabitants.Immerse yourself in this gallery of entries to the 2019 National Geographic Travel Photo Contest and experience the magic captured by photographers—encapsulating their unique and moving wildlife travel experiences.",
"A polar bear and her three-month-old cubs hunker among white spruce in Canada’s Wapusk National Park.Originally supported—at least in the United States—by hunting enthusiasts eager to safeguard big game, parks have a longstanding connection to wildlife preservation. Today, wildlife tourists are becoming more mindful than ever of the balance between enjoying the parks they support and keeping a healthy distance from wild animals. Check out these 10 parks in the U.S. and Canada where you can find some of the best wildlife encounters.America’s version of the Serengeti Plains features an array of large mammals, from apex predators like the grizzly bear and wolf to herbivorous herds of bison, elk, and pronghorn antelope. The Lamar Valley is renowned for some of the park’s best wildlife viewing, especially in winter when many of the animals take shelter in the snowy vale.The rich underwater feeding grounds at the confluence of the Saguenay and St. Lawrence Rivers in Quebec attract a broad range of marine mammals, including 10 types of whale, as well as seals, sharks, porpoises, and more than 300 bird species. Kayak trips and scenic boat cruises along the Saguenay Fjord are the ideal way to view them.Florida’s “river of grass” is renowned for its alligators, but the vast park is home to many other creatures: West Indian manatees, a subspecies of the mountain lion called the Florida panther, four different species of sea turtle, and the very rare American crocodile. Feathered friends also thrive in the wetlands, with more than 360 species on the park’s bird list.A great egret takes flight in Florida’s Everglades National Park.The world’s third longest barrier reef is a giant living thing all on its own. Biscayne and Dry Tortugas national parks, plus Pennekamp Coral Reef State Park, offer pristine coral gardens where snorkelers and scuba divers can mingle with tropical fish, sea turtles, and other denizens of the deep (just remember to keep a healthy distance). The Keys also boast great bird watching.More than 400 different bird species have been recorded in this feather-friendly Texas Gulf Coast refuge. Among the other creatures that dwell in its four distinct ecosystems are sea turtles, manatees, alligators, peccaries, coyotes, and bobcats.A version of this article was originally published in the book 100 Parks, 5,000 Ideas, which includes other great park suggestions.One of the places that saved the American bison from extinction, this Oklahoma reserve’s mix of shortgrass prairie and red-rock canyons shelters a vast array of animals viewed from roads and trails. They range in size from huge buffalo, Rocky Mountain elk, and feral longhorn cattle to the black-tailed prairie dogs that inhabit several “towns” in the park.Set along the shores of the Hudson Bay in northern Manitoba, Wapusk is considered the best place on the planet to observe and photograph polar bears in the wild. Peak viewing times are the fall migration back into the sea ice and midwinter when mother bears emerge from their dens with cubs. Thousands of beluga whales congregate offshore in the summer.Astride the migration route of humpbacks, orcas, and gray whales and home at any one time to 30,000 seals and sea lions, the Southern California archipelago is renowned for marine mammals. There are also copious birdlife and rare land creatures like the island fox, island spotted skunk, and island deer mouse.A pair of Japanese macaques escapes the cold winter weather in a hot spring.Alaska’s giant national park harbors a vast array of typical northern latitude creatures. Brown bears, caribou, Dall sheep, mountain goats, and moose are the “big five” terrestrial animals, while humpback whales, orcas, sea lions, harbor seals, and porpoises inhabit Icy Bay and other parklands along the Gulf of Alaska.One of the great spectacles of North American wildlife takes place at Katmai each summer: dozens of brown bears (aka grizzlies) fishing for spawning salmon in the Brooks River. The huge Alaska park is also home to scores of inland and coastal bird species and 42 different mammals including the gray wolf, sea otter, and humpback whale.",
"A black bear rears up amongst people at Yellowstone National Park. Though less aggressive than grizzlies, black bears are more populous and likely to scavenge, putting them in close proximity to humans.It seems self-evident that bears, charismatic and thoroughly photogenic though they may be, are also 500-pound apex predators from which humans should keep a healthy distance.But from these vintage pictures to a recent viral video of a woman standing still as a black bear sniffs her hair, it’s clear the lesson can be slow to take hold.Summer—already the busiest season for U.S. national parks—has seen some places slammed with tourists eager to return to the outdoors after coronavirus lockdowns. Lax adherence to face mask and social distancing policies is one problem. But overcrowding is also bringing people into closer contact with wildlife. While some encounters may be accidental, others are the result of deliberate interference, as in the case of a 72-year-old woman gored by a bison at Yellowstone National Park after repeatedly approaching it—the second such incident since the park reopened in May.(Related: Here’s how to visit national parks safely.)It’s unclear whether the latest viral video, filmed in northern Mexico’s Chipinque Ecological Park, documents the result of inappropriate encroachment by humans or simply hikers trying to react to a bear’s sudden appearance. But there are plenty of ways to stay safe around wild animals that don’t involve pausing for a selfie. So why, despite decades of incidents, don’t we steer clear of bears?For about 50 years after the 1916 inception of the National Park Service (NPS), park visitors took advantage of lax rules and laxer enforcement to get up close and personal with the bears who called those parks home.“Rangers would sort of look the other way,” says John Waller, supervisory wildlife biologist at Glacier National Park. “Up until the 1960s, it was part and parcel of the National Parks experience to see the panhandling black bears along the roads. But a lot of people got hurt.”As early as the 1930s, NPS knew the dangers of feeding wildlife. Why did the service permit risky behavior?Then as now, NPS encouraged visitors to get excited about embracing the great outdoors, says Rae Wynn-Grant, a carnivore ecologist and visiting scientist at the American Museum of Natural History. In the early years, “one of the ways they did that was sensationalizing interactions with wildlife, in particular wildlife that gives a shock value”—that is, bears, she says.(Related: Meet the spirit bears of the Pacific Northwest.)Visitors would sometimes go as far as deliberately dumping food waste, then climbing onto chalet roofs to wait, cameras in hand, for the baited bruins to appear.For black bears, whose acute sense of smell can sniff out supper from over a mile away, it was easy pickings. Both more populous and more apt to scavenge than their grizzly cousins, black bears were the ones most likely to come across park visitors.But grizzlies were the ones to sound the wake-up call. In 1967, two hikers were mauled to death in separate incidents in Glacier National Park during the “Night of the Grizzlies.” The well-publicized deaths led to swift policy change at NPS, and while enforcement took a while to catch on, bear-related injuries and fatalities in national parks have plummeted since the 1990s.(Related: What do you do with a bear that kills a person?)In fact, though Yellowstone Park has the second most bear-related deaths since 1900, you’re more likely to be killed by an asteroid than injured by a Yellowstone grizzly.Before European colonization, black bears’ range blanketed North America from the Southwestern deserts to Washington, D.C. The great diversity in indigenous cultures led to unique tribal relationships with the animals, from subsistence hunting to spiritual reverence; overall, humans’ use was sustainable.But European colonizers decimated bear populations, wiping out their forest habitat for agricultural use or killing them outright as dangerous pests. Not until the early 20th century was there an effort to protect natural lands and the bears that lived in them—a conservation movement begun by hunters, like Teddy Roosevelt, who wanted the animals available for sport.(Related: Should we kill animals to save them?)Since then, “we’ve kind of developed a compassion for them culturally,” says Wynn-Grant. “They’re part of kids’ stories; they’re always the good guy; they have families. We like them.”But our love for bears does them no favors. Bears that associate humans with food will never forget that association, and will very likely die because of it—whether being struck by vehicles as they forage in developed areas, or euthanized by state wildlife authorities because their behavior puts humans at risk.“You can’t humanize bears. I think that’s one of the things that leads people astray,” says Waller. “People look at bears as some surrogate or mirror of some kind of need that they have. Really, bears have pretty tough lives, and one of the things they don’t need is close relationships with people.”As an NPS wildlife manager, Waller’s job includes aversive conditioning, a way of teaching bears to associate humans with discomfort rather than food. When bears venture out of the backcountry into park campgrounds or other places people frequent, rangers use an escalating series of tactics to scare them away: If the rangers’ siren-blasting presence doesn’t do the job, they’ll shoot bears with bean bags or paintballs.(Read more about the difficulties of rehabbing problem bears.)Although it’s difficult for bears to live safely in a human-dominated environment, humans play an important role in bear conservation.“Sometimes people think, ‘Oh, this bear is hungry, it needs me to provide it with food!’ But that’s an inappropriate and irresponsible way to deal with that problem,” says Wynn-Grant. “Keeping them wild and in the back country is what we recommend.”Or as Waller says: “Just give ’em space.”Store food in bear-safe containers. Coolers don’t cut it in bear country, Waller says, and sometimes vehicles won’t do either: Yellowstone has seen bears rip off car doors to get at the food inside.Dispose of trash properly. Many parks have pack-in-pack-out policies; contact your park’s office to learn their specific rules and see what storage facilities they may have on site. Wynn-Grant’s research has found that use of bear-proof garbage cans is the best mitigation strategy to keep both bears and humans safe.Make some noise. Most incidents result when surprised bears react in self-defense. When hiking in bear country, sing, holler, or clap regularly to announce your presence and give bears a chance to steer clear.Do not feed ANY wildlife. Seriously, just don’t.Be big, be loud, and back away. If you have a jacket, hold it spread over your head to make yourself seem more intimidating. Then, speaking loudly in a low, resonant voice, back away slowly. Don’t run or make direct eye contact, as those are behaviors bears associate with prey.Use bear spray. Both Waller and Wynn-Grant point to bear spray as one of the biggest factors in reducing bear-caused fatalities. If a bear becomes aggressive, spray it with steady, sweeping blows as if putting out a fire.Fight back—or don’t. If a black bear attacks you, fight back, trying to land a blow on its nose, says Wynn-Grant. But if it’s a grizzly, don’t even try: All you can do is curl into a ball, protect your neck, and play dead.",
"On Memorial Day this year, visitors waited for sunrise at the Grand Canyon’s South Rim. The park, one of America’s most visited, has begun a phased reopening after closing to slow the spread of coronavirus.National parks in the United States have faced months of uncertainty during the coronavirus pandemic. March saw park fees waived to encourage visitors, a decision that courted controversy. April brought reports of vandalism at parks that remained open. Closing parks entirely created new problems by leaving neighboring, tourism-dependent towns in the lurch.Now, as state lockdowns ease, some national parks are beginning to welcome visitors again. Here’s a guide for finding out which ones are open and how to visit them safely.It depends. For the best information, check the official site of the park you intend to visit. You can search for parks by state, or scan the National Park Service’s central coronavirus resource for a list of the most recent changes to access, hours, and services at all 419 NPS units. National Parks Traveler, a nonprofit publication, also keeps an updated list of what’s open.(Related: Summer at America’s national parks kicks off with long lines and crowded trails.)Park openings have been fraught with the same inconsistencies that hampered their closures. At an April 22 press conference, President Donald Trump announced that parks would be reopening but offered no timeline or plan of action. Interior Secretary David Bernhardt, whose administration oversees the National Park Service, soon tweeted his commitment to “working with governors and local public health officials to gradually reopen our National Parks in a safe manner.”The current plan, as announced online on May 19 by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), is to open national parks on a case-by-case basis.Stay close to home. The CDC instructs people to avoid long-distance travel. To locate NPS-administered areas near you, visit Find Your Park, which lists experiences near forests, rivers, and monuments as well as national parks. A search function tailors results to your interests and zip code.Plan before you go. “Open” might not really mean, well, open. Be prepared to encounter reduced hours, off-limits areas, and limited or shuttered services (including restrooms)—especially since many park functions are managed by private concessioners who may be reopening on a different timeline than that of the park itself. To be prepared, plan to pack in your own food and other necessities.Steer clear of groups. Memorial Day crowds slammed parks from Yellowstone to Zion, creating unsafe conditions for visitors and workers alike. Social distancing guidelines apply in the outdoors, too—especially when safety procedures vary from park to park. Make way on trails and avoid crowded spots in order to stay six feet apart from others, and wear a mask where necessary.One of the most photographed views in Zion National Park, and perhaps all of the parks, is the view of the Watchman from the Canyon Junction Bridge. Although it has been shot endless times, and you are sure to be shoulder to shoulder with other photographers during sunset, it is still something everyone must do when visiting the park. My favorite spot is right at the center of the bridge where the river leads the eye to the Watchman in the background.",
"Eager crowds typically pack biking trails in Moab, Utah. But as parks struggle to prevent the spread of coronavirus, Utah officials are closing local businesses and campgrounds, asking travelers to stay away.Three days of rejuvenation in Canyonlands National Park seemed the perfect bridge from winter to summer. But like so many other spring break national park escapes, our plans to pitch tents in the Needles Campground next week were undone by coronavirus.Confusion about whether it’s safe to social distance at national parks was heightened by U.S. Interior Secretary David Bernhardt’s announcement Wednesday that park fees would be waived. The decision to waive park fees and encourage Americans to head to the great outdoors runs contrary to ongoing closures, public concerns—and to official White House guidance instructing that all gatherings of 10 or more people be canceled.Bernhardt’s message drew condemnation from the National Parks Conservation Association and the Coalition to Protect America’s National Parks, where Phil Francis highlighted concerns about the virus’ contagiousness.“It is irresponsible to urge people to visit national park sites when gathering at other public spaces is no longer considered safe,” Francis said. “We are concerned that the Secretary’s decision to waive entrance fees will lead to overcrowding and a greater risk to the health and well-being of our NPS employees and visitors.”The cherry blossoms in Washington, D.C., usually draw thick crowds. During the coronavirus pandemic, the CDC encourages people to practice safe social distancing.Options are quickly dwindling for a relaxing getaway within the National Park System. Though many NPS units remain open, facility and service closures are stacking up across the country, from Hawaii’s Pearl Harbor National Memorial (closed) to Virgin Islands National Park (the Cruz Bay Visitor Center has locked its doors, and food service and ranger programs at Trunk Bay have been suspended).Iconic destination lodges have also closed their doors, including Yosemite’s Ahwahnee, the Grand Canyon’s El Tovar, and Zion National Park’s namesake lodge. On Friday, Xanterra Parks & Resorts, which runs the Zion Lodge, closed its other park lodgings in Grand Canyon, Death Valley, and Yellowstone until at least late May, with hopes the coronavirus pandemic will wane before summer.As park lodgings shutter, so do nearby campgrounds, with the list growing by the day. Utah health officials have gone so far as to post “not welcome” messages for the Beehive State’s southeastern corner, a traditionally crowded—and rowdy—spring break destination due to the Slickrock mountain bike trail system and the red-rock beauty of Moab, Arches, and Canyonlands National Parks.Hospitality company Delaware North will close the Grand Canyon’s Yavapai Lodge on Sunday (through May 1), and lodging and dining at Sequoia and Kings Canyon National Parks are currently closed. The company will soon announce whether it will close its other park properties along the Blue Ridge Parkway and in Shenandoah and Olympic National Parks.Adventures on the Gorge, a tour company and resort at West Virginia’s New River Gorge National River, has canceled bookings through mid-April. Service provider Aramark canceled river trips and boat tours at Glen Canyon National Recreation Area in Utah, while also closing the Far View Lodge at Mesa Verde National Park until May 1. Even some national seashores should fall off your list: Officials in Dare County, North Carolina, are banning visitors to a big chunk of the Outer Banks, where Cape Hatteras National Seashore is located.Hikers walk a trail in Florida’s Ocala National Forest. While it may be possible to enjoy outdoor time safely, many recreation areas’ services and facilities are closed, and backcountry injuries will tax a healthcare system focusing on coronavirus response.So unprecedented is the coronavirus threat that the National Park Hospitality Association, which includes most major park concessionaires and outfitters, wrote President Trump this week seeking rescue. Along with a waiver of franchise fees paid to the National Park Service, the association is also asking for current concessions contracts to be extended two years.“National park concessioners are facing severe economic trauma from the coronavirus. Most of our operations are already shut down, and the likelihood of closure is high for many of the remaining operations, many of which are seasonal and being readied for opening,” wrote Scott Socha, president of Delaware North’s Parks & Resorts arm and NPHA board chairman, in the letter. “We believe the closures will cause a dramatic drop in visits and that visitor spending at our locations will decline by 75 percent or more this year. In fact, some of our operations will likely see a total loss of revenues.”The American Alpine Club has asked its members to restrict recreational travel in order to “flatten the curve,” or keep coronavirus cases at a manageable daily level for healthcare providers. “This is not the time to head to the desert or rally to your favorite national park for ‘social distancing,’” the club wrote. “While outdoor time is necessary for each of us during this turbulent period, we need to stay local and limit our interaction with vulnerable communities.”Concession workers are on the front lines, and some fear for their health.“Employees live in small rooms in small dorms. We share bathrooms and eat in dining rooms. We unclog your toilets and cook your food. When one person gets a cold it spreads throughout the dorms,” one concession worker said in a comment on NationalParksTraveler.org. “If someone brings [coronavirus] into Yellowstone National Park, it will spread like wildfire. Then, we will leave and take the virus back to the various states we came from and infect our families.”Utah health officials are so worried about the spread of coronavirus overwhelming their under-equipped rural medical facilities that they’re asking people to skip Moab for the time being. Along with closing area lodgings and campgrounds to non-locals, the Southeast Utah Health Department ordered bars, restaurants, and theaters to shut their doors.“In any other year we want to welcome people with open arms, but we are cognizant that this isn’t any other year, so as much as it pains us, we want to discourage tourists,” said department head Bradon C. Bradford. “Let’s get through this, let’s get over this and get back to visiting our national parks and having fun.”Considering the closing of facilities and campgrounds and the threat of contracting COVID-19, your clearest option instead might be to spend spring break binging the Ken Burns and Dayton Duncan documentary, The National Parks: America’s Best Idea.Montana’s Glacier National Park is iconic “because of its breathtaking, glacier-carved peaks and flowing river valleys,” says photographer Emily Polar. The 10th most visited national park, Glacier welcomed three million visitors in 2018, many of them to its renowned Going-to-the-Sun Road.",
"Rafters float through a calm stretch of the New River above Fayetteville, West Virginia. For decades, adventurers from around the world have come to brave the state’s white-water rapids.Appalachia has long struggled to throw off its stereotypical image of impoverished miners and moonshiners—and its recent outdoor recreation boom might be helping.The sprawling region, which stretches along the Appalachian Mountains from northern Mississippi to southern New York, gained notoriety in the 1960s as the epicenter of President Lyndon B. Johnson’s “War on Poverty.” But that doesn’t tell the whole story of an area that today is home to more than 25 million people—and which welcomes millions of visitors every year, drawn to the natural assets helping some communities bounce back from the economic brink.One such community is Fayetteville, West Virginia, bracketed by the New and Gauley Rivers, which plunge through billion-year-old gorges. Here, each morning for 22 days every fall, the U.S. Corps of Army Engineers opens the gates of the Summerville Dam, unleashing torrents of water that attract thousands of rafters from around the world to “Gauley Season.”“My dad was a coal miner,” explains guide Mike Sharp, as our raft rapidly approaches a section of white water on the New River. “As a kid, I spent two-thirds of my summer right here on this river, with my brothers.” Above the growing roar of gushing water, he warns us to get braced in.Rafters crash through rapids at Pillow Rock, on the upper Gauley River, where Class IV and V rapids challenge experienced paddlers.Sharp is one of about 600 people employed by outfitter and resort Adventures on the Gorge during the fall high season. His job is to guide thrill-seekers through West Virginia’s wild waters. His backstory, which reflects a generational shift away from extractive industry work toward jobs in outdoor recreation, isn’t uncommon here.Fayetteville (population: 2,700) sits on some of the country’s highest-grade coal; mining formed the region’s economic backbone for decades. Since 2008, however, coal production in West Virginia is thought to have fallen by 40 percent. The number of coal miners in Fayette County has halved in the last decade to around 600.Recreation, however, is on an upswing. Although the number of people taking commercial rafting trips has fallen nationwide since the 1990s—including in West Virginia—industry experts estimate that in 2019 the state hosted around 103,000 trips, channeling some $30 million into the economy. Independent kayakers and rafters are believed to bring West Virginia another $5 to $10 million a year. Advocacy group America Outdoors identifies the New River, which flows just west of Fayetteville, as one of the most popular rafting rivers in the U.S.Fayetteville’s outdoor recreation companies have broadened their offerings to include seasonal camping and rock climbing, as well as year-round zip lining on vast, wooded campuses. Rock climbing at nearby Summerville Lake and other local spots has exploded in recent years, adding $12 million a year to the economies of Fayette County and its neighbors, Nicholas and Raleigh Counties. And every October, some 80,000 people cram onto the New River Gorge Bridge to watch BASE jumpers dive into an 876-foot deep chasm. These events and industries have sparked new businesses, from gourmet sandwich shops and craft breweries to live music venues.But is it all free-flowing IPAs and s’mores over the campfire? Not exactly.Fishing and hunting still make up the largest portion of outdoor recreation revenue in West Virginia. Sporting groups oppose the potential loss of 4,800 hunting acres, should the New River Gorge National River be designated a national park and preserve, following a 2019 bill introduced to the U.S. Senate by West Virginia Senators Shelley Moore Capito and Joe Manchin.On the other hand, several rafting outfitters think official support of outdoor adventure tourism is still lagging: They point to the lack of state-level investment in marketing newer recreation offerings. “All of West Virginia tourism has a lack of awareness,” says Rick Johnson, who has led rafting trips with River Expeditions for 24 years.In recent years, seasonal rock climbing around Fayetteville at places like Summerville Lake has added millions of dollars a year to Fayette County and its neighbors. Zip lining, camping, and bespoke accomodation are also on offer.Education is another barrier to growth. According to the nonprofit Greatschools.org, 80 percent of Fayette County’s schools rank below the state average, making it harder to recruit and retain good workers, especially those with families.“When our oldest child hit school age, my wife and I struggled to justify staying,” says Jay Young, a North Carolina native who has worked with the Adventures on the Gorge for 13 years after moving from Charlotte, North Carolina.Young’s family found a small, nonprofit, private school that opened in 2009. “We went from thinking we had to leave to educate our children the way we wanted to thinking we should never leave,” Young says—though he doesn’t anticipate additional private schools opening in the area anytime soon.Some Appalachian towns, including Asheville, North Carolina, and Gatlinburg, Tennessee, are well-established outdoor meccas with large marketing budgets. That’s partially due to their prime locations on either side of Great Smokey Mountains National Park, America’s most-visited. But smaller communities farther from major population centers—like Pikeville, in eastern Kentucky; St. Paul, Virginia; and Fayetteville—face a struggle.“Part of it is just getting the word out,” says Shannon Blevins, vice-chancellor at the office of economic development and strategic initiatives at the University of Virginia, Wise. “There are some anchor outdoor recreation opportunities, [but] one single town might not have enough for people to come and stay for a week.”Though West Virginia’s economy still relies heavily on extractive industries like natural gas fracking, tourism contributes billions each year—and outdoor recreation is a growing segment of that amount.Blevins warns that Appalachian communities shouldn’t go all in for recreation at the expense of developing other industries. “Tourism isn’t recession-proof,” she says. And overinvesting carries its own risks. Case in point: Athens, Ohio’s plans for an 88-mile, $12 million bike park, which have raised concerns that the small university town may have bitten off more than it can financially chew.But for now, Fayetteville’s future looks bright. The town’s profile is rising, with 2021’s National Scouts Jamboree set to bring 40,000 participants to Fayette County. Although challenges remain, the growing variety of outdoor recreation opportunities might be what helps bring economic stability back to the area. If that happens, visitors will be able to see for themselves what Appalachia is really like today.Where to eat: Find one of the area’s tastiest menus at Smokey’s Cast Iron Grill (open daily May to October; off-season, Sundays only) at the Adventures on the Gorge resort in Lansing. In Fayetteville, drop by Southside Junction Tap House for a craft beer and a relaxed vibe.Where to stay: From campsites to high-end cabins, Adventures on the Gorge covers a lot of ground. In Fayetteville, the Historic Morris Harvey House Bed & Breakfast recalls old-time Appalachia.What to do: Fayetteville has zip lining, overnight fishing trips, and a spectacular, thousand-yard bridge walk. Nuttallburg Mine—an abandoned 19th-century facility of conveyors, coke ovens, and disused rail track—lies alongside the Headhouse hiking trail just west of town.But it’s Gauley Season (September and October) that sets the area apart, with good reason. Over a 12-mile stretch, the Gauley River drops more than 330 feet, blasting through five sets of class V rapids.One of the eight rivers originally designated by the 1968 Wild and Scenic Rivers Act, the Salmon River’s steep change in altitude—its 100-mile Middle Fork drops over 3,000 feet—takes it through a variety of habitats. Abundant wildlife includes bighorn sheep, elk, bears, cougars, and wolves, as well as one of the nation’s best fly fisheries, and advanced class white water rapids are popular with adventurers.",
"I could introduce this post by listing all the hackneyed misrepresentations of Appalachia. It would be easy. Boxing people in is easy. Writing off a region is easy. What’s more difficult is shedding some of those cliched ways of seeing in order to really look. That’s what Roger May, a photographer with his heartstrings tied to Appalachia, is trying to do. And the most important thing about his journey to re-see Appalachia is that he’s not doing it alone. I called May and asked him to tell me more about “Looking at Appalachia,” the crowdsourced photography project he is very thoughtfully facilitating.BECKY HARLAN: How do you think people outside of Appalachia view the region?ROGER MAY: My take is that it seems like the last bastion of America that’s sort of generalized, lumped together, and made fun of. It’s a relatively common thought that people from Appalachia are underprivileged, poorly educated, and backwoods. That probably says just as much about my bias toward outsiders as their perceived bias about Appalachia. I also know what I see and what mass media feeds our culture, and that is this pervasive view of the celebratory hillbilly. If that’s the filter that’s put on Appalachia by mass media, then shame on us if we lay down and take what mass media is feeding us.BECKY: And what about how actual residents view the region?ROGER: I think people in Appalachia are aware, to some extent, of the stereotypes. And in all fairness those stereotypes aren’t 100 percent inaccurate. To say that would be a huge disservice to the truth. I think some of those are celebrated and some of them may have been true at a specific point in time or in a specific place. But any time we make broad generalizations we paint a pretty limited picture.It’s important not to overromanticize the region, to not only photograph these wisened mountain mothers and old bearded men who look like they’ve worked with their hands for 60 years. There’s a whole Appalachia that I think has been unreported. One of the things I hoped this project would bring about is a balanced view of a place. And to think about the scale of Appalachia as defined by the Appalachian Regional Commission map—from southern New York to northeast Mississippi—that’s a huge region. We’re talking about some pretty big urban areas, Birmingham, Chattanooga, Asheville, and Pittsburgh.BECKY: You use President Johnson’s 1960s initiative, unofficially called the War on Poverty, as sort of a jumping off point to take another look at this region. Why do you reference that?ROGER: If you Google “War on Poverty,” you’ll be inundated with images of Appalachia. There are all these photos that circulated in the late ’60s that were used to illustrate the need in pockets of Appalachia. I think they somehow went on to visually define an entire region, however unfair that may be. And they were perpetuated by these other stereotypes, like holler dwellers and moonshiners. We started becoming inundated with photographs of broken-down cars and rail-thin kids out gathering coal by hand. I’m in no way saying those things didn’t happen or weren’t true at some level, it’s just that when Life magazine, in January of 1964, published a 12-page spread on eastern Kentucky, it was pretty heavily embellished with pictures of extreme poverty. I think the word “shack” was used near half a dozen times in the captions for those images.BECKY: Why do you think the more stereotyped images seem to dominate?ROGER: Maybe it’s that it’s already an established narrative. It doesn’t challenge what people know or think they know. I mean, poverty exists, right? There is suffering and struggling everywhere; it’s not just happening in Appalachia. People both inside and outside the region want that to be known. And those pictures are easy to make. They’re drive-by style. Making different pictures requires getting out of the car, talking to people, coming back. But most importantly, it means listening to people. Pictures of “normalcy” may require a bit more work. For those that are willing to slow down and settle in for the long view, I hope this project offers something worthy of their time and attention.BECKY: What inspired you to begin putting together this project? How did it turn into such a large collaboration?ROGER: 2014 was the 50th anniversary of the declaration of the War on Poverty. I looked around and didn’t see anyone doing any committed photography project to mark that, and that’s a pretty big milestone. I thought it would be interesting to take a fresh look at a region half a century after the fact.When I sat down at my dining room table with my Appalachian regional map and tried to plan a trip to 13 states and 420 counties, I realized pretty quickly that even on an accelerated schedule it would take me three or four months of being on the road to get around and make any meaningful photographs. I’m not in a position with my work to take that much time off. I have three kids at home and one in college. Even more so, I think it would be kind of flat to have just one photographer’s work. The real push of the project is to show the range and the breadth of the people and place, and having one photographer do that is not unlike having one mass media outlet portray a region in one way. So it made sense to put out an open call for work from anyone who was making pictures in one of the 420 counties in 2014.BECKY: What were the most common types of image submitted?ROGER: There were a lot of vistas. If people think of Appalachia they’re thinking the Appalachian region or the Appalachian mountains, and there’s some overlap there because obviously the mountains run through Appalachia. You get to this point where you’re like, “Okay, another vista.” And it doesn’t resonate in the same way.BECKY: What surprised you?ROGER: I said in a radio interview that my favorite emails were the ones that started with, “I’m not a professional photographer, but here’s a picture of my great uncle’s 90th birthday.” Or, “I don’t have a website. I hope that doesn’t exclude me from the project, but I wanted to include these pictures.” And more often than not I was really impressed with the quality of the pictures.BECKY: What were some of the themes you picked up on?ROGER: I think overall it’s just a fierce independence—a willingness to strike out and do your own thing and be your own person, to not conform as easily as people would like you to.BECKY: You received over 2,000 submissions. How did you choose the final images?ROGER: I knew that I couldn’t curate this thing on my own, that if I did it would be my aesthetic at work. So I asked seven other photographers whose work I really admire and [who I] am personal friends with to form an editorial board. There are a variety of photographers, from strictly film shooters who only shoot 4×5 to digital run-and-gun kind of photojournalists. It was a fairly balanced, democratic process.BECKY: Where do you think this story is headed?ROGER: This project is sort of a broad stroke, but that brush is made up of 298 bristles—that’s the number of photographs that were included in the 2014 selection. That broad brushstroke gives us, hopefully, a more balanced view of a place, and then each of those individual pictures tells their own story. What I hope by continuing the project is that each year we’re able to build on the previous year, that we can expand the story. To really continue to build this out, not so much rallying under the banner of, “Hey, that’s not what we look like. This is what we look like,” but, “Hey, let’s just take a fresh look at Appalachia.” And we may or may not be surprised at what we find, but the hard work is done in the looking.*****Want to get involved with Looking at Appalachia? Roger May wants you to too.“I would just encourage folks to have a look at the project, and if there’s anyone that wants to host a show, or host a talk, or be at a panel discussion, just give us a holler.” —Roger MaySee more of the 298 images that were chosen for the 2014 collection of Looking at Appalachia on its website and follow along on Instagram.See more of Roger May’s work on his website and follow him on Instagram.",
"The Monongahela River in Morgantown runs along the Coliseum Arena on the campus of West Virginia University.Ramble through rugged mountains and historic small towns on a roughly 500-mile scenic loop through some of West Virginia’s wildest terrain. Sample some of the best views, outdoor adventures, homegrown tastes, and live music the Mountain State has to offer.Over 12,000 acres make up Coopers Rock State Forest, with plenty of beautiful overlooks and hidden treasures to discover along the way.Home of the West Virginia University Mountaineers, Morgantown is a combo college town and nature activity hub. On campus, tour the free Art Museum of WVU (closed Mondays and Tuesdays) and see venerable Woodburn Hall, the university’s redbrick symbol built in 1876. In nearby Coopers Rock State Forest (about 13 miles east of downtown), blow up your Instagram feed with shots of Cheat River Canyon taken from the Raven Rock Trail overlook. End the day listening to live local, regional, and national acts at 123 Pleasant Street, a comfy music venue housed in a restored 1890s row house.Eat & Stay: Table 9 and The Chestnut HotelFrom Morgantown, it’s a scenic 70-mile drive (via WV-92 and US-50) southeast to Davis. The tiny (population 651) river town and its smaller (population 564) neighbor, Thomas, are mountain biking meccas. Rent bikes at Canaan Valley Resort State Park or at Blackwater Bikes. At Blackwater Falls State Park, follow the boardwalk 200 steps down (and 200 back up) for a front row-view of the falls. In Thomas, shop for Appalachian fine art and craft at Buxton & Landstreet Gallery and Studios. Stick around town for the evening show at the Purple Fiddle, where there’s West Virginia beer on tap and, most nights, live music on stage.Eat & Stay: Hellbender Burritos and Canaan Valley Resort in DavisThe Dolly Sods Wilderness spans three counties in West Virginia with over 17,000 acres to explore.Meander south through the wild and spectacularly scenic Monongahela National Forest, widely regarded as one of the most biologically diverse forests of its kind in the United States. For hardcore hiking and sweeping vistas, traverse the high-mountain meadows, heaths, and bogs of the forest’s remote Dolly Sods Wilderness. About 30 miles south in the Spruce Knob-Seneca Rocks National Recreation Area, climb the observation tower atop the state’s highest peak, 4,863-foot Spruce Knob. In nearby Circleville’s NROCKS, scale new heights on the adrenaline-pumping Via Ferrata, a fixed-anchor, guided rock climbing adventure. (Reservations are highly recommended.)Stay: Harman’s Luxury Log CabinsYou can't listen to the radio in this National Radio Quiet Zone, but you can visit the Green Bank Telescope and explore the interactive Green Bank Observatory.Continue south into Pocahontas County and the unplugged mountain hamlet of Green Bank. No cell phones, GPS devices, or other electromagnetic wave-transmitting gadgets are allowed in town, part of the 13,000-square-mile National Radio Quiet Zone. Green Bank’s radio-free status supports the work of its star attraction: the Robert C. Byrd Green Bank Telescope (GBT). Housed at the Green Bank Observatory the nearly 17-million-pound GBT is the world’s biggest fully steerable radio telescope. Take a public tour of the observatory to see the GBT (and the site’s other telescopes) and to explore the out-of-this-world field of radio astronomy.Eat & Stay: Chestnut Ridge Country Inn in Dunmore and the Last Run Restaurant in CassFollow WV-92 south through the Allegheny Mountains to historic Greenbrier Valley. In postcard-perfect downtown Lewisburg, browse the locally owned shops and galleries before catching a live performance at Carnegie Hall. Sample Appalachian adult beverages at Hawk Knob Hard Cider and Mead in Lewisburg and Smooth Ambler Spirits in Maxwelton. Learn about the area’s rich military history at the (declassified) Cold War Bunker at the Greenbrier and at the Confederate Cemetery at Lewisburg. Take a deep dive (120 feet underground) into the valley on a self-guided or Wild Cave tour of Lost World Caverns.Eat & Stay: The Greenbrier in White Sulphur SpringsTucked into the southeastern corner of the state is bucolic Monroe County. Cruise the scenic backroads for a slow-speed tour of rolling farmland, mountain valleys, and a slice of the three-state George Washington and Jefferson National Forests. August through November, watch soaring hawks and other migrating birds of prey from the rustic Hanging Rock Raptor Observatory. To reach the 3,812-foot-high perch, drive to the Allegheny Trail parking lot atop Peters Mountain and hike south for about a mile.Eat & Stay: Nanny’s Bakery & Café in Union and Four Fillies Lodge in Peterstown.If you stacked the Washington Monument on top of the Statue of Liberty, they would not reach the top of the New River Gorge Bridge in Fayatteville.Retrace your route north to Lewisburg and hop on US-60 W, also known as the Midland Trail National Scenic Byway. The historic two-lane road snakes 180 miles west to east across south-central West Virginia from the Ohio/Kentucky border to the Virginia state line. Stop at the Hawks Nest State Park overlook for panoramic views of the New River Gorge National River below. May to October, take the aerial tramway down to the bottom of the gorge and zip across the river on a jetboat. Head south toward historic Fayetteville to drive across the world-famous New River Gorge Bridge. If you can handle dizzying heights (the bridge is 876 feet above the gorge) take a guided Bridge Walk (reservations required) on the catwalk underside.Eat & Stay: Secret Sandwich Society and the Historic Morris Harvey House in FayettevilleThe West Virginia State Capitol building sits in its riverfront home.Take the scenic route (US-60) northwest to Charleston, a riverfront capital city with a friendly, small-town vibe. Shop for locally grown and made products—such as artisanal salt from J.Q. Dickinson Salt Works—at the indoor-outdoor Capitol Market. Tour the free West Virginia State Museum at the Culture Center on the grounds of the State Capitol Complex. Buy tickets in advance for a Charleston taping of Mountain Stage, a two-hour music radio show produced by West Virginia Public Broadcasting. On summer Fridays (May 26 to September 1), catch the free Live on the Levee outdoor concert in Haddad Riverfront Park. Return to Morgantown via I-79 N.Eat & Stay: Pies and Pints and Brass Pineapple InnMaryellen Kennedy Duckett lives, writes, and drives the backroads in East Tennessee where she wakes up curious every day. You can follow her on Twitter @mekd.",
"One of the eight rivers originally designated by the 1968 Wild and Scenic Rivers Act, the Salmon River’s steep change in altitude—its 100-mile Middle Fork drops over 3,000 feet—takes it through a variety of habitats. Abundant wildlife includes bighorn sheep, elk, bears, cougars, and wolves, as well as one of the nation’s best fly fisheries, and advanced class white water rapids are popular with adventurers.The year of the lava lamp and the Vietnam War, the assassination of Martin Luther King Jr. and the $1.50 movie ticket, 1968 in America was—like years before and since—a time of dissonance and division.But one thing came out of 1968 that plenty of people still agree on. Signed into law fifty years ago by President Lyndon B. Johnson, the National Wild and Scenic Rivers Act preserves waterways across the country (including Puerto Rico) which have “outstandingly remarkable” intrinsic value. Five federal agencies, including the National Parks Service, manage protected areas to ensure their waters continue flowing freely, unaffected by development.Today, sections of over 200 rivers enjoy Wild and Scenic status. But there’s still a long way to go: If the 600,000 miles of river affected by large dams were shrunk down to the length of a football field, wild and scenic rivers would only stretch just over two yards.To celebrate half a century of protected waters—and prepare for many more—here are ten of our favorite Wild and Scenic rivers.",
"Workers from a Servpro disaster recovery team wearing protective suits and respirators enter the Life Care Center in Kirkland, Wash., to begin cleaning and disinfecting the facility, Wednesday, March 11, 2020, near Seattle. The nursing home is at the center of the coronavirus outbreak in Washington state.SeattleWith each new day of the growing coronavirus pandemic, a chief concern is how to keep the rate of transmission down.Humans are both reservoirs where the virus thrives and causes destruction, and also the main spreaders of the disease. Once human carriers contaminate objects—known to medical professionals as fomites—there’s a new challenge of cleaning surfaces and washing hands to stymie the spread of the coronavirus.Even with such precautions, those who are most vulnerable—people who are older or have underlying health conditions—are advised to take extra care. But research on the coronavirus outbreak and past epidemics indicates it’s even harder to prevent transmission among people in certain jobs and those experiencing homelessness and poverty.The lessons learned in early epicenters, such as Seattle, and in past epidemics offer some guidance for the rest of the country.Early estimates from the University of Washington show 14.4 million workers in the United States are employed in jobs where exposure to or infection with COVID-19 could happen with greater frequency.Unsurprisingly, people working in health care have the highest estimated risk of exposure to respiratory infections akin to the coronavirus. In China, where the outbreak began, more than 3,000 health care workers had been infected with the coronavirus by late February. In Washington, there have been a number of cases at nursing homes, affecting both patients and staff members.But a number of other groups were also shown to be at high risk of exposure on a weekly or monthly basis: police officers, firefighters, and transportation security screeners; personal care workers like nannies and aides; and those in “productive occupations” like laundry and dry cleaning workers, wastewater treatment operators, and dental technicians.Race and ethnicity matter, too. For example, in a survey conducted during the H1N1, or swine flu, pandemic, Spanish-speaking Hispanic respondents were far more likely than white or black respondents to say that their job could only be done at their workplace, or that they would have difficulty staying home from work for seven to 10 days. Black and Hispanic respondents were also more likely to say they would have difficulty avoiding public transportation.University of Maryland professor Sandra Quinn, who led that study, says that she worries about elevated risk for low-income workers—who may live in more crowded conditions, struggle to take off work, or have more underlying untreated conditions that make them more susceptible to COVID-19. (Learn how these underlying conditions make coronavirus more severe.)“It’s the perfect storm for a catastrophe that will really be felt by the most vulnerable amongst us,” Quinn says. “The most important thing that people often forget in a situation like this is that an infectious disease by itself is not the disaster. It’s when it happens in a particular context.” In the U.S., the coronavirus is spreading through a country where racial and ethnic minorities, rural towns, and other communities already experience significant health disparities.At the entrance to the University District Food Bank in Seattle, there’s now a handwashing station. The food bank serves about 1,300 families per week, and executive director Joe Gruber says that they haven’t noticed a decline in the number of shoppers since the public health crisis began. But about a third of the volunteers who staff the food bank are seniors, and some regulars have chosen to forgo their weekly shifts to protect their health.“Appreciating that we have a lot of vulnerable populations that we touch with, it’s really paramount that we think about how we can preserve the integrity of our services as long as we can,” Gruber says.Homeless people are a particular concern in Seattle, which is not only the U.S. region hardest hit by the new coronavirus, but also a city with one of the largest homeless populations in the country. A high proportion of Seattle’s 11,200 homeless residents are unsheltered, meaning that they sleep outside rather than in a shelter or transitional residence. Many are older or suffer from chronic health issues.“Managing your health and staying healthy is so impossible when you’re homeless, under the best of circumstances, let alone the outbreak,” says Margot Kushel, a professor of medicine and director of the Center for Vulnerable Populations at the University of California, San Francisco.During the SARS outbreak in Canada, homeless agencies struggled to find cleaning and safety supplies and would have benefited from explicit hygiene guidelines. Screening for SARS was tricky, as many in the homeless community already exhibited one or more of the key symptoms. Many service providers also did not know how and where sick homeless individuals could be quarantined.Infections “are a kind of litmus test for inequality,” says Jon Zelner, assistant professor of epidemiology at the University of Michigan.Official recommendations to help protect vulnerable people will be familiar to anyone who has been following the news: Wash your hands frequently with soap and water, cover your mouth when you cough or sneeze, and stay home if you are sick.Many workplaces and city centers are also taking “social distancing” measures, temporarily keeping people apart in an effort to slow the spread of the virus. Many companies across the nation have asked all employees who can do so to work from home for the next few weeks. The NBA season was suspended after a player caught the virus, and numerous universities and events have been postponed from coast to coast, including the Boston Marathon and the Masters Tournament.While other cities are catching up, the effects of these social distancing measures can be felt around Seattle. Road traffic is lighter, and small businesses are struggling. Before public schools decided to officially close, attendance had dipped, according to Tim Robinson, a spokesperson for Seattle Public Schools.However, for the city’s poorest and most vulnerable residents, keeping away from other people is not always an option. And as more people will contract the virus, Seattle is grappling with what can be done to care for them.In a press conference on March 5, Gov. Jay Inlsee said that the state intends to cover the costs of coronavirus testing for the uninsured. The state insurance commissioner has also ordered insurers to waive the costs of testing. Medicare has been expanded to cover telemedicine—doctors’ visits by videoconference or over the phone—in outbreak areas, and officials have purchased a motel to quarantine coronavirus patients.“The last line of defense is often going to be people under pretty severe economic constraints,” Zelner says. “People are going to stay home, but they still need to go to grocery stores. Who works in grocery stores? You’re going to order something online so you don’t need to go out. Well, who delivers your packages?”",
"Kaylen Smith demonstrates how to don the protective gear that must be worn when dealing with patients with an infectious disease as Massachusetts General Hospital in Boston prepares for a possible surge in coronavirus patients on Feb. 27, 2020.Three hundred million respirators and face masks. That’s what the United States needs as soon as possible to protect health workers against the coronavirus threat. But the nation’s emergency stockpile has less than 15 percent of these supplies.Last week, U.S. Health and Human Services Secretary Alex Azar testified before the Senate that the Strategic National Stockpile has just 30 million surgical masks and 12 million respirators in reserves, which came as a surprise considering that the stockpile’s inventory is generally not disclosed for national security reasons. Asked by National Geographic about the discrepancy, a senior official with the Strategic National Stockpile said the department intends to purchase as many as 500 million respirators and face masks over the next 18 months.Even such a promised surge in production may not be enough—and it may not come soon enough. A widely overlooked study conducted five years ago by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention found that the United States might need as many as seven billion respirators in the long run to combat a worst-case spread of a severe respiratory outbreak such as COVID-19.The outbreak now has entered a new, more potent phase dictated by local or community transmission. It’s no longer just being imported from China. Coronavirus has started spreading locally in 13 other countries, including South Korea, Japan, Singapore, Australia, Malaysia, Vietnam, Italy, Germany, France, United Kingdom, Croatia, San Marino, Iran, the United Arab Emirates, and the United States. On Wednesday, the World Health Organization announced COVID-19’s global death rate is 3.4 percent, more than 30 times that of seasonal influenza, but also stated the coronavirus doesn’t spread as easily as the flu. The global tally of confirmed cases and deaths has risen to 93,000 and nearly 3,200, respectively.In the U.S., COVID-19 cases without clear ties to China began dotting the West Coast last week. At the same time, the nation saw an uptick in fatalities—nine so far as of Tuesday—with most occurring at a nursing home in Kirkland, Washington. Among those deaths is one patient who passed away last week at Seattle’s Harborview Medical Center. Viral tests, made well after his death, revealed a COVID-19 diagnosis and that hospital staff may have been exposed.  Besides confirming the threat posed to the elderly, these deaths, the community transmission, and genetic analysis suggest the virus has been spreading unnoticed in Washington since mid-January.“We will have community spread,” New York Governor Andrew Cuomo said Monday at a news briefing about the state's first confirmed case. “That is inevitable.”All of these events sparked a run on medical supplies over the weekend, a worrying prospect given the CDC has indicted there could be a global deficit of personal protective equipment such as surgical masks, goggles, full-body coveralls, and N95 respirators, the only CDC-approved face guard, which are designed to filter 95 percent of airborne particles."We’re concerned that countries’ abilities to respond are being compromised by the severe and increasing disruption to the global supply of personal protective equipment, caused by rising demand, hoarding, and misuse," Dr. Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus, WHO director-general, said at a press briefing at the agency’s headquarters in Geneva on Tuesday. "Prices of surgical masks have increased sixfold, and N95 respirators have more than tripled, and gowns cost twice as much."What’s more, even if U.S. medical centers obtain the necessary supplies, a second shortage of medical specialists may emerge if this respiratory outbreak spreads even more dramatically.The panicked demand and lack of supplies was predictable. China manufactures roughly 50 percent more medical and pharmaceutical supplies than its nearest competitor, the U.S., according to data supplied to National Geographic by Euromonitor International. But the Asian country now needs those precious supplies for its tens of thousands of cases, at a time when manufacturing has slowed across the country.“The fundamental point that's exposed in situations like that is that autarky—the idea of self-sufficiency—is lovely in theory, but it almost never actually works in practice, because we tend to not appreciate supply chains,” says Parag Khanna, a global strategy advisor and author of Connectography and Technocracy in America.Much of the world has become accustomed to same-day delivery without thinking about the bundles of transactions that support such a system. Some global industries can circumvent major blockages or delays in supply chains caused by the coronavirus outbreak. But other supply chains and industries—like automobiles, travel, and medical supplies—are too tightly bound across borders in what Khanna calls a supply circuit.  “China's a manufacturer of intermediate products … but what they're really manufacturing on a wider scale is starting material for active pharmaceutical ingredients,” says Scott Gottlieb, a former U.S. FDA commissioner and resident fellow at the American Enterprise Institute. “These manufacturers have one to three months of supply, so they're going to be able to continue to manufacture for a period of time, but eventually they're going to run out.”“The irony is that some of the other countries who could do these things very quickly, like Japan or South Korea, are also affected by the virus,” says Khanna, who has also noted that the coronavirus appears to be spreading along China’s “new silk road”—echoing what happened with the Black Death in the 1300s. He and other experts expect India, Thailand, Indonesia, and Vietnam to swoop in to capitalize on China’s deficit.  On Friday, the FDA announced the first drug shortage due to the coronavirus. And for nearly a month, the CDC has warned about the fragility of supply circuits for personal protective equipment, as manufacturers struggle to meet orders for face masks and N95 respirators. That’s possibly because the CDC conducted a thought experiment five years ago that offers a clear warning for the situation unfolding today. Back then, the public health agency wanted to predict how many resources the U.S. might need over the entire course of a hypothetical outbreak of a severe flu virus. (Learn about how coronavirus compares to flu, Ebola, and other major outbreaks.)The result was a series of models built with parameters that bear an uncanny resemblance to what is currently happening with the coronavirus. From disease transmission rates down to the lack of specific antivirals or vaccines, the CDC papers offer a rough guide on what preparedness needs to look like to combat an emerging respiratory pandemic.“In terms of the amount of masks, gowns, gloves, [and] respirators that would be needed, this influenza model is a good way to estimate that at this point,” says Eric Toner, a senior scientist at the Johns Hopkins Center for Health Security who wasn’t involved with the CDC papers. “I don't see any reason to think that we would need a different number of those things than we do for a severe pandemic flu.”Based on the models, U.S. health care workers would need two to seven billion respirators for the least- to most-severe possible scenarios. That’s up to 233 times more than what’s currently in the Strategic National Stockpile.“The demand that would be required in a severe pandemic is so unlike the amount that's used on a day-to-day basis,” says Lisa Koonin, an epidemiologist and founder of Health Preparedness Partners. She worked for the CDC for more than 30 years and is a co-author on these reports. “For the respirators and surgical masks, we're talking orders of magnitude greater need for a severe pandemic.”  The WHO has shipped nearly half a million sets of personal protective equipment to 27 countries, but it says supplies are rapidly depleting. The global health agency estimates that each month 89 million medical masks will be required for the COVID-19 response, along with 76 million examination gloves and 1.6 million goggles. The WHO estimates that supplies of personal protective equipment need to be increased by 40 percent globally.Along with the billions of respirators, the CDC predicted that U.S. patients and health care workers might need as many as 100 to 400 million surgical masks, as well as 7,000 to 11,000 mechanical ventilators. The latter are used during life support for the most severe cases of respiratory disease, after a patient’s lungs stop working on their own. A report published Friday in the New England Journal of Medicine states that about 2.3 percent of early coronavirus patients underwent mechanical ventilation.But ventilators, respirators, and even basic masks are only helpful when used by expert hands—and that presents another potential shortfall for the U.S.“In a severe pandemic, we certainly could run out of ventilators, but a hospital could just as soon run out of respiratory therapists who normally operate these devices,” says Toner. The Bureau of Labor Statistics estimates that the U.S. employs 134,000 respiratory specialists, or approximately 20 of these technicians for every hospital in America. (Will warming spring temperatures slow the coronavirus outbreak?)“One of [the CDC’s] conclusions was, it's not so much the number of ventilators as the number of people needed to operate the ventilators. That's the choke point,” Toner adds.Resource demands at a single hospital could also be substantial as coronavirus cases increase in the U.S. Three years ago, the Mayo Clinic—a prestigious medical system based in Rochester, Minnesota—asked Toner and his colleagues to assess what kind of individual stockpile might be required during a severe influenza pandemic.Concerned about the spread of COVID-19 in large gatherings, students from the University of North Carolina School of the Arts wear respiratory masks as they wait for Democratic presidential candidate Sen. Bernie Sanders (I-VT) to speak to supporters during a rally and march to early vote on February 27, 2020 at Winston-Salem State University in Winston-Salem, North Carolina.Unlike the CDC papers, their model ran through 10,000 scenarios, each with slightly different settings for epidemiologic variables such as hospitalization rates, hospital length of patient stays, how much time patients spend on mechanical ventilation, and case fatality rate.“A model like this can't tell you the right thing to do. But it can tell you the range of possibilities,” Toner says.For example, if the Mayo Clinic stockpiled 4.5 million gloves, 2.3 million N95 respirators, 5,000 doses of a potent antiviral, and 880 ventilators, those supplies would cover the clinic’s facilities for 95 percent of the likely outcomes—everything except the absolute worst-case scenarios for a respiratory pandemic.  “We go through a lot of gloves in health care, and the numbers can be staggering,” Toner says. “Particularly with a disease like this where some people are advocating double gloving, you'll burn through gloves twice as fast.”But he emphasizes that every hospital’s demands would be different. The Mayo Clinic is large, boasting more than 63,000 staff members that not only serve Minnesota, but accept specialty patients from around the world.  "We can’t stop COVID-19 without protecting our health workers," WHO director-general Ghebreyesus says. “Supplies can take months to deliver, market manipulation is widespread, and stocks are often sold to the highest bidder."The actual demand and supply for health care equipment during this outbreak will depend on myriad variables, one of which is an outbreak’s attack rate. As of this moment, that is a mystery for COVID-19.  The attack rate is what percentage of a population catches an infectious disease overall. If a hundred people live in a city, and a virus’ attack rate is 20 percent, then 20 citizens would be expected to get sick. Both the CDC papers and Toner’s models rely on attack rates ranging from 20 to 30 percent, a standard estimate for severe pandemics. (Learn about the swift, deadly history of the Spanish Flu pandemic.)But the attack rate for COVID-19 is still unknown because it takes time to measure. Scientists must develop a test—known as a serology assay—that can detect whether a person caught the coronavirus even if they never reported symptoms.“In terms of quantifying that specifically, it's still quite early days,” Maria Van Kerkhove, an infectious disease epidemiologist and the technical leader for WHO’s Health Emergencies Program, said at a press briefing at the WHO headquarters in Geneva on Monday. Van Kerkhove added those serologic surveys must be conducted across large populations, so attack rates can be determined for individual age groups.Because the attack rate reveals how much of a population is likely to catch a disease, it can be crucial in determining how to allocate resources locally, nationally, and globally. Van Kerkhove added that the necessary surveys are underway, and the World Health Organization hopes to see some preliminary results in the coming weeks.In the meantime, Vice President Mike Pence, the Trump Administration’s newly appointed coronavirus czar, on Saturday announced a deal with the Minnesota-based corporation 3M to produce 35 million masks a month. And the managers for the Strategic National Stockpile have asked companies to submit data on their inventories of personal protective equipment, in case the coronavirus crisis escalates. They also hope their recent request for 500 million respirators and masks will promote the growth of local manufacturers.“This purchase will encourage manufacturers to ramp up production of personal protective equipment now with the guarantee that they will not be left with excess supplies once the COVID-19 response subsides,” says Stephanie Bialek of the Strategic National Stockpile. “In an emergency, the SNS can send these products to areas in need as requested by state health officials.”",
"The Rio Grande marks the boundary between Mexico’s protected Santa Elena Canyon (left) and Texas’s Big Bend National Park, which is temporarily closed during the coronavirus pandemic.Even America’s parklands are beginning to strain under the coronavirus pandemic.Though group size limits and stay-at-home orders restrict the movement of millions, time outside in nature is more vital than ever. Dozens of national parks have closed entirely, from Acadia to Zion, while other public lands remain open despite controversy—and visitors are testing the limits.Golden Gate National Recreation Area’s visitor facilities are closed, though its outdoor spaces remain open for public use. California’s stay-at-home order allows appropriately distanced outdoor activity, and several parks reported a surge in visitors at the end of March.The cascade of closing parks has sent travelers in search of new destinations, including Arizona’s Sunset Crater Volcano National Monument.Created in 1930 to protect the picturesque landscape a Hollywood film crew proposed blowing up, Sunset Crater isn’t far from Flagstaff, and has seen an uptick in traffic. A loop road that meanders through Coconino National Forest bisects the monument on its way north to nearby Wupatki National Monument. Though the two monuments and their grounds are closed, the road is not, as it accesses national forest lands as well as private residences.Brenda Emry, an interpretive ranger at Sunset Crater, said Monday that upwards of 45 vehicles a day—more than accounted for by residents or Forest Service traffic—drive through.“The traffic is heavier than you would anticipate right now” during a pandemic, she said. “Anybody that’s pulling off the road, they basically are considered [to be] trespassing, unless they just continue through. I’d say maybe 18 to 20 a day that really try to pull off the road and start hiking our trails.”The vehicles bear a wide range of license plates: California, New York, New Mexico, Wisconsin. “People are being told to stay home, stay put, and yet, it’s because of that sort of cabin fever I think that is starting to happen,” said Emry. “There are still a lot of travelers.”At Virginia’s Shenandoah National Park, staff try to juggle officials’ competing needs.“We’re trying to strike a balance between the CDC guidelines and the governor’s orders to stay at home,” said Shenandoah spokesperson Sally Hurlbert. “He’s telling people to stay home, but he’s also leaving the door open for them to go to public places and get exercise and fresh air—for mental health as well as physical health reasons.”Until April 8, sixty-five miles or so of Skyline Drive, from Front Royal south to Swift Run Gap, were closed to vehicles—though open to cyclists and pedestrians because the surrounding counties had asked for help in reducing crowds drawn by the park’s hiking trails. On Wednesday afternoon, Shenandoah park closed fully.Park staff also decided to close the park overnight: Lodgings are shuttered, there’s a ban on camping, and they didn’t want to encourage nighttime hiking. But there are still some Shenandoah visitors who sense no one is watching.“There’s been a little bit of vandalism, but it’s mostly what we would call nuisance behavior,” said Hurlbert. “People spinning donuts in parking lots and overlooks. We’ve had an increase in speeding, people coming in and speeding Skyline Drive. And trash, lots of trash, more than usual. We’re trying to keep up with the sanitation, but it’s putting our rangers at risk every time they have to pick up a piece of garbage alongside the road and empty trash cans, because [coronavirus] can survive for a period of time on cardboard and plastic surfaces.”It doesn’t stop at nuisance behavior: There have been reports of arson at Ozark National Scenic Riverways in Missouri. Park staff announced Monday the offer of a reward of up to $10,000 for information leading to the conviction of those who started the Pot Hole Wildfire on March 9, which threatened a private home.Yellowstone and Grand Teton National Parks closed on March 24. The National Park Service’s hesitance to fully close parks during early stages of the pandemic drew criticism from experts.As telework becomes the new norm for the staffs of most park units that have closed facilities, some employees at Big Bend National Park in Texas have focused on overdue projects.“We’re doing a lot of work outside,” said Superintendent Bob Krumenaker. “Trail work, vegetation work. We are repainting the visitor center, deep-cleaning facilities. We’re maintaining social distance, but we still are hard at work and trying to put the park in as best shape as we can so when we reopen to the public, people will see that we’ve used the time productively.”For Jennifer Pharr Davis, the parks can’t reopen soon enough. Davis, who in 2011 set the then-record for fastest hike of the 2,180-mile-long Appalachian Trail, owns a guided hiking business in Asheville, North Carolina, next to Great Smoky Mountains National Park and the Blue Ridge Parkway.The closure of Great Smoky Mountains, and a recommendation from the Appalachian Trail Conservancy to stay off the iconic footpath, forced cancellation of her scheduled hikes.“We are 90 percent closed right now,” said Davis. “Our trips are canceled, most of the parks around us are closed, our shop has closed. Now the hard part is knowing when we can reopen and start scheduling things again. From a business standpoint, we’ve ceased everything except online retail.”Even some of the wildlife seems eager for the flocks of visitors to return.“Now that the people have gone away, we don’t have as many seagulls and crows hanging around,” J.J. Condella, general manager of Flamingo Adventures on the southern tip of Everglades National Park, said Monday of the usually ever-present birds that hope to steal a bite of visitors’ lunches. “They seem to have given up hope and moved on to a different area.”Seen from the International Space Station, the vibrant blue waters of Oregon's Crater Lake fill a dormant volcano.",
"The Rapidan River flows from the mountains in Shenandoah National Park.Location: Virginia  Established: December 26, 1935  Size: 197,411 acres Annual visitors: 1.4 million Visitor centers: Dickey Ridge, Byrd/Big Meadows, Loft Mountain Entrance fee: $25 per vehicle; $10 per personStretching more than a hundred miles along the Blue Ridge Mountains of western Virginia, Shenandoah National Park offers a patchwork quilt of wilderness and pastoral landscapes underpinned by stories from more than 300 years of history. Located between the Shenandoah Valley in the west and the Piedmont region in the east, the park is an expanse of wooden hollows and breezy summits, waterfalls and mountain streams, more than 500 miles of hiking trails, and nearly 80,000 acres of designated wilderness—all just 75 miles from Washington, D.C.Inspired by Yellowstone and other parks in the West, a national reserve in the Blue Ridge Mountains was first proposed in 1901. When the campaign stalled, Virginians took it upon themselves to make the park a reality. Using eminent domain, the commonwealth acquired property from some 5,000 landholders and donated the parcels to the federal government. The park was established the day after Christmas 1935.One of the park’s most famous features, Skyline Drive (constructed in the 1930s by the Civilian Conservation Corps), offers drivers 105 miles of scenic overlooks, trailheads, picnic areas, and campgrounds between Front Royal in the north and Rockfish Gap in the south. Another way to traverse the length of Shenandoah is by hiking the hundred or so miles of the Appalachian Trail that run across the park.In addition to Front Royal and Rockfish Gap, the park is accessible from Luray and Sperryville by way of the Thornton Gap Entrance Station, as well as from Elkton and Stanardsville via Swift Run Gap Entrance Station.Although it’s the closest part of the park to major metropolitan areas, the North District offers some of the more secluded terrain, a quiet part of Shenandoah that many people zip through on their way to the park’s more celebrated attractions farther south. And that’s quite all right for those who prefer their parks with fewer folks along the trails.Dickey Ridge Visitor Center near Front Royal presents a great introduction to the park with exhibits on Shenandoah’s human and natural history and plenty in the way of information and maps. From the visitor center parking lot, you can pick up two short walking routes—the Fox Hollow Loop and Snead Farm Road—that meander through the remains of bygone farms, including an old barn and grave sites.Overall Run Falls—at 93 feet, the tallest cascade in the park—is reached via trails from Hogback Overlook or Matthews Arm. It can be tough going: The main route (a 5.1-mile round trip) features an elevation change of 1,291 feet. Much easier is the 1.7-mile Traces Trail, which loops through the woods around the Matthews Arm Campground. The Appalachian Trail leaps across Skyline Drive near Beahms Gap, a great opportunity for those who want to hike a short portion of the trail but not the entire 2,200 miles from Maine to Georgia.Shenandoah’s middle section is the park’s highest and most popular area, with more vehicles in the turnouts and more hikers along the trails, especially during the busy summer months when the wooded highlands offer refuge from Virginia’s notorious heat and humidity.It’s also where Shenandoah tourism was born in the 1800s, long before the park became a reality. Skyland was originally envisioned as a mountaintop real estate development, but when that was slow to get off the ground, flamboyant owner George Freeman Pollock transformed the lofty plot into a summer vacation oasis. Many of the old buildings remain, including the restored Massanutten Lodge (built in 1911), several of its rooms decorated with early 20th-century furnishings and others dedicated to Addie Nairn Pollock and the women who frequented Skyland in the early days.Skyland offers a convenient parking place and jumping-off spot for a number of nearby trails, including the easy, 1.3-mile Limberlost Trail through a forest that Addie Nairn saved from logging by purchasing the old-growth hemlock trees for $10 each. The hemlocks long ago succumbed to insects and were replaced by the magnificent laurels that shade the path today.Among other routes in the area are the short but steep ascent to Stony Man peak (1.6 miles), the Whiteoak Canyon Trail (2-7.3 miles) to a series of six waterfalls, and the Skyland Stable Trail for horseback riders. Hikers can also reach Old Rag Mountain from Skyland. The shorter and more popular routes to the celebrated peak—from Berry Hollow and Route 600—are found along the eastern edge of the park.Hawksbill Summit—the park’s highest point at 4,051 feet—is reached from trails that start at two parking spots along Skyline Drive about halfway between Skyland and Big Meadows. Despite the elevation gain, the trails are not as difficult as one might expect.Learn more about park history at the Byrd Visitor Center, which lies about halfway along Skyline Drive (milepost 51) in the Big Meadows area. The park’s largest open space is a great place to spot wildlife in the early morning or late afternoon, especially the black bear and whitetail deer that feast on the meadow berries and other vegetation. A 1.4-mile trail drops down to 70-foot Dark Hollow Falls. Big Meadows also boasts a lodge, campground, and amphitheater for ranger talks and other programs.Rapidan Camp is downhill from Big Meadows. Built in 1929, the rural retreat served as a wilderness White House during the presidency of Herbert Hoover. Brown House, the presidential cabin, has been historically refurnished. The Prime Minister’s Cabin offers exhibits on Hoover’s life and times. Mill Prong Trail is the easiest way to hike to Rapidan (4.1 miles roundtrip). From spring to fall, the Park Service offers 2.5-hour guided van tours from Byrd Visitor Center.Six miles south of Big Meadows, Lewis Mountain Campground was the scene of an ongoing segregation struggle that pitted the National Park Service against local business and political interests. Developed by a private concession, it opened in 1939 as the park’s only picnic ground and campsite for “Colored People” and remained that way until 1950 when Shenandoah was fully integrated in line with Park Service policy.Seclusion returns in the park’s bottom end, like its northern counterpart much less crowded than the popular middle zone. Visitor services cluster at Loft Mountain with its campground, camp store, and amphitheater for interpretive programs. The nearby Frazier Discovery Trail (1.2-mile loop) offers a short scramble to an awesome viewpoint over the park. Another short hike is the 1-mile Blackrock Summit Trail, which climbs through a boulder- and rock-strewn talus slope on its way to another lofty vista.Farther south, Riprap–Wildcat Ridge Trail offers a strenuous 9.8-mile hike across rugged terrain that includes rock formations, stream crossings, waterfalls, and swimming holes, as well as a portion of the Appalachian Trail.The park finally peters out at Rockfish Gap, a large gap in the Blue Ridge Mountains between the Shenandoah Valley and eastern Virginia. Following trails blazed by Native Americans, European settlers were passing through the gap as early as the 1740s. A roadside tavern in the pass provided a meeting place in 1818 where Thomas Jefferson, James Madison, James Monroe, and other interested parties developed a plan for creating the University of Virginia.Unlike most national parks, Shenandoah is a place where settlers lived for more than a century. To create the park, Virginia state officials acquired 1,088 privately owned tracts and donated the land to the nation.Never before had a large, populated expanse of private land been converted into a national park. And never before had planners made a park of land so used by humans. Before the park opened and during its early days, some 465 families moved or were moved from their cabins and resettled outside the proposed park boundaries. A few mountaineers, though, lived out their lives in the park and were buried in the secluded graveyards of Shenandoah’s vanished settlements.Much of Shenandoah consisted of farmland and second- or third-growth forests logged since the early 1700s. Today, the marks of lumbering, grazing, and farming have mostly disappeared, as forests have slowly come back.Shenandoah National Park was built by members of the Civilian Conservation Corps (CCC), a government jobs program created during the Great Depression of the 1930s. Workers constructed the rock walls, overlooks, picnic grounds, campgrounds, trails, and the Skyline Drive. They also planted the mountain laurel that lines the road, and built more than 340 structures in the park, many now listed in the National Register of Historic Places.",
""Stony Man Mountain" is Shenandoah's version of New Hampshire's "Old Man on the Mountain." Stop at the Stony Man Overlook (milepost 38.6) and gaze west to see a profile of his face. Or follow the 1.6-mile, moderately difficult trail from the Stony Man parking area to the top of "his" forehead.Shenandoah National Park has some 180 miles of trails open to horses. Bring your own horse, or arrange for a guided trail ride through ARAMARK.The park's main road, Skyline Drive, winds some 105 miles along the crest of the Blue Ridge Mountains. There are 75 overlooks, affording visitors many opportunities to take in views of the Shenandoah Valley and the Virginia Piedmont. Also popular along the drive: walking sections of the Appalachian Trail, which roughly parallels the drive through the park.Shenandoah National Park has free printable hiking maps available online. The maps are organized into different sections of the park, so determine which area of the park you are interested in hiking, then print the map out and bring it along on your trip.You don't have to travel deep into the park to get a taste of its history. Across from the Dickey Ridge Visitors Center, just five miles from the Front Royal entrance, is the easy, self-guided, 1.2-mile Fox Hollow Trail, named for the farming family who settled here in 1837. Hikers can still see remnants of their life, including piles of stones cleared from farmland, as well as the family graveyard.Park at Milam Gap (milepost 52.8 along Skyline Drive) to begin a moderate, four-mile round-trip trek to Rapidan Camp, a national historic landmark that was former President Herbert Hoover's summer White House. Hoover's cabin, the Brown House, has been restored to its 1929 appearance; the Prime Minister's Cabin has self-guided exhibits. The hike to the camp passes a small waterfall and crosses several streams.Overall Run Falls (milepost 21.1 along Skyline Drive) is a strenuous round-trip hike of 6.4 miles. Overall Run Falls are the highest in the park, though in dry summers there may be very little water. Park at the lot near Hogback Overlook and begin your 0.4-mile hike down to the falls along part of the Appalachian Trail. The trail is steep and rocky at points, so make sure to wear sturdy shoes.Shenandoah National Park is home to more than 50 mammal species, 51 reptile and amphibian species, some 30 fish species, and approximately 200 resident and transient bird species. Keep an eye out for opossums, groundhogs, gray foxes, eastern cottontails, bobcats, raccoons, black bears, white-tailed deer, salamanders, turtles, snakes (18 species), barred owls, red-tailed hawks, warblers, and woodpeckers. Plant species include red oak, birch, and hickory trees; 60 fern species; and more than 800 wildflower species, including violets, pink azaleas, mountain laurel, and wild sunflowers.Shenandoah in autumn is a spectacular sight, as the hardwood forest changes from green to vibrant shades of red, orange, and yellow. Trails lead to sweeping vistas of the park. Bearfence Mountain trail (milepost 56.4) is a 0.8-mile hike that requires scrambling over some rocks to 360-degree views of the Shenandoah mountains.Drive to Crescent Rock Overlook (near milepost 44) to take in views of Hawksbill Summit, the highest point in the park at 4,051 feet.Limberlost Trail (milepost 43) was originally constructed to meet ADA accessibility standards, and although the trail does not meet current minimum guidelines, it does provide an opportunity for disabled visitors who have assistance to experience a trail within Shenandoah National Park. The 1.3-mile circuit walk (paved with crushed greenstone) winds through shaded forest and has benches.East Coast summers can be hot and humid, with temperatures often exceeding 90°F in the Shenandoah Valley. The mountains are generally ten degrees cooler, though humidity can often limit vista views. To escape the sun on a hot summer day, opt for a waterfall hike instead. Try Dark Hallow Falls (at milepost 50.7) or Whiteoak Canyon Falls, (at milepost 42.6).Throughout the summer, a variety of Ranger Programs are held for visitors of all ages. Watch the sunset over the Blue Ridge Mountains during the "Twilight at Big Meadows" or "Evening Campfire Program," take a guided tour of President Hoover's Rapidan Camp, or learn more about black bears and birds of prey.During the second weekend of May, the park hosts its annual Wildflower Weekend, where rangers host a variety of events, from wildflower hikes, to wildflower photography, to demonstrations on how flowers rely on bees, butterflies, and birds. Events take place throughout the park, so check the program schedule beforehand.History buffs should look no further than the foothills of the Blue Ridge Mountains, where three Presidents all had homes. The estates of Thomas Jefferson (www.monticello.org), James Madison (www.montpelier.org), and James Monroe (www.ashlawnhighland.org) are all within a two hours' drive of the park.Go on an underground adventure at two natural caverns located at the north end of the park. Luray Caverns are the largest in the eastern United States, and are home to the "Stalacpipe" Organ. Open year-round, hour-long tours begin every 10 to 20 minutes. Stop by Skyline Caverns for a guided tour through the caves and take a quick ride on a one-fifth scale train.Just an hour's drive from Front Royal is Berkeley Springs, West Virginia. The historic town is home to plenty of B&Bs, art galleries, cafés, and the country's first spa. The springs, which are a constant 74°F, were first noted on a map by Thomas Jefferson's father in 1747, though Native Americans had been using the springs centuries before the Europeans arrived. Soak in the baths, take a historic walking tour of the town, or visit the Museum of Berkeley Springs to learn more.Harpers Ferry National Historic Park is located at the confluence of the Potomac and Shenandoah Rivers, just over an hour north of Shenandoah National Park. Go for a hike or visit the living history museums in the town. The park is home to several battlefields, or visit nearby Antietam National Battlefield, where 23,000 soldiers were killed on September 17, 1862, during one of the bloodiest battles of the Civil War.Virginia is home to over one hundred wineries, and several are located within an easy drive of Shenandoah National Park, like Shenandoah Vineyards, just 30 minutes from the park's headquarters in Edinburg, or Rockbridge Vineyard, a 30-minute drive from Waynesboro at the park's south end. Visit www.virginiawine.org for more information about the many vineyards in Virginia and the Shenandoah region.The George Washington and Jefferson National Forest offers boating, fishing, horseback riding, shooting ranges, and ATV trails to its visitors. Stop by the headquarters in Roanoke for information about camping, hiking, swimming, and other recreational activities. 5162 Valleypointe Parkway, Roanoke, Va. 24019; +1 540 265 5100.",
"As U.S. secretary of the interior, Sally Jewell, 58, heads an agency responsible for managing energy and water resources on public lands and trust commitments to Native Americans. But perhaps the part of the job closest to her heart—she grew up in the Pacific Northwest and is an avid outdoorswoman—is acting as steward of America's national parks.What's the biggest challenge for parks?We need to make national parks relevant to new generations, to connect to people who have less time for a road trip or weekend campout with kids. We don't have enough people with parks on the radar as a place they want to go.So how do you get kids into national parks?We've started a four-part youth initiative: play, learn, serve, work. First is play. Let kids go to the park, ex- plore, satisfy the curiosity that all kids have. When you nurture that curiosity, they build a comfort with being outside. Then comes learn. My favorite classroom is the one with no walls, whether it's natural national parks or historic national parks like battlefields or the places that tell the stories of civil rights. Then serve. When young people volunteer time to make a park better, they see what happens when people leave garbage or when invasive species take over, and they recognize what's at stake. They never look at that place the same again. And finally work. We want to put kids to work in youth corps, like the Civilian Conservation Corps did. The CCC connected millions of young men in the 1930s to public lands, and that connection never left them.Will technology play a part in the parks?Integrating technology into the parks experience is critical, even basics like being able to locate where you are on your smartphone so you can find out about that place. With technology you can keep park information up-to-date.Sally Jewell feels that everyone should explore our national parks. What motivates you to get outside? Let us know—and also tell us who you'd like to see in 3 Questions—in the comments below.",
"The Rio Grande and its tributaries run through southwest Texas' Big Bend National Park, one of the most remote national parks.Chihuahuan Desert vegetation—bunchgrasses, creosote bushes, cactuses, lechuguillas, yuccas, sotols, and more—covers most of the terrain. But the Rio Grande and its lush floodplains and steep, narrow canyons form almost a park of their own. So do the Chisos Mountains; up to 20 degrees cooler than the desert floor, they harbor pine, juniper, and oak, as well as deer, mountain lions, bears, and other wildlife. A heavy rain transforms the desert: Normally dry creek beds roar with water, and seeds long dormant burst into fields of wildflowers.The rocks of Big Bend are a complex lot. Two seas, one after another, flowed and subsided in the region hundreds of millions of years ago, leaving thick deposits of limestone and shale. The present mountains, except the Chisos, uplifted along with the Rockies, roughly 75 million years ago. Around the same time, a 40-mile-wide trough—most of the present-day park—sank along fault lines, leaving the cliffs of Santa Elena Canyon to the west and the Sierra del Carmen to the east rising 1,500 feet and more above the desert floor. In the center, volcanic activity spewed layer upon layer of ash into the air and squeezed molten rock up through the ground to form the Chisos Mountains some 35 million years ago. Molten rock also cooled and hardened underground later to be exposed by erosion.Big Bend's topographic variety supports a remarkable diversity of life, including 1,200 plant species—some found nowhere else in the world.People have passed through this terrain for at least 10,000 years. The human pageant in historical times has included Apache, Spanish conquistadores, Comanche, U.S. soldiers, miners, ranchers and farmers, Mexican revolutionaries, and international outlaws and bandits.At least 450 species of birds inhabit the park—more than any other national park in the United States.",
"Hike: Nankoweap Trail
When to Go: September to May
Round-Trip: 28 Miles, Three to Four Days
Level: Challenging Backpacking TripOf all the Grand Canyon rim-to-river routes, the Nankoweap is the most challenging and the most rewarding. In the miles after the North Rim trailhead on the Kaibab Plateau, the trail plummets 6,000 feet. Allow one to two days to hike down and two to hike out. All the glories of the canyon are on view—buttes and hoodoos, cliffs of sandstone, and redwall limestone. But the real reward is a solitary camp beside the Colorado River near the echoing roar of Nankoweap Rapids and a chance to explore ancient granaries of the Ancestral Puebloan people.Insider Tip: On the way out, lay over at Nankoweap Creek, and be sure to top off your water bottles—the final 14 miles are bone dry.",
"Florida’s Everglades National Park is the largest contiguous mangrove forest in the western hemisphere.Location: Florida Established: December 6, 1947 Size: 1,542,526 acresAnnual visitors: 1 millionVisitor centers: Ernest F. Coe, Flamingo, Shark Valley, Gulf CoastEntrance fees: $25 vehicles, $8 per personnps.gov/everSprawling between South Florida’s Lake Okeechobee and the Gulf of Mexico, the Everglades is one of the world’s largest tropical wetlands. About 20 percent of the region is protected within the confines of Everglades National Park, the third largest national park in the lower 48 states. While the park’s main purpose is preserving a wilderness like none other in North America, the Everglades also provides plenty of scope for outdoor adventure. (Check out our travel guide to Florida.)Although technically a wetland, perhaps it’s best to think of the Everglades as the nation’s slowest, widest river—a constant stream of freshwater roughly 60 miles wide, moving at a speed of around 2.5 miles per day as it makes its way south to Florida Bay. The Seminole people called the region Okeechobee (“river of grass”). And while a large part of the Everglades is covered in razor-sharp sawgrass, the region also encompasses mangrove swamps, tropical hardwood hammocks (island forests), pine and cypress forests, freshwater prairie, and various marine and estuarine habitats. (Plan a trip to Everglades National Park with kids.)The hundred-mile-long Everglades ecosystem once flowed freely from Lake Okeechobee to Florida Bay. Although the park is a federally protected area at the downstream, southernmost portion of the Everglades, upstream development and agribusiness continue to diminish watery habitats (home to abundant wildlife, including tropical wading birds and the endangered Florida manatee).To help restore water flow and preserve one of eastern North America’s last remaining grassland and longleaf pine savanna landscapes, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service established the Everglades Headwaters National Wildlife Refuge and Conservation Area in 2011. Global interest in preserving the Everglades has led to the park’s designation as a UNESCO World Heritage site and International Biosphere Reserve, a Wetland of International Importance, and a specially protected area under the Cartagena Treaty.Although the entire coast is open to exploration via watercraft, land-bound visitors have three options for entering the park: Flamingo in the southwest, Shark Valley in the northeast, and Gulf Coast in the northwest.The Ernest F. Coe Visitor Center is the place to start for those making the 38-mile drive to Florida Bay. Some of the park’s best hikes are just beyond the visitor center, including the short, easy Gumbo Limbo Trail (0.4 mile) and Anhinga Trail (0.8 mile), which wind through a wildlife-rich hammock called Royal Palm, and the 6.1-mile Long Pine Key Trail through the park’s largest remaining stand of native pines.Main Park Road continues through a variety of ecosystems—the freshwater prairie, stunted cypress forest, mangrove and coastal marsh—to Flamingo on the shore of Florida Bay. Badly damaged by Hurricane Irma in 2017, the area has slowly recovered with the reopening of the Flamingo Visitor Center, beachfront campground, and boat and bike rental facilities.In addition to paddling along the shore of Florida Bay, the area boasts a number of inland routes, including the Nine Mile Pond Loop and the Bear Lake Canoe Trail. Flamingo is the southern terminus of the Everglades’ ultimate kayak/canoe experience—the Wilderness Waterway—a 99-mile meander through mangroves and marshes with raised platform “chickee hut” campsites along the way. An entire week is recommended for those who want to make the complete journey between Flamingo and Everglades City.Reached via the historic Tamiami Trail highway across the Everglades, Shark Valley Visitor Center is the gateway to a much different park experience—a chance to explore the freshwater grasslands and hammocks of the Shark River Slough. You won’t come across any sharks, but this might be the best place in the entire park to view crocodiles, turtles, and bird life at close range. The 15-mile Shark Valley Tram Road expedites hiking, biking, and a narrated tram tour to a 65-foot Observation Tower with views across the wet wilds. Seasonally, rangers lead full moon and meteor shower bike rides to the tower.Thirty-six miles from Naples, the Gulf Coast Visitor Center and the town of Everglades City anchor the park’s northwest corner. Daily boat tours are available to the remote Ten Thousand Islands archipelago along the Gulf of Mexico. Gulf Coast is also a jumping-off spot for the Wilderness Waterway, as well as shorter paddle routes like the Turner River Canoe Trail. Everglades City is home to several airboat tours that explore parts of the Everglades outside the national park.Get around: The park is vast, so choose an entry point based on what you want to see and do (see above).When to go: Dry season (December to March) is when most ranger programs and park concessions are available. This is also the best time to see wading birds and other wildlife. Wet season (April to November) is hot, humid, and buggy and has more limited park services.What to do: Look for wildlife on the wheelchair-accessible Anhinga Trail and on the two-hour Shark Valley Tram Tour (reservations recommended). Bike or hike the 15-mile Shark Valley Tram Road loop. See panoramic “river of grass” views from Shark Valley’s 65-foot observation tower. Take a guided boat tour from the Flamingo Marina or Gulf Coast, about 0.5 miles south of the Ranger Station in Everglades City. December through April, join a ranger-led tour of the park’s Cold War–era Nike Missile Base. The now abandoned antiaircraft missile site was built in response to the 1962 Cuban Missile Crisis.Where to stay: The closest hotels are in Homestead (eastern edge of the park) and Everglades City (western edge). Inside the park, camp at Long Pine Key Campground, located six miles from the Ernest Coe Visitor Center (open November to May; first come, first served), or at Flamingo Campground on Florida Bay (open year-round; reservations highly recommended from December to April). Or backcountry camp on ground or beach sites or on “chickees” (elevated camping platforms). Most backcountry sites are accessible only by water and require permits and reservations (make them in person at the ranger station no more than 24 hours in advance).Read before you go: Originally published in 1947, the definitive Everglades book remains The Everglades: River of Grass by Florida writer and conservationist Marjory Stoneman Douglas.",
"There’s never been a better time to get down to Florida. Everything you need to recharge is there—sunny sands, blues skies, subtropical wilderness, and affordable luxury. Book ahead and find deals; that trip-of-a-lifetime could become an annual tradition.Across the tip of the Florida peninsula, vast plains of saw grass are dotted with tree islands like ships in a verdant sea known as the Everglades. On a visit to Everglades National Park, you will be entering the largest subtropical wilderness in the United States. That means a million and a half acres of dank mystery and wonder, from mirror-water haunts of rare and endangered species to swamp trails that invite exploration. Wood storks, American crocodile, and panthers have homes here among ghost orchids and old-growth cypress that live on, deep in the Everglades’ watery mazes.Take a tram tour for sightings of wading birds and alligators. Get even closer to nature on a bicycle or paddling trail. Or simply cruise through on a scenic drive, stopping for the overlooks and leg-stretcher trails.One of Florida’s finest cities, Sarasota pleases the eye in more ways than one. Its world-class art museum, clean downtown, attractive landscaping, and pristine beaches add up to a trip-worthy destination.The family who created America’s most famous circus happened to love art. The John and Mable Ringling Museum of Art holds the world’s largest collection of Rubens’ paintings and many other treasures, including old circus costumes, wagons, and the world’s largest miniature circus.In town, shop the chic boutiques, savor a meal at one of many fine restaurants, and then head over to the shore for a day of Gulf Coast fun.When America’s great inventors needed to get away, they came to Florida. But they didn’t just lie out in the sun. Thomas Edison and Henry Ford were good friends who had winter homes next to each other, and they stayed busy tinkering. Visit their homes in Fort Myers to see what genius does on vacation.Tour Edison’s 1920s research laboratory and watch demonstrations that use his old equipment. Wander the 25-acre botanical garden that began as an experiment. It has more than 1,000 plant varieties from around the world, including a banyan tree Edison and friends imported for rubber experiments; it’s now an acre wide.The sunny state’s Gulf coast beaches have variety to suit every taste. Do you crave powdery white shoreline and seashells galore? In the mood for Gulf sunsets and gentle waves? Looking for seclusion, or a place to party? Fishing or snorkeling? The Gulf shore has it all, so it’s no wonder that these beaches are consistently ranked among the best in the world.Lido Key near Sarasota is a mecca for eco-tourism and sunset cruises; dolphin watching, sailing, and deep sea fishing also get top billing here. And the seafood is Gulf fresh. Go to St. Armands Circle for the best shopping around, and to Mote Marine Aquarium for nose-to-nose encounters with underwater life. Not far south, take a walk on lovely Venice Beach and find fossilized shark’s teeth.Who are the Floridians? They are the descendants of Timucuan, Miccosukee, and Seminole, European explorers and freed slaves, Cuban and Haitian refugees. Their art and architecture, language and food have mixed through the centuries to present a place like no other. They welcome you to their museums, parks, and communities, where you can delve into the fascinating story of Florida.Earthen temple mounds and shell mounds dot the Florida peninsula; archaeological parks show evidence of Native American occupation dating back to 200 B.C. Spanish missions, settled in the late 17th century, are even older than those in California.To see a living Native American community, visit the Big Cypress Seminole Indian Reservation in South Florida. An impressive modern theater and museum tell the story of the Seminole, and a mile-long boardwalk weaves through a 60-acre cypress dome to an area where demonstrators exhibit traditional craftmaking. Try such local delicacies as frybread, frog legs, and gator tail nuggets.Not to be overlooked, St. Petersburg has a number of wonderful surprises. Glimmering between the Gulf of Mexico and Tampa Bay, the town holds title to “most consecutive days with sunshine” at 768 days.The Salvador Dali Museum has the largest collection of Dali’s work outside Spain. Bold colors work well in waterfront Florida. Come for a visit and prepare to be awed by the depth of this flamboyant surrealist, who had far more than dripping clocks in his oeuvre.Elsewhere in town, check out the charming array of shops, restaurants, and bars. Among other great museums, the Chihuly Collection dazzles with colorful glasswork, and the Museum of Fine Arts showcases an impressive range of world masterpieces.With so much of Florida about water, it would be a shame not to see it at water level. Get intimate with natural Florida in a kayak or canoe and experience the place the way the early explorers did.Weedon Island Preserve shelters 3,190 acres of protected coastal wilderness in St. Petersburg. Take a leisurely two- or four-mile trail to discover the natural world flourishing on the edge of a city. South of Sarasota, Charlotte Harbor is the state’s second-largest estuary at 270 square miles. Its 830 miles of shoreline embrace a network of barrier islands, river passages, tropical hammock, pine flatwoods, freshwater marsh, and mangrove forests. Paddlers delight in finding new scenes worthy of camera, notebook, and memory.Florida is a paddlers paradise—all you need are strong arms and the spirit of adventure.It’s hard to find a better strand of peaceful beauty than Sanibel and Captiva Islands. The sun-blessed coastline makes a graceful, 50-mile curve into the Gulf of Mexico. Developed just enough to provide a range of resorts from family to luxury, this double hit of barrier island life add to a pretty perfect vacation destination.Most people head immediately to the beach, kick off their shoes, and squeak through soft white sand. In no time, they’re doing the Sanibel shuffle—walking slowly, head down, looking for the likes of sand dollars, whelks, and calico scallops. The shelling here is world famous. Take a tour with scientists from the Bailey-Matthews National Shell Museum, and see the museum’s hundreds of shells from around the globe.Just north, Captiva has its own magical rhythm. Try sailing, biking, birding, and any number of water activities.The Everglades isn’t the only great park in Florida. With 200 state and national parks, forests, and wildlife refuges to choose from, you can design your own roster of activities and sights, and then find a park to match.Big Cypress National Preserve protects more than 729,000 acres of swamp. Its tropical and temperate plant communities harbor a rich tapestry of wildlife, including the elusive Florida panther. The preserve also serves as a vital buffer for the neighboring Everglades. Explore its hidden nature by kayak or foot. Over on Sanibel Island, the Ding Darling National Wildlife Refuge supports a staggering number of wild creatures in its bogs, canals, inlets, mangrove swamps, and upland forests. Look for roseate spoonbills and snowy egrets. Inland from Sarasota, Myakka River State Park is one of Florida’s oldest and largest state parks. A 40-mile trail winds through the wilderness, home to thousands of birds, gators, and deer.For a taste of both sophistication and wild Florida, head down along the Gulf of Mexico to Naples, a cocktail of resort and remote. Families, romantic vacationers, and everybody in-between will find a welcoming harbor. Nature lovers fall for the 15-acre Naples Nature Center, and beach aficionados take naturally to Delnor-Wiggins Pass State Recreation Area. Shoppers should head to the swank galleries and boutiques of Third Street South and Fifth Avenue South.Marco Island spoils visitors with luxury resorts, to-die-for beaches, and lush parks. The only developed of the Ten Thousand Islands, Marco features a tropical climate and a laidback lifestyle. Take a walk into the wild on the Briggs Nature Center’s half-mile boardwalk. Nearby Collier-Seminole State Park offers more than 6,000 acres of wild Florida; a boat tour is a must.",
"The mangrove-fringed bays of Hurricane Hole on the island of St. John are a haven for 33 coral species.With coral reefs in decline and NOAA calling for a larger protected area for reefs in the Gulf of Mexico, U.S. Geological Survey scientists are pointing out another strategy to save reefs: First save the mangroves.Mangrove trees' thickets of stilt-like roots protect coastal land from erosion and help mitigate the damage of tsunamis and hurricanes.They may also serve as a haven for corals, according to a recent report in Biogeosciences. (Read more about how mangroves support animal life.)Warming waters have not been kind to coral reefs. Heat causes corals to release the photosynthetic algae that live within and help feed the reefbuilding creatures—a phenomenon called bleaching, which is often fatal. In the Caribbean, where bleaching is widespread, more than 50 percent of the area that was covered by reefs in the 1970s is no longer.In the mangroves of Hurricane Hole on St. John, U.S. Virgin Islands, however, Caroline Rogers of the USGS made a startling discovery. Growing among the tree roots were more than 30 coral species, including four threatened species. Some of the older corals must have survived bleaching that devastated the nearby reefs, suggesting the mangroves protected them.Reefs worldwide are facing destruction at every turn, as can be seen in this map of the Mesoamerican Reef, at the other end of the Caribbean from St. John.Why It MattersThe corals in Hurricane Hole mangroves appear to be thriving, especially where the shade of the trees protects them from extra heating, Rogers says. She and colleagues report that the corals recovered rather well from a bleaching episode in 2010.The corals in mangroves may also have evolved to be more resistant to bleaching than their brethren on reefs, the researchers speculate. Previous studies suggest that corals that are accustomed to environmental fluctuation can better weather extreme heat.That raises hope that these more bleach-resistant corals may be able to recolonize dead reefs.Threatened species, including star corals, take shelter in the shade of mangrove trees.The Big PictureBy 2030, more than 90 percent of the world's coral reefs will be endangered by bleaching, acidity from rising atmospheric carbon dioxide, tourism, and other threats.Researchers are looking for refuges for corals to hide out in, including deeper reefs with cooler water. These places may become top conservation priorities. (Read more about the search for refuges.)What's NextPreserving mangroves may be one in a portfolio of strategies to help corals survive the effects of climate change. Hurricane Hole is part of the protected Virgin Islands Coral Reef National Monument, but mangroves worldwide are being destroyed at a prodigious rate.The variety of coral species makes prediction difficult, says Rogers. But it also ups the chances that at least some species will survive the coming changes."That's to be optimistic," she says, "about a fairly dire circumstance."Follow Veronique Greenwood on Twitter.",
"Conservation photographer and National Geographic Explorer Carlton Ward, Jr., has been captivated by Florida’s Everglades National Park since he was a child, so much so that he’s made protecting it—and the amazing wildlife that lives there—his life’s work.He has been exploring and documenting the park with his camera since college, a labor of love that led him to launch the Florida Wildlife Corridor Expedition in 2012 to increase public awareness of the importance of protecting vital habitat in the Everglades.Here’s a look at the ecological wonderland through his unique lens.Follow Carlton’s story on Instagram and Twitter @CarltonWard. See more of his photographic work on Facebook.Winter is the best time to visit my park because there are fewer mosquitos. But planning a trip in summer is the best time to see the most beautiful light and powerful cloud formations.My park’s biggest attraction is the Anhinga Trail, but a visit isn’t complete without seeing Pahayokee Overlook.If I could offer one practical tip for optimizing your visit, it would be to allow sufficient time to slow down and take in the vastness and intricacies of the park.My favorite “park secret” is getting off the boardwalk and wading through the sawgrass. It’s a powerful experience to immerse yourself in the “River of Grass.”Head to the Anhinga Trail if you want to see wildlife. If you’re really lucky, you’ll spot a snail kite. Florida panthers can be seen elsewhere in the park.For the best view, head to Pahayokee Overlook or Shark Valley Tower.The Everglades Wilderness Waterway is the best trail in the park and the main park road, State Highway 9336, is the most scenic drive.If you’re up for an adventure/physical challenge, try paddling or poling through the heart of the Shark River Slough.To experience the park’s cultural side, visit with the Miccosukee Indians.The Everglades City Rod & Gun Club or the Ivey House bed and breakfast are the best places to stay while you’re visiting and Triad Seafood is the best place to eat.If you only have one day to spend in the park, make sure to hit the Anhinga Trail, Mahogany Hammock Trail, and Pahayokee Overlook.If you’re interested in a guided tour, I recommend ranger-led programs, most of which are available December through March.The most peaceful place in the park has to be amidst the sawgrass in the middle of the Shark River Slough.Franklin Adams is an “unsung hero” of my park because he helped save Big Cypress National Preserve and its vast wildlife habitat to the west.American alligators and American crocodiles sharing the same waters could only happen in my park.If you have kids (or are a kid at heart), you won’t want to miss the stacks of alligators near the Shark Valley Visitor Center.Just outside park boundaries, you can visit the Miccosukee Indian Village and museum.If my park had a mascot it would be the ubiquitous American alligator or the mysterious Florida panther.The biggest threat to this park’s future is failing to restore the water flow and overdevelopment of the Everglades Headwaters.In 140 characters or less, the world should heart my park because the watery wilderness envelops you and gives hope that we can still save the planet.",
"Kayakers with Journey’s St. George Island explore the Florida Circumnavigational Saltwater Paddling Trail, the state's longest sea kayaking trail.The Florida Circumnavigational Saltwater Paddling Trail, or CT, is the state's longest sea kayaking trail. Referred to as the saltwater version of the Appalachian Trail, the 1,515-mile route is divided into 26 segments. Experienced, long-distance kayakers can thru-paddle the entire trail in four or five months. Others conquer the CT over several months or years, or kayak a single segment.Segment 1: Pensacola/Fort PickensThis opening segment is where thru-paddlers typically start or end their journeys, yet it's also an ideal stretch to sample what the CT is all about, says Doug Alderson, assistant bureau chief for the Florida Department of Environmental Protection's Office of Greenways and Trails. "Besides the pristine nature of Big Lagoon State Park and the Gulf Islands National Seashore, what strikes me about this segment is the history," he adds. "You pass between Fort Barrancas on the mainland and Fort Pickens on Santa Rosa Island, where you can stop and walk through the fort." And if you encounter trouble crossing Pensacola Bay here, you'll want to improve your open-water paddling skills before attempting more segments of the CT.Segment 14: Everglades/Florida BayOne of the CT's two wilderness segments (the other is Segment 6, Big Bend Coast) the Everglades/Florida Bay section offers two options: an island route along Florida Bay and a more sheltered inland route along the Wilderness Waterway. "The island route is highly scenic and generally less buggy," says Alderson. "And once you pop out of the maze of mangroves from Everglades City, navigation is fairly easy with a GPS and map." As you paddle, what may be most surprising is what you don't see. "Except for some porta-potties and a couple of camping shelters, there are no structures—no houses or condos—for a hundred miles of coast," says Alderson. "How many places can you do that along the Gulf of Mexico?"Segment 26: Timucuan Trails/Fort ClinchIt's fitting that this history-rich section of the CT begins, or ends, at Fort Clinch, one of the nation's best preserved 19th-century forts. Spend at least three days paddling the route to allow ample time to stop and tour places such as Kingsley Plantation and the Ribault Club. "Near the end of the trail, Old Fernandina is a must-stop," says Alderson. "This place may have changed hands more than any other Florida city, with eight flags once flying along its harbor. Stop here to learn about the somewhat obscure East Florida Patriot War of 1812."TRAVEL TIPSWhen to Go: October through AprilWhat to Bring: Pack for a wilderness sea kayaking experience using the "Recommended Gear and Safety Equipment for Extended Trips" list prepared by the Florida Department of Environmental Protection Office of Greenways and Trails.Where to Go: Review the route segment guide to choose a portion of the CT that fits your kayaking abilities and interests and to learn about safety precautions related to tides, rocks, boat traffic, and other potential hazards in that segment.Practical Tip: Long-distance sea kayaking is strenuous and presents many challenges. Before tackling any section of the CT, gradually build strength, fitness, and skills by taking shorter sea kayaking trips.",
"Everglades has two seasons: dry (mid-December through mid-April) and wet (the rest of the year). The park schedules most of its activities in the dry season; hot, humid weather and clouds of mosquitoes make park visitors quite uncomfortable during the wet season.South from Miami, take US 1—Florida's Turnpike to Florida City, then go west on Fla. 9336 (Palm Dr.) to the Ernest F. Coe Visitor Center, about 50 miles from Miami. West from Miami, take US 41 (the Tamiami Trail) to Shark Valley Visitor Center. From Naples, head east on US 41 to Fla. 29, then south to Everglades City. Airports: Miami and Naples.If you can stay only a day for a drive-in visit, get out of your car and learn about Everglades ecology by taking self-guided walks at road turnoffs on the drive from the Ernest F. Coe Visitor Center to Flamingo. For a longer stay, pick either Flamingo or Everglades City as your base and time your travels to the schedules of concession boat tours. In wet or dry season, only a boat or canoe gives you access to the backcountry. Because of mosquitoes, the dry season is best for canoeing. (Near park entrances you'll see signs advertising airboat rides; airboats, which can disturb wildlife and tear up saw grass, are not licensed to operate in the park.)A wide variety of lodging options are available in and around the park.There are two front-country campgrounds in the park: Flamingo and Long Pine Key. Tent and RV sites are available, but there are no hookups. The cost is $16 per night, and during the dry season there is a 14-night limit. You can also opt to go backcountry camping at various ground and beach sites. To visit these remote areas of the park, you will need a $10 backcountry permit. Reservations cannot be made for backcountry camps or Long Pine Key. To make camping reservations at Flamingo, go to: www.recreation.gov.The Coral Roc Motel is a small facility of 17 units. The rooms are air-conditioned and there is a pool. To make reservations, call 1 305 246 8888.The Knights Inn, located off US 1, offers 48 air-conditioned rooms, some with kitchenettes. There is also a pool.Ten miles from the park is Best Western Gateway to the Keys. The hotel has a pool and offers free continental breakfast.Come prepared! Bring sunscreen, bug repellant, and plenty of water. If you are camping, bring all of the supplies you will need because no equipment is for sale in the park.No pets are allowed in the park except at the campgrounds.www.nps.gov/ever",
"Seen from the International Space Station, the vibrant blue waters of Oregon's Crater Lake fill a dormant volcano.There are plenty of things you cannot see from outer space: your home, the Eiffel Tower, the Taj Mahal. Most man-made structures are hard to enjoy from beyond the edges of low Earth orbit (save for, debatably, the Great Wall of China). Nature, on the other hand, takes on a whole new kind of beauty from the edges of our atmosphere.In 2017 the National Park Service saw over 330 million visitors across its 84 million acres. On the ground level, those numbers are huge. From space, the numbers seem a bit more manageable. While considering your next trip, explore some of these iconic sights the way our national bird might: from above."Aerial view of Autumn in Dixville Notch, New Hampshire. I love driving on these roads during fall. I used a drone to capture the fall colors that cannot be seen from the road." This photo was submitted to the Nature Photographer of the Year Contest 2017.",
"Few forget their first glimpse of Crater Lake on a clear summer’s day—21 square miles of water so intensely blue it looks like ink, ringed by cliffs towering up to 2,000 feet above. The mountain bluebird, Native American legend says, was gray before dipping into these waters.The tranquil gem of the Cascade Range is set in a dormant volcano called Mount Mazama, one in the chain of volcanoes that includes Mount St. Helens. Mount Mazama’s eruption about 5700 B.C. catapulted volcanic ash miles into the sky and expelled so much pumice and ash that the summit soon collapsed, creating a huge, smoldering caldera.Eventually, rain and snowmelt accumulated in the caldera, forming a lake more than 1,900 feet deep, the deepest in the United States. Wildflowers, along with hemlock, fir, and pine, recolonized surroundings. Black bears, bobcats, deer, marmots, eagles, and hawks returned.Scientists have yet to completely understand Crater Lake’s ecology. In 1988 and 1989, using a manned submarine, they discovered evidence that proves hydrothermal venting exists on the lake’s bottom and may play a role in its character.Crater Lake forms a superb setting for day hikes. Thanks to some of the cleanest air in the nation, you can see more than a hundred miles from points along many of the park’s 90 miles of trails. Forests of mountain hemlock and Shasta red fir predominate near the caldera rim, where twisted whitebark pines testify to the harshness of the long winter. Ponderosa pine, the park’s largest tree, and lodgepole pine are common farther down from the rim.The road linking two small villages—Mazama and Rim—and service centers on the south side of the park provides some of the best scenery away from the lake itself. The seven miles from Mazama to Rim exposes visitors to the region’s dry pine forest ecology, with some wonderful wildflower meadows. While in Rim Village, stroll to Sinnott Memorial Overlook to gaze at the lake’s turquoise waters.Spend at least a half day touring the 33-mile Rim Drive, enjoying its many overlooks and several hiking trails. From the southeast portion of Rim Drive, take Pinnacles Road about six miles to see the Pinnacles, an unusual grouping of volcanic pumice spires. As the sides of Wheeler Canyon eroded away, these graceful fossil fumaroles emerged, each marking where volcanic gas rose up through hot ash deposits. There’s an overlook from the parking area, on an easy half-mile trail.Perhaps the best secret hike in the park is across the lake—the Watchman Trail, which interpretive ranger Dave Grimes says “offers the best of the park in one trail.” It is only moderately steep, climbing just 420 feet in 0.8 mile (one way).To experience the lake itself, hike down the mile-long Cleetwood Trail to the dock on the shore. From here, a concessioner offers boat tours that circumnavigate the lake in two hours, while providing fine lessons on the geology and history of Crater Lake. The tour comes with great views of the only islands in the lake, Phantom Ship (so named because it seems to disappear completely against the crater’s walls when viewed from much of the rim) and the cinder-cone peak of Wizard Island. The standard tour runs often during peak season, typically July through September.On a second day, consider exploring more of Wizard Island. From the island dock, a mile-long trail weaves upward through a series of switchbacks to the crater at the cinder cone’s summit at 6,940 feet. The rim of this crater-within-crater provides views of the lake that only a tiny fraction of visitors ever get to see.During Crater Lake’s long winters, the annual snowfall average of 43 feet draws cross-country skiers and snowshoers to the lakeside—so long as the remaining open entrance roads are plowed. Snowmobiling is allowed only on the unplowed road from the North Entrance park boundary to the North Junction. The Rim Village area makes a great homebase, with ranger-led snowshoe trips and opportunities for cross-country skiing and self-guided snowshoeing.Because of the park’s position high in the Cascade Mountains, winter comes early and lingers. Oreg. 62 and the access road leading to Rim Village remain open in winter. The drive around the lake usually closes in October because of snow; in some years, the drive may not reopen completely until mid-July. The lake is at its best in the summer, with the park’s wildflowers peaking in late July to early August.Enter the park from the west (Medford, about 85 miles away) or the south (Klamath Falls, about 65 miles away) on Oreg. 62, or from the north on Oreg. 138. Nearby airports include Medford and Klamath Falls.Crater Lake Hospitality operates Crater Lake Lodge at Rim Village from mid-May through October and the Cabins at Mazama Village (mid-May through late September). The Klamath County Chamber of Commerce and the Medford/Jackson County Chamber of Commerce list options outside the park.In addition to hotels, the park offers two seasonal campgrounds. Mazama Campground has 214 sites, three-quarters of which may be reserved. Operated by the National Park Service, Lost Creek Campground (closed in 2022) has 16 tent sites, which are first come, first served. A free permit, available from park headquarters, is needed for backcountry camping.",
"Maintaining the Eiffel Tower's signature sparkle requires monumental effort. The soaring iron lattice gets a complete makeover with a fresh coat of paint approximately every seven years—certainly no small feat. At 984 feet, the tower earned the title of the tallest structure in the world when Gustave Eiffel designed it as a temporary exhibit for the 1889 World's Fair.The frequency keeps everything rust-free, but the color choice is purely aesthetic. Monsieur Eiffel chose to paint the Tower red, and since then, the Eiffel Tower changed colors several times, from reddish-brown to mustard yellows, and more recently, shades of brown. Now the Iron Lady's three different shades of specially made "Eiffel Tower Brown" paint—darkest at the bottom and lighter at the top—perfectly compliments the Parisian sky.Around 25 crew members fearlessly scale the tower using some 35 miles of climbing rope for 18 months during the last painting, which began in 2009. Some 66 tons of lead-free paint proves necessary to cover each crevice, beam, nut, and bolt.All of it gets done the old-fashioned way. The Eiffel Tower still gets repainted using the same tried and true method from its first painting in the 19th century—completely by hand, using small round brushes. Working this way keeps the tower open, plus no paint drips on anyone's head.The beauty regime doesn't end there. Ongoing cleaning and restoration work needs four tons of wipes, 25,000 garbage bags, and 105 gallons of metal cleaning solution per year. No corners get cut, not even while facing difficult times. Workers spent half a day just climbing the 1,665 steps (108 stories) to start cleaning the Eiffel Tower in 1946 when electricity rations after World War II kept the elevators off.Never built to last, the Eiffel Tower endures as the symbol of Paris. The 128-year-old iron structure welcomes around seven million visitors per year, making it the most-visited paid-for attraction in the world.Now city authorities plan a major 300 million euro renovation over the next 15 years to improve access and security. The city hopefully bid to host the 2024 Summer Olympics and the 2025 World Fair. So a squeaky clean Eiffel Tower helps Paris put it's best face forward.",
"The Taj Mahal is widely considered one of the most beautiful buildings ever created. The exquisite marble structure in Agra, India, is a mausoleum, an enduring monument to the love of a husband for his favorite wife. It's also an eternal testament to the artistic and scientific accomplishments of a wealthy empire.Shah Jahan, “the King of the World,” took control of the Mughal Empire throne in 1628 very much in love with the queen he dubbed Mumtaz Mahal or “Chosen One of the Palace.” The poets at Agra’s Mughal court said her beauty was such that the moon hid its face in shame before her.The Mughals were at the peak of their power and wealth during Shah Jahan’s reign, and India’s rich lode of precious gems yielded him much wealth and power. But he was powerless to stop Mumtaz Mahal’s death during childbirth in 1631. Legend has it that she bound him with a deathbed promise to build her the most beautiful tomb ever known.Mughal emperor Shah Jahan built the Taj Mahal in Agra, India, as a tribute to his favorite wife, who died in childbirth in 1631. The white marble monument, with its sprawling gardens, took more than 15 years to build.Promise or no, Shah Jahan poured his passion and wealth into the creation of just such a monument. It is said that 20,000 stone carvers, masons, and artists from across India and as far as Turkey and Iraq were employed under a team of architects to build the Taj Mahal in the lush gardens on the banks of Agra’s Jamuna River. They completed the epic task between 1631 and 1648.While the arch-and-dome profile of clean white marble has become iconic, other beauties lie in the Taj Mahal’s painstaking details: inlaid semiprecious stones and carvings and Koranic verse in calligraphy create an enchanting interior space where Shah Jahan came to visit his wife’s remains before he was eventually interred at her side.The Taj Mahal’s familiar marble domes are framed by four minarets from which Muslims are called to prayer. Each is designed with a slight outward lean, presumably to protect the main mausoleum in case one of them should collapse.Two red sandstone buildings also flank the main mausoleum on either side. One, to the west, is a mosque. The other is a former guesthouse.These buildings are set within lush gardens, complete with an enormous reflecting pool that regularly does what no human has ever been able to accomplish—duplicate the beauty of the Taj Mahal.Shah Jahan himself gazed upon that beautiful image until the end of his days—but as a prisoner, not a ruler. His son Aurangzeb seized the Mughal throne and imprisoned his father in Agra’s Red Fort (itself a World Heritage site and popular tourist attraction). Whether as consolation or torture, Shah Jahan commanded a view of the Taj Mahal from his window.Agra is a major city in the Indian state of Uttar Pradesh and well accustomed to visitors—some three million people visit the Taj Mahal each year. The city is accessible by bus, train, and (limited) air service and has a wide range of tourist amenities. Access to the Taj Mahal complex is on foot.The Taj Mahal is a year-round attraction and often busy, though new ticketing systems have thinned crowds at peak times. Visitors in search of more solitude might try coming early or late in the day. One time NOT to visit is on Friday, when the Taj Mahal is closed.The mausoleum’s interior is a striking (if smallish) space that begs some leisurely exploration. But a good part of any visit to the Taj Mahal will be spent looking at the building from the outside. The mausoleum’s clean white marble shifts in color and tone to match the mood of the world outside—a transformation so enchanting that it’s worth lingering to gaze at the building in different conditions, such as the rosy glow of dawn or the magical light of a full moon.",
""Aerial view of Autumn in Dixville Notch, New Hampshire. I love driving on these roads during fall. I used a drone to capture the fall colors that cannot be seen from the road." This photo was submitted to the Nature Photographer of the Year Contest 2017.Seasons can turn in the blink of an eye. In the northern hemisphere, winter is quickly approaching. Here are some photos to help us savor the beauty of changing seasons just a bit longer, thanks to amazing submissions in the Nature Photographer of the Year Contest 2017. Entries end November 17th! Enter your best nature photos for a chance to win $10,000 and be published in National Geographic magazine.",
"A mother grizzly and her cub roam Yellowstone National Park.With summer being the busiest season for most U.S. national parks, the potential for run-ins with wildlife increases—and so do visits to the emergency room.Though most people imagine bears or bison are the animals to watch out for, even small mammals can pose a risk.“At the Grand Canyon, the number one reason people end up at the clinic is from squirrel bites,” says Kathy Kupper, a spokesperson for the U.S. National Park Service.It’s illegal to approach, harass, or feed any type of wildlife in national parks, adds Kupper. “No matter the size, no matter how harmless or safe they appear.”Between 2008 and 2015 in the United States, 1,160 people died in animal encounters, mostly due to domestic animals such as dogs, followed by venomous species such as hornets, bees, and snakes.Though such incidents are rare, they can be made even rarer by following a few basic guidelines. The first and perhaps most important is to give wildlife a lot of room.“If your actions cause a reaction from the animal, then you’re too close,” says Kupper. “And if you can take a selfie with wildlife, then you’re definitely too close.” (Why people risk their lives for the ultimate animal selfie.)Bison rut in Yellowstone National Park's Lamar Valley.Many problems with wildlife can be solved simply by doing a little bit of research before entering an unfamiliar area.For instance, the American alligator, which can be found from South Carolina to Florida to Texas, can reach up to 15 feet long and weigh around a thousand pounds. These apex predators are capable of inflicting great bodily harm to their prey, and they have been known to kill humans from time to time.It may seem obvious, but don’t approach an alligator or get in the water with one. Certain behaviors, like splashing at the water’s edge, are also a no-no for this particular animal, says Rolf Olson, project leader for the Arthur R. Marshall Loxahatchee National Wildlife Refuge in Florida.“You can be within 10 to 15 feet as long as you’re up on dry ground,” Olson says. “Alligators can charge really fast and move really quickly, but they’re most dangerous in water.”A alligator surfaces in Everglades National Park. It's important to know what animals live in places you visit, experts say.Predators are also not the only animals that should be given a wide berth: Large herbivores like bison and hippos can be just as deadly. In Alaska, more people are injured by moose than bears each year. Bison, which may look slow-moving, are unpredictable and can charge in an instant. They're capable of running up to 35 miles an hour and changing directions with more speed and agility than a horse. (Read why a bison attacked a tourist in Yellowstone National Park.)In general, Kupper says remaining at least a hundred yards away from large animals like bears, wolves, and cats. For other wildlife, 25 yards is usually a good buffer.In addition to knowing your surroundings and keeping a distance, one of the best things you can do to prevent negative wildlife encounters is to keep your food to yourself.This is because when animals come to associate humans with food, it can create situations that put both parties at risk. (See National Geographic's tips for photographing wildlife.)In fact, Kupper says even small mammals with a taste for human food can be surprisingly harmful. (Here’s how to get kids to respect wildlife.)Of course, larger animals can do even more damage, which is why Olson, of the Florida refuge, says he and his team work tirelessly to keep people from feeding the alligators.“People have brought filet mignon down here,” he says.Food-habituated animals sometimes have to be trapped, relocated, or euthanized by wildlife managers because of the threat they pose to humans. This is why those in the know say “A fed bear is a dead bear.”Black bears have an incredible sense of smell, and will easily track down any human food that's left out or improperly stored. Not only are bears habituated to people more dangerous, they have shorter life-spans than bears that steer clear of us. (Here’s how to do wildlife tourism right and how to avoid negative interactions with bears.)In the end, Kupper says that we need to remember that seeing wildlife is a privilege.“You’re in their home,” she says. “We all need to do our part to make sure that they are safe so that others can enjoy them as well.”",
"At a zoo in France, a woman photographs a white tiger behind glass. A sign says not to touch. Stories of people entering wild animal enclosures to get selfies tend to baffle the public: Why would a person ever do something so foolish?It goes without saying that it’s a terrible idea to enter a wild animal’s enclosure.But a few days ago, in the quest for a selfie, a woman climbed over the concrete barrier of a jaguar enclosure at Wildlife World Zoo, outside of Phoenix, Arizona. The jaguar grabbed her sweater and ripped into her arm—the grisly wound caught on video. Bystanders pulled her away before the animal could injure her further. She’s fine—so is the jaguar—and has admitted fault for her actions.The story went viral, and the internet collectively posed the question: What would possess someone to do something so foolish?This isn’t the first time a story of a person acting reckless to get close to a wild animal has made headlines. Last year, an intoxicated man jumped into a lion enclosure at an Indian zoo because he wanted to see the big cats up close. A zoo-goer in China entered multiple animal enclosures for selfies before being killed by a walrus. Similar incidents are a regular occurrence in natural settings too: Multiple tourists in Yellowstone National Park have been gored by bison when they’ve gotten too close for a photo.  It’s common sense to not get close to wild animals that can hurt you. It’s why zoos have barriers—sometimes multiple walls—to keep people seperated from animals. Signs posted everywhere state the obvious: Keep your hands out of the cage.Yet the impulse to get close to wild animals can be strong enough to make someone ignore reason.As lions sleep in their enclosure at a Lithuania zoo, a woman snaps a photo. Television and social media is full of footage of people interacting hands-on with big cats. These controversial activities may perpetuate a misconception that the large predators aren't truly dangerous.“Animals have become less real to us,” says Susan Clayton, a professor of psychology and environmental studies at the College of Wooster in Ohio. Because we encounter exotic animals most frequently in managed settings like zoos, she believes that the animals, to some extent, become like props to us. People who get recklessly close to wild animals obviously don’t really think before they act, says Clayton, “but at a more implicit level, [they’ve] stopped associating animals with danger.”There are a number of cultural reasons for it. For one, media often normalize encounters with dangerous animals, Clayton says. Television shows and YouTube videos depicting thrill-seekers wrangling wild animals “de-fang the animal symbolically.” In other words, seeing a man like “Lion Whisperer” Kevin Richardson regularly play-fight and cuddle with with lions, jaguars, and hyenas may send the message that these animals aren’t so dangerous after all. Richardson has just under a million subscribers to his YouTube channel, but has received criticism from some conservation groups who say that his promotion of close contact with lions is irresponsible. (In 2017, a woman was mauled to death by a lion on one of his reserves.)Social platforms are also saturated with wild animal selfies. Many zoos, parks, and adventure tours around the world offer intimate experiences to the public, like walking with lions, posing with adult tigers, and cage diving with sharks—all of which are potentially dangerous to both humans and the animals’ well-being.Social media is perfectly positioned to contribute to the rise of thrill-seeking animal encounters, says Erin Vogel, a postdoctoral fellow in the department of psychology at the University of California, San Francisco. Getting likes and comments provide instant gratification, she says, noting that studies have found that when you post to social media, your self-esteem actually gets a temporary boost.To hold onto that feeling, even subconsciously, people may “go to more and more extremes” to showcase the most exciting versions of themselves, Vogel says. It may not be enough to get a photo of a beautiful, dangerous animal from outside a cage or across a valley, she says. By taking a selfie, you show that you’re part of that experience.A visitor views a polar bear at a zoo in France from behind glass. At many U.S. national parks, including Yellowstone, people increasingly risk death to get close to bears and other wild animals for photo ops. Yellowstone National Park has issued "safe selfie" guidelines to try to deter the reckless behavior.It’s not just dangerous animal encounters. People risk their lives all the time for extreme selfies, by standing near moving trains, teetering on the edges of cliffs, even posing with loaded guns. Results are often tragic. A 2018 study found that there were 259 documented “selfie deaths” worldwide between 2011 and 2017. Most incidents involved risky behavior, and the victims were mostly men in their early 20s.“People have always liked to do dangerous things,” Vogel says, even before social media existed. “But we do see people behaving on social media in ways they wouldn’t otherwise.” It’s the same impulse that takes over when you’re on vacation, or having a great experience with friends: If you’re focused on capturing the moment on Instagram, you’re not actually fully, consciously in the moment.“If you’re already focused on posting that selfie on social media, you’re not focused on what’s right in front of you, which is a dangerous wild animal,” Vogel says. It’s a recipe for impulsive decision-making.When it comes to animal encounters, reckless decisions can put the animal’s safety at risk as well. Zoo animals often must be killed to protect the person who’s entered their space, like Harambe, the 17-year old gorilla who was shot in 2015 at the Cincinnati zoo when a young boy fell in his enclosure.Often, thrill-seekers actively imperil the lives of animals. Just last week, a video showed a man jumping off a Florida harbor platform onto a wild pelican’s back. The video shows the pelican struggling to get away as onlookers laugh. In 2015, a video went viral that showed a man jumping on the back of a female moose as she swam across a lake in British Columbia, Canada.The common factor in these incidents, says Clayton, the psychology and environmental studies professor, is that people are not respecting the sentience of the animal. “The zoo environment can encourage the perspective that [animals] are there for us,” she says.It’s often in childhood when people learn to either objectify animals or to treat them with respect, she says, depending on the education that they have. At the zoo, “a parent can point and laugh at a bear and say, ‘Doesn’t he look stupid?’ Or you can use the zoo experience as a way to teach children about respecting animals.”And about those dangerous selfie impulses: When you’re by a tiger cage, Vogel says, resist the urge to do something foolish for a photo. “Your selfie doesn’t have to be all or nothing.”",
"Children tend to project human qualities on animals, something that isn’t always the best thing for the animal—or a kid. (Paddington may live with a human family in the movie but, you definitely don’t want your child thinking they can bring home a wild bear cub.) Show kids that animals in their natural habitats are living their best life—and should keep doing that. Start by watching these silly music videos together to see animals gettin’ wild in their environment.It’s easy for kids to respect those cute and cuddly mammals. But what about all those "scary" critters, such as bees, worms, and snakes? Habitats need all sorts of animals to stay healthy, so show kids why every critter is important. (For instance, worms keep soil healthy by wriggling through the dirt.) Get kids psyched about those not-so-cute animals by clicking through this photo gallery of bizarre bugs.We get it. What kid wouldn’t want to chase after a squirrel, or pet a wild rabbit? But human interactions with wildlife can negatively affect animals by changing their natural behavior. Teach children to leave critters alone and observe them from a distance. Get them started with this DIY forest scope or underwater viewer. Or watch the wildlife from your backyard with these tips.So you’ve gotten your child to leave those cute critters alone. Yay, you! But other choices can still harm wildlife. Try to keep kids from taking "souvenirs" that might be something’s home (like shells, nests, or logs). Throw away trash, since animals can mistake litter for food. That includes people food, which can be harmful to critters. Instead, teach kids about proper animal food by helping them make this bird feeder.",
"Elephants kept appearing in wrinkled herds, loitering near the dusty pans, in search of water. With the September temperature pushing a hundred degrees at midday, the pachyderms were moving at the edge of the Kalahari Desert in Namibia in a community-run wildlife reserve, or conservancy, called Nyae Nyae, where roughly 2,800 San people live today in unyielding conditions.The elephants left snapped branches and warm scat in their wake. When they caught our scent, our sweat mixing with the sun-scorched grasses, they broke into a trumpeting jog and were gone.Later, more materialized on the horizon, in the shade of the camel thorn trees, shades themselves. For such enormous creatures, they were nearly invisible but to the sharpest eyes. And those eyes belonged now to Dam, a short, compact man, a tracker from the local San people who stood in the back of the Land Cruiser.“Oliphant!” he cried, leaning hard over the right side of the vehicle, picking out tracks in the sand. He tapped on the door, and we came to a whiplashing halt. Dam jumped down, checking a footprint, its edges corrugated and etched inside with smaller bubbles. He motioned, and Felix Marnewecke, the professional hunter and guide on this expedition, popped out of the driver’s side door. Strapping, ruddy, and blond, in his 40s, he seemed straight from central casting, wearing a cloth hat and shorts. He stood over the impression for a moment, a quizzical expression on his face, and nodded his head in agreement. If Nyae Nyae’s desert scrub is home to San families, it is also home to some of the last, biggest wild elephants in the world. This footprint was proof.The rest of us unloaded, followed by the tracker they only ever called the Old Man, another tracker in training, and one more San, who was acting as a “game guard” to make sure the hunt was conducted in accordance with the conservancy’s rules and quotas. Last to emerge in that swelter was the client himself, an American businessman, who opened the passenger door and reached up to the rack for his gun, a 12-pound, bespoke .470 Nitro Express double rifle. These guns, costing up to $200,000, are favored for big-game trophy hunting because of their stopping power, and this is what he was here for, of course—a trophy. Two of them, actually. An avid hunter whose adventures had led him to Central Asia to shoot Marco Polo sheep at 15,000 feet and to Africa to shoot a leopard, he was now back in Africa for elephants.According to Marnewecke, the going rate for a 14-day, single elephant hunt is about $80,000. The trophy hunt limit of five elephants a year in Nyae Nyae represents real money to the San. A portion of the fee is paid directly to community members and to a fund for conservation projects to protect the area’s wildlife. As for the elephant trophies themselves, the client would take the tusks home, while the meat would all go to the San.Marnewecke and his client—anonymous at his request, given the controversial nature of elephant hunts—hoisted their rifles over their shoulders and fell in behind Dam, who took off at the speed of a jackrabbit. Marnewecke turned to me and said, as I stumbled to keep up, “I swear, there’s no better tracker in Africa. If it takes 30 miles, he never gives up.”From Charles Darwin and John James Audubon to Theodore Roosevelt and Ernest Hemingway, the most enlightened hunters have long viewed themselves as naturalists and conservationists, committed to sustainability among animal populations and the preservation of wild places where they stalk game. The linkage has become inextricable. Revenues of hundreds of millions in federal excise taxes levied on hunters go directly to wildlife management and related activities each year in the U.S. alone. And anyone who keeps a freezer full of venison is likely to tell you that the act of killing your own dinner in the wild is more humane than buying the plastic-wrapped meat of industrially raised livestock.But trophy hunting today, especially of the so-called big five in Africa (elephant, lion, leopard, rhino, and Cape buffalo), brings with it a larger set of moral and financial questions. The sport killing of animals beleaguered in the wild can arouse fierce opposition, even more so if the animal—Cecil the Lion, for example—is named. Biologists estimated total losses of large mammals in protected areas on the continent at up to 60 percent between 1970 and 2005. As big game populations dwindle further under pressure from human encroachment, shifting climate norms, and widespread criminal poaching, there are hunters—the American client in Nyae Nyae, for one—who argue that a thoughtfully regulated and expensive hunt for bull elephants in their waning days makes a sustainable way to protect both species and habitat.On we went, following the footprints. Every so often Dam would retrace his steps, circling in the dust, until we slowed to a more careful crawl. Coming over a knoll, we saw them at last, Loxodonta africana—what seemed to be three bulls, munching on leaves and grass. Marnewecke reached for his binoculars, the American client took his rifle in hand. Everything narrowed to a nervous point. African elephants live to be 60 or 70, and the biggest tuskers usually are older than 45. Tusks are measured by weight, and anything estimated to be over 50 pounds is considered a “shooter” by hunters. The client was looking for something in the 70-plus-pound range, but in the end these elephants’ tusks were too small. Marnewecke made his determination, turned on his heel, and began walking back to the Land Cruiser. No one seemed disappointed exactly: It was almost enough to have stood in the suburbs of such magnificent creatures.“The shooting is the last 5 percent of an elephant hunt,” Marnewecke said. “I feel quite shitty when an elephant dies, but those elephants pay for the conservation of the other 2,500 that move through here. Trophy hunting is the best economic model we have in Africa right now.” It was an argument I’d soon hear other hunters make and a host of activists and biologists tear apart. “In the end it may save this place—and the elephants too.”Standing in the heat and dust of the Kalahari that bright day, elephants at our back, I couldn’t help but wonder: Is that really how this works? Can you really kill five elephants to save 2,500? Or start from the other side: Why kill one at all?Seen from the air Africa can appear as an illusion, rich velds and dramatic rifts, wide deserts and thundering rivers, these seemingly vast stretches of unfettered, unpopulated wild ostensibly forgotten by time and people. At a glance it could be a repository for all our ideas about wilderness at its wildest. And yet today no patch here goes unclaimed, whether it’s marked, monetized, or fought over. The animals that roam the land have become commodified, part of a new consumerism, marketed and sold, their brands pitted against each other, their continued existence now a question of human demand, whim, and calculation. Wild game is the continent’s version of crude oil—and it too will run out someday.Trophy hunting—the killing of big game for a set of horns or tusks, a skin, or a taxidermied body—has burgeoned into a billion-dollar, profit-driven industry, overseen in some cases by corrupt governments. Many countries in sub-Saharan Africa allow trophy hunting, with varying degrees of transparency and control, establishing yearly quotas meant to reflect the status of species and creating exclusions for highly vulnerable populations. South Africa, for instance, no longer allows hunting of leopards. Kenya has banned trophy hunting outright since 1977, and in Botswana, a comparatively wildlife-rich country, a temporary ban in government-controlled hunting areas went into effect in 2014.Africa once seemed to have “an inexhaustible supply of nature,” says American lion biologist Craig Packer, who has lived and worked on the continent for more than 40 years. But, he says, from 30,000 feet you would see that the habitats are shrinking. “Lions really are becoming more of an endangered species, and hunters should really not shoot these animals for sport unless they can provide positive evidence that they’re having a salutary effect on lion conservation.”Biologists make the same argument against the hunting of other big game, including elephants, whose numbers across the continent have fallen sharply in recent years. Demand for rhino horn, elephant ivory, and lion bones, especially in Asia, has ignited a scourge of poaching. But the issue remains complicated, with some place-specific animal populations, such as the elephants of Nyae Nyae, thriving where there’s trophy hunting.“If you get rid of those conservancies in Namibia,” Packer says, “you’d probably get rid of all the wildlife and be left with cattle.” He says he and other biologists “are concerned with populations, and that’s an abstraction. That’s where the real conflict with the animal-rights organizations comes, because in their mind, Fifi must never die. That’s where the biologists can sound pretty heartless and cold.” For Packer, saving an individual animal misses the point; what’s crucial is protecting genetically viable populations as a whole. “I’m not against hunting. There’s got to be a middle ground,” he says. In his estimation, though, that middle ground isn’t exactly in the middle: He believes that trophy hunting is of marginal value as a large-scale conservation tool in Africa.On the other hand, hunters and government officials often cite a hotly contested estimate by the Safari Club International Foundation, a pro-hunting group with the stated goal of promoting conservation and education, that the roughly 18,000 trophy hunters who come to southern and eastern Africa each year contribute $436 million to the region’s GDP. The Humane Society International says the amount for that region is at most $132 million, or .03 percent of GDP.In a 2013 op-ed in the New York Times countering the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service’s proposal to list lions as a threatened species, making it more difficult for Americans to hunt them, the Tanzanian wildlife director, Alexander Songorwa, stated that hunters on 21-day lion safaris paid government fees of up to $10,000 and pumped $75 million into the economy from 2008 to 2011. Packer says the 120,000 square miles of hunting areas in Tanzania need $600 million in investment every year, “and you’re not going to get that shooting lions for $10,000.”For some, the hunting-antihunting debate boils down to Western environmentalists trying to dictate their agenda to Africa—a form of neocolonialism, as Marnewecke puts it. “Who gives anybody the right, sitting in another continent, to preach to us how we should manage our wildlife?” Hunters make the point that with all the outfitters paying to operate in conservancies and with trophy hunters paying fees for the game they shoot, hunting indeed has made significant financial contributions to the continent, and to habitat protection, while all that antihunting forces have done is make noise.As for what happens to the hunters’ fees, that is notoriously hard to pin down—and impossible in kleptocracies. And anyway, Packer says, when it comes to funding lion conservation, “it’s such an underwhelming amount generated by sport hunting, it’s no wonder that despite years of lion hunting being allowed in these countries, the lion population has plummeted.” The International Union for Conservation of Nature, which monitors animal populations, reports that the number of lions in five populations in Tanzania fell by two-thirds from 1993 to 2014.Yet hunters say they’ve helped fund everything from health clinics to schools to water wells to boots-on-the-ground assistance against poachers, all while leaving a lighter footprint on the land than the often cited alternative to killing game: wildlife-watching in the form of photographic safaris. The UN World Tourism Organization estimated that 35.4 million international tourists visited sub-Saharan Africa in 2015 and spent $24.5 billion. Operations designed to attract a higher-end clientele that craves a warm shower, big meal, and cool drink at the end of the day require infrastructure and equipment, maybe including a fleet of vehicles.There’s a danger, some hunters argue, that too many tourists will spoil the very experience they’re seeking. “The Serengeti is amazing,” says Natasha Illum-Berg, a Swedish-born professional buffalo hunter based in Tanzania, who, like Marnewecke, leads clients into the bush for “hunting experiences” and trophies. “The Ngorongoro Crater is a miracle. All these national parks that are filled with minibus after minibus of photographic tourists—it’s fantastic,” she says, noting that the minibuses also put pressure on those iconic wildlands. “But what about the other areas?” she says. “How many people have been to the area I work in, that’s 500 square miles? This year maybe 20 people.” Without trophy hunting, Illum-Berg argues, there would be no antipoaching there, no management. “I keep on saying: Give me a better idea than hunting as long as it’s sustainable.” She adds, “The big question in the end is, ‘Who’s going to pay for the party?’ ”The earliest evidence of an elephant having been killed by human hands dates back to a blue-mud swamp in Siberia nearly 14,000 years ago. The spine of a woolly mammoth found at the confluence of the Ob and Irtysh Rivers seems to have been penetrated by a man-made weapon that left flake traces of stone inside one of the vertebrae. The tusks, we might imagine, weren’t displayed in a trophy room back at the hunter’s cave.But hunting is more than a quid pro quo for sustenance. At some moment in our dawning consciousness, hunting became equated with status, virility, and power. Assyrian carvings from 650 B.C. depict lions being released from cages for slaughter by a chariot-riding king. The Maasai have long killed lions as a rite of passage.With the advent of better weaponry, hunting also evolved as a sport, one with class stratifications, micro-cultures, and occasional egregious examples of waste. In records from 1760 for Snyder County, Pennsylvania, two hunters shot more than a thousand animals, including black bears, mountain lions, bobcats, wolves, foxes, bison, elk, deer, wolverines, and thousands more smaller creatures, dressing some of the animals and throwing most of the carcasses into a bonfire.Skinners in Namibia in 2011 hold up the pelt of a leopard shot by an American hedge fund manager. Leopards are elusive, and dogs helped track this one down. Namibia later banned the use of dogs because those hunts resulted in too many kills per hunt and the trophy quota was reached earlier than expected.Another American hired a cameraman to record his 2016 leopard hunt in Namibia.Theologians were among the first to criticize such wasteful butchery. By the late 1700s an anonymous British hunter had penned The Sportsman’s Companion, or An Essay on Shooting, advocating fair chase and setting forth “directions to gentlemen” in the field and forest, including limiting the number of game animals killed. Those rules were expanded and refined during the next century. In 1887 Teddy Roosevelt founded the Boone and Crockett Club, a group of influential American hunters who were worried about preserving swaths of their country’s wilderness and became instrumental in building the U.S. National Park System.In 1934 at the Norfolk Hotel in Nairobi, Kenya, some white hunters established the East African Professional Hunters’ Association. It promulgated a kind of honor code and pushed for laws and regulations, including a ban on shooting nearly all female animals and on shooting animals at water holes or near vehicles. While the members worked to conserve hunting grounds, they also eliminated huge amounts of game from the continent. Today technology has taken a quantum leap forward, with drones, video of the hunt, and high-powered rifles equipped with laser range finders.Meanwhile “kill shots”—images of hunters posed with their dead quarry—have created viral sensations and stirred animal-rights activists and the general public to fulsome disgust. People were inflamed when Minneapolis dentist Walter Palmer hunted and killed Cecil, the popular lion from Zimbabwe, in June 2015. Controversy resurfaced in July 2017 when Cecil’s son Xanda was shot on a legal trophy hunt.With more than half the planet’s population living in cities, our relationship with the wild has become increasingly divorced from our everyday reality. We’re now less a part of that wild world from rain forest to veld than consumers of it. Yet if we eat meat or wear and use leather products, we too are hunters of a sort.Within the hunting community our hurry-up, have-it-all mentality—our ceaseless consumptive entitlement—has begun to manifest itself in troubling ways. Eschewing the time and cost of an African trophy hunt involving fair chase, some hunters have turned to canned hunting—the killing of often habituated animals in confined areas—baited hunting, herding animals with helicopters, or the shooting of their prey from the back of Land Cruisers. In Tanzania there have been reports of foreign hunters gunning down animals, including pregnant females, with AK-47s. In a hunting area called Loliondo that the government has leased long term to officials from the United Arab Emirates, local Maasai have reported transport jets leaving with game of all variety, dead and alive. Social scientists writing recently in the journal Biology Letters describe a kill-and-tell generation of hunters exhibiting “show-off behavior” by propagating their own kill shots on social media, sometimes in poses that undermine the dignity of the animal whose life they’ve just taken.In South Africa, which has some 2,000 wild lions, canned lion hunting has grown into a more than $100 million industry, with in excess of 200 facilities raising about 6,000 of the big cats for easy killing. According to Ian Michler, a South African safari operator and photographer who investigated the canned lion industry for the 2015 documentary Blood Lions, the animals are caged and bred sometimes under terrible conditions. The young are taken from their mothers and brought to petting zoos. When male lions grow into adulthood, many are shot and killed for “hunting” fees that are much lower than the cost for a wild lion on a standard 21-day hunt ($5,000 to $15,000, versus $50,000 and up). And the trophy is virtually guaranteed. “It’s appalling,” Michler says. “It’s perverse behavior.”Canned hunting has another deleterious effect. While hunters happily take the pelt and head, and the claws and teeth once were sold in the tourist shops of Nairobi and Zanzibar, today the bones are most in demand—shipped to Asia either to produce traditional medicines or to be repackaged as “tiger bone wine,” made from crushed bones and Chinese herbs and marketed to the upper class as a health tonic and aphrodisiac. This year South Africa authorized the export of up to 800 lion skeletons, and the worry among biologists, conservation groups, and animal-rights activists is that by legitimizing and allowing the trade, the country is spurring more demand for lion bones and more killing of the continent’s remaining 20,000 or so wild lions.As it turns out, some of the most vocal critics of these hunting practices are hunters themselves.“If we are not able to convince the majority of people that hunting is morally in order,” says Kai-Uwe Denker, a renowned professional hunter in Namibia, “there is no future for us.” In the face of bad publicity and bad behavior, some hunters have fallen back on an economic argument—that their presence in Africa provides jobs, that it’s a viable strategy for poverty alleviation. But Denker disagrees. “I see a very big danger in promoting only the financial side. Livelihoods, income generation, job creation—this is an additional thing. You cannot justify immoral things with money.”When I met Denker in a valley in the Erongo Mountains, where he lives 25 miles off the grid in a house he built, he lamented the intrusion of humans on the African landscape. According to him, hunting, when done properly, brings you into “a conversation with your own death.” As we spoke in the shaded portico, the sun flashed off a blanched elephant skull set nearby, and the wind stirred the acacia, blowing away a certain noon deadness that often grips the desert. Time seemed to bend to the prehistoric. Tall and slender, wearing a torn shirt and short shorts, Denker is legendary for walking up to 40 miles in a day of hunting. He also abides by a strict set of principles that includes hunting game, such as elephant and kudu, that have unfenced free range in historic habitat and shooting only older nonreproductive animals without fixating on large trophies.“Many of the antihunters, they criticize hunting as perverted,” Denker said. “Hunting as such is not perverted. It’s in our genes. If hunting is immoral,” he continued, “I will stop immediately. But it will be the end of nature.”If it pays, it stays. It was a phrase I heard over and over again, in myriad discussions about African conservation, in part to describe how money has changed the mind-set of rural populations regarding the value of big game. Too often people have seen an elephant destroy their annual crop, and some have known the pain of a lurking lion taking a child for food. Here there’s no mythologizing or fetishizing, no fund-raising around a fuzzy face: The leopard is a killer, the rhino is a ruiner. To protect themselves against the enemy, villagers often shoot and poison these intruders, without an iota of sentimentality. And yet, the argument goes, if those animals are worth money to a local community, that community will work hard to conserve and protect its assets.This is something I witnessed firsthand. My time in the Kalahari coincided with Nyae Nyae’s annual game count, in which 50 or so San camped for three nights at various water holes, trying to account for the number of animals within 3,500 square miles of sand, bush, and baobab trees.As fragile as it is, Nyae Nyae might be called a conditional success story, in part because the hunt quotas have been methodically monitored and increased over the years. On occasion cattle have threatened to overrun the conservancy, but the big game have returned, and the menu of animals offered to hunters includes leopard, kudu, and wildebeest, with prices set by a management committee of five members of the conservancy. Profits are shared communally: Last year each adult over 18 in Nyae Nyae was issued about $70. “We have enough,” the chief, Bobo Tsamkxao, told me as he sat in his yard in front of a disintegrating house, his wives sitting in a row among children and litter. The arrangement also requires that the professional hunter employ and train local people and contribute toward development projects such as schools and health clinics.Nyae Nyae became Namibia’s first conservancy, locally owned and run, in 1998. Every five years the conservancy is put up for tender, with professional hunters offering bids to the San for the right to establish an on-site operation. Last year the winning bid was more than $400,000, a rich number in large part because the elephants have become so big and valuable. The professionals sell hunting packages to clients to recoup the tender offer, cover expenses, and make a profit. Many operate on more than one conservancy; some string together enough to build their own little fiefdoms.When I was there, in September 2016, Marnewecke had just learned that he’d been outbid and would lose his Nyae Nyae operation by season’s end. “I’ll miss the San,” he said, but he had another conservancy to the north that would keep him busy. What worried him most was the Jenga-like fragility of Nyae Nyae, and that irresponsible people might come with their own selfish designs—crisscrossing the conservancy with new roads and upsetting the equilibrium.While Namibia has turned wildlife management over to the local population, governments in places such as Tanzania have taken an opposite tack, directly owning and leasing hunting grounds. Critics say that no country should be in the business of selling and profiting from dead animals. When coffers run low and funds are needed, they say, hunting quotas get raised without regard for the animals’ population numbers. And in those hunting areas where funds aren’t reinvested, there’s no wildlife left to hunt. That could explain how 40 percent of Tanzania’s designated hunting areas have been emptied of game animals during recent decades. A promotional video that surfaced in 2014 shows a hunting company, Green Mile Safari, guiding hunters from the United Arab Emirates on a disturbing shooting party. The minister of tourism and natural resources said the party violated a host of laws by, among other things, firing automatic weapons, hunting female and young animals, and allowing a minor to hunt. The government banned Green Mile from conducting hunts in Tanzania in 2014 but reissued the company’s license last year, leading to accusations of corruption. No arrests were made, and Green Mile claims that the guide was at fault.In the Selous Game Reserve ecosystem, a prized trophy hunting destination, aerial surveys estimate the elephant population at some 15,000, down from perhaps 50,000 as recently as 2009. “Why has the Selous been such a killing field?” says Katarzyna Nowak, a conservation scientist associated with the University of the Free State, Qwaqwa, in South Africa. “If hunters are coming in from all around the world, and you’re really pumping money earned from trophies back into the Selous for conservation and antipoaching, where have all the elephants gone?”Craig Packer sees the conservation of African wildlife in practical terms: If hunters were shooting lions “for a million dollars and returning a million per lion directly into management, they would be on solid ground. But lions are shot for tens of thousands of dollars, and very little of that money goes back to conservation.” With two billion dollars a year we could save and protect the wildlife in Africa’s national parks, Packer says. But that would have to come from international partners such as the World Bank, eco-philanthropists, and nongovernmental organizations.Some trophy hunters say it’s not fair to blame them. Make of their sport what you will, they don’t set the fees or determine the quotas. And they can’t control endemic corruption in some countries, even if they indirectly feed it. Some claim to share the concerns of environmentalists who see collapsing habitats and dwindling populations. Kevin Reid, a big-game ranch owner in Texas, says he raises endangered African species not only for the sport of trophy hunters but also to create “a seed vault of animals,” including oryx and white rhinos, to help rewild Africa once its problems have been sorted. “We’re trying to reverse extinction,” Reid says. In the never ending ironies of the issue, though, the near extinction of African elephants, rhinos, and lions comes today courtesy of the barrel of a gun.Perhaps, then, it boils down to another set of questions: In light of who we’ve become as a species, what new form has nature taken, and what new rules might be practiced there? Might we owe it to the natural world, after bunging it up so badly, to act differently—less acquisitively, more generously—toward it? Might it now be time to stop killing the dwindling herds for sport and display? Or, perhaps more difficult to ponder: Will these trophies be all we have left someday, tokens of a wild nature we once knew?On the 12th day of the elephant hunt in Nyae Nyae, in the rising heat of the day, Dam, the tracker, picked up the marks of three bulls moving together. Once Marnewecke and his client saw the elephants from a mile away, they knew they were big and approached them from downwind so as not to be detected. Two of the bulls were in front of them, but the largest and oldest stood apart and behind. So they maneuvered out around the others and came up on the third as he began to walk toward a clump of brush. The client crouched low on one side as the old bull—sagging and on his sixth molars, half ground down already, which means he was well on in the last season of his life—unwittingly ate on the other side.Would killing an old bull like this one help save all those other elephants in Nyae Nyae?Old bulls, says Caitlin O’Connell, a biologist and elephant researcher focused on how the animals communicate, are a font of wisdom, deciding when and where the herd will move in search of water, imposing an order on pachyderm society. “Contrary to myth, elephant bulls are very social creatures,” she says. “They move in groups of up to 15, and they maintain a strict hierarchy. The older bulls exert a very important regulatory impact on the herd and an emotional-social influence on the younger bulls.” Younger bulls in musth, a heightened state of aggression during which testosterone levels can be 10 times as high as normal, will be more likely to fight each other when an older bull is absent.At 15 yards, the client could see every wrinkle draping the elephant. He aimed his 12-pound double rifle with its hand-engraved silver stock and fired directly at the heart. The bull turned and began to run, 30 yards before it fell. The client put one more shot in the brain, and it was done. The tusks weighed out at more than 70 pounds each. Within six hours the carcass had been stripped by the San, who took roughly three tons of meat for their families.Two days later the hunting party found another big bull. The client fired a shot, bringing it down—but then, as another bull gave chase, he and Marnewecke ran for at least half a mile before the elephant lost interest in them. Eventually the process repeated: the flensing of the skin, the stripping of the bone, the feeding of families. With that elephant, Marnewecke’s quota for the year was filled. His client flew home; the tusks of the two elephants would follow, destined for his trophy room back in America.I thought about those tusks in the weeks that followed, possessions now, totems of a fraught accomplishment. They were all that was left of two 15,000-pound sentient beings. Which brought me to Bobo Tsamkxao, the San chief, and his wives and children, and how they and others in the community would eat from those animals. And how they would receive money, at least indirectly, from those animals as well. But something still seemed askew: a paying client killing a vulnerable animal to feed the San or conserve Nyae Nyae’s land. Even if hunting is in our genes, as Denker said, the essential question remained: Was it moral to kill such an imperiled creature at this moment in our history?After the hunters had packed up, the herds—sometimes called a “parade” of elephants, or even a “memory” of elephants—searched for water in temporary peace, unaware that another season would bring another group of hunters. We must imagine: Memories of elephants wandering all that contested space, some already with price tags on their head, there for us as things of wonder.",
"A remnant of the mid-20th-century Stiltsville community stands in the waters of Biscayne Bay.Biscayne National Park basically begins where Miami ends—in the shallow, aquamarine waters and lush sea-grass beds of Biscayne Bay. Protected within the park’s mostly submerged 173,000 acres are the longest stretch of mangrove forest on Florida's east coast, the northernmost Florida Keys, and part of the world's third longest coral reef tract. Many visitors never venture beyond the park’s northern waters, a popular playground for boaters, anglers, and windsurfers, as well as Miami-based charter boat trips and sunset cruises. Travel farther south (and below the surface) on a snorkeling or diving trip to discover Biscayne’s dizzying array of undersea treasures. Highlights include six shipwrecks on the Maritime Heritage Trail and spectacularly diverse and colorful aquatic life, including sharks, rays, sea turtles, sea cucumbers, jellyfish, and more than 500 species of fish. Above the surface, join a ranger-led canoe trip through the mangroves to see wading birds, crabs, and maybe even a manatee (November through April).The Loggerhead lighthouse, originally built in 1858, overlooks the waters around Loggerhead Key in Florida. Dry Tortugas National Park is home to approximately 30 different coral species, providing a vibrant home to the seemingly limitless numbers of fish.Inside Tip: To visit the park’s longest stretch of terra firma, book a boat tour to Elliott Key, home to the “Spite Highway” nature trail. The approximately six-mile-long path (blazed in the 1960s by landowners intent on sabotaging efforts to designate Biscayne as a national monument) leads through a subtropical forest. Hike the trail to see butterflies, including the federally protected Schaus swallowtail, a large, colorful butterfly native to South Florida but, in recent years, found mostly on Elliott Key and northern Key Largo.How to Get Around: Currently, there is no in-park watercraft concessionaire (a temporary service may be available by November 2015). For boat tours, kayak rentals, and other water activities, make advance reservations with an authorized park tour operator. Weekends from late November through late April, take the City of Homestead’s free, guided trolley tour from downtown Homestead to the Dante Fascell Visitor Center.When to Go: December to April is dry season and has increased ranger-led programs. For offshore activities, plan your visit based on your activity. For example, winter is windy, which is ideal for visiting Elliott Key and the other islands but not for the reefs. Though summer can be buggy on the islands, it's typically good for snorkeling (due to calmer waters and clear visibility).What to Do: Preplanning is key. Look at the park website well in advance of your trip, check the schedule of events, and, if needed, find an authorized tour operator to get you where you want to go. If you have limited time (and no access to a boat), visit the Dante Fascell Visitor Center to learn about the park, picnic along Biscayne Bay, and join a ranger-led program. Reservations are required for ranger-guided tours that have limited availability, such as the daylong paddling excursions to secluded Jones Lagoon, where you could spot an upside-down jellyfish (Cassiopea). Take a scenic boat tour to Boca Chita Key to picnic, camp, and see Biscayne National Park’s unofficial symbol, a 65-foot ornamental lighthouse built in the 1930s by one of the island’s former owners.Where to Stay: Primitive island camping is the only in-park option. A boat is required to reach the campgrounds on Boca Chita Key, which has a grassy camping area, and Elliott Key, which has forested and waterside sites. The nearest hotels to the Dante Fascell Visitor Center are in Homestead and Florida City. If you're taking a boat trip with a Miami-based tour operator, it may be more convenient to stay in Miami.Helpful Links: Biscayne National ParkFun Fact: The Hoover vacuum played a role in the creation of Biscayne National Park. In 1960, plans called for an oil refinery, a seaport, luxury homes, and other development in the keys and underwater acres now protected within the park. Herbert W. Hoover, Jr., then board chairman and company president of his family’s vacuum operation, had loved Biscayne Bay since childhood. An early conservationist, Hoover funded the successful campaign that led to the creation of Biscayne National Monument in 1968.",
"Seaplanes stand by on Garden Key in remote Dry Tortugas National Park.Known for its spectacular coral reefs teeming with aquatic life, Dry Tortugas National Park protects a seven-key (Garden, Loggerhead, Bush, Long, East, Hospital, and Middle) archipelago in the Gulf of Mexico. Nearly 99 percent of the park’s hundred square miles are submerged beneath crystalline waters. Stunning coral reefs ring Garden Key, home to Fort Jefferson (an imposing 19th-century military installation), a ferry dock, and the park’s campground and visitors center. Spanish explorer Juan Ponce de León named these low-lying keys Las Tortugas (The Turtles) for the green, hawksbill, leatherback, and loggerhead turtles he encountered here in 1513. During the summer, sea turtles return to the park’s sugar-white beaches to bury their eggs. And between roughly March and September, up to 100,000 sooty terns gather in Dry Tortugas to nest. Inside Tip: This is a primitive island park with no running water, food concessions, or restrooms. Use the bathroom facilities on board the ferries docked at Fort Jefferson. Pack in all food and drinks. Pack out all trash and garbage.How to Get Around: Dry Tortugas is located about 70 nautical miles west of Key West. Take the high-speed Dry Tortugas National Park Ferry (about two hours and 15 minutes one-way) or a seaplane (about 40 minutes one-way) from Key West to Fort Jefferson on Garden Key. A charter or personal boat (with permit) is required to visit most areas beyond Garden Key.When to Go: The park is open year-round. The daily ferry schedule (arriving on Garden Key at about 10:15 a.m. and departing at 3 p.m.) allows for about a four-and-a-half-hour visit. Plan an April or mid-May trip to witness the spring bird migration (more than 200 species may be sighted), or visit in May or June to see the greatest concentration of sea turtles. Winter is warm (temperatures in the 80s), yet it can be windy, with rough seas. Summer is a prime time to visit, but there is always the possibility of a tropical storm during hurricane season (June to November).Where to Stay: Tent camping is the only in-park option. There is a ten-site primitive campground on Garden Key (eight individual, one group, and one grassy overflow area). Individual sites and the overflow area are first-come, first-served. A tent is required. Reserve the group site (10 to 40 people). Campers must arrive by ferry (limit ten campers per day each way) or by private boat. Seaplanes cannot transport campers due to the added weight of camping supplies (including water, ice, food, and fuel).What to Watch Before You Go: The Plan Your Visit video created by the National Park Service includes practical information about what to pack and expect at the park, a brief historical overview of Dry Tortugas, and up-close views of Fort Jefferson, the ferry ride, and the park’s coral reefs, sea turtles, and other marine life.Helpful Link: Dry Tortugas National ParkDid You Know? Fort Jefferson served as a federal prison following the Civil War. Prisoners included Union Army deserters and four men convicted of conspiring to kill President Abraham Lincoln. Among the conspirators was Dr. Samuel Mudd, who set John Wilkes Booth’s broken leg after the assassination. Sentenced to life in prison in 1865, Mudd was pardoned four years later. He is credited with helping to save lives during an 1867 yellow fever epidemic at Fort Jefferson.",
"One of the Channel Islands, San Miguel is the only known place in the world where four different species of seals and sea lions breed.Strung along a stretch of California coast are five separate pieces of land surrounded by 1,252 square nautical miles of sea. Channel Islands National Park and Channel Islands National Marine Sanctuary protect these islands, the sea around them, and a dazzling array of wildlife.Two of the islands in this unusual park, Anacapa and Santa Barbara, were earlier designated a national monument, a refuge for nesting seabirds, seals, sea lions, and other long-threatened marine animals. When those islands and three others were joined in a national park, the mission of refuge continued.Today the park manages a long-term ecological research program that may be the best in the park system. The marine sanctuary—established in 1980—extends for six nautical miles around each island. Among the resources it protects are giant kelp forests with nearly a thousand kinds of fish and marine plants. The park and sanctuary also guard the area from encroachment by another kind of island—the seagoing oil rigs of the Santa Barbara Channel.About 70 different species of plants grow only on the islands, and some plants exist on but one of them. The islands shelter the only breeding colony of northern fur seals south of Alaska. To help native animals, park managers have gotten rid of such non-native species as black rats, burros, rabbits, and feral cats.A permanent ranger resides on each island. Reservations are needed for camping. Fishing and diving are strictly regulated and airplanes are asked to keep their distance.Chumash Indians lived on the Channel Islands until the early 19th century. They traveled from island to island in plank canoes caulked with tar from oil seeps. The tar from such seeps still appears on beaches, reminding strollers of the reason for the oil rigs on the horizon.The oldest human remains in North America, dating to 13,000 B.C., were discovered in 1959 on Santa Rosa Island.The Channel Islands were created by tectonic forces, which caused them to rise up out of the ocean five million years ago. They have always been islands separate from the mainland, and thus have unique plants and animals found nowhere else on Earth.",
"A pair of Japanese macaques escapes the cold winter weather in a hot spring.Every year, National Geographic Travel invites photographers to submit their most captivating and telling images to the 2018 Travel Photographer of the Year contest.This year, photographers from around the world submitted thousands of photos, many featuring rare and exotic animals.Check back on June 28, when all the contest winners will be announced. In the meantime, enjoy this collection of animal images taken by this year’s contestants.",
"A helicopter looks as tiny as a toy in the face of Hubbard Glacier in Alaska's Wrangell-St. Elias National Park, the largest of all national parks.Even in a state famous for its size, Wrangell-St. Elias stands out. It is by far the largest of our national parks—almost six times the size of Yellowstone. You fly over it and see mountains beyond mountains, glaciers after glaciers, rivers upon rivers. You float a river and watch the moods and mountains change by the minute. As you walk the tundra, you find Dall's sheep and mountain goats grazing.Four major mountain ranges converge here: the volcanic Wrangells, the Alaska, the Chugach, and the St. Elias—tallest coastal mountains in the world. Together they contain 9 of the 16 highest peaks in the United States, 4 of them above 16,000 feet. There are more than 150 glaciers; one, the Malaspina, is larger than Rhode Island. In 1980 Wrangell-St. Elias and adjoining Kluane National Park Reserve in Canada, along with Glacier Bay NP and Tatshenshini in British Columbia, were designated a United Nations World Heritage site.Vast and rugged as it is, the park is not a fortress. Two roads lead into small communities, remnants of the gold- and copper-mining towns that thrived in the early days of the 20th century. Today not mining but the nearly limitless hiking, rafting, kayaking, and climbing opportunities beckon.Drive, take a bus, or charter a plane. By car from Anchorage, take Alas. 1 (Glenn Hwy.) 189 miles northeast to Glennallen. Continue northeast 74 miles along the Copper River and the park's western boundary to Slana, where an unpaved road branches 42 miles into the park, ending at the town of Nabesna.Or, head toward McCarthy on the Richardson Hwy. from Glennallen 32 miles southeast to the Edgerton cutoff (Alas. 10), then turning left and continuing 33 miles to Chitina. There the pavement ends but a road follows an old railroad bed about 60 miles into the park. Buses run regularly in summer from Anchorage to Valdez with stops in Glennallen.Air charters into the park operate out of Anchorage, Fairbanks, Yakutat, Cordova, Glennallen, Gulkana, Tok, Chitina, McCarthy, Nabesna, and Northway. Commercial jets service Yakutat and Cordova. In summer, the Alaska State Ferry serves Valdez and Cordova.Summer. Lodges and guide services operate in the park from mid-May to the end of September. June is best for wildflowers; July has the warmest days; berries ripen in August. Be prepared for cloudy skies, but September can be beautiful with clear skies, autumn colors, no mosquitoes, and a dusting of new snow on the mountain peaks. March and April offer excellent cross-country skiing for those of strong will.Take one of the two unpaved roads into the park. The McCarthy Road is maintained and usually passable in summer, though a four-wheel drive may be needed in other seasons. Stop at park headquarters in Copper Center for latest road conditions. The Slana-Nabesna Road is also maintained, including some river crossings, but can require four-wheel drive in high water. Both roads end at trailheads for many backcountry hikes.Or, charter a plane into a remote part of the park and hike or run a river. Several commercial companies offer guided rafting or kayaking trips on the rivers and in the spectacular coastal bays. You can get a full listing of them from the park.",
"This endangered Amur tiger (also known as a Siberian tiger) was photographed at Omaha's Henry Doorly Zoo. The zoo participates in the Association of Zoos and Aquariums’ Species Survival Program for the subspecies, which uses well-managed captive breeding to create a self-sustaining, genetically diverse “insurance population.”Netflix’s recent documentary miniseries Tiger King has wild animals, ex-felons, a brief presidential campaign, polygamy, a murder-for-hire plot, and a huge cast of eccentric characters. It follows Joseph Maldonado-Passage, better known as “Joe Exotic,” the owner of Oklahoma’s Greater Wynnewood Exotic Animal Park, which was, in its heyday, a prominent cub-petting, tiger-breeding operation and private zoo. Now Maldonado-Passage is serving 22 years in prison for plotting to have a critic murdered, killing five tigers, and illegally selling tigers across state lines.Because the series is character-driven, it doesn’t spend a lot of time on the animal welfare and trade issues that surround the captive-tiger breeding industry. Exotic pets, captive wildlife, the illegal wildlife trade, and even Joe Exotic are topics National Geographic routinely covers, so here’s some contextual information.Some private tiger breeders argue that they’re helping shore up tigers, which are endangered in the wild. But their cats will never be released into the wild, both because they wouldn’t know how to fend for themselves and because of their genetics. There are multiple subspecies of tigers in the wild, each adapted to live in a certain part of the world. A Bengal tiger is not a Siberian tiger is not a Sumatran tiger. Most privately owned tigers in the U.S. are of mixed or unknown lineage and therefore are excluded from participating in captive-breeding efforts at accredited zoos and institutions that seek to preserve the subspecies.According to the Global Federation of Animal Sanctuaries, an accrediting organization, a true sanctuary exists to provide lifetime care to animals that have been abused, neglected, discarded, or are otherwise in need of help. A true sanctuary does not breed or allow hands-on interactions with animals, and it maintains high standards of care and operation.Tiger and liger cubs—born from a male lion and female tiger—pose at Myrtle Beach Safari, in South Carolina, owned by Bhagavan “Doc” Antle. Young cubs are a big part of the business. At about 12 weeks old, cubs are considered too big and dangerous for tourists to pet.For zoos in the U.S., accreditation by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums requires facilities to go above and beyond the basic requirements set by the government in terms of animal health, welfare, guest education, safety, recordkeeping, and more. Conservation is typically promoted as an important part of a zoo’s mission. (Many other countries have accrediting organizations too.)“Pseudo-sanctuaries” and “roadside zoos” are loose terms that describe unaccredited facilities with low, or at least problematic, standards of operation and care.It’s easy to understand the impulse to want to play with an adorable tiger cub. But did you ever wonder why a facility seems to always have them? Or what happens when they’re not cute and tiny anymore?Cub-petting facilities often speed-breed their tigers so there’s a constant supply, National Geographic reported in December. As soon as a litter is born, the cubs are removed from the mother, making her go into heat sooner so she can breed again.An endangered Sumatran tiger watches over her playful cubs at Zoo Atlanta.Interacting with humans is also stressful for cubs. They’re very young; they’re not with their mother; and they’re being passed around amid bright lights, noise, and milling people that, to their tiny selves, could be predators.Cubs are only economically (and legally) useful for a short time—eight weeks to 12 weeks old. They quickly get too dangerous to interact with visitors. They may become breeders themselves, or go on exhibit. There’s evidence that some are killed.Cross-bred species abound in private zoos and menageries. In the wild, lion-tiger hybrids such as ligers and tigons don’t exist. In fact, the lions and tigers live in separate parts of the world. Cross-breeding species can cause genetic defects and health problems, according to Luke Hunter, a big cat scientist and conservationist, who talked to National Geographic in 2017 about big cat hybrids.White tigers aren’t hybrids, but they’re not exactly natural, either—at least, not in the numbers we see in captivity. They’re simply tigers with white fur, and they’re rarely found in the wild. Intensive inbreeding to create and sell white tigers over the years means some suffer congenital defects that require lifetime care, wrote AZA CEO Dan Ashe in a recent post.If you’re thinking about visiting a sanctuary or zoo, here are some tips to help you identify ethical and responsible places. Tigers are big, nocturnal, solitary animals, and that means they have some special needs in captivity, according to graduate research by Leigh Pitsko, now at Smithsonian’s National Zoo. They need space to exercise, and they shouldn’t be crowded with other tigers. They need a place to hide if they’re feeling stressed or overwhelmed by human visitors, and they should always have access to shade and water. Toys, activities, and climbing equipment are important for keeping tigers’ brains active, and enclosures with natural flooring substances, not concrete, are important not only for the health of their feet and skin but also for their well-being. The more natural their enclosure, the better.To learn more about tigers in the U.S., including the patchwork of laws concerning ownership, the history of why there are so many tigers in the U.S., and the efforts to protect both tigers and humans, check out our December feature.To see how tigers have been traded across the U.S., check out these maps.",
"Joseph Maldonado-Passage, better known as “Joe Exotic,” shuffled into federal court in Oklahoma City on Wednesday for sentencing, his hands and feet shackled. He wore an orange prison jumpsuit. Until his arrest in September 2018, he’d run one of the largest tiger breeding and cub-petting and photo op attractions in the U.S., sometimes putting on shows dressed as a Las Vegas-style performer.But the man once hailed as “The Tiger King” was now subdued, haggard. There was no trace of the confident, effusive showman I’d observed during his seven-day trial last spring. On April 2, a jury convicted him on two counts of murder-for-hire and 17 wildlife charges, which we’d reported as part of a larger story examining why 5,000 to 10,000 captive tigers live in the US, who owned them—and why.Joe Exotic wept as he pled with the judge for leniency. “I broke no laws,” he said. He claimed ill health. He said he owed his victim, Carole Baskin, an apology and then blamed her, the government, law enforcement, his employees and others for his current plight.His face remained emotionless as Judge Scott Palk issued his sentence: 264 months, or 22 years in prison. For the 56 year-old, it’s essentially a life sentence.Joe Exotic had tried to hire two different hitmen—an employee and an undercover FBI agent—to kill Carole Baskin, founder of the Big Cat Rescue Wildlife Sanctuary in Florida. She was his sworn enemy. Her “911 Animal Abuse” website profiled people who mass-bred tigers, separated cubs from their mothers at birth, and used them as photo props. The site rallied protests against the lucrative traveling shows that Joe Exotic staged at malls and fairs. It ruined his business, he threatened her on social media and in public—and then he tried to get her killed.Baskin was given the chance to speak at the sentencing. “The conviction of Mr. Schreibvogel Maldonado Passage was made based upon only a handful of vivid examples of his malicious intent to murder me,” she said. “As you consider his sentence, I would just like you to take into account that if this vicious, obsessed man is ever released from jail, my life and my family’s lives, will return to what it was like during the decade leading up to his arrest.”Each of the murder-for-hire counts carried a 108-month sentence, to be served consecutively.The wildlife charges brought another four years in prison. Joe Exotic was convicted of killing five tigers, shooting them in the head to make room for other cats. He sold and trafficked tigers and other endangered species and falsified government documents to hide his activities in violation of federal laws.“All of the sentences reflected the judge’s understanding of the gravity of the defendant’s conduct,” said environmental crimes prosecutor John Webb. Baskin said she was “relieved that Maldonado-Passage will be behind bars for so many years.”In his pre-sentencing statement, Judge Palk said that Joe Exotic was “consumed, if not obsessed with silencing Carole Baskin.” He also highlighted the defendant’s ongoing lack of respect for the law: Joe Exotic had been recorded on a phone call trying to broker the sale of lion cubs while awaiting trial in Grady County Jail. The judge cited a pattern of “systematic trafficking of animals” and noted the seriousness of the wildlife crimes, which he called “significant in volume.”Joe Exotic’s lawyers requested that he be allowed to again own wild animals after his release from prison. Judge Palk was adamant in his denial. He “has demonstrated his willingness to circumvent the regulatory statutes,” the judge said, which “ leaves zero wiggle room” that he will ever be involved in possession or care of animals again.Over the years, Joe Exotic has attracted lots of attention: hundreds of news stories, podcasts and now, a TV series that will be produced by Saturday Night Live star Kate McKinnon. He’s an extremely colorful character who lived in the limelight for decades—he even ran for president and Oklahoma governor—and there’s irresistible film noire appeal in a murder-for-hire charge. But what Joe was doing with tigers at Greater Wynnewood Exotic Animal Park, which remains open, appears to be endemic in the cub-petting industry. (Discover the dark truth behind wildlife tourism.)Testimony from numerous witnesses during Joe Exotic’s trial revealed that selling and trafficking tigers and other endangered species, falsifying government documents, money laundering, tax evasion and other criminal activity may be occurring at numerous other venues. During the sentencing hearing, defense lawyer William Earley noted “I think there’s plenty of evidence that others were involved in similar violations of the law.” In our earlier reporting, we mapped a nationwide US tiger trade network.Lax laws and limited government oversight have allowed these businesses to thrive despite years of repeated violations for abuse, neglect and potential danger to animals and the public. Very few have lost their U.S. Department of Agriculture exhibitor’s licenses. “The USDA should have shut down Joe Exotic’s business two decades ago,” said Brittany Peet, director of captive animal law enforcement at the PETA Foundation. “He may be the first captive-animal abuser to go to prison for killing and trafficking in captive big cats, but he shouldn’t be the last, and PETA is calling on the U.S. Department of Justice to finish what they started with Joe Exotic by taking on the U.S. captive tiger trafficking network and shutting it down once and for all."While he wasn’t criminally charged with animal abuse, Joe Exotic’s treatment of animals brought him scrutiny from many involved in animal welfare. Back in 2011, an undercover investigation by the Humane Society of the U.S. found tigers and other species “caged in barren conditions, punched, dragged and beaten as ‘training,’ and bred to provide infant animals for public photo shoots and then offloaded when they were no longer useful,” said Kitty Block, the nonprofit’s president and CEO. Year after year, he was cited by USDA for violations of federal Animal Welfare Act standards.The landscape may be changing around this issue. In the last days of December, the U.S. House of Representatives gained enough sponsors to move forward with The Big Cat Public Safety Act. The U.S. currently has no federal law governing big cat ownership, though these predators can weigh up to 500 pounds and may reach 10 feet long. This bill would prohibit ownership of big cats as pets and outlaw hands-on contact with cubs. Newly-introduced state laws in Virginia and Oklahoma would also make public contact illegal.A few of the largest cub-handling attractions are being investigated or face lawsuits involving endangered big cat species. In December, Myrtle Beach Safari in South Carolina was raided as part of an investigation into possible lion trafficking. Florida’s Dade City Wild Things, which once allowed visitors to swim with cubs, is amidst a lawsuit alleging that its practice of pulling cubs from their mothers at birth, forcing them to interact with the public and housing them in small cages violates the Endangered Species Act (ESA). Wildlife In Need in Indiana is under an injunction barring it from prematurely separating mothers and cubs as part of a pending lawsuit. A court order in that case established that declawing endangered or threatened exotic cats to make public contact easier—without medical necessity—violates the ESA.There has been growing public protest over itinerant tiger exhibits and performing acts at state and county fairs. In October, California banned the use of wild animals in circuses.The situation in the U.S. has also sparked international scrutiny. The U.S. is one of six nations under investigation for possible tiger trafficking by the Secretariat of the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species, a treaty signed by 183 nations regulating that trade. The U.S. is a signatory.Phillip Land, special agent in charge at the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, says that his agency will continue to “vigorously investigate wildlife crime,” adding that “I hope the sentence received by Joe Maldonado-Passage will be a strong deterrent to others.”",
"A critically endangered Sumatran tiger stares out from an enclosure in Indonesia's Surabaya Zoo.Rama, a critically endangered Sumatran tiger, died recently at an Indonesian zoo notorious for the high death rate of its charges. Once celebrated as the oldest and largest zoo in the country, the Surabaya Zoo has earned a new reputation: “death zoo.”Nearly a hundred animals have died at the facility in less than 12 months, according to a report from Mongabay. But problems were evident as early as 2010, when a spokesman said as many as 25 animals were dying every month. In 2012, a dead giraffe was found with a 40-pound ball of plastic in its stomach. Then there was the young lion that got its neck tangled in a cable and died of strangulation, and the 13-year-old white tiger that died after a tongue injury left it unable to eat.The most recent tiger death involved heart failure, said zoo spokesperson Veronika Lanu, according to Agence France Presse. “The death was due to natural causes—we provided the best care we could,” she said. Rama had issues with his teeth, a bad cough, and appeared lethargic in the weeks before his death, AFP reported. Tigers can live for 20 years in captivity.It’s unclear what truly led to the tiger’s death, but critics of Surabaya say it’s in keeping with a long pattern of abuse and neglect. Specific concerns cited include overpopulation, as well as cramped and trash-ridden cages. In a petition, People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals has called for officials to shut down the zoo immediately.A veterinarian observes Sumatran tigers at Surabaya Zoo, where a tiger named Rama died recently—sparking controversy.But Surabaya isn't the only zoo out there facing harsh criticism for mistreatment of animals. Which begs the question: What makes a good zoo?To some people there’s no such thing—a wild animal simply shouldn’t be confined in this way. Ethical considerations around keeping elephants, in particular, in such tight quarters are hotly debated (one investigation found that the infant mortality rate of elephants in U.S. zoos was almost triple that of elephants in the wild). But if an animal is under a zoo’s care, how can we distinguish the more responsible from the negligent?One way is to check zoo-accrediting organizations and their standards. Most well-known American zoos, for example, are accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums. The bar for becoming a member of the association is set higher than the standards for obtaining a license from the United States Department of Agriculture, a requirement for all zoos in the country. But some critics question whether even the AZA rules are too lax.In general, zoos that demonstrate the following qualities shouldn’t raise a red flag.Conservation mission: Traditionally zoos have prized their animals solely for their entertainment value, displaying them in tiny cages. While some zoos still focus purely on entertainment, others conduct research, help to conserve wild animals by breeding them for reintroduction into the wild, and educate the public about the animals and their conservation status.“Zoos have tried to change their mission, and some have done that better than others,” Daniel Blumstein, chairman of the department of ecology and evolutionary biology at the University of California, Los Angeles, told the Guardian last month. “The onus is on zoos to show an educational mission, to have a potential to do more than entertainment.”For example, the San Diego Zoo has 132 conservation projects in 62 countries, ranging from breeding the rare alala bird for reintroduction in Hawaii to monitoring gorillas in Cameroon.Animal welfare: Of course, a decent zoo meets animals’ basic needs: appropriate food, fresh water, proper exposure to light. Animals have enclosures that are clean, roomy enough—for flying or running, swimming or climbing—and include features that mimic conditions in the wild.An elephant gives herself a sand bath in 2013 in a spacious enclosure in the Smithsonian Institution's National Zoo, in Washington, D.C. Some people think that elephants, in particular, shouldn't be confined in zoos at all.But a higher-quality zoo goes beyond meeting the bare necessities. “An institutional commitment to ensuring that each animal is thriving, not just surviving,” should be the fundamental philosophy of a good zoo, according to the framework laid out by Detroit Zoological Society’s Center for Zoo Animal Welfare.One way to do that is by offering enrichment activities or stimulating animals’ minds, said Mike Dulaney, curator of mammals at the Cincinnati Zoo and Botanical Garden. That could mean hiding treats in a container that tigers would have to rip open, for example, or tossing a giant ball into a pool for them to play with. “You try to give them something different every day,” he said.So how can you tell if an animal is happy? Stressed out animals might have physical injuries or engage in “stereotypic behaviors,” such as pacing or swaying back and forth. One study found that enrichment helps reduce stereotypic behavior only 53 percent of the time, so brain games aren’t a cure-all.Oversight: A zoo that cares keeps its animals’ records current and provides consistent veterinary care, which the AZA says should at the very least involve twice monthly inspections. “You have to have good and consistent care by professionals trained to deliver it,” said Dan Maloney, deputy director of animal care and conservation at Florida’s Jacksonville Zoo and Gardens, “and have a situation with enough resources so you can make sure it’s delivered in the right way.”And a better zoo will belong to an accrediting organization, which makes it more likely that higher standards are upheld and that there are consequences for falling short.This story was produced by National Geographic’s Special Investigations Unit, which focuses on wildlife crime and is made possible by grants from the BAND Foundation and the Woodtiger Fund. Read more stories from the SIU on Wildlife Watch. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to ngwildlife@natgeo.com.",
"A liger, Zita, walks with her month-old cub at Russia's Novosibirk Zoo. Ligers are the offspring of a female tiger and male lion.Ever heard of a liger? It’s the offspring of a male lion and female tiger. There’s also the tigon, which has a lion mother and tiger father. And the leopon, the progeny of a lion and a leopard—not to be outdone by the jagulep, a jaguar-leopard mix.Feline hybrids aren’t found in nature. Lions and tigers don’t overlap in the wild (except in India’s Gir Forest, where until now no ligers have been found). And big cats in the same territory don’t cross the species line—they’re not interested in each other, just as humans aren’t drawn to chimps.Instead, these animals are the offspring of big cats that crossbreed in captivity and they're destined to become curiosities in zoos and wildlife parks. While it might seem fun to see one of these oddballs in the flesh, advocates of big cat conservation say this hybridization has a dark side.“With hybrids there’s a much greater chance of the genetics being messed up,” says Luke Hunter, who heads the wild cat conservation organization Panthera. This means there’s a higher likelihood of infertility and other defects, he says.The prevalence of these problems in big cat hybrids isn’t known: Because the animals don’t exist in the wild, scientists haven’t studied them much.But many of the crossbreeds live healthy lives, and some have even produced offspring—a female liger in a Russian zoo mated with a male lion and gave birth to a so-called liliger in 2012.It’s not known, either, how many of the various big cat hybrids exist, but Usman Masood, who has collected online reports of ligers and runs the website ligerzoos.com, puts liger numbers at about a hundred.Ligers, made popular by the 2004 cult classic Napoleon Dynamite, are gold mines because of their size. The faintly striped creatures grow to about five feet tall and can weigh up to a thousand pounds, more than twice the size of their lion fathers and tiger mothers.Reports of liger births occasionally surface from countries around the world—in late January a Russian zoo announced the birth of a liger cub named Tzar. But ligerzoos.com posits that most ligers are in private hands in the United States. Accredited zoos frown on crossbreeding big cats.“These cats of mine are big mellow guys,” and they’re healthy, says Gregg Woody, owner of Woody’s Menagerie in Mulberry Grove, Illinois, of his two seven-year-old ligers, Hank and Charlie. Woody takes Hank and Charlie around the country as part of a traveling liger exhibit. Their size, he says, is “shocking” to people.According to Woody, the ligers' parents spent a lot of time together and eventually mated, which scientists say can happen when a lion and tiger live in close quarters and lack other options.“Lions are tigers are separated by about seven million years of evolution,” Craig Packer, director of the Lion Research Center at the University of Minnesota, previously told National Geographic. “But they are still closely enough related that they can hybridize.”Feline hybrids aren’t helpful to the genetic diversity of big cats and have no conservation value, says Rob Vernon, spokesman for the Association of Zoos and Aquariums, which represents 230 zoos in the U.S and a handful of other countries.This liger, Bahier, was born at Arche Noah, a private zoo in Germany on the Baltic Sea. Big cat experts say that ligers have no conservation value.According to the association, zoos today are supposed to be arks for threatened animals and educate the public about conservation efforts. “Propagating animals that specifically do not represent the normal characteristics and variation of the species creates a confused educational message,” states the association’s policy against the intentional breeding of animals to produce rare traits.Conservation scientist Luke Dollar says that any crossbreeding between big cat species is unethical and is the result of greed or irresponsible breeding.“I can think of no legit excuse for a liger or tigon to exist,” says Dollar, program director for National Geographic Society’s Big Cats Initiative. “If we want to recognize and honor big cats as they naturally occur in the wild, why would we possibly experiment in these completely unnatural and not biologically founded practices?”While we know that lions and tigers have yet to get frisky in the wild, it’s certainly possible for two species to produce a hybrid in nature. “Hybridization occurs among carnivores in the wild when the reproductive opportunities become really, really limited,” Hunter says.Coywolves, the offspring of wolves and coyotes, number in the millions in the U.S. and eastern Canada. Deforestation, hunting, and poisoning of wolves in the east meant that they increasingly bred with coyotes spreading into eastern wolf territory from the U.S. Southwest.Climate change can also have an effect. Scientists predict that melting Arctic ice will lead more than 20 marine mammals to hybridize. Already, grizzly bears moving northward into higher latitudes have been known to mate with polar bears. The result: brown-pawed, white-coated “pizzlies.”",
"As the normally bustling canals of Venice became deserted amid pandemic quarantines, viral social media posts claimed swans and dolphins were returning to the waters. It wasn't true. The canal water, nonetheless, is clearer because of the decrease in boat activity.Scattered amid a relentless barrage of news about COVID-19 case surges, quarantine orders, and medical supply shortages on Twitter this week, some happy stories softened the blows: Swans had returned to deserted Venetian canals. Dolphins too. And a group of elephants had sauntered through a village in Yunnan, China, gotten drunk off corn wine, and passed out in a tea garden.These reports of wildlife triumphs in countries hard-hit by the novel coronavirus got hundreds of thousands of retweets. They went viral on Instagram and Tik Tok. They made news headlines. If there’s a silver lining of the pandemic, people said, this was it—animals were bouncing back, running free in a humanless world.But it wasn’t real.The swans in the viral posts regularly appear in the canals of Burano, a small island in the greater Venice metropolitan area, where the photos were taken. The “Venetian” dolphins were filmed at a port in Sardinia, in the Mediterranean Sea, hundreds of miles away. No one has figured out where the drunken elephant photos came from, but a Chinese news report debunked the viral posts: While elephants did recently come through a village in Yunnan Province, China, their presence isn’t out of the norm, they aren’t the elephants in the viral photos, and they didn’t get drunk and pass out in a tea field.The phenomenon highlights how quickly eye-popping, too-good-to-be-true rumors can spread in times of crisis. People are compelled to share posts that make them emotional. When we’re feeling stressed, joyous animal footage can be an irresistible salve. The spread of social phenomena is so powerful, 2016 research shows, that it can follow same models that trace the contagion of epidemics.Kaveri Ganapathy Ahuja’s controversial tweet about the swans that “returned” to Venice canals has hit a million likes.“Here's an unexpected side effect of the pandemic,” her tweet reads. “The water flowing through the canals of Venice is clear for the first time in forever. The fish are visible, the swans returned.”Ahuja, who lives in New Delhi, India, says she saw some photos on social media and decided to put them together in a tweet, unaware that the swans were already regulars in Burano before the coronavirus tore across Italy.“The tweet was just about sharing something that brought me joy in these gloomy times,” she says. She never expected it to go viral, or to cause any harm. “I wish there was an edit option on Twitter just for moments like this,” Ahuja says.Nonetheless, she hasn’t deleted the tweet and doesn’t plan to, arguing that it’s still relevant because waters in Venice are clearer than usual—a result of decreased boat activity—and that’s what matters, she says. She’s tweeted about the “unprecedented” number of likes and retweets she’s received on the tweet. “It’s a personal record for me, and I would not like to delete it,” she says.Swans are regular visitors to the canals of Burano.Paulo Ordoveza is a web developer and image verification expert who runs the Twitter account @picpedant, where he debunks fake viral posts—and calls out the fakers. He sees firsthand the “greed for virality” that may drive the impulse to propagate misinformation. It’s “overdosing on the euphoria that comes from seeing those like and retweet numbers rise into the thousands,” he says.Getting a lot of likes and comments “gives us an immediate social reward,” says Erin Vogel, a social psychologist and postdoctoral fellow at Stanford University. In other words, they make us feel good. Studies have found that posting to social media gives one’s self-esteem a temporary boost.The need to seek out things that make us feel good may be exacerbated right now, as people try to come to grips with a pandemic, a collapsing economy, and sudden isolation. “In times when we’re all really lonely, it’s tempting to hold onto that feeling, especially if we’re posting something that gives people a lot of hope,” says Vogel. The idea that animals and nature could actually flourish during this crisis “could help give us a sense of meaning and purpose—that we went through this for a reason,” she says.It was the running theme of many of the viral tweets. “Nature just hit the reset button on us,” read a tweet celebrating the dolphins supposedly swimming in Venetian canals.“I think people really want to believe in the power of nature to recover,” says Susan Clayton, a professor of psychology and environmental studies at the College of Wooster, in Ohio. “People hope that, no matter what we’ve done, nature is powerful enough to rise above it.” (Read about how this incredible—and real—shark photo went viral.)About half of Americans say they’ve been exposed to made-up news or information related to coronavirus, according to a new Pew Research Center survey. While a fake happy news story about dolphins in a canal may not be all that problematic, relatively speaking, there can still be harm in spreading false hope in times of crisis.These fake feel-good stories, Vogel says, can make people even more distrustful at a time when everyone already feels vulnerable. Finding out good news isn’t real “can be even more demoralizing than not hearing it at all.”Spots of hope on social media are likely to play a key role in keeping spirits up in the weeks and months ahead, as people self-quarantine in their homes and connect with each other through screens. “I’d encourage people to share positive things,” says Vogel. “But it doesn’t have to be anything dramatic. It just has to be true.”",
"Photographer Tom Peschak was down to the last frames on his roll of film when he captured the photo he'd been waiting for: a great white surfacing behind researcher Trey Snow's kayak. "Instead of the scientist tracking the shark the shark is tracking the scientist," Peschak says.During 2017’s Hurricane Harvey, a photograph of a shark swimming down a flooded street in Houston was posted on Twitter—and retweeted thousands of times. Around that time, National Geographic photographer Thomas Peschak received an email with the words, “Guess who’s back?”Peschak knows that great white shark well. He photographed it 15 years ago following scientist Trey Snow in a bright yellow kayak off South Africa. Ever since then, people have been photoshopping the shark into their pictures to fake scary scenes.Like many photographs that capture our attention, Peschak's original shot of the shark resulted from a combination of ingenuity, patience, and serendipity. (See “14 Not-Fake Shark Pictures From a Real Nat Geo Photographer.”)In 2003 marine scientist Michael Scholl of the White Shark Trust had alerted Peschak to an unusually large number of sharks cruising the southernmost shoreline of South Africa.The pair tried following the sharks in a research boat, but found the engine noise altered the sharks’ behavior. Then Peschak had an idea. He had recently purchased a sea kayak, which would be less disruptive to the fish. Why not attempt to track them that way?“Because it was my dumbass idea, I got to try it first,” he says.It worked. “With a GPS mounted on the kayak, we were able to follow the shark into shallow water and observe natural behavior,” Peschak says. “Once that occurred, the photographer in me switched on again.”He spent the next several months out on the research boat, waiting for calm conditions to deploy the kayak once again. (Hear more from Peschak on his work photographing sharks.)Peschak was ready when the day finally came. From his vantage point, harnessed to the boat’s flybridge, he patiently watched as Scholl tracked sharks around Haaibaai, Afrikans for "Shark Bay."A nice scene, but it wasn’t doing it for him.“Then we get this one bold shark that comes up behind the kayak and quickly rises in the water column,” he says. “I am down to the last five or six frames on my roll of film. As the dorsal fin breaks the surface, the scientist in the kayak looks back, then click.“Instead of the scientist tracking the shark the shark is now tracking the scientist, which was much more compelling. Sometimes the best images are not the ones we planned for.”Santa Catalina Island, CaliforniaThe photograph, first published in South African newspapers and magazines, instantly resonated with the public.“I got 100,000 visitors to my website in the first 24 hours, which in 2003 was viral,” he laughs. “I wasn’t expecting that everybody would think it was fake.”Conspiracy theories flourished in online discussion forums, with commenters analyzing everything from the angle of shadows to comparing ripples on either side of the shark to determine whether not it had been cloned.The attention was ultimately a curse and a blessing. (See National Geographic photographers’ favorite wildlife pictures.)The picture put Peschak on the map as a photographer, but instead of opening people’s eyes to how amazing sharks are, all anyone could talk about at the time was whether it was too amazing to be real.“For a while I dragged the original slide with me to media interviews as proof,” he says.This irony was not lost on him when the shark began appearing in various places around the Internet a few years later—washed into the streets of a Puerto Rican town following tropical storm Irene in 2011, swimming through an indoor mall in Kuwait following an aquarium burst, and striking terror in the hearts of Houstonians.In the Hurricane Harvey instance, it was Peschak’s online community of fans who alerted him. Each time they discover a new fake photo, “they’re more outraged than I am,” he says.",
"A few weeks ago photographer Thomas P. Peschak stopped by the National Geographic offices to show work from his upcoming story on South African marine reserves. Peschak, who studied marine biology, is passionate about conservation, and once we started talking about his work, I could barely get him to stop.One arresting image from his project is an underwater silhouette of a surfer and a shark swimming side-by-side. Of course I wanted to know: “How the heck did you do that?” The answer, of course, is complex.“I didn’t want to create an image that conveyed conflict. I wanted to illustrate the reality and the menace that surfers feel—the yin and the yang of the beautiful shapes.”—Thomas P. PeschakPeschak knows the ocean intimately, and says he can read shark behavior just as easily as the average person can tell the difference between a poodle wagging its tail and a Rottweiler menacing its teeth. Peschak says it’s the same with sharks.“They are not dangerous animals,” he says of the blacktip sharks in these photos. “They are powerful, you have to be respectful, and you have to know what you are doing. It comes from putting in the time in the water, watching them, knowing them. If you don’t know what you are doing, that’s when you get into trouble.”In these photos, surfers test a prototype of a shark-resistant surfboard under baited conditions off the KwaZulu-Natal coast in South Africa. A device in the board sends out an electromagnetic field to bother the sharks and keep them away. While not yet in mass production, Peschak says the concept shows that people are thinking beyond killing sharks—and instead are looking for ways to co-exist.Perhaps one of the most surprising things about Peschak’s method is that he doesn’t use any SCUBA gear—instead, he free-dives with only a mask, snorkel, fins, and a weight belt—holding his breath for a few minutes at a time. He says it gives him greater mobility in the water, and allows him to work for longer periods of time. It also makes him seem less threatening to the wildlife.Peschak also pre-visualize images before he dives, sometimes even sketching them out in advance so he knows what to shoot once he’s in the water.“One of the things people forget is the amount of time and research that goes into taking pictures,” says Peschak. “Once you are in the water it’s just waiting for it to happen. You know it’s going to happen because you’ve done your homework. One of the secrets is curiosity—speak to people, become a sponge, and make smart decisions about where and what to photograph.”Thomas P. Peschak’s book Sharks and People was published by the University of Chicago Press in August. You can also see more of his work on his website.",
"Pacific angelshark. Santa Catalina Island, CaliforniaThere are over 465 known species of sharks, ranging from the planet's largest fish—the whale shark—to the palm-size dwarf lanternshark. These misunderstood predators not only fascinate us, but surprise us with their beauty and vulnerability. Due to overfishing and discriminatory killing, among other causes, at least a quarter of sharks and rays may be headed for extinction, according to a 2014 report by the International Union for Conservation of Nature."For the artist within me, sharks represent an endless well of inspiration, a blend of grace and power that lures me into the sea," National Geographic photographer Brian Skerry wrote of his more than 10,000 hours spend photographing sharks."As a journalist, I'm driven by a sense of responsibility and a sense of the urgent need to broadcast that sharks are in trouble and need our help."Here is a closer look at these charismatic creatures.SHARKS: On Assignment with Brian Skerry opens at the National Geographic Museum on May 24, 2017",
"Darrington, Wash.When the door of the wood box slid open, a hefty male fisher named Niffler poked his nose out. Then he took off, gliding like a cat across the damp, mossy earth and into the woods. Next, Niffler’s travel companions, Kendra, Neville, and Katie, were released, each undulating gracefully over fallen branches and logs. Their lush, thick, fur is obvious even as they zoom by at a run.Fierce and lithe, these long-tailed carnivores are native to Canada and the United States, but fur trapping in the early 20th century caused their numbers to plummet. In Washington State, they were wiped out entirely.Niffler, Kendra, Neville, and Katie—all named after characters from the Harry Potter universe—are the last fishers to be released into Washington State’s North Cascades National Park.This fisher reintroduction, which began in Washington in 2008, is bigger than one species. It returns the original complement of mammal carnivores that existed before European colonization back to the state. This includes black bears, wolverines, and lynx, which managed to survived across the centuries; wolves, which began to return on their own in the late 1990s (with local pups documented in 2008); fishers; and grizzly bears, whose numbers are low—but with a little help, their full recovery is feasible. Conservationists are celebrating this victory as proof that the decades-long work of conservation and restoration of native animals can beat back species loss, even in the middle of a global biodiversity crisis. This isn’t just more animals for the animals’ sake—the more biodiverse an ecosystem is, the more resilient it can be.A young male fisher named Remus looks out of his transport box before taking his first steps into the North Cascades.“We’re looking at who-knows-how-many unquantified effects of climate change on the ecosystem—whether it’s fire frequency, or berry production, or any number of things that will have big rippling effects across communities of wildlife,” says Jason Ransom, the lead wildlife biologist for North Cascades National Park. “If you have more species, you have a better chance of keeping the ecosystem functioning and intact.”North Cascades National Park is one of the largest untrammeled ecosystems in the U.S., and along with Mount Rainier and Olympic National Parks, also in Washington, offer the space, resources, and protection that large carnivores need to succeed, Ransom says.By the time fishers received legal protections from overhunting in 1934, they had disappeared from many states entirely. On the East Coast, logging companies began reintroducing them in the 1950s for a business reason—fishers eat porcupines, which eat seedling trees. (Learn more about fisher expansion on the East Coast.)In the Rockies, successful reintroductions took place in the 1960s, ‘70s, and ‘80s.It’s been slower in the West, however. “The West Coast has more carnivores than the East Coast because it was less heavily developed,” says Mitchell Parsons, a wildlife ecologist who wrote his doctoral thesis on fishers. They’re hunters themselves, but they’re also prey—to bobcats, coyotes, and wolves.Parsons also says that the West Coast’s comparatively fewer hardwood trees, which mature faster, may have contributed to slower fisher reproduction in the West, as fishers like to nest in old tree cavities.In Washington state, some 260 fishers have been reintroduced since 2008. So far so good—the fishers have been surviving and reproducing: “The ecosystem’s here, the food’s here, there’s plenty of room for them,” Ransom says.Kingsley, a young male fisher, races along a log into his new habitat in the North Cascades.Federal and state government agencies, Native American tribes, and nonprofits, such as the Seattle-based Conservation Northwest, have come together to ensure success, says Tara Chestnut, an ecologist with Mount Rainier National Park.The national parks also worked with the Canadian provinces of British Columbia and Alberta, and the First Nations tribes there, to capture and transport healthy young fishers. “We were able to facilitate connection and ceremony with some of the local tribes—the Nisqually tribe in particular—so the First Nations could transfer stewardship of their fisher brethren to the local tribal entities,” Chestnut says.In Washington, the Yakama Nation shares a 48-mile-long border with the Gifford Pinchot National Forest, which abuts Mount Rainier National Park. Mark Neutzmann, a wildlife biologist for the Yakama Nation, says they support the return of the fishers and are committed ensuring the safety of any pregnant fishers that may end up on the reservation.“We’d have a buffer around that den, with no harvest and no logging activity during the denning season,” Neutzmann says. For the Yakama, fishers, wolves, and grizzly bears are culturally significant.Just because native carnivores are back doesn’t mean they’re completely safe. The absence of wolves and fishers for so long, for example, left an open niche for coyotes, who have proliferated and moved into territories new to them. Endemic Cascade red foxes, which once occurred throughout Washington’s Cascade Mountains, are now virtually unknown in the North Cascades ecosystem, according to Jocelyn Akins, director of the Cascades Carnivore Project, who is studying whether the foxes are being outcompeted by coyotes. (Read more about how coyotes have expanded their range to 49 states—and show no signs of stopping.)The status of other carnivores is also unknown. “Wolverine abundance has not been estimated, but it is low,” Akins says. Nor is it entirely clear how many grizzly bears live in the state—maybe 10, maybe fewer. There’s a grizzly restoration program proposal working its way through the approvals process right now, and about 80 percent of Washington voters say they support bringing more grizzlies back to the landscape, which could accommodate about 200.Gray wolves, for their part, have had a remarkable self-reintroduction. After being eradicated from the state by the 1930s, there are now 126 wolves in 27 packs, including 15 successful breeding pairs, according to the most recent data from the Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife.Precisely how all these animals will interact isn’t yet known.“We may have a carnivore dynamics shift,” says Chestnut, with populations of previously absent animals rebalancing the ecosystem in different ways. “Grizzlies and wolves were both widespread in the entire U.S., so removing them had remarkable impact on the landscape, from [affecting] the behavior of their prey to [changing] how vegetation grows.”One important advantage is that the full suite of carnivores will likely bring greater resiliency to random wildlife disease events like parvo and distemper, she says. And having a wider variety of species is certainly a benefit for the region.“Diversity brings the strength to survive and thrive through uncertain futures,” Ransom says.Researchers are keeping a close eye on how these animals will influence the temperate rainforest, alpine, prairie, and other Washington ecosystems that haven’t seen this mix of animals in decades. This science will then inform restoration work for coming generations, Chestnut says.",
"Washington's North Cascades—the “American Alps”—have snow-topped mountains, rivers, and valleys. A true wilderness, the park is home to a diverse ecosystem that includes wolves, lynx, and moose.Location: Washington Established: October 2, 1968 Size: 684,000 acres, includes two recreation areasWith glacier-clad peaks rising almost vertically from thickly forested valleys, the North Cascades are often called the American Alps. The national park forms one unit of the North Cascades National Park Service Complex. The two other units—Ross Lake National Recreation Area and Lake Chelan National Recreation Area—contain most visitor facilities.The park complex preserves virgin forests, fragile subalpine meadows, and hundreds of glaciers. Mule deer and black-tailed deer graze the high meadows, where black bears gorge on berries and hoary marmots sunbathe. Mountain goats clamber on rock faces. Mountain lions and bobcats, seldom seen, help keep other wildlife populations in balance.The wildness and ruggedness of the park especially lure hikers, backpackers, and mountaineers. "A more difficult route to travel never fell to man's lot," complained trapper Alexander Ross, who came here in 1814. But today the main road (through Ross Lake NRA) and easy access into the park—on some of its nearly 400 miles of trails—also allow more casual visitors to experience the peaceful forests and the drama of the mountains.The region forms part of the Cascade Range, named for its innumerable waterfalls. The range extends from British Columbia to northern California. A geological theory proposes that the mountains began as a micro-continent several hundred miles out in the Pacific Ocean. Over the eons a series of islands floated on their plate toward North America. About a hundred million years ago, the plate smashed into the North American continent, folding and crumpling into a mountain range as it lodged against the landmass. Those mountains eroded; the Cascades you see today rose only five or six million years ago.The western part of the park differs markedly from the east. Moisture blows in from Puget Sound and the Strait of Juan de Fuca. It hits the western slopes and rises, condensing to rain and snow. Western red cedars, hemlocks, and Douglas firs luxuriate on slopes that receive 110 inches of precipitation a year. When the winds reach the east, they are mostly wrung dry: Only 35 inches of precipitation fall in Stehekin at the head of Lake Chelan. Arid-dwelling sagebrush and ponderosa pine grow in the peaks' rain shadow.In 1956, Canadian author Jack Kerouac found solace (and inspiration for two novels) in a cabin on Desolation Peak, where he worked for the Park Service as a fire spotter for 63 days. In The Dharma Bums, he writes, "I went out in my alpine yard and there it was ... hundreds of miles of pure snow-covered rocks and virgin lakes and high timber ... Below, instead of the world, I saw a sea of marshmallow clouds."With over 300 to its name, North Cascades has more glaciers than any other U.S. park outside Alaska.",
"An active volcano, Mount Rainier has erupted thousands of times during its relatively young life.Location: WashingtonEstablished: 1899Size: 236,381 acresAnnual Visitors: 1.4 millionVisitor Centers: Sunrise, Paradise Jackson, OhanapecoshEntrance Fee: $30 per vehicle, $25 per motorcycle, or $15 per personOne of the world’s oldest national parks, Mount Rainier became part of the federal system in 1899, shortly after its last eruption. Park status was the culmination of a long campaign by John Muir and other conservationists to preserve a unique forest, field, and glacial landscape under threat from the timber and mining extraction that had already ravaged much of the American West. (Here’s why wild salmon remains king in the Pacific Northwest.)That wasn’t the last battle over the mountain. There was also a bitter feud over the name. British explorer George Vancouver originally christened the peak in 1792, naming it after his friend Rear Admiral Peter Rainier of the Royal Navy. With memories of the redcoats still fresh in their minds, Americans who settled the region in the early 19th century preferred the name Mount Tacoma. The lexical dispute continued into the 1920s and returned again with the official designation of Denali as the name of Alaska’s highest peak in 2015.Despite its mountainous topography, the national park is accessible via five different roads from the surrounding lowlands. One of the most popular areas is Sunrise in the northeast, easy to reach from the Seattle–Tacoma metropolitan area (around two hours) and also the highest point (6,400 feet) in the park that visitors can venture with their cars. (Discover the best activities in Seattle.)Wildflowers blanket the park during July and August.Cross-country skiing and snowshoeing are popular activities during winter.Renowned for its panoramic views of Mount Rainier and Emmons Glacier, Sunrise Visitor Center is well stocked with maps, books, and information on the park. Ranger-led programs are a staple during the summer season. Snacks, drinks, and souvenirs are available at the nearby Sunrise Day Lodge.Set amid a large alpine meadow, Sunrise is also the jumping-off point for numerous trails, both short and long, around the fringe of Mount Rainier. One of the easier hikes is the Silver Forest Trail (2 miles) to the Emmons Vista Overlook and an old burn area where the grayish tree trunks glisten silver in a certain light. Far more difficult—and far more rewarding in scenery—is Boroughs Mountain Trail, which climbs steadily upward through wildflower-filled tundra to Frozen Lake and the edge of Winthrop Glacier. Another great route is the 7-mile hike to the Palisades Lakes area, which starts at the parking lot for Sunrise Point (also the best place in the park to catch daybreak over the hazy plains of central Washington).The park’s most visited area is Paradise on the mountain’s south side, which owes its name to Martha Longmire, a young settler who is said to have exclaimed “What a paradise!” when her family homesteaded the area in the 1880s.Paradise Jackson Visitor Center offers exhibits, ranger programs, and films. Even if you’re not sleeping at the historic Paradise Inn (opened in 1917), grab a meal or check out the iconic “parkitecture.” Permits for climbing Rainier and hiking the backcountry are available at the Paradise Climbing Information Center. With the entrance road plowed throughout the winter, Paradise is also the park’s favorite spot for cross-country skiing, snowshoeing, and tubing.Right down the road from Paradise is the Longmire Historic District, where James Longmire (the father of Mount Rainier tourism) and his family settled in the 1880s. The two old park headquarters buildings are now home to the Longmire Museum of local history and the Longmire Wilderness Information Center (another place that issues climbing and backcountry permits).A scientist overlooks an eruption at Mount Etna, one of the world’s most active volcanoes. The Sicily, Italy, volcano is almost constantly in a state of eruption.Tucked in Rainier’s southeast corner is the Ohanapecosh Visitor Center, nestled in a thick old-growth forest that offers a dramatic contrast to the park’s higher altitudes. The Grove of the Old Patriarchs shelters trees as tall as 300 feet and up to 1,000 years old, while the Silver Falls Loop (2.8 miles) leads to the eponymous cascade.Separated from the rest of the park by Rainier’s bulk, the Carbon River area in the northwest has few facilities and few visitors but offers excellent hikes through the temperate rainforest. Carbon Glacier—the lowest elevation glacier in the lower 48 states—is a 17-mile (27.36 km) round-trip walk from the ranger station. Mowich Lake, the park’s largest water body, is the best place to canoe or kayak at Rainier.Get there: From Seattle (95 miles) or Tacoma (70 miles) to the Nisqually Entrance (open year-round), take I-5 to Wash. 7, then follow Wash. 706. From Yakima, take Wash. 12 west to Wash. 123 or Wash. 410, and enter from the park's east side (Stevens Canyon or White River Entrances closed in winter). For the northwest entrances (Carbon River and Mowich Lake), take Wash. 410 to Wash. 169 to Wash. 165, then follow the signs. Carbon River Road washed out in a November 2006 flood (check with the park for closure information).When to go: Year-round. Wildflowers are at their best in July and August. High trails may remain snow covered until mid-July. Cross-country skiing and snowshoeing are popular in winter. Summer and winter, to miss the crowds, time your visit to midweek.Where to stay: Inside the park, stay at Paradise Inn, an iconic national park lodge on the south side of Mount Rainier, or the historic National Park Inn located in Rainier’s Longmire village with a restaurant, general store, and winter ski and snowshoe rental. A half hour from the park entrance on Highway 504, Eco Park Resort offers cabins and yurts. Find campsites at Cougar Rock, White River, Ohanapecosh, and Mowich Lake.",
"Patrolling the front of his shop in bright orange deck pants, the fishmonger drums up a little impromptu drama for tourists fingering their wallets. “What’s the matter?” he asks the crowd, putting his hands on his hips. “Never been properly introduced to the king before?” He extends an open hand.At Seattle’s Pike Place Market, where a ragtag collection of produce, meat, and seafood stalls overlooks the city’s downtown waterfront, crowds gather around comforting displays of food. Stacked like treasure on cushions of ice, several king salmon stare blankly back, their thick sides burnished with a silver sheen. As one of the top three favorite seafoods globally (along with tuna and shrimp), salmon isn’t a tough sell. A couple on vacation from Kalamazoo, Michigan, giggles and points to a 10-pounder. The fishmonger closes the deal with a pretend shake of the fin and tosses the fish theatrically to his colleague behind the counter, who makes a backhanded circus catch before brandishing a large fillet knife that gleams in his hand.The first Copper River salmon of the year are the prize catches at Seattle’s Pike Place Market, where fishmongers entertain tourists with banter and flying fish.Each spring, as the dogwoods begin to bloom, salmon leave the deep-blue pastures of the North Pacific and return to their natal streams to spawn and die. For millennia, people in salmon country—from Alaska to California and inland to Idaho—have celebrated this miraculous gift from the sea.To research my book on salmon culture, I traveled the region and spent time with those who know salmon best, from commercial and tribal fishermen to scientists, anglers, and chefs, all of them connected in one form or another to the ultimate wild food in North America.Recreational anglers gather at Drano Lake, a side channel of the Columbia River, to catch prized spring chinook.In mid-May, when the first Copper River kings and sockeye arrive from Alaska, a whole king of 20 or more pounds might sell for upwards of $40 per pound at Pike Place Market; cleaned and filleted, the same fish costs nearly double. Customers hardly bat an eye. Though the prices drop as lesser known varieties pile up throughout the season, the region’s signature wild salmon are always an attraction. These handsome fish capture our imaginations like no other, and the fishmongers have learned to stage a bit of showbiz flair to move their inventory.While tossing salmon is a ritualistic practice at Pike Place Market, up the slope in Seattle’s Capitol Hill neighborhood, chef John Sundstrom doesn’t seek attention with airborne fish. Instead, he serves a lightly seared fillet skin-up, a formerly eyebrow-raising practice that is gaining traction in many of the city’s better restaurants. The reasoning is simple, and akin to the tenets of nose-to-tail dining: salmon skin is a delicacy that deserves wider appreciation. At Sundstrom’s restaurant, Lark, the salmon is always wild—never farmed. Fittingly for a chef who incorporates Pacific Rim details into his Northwest food, he came to appreciate salmon skin from his first cooking job, at a Japanese restaurant. “I learned from my Japanese chef to treasure the skin and serve it in many forms. I love the fattiness, the deep salmon flavor, and the ability to cook it crispy to provide texture to a dish. At Lark I wouldn’t dream of taking the skin off. It makes for a more pleasing presentation as well as a full expression of a salmon’s flavor.”The Confederated Tribes of the Umatilla Reservation gather for the First Foods festival in Pendleton, Oregon. The festival honors the year’s first salmon, deer, roots, and other wild foods of the region.Seattle is the jumping-off point for salmon eaters and anglers from all over the world heading to Alaska and its myth-shrouded fisheries. But for hundreds of years, probably longer, the most revered salmon in the region were actually found to the south. After taking in the spectacle of Seattle, I continue my salmon tour to the Big River, as the Columbia is known to Native Americans, where it borders the states of Oregon and Washington, following a route that would have been familiar to indigenous fishermen and traders long ago. The four-hour drive takes me over Snoqualmie Pass to the far side of the Cascade Range, lush forests giving way to sagebrush-dotted plateaus and rocky canyons. With a high desert wind at my back, I skirt the Yakama Nation and the volcanic cone of Mount Adams before dropping over the lip to see the grandeur of the Columbia River Gorge, historically the greatest salmon fishery on the planet.The fish ladders at Bonneville Dam, on the Columbia River, allow the passage of salmon, shad, eel, and other species upriver to spawn. Fish swim back and forth in a channel that rises in elevation in a series of switchbacks.The spring kings of the Columbia (also called spring chinook, or simply springers) migrate hundreds of miles upstream without feeding, relying on heavy stores of fat to carry them through to the fall spawning. Entire indigenous societies, some of which still exist, were organized around these fish. The fish ladder at Bonneville Dam, an hour east of Portland, Oregon, is the place to see these marathoners up close, and the greeters at the dam’s interpretive center understand the attraction. They direct tourists to the downstairs viewing area first; the turbines and other power-generating equipment on this, one of the most hydroelectrically developed river systems in the world, can wait.As soon as the elevator doors open, I hear the clamor. Kids and adults alike press their faces to the glass as chunky king salmon, dozens of them, move silently through the ladder, a galaxy of bubbles rushing backward in the current. “I’d like to have a couple of those in my truck,” murmurs a man in coveralls. The fish enter a chute at the foot of the dam because they’re naturally drawn to current. Back and forth they swim through a hard-edged concrete channel that flows like a water slide, gaining elevation through a series of stair-stepping switchbacks, until they’ve summited and reached the reservoir on the other side. The salmon don’t seem to see us as they pass the viewing chamber, just inches away. Their unblinking eyes betray no recognition, and unlike a curious leopard or gorilla at the zoo, they move through with their otherness intact.The Snake River sockeye will swim more than 900 miles upstream to a chain of subalpine lakes in the Sawtooth Mountains of central Idaho, the longest salmon migration in the contiguous United States. It’s a heroic journey, one that can tire you out just thinking about it.In Oregon’s Cascade Locks, at Brigham Fish Market, I contemplate the mysteries of fish while ogling silver and red slabs gleaming in the refrigerated glass case. The Brigham family belongs to the Confederated Tribes of the Umatilla, and their store is the first Native American–owned brick-and-mortar fish market in the Columbia Gorge, never mind that Umatilla tribal members have fished here since “time immemorial,” as it’s usually put.Fillets smoke on a grill at Brigham Fish Market in Cascade Locks, Oregon. The Market is the first Native American–owned brick-and-mortar fish market in the Columbia River Gorge.Ask Kim Brigham Campbell where the rich sides of salmon in the case come from and she’ll nod toward the back door. Her sister, Terrie Brigham, explains that most of the salmon are caught nearby by family members and friends, mainly in modern gill nets, though 15 percent of the catch still comes from traditional dip netting.I find Brigham Campbell, Kim’s teenage son, working a dip net down by the site of the former locks, which were built in 1896 and became obsolete with the completion of Bonneville Dam in 1938. Today a museum and park mark the site, with a concrete-lined channel where the boy is fishing from a platform suspended from a stone retaining wall. He figures he’s been fishing since he was six or seven. The scaffolding that supports him hangs over the river, connected by high-tension cables. With one hand gripping a long pole, he sinks a net 10 feet down, while his other hand holds a line tied to the back of the mesh.“Sometimes on the pole I get a little tweak sideways or it’ll shake a little bit,” he says of the technique. “But mostly I feel it on the string.” And just like that, he pulls up on the line and hauls in his net. Several shad thrash in the mesh, their large silver scales lighting up like strobes in the sun. He dumps them in a bucket and continues to fish. Earlier that morning he caught a seven-pound steelhead. Sockeye are harder to catch.Terrie Brigham holds a spring chinook salmon she caught in Cascade Locks, Oregon.“It’s lucky to get just one. Two is really good. My mom got two yesterday.” Spring chinook, the prize fish, require extra vigilance; otherwise, they can do damage. “Your pole shakes. You’ve got to get it up fast. If it gets its head down and shakes, it’ll break the net.” The salmon and steelhead are all filleted and sold at the market. The shad is sold as bait to sturgeon fishermen, who fish for the prehistoric-looking bottom-feeders in the deep pools behind the dams.Farther east in the Columbia River Gorge, one of the consequences of the river’s power-generating capabilities lies hidden below the waterline. For centuries and possibly millennia, Celilo Falls was the epicenter of the Pacific Northwest’s salmon culture. Native Americans gathered at the falls each spring to catch a year’s supply of salmon and to trade goods. Lewis and Clark landed there on October 22, 1805, noting it as “the great mart” of the West. Also called Wyam, which means “the sound of water upon the rocks,” these falls haven’t been heard since March 10, 1957, when The Dalles Dam closed its gates for the first time and flooded one of the most sacred of all fishing sites in North America.Fishermen from the Yakama Nation in Washington fish from their homemade wooden platforms for spring chinook along the shores of the Klickitat River.Historically, Native American communities from up and down the river traveled to Celilo each spring to catch salmon in dip nets from wooden platforms built precariously over the falls. The fishing couldn’t begin, however, until the salmon had been shown the proper respect. Variations of the First Salmon ceremony still take place throughout salmon country. They differ slightly from tribe to tribe, but the general outline is the same: The first salmon of the year is ritualistically shared with everyone in the community, and its skeleton cleaned and returned to the river and floated downstream. In this way, the ambassador from the salmon tribe can return to its underwater kin and tell of the respect it received from the human beings living upstream, so that more of its kind will ascend and nourish the people.Once the First Salmon ceremony has been performed—with its rituals of drumming, dancing, fasting, and feasting, which might take place over several days—the fishing season can then begin in earnest. Before the dam-building era, the fishing closures built into such rites had the effect of allowing more salmon to reach their upstream spawning grounds, ensuring future runs for harvest. “Spiritual game management,” it’s been called.Today, the powwow that accompanies the Celilo First Salmon ceremony, usually held in mid-April at the village longhouse, is open to the public, with a salmon picnic to follow. Traditional dip netting can still be seen on the Columbia and its tributaries. These fishing sites represent some of the longest continuously inhabited places in the Americas and, though the river is no longer the fishery it once was, it’s still the heart of salmon country.The Big River, as the Columbia is known to Native Americans, borders the states of Oregon and Washington.Before leaving the gorge, I stop by the Bridge of the Gods, in Cascade Locks, where the Pacific Crest Trail crosses the Columbia River, to try one last bite of smoked chinook sold from the back of a tribal member’s pickup. In the shadow of this modern cantilever bridge named for an ancient Native American myth, I savor the richness of wild salmon, a taste both old and new—and unlike any other fish from the sea. As a tribal elder once told me, “We are not wealthy, but we always have salmon.”Columbia spring chinook season is typically April and May. Check the Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Oregon Department of Fish and Wildlife for regulations.Hood River Hotel — Recently renovated but retaining vintage details, this 41-room lodging in the Columbia River Gorge is on the National Register of Historic Places. Ground-level rooms are dog-friendly.Inn at the Market — Located on-site at Pike Place Market, this 76-room boutique hotel has expansive views of the Seattle waterfront from some rooms and a rooftop deck for sunset cocktails.Celilo Restaurant & Bar — Locally and sustainably sourced fish, meats, and produce star at Celilo, in Hood River. An A-list cellar highlights Oregon wine.Double Mountain Brewery — Creating notable craft brews, including an oatmeal stout and a Brut IPA, this Hood River brewery and taproom is also known for its tasty pizza. The venue hosts live music acts regularly.Lark Restaurant — In the Capitol Hill neighborhood, this top Seattle restaurant helmed by chef John Sundstrom celebrates Pacific Northwest ingredients, from oysters and wild salmon to sunchokes and black trumpet mushrooms.",
"The iconic Space Needle overlooks solar-powered flower sculptures at the Pacific Science Center in Seattle.Nestled between Puget Sound and Lake Washington, and bordered by the Olympic and Cascade Mountains, Seattle is a stunner. Despite its rightful reputation for gray, rainy days, it makes a great place to visit, with plenty to do outside, great shops and restaurants, rich history, and even richer coffee. And if the sun comes out while you’re there, you’ll understand just why so many people are flocking to this Pacific paradise. Here are 10 places not to miss when visiting the Emerald City.Short of your 10,000 steps for the day? Knock out 848 by climbing to the top of Seattle’s most iconic landmark—or take a high-speed glass elevator to the observation deck 520 feet above downtown. Built in an astonishing 400 days for the 1962 World’s Fair, the Space Needle’s sweeping views take in the Seattle skyline, Elliott Bay, and permanently snowcapped Mount Rainier. There’s a revolving restaurant at the top if you like a little spin with your lunch, or go at night to see the city alight.If you’ve ever seen a rom-com filmed in Seattle, you’ve seen Pike Place Market. This is no mere tourist attraction, though—it’s a working market that brings in as many locals as it does out-of-towners. It sprawls over more than seven acres and includes food and produce stalls (watch out for fish flying overhead), a craft market, a warren of small shops, and scores of places to eat and drink. The very first Starbucks is here, as is the grossly mesmerizing Gum Wall.You can spend an entire day exploring all that Seattle’s bustling waterfront has to offer. Amid the shops and restaurants (try Ivar’s for fish and chips or Elliott’s Oyster House for happy hour deals), there are other attractions. The Seattle Aquarium is a perennial favorite; there are the usual fishy delights but the stars are the playful sea otters. For a view with a thrill, take a ride on the Great Wheel, the largest observation wheel on the West Coast, or get out on the water with a ferry to the islands or an Argosy cruise of the waterfront.Gas Works Park stands out in a city of outstanding parks. You might recognize it from 10 Things I Hate About You or the Amazing Race (or any of its countless other TV and film cameos). There are picnic-perfect sweeping lawns, a large hill with amazing views of Lake Union and downtown, a play barn for kids—and the rust-red remains of the former Seattle Gas Light Company gasification plant. The industrial structures only serve to heighten the beauty of the green space around it—and make for incredible Instagram shots.It’s impossible to narrow Seattle’s neighborhoods down to just one. These two stand out for their perfect combos of shops, restaurants, and personality. The self-proclaimed “center of the universe,” Fremont is a (slightly) gentrifying boho neighborhood that’s easily walkable. Don’t miss the Fremont Troll, an 18-foot-tall sculpture under Aurora Bridge, or the statue of Lenin that was brought here after the Velvet Revolution in Czechoslovakia. Hip Ballard is best known for its restaurants, bars, and shops. Try Bitterroot BBQ for hefty sandwiches and platters, La Carta de Oaxaca for authentic Mexican, or The Walrus and the Carpenter for oysters and atmosphere.That shimmering mirage near the Space Needle? That’s the Museum of Pop Culture, a stainless steel and aluminum-clad wonder designed by Frank Gehry. Microsoft co-founder Paul Allen established the museum in 2000 as the Experience Music Project, a paean to rock ‘n’ roll in the city that gave us Jimi Hendrix and grunge. Its focus has widened to include all aspects of pop culture with changing exhibitions, but music still has prominence. Don’t miss the Sky Church, the “throbbing heart” of the museum, and the Science Fiction Hall of Fame.This Seattle gem is one of the best aviation museums in the world. Located at Boeing Field near Georgetown, the Museum of Flight features more than 160 aircraft and spacecraft, including a Concorde, the first Air Force One, and the Caproni Ca.20, the first World War I fighter plane (and the only one ever made). There are scores of interactive elements: an air traffic control tower overlooking Boeing Field’s busy runways, flight simulators, a mock NASA Mission Control, and more. The Boeing Company’s original manufacturing plant, the Red Barn, now holds historical exhibits and artifacts.One of Washington State’s most colorful exports is Dale Chihuly, a glass sculptor whose massive blown glass installations can be seen in museums and installations around the world. Chihuly Garden and Glass in Seattle Center near the Space Needle celebrates the artist and showcases his work in a beautiful location. The centerpiece is the Glasshouse, a 40-foot-tall conservatory that features a 100-foot-long glass sculpture. Eight other galleries spotlight more work, and a theater shows films of Chihuly in action. The displays continue outside in the Garden, where fanciful glass forms rise from flowers.Even if you don’t love football, taking in a home game of the city’s beloved Seattle Seahawks is an unforgettable experience. At CenturyLink Field, the roar made by very, very exuberant fans set a record for loudest stadium noise. The sound actually registered on seismographs as a minor earthquake. Games often sell out, so book tickets before your trip.Seattle is serious about coffee. Very serious. You can’t possibly try each place (unless you’re staying for a few years) but you can give it a good try. Start with Espresso Vivace in Capitol Hill, hailed by Emeril Lagasse as the best coffee in the country. You know the foam drawings on top of your coffee? Vivace owner David Schomer started that trend. In Pioneer Square, stop at Zeitgeist, an airy spot that also features local artists. For great coffee with a view of Puget Sound, try Storyville in Pike Place Market. In Belltown, there’s the unassuming Moore Coffee Shop, which offers some unusual drinks (taro latte, anyone?), and Top Pot, famous for its doughnuts. And even if you’re not a fan of the chain, the massive Starbucks Reserve Roastery and Tasting Room in Capitol Hill is a beautiful space to see the roasting process up close.",
"Olympic’s 73 miles of park coastline feature soaring cliffs and sea stacks, sandy beaches, rocky shores, and teeming tide pools.Established: 1938Size: 922,650 acresAnnual Visitors: 3.4 millionVisitor Centers: Port Angeles, Hurricane Ridge, Hoh Rain Forest, Lake QuinaultEntrance Fee: $25 vehicles; $10 individualsnps.gov/olymOne of the most primeval parts of the lower 48 states, Olympic National Park covers nearly 1 million acres of the eponymous peninsula in Washington State—95 percent of which is designated wilderness. While the typical image of the park is a dark, damp, and overwhelmingly beautiful temperate rainforest, the park also shelters alpine highlands, tranquil lakeshores, and a wild Pacific coastline that seems totally untouched by humans.Olympic is one of the places that President Teddy Roosevelt recognized as an endangered national treasure, protecting the area’s snowcapped peaks and lush forest with national monument status in 1909. That set the stage for a struggle between the timber industry and conservationists that segued into the ecological wave that later swept the Pacific Northwest.In 1938, Olympic was designated as a national park, after an act of Congress that was signed into law by President Franklin Roosevelt.While it’s possible to enter the park from more than two dozen spots off the Olympic Highway (U.S. 101), the most popular is via Port Angeles on the peninsula’s north shore. The city’s Olympic National Park Visitor Center provides the usual range of information, books, and maps, as well as hands-on exhibits on the park’s human and natural history. Two short nature walks, the Living Forest Loop (0.4 mile) and Peabody Creek Trail (0.5 mile), are a good introduction to the nature that lies ahead.Mount Angeles Road meanders 17 miles south into the heart of the park and a popular spot called Hurricane Ridge, where another visitor center offers exhibits and ranger-guided activities during the summer. Hikers have plenty of choices, from the short, flat Big Meadow Loop (a quarter mile) to challenging treks like the 8-mile Wolf Creek Trail to Whiskey Bend. During winter, snow-shoeing and cross-country skiing take over the Hurricane (equipment rentals are available at the gift shop).Heading west from Port Angeles, Highway 101 makes a beeline for blue-green Lake Crescent, renowned for both its beauty and indigenous trout species. Get out on the water with a rental boat from Fairholme Store, hike or bike the north shore via the 10.5-mile Spruce Railroad Trail, or take a refreshing dip at East Beach.Just beyond the lake’s western end, a side road leads to Sol Duc Hot Springs with its outdoor mineral pools (the hottest averages 104°F) and massage treatments. The valley is also renowned for its ancient forest, with many of the towering trees more than 200 years old. Salmon Cascades is a great spot to watch fish spawn in the fall, while trails lead off to Mink Lake, Sol Duc Falls, and the secluded Seven Lakes Basin.Sunrise paints the sky pale orange over Coastguard Beach in Cape Cod, Massachusetts. More than half of all U.S. residents live in coastal counties—and that figure is expected to continue climbing, according to the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.Over on the park’s supersaturated west side, the Hoh Valley is home to the park’s most enchanting forest, a mosaic of moss, ferns, and giant trees that really does look like something from a medieval fairytale (or Sasquatch movie). This is also the gateway to 7,980-foot Mount Olympus, the park’s highest point. Glacier-climbing skills are necessary to reach the peak, but day hikers can reach the base of Blue Glacier via the 18-mile Hoh River Trail.As Anne and Mike Howard wrote for National Geographic, the Quinault Valley is “a humbling place,” home to some of the largest hemlocks, Douglas firs, western red cedars, and a 1,000-year-old Sitka spruce. The Howards suggest starting with the educational Quinault Rain Forest Nature Loop, a half-mile trail through this textbook example of a temperate rain forest. Continue hiking on the various connecting trails or keep it mellow with a 31-mile drive around the exceptionally scenic lake.Separated from the rest of the park by private and tribal lands, Kalaloch area protects 65 miles of a wild Pacific coast carved by waves and tidal action. Riptides and floating logs inhibit swimming or surfing in these waters. The shoreline is more suited to long walks, exploring tide pools, and scouting for the harbor seals, porpoises, sea otters, and other local denizens.Hotels • Lake Crescent Lodge: Founded in 1915, the south shore inn offers biking, fishing, and paddle sports; restaurant, gift shop.• Log Cabin Resort: Perched on the north shore of Lake Crescent, the resort provides a wide range of choices from rustic camper cabins to A-frame chalets; restaurants, boat rental, general store.• Sol Duc Hot Springs Resort: The mineral pools are just steps away from this historic retreat founded in 1912 in the Sol Duc Valley; restaurant, grocery store, gift shop, spa treatments.• Kalaloch Lodge: Cabins and motel-style rooms overlook the Pacific; restaurant, gift shop.Camping • Olympic National Park contains 14 developed campgrounds and scores of backcountry possibilities. Check with the Park Service for more info.• Situated above 5,000 feet, Hurricane Ridge becomes a snowy winter playground from roughly December to March.• Snowshoeing and cross-country skiing are popular (ranger-guided tours are available and equipment can be rented at the gift shop).• Alpine skiing, snowboarding, and tubing are available at the small Hurricane Ridge Ski and Snowboard Area.",
"Stubborn remnants of an ancient coastline, sea stacks tower above Shi Shi Beach in Olympic National Park. Endowed with a dramatic coastline, thick forests, and muscular peaks, Olympic scores a gold among the nation's premier parks.",
"Moss-draped trees, shrubs, and ferns adorn the Hoh River Valley, a temperate rain forest in Washington State's Olympic National Park. Its trees include big leaf maples, western hemlock, and Sitka spruce.",
"Two backpackers trek along the Hoh River Trail in Washington's Olympic National Park.Western Washington State gets a lot of flack for "bad" weather, but the rain forests of Olympic National Park make it all worthwhile. The 12 to 14 feet of annual rainfall in the Olympic Mountains yields an intensely lush landscape of moss-dropped cedars, towering spruces, and fog-shrouded Douglas firs, some 300 feet tall. The relative rarity of a rain forest in the United States has obvious appeal, though that's just one card in this park's ecological full house.In addition to the mystical Hoh and Quinault temperate rain forests, this heart-shaped peninsula is also nestled amid glacier-capped mountains, wildflower meadows, 13 teal rivers, and 70 miles of rugged coastline. Its diversity of ecosystems is so impressive it has earned status as an international Biosphere Reserve and a UNESCO World Heritage site.In theory, you could ice climb, beachcomb, mountain trek, fly-fish, and soak in volcanic hot springs all in the same day. No matter your interests, the million acres of national park and about 611 miles of trails will lead to excitement.After a walk through the famous Hall of Mosses, shake the crowds and follow the glacial-blue Hoh River to Five Mile Island. Centuries-old cedars weave the canopy, ferns carpet the forest floor, and Roosevelt elk appear in the herds the deeper you get. A 10-mile hike will fly by with such flat terrain and beauty largely unchange for thousands of years.A hiker stops on a trail along Hurricane Ridge in Washington's Olympic National Park.One of the most accessible peaks is also among the most spectacular, especially as an overview of the expansive Olympic National Park. A 17-mile drive brings you to panoramic vistas of the peninsula, Strait of Juan de Fuca, and the glaciated peaks of the Olympic Mountains. The ridge has trails for every fitness level.Light shines through the maple trees in Olympic National Park's Quinault Valley.Home to some of the largest hemlocks, Douglas firs, western red cedars, and a 1,000-year-old Sitka spruce, the Quinault Valley is a humbling place. Start with the educational Quinault Rain Forest Nature Loop, a half-mile trail through this textbook example of a temperate rain forest. Continue hiking on the various connecting trails or keep it mellow with a 31-mile drive around the exceptionally scenic lake.A kayak sits on a rocky shoreline inside Washington's Olympic National Park.A rugged beach with massive driftwood, tree-topped sea stacks, folding rocks, Kaloloch's Beach 4 is stunning and especially impressive when you explore at low tide. Tiptoe around the pools to spy massive green anemones, starfish in sunset hues, and otters splashing about.Anne and Mike Howard travel the world and share their adventures at HoneyTrek.com. Follow them on Instagram @honeytrek.One of the most photographed views in Zion National Park, and perhaps all of the parks, is the view of the Watchman from the Canyon Junction Bridge. Although it has been shot endless times, and you are sure to be shoulder to shoulder with other photographers during sunset, it is still something everyone must do when visiting the park. My favorite spot is right at the center of the bridge where the river leads the eye to the Watchman in the background.",
"The snow-topped peaks of the Olympics are a mercurial sight from Seattle, vanishing in fog and rain only to reappear again when the skies clear. First explored by non-natives only in 1890, when a Seattle newspaper sent an expedition across Puget Sound to do so, the Olympics and their peninsula of 3,600 square miles (9,324 square kilometers) are still surprisingly, romantically wild. Even now no roads traverse the interior, which remains a redoubt of elk and old-growth forest, protected by Olympic National Park and the rugged, saw-toothed peaks of the Olympic Range.Enter the loop highway, 101, at its junction with 104, then follow it for 330 miles (531 kilometers) around the peninsula counterclockwise via Port Angeles to Aberdeen; take Highway 12 inland to just west of Olympia, then follow 101 north to complete the loop along the Hood Canal.Cross the Hood Canal Bridge to reach the Olympic Peninsula, connect with 101, then quickly turn right on Highway 20 for a quick detour to Port Townsend. It's "the most sophisticated place west of Seattle," known for its Victorian architecture, art galleries, and wine bars, says one resident. Back on 101, proceed toward Sequim. As you approach this small town surrounded by lavender farms and clusters of retirees' RVs, you'll come inside the peninsula's rain shadow—in which the mountains to the west drain the Pacific storms, leaving clear skies. Watch for views of the peaks, an alpine watercolor framed by your windshield. Stop for a bite at Sawadee Thai Cuisine (271 S. 7th St., Sequim; tel. 1 360 683 8188), which bustles with locals hungering for fresh curries.Beyond Sequim, turn north to see the Dungeness Spit, one of the world's longest natural sand spits. The area was declared a national wildlife refuge in 1915 because of the abundance of bird species—over 250—that you find here, making it a bird-watcher's paradise.A bit father along 101, as you continue moving counterclockwise around the northeast corner of the peninsula, you reach Port Angeles. This coastal logging town at the doorstep of Olympic National Park offers a possible side trip: From here you can catch the ferry over to the wonderfully British city of Victoria on Vancouver Island, British Columbia. But there's plenty to see on this side of the Strait of Juan de Fuca as well. Stay overnight and enjoy the gourmet breakfast at the Domaine Madeleine (146 Wildflower La., Port Angeles; tel. 1 888 811 8376; www.domainemadeleine.com), an elegant B&B. Take a day trip out to Hurricane Ridge, which offers a panoramic view of snowy peaks, probably the best views of the park available by road. "We like being at the ends of the Earth here," says one Port Angeles resident. "Where else in the world do you have this beautiful coastline, mountains, and glaciers?"Soon the road forks. If you bear right and take Highway 112, you'll end up at Neah Bay, the westernmost point reachable by car in Washington state. Here the Makah Indian tribe (www.makah.com) has a cultural center and gift shop. And you can camp, hike, or fish in the vicinity.If you bear left at the fork, and stay on Highway 101, you'll soon be along the shores of Lake Crescent, "the most beautiful lake in the United States," boasts one local. Each bend opens another vista more transcendent than the last. The road traces the southern shore of the lake, dipping inside the park boundary. The views rival anything in the Alps. Spend the night at the rustic Lake Crescent Lodge (416 Lake Crescent Rd.; tel. 1 360 928 3211; www.lakecrescentlodge.com); ask for a lakeside cottage with fireplace.Another classic resort in the park is Sol Duc Hot Springs (tel. 1 866 476 5382; www.visitsolduc.com), offering cool hikes in misty forests and hot soaks in heated pools.As Highway 101 rounds the corner and turns south, watch for the turnoff to 110, leading to La Push, a town surrounded by the coastal section of Olympic National Park and just outside the Quileute Indian Reservation. For views of the Pacific surf and nearby sea stacks, stay at Oceanside Resort (320 Ocean Dr.; tel. 1 360 374 5267; www.quileutenation.org), owned and run by the tribe.Back on 101, heading south, you're soon in the logging town of Forks. Stop at the Forks Timber Museum (1421 S. Forks Ave.; tel. 1 360 374 9663), built by the town's high schoolers back in 1990 as an homage to the local timber industry. The museum has displays of equipment and artifacts dating back to the 1870s.One of the real highlights of the drive is a hike in the Hoh Rain Forest in the heart of the national park. Here Sitka spruce and western hemlock reach heights of up to 300 feet (91 meters), the moss-covered giants thriving on some 150 inches (381 centimeters) of rainfall a year. The Hoh is like Tolkien's Middle-earth, a supernatural world of fantastic shapes. Like laser beams, shafts of sunlight pierce the wet air, causing steam to rise wherever they strike the soggy forest floor. Enjoy a visitors center (Hoh Rain Forest Visitor Center, tel. 1 360 374 6925; www.nps.gov/olym/planyourvisit/visting-the-hoh.htm), campground, picnic area, and self-guided trail.As wonderful as the Hoh is, some locals prefer the Quinault Rain Forest (www.quinaultrainforest.com), which is farther south along the loop. "In the summer it sees fewer tourists," says one. Enjoy a lake, river, and hiking trails. Drive the 30-mile (48-kilometer) loop around Lake Quinault for great views of forests and mountains. Stay at the romantic Lake Quinault Lodge (tel. 1 888 896 3827; www.visitlakequinault), a favorite for weddings, which is listed on the National Register of Historic Places.Drive on to Grays Harbor on the peninsula's southern end, where you pick up Highway 12. Stop in Hoquiam to see the national wildlife refuge (www.fws.gov/graysharbor), a habitat for shorebirds, and the Polson Museum (www.polsonmuseum.org), a local history museum housed in a former private mansion dating to 1924.Rounding the southern end of the loop and heading back north on 101, stop in Shelton, home of Nita's Restaurant and Gallery (325 W. Railroad Ave.; tel. 1 360 426 6143), known for its good diner fare, including berry milk shakes. Continue up 101 as it follows the Hood Canal. As you close out the loop, there are a number of state parks where you can stop along the way to stretch your legs or camp overnight. Before rejoining 104, take a detour drive—about five miles south of the town of Quilcene—to the summit of Mount Walker. The four-mile (six-kilometer) gravel road is narrow and steep but okay for passenger cars. The payoff at the top are broad views of Mount Rainier, Puget Sound, and Seattle.Olympic Peninsula Visitor Bureau (tel. 1 800 942 4042, www.olympicpeninsula.org); Port Townsend guide (http://www.cityofpt.us/); Port Angeles guide (www.portangeles.org), Olympic National Park (Port Angeles; tel. 1 360 565 3130, www.nps.gov/olym).—Text by Andrew Nelson",
"Encompassing 1,441 square miles of Washington’s Olympic Peninsula, Olympic National Park invites visitors to explore three distinct ecosystems: subalpine forest and wildflower meadow; temperate forest; and the rugged Pacific shore. Because of the park’s relatively unspoiled condition and outstanding scenery, the United Nations has declared Olympic both an international biosphere reserve and a World Heritage site.Barb Maynes knew she wanted to work for the National Park Service when she was just 13, owing to a chance run-in with a kindly ranger at the Grand Canyon who took time out to explain what made the geological icon such a special place. Since then, she’s worked in nine different national parks, and each one has been a dream come true.Barb’s current favorite is Olympic, where she’s spent the last 25 years helping people make their own connections with the park’s awe-inspiring landscapes. Here’s a look at the wild wonderland through her unique lens.Spring is the best time to visit my park because Olympic absolutely pops! The weather is unpredictable; a single day can include rain, sleet, and brilliant sunshine. But by May, the mountain snow has melted enough that the Hurricane Ridge Road is open and the forests are filled with every shade of green imaginable.Olympic’s biggest attraction is its amazing diversity of forested mountains and Pacific coast beaches. But a visit isn’t complete without stopping along a river to listen to its babble and ponder the role it plays in connecting the mountains to the sea.If I could offer one practical tip for optimizing your visit, it would be to expect some rain and be ready to enjoy it with good gear and plenty of layers. Fleece works well because it keeps you warm even if it gets wet. Hats and gloves made of lightweight fleece and hiking boots with wool socks can help visitors fall in love with a rainy day.My favorite “park secret” is the Madison Falls Trail in the Elwha Valley. It’s paved, only a quarter mile long, and ends at a beautiful waterfall. The trail is also highly accessible, which makes it a great choice for families with strollers or young walkers, or for anyone in a wheelchair.Head to the Hoh Rain Forest if you want to see wildlife. If you’re really lucky, you’ll spot some Roosevelt elk.For the best view, head to Hurricane Ridge.The Hall of Mosses Trail in the Hoh Rain Forest is one of the best trails in the park and the road leading up to Hurricane Ridge is the most scenic drive.If you’re up for a physical challenge, try hiking the nine-mile Ozette Triangle.To experience the park’s cultural side, stop at the Lake Crescent Lodge, which celebrates its centennial in 2015 and offers beautiful views of Lake Crescent and the surrounding mountains from its historic sun porch.If you only have one day to spend in the park, make sure to get an early start and get a taste of the mountains at Hurricane Ridge and the coast at Rialto Beach. Somewhere in between the two (Lake Crescent and Sol Duc are good options), take a few moments to walk through the ancient forest.If you’re interested in a guided tour, I recommend checking the Olympic Peninsula Visitor Bureau website.The most peaceful place in the park has to be just about anywhere. Find a trail and follow it. Soon, the sounds of traffic will fade away and you can find a spot to sit and soak up the tranquility that surrounds you.The countless generations of native Americans who have inhabited the Olympic peninsula are the “unsung heroes” of the park. The cultural knowledge and profound connection to the land that have been passed down throughout the ages to today’s tribal members deepen everyone’s appreciation for this beautiful place.Seeing glaciers, temperate rain forests, and the ocean in one day could only happen in my park.If you have kids (or are a kid at heart), you won’t want to miss the beaches in the Kalaloch area.Just outside park boundaries, you can visit lots of amazing places, from lavender farms to wineries to seaside towns. The Olympic Peninsula Visitor Bureau website is a great source of information.If my park had a mascot it would be the Olympic marmot, because this cute, furry animal can only be found in the Olympic Mountains. And it whistles!The biggest threat to this park’s future is climate change.In 140 characters or less, the world should heart my park because it has something beautiful for everyone—glacier-capped mountains, towering trees, wave-swept beaches, and much more.",
"Sunrise paints the sky pale orange over Coastguard Beach in Cape Cod, Massachusetts. More than half of all U.S. residents live in coastal counties—and that figure is expected to continue climbing, according to the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.",
"Fishers are returning to places in North America where they haven't been seen for 200 years.They're fierce. They're furry. They're cousins to the weasel. And they could be coming to a suburb near you.According to a new study, fishers are starting to expand their range in places in the northeastern United States where they haven't lived for some 200 years, including places near people. And their range isn't the only thing that's growing: Recent examinations of eastern fisher skulls show that the predators are becoming bigger than their counterparts out West.What's a fisher? Well, the first thing to know is that it doesn't eat fish. The name "fisher" is thought to have come from early American immigrants who noted the animal's resemblance to the European polecat, which was also called a "fitchet," "fitch," or "fitchew."Fishers are long-tailed carnivores in the family Mustelidae. Sometimes called the weasel family, it also includes badgers, otters, and minks. The fisher is found only in Canada and the northern U.S.In size and attitude, it's somewhere between a domesticated ferret and a wolverine."Maybe a little closer to a wolverine," says Scott LaPoint.A postdoctoral researcher at the Max Planck Institute for Ornithology, LaPoint is the lead author of a new paper published in Animal Conservation that details how these medium-size mustelids have begun to retake their old territory after centuries of persecution. (The research was funded in part by the National Geographic Society's Waitt Grants program.)"[Fur] trapping and forest clearing practically wiped fishers out of the U.S.," says LaPoint, "but [they] are now reclaiming much of their historic range" across the northern U.S. and down the Appalachian Mountains.In the eastern U.S., LaPoint found, fishers have now expanded their geographic range by 119 percent since about 1900. One male was even spotted prowling the streets of the Bronx earlier this month—which means the city's rats, squirrels, and pigeons should be on high alert.Mustelids in the MiddleFishers are what biologists call mesopredators, or middle predators. That means they're a link below apex, or top, predators in the food chain. Adult females weigh about 4 pounds (1.8 kilograms); adult males tip the scales at about 12 (5.4 kilograms). Full-grown males can be nearly four feet (1.2 meters) long, though a lot of that is tail.Fierce and lithe, fishers can pursue prey into tight spaces like underground tunnels or the passages some creatures create beneath winter snow. After they chase down hares and squirrels, they dispatch them with a quick bite to the back of the neck.Sharp, partially retractable claws let fishers scale trees like a cat. And their hind paws can rotate nearly 180 degrees, allowing them to come back down a trunk headfirst. This last trick is what makes fishers one of the few predators that can take down a porcupine.Dance of DeathWith a nearly impenetrable coat of 30,000 quills, each tipped with a microscopic barb that sticks in flesh like a whaling harpoon, porcupines don't have much to fear from predators large or small. But every defense has its weakness."The fisher attacks the head, because the head has no quills," says Uldis Roze, a professor emeritus of biology at Queens College at the City University of New York and a porcupine researcher for more than 35 years. "Of course, the head is crucial to the porcupine. No head, no porcupine."To avoid the most dangerous parts of a porcupine—the neck, back, and tail—a fisher dances circles around its prey. Each time the low-to-the-ground fisher gets a look at the porcupine's face, it lunges forward and strikes. Repeated bites to the face disorient the victim, cause bleeding, and eventually send it into shock. The fisher then rolls the porcupine over and starts eating through its stomach, neatly skinning the kill to avoid the still dangerous quills.The process is neither quick—Roze says the lethal dance alone takes 30 minutes to an hour—nor pretty. Often the fisher scalps the porcupine in the process. Roze and a colleague once happened upon a fisher moments after a kill and found a porcupine carcass completely beheaded.When a porcupine is cornered, it will sometimes jam its vulnerable head against the base of a tree. Any other predator would be at an impasse, facing a wall of quills on every side. But the fisher's special ankles mean it can hop on the trunk and start attacking from above.The Ecology of FearAs fishers have been pushing back East, they've also been getting bigger. LaPoint's research evaluated specimens from across the U.S. and found that eastern fishers now have larger skulls than those examined in the American West and Midwest.This is what biologists call directional selection. In this case, a random mutation of genes produces a few fishers with slightly larger skulls. That may allow them to take down their prey more efficiently or target larger prey. Over time, as the bigger-skulled fishers keep passing on their genes, the new genes become the norm.According to one of LaPoint's co-authors, Roland Kays, the lab director at the North Carolina Museum of Natural Sciences and a professor at North Carolina State University, "Finding that fishers are evolving a larger body size and that they're eating larger prey really shows that they're starting to move into the larger predator space."Around the same time that fishers were disappearing, aggressive antipredator campaigns sought to kill off wolves and mountain lions. As this study and others illustrate, we're still trying to understand the effects.Kays says the absence of apex predators—and the effect it's had on fisher size and range—constitutes an interesting ecological phenomenon."We call it the ecology of fear," he says. "If you have a predator that you're afraid of, you use the landscape in different ways."For a fisher, that would mean avoiding risky places like clearings or foraging only when it knows that apex predators won't be around. But no predators means no pressure—or competition.Fisher KingsWhether they're roaming around the Bronx or figuring out ways to cross highways, fishers are thriving in part because they're highly adaptable. Human development presents certain opportunities, such as backyard bird feeders, farmers' fields, highway roadkill, and neatly groomed parks. "Think of all those naive squirrels!" says LaPoint."Fishers have been able to recover right under our noses," says Kays, who has fitted more than a dozen with high-resolution GPS collars and followed them all over suburbia. "A lot of people don't realize how common they are, or that they're even in the forests around their houses, because they keep this low profile."Their comeback, he adds, "shows the resiliency of nature, and the ability of animals to adapt to modern conditions and make the best of it. [Fisher's are] a good conservation story."Of course, porcupines might feel differently.",
"A coyote triggers a camera trap at Babcock Ranch State Preserve in Florida. The U.S. Southeast was the last region of the country that coyotes colonized.ChicagoShe pops up suddenly from behind a green tarp and trots through the construction site, pausing every so often to swivel her large, triangular ears. The beep beep beep of a cement paver and the deafening roar of buzzsaws are just background noise to 1242.A few weeks ago her mate for life, 1244, was shot near this new high school going up outside Chicago. Now Lauren Ross, a field technician with the Max MacGraw Wildlife Foundation, has pinpointed the radio-collared female’s location with a telemetry unit, the constant ping revealing her exact location. Even so, it’s rare to see urban coyotes during the day, as most have learned to be active at night to avoid people. But 1242 has pups to feed. And in the indefatigable coyote spirit—that same quality that has propelled the predator into every corner of the United States—this lanky single mother is making it work without her partner.“We consistently underestimate this animal and its ability to adjust and adapt,” says Stan Gehrt, a wildlife ecologist with Ohio State University and the Max McGraw Wildlife Foundation. Gehrt has studied Chicago’s coyotes since 2000, not long after the animals surfaced in the nation’s third biggest city. “They push the boundaries of what we perceive to be constraints,” Gehrt says.For instance, at the beginning of his research, he thought coyotes would be restricted to parks and green spaces. He was wrong. “Now we have coyotes everywhere—every neighborhood, every suburban city, and downtown. The only place we don’t have them is airports, and that’s because they kill them.”Native to the western two-thirds of the United States, coyotes began dramatically expanding their range in the early 1900s. They’ve increased their habitat across North America by 40 percent since the 1950s—twice the rate of any other North American carnivore—and now live in every U.S. state but Hawaii. The near-extinction of wolves, the crash of the coyote pelt market, and the explosion of food-rich suburbs fueled their rise, as did their innate tenacity forged by a million years of evolution.“They have this amazing balance between being bold enough to hunt, attack, and kill something and being shy or savvy enough to avoid being killed themselves,” Gehrt says. And they’ve achieved this dramatic increase despite being one of the most persecuted animals in the U.S. At least 400,000 coyotes are exterminated each year, with the federal government killing around 80,000. (Read how the most hated animal in America outwitted us all.)From New York City (one daring individual hopped onto a roof in Queens) to the Florida Keys to the Hollywood Hills, no city or climate seems off limits. Coyotes recently migrated as far south as Panama, where they’re now poised to enter South America for the first time.When will they stop? That’s the question that fascinates many urban ecologists. So far coyotes seem to have weathered most traditional population checks, such as disease.“What’s striking is almost all eastern states show exponential growth,” says Roland Kays, a zoologist at the North Carolina Museum of Natural Sciences and North Carolina State University in Raleigh, who studies how coyotes evolved and spread across the continent. “There’s no leveling off in most places.”That’s why Gehrt’s Urban Coyote Research Project in Chicago—and many similar initiatives in New York, Vancouver, Los Angeles, Denver, Washington D.C., San Francisco, and elsewhere—are busy trying to figure out how people can best coexist with a predator that’s here to stay.On a chilly morning at the start of the spring research season, Gehrt and other biologists are searching for coyote pups in Busse Woods, a nature reserve northwest of downtown Chicago. Gehrt captured the city’s first coyote here in 2000. Now there are 1,283 on record.The scientists fan out across the open, sunny forest abloom with spring wildflowers such as jack-in-the-pulpit and red trillium. They poke their heads into moss covered logs—choice coyote denning sites.Lauren Ross, the field technician, shines a light inside a decaying log and shouts, “I think I found them.” A pile of coyote pups is tucked at the far end. Shane McKenzie, a researcher with Max McGraw, fishes out two blinking, squirming pups. Another two are out of reach. “In this situation, you’re not going to give up,” McKenzie says, one arm buried in the log up to his shoulder.Finally the team carefully tears a hole in the log and extracts the two remaining pups. (The parents would soon move their babies to a new den anyway.) Surprisingly calm, the football-size coyotes smell like wet dogs and are covered in thick, dark brown fur except on their fuzzy bellies.Ross weighs, measures, and tags each pup, steering clear of their tiny, razor-sharp claws. “You’re 1252,” she says gently to one. A commotion ensues when technician Yasmine Hentati places the pups back in their den and discovers a fifth pup that, in classic wily coyote fashion, had evaded capture.Busse Woods has been home to two packs of coyotes since biologists began monitoring them in 2000—a north pack and a south pack—and each year there’s been a litter born in each section. But these pups are notable because, for the first time, there’s been a second litter born in the southern part of the park—suggesting another pair of coyotes have moved into the area and apparently took over part of the southern territory.“Life must be good for the coyotes—there are still ways for them to increase even within areas that have been occupied for many years,” Gehrt says.Though much is made of coyotes’ flexibility, they’re rigid in two regards: their monogamy—generally both parents raise a litter of pups together—and in their need for a defined territory. This territorialism, says Gehrt, could be a factor that will limit their spread.Common sense says that when coyotes run out of room, their population should drop. But that’s not what’s happening in Chicago. Instead, the animals are carving out niches in the most impractical and dangerous of places, such as busy downtown streets. If a young coyote simply can’t find a home, its parents will sometimes cede part of their territory, a process called "budding."The territorial instinct is also why killing coyotes with the goal of reducing their numbers—called lethal control—doesn’t usually work. Like the game Whac-a-Mole, killing coyotes only creates a habitat vacuum, giving their competitors a chance to move in. Beyond that, coyote biology is primed for persecution: When the rate of killing goes up, young coyotes mature faster, and females produce larger litters.Disease is another factor that usually limits wildlife populations, Gehrt notes. Canine distemper, for example, often breaks out among wild coyotes. But except for a few cases of mange and getting hit by cars—their primary cause of death—Chicago’s coyotes are oddly healthy, living even longer than rural coyotes. (Learn how coyotes are hacking life in the city.)According to analyses of coyote trapping records in the eastern U.S. by Roland Kays, the North Carolina zoologist, it's possible that coyote populations have reached their limit—called the carrying capacity—in Maine and New Hampshire, the first eastern states they colonized. But it’s still too early to say for sure, Kays cautions.Stewart Breck, a research wildlife biologist with the U.S. Department of Agriculture in Denver, says that the coyote population in that city has remained stable over the past decade, indicating that it has reached carrying capacity.A macaque grips a wall at the Padangtegal Temple in Bali, Indonesia. "There is a strong mystery component to this image, and that is what makes it special," Yadav says.But, he says, “As they continue to expand their distribution on a geographic level [throughout the Americas], what are the limits?”For some animals with specialized diets, food availability can also restrict population growth. But coyotes are omnivores, often eating fruit and vegetables—both of which are in plentiful supply in the suburbs. Yet most urban coyotes still eat a lot of wild prey—particularly rabbits and squirrels—instead of trash or human food.Because many coyotes dwell in areas that blur the line between wild and urban, figuring out how to predict their patterns is complex. Busse Woods, for example, may look natural, but it’s an illusion, Gehrt says. At least 2.5 million people come here every year, and the park is hemmed in by neighborhoods and busy roads.“Even in what you consider the most protected, natural areas, those coyotes are being born and raised around people and dogs.”So far, reported run-ins with people haven't increased, even as Chicago’s coyote population continues to grow—there are now up to 4,000 in Cook County alone. But, Gehrt says, “The question is, year after year, generation after generation, will they continue to have that healthy fear of people?”That question intrigues Megan Draheim, founder of District Coyote in Washington, D.C., one of the last American cities that coyotes colonized, in the early 2000s. Because the predators are relatively new arrivals to the nation’s capital, “I’d like to get out in front of conflict,” says Draheim, a conservation biologist at Virginia Tech. “It’s a nice opportunity to be proactive rather than reactive.”On a summer morning at the Rock Creek Park Golf Course, Draheim and American University biologists Christopher Tudge and Lindsay Powers are out looking for coyote scat, which tells them what the animals are eating and where they’re hunting, as well as offers a peek into their DNA.As in the case of Chicago’s Busse Woods, Rock Creek Park is quasi-natural. A helicopter drones above us, woodpeckers tap, a golf cart buzzes by on its rounds.Draheim bends down to photograph two sets of likely coyote pawprints—one large, one small—on a dirt path that runs along the hilly back nine, a temporarily closed section of the course fringed by forests. Cresting a hill, Tudge turns and whispers, “Walk slowly!”At the base of the hill, completely out in the open, a coyote and pup are standing next to each other, staring at us with apparently mutual surprise. The parent, its back golden in the sun, remains frozen in place, while its pup frolics about. A few seconds later, the adult slips into the forest, bushy tail disappearing last. The pup hangs back a few seconds, seemingly curious, then follows.It’s a thrilling sighting—“The coyote gods smiled down on us,” Draheim says—and it provides valuable insight into where coyotes are using the landscape, one of the project’s research goals. Draheim has created an online citizen science reporting form so people in the D.C. region can record where they see or hear coyotes and foxes. She and Powers are also planning a “howl survey” in which they broadcast a coyote howl, then use acoustic software to identify individual coyotes that howl in response.So far the canids have been sighted mostly in green spaces, and reports of human conflicts are relatively low. But the capital coyotes will inevitably spread into more urban parts of D.C., and Draheim hopes her data can help the city government manage coyotes and prevent conflicts with people.She also plans to share best practices for coexisting with coyotes with schools and local communities. Guidelines include keeping pets inside and on leash and not feeding the carnivores, which can make them more aggressive. Teaching people how to humanely haze coyotes could also keep the animals wary of people.It probably won’t be easy, adds Draheim, who has a coyote tattooed on her left arm. Her research has shown there are usually some “people who believe that cities are human areas and nature belongs out there. Coyotes muddle that perspective of the world.”Like them or not, coyotes are thriving in our human-dominated era—the Anthropocene—when most species aren’t, Kays notes. “It’s a really interesting evolution story that’s happening right under our noses.”This very instant, coyotes are literally pushing their boundaries southward. The animals first made it to Panama in 2013 as deforestation opened up dense habitat. The lawless Darién Gap is their last hurdle to reaching South America. Once there, Kays says, “They’re probably going to take over the continent in non-forested areas,” such as grasslands and agricultural lands in Colombia, Venezuela, and Brazil.Meanwhile, biologists are busy trying to discern whether urban coyotes are bolder than rural coyotes, and if that is reflected in populations across the country. In Denver, for instance, some coyotes are "very visible and brazen," says the USDA’s Breck, while in Chicago they’re more shy, according to Gehrt.To determine if this phenomenon of bold urban coyotes is specific to Colorado or more widespread, Kays, Breck, and USDA’s Julie Young have developed a nationwide “boldness protocol” that at least 20 cities will use to study their coyote populations—including places as diverse as Panama City, Panama; Florida; and Seattle.“[If] we can figure it out, we can reduce people’s problems with these animals and allow them to enjoy the good side of coyotes,” Kays says.As for Gehrt, the project that was meant to last a year is now funded through 2023. There are just too many questions to stop now.“It’s an evolving story,” he says. “We don’t know what the final chapter of the urban coyote story is going to be.”",
"A macaque grips a wall at the Padangtegal Temple in Bali, Indonesia. "There is a strong mystery component to this image, and that is what makes it special," Yadav says.Prasenjeet Yadav had a beast of a project before him: sifting through thousands of photographs of urban wildlife taken around the world.In November 2015, the National Geographic Young Explorer and photographer asked the Your Shot photography community to explore their own cities and send him the most incredible photos of the critters they saw.They had mere weeks and some clear rules, such as no domesticated animals allowed. (Sorry, lolcat fans.)"Looking through more than 15,000 images and compiling a story out of 27 was one of the hardest things that I have ever done," Yadav, who is based in Bangalore, India, says by email.But the project “created something special,” he adds, by reminding us how alive our cities really are.Yadav’s final selection of your urban wildlife photos ranges from deer munching on a suburban buffet in England to a bird’s-eye view of pigeons in Kuwait. The results show that we’re "surrounded by urban wildlife, but unfortunately we tend to ignore the beauty in them," he says."It’s high time that we bring attention to these species."—Writing by Christine Dell'Amore. Photo editing by Jeanne Modderman.",
"The path leads up a hill, across a fast-moving stream, back across the stream, and then past the carcass of a sheep. In my view it's raining, but here in the Southern Uplands of Scotland, I'm told, this counts as only a light drizzle, or smirr. Just beyond the final switchback, there's a waterfall, half shrouded in mist, and an outcropping of jagged rock. The rock has bands that run vertically, like a layer cake that's been tipped on its side. My guide, Jan Zalasiewicz, a British stratigrapher, points to a wide stripe of gray. “Bad things happened in here,” he says.The stripe was laid down some 445 million years ago, as sediments slowly piled up on the bottom of an ancient ocean. In those days life was still confined mostly to the water, and it was undergoing a crisis. Between one edge of the three-foot-thick gray band and the other, some 80 percent of marine species died out, many of them the sorts of creatures, like graptolites, that no longer exist. The extinction event, known as the end-Ordovician, was one of the five biggest of the past half billion years. It coincided with extreme changes in climate, in global sea levels, and in ocean chemistry—all caused, perhaps, by a supercontinent drifting over the South Pole.Stratigraphers like Zalasiewicz are, as a rule, hard to impress. Their job is to piece together Earth's history from clues that can be coaxed out of layers of rock millions of years after the fact. They take the long view—the extremely long view—of events, only the most violent of which are likely to leave behind clear, lasting signals. It's those events that mark the crucial episodes in the planet's 4.5-billion-year story, the turning points that divide it into comprehensible chapters.So it’s disconcerting to learn that many stratigraphers have come to believe that we are such an event—that human beings have so altered the planet in just the past century or two that we've ushered in a new epoch: the Anthropocene. Standing in the smirr, I ask Zalasiewicz what he thinks this epoch will look like to the geologists of the distant future, whoever or whatever they may be. Will the transition be a moderate one, like dozens of others that appear in the record, or will it show up as a sharp band in which very bad things happened—like the mass extinction at the end of the Ordovician?That, Zalasiewicz says, is what we are in the process of determining.The word “Anthropocene” was coined by Dutch chemist Paul Crutzen about a decade ago. One day Crutzen, who shared a Nobel Prize for discovering the effects of ozone-depleting compounds, was sitting at a scientific conference. The conference chairman kept referring to the Holocene, the epoch that began at the end of the last ice age, 11,500 years ago, and that—officially, at least—continues to this day.“‘Let's stop it,’” Crutzen recalls blurting out. “‘We are no longer in the Holocene. We are in the Anthropocene.’ Well, it was quiet in the room for a while.” When the group took a coffee break, the Anthropocene was the main topic of conversation. Someone suggested that Crutzen copyright the word.Way back in the 1870s, an Italian geologist named Antonio Stoppani proposed that people had introduced a new era, which he labeled the anthropozoic. Stoppani's proposal was ignored; other scientists found it unscientific. The Anthropocene, by contrast, struck a chord. Human impacts on the world have become a lot more obvious since Stoppani's day, in part because the size of the population has roughly quadrupled, to nearly seven billion. "The pattern of human population growth in the twentieth century was more bacterial than primate," biologist E. O. Wilson has written. Wilson calculates that human biomass is already a hundred times larger than that of any other large animal species that has ever walked the Earth.In 2002, when Crutzen wrote up the Anthropocene idea in the journal Nature, the concept was immediately picked up by researchers working in a wide range of disciplines. Soon it began to appear regularly in the scientific press. "Global Analysis of River Systems: From Earth System Controls to Anthropocene Syndromes" ran the title of one 2003 paper. "Soils and Sediments in the Anthropocene" was the headline of another, published in 2004.At first most of the scientists using the new geologic term were not geologists. Zalasiewicz, who is one, found the discussions intriguing. "I noticed that Crutzen's term was appearing in the serious literature, without quotation marks and without a sense of irony," he says. In 2007 Zalasiewicz was serving as chairman of the Geological Society of London's Stratigraphy Commission. At a meeting he decided to ask his fellow stratigraphers what they thought of the Anthropocene. Twenty-one of 22 thought the concept had merit.The group agreed to look at it as a formal problem in geology. Would the Anthropocene satisfy the criteria used for naming a new epoch? In geologic parlance, epochs are relatively short time spans, though they can extend for tens of millions of years. (Periods, such as the Ordovician and the Cretaceous, last much longer, and eras, like the Mesozoic, longer still.) The boundaries between epochs are defined by changes preserved in sedimentary rocks—the emergence of one type of commonly fossilized organism, say, or the disappearance of another.The rock record of the present doesn't exist yet, of course. So the question was: When it does, will human impacts show up as "stratigraphically significant"? The answer, Zalasiewicz's group decided, is yes—though not necessarily for the reasons you'd expect.Probably the most obvious way humans are altering the planet is by building cities, which are essentially vast stretches of man-made materials—steel, glass, concrete, and brick. But it turns out most cities are not good candidates for long-term preservation, for the simple reason that they’re built on land, and on land the forces of erosion tend to win out over those of sedimentation. From a geologic perspective, the most plainly visible human effects on the landscape today “may in some ways be the most transient,” Zalasiewicz has observed.Humans have also transformed the world through farming; something like 38 percent of the planet’s ice-free land is now devoted to agri­culture. Here again, some of the effects that seem most significant today will leave behind only subtle traces at best.Fertilizer factories, for example, now fix more nitrogen from the air, converting it to a biologically usable form, than all the plants and microbes on land; the runoff from fertilized fields is triggering life-throttling blooms of algae at river mouths all over the world. But this global perturbation of the nitrogen cycle will be hard to detect, because synthesized nitrogen is just like its natural equivalent. Future geologists are more likely to grasp the scale of 21st-century industrial agriculture from the pollen record—from the monochrome stretches of corn, wheat, and soy pollen that will have replaced the varied record left behind by rain forests or prairies.The leveling of the world’s forests will send at least two coded signals to future stratigraphers, though deciphering the first may be tricky. Massive amounts of soil eroding off denuded land are increasing sedimentation in some parts of the world—but at the same time the dams we’ve built on most of the world’s major rivers are holding back sediment that would otherwise be washed to sea. The second signal of deforestation should come through clearer. Loss of forest habitat is a major cause of extinctions, which are now happening at a rate hundreds or even thousands of times higher than during most of the past half billion years. If current trends continue, the rate may soon be tens of thousands of times higher.Probably the most significant change, from a geologic perspective, is one that’s invisible to us­—the change in the composition of the atmo­sphere. Carbon dioxide emissions are colorless, odorless, and in an immediate sense, harmless. But their warming effects could easily push global temperatures to levels that have not been seen for millions of years. Some plants and animals are already shifting their ranges toward the Poles, and those shifts will leave traces in the fossil record. Some species will not survive the warming at all. Meanwhile rising temperatures could eventually raise sea levels 20 feet or more.Long after our cars, cities, and factories have turned to dust, the consequences of burning billions of tons’ worth of coal and oil are likely to be clearly discernible. As carbon dioxide warms the planet, it also seeps into the oceans and acidifies them. Sometime this century they may become acidified to the point that corals can no longer construct reefs, which would register in the geologic record as a “reef gap.” Reef gaps have marked each of the past five major mass extinctions. The most recent one, which is believed to have been caused by the impact of an asteroid, took place 65 million years ago, at the end of the Cretaceous period; it eliminated not just the dinosaurs, but also the plesiosaurs, pterosaurs, and ammonites. The scale of what’s happening now to the oceans is, by many accounts, unmatched since then. To future geologists, Zalasiewicz says, our impact may look as sudden and profound as that of an asteroid.If we have indeed entered a new epoch, then when exactly did it begin? When did human impacts rise to the level of geologic significance?William Ruddiman, a paleoclimatologist at the University of Virginia, has proposed that the invention of agriculture some 8,000 years ago, and the deforestation that resulted, led to an increase in atmospheric CO₂ just large enough to stave off what otherwise would have been the start of a new ice age; in his view, humans have been the dominant force on the planet practically since the start of the Holocene. Crutzen has suggested that the Anthropocene began in the late 18th century, when, ice cores show, carbon dioxide levels began what has since proved to be an uninterrupted rise. Other scientists put the beginning of the new epoch in the middle of the 20th century, when the rates of both population growth and consumption accelerated rapidly.Zalasiewicz now heads a working group of the International Commission on Stratigraphy (ICS) that is tasked with officially determining whether the Anthropocene deserves to be incorporated into the geologic timescale. A final decision will require votes by both the ICS and its parent organization, the International Union of Geological Sciences. The process is likely to take years. As it drags on, the decision may well become easier. Some scientists argue that we’ve not yet reached the start of the Anthropocene—not because we haven’t had a dramatic impact on the planet, but because the next several decades are likely to prove even more stratigraphically significant than the past few centuries. “Do we decide the Anthropocene’s here, or do we wait 20 years and things will be even worse?” says Mark Williams, a geologist and colleague of Zalasiewicz’s at the University of Leicester in England.Crutzen, who started the debate, thinks its real value won’t lie in revisions to geology textbooks. His purpose is broader: He wants to focus our attention on the consequences of our collective action—and on how we might still avert the worst. “What I hope,” he says, “is that the term ‘Anthropocene’ will be a warning to the world.”",
"Castello Aragonese is a tiny island that rises straight out of the Tyrrhenian Sea like a tower. Seventeen miles west of Naples, it can be reached from the somewhat larger island of Ischia via a long, narrow stone bridge. The tourists who visit Castello Aragonese come to see what life was like in the past. They climb—or better yet, take the elevator—up to a massive castle, which houses a display of medieval torture instruments. The scientists who visit the island, by contrast, come to see what life will be like in the future.Owing to a quirk of geology, the sea around Castello Aragonese provides a window onto the oceans of 2050 and beyond. Bubbles of CO2 rise from volcanic vents on the seafloor and dissolve to form carbonic acid. Carbonic acid is relatively weak; people drink it all the time in carbonated beverages. But if enough of it forms, it makes seawater corrosive. "When you get to the extremely high CO2, almost nothing can tolerate that," Jason Hall-Spencer, a marine biologist from Britain's University of Plymouth, explains. Castello Aragonese offers a natural analogue for an unnatural process: The acidification that has taken place off its shore is occurring more gradually across the world's oceans, as they absorb more and more of the carbon dioxide that's coming from tailpipes and smokestacks.Hall-Spencer has been studying the sea around the island for the past eight years, carefully measuring the properties of the water and tracking the fish and corals and mollusks that live and, in some cases, dissolve there. On a chilly winter's day I went swimming with him and with Maria Cristina Buia, a scientist at Italy's Anton Dohrn Zoological Station, to see the effects of acidification up close. We anchored our boat about 50 yards from the southern shore of Castello Aragonese. Even before we got into the water, some impacts were evident. Clumps of barnacles formed a whitish band at the base of the island's wave-battered cliffs. "Barnacles are really tough," Hall-Spencer observed. In the areas where the water was most acidified, though, they were missing.We all dived in. Buia was carrying a knife. She pried some unlucky limpets from a rock. Searching for food, they had wandered into water that was too caustic for them. Their shells were so thin they were almost transparent. Bubbles of carbon dioxide streamed up from the seafloor like beads of quicksilver. We swam on. Beds of sea grass waved beneath us. The grass was a vivid green; the tiny organisms that usually coat the blades, dulling their color, were all missing. Sea urchins, commonplace away from the vents, were also absent; they can't tolerate even moderately acidified water. Swarms of nearly transparent jellyfish floated by. "Watch out," Hall-Spencer warned. "They sting."Jellyfish, sea grass, and algae—not much else lives near the densest concentration of vents at Castello Aragonese. Even a few hundred yards away, many native species can't survive. The water there is about as acidified as the oceans as a whole are forecast to be by 2100. "Normally in a polluted harbor you've got just a few species that are weedlike and able to cope with widely fluctuating conditions," Hall-Spencer said once we were back on the boat. "Well, it's like that when you ramp up CO2."Since the start of the industrial revolution, enough fossil fuels—coal, oil, and natural gas—have been burned and enough forests cut down to emit more than 500 billion tons of CO2. As is well known, the atmosphere has a higher concentration of CO2today than at any point in the past 800,000 years and probably a lot longer.What is less well known is how carbon emissions are changing the oceans too. The air and the water constantly exchange gases, so a portion of anything emitted into the atmosphere eventually ends up in the sea. Winds quickly mix it into the top few hundred feet, and over centuries currents spread it through the ocean depths. In the 1990s an international team of scientists undertook a massive research project that involved collecting and analyzing more than 77,000 seawater samples from different depths and locations around the world. The work took 15 years. It showed that the oceans have absorbed 30 percent of the CO2 released by humans over the past two centuries. They continue to absorb roughly a million tons every hour.For life on land this process is a boon; every ton of CO2 the oceans remove from the atmosphere is a ton that's not contributing to global warming. But for life in the sea the picture looks different. The head of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, Jane Lubchenco, a marine ecologist, has called ocean acidification global warming's "equally evil twin."The pH scale, which measures acidity in terms of the concentration of hydrogen ions, runs from zero to 14. At the low end of the scale are strong acids, such as hydrochloric acid, that release hydrogen readily (more readily than carbonic acid does). At the high end are strong bases such as lye. Pure, distilled water has a pH of 7, which is neutral. Seawater should be slightly basic, with a pH around 8.2 near the sea surface. So far CO2 emissions have reduced the pH there by about 0.1. Like the Richter scale, the pH scale is logarithmic, so even small numerical changes represent large effects. A pH drop of 0.1 means the water has become 30 percent more acidic. If present trends continue, surface pH will drop to around 7.8 by 2100. At that point the water will be 150 percent more acidic than it was in 1800.The acidification that has occurred so far is probably irreversible. Although in theory it's possible to add chemicals to the sea to counter the effects of the extra CO2, as a practical matter, the volumes involved would be staggering; it would take at least two tons of lime, for example, to offset a single ton of carbon dioxide, and the world now emits more than 30 billion tons of CO2 each year. Meanwhile, natural processes that could counter acidification—such as the weathering of rocks on land—operate far too slowly to make a difference on a human time-scale. Even if CO2 emissions were somehow to cease today, it would take tens of thousands of years for ocean chemistry to return to its pre-industrial condition.Acidification has myriad effects. By favoring some marine microbes over others, it is likely to alter the availability of key nutrients like iron and nitrogen. For similar reasons it may let more sunlight penetrate the sea surface. By changing the basic chemistry of seawater, acidification is also expected to reduce the water's ability to absorb and muffle low-frequency sound by up to 40 percent, making some parts of the ocean noisier. Finally, acidification interferes with reproduction in some species and with the ability of others—the so-called calcifiers—to form shells and stony skeletons of calcium carbonate. These last effects are the best documented ones, but whether they will prove the most significant in the long run is unclear.In 2008 a group of more than 150 leading researchers issued a declaration stating that they were "deeply concerned by recent, rapid changes in ocean chemistry," which could within decades "severely affect marine organisms, food webs, biodiversity, and fisheries." Warm-water coral reefs are the prime worry. But because carbon dioxide dissolves more readily in cold water, the impact may actually show up first closer to the Poles. Scientists have already documented significant effects on pteropods—tiny swimming snails that are an important food for fish, whales, and birds in both the Arctic and the Antarctic. Experiments show that pteropod shells grow more slowly in acidified seawater.Will organisms be able to adapt to the new ocean chemistry? The evidence from Castello Aragonese is not encouraging. The volcanic vents have been pouring CO2 into the water for at least a thousand years, Hall-Spencer told me when I visited. But the area where the pH is 7.8—the level that may be reached oceanwide by the end of the century—is missing nearly a third of the species that live nearby, outside the vent system. Those species have had "generations on generations to adapt to these conditions," Hall-Spencer said, "yet they're not there."Because it's so important, we humans put a lot of energy into making sure that the pH of our blood is constant," he went on. "But some of these lower organisms, they don't have the physiology to do that. They've just got to tolerate what's happening outside. And so they get pushed beyond their limits."Fifty miles off the coast of Australia and half a world away from Castello Aragonese lies the equally tiny One Tree Island. One Tree, which actually has several hundred trees, is shaped like a boomerang, with two arms that stretch out into the Coral Sea. In the crook of the boomerang there's a small research station run by the University of Sydney. As it happened, just as I arrived one spectacular summer afternoon, an enormous loggerhead turtle heaved herself up onto the beach in front of the lab buildings. The island's entire human population—11 people, not including me—gathered around to watch.One Tree Island is part of the Great Barrier Reef, the world's largest reef complex, which stretches for more than 1,400 miles. The entire island is composed of bits of coral rubble, ranging from marble to basketball size, that began piling up after a peculiarly violent storm about 4,000 years ago. Even today, the island has nothing that could really be called dirt. The trees seem to rise up directly out of the rubble like flagpoles.When scientists first started visiting the island in the 1960s, they posed questions like, How do reefs grow? Nowadays the questions are more urgent. "Something like 25 percent of all species in the oceans spend at least part of their life in coral reef systems," Ken Caldeira, an expert on ocean acidification at the Carnegie Institution, said one evening before heading out to collect water samples on the reef. "Corals build the architecture of the ecosystem, and it's pretty clear if they go, the whole ecosystem goes."Coral reefs are already threatened by a wide array of forces. Rising water temperatures are producing more frequent "bleaching" events, when corals turn a stark white and often die. Overfishing removes grazers that keep reefs from being overgrown with algae. Agricultural runoff fertilizes algae, further upsetting reef ecology. In the Caribbean some formerly abundant coral species have been devastated by an infection that leaves behind a white band of dead tissue. Probably owing to all these factors, coral cover in the Caribbean declined by around 80 percent between 1977 and 2001.Ocean acidification adds yet another threat, one that may be less immediate but ultimately more devastating to hard, reef-building corals. It undermines their basic, ancient structure—the stony skeleton that's secreted by millions upon millions of coral polyps over thousands of years.Coral polyps are tiny animals that form a thin layer of living tissue on the surface of a reef. They're shaped a bit like flowers, with six or more tentacles that capture food and feed it to a central mouth. (Many corals actually get most of their food from algae that live and photosynthesize inside them; when corals bleach, it's because stress has prompted the polyps to expel those dark symbionts.) Each polyp surrounds itself with a protective, cup-shaped exoskeleton of calcium carbonate that contributes to the collective skeleton of the whole colony.To make calcium carbonate, corals need two ingredients: calcium ions and carbonate ions. Acids react with carbonate ions, in effect tying them up. So as atmospheric CO2 levels rise, carbonate ions become scarcer in the water, and corals have to expend more energy to collect them. Under lab conditions coral skeleton growth has been shown to decline pretty much linearly as the carbonate concentration drops off.Slow growth may not matter much in the lab. Out in the ocean, though, reefs are constantly being picked at by other organisms, both large and small. (When I went snorkeling off One Tree Island, I could hear parrotfish chomping away at the reef.) "A reef is like a city," said Ove Hoegh-Guldberg, who used to direct the One Tree Island Research Station and now heads the Global Change Institute at Australia's University of Queensland. "You've got construction firms and you've got demolition firms. By restricting the building materials that go to the construction firms, you tip the balance toward destruction, which is going on all the time, even on a healthy reef. In the end you wind up with a city that destroys itself."By comparing measurements made in the 1970s with those taken more recently, Caldeira's team found that at one location on the northern tip of the reef, calcification had declined by 40 percent. (The team was at One Tree to repeat this study at the southern tip of the reef.) A different team using a different method has found that the growth of Porites corals, which form massive, boulderlike clumps, declined 14 percent on the Great Barrier Reef between 1990 and 2005.Ocean acidification seems to affect corals' ability to produce new colonies as well. Corals can, in effect, clone themselves, and an entire colony is likely to be made up of genetically identical polyps. But once a year, in summer, many species of coral also engage in "mass spawning," a kind of synchronized group sex. Each polyp produces a beadlike pink sac that contains both eggs and sperm. On the night of the spawning all the polyps release their sacs into the water. So many sacs are bobbing around that the waves seem to be covered in a veil of mauve.Selina Ward, a researcher at the University of Queensland, has been studying coral reproduction on Heron Island, about ten miles west of One Tree, for the past 16 years. I met up with her just a few hours before the annual spawning event. She was keeping tabs on a dozen tanks of gravid corals, like an obstetrician making the rounds of a maternity ward. As soon as the corals released their pink sacs, she was planning to scoop them up and subject them to different levels of acidification. Her results so far suggest that lower pH leads to declines in fertilization, in larval development, and also in settlement—the stage at which the coral larvae drop out of the water column, attach themselves to something solid, and start producing new colonies. "And if any of those steps doesn't work, you're not going to get replacement corals coming into your system," Ward said.The reefs that corals maintain are crucial to an incredible diversity of organisms. Somewhere between one and nine million marine species live on or around coral reefs. These include not just the fancifully colored fish and enormous turtles that people visit reefs to see, but also sea squirts and shrimps, anemones and clams, sea cucumbers and worms—the list goes on and on. The nooks and crevices on a reef provide homes for many species, which in turn provide resources for many others.Once a reef can no longer grow fast enough to keep up with erosion, this community will crumble. "Coral reefs will lose their ecological functionality," Jack Silverman, a member of Caldeira's team at One Tree, told me. "They won't be able to maintain their framework. And if you don't have a building, where are the tenants going to live?" That moment could come by 2050. Under the business-as-usual emissions scenario, CO2 concentrations in the atmosphere will be roughly double what they were in preindustrial times. Many experiments suggest that coral reefs will then start to disintegrate."Under business as usual, by mid-century things are looking rather grim," Caldeira said. He paused for a moment. "I mean, they're looking grim already."Corals, of course, are just one kind of calcifier. There are thousands of others. Crustaceans like barnacles are calcifiers, and so are echinoderms like sea stars and sea urchins and mollusks like clams and oysters. Coralline algae—minute organisms that produce what looks like a coating of pink or lilac paint—are also calcifiers. Their calcium carbonate secretions help cement coral reefs together, but they're also found elsewhere—on sea grass at Castello Aragonese, for instance. It was their absence from the grass near the volcanic vents that made it look so green.The seas are filled with one-celled calcifying plants called coccolithophores, whose seasonal blooms turn thousands of square miles of ocean a milky hue. Many species of planktonic forami­nifera—also one-celled—are calcifiers; their dead shells drift down to the ocean floor in what's been described as a never ending rain. Calcifiers are so plentiful they've changed the Earth's geology. England's White Cliffs of Dover, for example, are the remains of countless ancient calcifiers that piled up during the Cretaceous period.Acidification makes all calcifiers work harder, though some seem better able to cope. In experiments on 18 species belonging to different taxonomic groups, researchers at the Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution found that while a majority calcified less when CO2was high, some calcified more. One species—blue mussels—showed no change, no matter how acidified the water."Organisms make choices," explained Ulf Riebesell, a biological oceanographer at the Leibniz Institute of Marine Sciences in Kiel, Germany. "They sense the change in their environment, and some of them have the ability to compensate. They just have to invest more energy into calcification. They choose, 'OK, I'll invest less in reproduction' or 'I'll invest less in growth.'" What drives such choices, and whether they're viable over the long term, is not known; most studies so far have been performed on creatures living for a brief time in tanks, without other species that might compete with them. "If I invest less in growth or in reproduction," Riebesell went on, "does it mean that somebody else who does not have to make this choice, because they are not calcifying, will win out and take my spot?"Meanwhile, scientists are just beginning to explore the way that ocean acidification will affect more-complex organisms such as fish and marine mammals. Changes at the bottom of the marine food web—to shell-forming pteropods, say, or coccolithophores—will inevitably affect the animals higher up. But altering oceanic pH is also likely to have a direct impact on their physiology. Researchers in Australia have found, for example, that young clownfish—the real-life versions of Nemo—can't find their way to suitable habitat when CO2 is elevated. Apparently the acidified water impairs their sense of smell.During the long history of life on Earth, atmospheric carbon dioxide levels have often been higher than they are today. But only very rarely—if ever—have they risen as quickly as right now. For life in the oceans, it's probably the rate of change that matters.To find a period analogous to the present, you have to go back at least 55 million years, to what's known as the Paleocene-Eocene Thermal Maximum or PETM. During the PETM huge quantities of carbon were released into the atmosphere, from where, no one is quite sure. Temperatures around the world soared by around ten degrees Fahrenheit, and marine chemistry changed dramatically. The ocean depths became so corrosive that in many places shells stopped piling up on the seafloor and simply dissolved. In sediment cores the period shows up as a layer of red clay sandwiched between two white layers of calcium carbonate. Many deepwater species of forami­nifera went extinct.Surprisingly, though, most organisms that live near the sea surface seem to have come through the PETM just fine. Perhaps marine life is more resilient than the results from places like Castello Aragonese and One Tree Island seem to indicate. Or perhaps the PETM, while extreme, was not as extreme as what's happening today.The sediment record doesn't reveal how fast the PETM carbon release occurred. But modeling studies suggest it took place over thousands of years—slow enough for the chemical effects to spread through the entire ocean to its depths. Today's rate of emissions seems to be roughly ten times as fast, and there's not enough time for the water layers to mix. In the coming century acidification will be concentrated near the surface, where most marine calcifiers and all tropical corals reside. "What we're doing now is quite geologically special," says climate scientist Andy Ridgwell of the University of Bristol, who has modeled the PETM ocean.Just how special is up to us. It's still possible to avert the most extreme acidification scenarios. But the only way to do this, or at least the only way anyone has come up with so far, is to dramatically reduce CO2 emissions. At the moment, corals and pteropods are lined up against a global economy built on cheap fossil fuels. It's not a fair fight.",
"When the photographer realized the manta, photographed near Lady Elliot Island, was actually pink, "my jaw dropped," he says.Photographer Kristian Laine was freediving recently off the southernmost island of Australia’s Great Barrier Reef when a bright pink manta ray glided by. He thought for sure that his camera was malfunctioning.“I had no idea there were pink mantas in the world, so I was confused and thought my strobes were broken or doing something weird,” says Laine, whose photographs posted on Instagram this week have gone viral. Laine later realized he’d spotted an 11-foot male reef manta ray named after Inspector Clouseau, the bumbling detective of the Pink Panther movies. The fish, who cruises the waters around Lady Elliot Island, is the only known pink manta ray in the world.First spotted in 2015, Inspector Clouseau has been seen fewer than 10 times since. “I feel humbled and extremely lucky,” says Laine, who photographed him amid a group of seven other males, all of them vying for a female. (Read how manta rays form close friendships, shattering misconceptions.)Scientists with the Australian research group Project Manta, who study the rosy ray, have confirmed its color to be real. At first, they theorized Inspector Clouseau’s color was the result of a skin infection or diet, similar to how pink flamingos get their color from eating tiny crustaceans. But in 2016, Project Manta researcher Amelia Armstrong took a small skin biopsy from the famous animal, and their resulting analyses ruled out diet and infection as the cause.Now, Project Manta’s leading theory is that the manta has a genetic mutation in its expression of melanin, or pigment, says Asia Armstrong, a research assistant for the group.And the ray is not just a cool-looking animal—it could contribute to science, she adds by email. “Understanding the origin of this genetic mutation may help inform us” about how color evolved in mantas, she says.The unusually colored fish likely suffers no ill effects from its hue—it's been photographed occasionally since 2015.Solomon David, an aquatic ecologist at Louisiana’s Nicholls State University, suspects the mutation is a condition called erythrism, which causes an animal’s skin pigmentation to be reddish, or in some cases, pink. Other more well-known genetic mutations to an animal’s pigment can make them melanistic (black) or albino (white).“Having seen other pigmentation-related mutations in fishes, it’s not completely unexpected that this exists, but it’s really cool to see regardless,” Solomon says by email. (Go inside the underwater world of manta rays with a National Geographic photographer.)Guy Stevens, CEO and co-founder of the U.K.-based Manta Trust, agrees that erythrism is the most plausible explanation.Reef mantas typically come in three color patterns: All-black, all-white, or black-and-white. The latter, which is most common, features a pattern called countershading, in which the fish has a black back and a white belly. When viewed from above, their dark backs blend in with the darker water below, and when viewed from below, their light bellies blend into the sunlit surface—a configuration generally thought to offer protection from predators, such as sharks.Even so, Stevens thinks the manta’s atypical color shouldn’t impact its survival or vulnerability to predation. That’s mostly because of the reef manta's massive size; an adult can easily weigh more than a ton. (Learn why manta rays swim in mesmerizing circles.)“They are big when they are born, and they grow quite quickly in their first few years to make them large enough that only the biggest of marine predators prey on them.”“It just goes to show—nature will always surprise you,” he adds. “Now the search is on for a blue manta.”",
"Sharks and rays are often perceived as cold fish, but at least one species of manta ray has a surprisingly complex social life, a new study says.A majestic species that can reach widths of 18 feet, reef manta rays (Mobula alfredi) are often seen gliding over tropical reefs in large numbers, notes study leader Rob Perryman, a researcher for the Marine Megafauna Foundation.Their feeding and courtship activities also occur in groups, which gave Perryman reason to suspect these animals are actually social butterflies. (Go inside the underwater world of manta rays with a National Geographic photographer.)What’s more, their big brains—the related giant manta ray has the largest brain of all fish—hinted that reef mantas are “reasonably intelligent animals,” he says.Five years of observation and study later, the study reveals that reef mantas actively choose “to socialize with other individuals that they know, and they remember their social contact with those individuals,” says Perryman, whose study was published recently in the journal Behavioral Ecology and Sociobiology.“They have friends, to put it in quite an anthropomorphic way.”The study, one of the first to illuminate the animal’s social life in depth, also “adds to the growing evidence in recent years that sharks and rays are not the solitary, mindless, socially bereft animals that we perhaps thought them to be in the past,” he adds.Perryman and colleagues work in Indonesia’s hyper-diverse Raja Ampat Marine Park, a mostly undisturbed habitat where reef mantas behave naturally.During the research, the team regularly snorkelled or scuba dived to photograph and identify individual manta rays at their congregation sites. Reef mantas have patterns of unique belly spots that stay the same throughout their lives.The researchers recorded 3,400 encounters with nearly 600 different mantas, plugging them into a database that logged where and which mantas were seen, and with whom. Further analyzing this data, the researchers eliminated non-social reasons some mantas might congregate in specific places, such as habitat preferences. (Read about the discovery of a rare manta ray nursery.)The results revealed mantas formed two types of social circles, with mature females grouping together, and another clique consisting of males, females, and juveniles. Perryman thinks that the aggregations of females might be a defense against unwanted mating attempts from males.Whether closely related rays spend more time together is one of Perryman’s future research questions.Csilla Ari, a behavioral neuroscientist at the University of South Florida, says the findings mesh well with her own research, which has suggested the fish are clever, interacting with their reflections in mirrors. Mantas can also quickly brighten the white markings on their back during intense social interactions, according to Ari, who is not involved with the study.This signal may reinforce social hierarchies between mantas, or simply convey excitement, Ari says by email, noting the new study “adds a new level of understanding about the social behavior of manta rays.”Joshua Stewart, a conservation ecologist with the U.K.-based nonprofit Manta Trust, praised the study’s findings, but cautioned against placing our own, mammalian expectations of social behavior on the mantas. (Learn why manta rays swim in mesmerizing circles.)Both Stewart and the study authors acknowledge that the mantas’ bonding is not the tight-knit, lifelong phenomenon that many whales experience, for example. Manta alliances last weeks to months, not decades.Understanding this newly identified social world could help scientists better conserve the species, which is listed as vulnerable to extinction by the International Union for Conservation of Nature. Reef mantas face many threats, from plastic pollution to overfishing.For instance, the mantas’ social networks may be crucial for their reproduction or ability to find food, says Perryman.Because it’s very popular for people to see or swim alongside manta rays, such research could inform tourism operations about more responsible practices.For example, the data could help governments develop guidelines on the number of boats and tourists allowed in the water with mantas. (See the best places to spot mantas in the wild.)Overall, he hopes his research on manta “friendships” can easier connect the public to these regal creatures, and drive enthusiasm for their protection.",
"Manta rays are relatively new to the conservation scene. They are not as edgy as their distant cousins the shark, and perhaps not as easy for humans to identify with as whales and dolphins. But they are starting to get their due.Graceful ocean giants with wing spans reaching 12 to 23 feet, mantas have the appearance of birds soaring through the sea. They feed on plankton which they filter through rows of small plates in their mouths. They have the largest brain to body ratio of all fish and have been known to sometimes allow scuba divers to ride on their backs.“Manta rays are super intelligent and super aware of you. When they look at you, you can tell the lights are on in there,” says photographer Thomas P. Peschak, who has been photographing mantas for the past decade.During the southwest monsoon season both mantas and enormous schools of baitfish feed on the microscopic riches upwelled by the trade winds that blow across the Indian Ocean every year.Peschak’s introduction to manta rays began in 2008 when he accompanied scientist Guy Stevens on a trip to the Maldives, where Stevens was researching reef mantas. The abundance of mantas made this a perfect place to witness their behaviors but also see the potential threats of tourism and overfishing. The fruits of this collaboration were published in the pages of National Geographic magazine, but the story didn’t end there.Paschak and Stevens next traveled to Sri Lanka, where manta rays are fished for their meat but more importantly, for their gill rakers which are used in traditional Chinese medicine. The combined experience of diving with hundreds of manta rays in the Maldives and then seeing the potentially devastating impacts of overfishing cemented the idea of forming an organization dedicated to studying and protecting mantas on a global scale, Peschak says. A need made more pressing by the fact that, at the time, no such organization existed. The pair mapped out the groundwork on the back of a napkin over beers a few years later and the Manta Trust was officially formed in 2011.Fishermen and market traders weave their way through piles of mobula rays to be sold to the highest bidder. Most of the value lies in the gill rakers/plates, while the meat is one of the lowest valued commodities in this Sri Lankan fish market.Magnified manta and mobula gill plates/rakers resemble a feather like mesh, perfectly adapted to filter tiny planktonic food from the water.Bringing the story full circle, Peschak and Stevens have recently published a book, Manta: Secret Life of Devil Rays, which along with the Manta Trust works to raise awareness of what we have to gain by getting to know these extraordinary creatures.",
"A giant manta ray swims at Kingman Reef, in the Pacific Remote Islands Marine National Sanctuary.Marine biologist Josh Stewart was floating underwater, looking up at the manta ray that materialized out of the blue above him, when he did a double take: The animal was a juvenile, only a few feet across—nowhere near as big as a mature giant manta ray, which can be as wide across as a giraffe is tall.  Stewart, a graduate student at the Scripps Institution of Oceanography, had studied mantas for years, diving with them all over the world, but in all his time in the oceans he had only seen one or two other young mantas.When he got back to the surface, he shared his excitement with the researchers who regularly dove and surveyed marine life at this reef in the Flower Garden Banks National Marine Sanctuary, off Texas and Louisiana.But they were unfazed—they saw juveniles all the time. Even so, Stewart knew it wasn't normal to see so many baby rays. When he dug through 25 years of carefully collected dive data from the site, his hunch was confirmed: This was a nursery ground for giant manta rays. (Read why manta rays prefer “staycations.”)  In a study published today in Marine Biology, Stewart and his colleagues describe a nursery brimming with young mantas, from newborns through adolescents—a safe space for the young rays to grow and develop.  “It's really important for us to know where these nursery sites are,” says Andrea Marshall, a ray expert at the Mozambique-based Marine Megafauana Foundation and a National Geographic Explorer. “Anywhere that has tiny mantas is really important for us to learn about, so we can target our protection strategies.”Giant oceanic mantas take their time to grow up. Females, which can live to 40 years old, don't generally have their first babies until they're eight to 10 years old.So every teenage ray loitering around the Flower Garden Banks nursery zone is valuable—a product of time, effort, and energy from its mother.They’re also valuable for the continuation of their species, which is listed as threatened under the U.S. Endangered Species Act. (Learn how to put a camera on a manta ray.)Total population estimates are few and far between—especially for the mysterious giant manta ray. But sightings of closely related reef mantas have dropped by 90 percent over the past decade in many parts of the world.Fishing is the primary threat to mantas, which are sought after for their gill plates, the soft, fine sieves through which they filter their food from seawater.Gill plates are sold for medicinal purposes in China, where they drive a roughly $11 million annual market, even though they have no historical application in traditional Chinese medicine.Mantas are also “incredibly talented at getting caught in fishing gear,” explains Stewart, so the graceful creatures often end up as bycatch, their wide wings tangled in purse seines or trawl nets.Researchers don’t yet know why, exactly, the Flower Garden Banks nursery are so attractive to young mantas, but they want to understand what makes the vibrant, shallow offshore reef habitat such a good place to grow up.“These are the areas that hold the animals in their most delicate life phase,” says Giuseppe Nortarbartolo di Scioria, a marine conservation ecologist at the Tethys Institute, based in Italy. He hopes that, by understanding this nursery site, researchers can figure out how to find and protect other important nurseries around the world.Stweart agrees. “The more we understand why these areas are important,” he says, “the better we can tailor [conservation strategies] to them—” and help ensure the young rays living in these nurseries survive long enough to have their own pups.",
"Even though these huge fish are 12 feet across, the social behavior of the reef manta ray has generally remained secretive—until now.In rare drone footage captured off the coast of Oahu in Hawaii by Mark Merkley, the unique and graceful feeding behavior of the reef manta ray is captured in great detail.“When drone technology came out we noticed that mantas were behaving a lot more naturally without boats around,” says Andrea Marshall, the Director of the Marine Megafauna Foundation and a National Geographic explorer. She was not involved with capturing this video but has been researching the behavior of mantas for over 15 years. (Read about how to stick a camera on a manta ray.)Marshall explains that this circling behavior is a social way of eating. Manta ray individuals “stack” behind one another while feeding. The one in front gets the most plankton via filter feeding with its giant gaping mouth, but they switch places as they swim so each gets a turn in the leader position.“They seem to associate closely with one another. When they spend time together, they are incredibly social,” says Marshall, who adds that these animals don’t just feed together, but they also play together. (How to Give a Manta Ray a Makeover.)The social groupings of manta rays are intriguing in part because they aren’t necessarily family groups. In her own research, Marshall is analyzing their DNA to see if they are related in an attempt to understand why these animals spend so much time together—but they might just be friends that grew up together.Follow Shaena Montanari on Twitter.",
"A black jaguar (Panthera onca) crouches in a pool of water in Brazil. Black jaguars are also called black panthers, which is an umbrella term for any big cat with a black coat.As theatergoers around the world marvel at the new superhero movie Black Panther, we here at National Geographic wanted to share some facts about these real-life fascinating felines.First things first: A "black panther" is not its own species—it's an umbrella term that refers to any big cat with a black coat. (Learn more about National Geographic's Big Cats Initiative.)The condition is caused by the agouti gene, which regulates the distribution of black pigment within the hair shaft, according to the University of California, Davis. It's most well known in leopards, which live in Asia and Africa, and jaguars, inhabitants of South America. (Domestic cat lovers might be interested to know the agouti gene doesn't cause black fur in house cats.)According to Big Cat Rescue, the coloring comes from a surplus of melanin, the same pigment responsible for suntans, and an animal with the condition is known as "melanistic."Also, just because black panthers are dark in color doesn't mean they don't have spots—they're just harder to see. (Also see "'Strawberry' Leopard Discovered—A First.")"When their coat catches the sunlight in a certain way, you can see their spots very distinctly; at a bit of a distance, or if there is not direct sunlight on them, they look just like a solid black animal," said Patrick Thomas, general curator of the Wildlife Conservation Society's Bronx Zoo, which is home to two black leopards."Black leopards are more common in Asia than in Africa," Thomas said, "but I wouldn't say they were common anywhere."Wouldn't a black coat be an advantage for nighttime hunters, and therefore more common? Actually, no, Thomas said."It's actually easier for other species to spot a solidly patterned animal versus one whose markings are broken up," he said."So a tiger with its stripes or a leopard, jaguar, or cheetah with its spots are more difficult to see in dappled vegetation than a purely solidly colored animal would be." (See big cat pictures.)Plus, Thomas says it's a misconception that big cats are strictly night owls."They're very opportunistic," he said. "If there's an opportunity to hunt during the day and they're hungry, they will."Also, if "you're hunting when it's bright, there's an advantage to having your body broken up by a patterned coat rather than a solid coat."Other wild cat species can have melanism—a 2012 study in PLOS ONE notes that it's been documented in 13 so far—but Thomas added he knows of no cases of lions or tigers with the condition.Too bad ... if only because we're missing out on calling them blions and bligers. Oh my.Got a question about the weird and wild animal world? Tweet me or leave me a note or photo in the comments below. You can also follow me on Facebook.",
"Almost as soon as the honeybee colony was installed, it came under attack.Not from varroa mites, pesticides, colony collapse disorder, or any of the many other perils now facing honeybee populations across the world, but from hornets—each one a red-eyed giant next to the hairy little bees. Each strike took just an instant, the predators snatching bees out of the air and then flying away with their victims, which would be carved up later and fed to the hornets’ own ravenous larvae.One-on-one, a western honeybee is no match for a European hornet. Up to an inch and a half long, the hornet is equipped with powerful mandibles capable of shearing smaller insects to pieces.For those first few days of the siege, the honeybees appeared helpless in the face of the hornet onslaught.“I thought, Oh God, if this keeps happening, they will kill my whole colony,” says photographer Ingo Arndt, whose yard in Langen, Germany, hosts the honeybees.But as the week wore on, the bees began gaining ground. They started to swarm near the entrance of the nest, creating a living carpet of guards. Each time a hornet flew too close, some of the defenders would leap onto the invader and tackle it. In an instant, more honeybees would pile on and pin the hornet down.Inside this bee ball, something even more bizarre was taking place. Western honeybees have a trick in which they can activate their flight muscles so rapidly that their thoraxes, or midsections, radiate small amounts of heat. When a dozen or more bees rev their engines at the same time, the cluster can significantly raise the ambient temperature.The bees were cooking the hornets alive.“I find this ingenious,” says Jürgen Tautz, a recently retired biologist who specialized in honeybees for about 25 years at the Julius Maximilian University of Würzburg, in Germany.The heat trap is a powerful weapon, but it can also lead to friendly fire. Sometimes the innermost bees in the ball die alongside the hornet, sacrificing themselves for the colony’s defense.This is just one facet of western honeybee behavior that Arndt has captured in new detail over the past two years. He has been photographing wildlife for 30 years, but he’s no insect expert, so he partnered with Tautz.To guard their nest from predatory hornets, the bees go into a defensive stance at the entrance to the cavity. They raise their front legs and open their mandibles.Then the bees rapidly work their flight muscles to generate heat. The hornet’s body temperature rises until it succumbs to the heat.The bee-versus-hornet behavior has been documented in related species in Asia and has been seen by western honeybee keepers in Israel and Egypt, but no one had ever captured the insect duel quite as Arndt had. “It’s the best photo of it I’ve ever seen,” says Thomas D. Seeley, a Cornell University professor who has been studying honeybee behavior and social interactions for half a century.After the first few battles, Arndt says, he saw hornets and honeybees locked in combat as many as 10 times a day. If a honeybee colony is weak, hornets can annihilate it, but for now, the fight in Arndt’s yard continues as a war of insect attrition.There are other factions in this saga as well. Arndt says honeybees from nearby colonies often raid the nest in his backyard in an attempt to steal its honey, especially toward the end of summer when flowers become less available.After accompanying scientists through the forests of Germany’s Hainich National Park as they studied bees in the wild, Arndt got hooked. But he realized that he’d never truly unlock the insects’ secrets while watching them in an artificial box engineered by humans for the purpose of extracting honey. What he really wanted was to photograph a natural nest.This is no small feat. Even if you put on a beekeeping suit and climb 60 feet up into the forest canopy where bees like to nest, as Arndt did in 2018, “the most exciting stuff is happening inside the tree,” he says.So in February 2019, Arndt received permission from the German forest authorities to go into a local forest and remove a fallen beech tree with an abandoned black woodpecker cavity in its trunk—a treasured home for western honeybees. He cut out a piece of the log and arranged for it to be sent to his garden.Newly formed bees chew their way out of wax-covered cells in a manmade hive. Like butterflies, bees go through several life stages. From eggs, they hatch into squiggling, voracious larvae, which must be fed constantly by attentive worker bees. After several days, the workers cap the cells with wax, signaling the larvae to spin a cocoon to pupate, or finish metamorphosis. A week or two later, the fully formed bees emerge.Arndt set to work building a four-walled, plywood photographer’s blind up against the 200-pound hunk of wood, complete with lighting and a tiny window, which allowed him to sneak his macro lens through the back of the cavity. He then extracted the queen from a nearby colony of western honeybees and placed her inside the woodpecker burrow. All he had to do was wait in the blind with his finger on the shutter button.Within moments, scout bees from the queen’s original colony lit on the rim of the woodpecker burrow. More bees landed and then more, until the log hummed with tens of thousands of the wild, social insects. The entire colony soon moved itself into the woodpecker cavity.Over six months, Arndt shot more than 60,000 pictures, creating a portrait of wild honeybees unlike anything seen before.“That is what makes this very special,” Seeley says. Ornithologists have used similar techniques to study birds, but no one studying bees in the wild had done this.Hundreds of hours in the blind paid off. When it was warm out, Arndt watched as bees made repeated trips to a nearby water source that he provided, where they would suck up the liquid with strawlike tongues and then fly back to the nest. Inside, they passed the water to another group of bees, known as water spreaders, whose job is to regurgitate the liquid onto the combs, where it evaporates and creates a cooling effect. The process can be accelerated when other bees fan their wings to increase airflow to make the water evaporate faster. Called evaporative cooling, it’s essentially what happens when you sweat and then sit in front of a fan.When the temperatures outside dipped, the honeybees grabbed hold of each other’s legs to form a living quilt along the surface of the combs. Tautz likens the structure to a sleeping bag, but one in which the fabric’s weave—made of interlocked bees—can be loosened or tightened to adjust the temperature.In some cases, Arndt and Tautz were able to explain behaviors that beekeepers have long puzzled over. One mystery was why the insects would gnaw at the wood of their boxes without any appreciable effect. Inside the tree, they found, the behavior makes more sense.“They scratch all the loose particles from inside the surface of the hollow,” Tautz says.Not only might this behavior remove potential pathogens, such as fungal buildups, but it also creates a smooth surface onto which other bees can apply a shellac known as propolis.“Propolis is a secretion produced by the buds of trees in spring,” Tautz says. “It’s very sticky, but bees collect it because it is antifungal and antibacterial. It’s part of the pharmacy of the forest.”Other moments were captured for the first time, such as when Arndt photographed a honeybee opening a pheromone-emitting gland in midflight.“Nobody has ever shown that before,” Seeley says. He hopes these intimate photos will open people’s eyes to the mostly hidden beauty of wild bees.“We’re so used to seeing bees or thinking of bees living in a square white box,” Seeley says. “And that’s how they live for beekeepers. But it’s not how they lived for millions of years on their own.”",
"A honeybee queen, when all is right in her world, should live for two to three years. But in the United States, beekeepers have seen that life span drop by more than half over the past decade, and researchers are trying to determine why. It’s one of many questions surrounding the mystery of honeybee mortality, a disturbing phenomenon that’s linked to a mix of factors, including parasites, pesticides, and habitat loss.Aside from making a delicious natural sweetener, honeybees—which are not native to the U.S.—also provide a crucial service to agriculture: pollination. From apples to almonds, many crops would suffer without honeybees. And while about 90 percent of beekeepers in this country are hobbyists, the majority of hives belong to large-scale, commercial operations, says North Carolina State University entomologist David Tarpy.Colony collapse in general could be devastating to food production. So scientists are looking for alternatives. Most honeybees in the U.S. today are of Italian heritage and vulnerable to a pest called the varroa mite. But Russian bees are more resistant to it, and backyard beekeepers have had success with them. The problem, says Tarpy, is that Russian honeybees don’t make as much honey as their Italian counterparts and “aren’t as amenable” to the migratory nature of pollinating large-scale farms.Another option, says wildlife biologist Sam Droege of the U.S. Geological Survey, is to embrace the thousands of North American wild bee species, which are excellent pollinators, rarely sting, and are typically the size of a grain of rice. The drawback for some people is that none of the wild bee species produce honey. But, says Droege, “we can always get honey from other countries.”",
"A woman and child wait at the Rockaway Avenue transit stop in Brooklyn, New York’s Brownsville neighborhood. Under New York City’s Essential Service Plan, the Metropolitan Transit Authority has slashed subway service by 25 percent. Many subway lines run in 20 to 30 minute intervals.Coronavirus is ravaging every part of Warren Bell’s life in New Orleans. His 81-year-old cousin was hospitalized with COVID-19. His youngest daughter is furloughed from her culinary job at a major hotel because of the pandemic. His oldest daughter, a nurse, is doing 12-hour shifts at New Orleans East Hospital “where COVID-19 patients started dying weeks ago.”“One of the nursing staff died over a week ago and her supervisor was on quarantine. So naturally, I worry every day about her,” says Bell, a former TV news anchor and radio host. A football coach at the school where his wife works, and a long-time friend, jazz patriarch Ellis Marsalis, recently died from the disease. “This is scary stuff,” he says.In urban centers large and small across the U.S., the novel coronavirus is devastating African American communities. The environments where most live, the jobs they have, the prevalence of health conditions such as high blood pressure and diabetes, and how they are treated by the medical establishment have created a toxic storm of severe illness and death. (These common, underlying conditions make coronavirus more severe.)An Amazon worker navigates grocery delivery in Brooklyn’s Clinton Hill neighborhood. Delivering groceries is essential, but these workers are at greater risk of becoming infected with COVID-19 because of the number of people they encounter.Augusta (who did not want to reveal his full name because of his job) has worked in Chicago’s West Garfield Park neighborhood for more than nine years. Mail carriers are ‘essential’ employees.A worker wearing a protective mask and gloves helps a customer at the Eastern Market in Detroit, Michigan, one of the hardest-hit areas in the United States.A McDonalds employee in Brooklyn, New York takes an order behind a glass shield.In cities, counties, and states that are reporting racial data, the impact of coronavirus on the black community has been extraordinary and disproportionate. Almost one-third of infections nationwide have affected black Americans, according to data from the Centers for Disease Control, though blacks represent only 13 percent of the U.S. population. Likewise, nearly one-third of those who have died across the country are black, according to an analysis of available state and local data by the Associated Press.In some places, African-American deaths have been even higher. Thirty-six percent of coronavirus deaths recorded in Wisconsin have been among blacks, though they comprise just 6.7 percent of the state’s population. Seventy-one percent of fatalities in Shelby County, Tennessee, which includes Memphis, are Africans Americans, who make up half the population.The Lawyers’ Committee for Civil Rights Under Law, an organization that targets the inequities confronting African Americans and other racial and ethnic minorities, teamed up with hundreds of medical professionals on April 6 to demand that the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services and the CDC release daily racial and ethnic data on COVID-19 tests and outcomes. With no response yet from the CDC, the group sent a second letter now that two more weeks of data indicate worsening numbers.“People are either in shock or kind of numb,” said Demetrius Young, a city commissioner in Albany, Georgia, where a whopping 90 percent of those who’ve died have been African Americans. “They are very scared waiting to hear the next news of who has died. People will get a little tingle and immediately get frightened. Someone called me and broke down in tears because a friend who had been to her house tested positive. She had an anxiety attack.”A health care worker talks with a patient outside of a Physicians Immediate Care center in Chicago.Why is the impact so outsized on African Americans?“Look in our community: You see food deserts, transportation deserts, and education deserts,” said Dr. Celia J. Maxwell, an infectious disease physician and associate dean at Howard University College of Medicine in Washington, D.C. “All the social determinants of health that you would look to [in order to] keep the community in good health are missing from our communities of color.”“With persons of color, and African Americans specifically, there are so many issues they are dealing with—health, socio-economic, poverty, education and systematic racism,” Maxwell added. “With all those things together, it doesn’t surprise me that these patients would be more vulnerable to something like COVID-19. It’s the healthcare disparity that’s driving the epidemic.Other contributing factors, health disparities experts say, are the close-knit nature of family, friends and church in the black community. Added to that is overcrowding in urban areas and homes where multiple generations might share space.Life seems to resume in Austin, Chicago’s west side neighborhood, on a recent Sunday night. Residents built this community when local officials failed to provide access to basic resources. Now 35 residents of Austin have died from COVID-19—the second-highest death toll in the city.COVID-19 has torn through gatherings attended by African Americans, including a celebration of sheriff’s deputies and the tight-knit ballroom dance scene in Detroit; a funeral and a birthday party in Chicago; an annual African-American ski trip to Idaho that brought together 600 skiers from across the nation and as far away as London; and Mardi Gras in New Orleans.While many of the health issues prevalent among African Americans make them more susceptible, some—such as the skiers—were relatively healthy, athletic, and higher wage earners.Dr. Ebony Hilton, associate professor of anesthesiology and critical care medicine at the University of Virginia, said African Americans suffer higher rates of eight of the top 13 top causes of death in the U.S. – heart disease, stroke, cancer, influenza and pneumonia, diabetes, HIV disease, kidney failure and homicide.“I knew that the coronavirus would leave a higher rate of death in the African-American community,” she said. “I knew we would be in an uphill battle. I could see the storm coming.”Dr. Keith Ferdinand, professor of medicine at Tulane University School of Medicine in New Orleans, said numerous variables are making African Americans more vulnerable to COVID-19. They include working in service industries or “essential jobs” that require them to expose themselves to others who may be infected; using public transportation to get to work; lack of access to early testing; and a historical distrust of the health-care system because of previous bias. This leads to “a mixture of the many difficulties faced by African Americans which may compound or even extend the burden for the coronavirus risk factors,” Ferdinand said.A line forms outside of Break Through Fresh Market, a food pantry that serves 645,939 pounds of fresh produce to more than 4,000 residents of East Garfield Park, a low-income neighborhood in Chicago. “All you can do is pray, man, just pray,” says Jimmy Love, who waits in line in a mask.Posters promoting social distancing hang in trains and stations in Chicago, but many Chicagoans and essential workers must continue to take public transit to get to work and meet their basic needs.Moreover, many African Americans are concentrated in hourly wage jobs that don’t have health benefits, said Maya Rockeymoore Cummings, a former chairwoman of the Democratic Party of Maryland and candidate for the U.S. House of Representatives from Baltimore. They are either among the first wave of layoffs who are now unemployed and uninsured, or, they were deemed “essential workers” and are being exposed to the virus, she said. (See pictures of essential workers serving on the frontlines around the world.)“Go to the store or look out the window when your garbage is collected,” said Rockeymoore Cummings, who is also the widow of U.S. Rep. Elijah Cummings. “We have disproportionately exposed people who don’t have the benefits to protect themselves.”From the cities, counties, and states that have collected COVID-19 data, here are a few of the findings.In this city of 75,000 people 150 miles south of Atlanta, 90 percent of the COVID-19 deaths have been African Americans in a town that’s 72.5 percent black. Authorities said they believe two funerals and possibly the annual Snickers Marathon in the first week of March, which hosted 1,000 runners, contributed to the spread.“We’re still very much in the crisis stage,” Young said. “We’ve had 50 deaths. I have two lifelong friends who passed away. I have a lot of acquaintances through the faith community who are affected.”Several people became sick after attending funerals at the MLK Memorial Chapel in Albany, Georgia. Albany has been a coronavirus hot spot. The state’s governor relaxed some social distances measures and opened some non-essential businesses Friday including hair and nail salons, barbershops and bowling alleys.Albany’s African American community is very close-knit, he said, and a 30 percent poverty rate has exacerbated the situation. “A lot of people in the demographic are already suffering from poor access to health care. And we have a large elderly population, which is not very healthy,” he said.One person who served on a jury of a high-profile murder trial seems to have unwittingly “passed the virus on to a lot of others in the courtroom, including our chief judge, who is fighting for his life. Another judge has since passed away,” Young said.The Rev. Jarod Pierce, pastor of The Real Church in Albany, said he only leaves home when it is absolutely necessary. One of the reasons it hit so hard was people didn’t take it seriously “until it hit close to home,” he said. “Someone called me last week. Their mom, grandmother and uncle were all fighting for their lives.”Despite pushback from mayors across the state and warnings from public health leaders to move forward cautiously, Georgia Gov. Brian Kemp on Friday relaxed some social distancing measures and opened some non-essential businesses including hair and nail salons, barber shops and bowling alleys.An emergency room nurse dons personal protective equipment before entering the room of a patient suspected of having coronavirus at MedStar St. Mary's Hospital in Maryland. The state of Maryland currently has more than 14,000 reported COVID-19 cases and nearly 600 deaths.In the nation’s capital, 81 percent of the fatalities have been African American, according the mayor’s website, in a city whose population is 46 percent African American. Many of the deaths are in the city’s poorest and predominantly African American neighborhoods.Sandy Henderson, a retired conference manager, was among 600 African American skiers across the U.S. and as far away as London, who traveled to Ketchum, Idaho, for the annual get-together of the National Brotherhood of Skiers in early March. Henderson, president of the Washington, D.C., affiliate Black Ski Inc., and her companion came home sick.“I felt so chilled, all I could do was get up the stairs and cover up,” said Henderson, 69. Their physicians prescribed them both the antibiotic Zithromax, used for common bacterial infections, and sent them home. Later in the week, Henderson fainted on her bathroom floor.Two men play chess outside the George Washington University Hospital in Washington, D.C. in late March. To prevent the spread of coronavirus, Virginia, Maryland, and DC announced stay-at-home orders strongly discouraging residents from going outside on March 30.Several days later, when they still felt awful, they knew something was very wrong. At the nearest emergency room, they were tested for flu, strep throat, and COVID-19, and three days later, both were found positive for COVID-19. After both were deemed out of danger, the hospital sent them home.Meanwhile, as many as 100 people from their ski trip had fallen sick and at least four had died, Henderson said. She and her companion are fortunate not to suffer from the underlying health issues that make the disease so deadly for others.Fifty-six percent of the city’s deaths have been African American, though they make up just 30 percent of the city’s population. Mayor Lori E. Lightfoot said the numbers are “troubling“ and “a stark reminder of the deep-seated issues which have long created disparate health impacts in communities across Chicago.”The impact is personal for the Rev. Marshall Hatch, pastor of historic New Mount Pilgrim Missionary Baptist Church. “My sister passed with corona-related illnesses seven days ago. My best friend passed a couple of days before that.”At New Mount Pilgrim Missionary Baptist Church in the West Garfield Park neighborhood in Chicago, Easter services is held to an empty hall. The service was instead streamed live on Facebook where more than 4,900 worshipers attended virtually. The Rev. Marshall Hatch mourns the loss of his best friend to COVID-19.The church is doing virtual services, streaming live with “one singer, one minister, a musician,” and producers offsite, he said. “Naturally our [streaming] numbers are up ten-fold. Because of anxiety, fear, sense of isolation, these services are a spiritual lifeline to people.”Hatch’s church is one of the largest on Chicago’s West Side, one of the city’s poorest communities, which is plagued with violence, joblessness and has the second-lowest life expectancy out of 77 Chicago neighborhoods, he said. “This epidemic has magnified the kind of inequities that people experience every day.”It’s “a tale of two cities,” Hatch said. “The wide disparity in life expectancy between our community and other communities is stark and immoral. We have Illness based on stress, food deserts, and the violence that comes from neighborhoods in despair.”“You can’t say Larry without saying Marshall. It was one word because we were partners most of our lives.” says Pastor Marshall Hatch as he mourns his best friend Larry Harris, who died on April 1. The autopsy listed “natural causes” as cause of death, but Harris had a history of heart attacks and symptoms of COVID-19. Harris leaves behind two children and 12 grandchildren.The novel coronavirus also hit U.S. Rep. Gwen Moore (D-WI) close to home. Her 4th congressional district includes the city of Milwaukee, where 72 percent of the COVID-19 related deaths have been African Americans, in a city that is only 39 percent African American.Moore has been in quarantine twice in the last month after being exposed separately to two different individuals who later tested positive for COVID-19. Her daughter, a nursing assistant on the frontlines, and a cousin, who is a nurse, are awaiting COVID-19 test results.She also is concerned about a nephew who lives in a homeless shelter.“When you have four men living in a room, social distancing is not practical, and people have different standards of sanitation,” Moore said.Several of her friends and colleagues are recovering from the virus, including a 33-year-old state representative, a county commissioner and a candidate for city attorney. A retired police lieutenant colonel she knows succumbed to the virus.A pandemic didn’t stop Rosie Redmon, 79, and her son, Deshawn Hudson, from voting in the Wisconsin presidential primary. The pair lined up outside Riverside High School in Milwaukee  while wearing masks and practicing social distancing in early April.“It’s everywhere I go,” Moore said. “I’m one of the vulnerable people. I’m on cancer treatment. I have been ordering my groceries. Every time I don’t have to wait in line at a grocery store is one less time of exposing myself.”Milwaukee Health Commissioner Jeanette Kowalik said she feels that early on, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) overemphasized travel as a key risk factor. Many people “didn’t feel they needed to worry about it because they didn’t travel and didn’t know anybody who did.”Kowalik said she knows three people who contracted COVID-19 without having traveled overseas, and have since recovered – all African-American men. A friend and mentor of hers, an African American educator, died from disease.“Earlier there were myths that black people couldn’t get COVID-19,” Kowalik said. “Then there were the conspiracy theories. We put a lot of energy into that instead of energy into prevention.”Moore, meanwhile, worries that some young African Americans still aren’t taking the outbreak seriously. A young black man told her he could survive coronavirus because his immunities were strong. “It had never occurred to him” that he could infect and kill others such as herself.A woman gets her hair braided at a salon in the Bedford Stuyvesant neighborhood of Brooklyn. Three days later, on March 20, Governor Cuomo enacted a stay-at-home order for all of New York state. The governors of Connecticut, Illinois, and New Jersey followed suit.Nearly 57 percent of COVID-19 deaths the state have been African Americans, though they make up only on third of the state’s population.Rev. Fred Luter, pastor of the 5,000-member Franklin Avenue Baptist Church in New Orleans, presided over six funerals in two weeks. With only immediate family permitted to attend, the services are livestreamed and abbreviated.Members of his congregation ranging in age from their 40s to 80s have died from COVID-19 in recent weeks, and others have been infected and quarantined. “You see more people wearing masks and staying home. It’s like a wakeup call that this getting is more serious than we thought it was.”One of the most heartbreaking stories, Luter said, is that of the Rev. Dr. Gilbert L. Barnes, who had been senior pastor of Rock of Ages Church in Marrero, Louisiana, outside of New Orleans, for 25 years. He and his wife, Janie, celebrated their 60th anniversary this past September. Barnes, 77, died of complications to COVID-19 on April 5. His wife, Janie Barnes, 76, who also tested positive, died just hours before him.“People are losing husbands, wives, and children,” Luter said. “You would love to embrace them and give them a hug, but we just can’t do it. Everybody understands, but it doesn't ease the pain of not being able to share that physical touch.”Meanwhile in New Orleans, Warren Bell finally got one spot of bright news. After more than two weeks in the hospital, his cousin is recovering and will be released to a rehabilitation facility or to the home of his son, a popular local priest. His cousin still needs oxygen, but “he’s definitely kicking corona’s butt.”",
"A city employee disinfects a street in Beyoglu, a tourist district empty of tourists.The workers who now find themselves on the frontlines of the COVID-19 pandemic have always been essential but we're just now noticing them. A worldwide health crisis forced us to realize that we depended on them—and that they're risking their lives. With the streets empty and much nonessential work stopped, we are finally seeing the faces of the people we need to survive.Photographers also perform essential work, by showing us people we might not otherwise see—the fumigators working at night in Nairobi and the garbage collectors driving dark streets in Normandy. In South Africa, a photographer notices workers returning electricity to a poor neighborhood, while in Brazil, another finds a shopkeeper delivering groceries to his customers. In London, a doctor reads up on the coronavirus after a long shift, while just outside Paris, workers in a coffin factory double their production. (Learn about the new role played by paramedics and undertakers in France.)How has our view of what constitutes vital work changed? National Geographic and Magnum Photos photographers bring you a global look at how coronavirus is affecting the worlds they see inside—and just outside—their windows.A grocery store worker in Brooklyn lays in a supply of paper towels during the early days of the pandemic.A man sells fruit on a deserted street. He told photographer Enri Canaj that he had to earn a living: "There's nothing else I can do."Mary Bolela, a nurse from Mississippi, volunteered to care for COVID-19 patients in New York. Assigned to the temporary hospital at Coler Campus on Roosevelt Island, she bought sodas for her colleagues while on break."My wife Anna is a doctor so she goes to work every day," says Jonas Bendiksen. "I photographed her as she was having her morning coffee and a well-deserved day of rest."Mojaleda works as a security officer in a shopping mall some six miles from his home. "It worries me to use public transportation at the moment," he says. "Because of the current restrictions, it has been more difficult to get there.""This is Steve, the postal worker who delivers mail to my parents' new home in Las Vegas," says photographer Daniella Zalcman. "Thankfully he has a route that allows him to remain in his truck and not interact with anyone while he's out working every day."Raul Hernandez (left) and his father Ignacio Hernandez work on a house construction project. "Our neighbors worked at a restaurant and at a gym," says Ignacio. "They both lost their jobs. I feel really lucky we still have work."Nono takes a phone order at her father's Japanese cafe, where all the other workers have been furloughed. She spends most of the day doing schoolwork but sometimes her dad lets her help him.The only Catholic church in town has been closed for more than three weeks but Father Ednaldo Cardoso has been offering spiritual advice via WhatsApp."The maintenance and security staff at our housing society have been working 24/7 to keep all of us safe and comfortable," says photographer Smita Sharma. "They fumigated the whole apartment complex while one of my neighbors watched the smoke from her balcony."Members of the band Revelacion Norteña play outside Tepic's cathedral. They used to perform at parties but since everything stopped they've been trying to earn money by playing on the streets.Leonardo Palloni is a butcher in Florence. With long lines at supermarkets, people are turning to small stores like his for their grocery shopping."We have been having a lot of power cuts," says photographer Lindokuhle Sobekwa, "which has made it difficult for most people to social distance without electricity." These municipal workers are repairing a faulty cable.Nurses join the clapping for National Health Service workers outside Bristol Royal Infirmary, a large teaching hospital.Staff at this local supermarket in a Kuala Lumpur mall wear masks, face shields, and gloves for protection. Public hand sanitizers are strategically placed at checkouts while grocery cart handles are cleaned twice after each use.Since mid-March, workers at a casket manufacturer near Paris have doubled their daily production of coffins.During the lockdown, veterinarians only examine animals needing urgent treatment, including photographer Paolo Verzone's 15-year-old cat Panterino.A driver stops his bus outside East Elmhurst Hospital in Queens. New York City's public transit workers have been hit hard by the coronavirus: At least 83 have died.Photographer Cristina Garcia Rodero would like to thank all the pharmacists. "With their dedication and courage, they make it possible for us to buy masks, alcohol, disinfectants, and gloves."Food delivery personnel wait for their packages at a small market in the Copan building, the largest residential building in Latin America.Psychiatrist Marc Windisch reads poems near the Eiffel Tower to comfort people.Night time is the province of essential workers: the fire brigade, ambulance drivers, security guards, and fumigation teams, like this one.Mike Bae, the owner of the General Store in Topanga Canyon, has provided his eight employees with masks, sanitizer, and gloves. He has experienced a surge in business since the pandemic began.Photojournalist Xanderleigh Dookey reports from an abandoned building that has become a home for people with nowhere else to go. "We are the eyes and ears of the people, even more so when our world is on lockdown," says photographer Gulshan Khan, who captured Dookey at work.At a bakery, the face of a woman working behind the counter is reflected in the display case below.Photographer Sara Hylton was quarantined for two weeks after returning to Canada from India. During that time, her mother Lyn visited her everyday, bringing treats or the newspaper. "Even though we have yet to hug or touch, I am grateful to see my beautiful, healthy mother in the flesh," says Hylton. "My essential worker."Essential yet disposable, these gloves were scattered across a parking lot near Paris.Garbage collectors work while the streets are empty and the windows are shuttered.André runs a small convenience store with his wife. He's delivering orders to their customers so people won't crowd the tiny shop.Caroline Smith, an emergency doctor, studies coronavirus statistics at home.A small production and design company called Yeti shifted their work to produce protective gear for local hospitals.An employee at the nearby cemetery is dressed for his somber job—dark suit, gloves, and a mask—although funerals have been banned in Italy.",
"Medical staff put on protective clothing in a staging room outside a new military field hospital in Mulhouse, France. The region is considered one of the epicenters of the coronavirus crisis, with nearly a quarter of the country’s deaths.The first funeral I photographed during the coronavirus crisis was for a woman named Marie Therese Wassmer. She was nearly 90 years old and was buried in a cemetery outside the small city of Mulhouse, an early flashpoint of the outbreak in France. Although she hadn’t been tested for the virus, she was buried like a victim. Neither her friends nor family attended the funeral for a variety of reasons, including the countrywide lockdown. As a priest and four undertakers laid her to rest in a sealed coffin, the undertakers adopted an unusual role: They prayed over her coffin. It was as though they were her family.Paramedics leave the house of a man exhibiting classic COVID-19 symptoms: coughing, shortness of breath, and a soaring temperature. They take him in an ambulance to a hospital in Mulhouse.As France struggles to stanch a coronavirus pandemic that has killed 20,796 French citizens and infected 117,324, as of April 21, the country’s undertakers have become unsung superheroes who take care of both the dead and the living. Not only are they critical first responders, they’re also the last connection families have to loved ones. When the risk of contagion shuts relatives out of hospitals, morgues, and cemeteries, it’s the undertaker who consoles them and helps them say goodbye in other ways.A man infected with COVID-19 is transported from one hospital to another in Mulhouse. The region’s hospitals are so overwhelmed that some patients are airlifted to Germany or elsewhere in France.A healthcare worker who had been treating COVID-19 patients is taken to a hospital after developing symptoms herself.I saw this first-hand in Mulhouse, an industrial city located in eastern France, near the German border. There, a funeral company director named Jeremy Walter told me people have asked him to place letters from loved ones inside coffins. Recently, at the request of one distraught family, he said he took a photo of a man before his coffin was sealed. The last time they had seen their relative was weeks before at the nursing home where he lived.Paramedic Kevin Burger attends to a man with severe COVID-19 symptoms, including a temperature of nearly 105 degrees. The first coronavirus cases in eastern France were traced to a large evangelical gathering in mid-February that attracted attendees from all over the world.Dr. Sara Boussous treats a COVID-19 patient at Saint Jean Caring Center in Sentheim, near Mulhouse. Saint Jean specializes in post-operative care, such as physiotherapy. But some of the hospital’s wards are being used to care for patients recovering from COVID-19 who were discharged from nearby ICUs. Staff members don’t typically treat infectious diseases or experience death.On Feb. 17, before public gatherings were banned, 2,500 people from around the world flocked to Mulhouse to attend an annual five-day evangelical conference at the Christian Open Door church. Soon after, Mulhouse had the largest cluster of coronavirus infections in all of France. The French health minister called Mulhouse “the tipping point” of the virus’s spread in the country. As of April 21, there have been 4,545 confirmed COVID-19 deaths in the region—second only to the area around Paris. (See pictures of a quiet, empty Paris under lockdown.)Undertaker Alain Senn collects the bodies of two COVID-19 victims from a nursing home in Bantzaheim, near Mulhouse. French authorities didn’t include nursing homes in the country’s official death toll until April 3, which increased the total figure by 61 percent.Undertakers Jeremy Walter and Laura Wioland collect the body of an elderly woman who died from COVID-19 outside Mulhouse. Many of the deceased come from nursing homes, which bar journalists. A nurse at this hospice made an exception for photographer William Daniels.I came here from Paris in late March to document a field hospital the French army had set up. I drove more than 300 miles without seeing anyone. When I arrived in Mulhouse, the caseload was peaking. The region was so overwhelmed by virus cases that helicopters were transporting patients elsewhere in France and to Germany. The streets of Mulhouse were eerily empty. Only two hotels were open: one hosting military personnel and another hosting journalists.Undertakers Jeremy Walter and Fred Pons arrive at a nursing home near Mulhouse to collect the body of a COVID-19 patient. Before the crisis, they handled about seven cases a week. At the peak of the epidemic in Mulhouse, when this photograph was taken, they were collecting five to eight deceased people per day.Barred from photographing anywhere other than the entrances at both the new military and public hospitals, I began to notice other people on the front lines, people we don't often talk about. I put on a mask and gloves and started following the undertakers.A COVID-19 patient is being transferred via helicopter from a public hospital in Mulhouse to one in neighboring Germany. When the hospitals in eastern France became overwhelmed with coronavirus cases, the military began airlifting patients to other parts of France and Germany.Outside of my father’s death in 2017, I had never had much contact with the men and women who run funeral homes. In Mulhouse, I saw people going above and beyond to do their jobs. In the face of a critical mask shortage, with no help from the government, they purchased their own personal protective equipment or received donated masks and gloves. They went into nursing homes, where hundreds were dying, to collect victims of COVID-19. Despite the precautions they took, some undertakers became infected—but not the ones I met.Workers disinfect a railway platform in Mulhouse after a train carrying a dozen COVID-19 patients departed for a hospital in western France.All the undertakers I followed were efficient and careful. They put on gloves and a mask before placing a body inside a fully disinfected coffin. Only after they closed the lid did they remove their personal protective equipment. For COVID-19 cases, a police officer or the mayor must secure coffins with a non-removable sticker or a wax seal. Once it’s closed, it cannot be reopened. At funerals, no more than 10 people can gather. With four undertakers and a priest, that leaves only five family members who can mourn at the gravesite. (Here's how these restricted funerals are impacting our ability to mourn.)The Hauptmann funeral home that Jeremy Walters directs is a small operation based in Cernay, just outside Mulhouse. In addition to working tirelessly since the beginning of the crisis, Walters also volunteers as a firefighter.The Christian Open Door Church remains closed a month after it held a conference with 2,500 people from around the world in mid-February. The French government now says this event was one of the key drivers of the virus’s spread in the country.Inside the Hauptmann funeral home, rooms that were used for private family viewings now serve as storage for an overflow of coffins. Each room holds a dozen or more coffins, with most containing coronavirus victims. The air conditioning is set to the max.Private rooms in a funeral home in Pfasttat, in eastern France, are typically used for by families in mourning. Now they hold the coffins of those who’ve lost their lives to the coronavirus pandemic.We often think of undertakers as sober, stone-faced people. To the world, they’re invisible until they’re needed. Even then, we don’t know the full extent of the work they do. The truth is, those who care for the deceased are feeling the effects of the coronavirus pandemic just as much as everyone else, perhaps even more so. An undertaker named Catherine Pereira told me she can longer touch her eight-year-old son when she gets home from work; it’s too risky. Her voice broke as she said that.At the funeral for Marie Therese Wassmer, in the village of Vieux Thann, no family attended. The undertakers prayed over her coffin. Wassmer was found dead at her home and wasn’t tested for the virus.Because of the pandemic, a maximum of 10 people, including the priest and undertakers, are allowed at funerals in France. Five out of 34 relatives attended the funeral of Simone Piquelmal, who died of COVID-19.During my time in Mulhouse, I also got to know paramedics. Like undertakers, these first responders are exposed to the virus every day and receive no guidance from the government on how to protect themselves. And yet they’ve maintained their humanity and professionalism under extreme conditions.Transporting the deceased takes a toll. Catherine Pereira, an undertaker, pauses after collecting the body of a woman from a nursing home in Lutterbach. After weeks of working in crisis mode, Pereira is physically and emotionally drained.Roger Ermoli of Cernay, France, had been quarantined for several weeks but had to go to the hospital for dialysis. His son believes that’s when he was infected with COVID-19. Ermoli’s wife, daughter, son, and their spouses attended the funeral, but his three grandchildren were unable to join, due to the restriction on gatherings.Late one night, I joined a paramedic team answering a call out in the country. The patient was a man in his 80s suffering from a fever near 106 degrees Fahrenheit. It was definitely a COVID-19 case. Though his daughter couldn’t ride with him to the hospital, the paramedics allowed her to come inside the ambulance to say goodbye. She might have been seeing him for the last time. At his age the chance of dying is high. (These underlying conditions can make coronavirus more severe.)As I watched the paramedics that night, I thought about what I’d heard about the hospitals in France. So many patients are dying that doctors are forced to prioritize younger patients over older ones. If this man needed respiratory assistance, I don't think he’d receive it. I don’t know what happened to him.Undertakers Alain Senn and Didier Kraus prepare coffins before collecting the bodies of COVID-19 victims from a nursing home. After the body is laid inside, coffins are sealed with a non-removable sticker or wax and can’t be reopened.After spending nearly two weeks in Mulhouse, I’m back in Paris. The lockdown in France has been extended until May 11 and may be extended again. When I got back from Mulhouse, the daily death toll was at its highest since the start of the outbreak in France. But the number of infected people admitted into intensive care at hospitals is getting lower. The caseload in Mulhouse is also much lower, and Paris is just a couple weeks behind.It’s been five weeks since France’s shelter-in-place order was instituted, and many Parisians are feeling the financial pain. At first there was a spirit of togetherness and solidarity in the streets. Now I sense suspicion and distress in those around me. I wonder how long it will be before things feel normal again. As I walk through my mostly empty neighborhood, I take in the trees blooming in empty parks and realize we’re having one of the most beautiful springs I’ve seen in a long time.",
"Police patrol the empty Plan du Trocadero on March 17, the first day of the lockdown in Paris. Before leaving their homes, Parisians are supposed to show authorities a note stating the purpose and time of their outing. Those without one risk a fine.In the nearly two decades I’ve lived and worked in Paris, I’ve never seen it this quiet. It’s an eerie, empty quiet.At first, it took time for people to understand what was happening, that this new coronavirus was much more than an Asian crisis. Schools here closed on March 12—and yet on the following weekend, spring was in the air, it was sunny and beautiful, and Parisians couldn’t resist going outdoors.Then on March 16, the full meaning came clear when President Emmanuel Macron ordered the entire country to stay at home for 15 days, starting at noon the next day. That morning, a line 200 yards long formed outside my supermarket. As I photographed the line, a few customers objected. But after we talked, I understood that they were just scared, and some were upset with the government for not seeing the crisis coming sooner.When France’s ordeal began, London was still packed and bustling with people, and New York City was too. I think Paris was one of the first big, famous cities to empty out. By March 30, 11,838 people in Paris and its suburbs were sick with COVID-19, and 954 had died. Nationwide, France had 44,550 reported positive cases and 3,024 deaths. Many here assume the actual number of cases must be much higher because we’re testing only people with severe symptoms. France doesn’t have enough tests available, as opposed to Germany where more than a hundred thousand people are tested every week. And the number of reported deaths here must be artificially low as well, because only those who die in hospitals are counted. (Here's why the U.S. coronavirus testing failures were inevitable.)Six days after the order for people to stay home, La Defense, the business district of Paris, was deserted.Based on health officials’ projections, we expect the big wave of COVID-19 to hit Paris this week, with the peak coming around April 5. Some authorities say the caseload in the Paris region will be similar to that in northern Italy, where 6,818 people had succumbed by March 29.If you go outside in the city, you must have an official note that says why you need to be out and what time you left your home, or you risk being fined by the police. Early in the lockdown, I went to a market in Barbès, a poor neighborhood in the north of Paris. It was crowded that day, and many people I spoke with didn’t have a note, but I didn’t see any police officers choosing to impose fines.The Châtelet-Les Halles Metro station, in the heart of Paris, is the biggest underground station in Europe. No bustle today.Three regional city trains and five metro lines run through Châtelet-Les Halles, moving a total of 750,000 travelers a day in normal times. During the lockdown, only essential workers can use public transport.In these poor neighborhoods, where life can be a struggle on an average day, fights have erupted between young men, and the local markets have all closed. My press credential allows me to be out in the streets and public places taking photographs. I consider myself lucky—for poor families stuck in small apartments, it’s much harder.Though I’m originally from Normandy and have lived in Paris for 18 years. I’ve done little photojournalism in France. Instead I’ve concentrated on documenting social issues in Africa and the wars in the Central African Republic, Libya, Syria, and Iraq. When you cover wars, you need to keep your distance from the pain and suffering. You need that separation to report objectively and not be overwhelmed by your emotions.With an eye on the unfolding crisis in neighboring Italy, France moved quickly to shut down its busiest areas, such as the Forum des Halles shopping mall. Starting March 14, only essential services were allowed to stay open.The first time I covered something bad happening in my country was in 2015, when I photographed the aftermath of the terrorist attacks on a concert hall, café, and soccer stadium in Paris. Compared to that, my work during this COVID calamity is so different. It’s about all of us—strangers, friends, my family, my neighbors, me. (See pictures from a world paused by coronavirus.)In some ways, it’s more difficult to shoot your own place and people. One thing I’ve wanted to do is convey the mood of the city’s most iconic structures as they appear under lockdown—the Louvre, the Eiffel Tower, the business district of La Défense—at different times, in different lights. It’s very hard to photograph emptiness. I’ve been spending a lot of time—sometimes three hours or more—at each site. In all, I must have shot at least 4,000 frames by now.In familiar settings I have to find beauty and meaning in something I see every day, and I’m so used to what’s around me that I may miss interesting scenes or moments. In the city center now, I see so many homeless people I hadn’t noticed before when they were hidden among the daily crowds. Their situation is terrible. They can’t plead with passersby for money because the streets are empty. All the public toilets they usually use are closed. In the past, homeless people have been helped by small aid organizations, but nearly all these groups have stopped their work.I want to show how the pandemic is affecting the homeless, as well as immigrants and refugees who live in camps just outside Paris. For them, social distancing is impossible. They have no access to masks and gloves, and maintaining strict personal hygiene is difficult. I’m also planning to cover the work of Médecins Sans Frontières (Doctors Without Borders), who are helping vulnerable populations by organizing mobile clinics to test them and teach them how to protect themselves as much as they can.A lone police car enforces the lockdown on Place du Trocadero, across the River Seine from the Eiffel Tower. The lockdown has been extended to April 15 as the COVID-19 death toll rises.I intend to continue this work over the next few weeks, to give the world’s people at least one view of the pandemic in my city. As I’ve roamed Paris, I’ve noticed that the air is much fresher—there’s less pollution. And one day when I was shooting at the main entrance of Les Halles, one of the biggest commercial malls in Europe, I heard birds singing. I’d never realized there were birds at Les Halles of all places. It gave me hope.",
"A medical personnel member takes samples on a woman at a "drive-thru" coronavirus testing lab set up by a community center in West Palm Beach, Florida, on March 16, 2020.Leah Craig stepped out of her car and into a nightmare. Days after developing a sore throat, the 29-year-old started coughing uncontrollably, something her asthma only made worse. By the evening of March 18, Craig was struggling to breathe when she opened an email from her synagogue in Los Angeles that said a member who’d attended the previous week’s Purim celebration had tested positive for COVID-19.She and her fiancé, Soren, promptly drove to the hospital at the University of California, Los Angeles (UCLA), where a nurse in the emergency room grabbed a plastic swab akin to a long Q-Tip and inserted it deep into Craig’s nasal cavity.Whereas South Korea, Taiwan, and Germany have been able to return results in under 24 hours, Craig was told to wait three to five days. Well over a week later, she hadn’t received her diagnosis. “I know I’m really lucky to have even been tested,” Craig says, acknowledging the nation’s difficulties with making tests for the novel coronavirus widely available.So far, more than 831,000 Americans have been tested for COVID-19—but 98 percent of those tests were conducted after March 14, the day the White House coronavirus task force announced a major push, according to the volunteer-driven COVID Tracking Project. The delays in part result from design flaws with the early diagnostic tests developed by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC).At the same time, those CDC errors have exposed other shortcomings in the nation's capacity for diagnostic testing that existed years before the novel coronavirus emerged in China, according to Catharina Boehme, the CEO of Foundation for Innovative New Diagnostics (FIND), a medical nonprofit based in Geneva, Switzerland.Since 2006, the Biomedical Advanced Research and Development Authority, which is a branch of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, has provided hundreds of millions of dollars in grants for so-called rapid-response platforms—initiatives intended to develop technology at a fast pace when an outbreak emerges. These funds were directed primarily toward the development of therapeutic treatments and vaccines rather than creating diagnostic methods for new threats or increasing the volume of tests the system could perform. As a result, Boehme says, test development has lagged behind efforts to bring new vaccines to clinical trials.Testing has also been hampered by shortages of vital components, including the chemical solution used to extract genetic material from clinical samples, the machines needed to run the test, and the swabs used to collect the samples, according to a statement released by the American Society for Microbiology.Commercial and university laboratories rushed to fill the gap. Many of them, especially larger companies such as LabCorp and Roche, now use a similar but improved version of the CDC’s testing technique. Smaller labs such as Mammoth Biosciences and Sherlock Biosciences have gotten more creative, developing tests using CRISPR, a promising gene-editing technology. Multiple startups have also developed a collection of at-home tests, but doctors and the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) have warned against their use, in part because self-administering a nasal swab is difficult and could cause injury. Also, a poorly-executed swab could lead to a negative result when a person is actually infected.The frenetic rollout of testing during the past two weeks explains why the U.S. now leads the world in the number of reported COVID-19 cases, and it gives a truer emerging picture of the magnitude of the country’s pandemic. On March 29, Anthony Fauci, the head of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, told CNN that the U.S. could experience 100,000 deaths and millions of cases despite the recent surge in testing.“Diagnostics are the forgotten small brother of pandemic response. When it all goes right, they’re almost invisible,” Boehme says. “COVID-19 has shown the world the importance of diagnostics.”After Chinese officials published the genetic sequence of the new coronavirus, officially called SARS-CoV-2, on January 10, laboratories around the world hurried to develop a strategy for diagnosing the disease. A team from Germany was among the first, and its test was adopted by the World Health Organization on January 17, becoming the de facto gold standard. The U.S., though, continued to forge its own test at the CDC, as it has done in the past, such as with the West African Ebola outbreak in 2014, when a rapid diagnostic test was prepared for use in the region and for U.S. personnel who might have been exposed.Nearly all COVID-19 tests use similar approaches to spot the presence of the virus’s genetic material in clinical samples of sputum, saliva, or a swab from deep in the nasal passages. Once a lab has the sample, scientists extract all the genetic material, but detecting coronavirus among the cells and the multitude of microbes in the nose and mouth is challenging.To make it easier, molecular pathologists use a technique called a polymerase chain reaction to amplify the genetic signal from a particular virus. This method relies on custom-designed “primers” to make copies of the coronavirus’s genetic code. Scientists then use a chemical probe that glows only when it interacts with these copies. If a sample reaches a certain level of brightness, the patient has tested positive.On March 4, the CDC sent test kits using four sets of primers to state health labs. Three were designed to detect the coronavirus, while the other was supposed to hone in on unrelated genetic material to act as a negative control. But that’s not what happened.Within days, some labs reported back that they were getting false positive results in their negative controls. The CDC recalled the problem batches but didn’t explain what was wrong, according to Tomer Altman, a Silicon Valley bioinformatics consultant.Altman, who designs primers for these kinds of tests, thinks he has identified one of the flaws. He analyzed the CDC’s testing components on widely used software, and the program flagged major problems, including one known as primer dimer. That’s when a pair of the primers generate a false signal by binding to each other rather than to the coronavirus’s genetic code. “It’s like running a race with a 10-pound weight tied to your foot,” Altman says—although he cautions that his analysis wasn’t comprehensive and doesn’t definitively show what the problem was.Normally, state labs would receive, administer, and analyze results from tests developed by the CDC. But with the recall of the faulty batches and commercial tests under production, testing for COVID-19 has lagged dangerously nationwide—and has yet to fully recover.“We’re failing on so many levels,” says Benjamin tenOever, a microbiologist at the Icahn School of Medicine at Mt. Sinai in New York City who’s an authority on viruses.Requests for comment from the CDC have not been answered.Aside from failing to allocate sufficient funds for the design of diagnostic tests, the U.S. has lacked the administrative flexibility to react effectively, says Luciana Borio, vice president at In-Q-Tel, a nonprofit venture capital firm, and former director of medical and biodefense preparedness at the National Security Council. As a result, the nationwide system couldn’t rapidly coordinate the COVID-19 response among all the different agencies, clinics, hospitals, and corporations. “We need to bring in the private sector to be a part of our planning and ask them what they need to be a part of this [response],” Borio says.By developing a test loosely based on the CDC version during the 2009 H1N1 influenza pandemic, Karen Kaul, a molecular pathologist at NorthShore Hospital outside Chicago, ramped up testing capacity for thousands of people in mere days. At the time, groups such as hers could make such “laboratory-developed tests” without approval by the FDA, provided they met the safety requirements described in the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Act.During the past decade, there’s been an explosion of laboratory-developed tests (especially for genetics), aggressively marketed to physicians and consumers, leading the FDA, in 2014, to propose a more stringent approval process to better ensure patient safety. That guidance was never finalized and was withdrawn in January 2017 as President Barack Obama left office, but the FDA’s cautionary impulse did have a chilling effect on laboratory-developed tests, such as when the agency attempted to block the creation of some tests for the mosquito-borne sickness Zika in 2016. Since Obama left office, the policy has been under Congressional deliberation.Laboratories still needed to seek FDA approval before using their own tests during an emergency situation, which slowed the ability of clinical labs such as Kaul’s in Chicago and larger commercial operations to bring to bear safe and reliable alternatives for COVID-19. So on February 29, the FDA loosened some of the paperwork requirements, allowing groups to make and use laboratory-developed tests prior to official approval.The lack of alacrity can be attributed in part to the absence of emerging disease outbreaks in the U.S. in recent years, says Catharina Boehme, of the Foundation for Innovative New Diagnostics. East Asian countries, scarred by the SARS outbreak in 2002 and 2003, invested heavily in testing infrastructure. But the U.S. largely escaped SARS, and because the country had been flexible enough to manage the H1N1 outbreak a decade earlier, agencies and systems weren’t ready for the novel coronavirus.“There’s a lot of panic in outbreak situations, but we very rapidly forget,” Boehme says. “There has been very little investment in preparedness, and all the investment flows to response.” Preparedness means taking steps to respond as soon as agencies hear of a potential threat, having the mechanisms in place to develop diagnostic tests safely and fast, and the system capacity to meet testing demands.Even now, with wider testing available, only people with overt symptoms are getting tested. Since many cases of COVID-19 are mild or asymptomatic, it’s not known how many people have been infected, and we may never know how many new cases will arise as a result of the lag.Even after a second trip to the emergency room because of her difficulty breathing, Leah Craig didn’t receive her test results until March 28. UCLA told her she’d tested negative but also said that her result was likely false, adding to her confusion and worry. Now Craig and Soren are isolating themselves in one half of the small, two-bedroom apartment they share with Craig’s mother. Although UCLA told Craig she could be re-tested, Craig said it wouldn’t be worth the additional burden on the system.“We could have tested more people sooner,” says Kelly Wroblewski, director of infectious disease at the Association for Public Health Laboratories. “It’s a cascade of unfortunate events.”",
"Thirteen-year-old Ava Cairns-Locke takes a photo of the Eiffel Tower while backpacking through Europe in 2014.Thursday is Bastille Day, an important holiday in France that commemorates the beginning of the French Revolution with the storming of the Bastille on July 14, 1789. This year's celebrations being held around the world have taken on a particular meaning as the nation tries to heal from recent devastating terrorist attacks.No stranger to violence, Paris has endured countless trials over its two millennia of existence, from the 1814 Battle of Paris to the German Occupation during World War II. In November, a series of terrorist attacks left more than 120 dead and hundreds more injured.But French values have endured for centuries. “The bonds of liberté and égalité and fraternité … are going to endure far beyond any act of terrorism,” U.S. President Barack Obama said just after the attacks.Famous artists and thinkers from all over the world have debated and celebrated these values in Parisian cafes and on the city's streets, during times of peace and times of unrest. These photos from our archives show the city’s iconic streetscapes, which—like its values—remain resilient. They remind us why we love the City of Light.Follow Becky Little on Twitter.This story was originally published on November 14, 2015 and updated on July 13, 2016.",
"In the mortuary of one of the biggest cemeteries in Milan, Italy, a woman looks at a coffin.Paula Bronstein sat in the cemetery in a rented Ford Fusion, listening to the rabbi and taking pictures out her window. Her family members, in three cars behind her, followed the rabbi’s words on a conference call.Bronstein, a photojournalist, had flown in from Thailand, knowing it might be the last time she’d see her father. George Bronstein had been born during the 1918 Spanish flu pandemic. Now 101, he was dying of natural causes, and she had been prepared to say goodbye—but not for a pandemic to come between them.Paula Bronstein's father, George, blows out the candles at his 100th birthday party.Upon her arrival in the United States, she’d self-quarantined because of the novel coronavirus, and could not see her dad in person. By the time he died, on March 30, the social distancing put in place to slow the virus was disrupting death observances. There would be no funeral home gathering, no synagogue service, no comforting visits to mourners sitting shiva. A handful of family members could attend the burial, provided they stayed in their cars. The rabbi, alone, could toss dirt on the burial plot—and only if he brought his own shovel.As coronavirus ravages communities across the globe, rising fatalities and social distancing are upending memorials and sacred rituals around death and dying. That is transforming where and how the living grieve, altering the ways we process loss.“I’ve seen a lot—I’ve experienced horrific things,” Bronstein says. She’s documented wars, earthquakes, typhoons, and famine. But “it didn’t prepare me for sitting in a rental car by myself, having to watch my father’s casket going to the grave.”Across a range of beliefs, loss through death is usually processed communally. But wrestling with death in the age of COVID-19—the illness caused by the coronavirus—has become a largely solitary battle.This spring, for example, in heavily Catholic Bergamo, Italy, the birthplace of Pope John XXIII, people by the hundreds were dying alone. Fear of infection put a halt to wakes and funerals, while caskets were stacked in churches. Crematoriums ran 24 hours a day, but a military convoy still had to cart dozens of the deceased to nearby towns to be cremated.Today, many hospital chaplains are discouraged from approaching dying COVID-19 patients or comforting them by holding hands; doctors and nurses can’t spare limited personal protective equipment for non-lifesaving uses. A hospital on Long Island is now providing small clay molds of victims’ fingerprints as mementos for loved ones who couldn’t sit with dying relatives.And in New York City, where more than 10,000 have now died and bodies are stored in refrigerated trucks, Muslim families often must forgo the traditional washing of the deceased. Instead they tap their hands in dirt and sprinkle it over a body sealed in wrapping.“The sheer number of people passing away is overwhelming every part of the process,” says Imam Khalid Latif, university chaplain and executive director of the Islamic Center of New York University.All this turmoil is leaving mourners around the world with “irreconciled emotions,” he adds.Even those who minister to survivors aren’t sure how to proceed.“This is absolutely new territory,” says Rabbi Elias Lieberman, who led the burial ceremony for Paula’s father. “Quite honestly, I’m still feeling my way through this.”(See how some families are living with coronavirus.)Compounding the confusion, everything is just moving so fast. What’s acceptable one moment is gone the next.In Bronstein’s case, her father’s burial plot is overseen by the Jewish Cemetery Association of Massachusetts, which owns or manages 123 cemeteries in and around Boston. In response to COVID-19, the association closed cemeteries to visitors and tightened rules around burial services just three days before her father died. Lieberman lobbied on the Bronsteins’ behalf, but “representatives of the association were present to make sure the rules were followed,” Lieberman says. “Their primary concern was protecting cemetery workers.”A hearse carries the coffin of George Bronstein, parked in a lot near by the Baker Street Jewish cemetery in Boston. It was the only place that his daughter, Paula, was able to say goodbye and view his body before the funeral, since the memorial chapel was closed to the public due to the coronavirus.The family considered delaying the service until things loosened up, but that could have been weeks or months. While not someone who typically accepts “no” for an answer, Bronstein, in her grief, saw no other option.“We couldn’t even stand in a circle around the grave at the proper social distance,” she says. Instead, her last memory of her father’s face was viewing the open casket from a grave-side parking lot.“It just caused so much pain for our family; it couldn’t have been much worse,” she says. Finding peace “is going to take a while because we just couldn’t do it properly.”That’s a sentiment Lieberman’s friend, Rev. Nell Fields, at Waquoit Congregational Church in eastern Massachusetts, knows well. In March, as social distancing was getting under way, an elderly member of her congregation, a World War II veteran, died. Fields called his family to postpone the funeral. Now, she suspects she may have to put it off once again.“What happens to people emotionally is delayed grief,” Fields says. “They’re in this suspended place where you clearly cannot go back but you can’t go forward. If you think of the grieving process as a stream, it’s going to carry us somewhere. But when that stream is interrupted, you get stuck.”In New Canaan, Connecticut, a family sits shiva, a traditional Jewish time of mourning. Friends and family gather remotely on a Zoom call for their elderly relative, who died of heart failure. Because he died during the COVID-19 pandemic, family members were unable to say goodbye in the hospital or make plans for a funeral.Before coronavirus, people had notions of what a loved one’s funeral might be like. They had expectations.“Then they had the rug pulled out from under them with no warning whatsoever,” she says. “You have to grieve the loss of what you had planned and then wrap your head around what this will look like when we get back together.”It’s not just the rituals that have changed—it’s how we’re passing.Carol LeCompte has spent hours of her life holding people’s hands as they lay dying. A hospital chaplain at Atrium Health Pineville, in Charlotte, North Carolina, she knows that people often fear dying alone more than they fear pain. “The whole thought rattles people to their core,” she says.With coronavirus patients, it’s often the only option.Creative solutions can help One fellow chaplain rigged a phone on a video chat to a pole made for an intravenous drip so family could say their goodbyes to a failing patient. . The call stayed connected for five hours. Now LeCompte’s hospital is waiting for a shipment of iPads so they can offer similar virtual company.And yet despite all the anxiety it’s also possible that how we manage this loss won’t change nearly as much as we expect.Grief and sadness “are highly adaptive,” says George Bonanno, of Teachers College, Columbia University, author of The Other Side of Sadness: What the New Science of Bereavement Tells Us About Life After Loss.After 30 years of studying grief, he has found that, statistically, little alters our response to death. About two-thirds of us largely return to normal after a few months, a quarter struggle for a year or two, and five to 10 percent may need many years to deal with the loss. That’s true for those who’ve lost loved ones to trauma, old age, hurricanes, and medical problems.In study after study, he and his colleagues find “most people deal with their losses really well,” he says. “Most people get over loss in relatively short order. It doesn’t mean they don’t have bouts of sadness or pain. It means we can function. We can work and feel connected to other people.” In grief we need time to turn inward and recalibrate. But “it can happen pretty quickly.”That makes sense from an evolutionary perspective, Bonanno says. If humans wallowed excessively in death, we would not survive. Jane Goodall’s Chimpanzees of Gombe in 1986 repeatedly described depression-like symptoms among young chimps whose mothers had died. While new adult chimpanzee caregivers usually looked after the orphaned monkeys, the most lethargic and sad-seeming youngsters were left to die, Bonanno says. While he concedes it’s often difficult to comprehend emotional states in animals, he suggests that it might be yet another sign that extended bereavement may be detrimental.Helpfully, funerals and memorials in most cultures augment things we do anyway—they allow us to come together, spend time with family, celebrate and reminisce. These gatherings give people a chance to show survivors they care. It lets us paint a picture of the deceased as we want them remembered. If we understand how these rituals help, Bonanno says, we can recreate the important parts for ourselves, even if we have to do it virtually.“We’ve survived all kinds of things, and we will survive this, too,” he says.The very fact that we’re all going through this together might even, eventually, reduce the sting. Four years from now, if you tell someone you lost a family member during the pandemic, they will immediately understand the context and have a sense of what you went through, Bonanno says.“This is a big, shared, historical moment,” he says. That doesn’t mean much to people grieving now, he says, but “I do think it will.”",
"With much of the world facing stay-at-home orders in response to the global pandemic, hundreds of millions of people are suddenly involuntarily engaged in a previously unimaginable experiment. Virtually overnight, we’re trying to figure out how to stay in touch while alone.Social scientists are watching with alarm, worried about the harm this will inflict on some of us: depression, substance abuse, domestic violence. Forty-five percent of Americans say the coronavirus outbreak has taken a toll on their mental health, according to a Kaiser Family Foundation poll. Cigarette and alcohol purchases are up. So, too, are gun sales.But research underway in Seattle, Washington, where I live and where COVID-19 first surfaced in America, suggests many of us are finding our way—at least so far. Washington State’s King County, the region around my home, was one of the first places in the United States to practice social distancing, and scientists are already tracking 500 people. Residents log into their phones and laptops nightly to answer survey questions online: How much did they interact with others today? Do they feel cared for and connected? How outgoing have they been? How hard has it been to rid their thoughts of COVID-19?Nearly a month into one of the earliest social research projects in the wake of the U.S. coronavirus outbreak, “it’s telling a story of resilience and adaptation,” says Adam Kuczynski, a University of Washington graduate student who’s leading the study. “People earlier were seeing a lot of intrusive thoughts—not being able to get it out of their head. . .That’s going down.”We can’t yet say how this period of confinement will change us. Humans need each other to survive. Excessive isolation can weaken the immune system, increase blood pressure, and may even help cancer cells spread. Over time, lack of human contact can be as risky as smoking.Social ties, of course, don’t just protect us. Agustín Fuentes, a University of Notre Dame anthropologist, says we evolved to solve problems together. Our ancestors created stone tools using teamwork and developed glues and dyes to share insights through art. Connecting is central to what makes us human. “It helps keep us alive,” Fuentes says.Pedestrians walk on the empty streets near the Public Market Center in Seattle, Washington.Now those bonds are being strained, but in a way the world has never seen. As harrowing and heartbreaking as this outbreak is, it’s not close to the most devastating diseases that have ravaged the world. It’s not the 1918 Spanish flu pandemic, which killed 20 million to 50 million people, many of them children, just as the world was ending a horrific war. It’s not London in the 1600s, when bubonic plague cycled through every few decades and constables padlocked the houses of victims, leaving healthy inhabitants trapped inside. (Here's how some cities "flattened the curve" in 1918.)We are isolated, and we are quarantined, but today we have Zoom and Xbox and iPhones. We see the world on bike rides or on TikTok. Cat videos are as popular as ever, as are lip-synched Broadway show tunes, the lyrics rewritten for coronavirus. If friends can’t share dinner, they’re sharing lists. Books to read. Bucket lists. To-do lists. Once-mundane treks to the supermarket are major social outings, albeit behind face masks while steering wide of everyone.Across the street from my house a tubby, blond, eight-foot stuffed bear rests on a porch. It’s part of a social media-inspired movement to help cooped-up kids find joy. Children meander sidewalks, giggling with their parents, tallying the number of toy animals we’ve hidden on stoops and in windows—a bear hunt, if you will.Yet much of the larger world is eerily quiet. Trafalgar Square, St. Peter’s Square, Times Square—they’re all empty, or nearly so. Seattle’s Space Needle shuttered weeks ago.A field hospital occupies the soccer field near Seattle where the author's daughter was to have tried out for soccer.I feel that stillness in my own home and it fills me with unease. For half her life, my soccer-obsessed 11-year-old—co-captain of her citywide team, with a poster of U.S. star Megan Rapinoe above her bed—has played or practiced four days a week. Now the only goals she scores are in the yard against dad. The field where she was to try out for next season has become a 200-bed hospital. It has taken until just days ago for her, through tears, to finally ask, “How much longer?” I didn’t know how to answer.The magnitude of all the change can strike at any moment. My neighbor Shannon Campe, usually hard to rattle, has been surprised by her own sudden fragility. A close friend lost her restaurant job, as has that friend’s husband. Two families on our street are in self-quarantine after exposure to sick friends or relatives. Campe’s seventh-grade daughter is pleading to see other kids, but Campe knows her trial has just begun. Overwhelmed, Campe found herself, on April Fool’s Day, sobbing on the sidewalk. “I don’t recognize myself,” she says.Some, of course, have maintained their equanimity. “We’re not too distressed at all,” says James Smith, a 74-year-old retiree, who lives 30 miles south of me in a ranch house in Tacoma. His 93-year-old mother is alone in Los Angeles. His son works as a paramedic. But Smith and his wife aren’t worriers. They watch the news, wipe the mailbox with alcohol, putter in the garden. He says he’s used to life being challenging. “This is just something else we need to get through,” he says. But, he adds, “we’re happy people.”So is my friend Mike Lewis, an AM news radio host who co-owns a Seattle tavern he was forced to close three weeks ago. He’s temperamentally upbeat but conscious enough of his own stress now to know his listeners are grasping too. So he relieves some of his own anxieties by trying to help lighten theirs. He relishes the chance to share silly things, such as the day last month when Chicago’s Shedd Aquarium let the rockhopper penguins—Edward, Annie, and Wellington—loose to waddle through empty halls to spy on marine life from the other side of the glass.“It’s like there’s no handholds anymore,” Lewis says.Distress over social distancing is, of course, normal. “This is our body signaling a need to reconnect,” says Julianna Holt-Lunstad, an expert on the psychology of human connection at Brigham Young University. “Just like hunger signals us to eat, and thirst signals us to drink water, loneliness is thought to be a biological drive that motivates us to reconnect.” (At times, the six-foot barrier between us can feel like a million miles.)But what happens when we can’t? Hospital workers who were isolated after exposure to SARS in 2003 experienced more insomnia, irritability, exhaustion, and detachment than those who were not isolated. Most were quarantined for just a few weeks. Their symptoms, though, sometimes lingered for years.Kuczynski, the University of Washington grad student, began his survey on March 14—the day after Washington Gov. Jay Inslee shut down all schools and the day before he announced he was closing all bars and restaurants. Working with Jonathan Kanter, a psychologist at the University of Washington’s Center for the Science of Social Connection, Kuczynski set out to capture people’s day-to-day experiences when the details were still fresh, before they fell asleep. So every day at 7:30 p.m., their subjects begin answering at least 27 questions, sometimes more. The survey takes about three minutes. They plan to continue it at least 75 days.An expert on socialization and well-being, Kanter was concerned. For people who live alone or with mental illness, such as obsessive-compulsive disorders, social distancing may well bring out the worst. He’s already hearing as much from colleagues. “Most of us will land on our feet,” he says. “But there are groups of people who are more vulnerable and don’t have safety nets.”After hearing that people were putting rainbows in their windows for children to find on walks, the photographer painted some on the window of her apartment in Brooklyn, N.Y.The early results have surprised them both. People, generally, seem to be coping. They expressed solidarity and a sense that they felt cared for even as they obsessed about the virus. Kanter suspects the nearly universal nature of their plight helps. “Even though almost all of the news is bad, there’s something about all of us being in this at the same moment in time which I think is keeping people from falling apart,” he says.Over time, anxiety began leveling off, as did interpersonal conflict. People thought about the virus less each day. People exercised more. “It could be that we’re getting used to this,” Kuczynski says. But then stress ticked back up—on the day that Washington’s governor extended the state’s stay-at-home order to early May.But through it all, despite the generally positive trend, a significant minority have been suffering debilitating anxiety and spikes of sadness. “We ask ‘How lonely do you feel on a scale of 0 to 10?’” Kanter said. By early April the average was still only about 3. But every day there are people answering 0—and people answering 10.Kanter was distressed by that. His initial interest in this research was humble. He hoped to identify who did well, who struggled, and learn why.His outlook now has changed. Last week he started a new project designed, in part, to learn whether there’s a way to alleviate such suffering. He plans to conduct a similar survey nationally for four weeks, but this time during weeks two and three, half of participants will get a daily text message offering evidence-based tips for well-being. (This astronaut has some advice for surviving cramped spaces.)Some will be simple—such as breathing exercises, suggestions for expressing gratitude or reaching out to friends. Other responses will be more involved, offering links to a web page including more detailed information. In some cases, he’ll even urge people to engage a partner in answering a standard set of 36 questions designed to draw people closer, starting with “Given the choice of anyone on earth, who would you want as a dinner companion?”“For many people, their normal social interactions and connections have been disrupted, and loneliness and social disconnection are worries, if not realities,” Kanter says. “We are hoping to reconnect people with the basic dance steps of relationships and connection right now.”",
"Philadelphia detected its first case of a deadly, fast-spreading strain of influenza on September 17, 1918. The next day, in an attempt to halt the virus’ spread, city officials launched a campaign against coughing, spitting, and sneezing in public. Yet 10 days later—despite the prospect of an epidemic at its doorstep—the city hosted a parade that 200,000 people attended.Flu cases continued to mount until finally, on October 3, schools, churches, theaters, and public gathering spaces were shut down. Just two weeks after the first reported case, there were at least 20,000 more.The 1918 flu, also known as the Spanish Flu, lasted until 1920 and is considered the deadliest pandemic in modern history. Today, as the world grinds to a halt in response to the coronavirus, scientists and historians are studying the 1918 outbreak for clues to the most effective way to stop a global pandemic. The efforts implemented then to stem the flu’s spread in cities across America—and the outcomes—may offer lessons for battling today’s crisis. (Get the latest facts and information about COVID-19.)From its first known U.S. case, at a Kansas military base in March 1918, the flu spread across the country. Shortly after health measures were put in place in Philadelphia, a case popped up in St. Louis. Two days later, the city shut down most public gatherings and quarantined victims in their homes. The cases slowed. By the end of the pandemic, between 50 and 100 million people were dead worldwide, including more than 500,000 Americans—but the death rate in St. Louis was less than half of the rate in Philadelphia. The deaths due to the virus were estimated to be about 358 people per 100,000 in St Louis, compared to 748 per 100,000 in Philadelphia during the first six months—the deadliest period—of the pandemic.Dramatic demographic shifts in the past century have made containing a pandemic increasingly hard. The rise of globalization, urbanization, and larger, more densely populated cities can facilitate a virus’ spread across a continent in a few hours—while the tools available to respond have remained nearly the same. Now as then, public health interventions are the first line of defense against an epidemic in the absence of a vaccine. These measures include closing schools, shops, and restaurants; placing restrictions on transportation; mandating social distancing, and banning public gatherings. (This is how small groups can save lives during a pandemic.)Of course, getting citizens to comply with such orders is another story: In 1918, a San Francisco health officer shot three people when one refused to wear a mandatory face mask. In Arizona, police handed out $10 fines for those caught without the protective gear. But eventually, the most drastic and sweeping measures paid off. After implementing a multitude of strict closures and controls on public gatherings, St. Louis, San Francisco, Milwaukee, and Kansas City responded fastest and most effectively: Interventions there were credited with cutting transmission rates by 30 to 50 percent. New York City, which reacted earliest to the crisis with mandatory quarantines and staggered business hours, experienced the lowest death rate on the Eastern seaboard.In 2007, a study in the Journal of the American Medial Association analyzed health data from the U.S. census that experienced the 1918 pandemic, and charted the death rates of 43 U.S. cities. That same year, two studies published in the Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences sought to understand how responses influenced the disease’s spread in different cities. By comparing fatality rates, timing, and public health interventions, they found death rates were around 50 percent lower in cities that implemented preventative measures early on, versus those that did so late or not at all. The most effective efforts had simultaneously closed schools, churches, and theaters, and banned public gatherings. This would allow time for vaccine development (though a flu vaccine was not used until the 1940s) and lessened the strain on health care systems.The studies reached another important conclusion: That relaxing intervention measures too early could cause an otherwise stabilized city to relapse. St. Louis, for example, was so emboldened by its low death rate that the city lifted restrictions on public gatherings less than two months after the outbreak began. A rash of new cases soon followed. Of the cities that kept interventions in place, none experienced a second wave of high death rates. (See photos that capture a world paused by coronavirus.)In 1918, the studies found, the key to flattening the curve was social distancing. And that likely remains true a century later, in the current battle against coronavirus. “[T]here is an invaluable treasure trove of useful historical data that has only just begun to be used to inform our actions,” Columbia University epidemiologist Stephen S. Morse wrote in an analysis of the data. “The lessons of 1918, if well heeded, might help us to avoid repeating the same history today.”",
"NASA astronaut Chris Cassidy gazes out the cupola of the International Space Station in August 2013, during his stint aboard the orbiting laboratory as the Expedition 36 flight engineer.Chris Cassidy is going into quarantine—but for a NASA astronaut preparing to launch to the International Space Station, that’s just part of the routine. Pandemic or not, NASA astronauts are always isolated for two weeks before launch to ensure they don't carry any unwanted bugs to the space station, a process NASA calls "health stabilization." The space agency also said that it is considering testing Cassidy and his crew members for COVID-19 before they fly, just to be sure.On April 9, Cassidy, a U.S. Navy captain and former SEAL, will join cosmonauts Anatoli Ivanishin and Ivan Vagner aboard a Russian Soyuz rocket to launch to the ISS. The trio will live and work on board the space station for six months as part of Expedition 63, which Cassidy will command. The voyage will mark Cassidy’s third trip into space, having logged a total of 182 days in orbit during a 2009 space shuttle flight and a 2013 stay aboard the ISS.In a telephone interview from Star City, Russia, where Cassidy is preparing for launch, the astronaut discussed his upcoming mission—and how a disruption like the COVID-19 pandemic could affect his time in Earth’s orbiting laboratory. (This interview has been edited for length and clarity.)I'm really looking forward to seeing familiar faces—floating through the hatch and seeing Drew and Jessica [NASA astronauts Andrew Morgan and Jessica Meir] and giving them a big hug. That's a great moment. Those emotions, if you see them on TV—the smiles and the laughing—are real. We're friends, colleagues, and coworkers, but also we're humans who are experiencing something super cool together. That first couple hours, I can't wait to experience that.Of course, looking out the window is always fantastic, but we'll have limited handover time [before Morgan and Meir return to Earth], so I just want to soak up their experience for that week before they disappear on me a few days later.Interestingly enough, the preparation has been no different, and the quarantine for us as crewmembers has been very similar to what I'm used to for quarantine. The real weird part is everybody else also being in quarantine. The social distancing concept is not just pertaining to the three crewmembers, but it's everybody.The other part that's not so operational, but more on the support side, is trying to navigate through all the uncertainties of which people will get to come to launch: friends, family, NASA support personnel. All that kind of stuff has been quite dynamic, as I'm sure you've been experiencing in your own life over the last seven days.(laughs) Well, setting a routine, I think, is the biggest thing. We have no choice in that matter; the mission control folks tell us what that routine is going to be. But I have experienced that in the military on deployment. There were times on my Navy deployments where I had a lull in operational activity, and we found that it was really healthy for the group to stay in some sort of normal routine.If everybody just kind of lounges around and doesn't get up until 11:00, and nobody's brushing their hair or their teeth, not only do you look crappy and you feel crappy, but you just get in that funk. So sticking to a Monday-through-Friday routine is probably the most basic thing that I would recommend to folks.In all likelihood, I'll come back to Earth in October, and knock on wood, the pandemic will be kind of behind us, and people will start trying to get back to normal existence, much like in the months after 9/11. It took some time, but eventually, life returned to semi-normal, or a new defined normal.It’ll be this whole spring and summer that will be really interesting for me. I'll be super busy, of course. I'll be mostly by myself on the space station and hopefully welcoming my colleagues Doug Hurley and Bob Behnken, from the SpaceX [Crew Dragon] mission. So I will have a full plate, and my mind will be engaged, but I'm still going to be talking, communicating, and emailing with my family and loved ones and friends. I'll be living vicariously through them.I certainly am not going to be disengaged from it and think, Oh, it's not my problem. It's certainly my problem because my family is living it, and my friends and my coworkers are living it in real time.",
"The SpaceX Crew Dragon spacecraft sits perched atop a Falcon 9 rocket ahead of its March 2 launch from NASA's Kennedy Space Center in Florida.It’s been nearly eight years since astronauts blasted into orbit from a U.S. launch pad—but that might be about to change.Just before 3 a.m. ET on March 2, a rocket carrying SpaceX’s first capsule designed for humans, the Crew Dragon, lifted off from Cape Canaveral, Florida. As with previous Falcon 9 flights, the first-stage reusable rocket booster returned to Earth and stuck its landing on a drone ship 10 minutes after liftoff.To be clear, there is no one inside the capsule right now. It’s merely a test launch, called Demo-1 in NASA lingo, and it’s designed to help scientists and engineers find any bugs in the new hardware and test the system’s operations while in orbit. The successful launch represents a major step on the path toward resuming spaceflight capabilities from the United States. If all goes well with a second test flight later this year, the first SpaceX flight carrying astronauts could lift off as early as July.“This is really a significant achievement in the history of American spaceflight,” NASA administrator Jim Bridenstine said during a broadcast of the launch.With the Crew Dragon now winging its way into orbit, we break down what you need to know about this morning’s fiery milestone.Ripley, a sensor-wearing “anthropomorphic test device” named after Sigourney Weaver’s character in Alien, is making the trip to the ISS and will help engineers assess the conditions inside the crew capsule. In addition, the capsule is carrying a plush stuffed Earth that will indicate when the capsule has reached microgravity, a bunch of dead weight meant to simulate on-board crew and cargo, and roughly 400 pounds of actual cargo for the space station, such as extra hardware and supplies, the Planetary Society reports.“Once Ripley comes back home, she is going to give us all the data, and that’s going to get us one step closer to human spaceflight for everyone,” says SpaceX’s Alireza Farjoud.The Crew Dragon will autonomously dock with the ISS so that astronauts on board can unload their supplies and engineers can make sure the onboard software is up to the challenge. Then, on March 8, it will detach and parachute into the Atlantic Ocean off the Florida coast carrying Ripley and fresh cargo, including scientific research samples that have been on board the station. SpaceX’s recovery ship, called Go Searcher, will retrieve the craft.The SpaceX Falcon 9 rocket carrying the Crew Dragon spacecraft stands ready for launch from Kennedy Space Center, as seen on February 28, 2019.SpaceX’s cargo supply ships have been ferrying items back and forth between Earth and the ISS since 2012. But the Crew Dragon is longer and heavier, and it has three windows that will help passengers enjoy the view. It’s outfitted with seats and can carry up to seven astronauts as well as crucial life-support systems. In addition, eight SuperDraco abort engines give astronauts the ability to escape “an unlikely emergency situation on the launch pad or during ascent,” according to NASA.That could happen as early as July of this year, assuming this test and the next one go well. NASA has assigned astronauts Robert Behnken and Doug Hurley to pilot the inaugural flight.NASA is currently buying seats aboard the Russian Soyuz spacecraft for somewhere around $80 million a ticket; the space agency is also investing in a commercial crew capsule designed by Boeing, called the CST-100 Starliner. The first test launch of Starliner is set for April, and if that and subsequent tests go well, Starliner could carry its first crew into space in August.“NASA continues to work with both Boeing and SpaceX to design, build, test and operate safe, reliable and cost-effective human transportation systems to low-Earth orbit,” Joshua Finch, an agency representative, says in an email.NASA is also working on its own Orion capsule, which is designed to eventually carry astronauts even further into space. If all these craft can begin ferrying astronauts to the space station and back, NASA will presumably cease paying for spots aboard the Soyuz. But that doesn’t necessarily mean cosmonauts and astronauts won’t be sharing rides in the future.“NASA and Roscosmos have and will continue to work closely as partners for the sustainability of human exploration systems. For safe operations of the International Space Station, we have historically flown crews that include both U.S. and Russian crew members,” Finch writes. After all, as the name implies, the space station is made of modules designed and built by multiple countries.“By flying integrated crews," Finch writes, "we ensure [both] a U.S. and Russian crew member are on board to operate the space station.”",
"The space shuttle Discovery lifts off from NASA's Kennedy Space Center in 1984.Since the invention of gunpowder in China more than seven centuries ago, humans have sent cylinders soaring into the skies with the help of controlled explosions. These craft and their engines, called rockets, have taken on many roles as fireworks, signal flares, and weapons of war.But since the 1950s, rockets also have let us send robots, animals, and people into orbit around Earth—and even beyond.As tempting as the logic may be, rockets don't work by “pushing against the air,” since they also function in the vacuum of space. Instead, rockets take advantage of momentum, or how much power a moving object has.If no outside forces act on a group of objects, the group's combined momentum must stay constant over time. Imagine yourself standing on a skateboard with a basketball in your hands. If you throw the basketball in one direction, you and the skateboard will roll in the opposite direction to conserve momentum. The faster you throw the ball, the faster you roll backward.Rockets work by expelling hot exhaust that acts in the same way as the basketball. The exhaust's gas molecules don't weigh much individually, but they exit the rocket's nozzle very fast, giving them a lot of momentum. As a result, the rocket moves in the opposite direction of the exhaust with the same total oomph.Rockets make exhaust by burning fuel in a rocket engine. Unlike airplanes' jet engines, rockets are designed to work in space: They don't have intakes for air, and they bring along their own oxidizers, substances that play the role of oxygen in burning fuel. A rocket's fuel and oxidizer—called propellants—can be either solid or liquid. The space shuttle's side boosters used solid propellants, while many modern rockets use liquid propellants.Today's large, space-bound rockets consist of at least two stages, sections stacked in a shared cylindrical shell. Each stage has its own engines, which can vary in number. The first stage of SpaceX's Falcon 9 rocket has nine engines, while the first stage of Northrop Grumman's Antares rocket has two.A rocket's first stage gets the rocket out of the lower atmosphere, sometimes with the help of extra side boosters. Because the first stage must lift the entire rocket, its cargo (or payload), and any unused fuel, it's the biggest and most powerful section.The faster a rocket goes, the more air resistance it encounters. But the higher the rocket goes, the thinner the atmosphere gets. Combined, these two factors mean that the stress on a rocket rises and then falls during a launch, peaking at a pressure known as max q. For the SpaceX Falcon 9 and the United Launch Alliance Atlas V, max q occurs at 80 to 90 seconds after liftoff, at altitudes between seven and nine miles.Once the first stage has done its job, the rocket drops that portion and ignites its second stage. The second stage has a lot less to transport, and it doesn't have to fight through the thick lower atmosphere, so it usually has just one engine. At this point, rockets also let go of their fairings, the pointed cap at the rocket's tip that shields what the rocket is carrying—its payload—during the launch's first phase.Historically, most of a rocket's discarded parts were left to fall back down to Earth and burn up in the atmosphere. But starting in the 1980s with NASA's space shuttle, engineers designed rocket parts that could be recovered and reused. Private companies including SpaceX and Blue Origin are even building rockets with first stages that return to Earth and land themselves. The more that a rocket's parts can be reused, the cheaper rocket launches can get.Just as automobiles come in many shapes and sizes, rockets vary depending on the jobs they do.Sounding rockets launch high in the air on ballistic arcs, curving into space for five to 20 minutes before they crash back to Earth. They're most often used for scientific experiments that don't need a lot of time in space. For instance, NASA used a sounding rocket in September 2018 to test parachutes for future Mars missions. (Where exactly is the edge of the space?The answer is surprisingly complex.)Suborbital rockets such as Blue Origin's New Shepard are strong enough to temporarily enter space, either for scientific experiments or space tourism. Orbital-class rockets are powerful enough to launch objects into orbit around Earth. Depending on how big the payload is, they also can send objects beyond Earth, such as scientific probes (or sports cars).Ferrying satellites to orbit or beyond requires serious power. For a satellite to remain in a circular orbit 500 miles above Earth's surface, it must be accelerated to more than 16,600 miles an hour. The Saturn V rocket, the most powerful ever built, lifted more than 300,000 pounds of payload into low-Earth orbit during the Apollo missions.For now, SpaceX's Falcon Heavy and United Launch Alliance's Delta IV Heavy are the world's most powerful rockets, but even bigger ones are coming. Once NASA's Space Launch System gets past its delays and cost overruns, it will be the most powerful rocket ever built. Meanwhile, SpaceX is building a test version of its Starship, the massive rocket formerly known as the BFR (Big Falcon Rocket). Russia has also announced its goal of launching a “super-heavy lift” rocket in 2028.As some rocket makers go big, others are going small to service the growing boom in cheap-to-build satellites no bigger than refrigerators. Rocket Labs's Electron rocket can lift just a few hundred pounds into low-Earth orbit, but for the small satellites it's ferrying, that's all the power it needs.A launch pad is a platform from which a rocket is launched, and they're found at facilities called launch complexes or spaceports. (Explore a map of the world's active spaceports.)A typical launch pad consists of a pad and a launch mount, a metal structure that supports the upright rocket before it launches. Umbilical cables from the launch mount provide the rocket with power, cooling liquids, and top-up propellant before launch. The structure also helps shield the rocket from lightning strikes.Different launch complexes have different ways of putting rockets on launch pads. At NASA's Kennedy Space Center, the space shuttle was assembled vertically and moved to the launch pad on a tank-like vehicle called a crawler. The Russian space program transports its rockets horizontally by train to the launch pad, where they're then lifted upright.Launch pads also have features that minimize damage from the rocket's launch. When a rocket first ignites, valves lining the launch pad spray hundreds of thousands of gallons of water into the air around the exhaust, which helps lessen the rocket's deafening roar. Trenches beneath the launch pad also direct the rocket's exhaust out and away from the craft, so the flames can't rise back up and engulf the rocket itself.There are many launch sites around the world, each with different pros and cons. In general, the closer a launch site is to the Equator, the more efficient it is. That's because the Equator moves faster than Earth's poles as the planet rotates, like the outer edge of a spinning record. Launch sites at higher latitudes more easily place satellites into orbits that pass over the poles.Between 1957 and 2017, 29 spaceports sent satellites or humans into orbit. Many of the sites are still active, including the only three facilities ever to launch humans into orbit. More spaceports are on the way, both public and private. In 2018, the U.S.-New Zealand firm Rocket Labs launched satellites into orbit from its own private launchpad on New Zealand's Mahia Peninsula.In the United States, NASA's Kennedy Space Center regularly offers access to visitors. NASA's Wallops Flight Facility in Virginia also allows launch viewing from its visitor center. The European Space Agency's spaceport in French Guiana is open to visitors, but the agency encourages travelers to plan ahead. Tourists can visit Kazakhstan's Baikonur Cosmodrome, the storied home of the Soviet and Russian space programs, but only by booking a tour. The facility remains closely guarded. (See pictures of the villages near Russia's Plesetsk Cosmodrome, where salvaging discarded rockets is a way of life.)If you can't visit a spaceport in person, never fear: Many public space agencies and private companies offer online livestreams of their launches.",
"The skies above Earth are teeming with more than 8,000 manmade objects, large and small. The U.S. Space Surveillance Network uses radar to track more than 13,000 such items that are larger than four inches (ten centimeters). This celestial clutter includes everything from the International Space Station (ISS) and the Hubble Space Telescope to defunct satellites, rocket stages, or nuts and bolts left behind by astronauts. And there are millions of smaller, harder-to-track objects such as flecks of paint and bits of plastic.For half a century, humans have been putting satellites into orbit around Earth to serve a variety of functions. The Soviets launched the first, Sputnik 1, in October of 1957 just to prove they could. Four months later, the U.S. responded with Explorer 1.Since then, some 2,500 satellites have been sent aloft. These include Hubble and the ISS, the Russian Mir space station, the 27-satellite Global Positioning System, Iridium, GOES, Voyager, and hundreds of others that provide communications, broadcast television and radio signals, and help scientists predict weather, among many other purposes.These man-made objects circle Earth in orbits that range from as near as 150 miles (240 kilometers) to 22,500 miles (36,200 kilometers) away. Satellites in low-Earth orbit, or LEO, stay within 500 miles (800 kilometers) and travel extremely fast—17,000 miles an hour (27,400 kilometers an hour) or more—to keep from being drawn back into Earth's atmosphere. Most satellites around Earth are found in the LEO range.Other objects are sent much farther into space and placed in what is called geosynchronous orbit. This allows the satellite to match the Earth's rotation and "hover" over the same spot at all times. Weather and television satellites are generally in this category.Orbital debris, the technical term for nonfunctional and human-made space junk, includes not only whole, abandoned satellites, but also pieces of broken satellites, nosecone shrouds, hatch covers, deployed rocket bodies, human waste, and other random objects, like the glove lost by astronaut Ed White during his historic 1965 spacewalk. The oldest known piece of orbital debris is the 1958 Vanguard 1 research satellite, which ceased all functions in 1964. One of the newest is a refrigerator-size ammonia reservoir released into its own orbit in July 2007, following a NASA decision that no other disposal options were feasible.Like satellites, LEO debris whizzes around the planet at 17,000 miles an hour (27,400 kilometers an hour) or more. The orbits of these objects differ in direction, orbital plane, and speed, however—meaning collisions are inevitable. At such speeds, termed hypervelocity, even a miniscule piece of junk presents a serious hazard for satellites, spacecraft, and spacewalking astronauts.Gravitational pull will ensure that anything we've ever put in orbit will eventually make its way back to Earth. And though thus far no one has ever been killed by reentering space debris, NASA estimates on average one piece returns to Earth each day.NASA and other national space agencies have identified orbital debris as a serious problem and are currently devising plans to mitigate existing space junk and curb future debris.",
"If weather conditions are favorable, returning space shuttles land at Kennedy Space Center. Florida storms, however, frequently divert the shuttle to Edwards Air Force Base in California. The shuttle then hitches a ride back to Florida on one of two commercial Boeing 747 airplanes modified for space shuttle piggybacking. Officially called shuttle carrier aircraft, the planes are bolstered with struts, stabilizers, and electronic monitors.NASA's space shuttle was unlike any other spacecraft built during the 30 years the program was in operation. Unlike the much smaller capsules of the Apollo era, which launched on the tips of rockets and splashed back into the ocean, the jetliner-size shuttle was designed to streak into space using powerful boosters and return to solid ground as a glider. The craft’s aerodynamic winged shape allowed it to descend through the atmosphere and touch down on a runway, much like a commercial airplane.While in orbit, the space shuttle circled the planet at some 17,500 miles (28,000 kilometers) an hour, which means that the crew could see a sunrise or sunset every 45 minutes.NASA's space shuttle was unlike any other spacecraft built during the 30 years the program was in operation.Unlike the much smaller capsules of the Apollo era, which launched on the tips of rockets and splashed back into the ocean, the jetliner-size shuttle was designed to streak into space using powerful boosters and return to solid ground as a glider. The craft's aerodynamic winged shape allowed it to descend through the atmosphere and touch down on a runway, much like a commercial airplane.While in orbit, the space shuttle circled the planet at some 17,500 miles (28,000 kilometers) an hour, which means that the crew could see a sunrise or sunset every 45 minutes.After liftoff from Florida's John F. Kennedy Space Center, a typical space shuttle mission lasted ten days to two weeks and included a full schedule of scientific experiments and technological maintenance. Astronauts performed a variety of tasks aloft, including satellite repair and construction of the International Space Station. Each of the shuttles was specially equipped for such functions, most notably with a large cargo bay and a robotic manipulator arm.On April 12, 1981, John Young and Robert Crippen launched the space shuttle program by piloting Columbia to space and returning successfully two days later.In 1983 space shuttle astronaut Sally Ride became the first U.S. woman in space as part of the Challenger crew.The program was a tremendous success for NASA, but it also endured several tragedies. A string of successful missions was broken in 1986 when Challenger disintegrated seconds after liftoff, killing its seven-person crew.The space shuttle program was suspended in the wake of the accident, and no shuttles were launched for nearly three years. The program rebounded in April 1990 with the successful mission of Discovery.Astronauts on this momentous flight placed the Hubble Space Telescope into orbit. This incredible imaging device has subsequently added much to our understanding of the cosmos while returning otherworldly images that bring the universe to life.In 1995 the space shuttle Atlantis successfully docked at the Russian space station Mir, bringing the two great space programs closer together in an era of cooperation that stood in marked contrast to the early days of the space race.Tragedy struck again in February 2003 when the program lost its second shuttle: Columbia disintegrated over Texas just 16 minutes before its scheduled landing, and all seven crew members were lost.Despite this heartbreaking setback, the space shuttle was flying regularly again by 2006. In February 2008 Atlantis delivered the European Space Agency's Columbus laboratory to the ISS. And in February 2010 Endeavour brought up the Cupola, a robotic control station with seven windows that provides the ISS crew with a 360-degree view.In 2004, U.S. President George W. Bush announced that the space shuttles would be retired. The final flight came to a close when Atlantis touched down at Kennedy Space Center on July 21, 2011. The three remaining orbiters and the prototype shuttle, Enterprise, are now be housed in museums in California, Florida, New York, and Virginia.For its next phase of manned space exploration, NASA is designing and building the spacecraft needed to send humans deeper into the solar system, working toward a goal of putting people on Mars. The Multi-Purpose Crew Vehicle, for example, is being developed to take four astronauts on 21-day missions. NASA is also developing the Space Launch System, an advanced heavy-lift launch vehicle designed for human exploration beyond Earth's orbit.In addition, the space agency is partnering with private companies such as Space Exploration Technologies Corporation, or SpaceX, to launch commercial vehicles to the ISS-and perhaps beyond.",
"The moon seems to hang in the balance between Earth's atmosphere and the blackness of space in a picture taken from the International Space Station.Ask someone where outer space is, and they’ll probably point at the sky. It’s up, right? Simple.Except, no one really knows where “air space” ends and “outer space” begins. That might sound trivial, but defining that boundary could matter for a variety of reasons—including, but not limited to, which high-flying humans get to be designated as astronauts.Now, with Virgin Galactic seemingly on the cusp of launching paying passengers onto suborbital trajectories, many people are wondering whether those lucky space tourists will earn their astronaut wings. As of right now, they will, according to U.S. practices.Is that a problem? “No, I think it’s great!” says NASA astronaut Mike Massimino, who helped repair the Hubble Space Telescope.Here, we take a look at the ways space is currently defined, the confusion surrounding the demarcation, and what the future might bring.International treaties define “space” as being free for exploration and use by all, but the same is not true of the sovereign airspace above nations. The laws governing air space and outer space are different; flying a satellite 55 miles above China is just fine if space begins at 50 miles up, but define the edge at 60 miles, and you might find your satellite being treated as an act of military aggression.“Where does a country’s air space stop and space begin?” asks Jonathan McDowell of the Harvard-Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics. “Once you agree on a boundary of space, you agree on a boundary where space law applies.”However, the United States and some other countries have resisted a formal, international delimitation of space, stating that it’s not necessary and that “no legal or practical problems have arisen in the absence of such a definition.” Others argue that maintaining a distinct boundary will be crucial, given an increase in the number of national space programs and in private spaceflight endeavors that are boosting the amount of suborbital traffic.Broadly, most experts say that space starts at the point where orbital dynamic forces become more important than aerodynamic forces, or where the atmosphere alone is not enough to support a flying vessel at suborbital speeds.Historically, it’s been difficult to pin that point at a particular altitude. In the 1900s, Hungarian physicist Theodore von Kármán determined the boundary to be around 50 miles up, or roughly 80 kilometers above sea level. Today, though, the Kármán line is set at what NOAA calls “an imaginary boundary” that’s 62 miles up, or roughly a hundred kilometers above sea level.The Federation Aeronautique Internationale (FAI), which keeps track of standards and records in astronautics and aeronautics, also defines space as beginning a hundred kilometers up. It is, after all, a nice round number.But the Federal Aviation Administration, the U.S. Air Force, NOAA, and NASA generally use 50 miles (80 kilometers) as the boundary, with the Air Force granting astronaut wings to flyers who go higher than this mark. At the same time, NASA Mission Control places the line at 76 miles (122 kilometers), because that is “the point at which atmospheric drag becomes noticeable,” Bhavya Lal and Emily Nightingale of the Science and Technology Policy Institute write in a 2014 review article.“It’s very political, it turns out,” McDowell says.There is no easy distinction between “space” and “not space,” in part because Earth’s atmosphere doesn’t simply vanish; rather, it gradually becomes thinner and thinner over about 600 miles. Technically, the International Space Station—which orbits at an average height of 240 miles—would not be in space if we defined “space” as the absence of an atmosphere.Furthermore, there’s no single altitude above which a satellite can stably remain in orbit; that depends on the type of satellite and its orbital trajectory, McDowell says.A prodigious maker of lists, McDowell was compiling records for rockets, astronauts, and other space objects, and he went looking for an accepted international boundary that would help him decide which records to include. When he realized none existed, he decided to find one by revisiting the types of calculations von Kármán did.He pulled publicly available orbital paths for 43,000 satellites and sorted them based on the lowest points in their orbits (called perigee) during decommissioning and atmospheric re-entry. From there, he realized that satellites could orbit the planet numerous times below an altitude of 62 miles, but those dipping beneath 50 miles met a quick and flaming end more often than not.After that, he redid the von Kármán math and found that atmospheric contributions on orbiting spacecraft become negligible at around 50 miles up.“What you don’t see is satellites dipping down to 70 and coming back out,” he says. “There is a fairly sharp boundary, a decently sharp boundary, between how low the perigee can be and where you just won’t make it back out again.”McDowell thinks that’s unlikely, although he’s sure the conversation will pick up speed as commercial spaceflight ventures begin spending more time in the region between 50 miles and 200 miles up, where the space station orbits.“I think that as space activity moves more into this regime, the pressure to agree on a boundary will be greater,” he says.In fact, the FAI says that because of “compelling” recent analyses suggesting that space ought to begin around 50 miles up, it will propose a meeting this coming year to evaluate the idea.As of now, yes, at least if they make the trip from a U.S. launch site. The FAA and the U.S. Air Force both agree that flying higher than 50 miles above our planet qualifies a person for the title. (See where active spaceports exist around the world.)Some people might argue that getting into orbit is what defines an astronaut. However, “I think Alan Shepard and Gus Grissom would disagree,” says Terry Virts, a former commander of the International Space Station who has spent more than 213 days in orbit. “They’re the first two U.S. astronauts who didn’t get into orbit.”Virts says there’s a big difference between riding along on a five-minute suborbital flight and performing a six-month orbital mission, but when it comes down to it, folks on both types of trips have earned the “astronaut” title.“If you’re strapping your butt to a rocket, I think that’s worth something,” Virts says. “When I was an F-16 pilot, I didn’t feel jealous about Cessna pilots being called pilots. I think everybody’s going to know if you paid to be a passenger on a five-minute suborbital flight or if you’re the commander of an interplanetary space vehicle. Those are two different things.”Massimino agrees that there’s an important distinction between being selected as a NASA astronaut—“the training, the struggle, the rejections, all of that”—and being a paying customer. But he’s also completely on board with space tourists earning the title.“I think if you get above that line, you certainly qualify as an astronaut, absolutely,” he says. “The more the merrier!”After three failed launches, SpaceX CEO Elon Musk scraped together enough funding to launch a fourth version of SpaceX's Falcon 1 rocket. On September 28, 2008, Musk's gamble paid off when the Falcon 1 became the first privately developed liquid-fuel rocket to orbit Earth. The rocket is seen here lifting off from the Reagan Test Site in the Marshall Islands.",
"Astroanuts take a spacewalk outside the International Space Station, which has been continuously occupied by rotating crews since November 2000.Flying some 240 miles above Earth's surface at 17,500 miles an hour, the International Space Station (ISS) is a science laboratory dedicated to helping humans learn how to live in space. Crucially, that means figuring out how the space environment affects biology–and human bodies, especially. Other onboard experiments are aimed at better understanding how the cosmos works, from the highest-energy particles that streak through our solar system to the faraway, extremely dense corpses of former stars.Continuously occupied by rotating crews since November 2000, the space station is the work of five space agencies: NASA, Russia’s Roscosmos, the European Space Agency, the Japanese Aerospace Exploration Agency, and the Canadian Space Agency. Hundreds of spacefarers have visited the ISS—primarily professional space travelers, although a handful of space tourists have also made the journey. Here’s how the ISS came to be and what scientists hope to learn from experiments conducted there.In the mid-1980s, President Ronald Reagan directed NASA to build an international space station within a decade, declaring that it would “permit quantum leaps” in science research. First, the U.S. partnered with Europe and Japan; it then invited Russia into the enterprise in 1993 because that nation had the most extensive experience operating orbital space stations. By 1998, all five space agencies were on board with the project.The ISS was conceived as a series of linked, cylindrical modules that are solar powered and cooled by loops that radiate heat. These are divided among the station’s two larger segments: the Russian Orbital Segment, operated by Russia, and the U.S. segment, which includes contributions from many countries.Construction began in November 1998, when the first piece of the eventual ISS structure—the Russian Zarya Control Module—was autonomously delivered to orbit by a Proton rocket. Named using the Russian word for “sunrise,” the Zarya module originally provided power, communications, and altitude control functions and is now primarily used for storage and propulsion. Two weeks later, astronauts aboard the space shuttle Endeavour delivered one of the major U.S. components, Unity, a module that now connects the Russian and U.S. segments of the station. The first crew to inhabit the station arrived on November 2, 2000, and included cosmonauts Yuri Gidzenko and Sergei Krikalev, and NASA astronaut Bill Shepherd.The station today spans the area of a U.S. football field and is typically occupied by at least three astronauts, or as many as six. Construction is still ongoing, with Russia getting ready to send a new science module to the station.Both the U.S. and Russian segments of the ISS generate power and host laboratories, living spaces, and docking ports. Astronauts can move between the segments, which are connected to a larger structural truss that holds the station’s solar arrays and thermal radiators. Also attached to that truss is Canadarm2—a Canadian-built apparatus that functions as a large, remote-controlled space crane used to do a range of tasks, from moving equipment to capturing inbound spacecraft.On the U.S. side, the single largest module is Kibo, a Japanese science laboratory space with an external “porch” that is used for experiments in the vacuum of space. The nearby Node 3, or Tranquility module, houses the European-built cupola that affords astronauts unforgettable views of planet Earth. In 2016, NASA attached an inflatable habitat—the Bigelow Expandable Activity Module—to the space station for the first time, perhaps paving the way for future inflatable space hotels and tourist destinations.Everything on Earth evolved to thrive in its home environment and not the alien surroundings of space, which can challenge lifeforms in surprising ways. The space station is by far the best place to practice living and working in these unfamiliar conditions, and to better understand how space affects our complex biology.Most importantly, surviving in space means dealing with microgravity (the near-absence of gravity) and increased radiation exposure— two conditions that can dramatically impact biological functions. Life in orbit also means tolerating a small, closed environment, limited human contact, and high-pressure situations that might require rapid teamwork to survive.Crews must adapt to an existence in which the sun rises and sets as many as 16 times a day. Getting a good night’s sleep requires securing themselves to a non-floating object. Intense daily exercise is crucial for maintaining healthy bones and combatting microgravity-induced muscular atrophy. And astronauts have to contend with a variety of conditions that arise when there’s literally no up or down—problems with balance and orientation, changes in blood circulation and fluid distribution, and a strange and mostly unexplained deterioration in eyesight.Increased radiation exposure means a higher risk of developing various cancers. Teams on the ground are currently designing spacesuits to shield long-duration space travelers from potentially destructive cosmic particles.The crew is also occupied with a full suite of scientific experiments designed to help humans figure out how to live in space permanently. These include growing plants and human tissues in microgravity, seeing how microbes respond to the space environment, studying how space affects DNA and gene expression, and learning whether normal reproduction is even possible (the jury is still out).Although the bulk of research done on the station is focused on learning more about surviving in space, experiments outside of the space station are peering into the cosmos and attempting to learn more about the environment in which spacefaring humans might live. One of these instruments, called NICER, is studying neutron stars, stellar corpses that are the densest objects in the known universe. Another, the Alpha Magnetic Spectrometer, is a particle physics experiment that is attempting to snare and analyze cosmic rays, the most fundamental components of the cosmos, to better understand the origins of the universe.In recent years, U.S. astronauts have typically spent between three and six months on board the ISS, but the longest continual stay lasted nearly one year—a milestone achieved in 2016 by NASA astronaut Scott Kelly and his Russian colleague, cosmonaut Mikhail Kornienko. Back on Earth, teams are simulating these environments and studying the psychological challenges associated with isolation, in an attempt to better understand who might be best suited for space flights of even longer duration.Until 2011, astronauts were ferried to the station by the U.S. space shuttles and the Russian Soyuz spacecraft. After the U.S. retired the space shuttle program, Soyuz became the only ride into orbit—until private company SpaceX successfully flew a crewed mission to the station in May 2020.Piloted by NASA astronauts Doug Hurley and Bob Behnken, this crucial test flight departed the station in early August, ending in a safe and successful splashdown off the western coast of Florida. Now, astronauts can once again launch into orbit from U.S. shores; and NASA’s new reliance on private companies could, in theory, foster competition that might drive down prices and open up travel to the ISS to a broader swath of humanity.For now, plans include operating the space station through at least 2024, although that timeline could be extended.",
"Today, when SpaceX’s Falcon 9 rocket blasts off from Cape Canaveral, it will be boosting the rough equivalent of an inflatable bouncy house to space – a type of inhabitable module that could ultimately be used to construct a space hotel or habitat.And really, what could be better than a bouncy house in space? It’s like the ultimate Airbnb.Ok, fine. The Bigelow Expandable Activity Module isn’t exactly like the inflatable castles you can temporarily park in your yard, but it’s pretty darn close, conceptually. Designed to expand after unpacking, the module, when inflated, will resemble a hollow, crinkled marshmallow with rounded edges.And inside, where someone could theoretically live, it’ll actually be rather spacious. The 3,000-pound prototype launching today is smaller than the envisioned double-decker version of the future, but it’s still bigger than some San Francisco living spaces. When packed, BEAM measures just 7 feet long by 7 feet wide – somewhat shorter than a Smart car, but a little bit taller – and after being pumped full of air from the International Space Station, it’ll be 13 feet long and 10.5 feet in diameter.Ultimately, the idea is to string a bunch of these things together like Legos and create a habitat in space, on Mars, on the moon, wherever. After all, it’s much easier to collapse a tent and squish it into a backpack than it is to port the thing fully assembled.It’s an appealingly practical idea, though having a thin layer of material as the only buffer between fragile biology and a hostile vacuum is somewhat unsettling (that flexible layer, however, is made of Kevlar-like materials and is strong enough to withstand an attack from rogue space debris, company president Robert Biglow told Florida Today).So.“Would you go to an inflatable hotel in space?” I asked planetary scientist Paul Abell, one of my hosts on a recent tour of NASA’s Johnson Space Center, where I had a chance to see a training replica of the BEAM prototype.“Oh yeah – without a doubt,” Abell said.Me, too, I thought, while eyeing the module in the Space Vehicle Mockup Facility. This is where astronauts train for missions using replicas of the ISS, Soyuz capsule, Space Shuttle, and other spacecraft. I’m told that astronauts used the exact BEAM module I’m looking at to train for hatch interaction, deployment, and sensor retrieval.It’s actually not the first time something like this has hitched a ride into orbit. In 2006 and 2007, Bigelow’s expandable Genesis I and II modules blasted off from Russia. Genesis I carried, among other things, a cache of Mexican jumping beans. And tucked inside Genesis II were a variety of bugs – ants, Madagascar hissing cockroaches, and scorpions from South Africa. The bugs are probably long dead (if not, yikes), but both modules are still in good shape and are orbiting the Earth, destined to re-enter the atmosphere sometime in the next decade.The module launched today will experience a similarly low-key fate, bugs not included. It won’t house any space tourists, and will only occasionally feel the presence of astronauts. After the crew on board the International Space Station inflates it sometime in May (most likely), it’ll hang out for two years, serving as a demonstration that such habitats are capable of handling long-duration exposures to space.Someday, I would love to visit one of these inflatable modules in space. I imagine it’ll be way better than my already awesome first experience in a bounce house, which didn’t happen until disappointingly later in life, when I was 18 and about to take off for college. My parents decided the occasion merited a party, and I decided to go all unintentionally hipster and see if we could temporarily install a bounce house in the backyard.“What kind of house do you want?” they asked, pointing out the variety of castles and other available designs.“Ummm, the space station one,” I replied. Obviously.",
"NASA Astronaut Kate Rubins works on the Biomolecule Sequencer experiment aboard the International Space Station. A space-based DNA sequencer could one day identify microbes, diagnose diseases, and potentially help detect DNA-based life elsewhere in the solar system.No one wants to risk a contagion in space. Returning home can be tricky, medical supplies are limited, crews cannot treat every complication that might arise, and a single infected astronaut could jeopardize an entire mission.That’s especially true for any future human missions to Mars, in which an astronaut with the sniffles would be at least 33 million miles from the nearest commercial pharmacy. And while astronauts headed into space already take a ton of precautions to reduce the risk of illness, what happens if we get to the red planet and find a whole new source of infections?No one knows whether Mars harbors microbial life today. But if the planet is inhabited by more than mere robots, those creatures could be very well be single-celled organisms tucked underground, where they’d be sheltered from harsh radiation and possibly thriving near buried geothermal systems that provide water, nutrients, and energy.The problem is that people might also want to tap into the planet’s subterranean resources, which could expose them to potential Martian germs. And based on studies of earthly microbes, there are worrying signs that some bacteria behave especially weirdly in space. Understanding how these host-pathogen reactions change during spaceflight is crucial for long-duration voyages, like the months to years it would take to complete a human mission to Mars.“We better figure out what the microbes are doing in response to the spaceflight environment before you just send humans up there for long-term flight,” says Cheryl Nickerson of Arizona State University.In the 1960s and ‘70s, at least two Apollo missions were affected by sick crew members. In 1968, Apollo 7 commander Wally Schirra came down with a head cold 15 hours after launch. He promptly shared it with his increasingly cranky and irritated crewmates and fueled what’s been described as “a mini-mutiny.”Later, before the infamous Apollo 13 mission launched in 1970, at least one scheduled crew member was replaced because of measles exposure. Then, during flight, a urinary tract infection bloomed in crew member Fred Haise, went painfully untreated, and progressed to a longer-term kidney infection.To reduce the risk of off-world illnesses today, space agencies first quarantine their astronauts. Current NASA guidelines dictate that seven days before launch, astronauts enter a facility where contact is limited to approved family members and support personnel. In practice, that may still add up to between 40 and 50 people, says astronaut Samantha Cristoforetti, who has been quarantined at the Baikonur Cosmodrome in Kazakhstan.“Many people are with us in quarantine,” she says. “We interact with other people occasionally—we should avoid physical contact, and they wear surgical masks.”During that period, doctors routinely assess astronauts and their contacts for symptoms of infection, such as fever or a sore throat.“While it may not sound very exciting, we’re concerned about everyday infectious diseases such as the common cold or influenza, because these are the most prevalent pathogens,” Robert Mulcahy, a physician at NASA’s Johnson Space Center, writes in an email. “We would not want something like a cold to impair the flight crew’s performance during critical operations such as launch and docking.”Similar procedures apply to astronauts headed into space via Russia’s Soyuz capsule, which launches from Kazakhstan. But Mulcahy and his colleagues are currently working on updating NASA’s quarantine requirements, which are presented in what’s known as the agency’s Health Stabilization Plan, to support commercial crew and future NASA missions launching from the United States.Proposed edits include increasing the quarantine period from seven to 14 days, increasing the restrictions on direct contact between astronauts and guests, and requiring additional vaccinations for non-astronaut personnel working in the facility.“We’ve seen a resurgence of vaccine-preventable diseases such as measles in the general U.S. population,” Mulcahy says, “so it is important to ensure a low risk of exposure to these conditions in the quarantine period.”Protecting astronauts from preflight disease exposure is one thing, but what about the microorganisms that ultimately do hitch a ride into space, whether inside or outside of a human?For decades, scientists have been studying how humans and microbes respond to microgravity, which might also be relevant to the lower gravity experienced on Mars. While the exact mechanisms governing those responses are not yet fully understood, observations suggest that spaceflight alters the ongoing arms race between infectious microbes and immune systems, potentially tipping the scales in favor of infection.A self-portrait of the Mars rover Curiosity.Being in lower gravity can weaken the human immune system and make us more susceptible to disease, according to this research. At the same time, microgravity also appears to change how microbes respond to stresses, in some cases boosting their disease-causing potential and their resistance to countermeasures. Dozens of studies, conducted both in space and in simulated microgravity on Earth, suggested that spaceflight affects how some bacteria respond to their environmental.“It was actually quite surprising to see a change in virulence for a microorganism in spaceflight,” Nickerson says. Her lab has demonstrated that a particular strain of Salmonella Typhimurium, which is responsible for nasty food-borne illnesses in humans, becomes more virulent after spending time in microgravity.In 2006, they sent Salmonella into orbit aboard the space shuttle Atlantis. While Nickerson and her team grew cultures on Earth, astronauts grew Salmonella in space. When the shuttle returned to Earth, Nickerson infected mice with Salmonella that had stayed on Earth and Salmonella that went into orbit.The result? Spaceflight had increased Salmonella’s virulence, helping it kill mice faster and at lower doses. But, Nickerson is careful to note, the effect was transient.“This was a short-duration experiment,” she says. “This was not a permanent, heritable change. The bacteria were simply adapting to their environment, and when you take them out of that environment, they change how they’re adapting. … That’s what bacteria do for a living, that’s what they do when they infect us anywhere.”Further work revealed that microgravity mimics an environmental signal that Salmonella normally encounter—namely, a decrease in the amount of force generated by liquids moving over the cells’ surface, which signals to the cells that it is time to begin infection. On Earth, that relative calm might occur in a nice, protected pocket of lung or intestine, but in space, it’s basically everywhere.“No one had shown that before,” Nickerson says. “No one had thought about a physical force changing the virulence or pathogenicity of an organism.”But so far, Salmonella is the only microbe in which a spaceflight-induced increase in virulence has been demonstrated in a live animal. But numerous other studies have suggested that spaceflight changes microbial growth, size, metabolism, antimicrobial resistance, and other characteristics.These experiments, done both in space and in simulated microgravity, tested well-known microbes such as E. coli, Yersinia pestis (the culprit behind plague), Streptococcus mutans, Staphylococcus aureus, Bacillus subtilis, and Candida albicans, the fungus responsible for yeast infections. Some of these studies suggest that other microbes might become virulent in microgravity, while others point to the opposite or no response.“Multiple experiments over the past 50 years have indicated unique microbial responses when microorganisms are cultured during spaceflight, including changes in growth kinetics, antibiotic resistance, and biofilm formation,” reports NASA’s Mark Ott.Biofilms, notably, can present major problems both for human health and environmental systems. These conglomerates of microbes latch onto surfaces and grow synergistically, forming complex layered structures that can boost the bugs’ resistance to immune defenses and environmental insults. As a result, they are notoriously difficult to treat inside humans and are responsible for clogging and degrading crucial space station infrastructure.“The majority of bacteria in nature exist in surface-associated microbial communities,” Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute’s Cynthia Collins and colleagues wrote in a recent paper. “Abundant biofilms were found in the Russian Mir space station and were responsible for increased corrosion and a blocked water purification system.”In 2011, Collins and her colleagues sent Pseudomonas aeruginosa—the microbe responsible for astronaut Fred Haise’s inflight discomfort—into space aboard the space shuttle Atlantis. There, Pseudomonas readily grew into biofilms that were thicker and more massive than their Earth-based counterparts and they exhibited what scientists described as “a column-and-canopy structure that has not been observed on Earth.”Based on other studies, not only are bacteria growing in space, but changes in their growth and behavior might be making the microbes more difficult to kill. E.coli, in particular, has shown a pronounced increase in antibiotic resistance while in orbit, a result derived from an experiment performed in 1982 aboard the Soviet space station Salyut 7.More recently, astronauts Terry Virts and Jeff Williams swabbed eight surfaces inside the International Space Station—including the dining table, crew quarters, and the waste and hygiene compartment—and sent the swabs back to Earth for culturing.“The ISS is not a sterile environment,” Mulcahy says. “The astronauts perform regular cleaning, just like you would at home.”When a group based at the Jet Propulsion Laboratory grew microorganisms from those cultures and sequenced their genes, they found that many of the cultures, including nine pathogenic organisms, exhibited resistance to multiple antibiotics, including penicillin. Sequencing also revealed the potential for resistance to additional antibiotics, although that has not yet been experimentally verified, nor has spaceflight been proven to be the culprit in boosting resistance.Still, even if modern Mars is barren and lifeless after all, keeping any future human habitations clean will be key, as will understanding the best ways to battle earthly germs that might flourish in microgravity.“Can you figure out everything in advance? No, we don’t know the vast majority of why pathogens cause disease down here on Earth,” Nickerson says. “But it’s incredibly important. Microbes rule our world; we’re just playing in it.”",
"Astronaut Scott Kelly (right) sits with his twin brother, former astronaut Mark Kelly, at a media briefing in January 2015.If you believe recent news, NASA astronaut Scott Kelly went to space, spent a year there, and came back with substantial changes to his DNA. Some outlets are even reporting that a whopping seven percent of Kelly’s genes—segments of DNA that code for various proteins—are “abnormal” post-spaceflight.Unfortunately, even Kelly appears to be surprised by the news.“What? My DNA changed by 7%! Who knew? I just learned about it in this article. This could be good news! I no longer have to call [Mark Kelly] my identical twin brother anymore,” Scott Kelly tweeted.Well, and we hate to spoil the fun, but no. The story Kelly is referring to, and many more, misrepresent the results of a study NASA commissioned on the effects of spaceflight by confusing changes in genetic sequence with changes in gene expression levels.That study, which involves multiple independent research groups, compared Scott with his twin brother Mark (also a NASA astronaut) and looked for changes caused while Scott spent a year aboard the International Space Station, a mission that ended in March 2016. Among the dimensions surveyed were cognitive ability, immune system function, and genetics.The space agency says that papers detailing the findings will be published later this year, and for now, the press is mostly relying on some vague wording and other information contained in a NASA release.“I, too, am concerned about how the stories coming out are being sensationalized,” says Colorado State University’s Susan Bailey, who leads one of the research groups studying the twins.So, no, seven percent of Kelly’s DNA is not mutated after his year in space, which makes sense if you keep in mind that humans and chimps have genetic sequences that differ by less than 2 percent, and individual humans—even completely unrelated strangers—differ by about 0.1 percent.Here’s how this works.Genetic sequences are like strings of letters arranged just so, and they are in charge of producing proteins. Mutate the wrong letter, or sequence of letters, and it can be mildly annoying, like our favorite ducking autocorrect, or it can be extremely bad news, like the mutations that allow tumors to proliferate. Most mutations, however, go unnoticed (the one that confer superpowers are a different story).Expression levels, on the other hand, reflect whether genes are turned on or turned off. Within each of us, most of our cells are otherwise genetically identical, but their genes are expressed at different levels. It’s those patterns of expression that produce hearts, brains, eyeballs, and other things, kind of like using the same set of ingredients to cook up vastly different dishes.The NASA result everyone is freaking out about actually measured Scott Kelly’s expression levels, and it found that—not surprisingly—spaceflight affects how much expressing certain genes do, particularly those involved in immune function, DNA repair pathways, and bone growth.“Seven percent of the genes that changed their expression during spaceflight were still altered after six months back on Earth,” says Weill Cornell Medicine’s Christopher Mason, who led the analysis.That these levels of expression haven’t boomeranged to pre-spaceflight values is humongously different than saying Kelly’s DNA didn’t “return to normal after a sojourn in space.”“We had no idea what to expect, and this is the first experiment of its kind, so this sets the bar for future studies of astronauts,” Mason says. “Nonetheless, this number is likely within the range for humans under stress, such as climbing a mountain, or SCUBA diving.”Indeed, seeing such changes in expression is not at all unusual—it happens each time we get sick, or in response to environmental factors. Certainly, spending a year in microgravity with reduced oxygen and increased radiation levels could cause that type of change.Another somewhat alarming-sounding finding is that Scott Kelly’s DNA “no longer matches that of his identical twin.”For anyone familiar with genetics, this is possibly the most obvious statement one could make. We humans accumulate random mutations throughout our genomes as we age, and the chances that Mark and Scott’s genetic sequences were randomly modified in exactly the same way are astronomically small. In reality, their DNA hasn’t been identical for most of their lives.That’s just at the most basic sequence level. All sorts of chemical modifications to DNA can dramatically affect where and how genes are expressed, and those markings—termed epigenetic—are malleable. Genomes add and erase those markings all the time, and they’re not the same between identical twins, either.Throw in a heaping pile of spaceflight, where exposure to higher levels of radiation necessarily mutates DNA more quickly, and the truly surprising result would be seeing no difference between Mark’s and Scott’s genetic sequences. The fact that they differ, and that Scott’s mutation rate is apparently a bit higher than Mark’s, is totally expected.“No twin pairs are ever completely identical, and we all do accrue random mutations all the time,” Bailey says. “No doubt, Scott did or does have different or more mutations than Mark—and anyone else not being in space for a year—due to radiation exposure alone.”All of that being said, one of the actually surprising findings from the NASA study is that Kelly’s chromosomes grew longer while he was in space, at least in his white blood cells. The changes occurred in what’s known as the telomere, a cap of genetic material that sits at the end of each chromosome.Normally, telomeres shrink with age, the idea being that each time a chromosome is copied during cell division, the process chips away at that cap. Shortened or frayed telomeres are largely thought to be responsible for age-related cellular breakdown.But Kelly’s telomeres elongated in space … and then quickly shrank to their original lengths after he returned to Earth. That these structures exhibit such flexibility is intriguing and potentially quite consequential, says Bailey, whose lab studied Kelly’s telomeres.“We’re now trying to figure out why and what caused such shifts, so we can better appreciate potential health risks,” Bailey says, though she also notes that Scott Kelly’s exercise and nutrition on the station likely contributed to the chromosomal bungee.All this means that if Scott really wanted to no longer be genetically identical to Mark, he didn’t need to spend a year in space.",
"A family frolicks on the surface of Mars in an illustration.Fast-forward to several decades or a half-century from now, and it’s not inconceivable that humans could be living on Mars—building habitats, trundling around in rovers, mining the subsurface for resources, and producing the first generation of bipedal Martians.Except, no one really knows if humans can successfully reproduce in space, whether that’s during spaceflight or on another planet. To be clear, having sex in (much) lower gravity is a simple physics problem. But a host of unknowns swirl around how space environments affect the actual biological sequences of events that must unfold with precision for a new human to grow, from fertilization to weaning.It’s not as though we haven’t tried to sort it out. Mice, rats, salamanders, frogs, fish, and plants have been the subjects of experiments looking at how spaceflight affects reproduction. To put it simply, though, the results so far are mixed and inconclusive.“All of our big tech gurus out there who want us to be a multiplanet civilization—this is a key question that no one has answered yet,” says Baylor College of Medicine physician Kris Lehnhardt, who specializes in space medicine.“Everyone is focused on the hardware, and the hardware is great, but in the end it’s the squishy meat-sack that messes everything up. Ignoring the human system, if you will, in future plans and designs is only going to lead to failure.”On Earth, evolutionary processes are fine-tuned to work in an environment characterized by one of our planet’s most basic forces: gravity. In space, gravity is essentially nonexistent, and on Mars it’s about 38 percent the strength of Earth’s downward pull. So far, no one has even come close to figuring out how a partial gravity environment could affect mammalian reproduction.As well, radiation in space is stronger and potentially more damaging than down here on the ground, because Earth’s magnetic field helps shield the planet from energetic cosmic particles. High radiation doses are already a serious concern for adult space travelers, and space agencies carefully track their astronauts’ exposures in orbit. What that radiation could do to a much more developmentally sensitive fetus is a real worry.The effects of those two things—gravity and radiation—on reproduction are, so far, the major issues scientists are trying to address. And because of ethical qualms associated with studying medical risks in humans, scientists have spent decades launching various other animals and associated tissues into space.Early experiments done by the Soviets in the late 1970s included sending several rats into orbit aboard the Cosmos 1129 satellite. When they returned, there was evidence that they’d mated in space, but none of the females ever delivered, which might not be surprising to anyone who studies rodents, given their sensitivity to environmental perturbations.Later, NASA scientist April Ronca sent pregnant rats into orbit and observed how spaceflight affected the later stages of pregnancy; back on Earth, the birthing process was more or less normal, but other work suggests that rat pups exposed to microgravity develop abnormal vestibular systems, or the inner-ear machinery associated in sensing movement direction and orientation.Spaceflight also appears to decrease total rat sperm counts, while increasing abnormalities; still, Ronca has written that “the available data suggest that numerous aspects of pregnancy, birth and early mammalian development can proceed under altered gravity conditions.”In mice, the story is similarly complicated. Research suggests that the two rodent species respond differently to changes in gravity. Two-cell mouse embryos sent into space aboard the shuttle Columbia failed to develop further, even as Earth-based controls matured normally. Later, work in simulated microgravity (achieved using a rotating piece of machinery called a clinostat) showed that while in vitro fertilization could occur normally, microgravity-cultured embryos transferred to female mice failed to implant and develop at normal rates.Most recently, a Japanese-led study found that freeze-dried mouse sperm could produce embryos after spending nine months in space. Other work shows that crickets, nematodes, and fruit flies can successfully reproduce when spaceflight is involved. And Japanese medaka fish mated and produced offspring while on board the space shuttle Columbia.Meanwhile, salamander eggs from Pleurodeles waltl fertilized aboard the Russian space station Mir produced embryos that developed into larvae, although with some alterations. Experiments in sea urchins similarly suggest that fertilization in space can occur, but microgravity dramatically affects how their sperm move. And quail eggs kept in an incubator aboard Mir failed to develop normally.Taken together, these experiments and others aren’t exactly constructing a cohesive image of how spaceflight affects reproduction.“If you were to take reproduction and break it down into all of its various parts … there’s never really been a dedicated scientific program that looks at how each of those steps is affected by the space environment,” Lehnhardt says. “It’s one thing to know that it’s even possible, it’s another thing to know that it can be done safely and have a good outcome.”In general, though, it’s not looking good for mammals, in which successful embryonic development starts with a complicated interchange between mom and fetus and just gets more complex from there.“Across the board, almost every study has shown that in space, either things don’t work at all or they’re not as good—and so as we move forward, we need better and bigger studies, and human studies,” says James Nodler of the Houston Fertility Clinic, who reviewed the links between gravity and embryonic development.In an attempt to address some of the concerns associated with long-term human habitation on the surface of Mars, a team based primarily at NASA’s Langley Research Center designed an experiment that would allow scientists to study the long-term effects of partial gravity on mammalian reproduction.“Before significant investment is made in capabilities leading to such pioneering efforts, the challenges of multigenerational mammalian reproduction in a partial gravity environment need be investigated,” the scientists write. “Humans may encounter reproductive challenges in gravity environments different than Earth’s, as gravitational forces may disrupt mammalian life cycle processes and actively shape genomes in ways that are inheritable.”As envisioned, the experiment would involve placing a mouse colony into lunar orbit, enclosed in a rotating habitat that could be observed and operated almost completely autonomously, courtesy of 600 cameras and telerobotic animal care.Called MICEHAB, for Multigenerational Independent Colony for Extraterrestrial Habitation, Autonomy and Behavior health, the experiment would study the effects of spaceflight and partial gravity on at least three generations of mice a year, with scientists keeping track of birth rates and overall animal health.About once a year or so, the autonomous mouse colony would rendezvous with a planned human habitat in cis-lunar space, allowing astronauts to retrieve samples from the experiment and perform any necessary maintenance, with the goal being to run the experiment for 10 years.“Partial gravity mammalian reproduction research should be conducted prior to the late 2020s in order to inform design decisions on future human Mars missions,” the scientists write. “Permanent surface settlements may be infeasible if partial gravity reproduction challenges are too great to overcome.”But as of now, there’s no indication that MICEHAB will be launching any time soon – and even if it were, some scientists worry it wouldn’t actually answer the questions we’re keen to know about ourselves. Human reproduction differs dramatically even from that of other primates, and none of the organisms studied so far are effective surrogates, says Nodler, a reproductive endocrinologist who specializes in assisted reproductive technologies.“If you look at early IVF studies, they skipped over a lot of mouse and primate studies—it’s just not the same,” Nodler says. “It can’t be overstated that at some point, we have to do human studies to see what’s really going on here.”But deciding which experiment to perform depends on the goal posts, Nodler says, and whether we’re thinking a bit outside the frame of “normal” reproduction and potentially leaning on assisted technologies to produce a generation of Martians.“Is our end point to see if we send up a man and a woman, and they have sex, can they have a baby?” he asks. “Or do we want to say, can we take a whole bunch of embryos, freeze them on Earth, send them to Mars and thaw them?”Performing that first experiment is technically simple enough, although mired in potential ethical snags. And while studying the precise effects of a space environment on human embryos is more difficult, it could feasibly be done today, except for an even bigger pile of moral and ethical snags.For example, scientists could send human sperm and eggs to the International Space Station and attempt in vitro fertilization to see if it would even work, and then compare how many embryos were produced compared to controls on Earth.“The problem is, those are potentially viable embryos, and people would have a heyday with that,” Nodler says.Scientists could also send already fertilized embryos to the ISS and look at how the space environment affects development, DNA damage, and repair. This could be done, Nodler says, with embryos that already have no chance of developing normally—which might remove some of the ethical challenges—but the real test would be to look at the effects of spaceflight on viable embryos.“Let them stay frozen on ISS for six months or a year, then bring them back to Earth, and use them to try to have a live birth. That would be really, really difficult to get approval for, but at one point you gotta do it,” he says, noting that “we have thousands of discarded embryos that patients have said we can use for scientific research. The problem is getting someone to let me use them for scientific research.”Lehnhardt agrees that it’ll be tricky to study human reproduction in space without actually studying humans, and that means being willing to tackle not only the scientific challenges, but the ethical quandaries as soon as possible.“The moral and ethical challenges are not going away,” he says. “So, we’re going to have to face those head-on as we work on stuff like this in the future.”",
"A SpaceX Falcon 9 rocket lifts off from NASA’s Kennedy Space Center in Florida carrying NASA astronauts Bob Behnken and Doug Hurley.Cape Canaveral, FloridaAgainst a backdrop of shifting clouds and patches of welcome blue sky, a SpaceX Falcon 9 rocket roared to life at 3:22 p.m. ET at NASA’s Kennedy Space Center (KSC), warming the already sweltering, sticky air with blindingly bright rocket fire and sending tremors through the Florida coast. Strapped into a spacecraft atop the 229-foot-tall rocket, veteran astronauts Bob Behnken and Doug Hurley soared into the sky, marking a triumphant return to orbit from U.S. shores.“SpaceX, Dragon, we’re go for launch, let’s light this candle,” Hurley said to SpaceX mission control in Hawthorne, California, just before liftoff.Behnken and Hurley—occasionally referred to by their colleagues as Dr. Bob and Chunky—are now cruising to the International Space Station, a journey that will take approximately 19 hours. This flight of SpaceX’s Crew Dragon is only the fifth time in history that U.S. astronauts have piloted a brand-new spacecraft into orbit.Astronaut Robert Behnken (foreground) gives a thumbs up as he heads to the launch pad with Doug Hurley (background).For the first time since NASA retired its space shuttles in 2011, the space agency can launch astronauts from its home shores rather than paying for seats aboard Russian spacecraft. Now, NASA will buy seats on Crew Dragon. In the new Commercial Crew model, SpaceX retains ownership and operational control of its spacecraft, meaning anyone with enough cash, at least in theory, could buy a ticket to orbit.“We want to send all kinds of people to space,” says Benji Reed, director of crew mission management at SpaceX. “Everything we’re doing is to open that new chapter in the space age.”Today’s flight, called Demo-2, was originally scheduled for May 27, but lightning and cloud cover near the launchpad that day forced a scrub about 17 minutes before liftoff.“It's a challenge to compete with the weather here in Florida in the summer,” NASA KSC director Bob Cabana said on May 29. “But we’re going to do what’s right.”Demo-2 is the second and final test of the Crew Dragon spacecraft before the vehicle is certified for regular launches with passengers. If the entirety of the demonstration flight goes well, SpaceX could launch its first operational mission to transport astronauts to the ISS, called Crew-1, later this year.“We haven’t seen this moment since 1980, this moment of anticipation with a new program starting and a new way of doing things,” says Jennifer Levasseur, a curator and historian at the Smithsonian’s National Air & Space Museum.The bright orange flame from the SpaceX rocket seems to draw a line through the cloud layers in this 40-second exposure.Designed to ferry as many as seven people between Florida’s Atlantic coast and low-Earth orbit, the SpaceX capsule is a sleek, modern vehicle with windows, touch screen control panels, and a large storage compartment. While in orbit, 16 Draco thrusters orient the capsule in the vacuum of space.Eight larger SuperDraco engines provide a way for Crew Dragon to abort, hurtling away from a malfunctioning rocket during an emergency. This in-flight abort capability is designed to avoid a catastrophe like the 1986 destruction of the space shuttle Challenger, which broke apart shortly after launch, killing all seven passengers.“It’s a very effective system,” Reed says. “You put a lot into it, you test it, you make sure it’s going to work, and then you hope you never, ever have to use it.”Behnken and Hurley had no need for the abort system today, as they safely separated from the Falcon 9 rocket while strapped into their seats aboard Crew Dragon about 12 minutes after liftoff. For much of the ride, Dragon will fly itself while the astronauts test equipment, such as the life-support systems and specially designed pressure suits. As Dragon approaches the space station, though, Hurley will take over and practice maneuvering the capsule manually—a crucial test of Dragon’s capabilities in case the vehicle’s autonomous rendezvous mechanism fails.“This is a critical test flight,” says NASA’s Kathy Lueders, commercial crew program manager. “Bob and Doug are going to get to test fly the vehicle and check it out ... and make sure that before it’s certified, the design is working.”Dragon will autonomously dock with the ISS at approximately 10:29 a.m. on May 31, where Behnken and Hurley will join U.S. astronaut Chris Cassidy and Russian cosmonauts Anatoly Ivanishin and Ivan Vagner. The Demo-2 crew’s stay in space will last between one and four months, a duration that depends on both space station operations and the timing of the Crew-1 launch, currently set for late August.Behnken and Hurley are 20-year veterans of the astronaut corps, close friends, and former military test pilots. Each flew aboard two space shuttle missions and delivered portions of the ISS into orbit—and Hurley piloted the last shuttle flight before the program’s retirement in 2011. During that mission, known as STS-135, the crew left a small U.S. flag aboard the space station; now, Hurley and Behnken will retrieve it.Two minutes after launch, the SpaceX rocket is a mere orange dot as its engines push the astronauts toward space in a picture-perfect launch.“The plan always was ... that the first U.S. vehicle to launch from Florida and come to the International Space Station would grab that flag,” Hurley said before launch. Neither astronaut expected another flight assignment after the space shuttle was retired, let alone on a completely new spacecraft.“We’ve longed to be a part of a test mission, a test spaceflight,” Behnken said. “It’s something we maybe dreamed about,” even though it did not seem likely back when the pair joined the astronaut corps.But in 2015, NASA selected the two pros for the Commercial Crew program. Now returning to orbit to join their colleagues aboard a space station they helped build, Hurley, 53, and Behnken, 49, feel a bit like going back to an old home.“[Cassidy] said something about how he’s looking forward to seeing our ugly mugs on board space station.” Hurley said shortly after arriving in Cape Canaveral on May 20. “We’re hoping to go up there and lend a couple of extra sets of hands and hopefully not make more work for him in the meantime.”When the Demo-2 astronauts leave the ISS, they’ll fly Dragon back through Earth’s atmosphere and splash down off Florida’s Atlantic coast using four parachutes. The ocean landing is similar to the watery touchdowns of U.S. spacecraft in the 1960s and 1970s.“A capsule design—it’s kind of rudimentary in some ways, but it makes a lot of sense for getting in and out of the atmosphere in the simplest and lightest way possible,” says Bill Barry, NASA’s chief historian. Capsules are also an efficient design for targeting destinations beyond Earth’s immediate neighborhood, such as Mars.“We want our next space vehicle to take us beyond low-Earth orbit,” Barry says.For decades, NASA spacecraft have streaked through Florida’s skies, taking advantage of the faster rotation of the planet near the Equator to slingshot people and machines over the Atlantic and into space. And even during the earliest days of U.S. human spaceflight, private companies played a major role in launching astronauts into orbit.“It’s not like NASA’s civil service employees sat there and turned wrenches to build Mercury, Gemini, Apollo,” Barry says. “We had contractors who did that.”In the early 1980s, while the Soviet Union stuck to the same basic spacecraft design, the U.S. took a different approach. NASA abandoned the capsules of its early years and launched a fix-winged spacecraft into orbit—a space shuttle that carried seven astronauts. Rather than parachuting back to Earth, the shuttle could glide and land like an airplane on a long runway at KSC or California’s Edwards Air Force Base.Thirty years of shuttle launches turned rocket thunder into a common refrain over Cape Canaveral. Shuttle missions delivered telescopes into orbit, enabled science experiments in microgravity, and brought up the hardware needed to build the ISS. But the space shuttle program also suffered two tragedies that killed 14 astronauts: Challenger, in 1986, and Columbia, which disintegrated during reentry in 2003.In 2011, human spaceflight from the U.S. paused. NASA retired the shuttle program, long plagued by ballooning expenses, and lost its ability to send astronauts into orbit from home. The U.S. began buying seats on Russia’s Soyuz spacecraft.Per seat, “they originally charged about $20 million, and the prices have gone up since then,” Barry says. Today, NASA pays as much as $90 million per astronaut. “It’s pretty pricey to get into space.”At the same time, however, NASA laid the groundwork for the Commercial Crew program—an initiative to return orbital capabilities to the United States. In 2014, NASA awarded two companies contracts to develop vehicles to reach low-Earth orbit: Boeing, with a contract worth $4.2 billion to build its Starliner spacecraft, and SpaceX, with a contract for $2.6 billion to build Crew Dragon.SpaceX became the first commercial company to deliver cargo to the ISS in 2012. The company has since flown about two dozen resupply missions to the space station on a cargo version of its Dragon spacecraft and lofted satellites for a variety of customers, launching to orbit last year more than any other U.S. organization.The SpaceX Crew Dragon spacecraft and Falcon 9 rocket sit in the hangar with two sooty Falcon 9 first stage boosters that were recovered after a launch. SpaceX was the first company to recover the orbital-class boosters for reuse instead of losing them at sea after launch.A SpaceX Falcon 9 rocket lifts off from Launch Complex 39A at NASA’s Kennedy Space Center in Florida on January 19, 2020, carrying the Crew Dragon spacecraft on the company’s successful uncrewed In-Flight Abort Test. The flight test demonstrated the spacecraft’s escape capabilities in preparation for the crewed flight to the International Space Station.Founded in 2002 by billionaire Elon Musk, the company’s stated goal has always been to make spaceflight more affordable, ultimately helping humanity move beyond Earth. For Musk, achieving that goal meant building orbital rockets that are reusable rather than abandoning them to the ocean after every launch. The company wasn’t immediately successful.SpaceX’s forays into rocketry have been marked by dramatic failures as well as historic achievements of engineering. Before successfully landing the first stage of an orbital-class rocket in 2015—a previously unaccomplished feat that allowed the company to start relaunching Falcon 9 first stages in 2017—SpaceX crashed several of their boosters in failed landing attempts. Just last year, one of the SuperDraco engines on the Crew Dragon that powers the in-flight abort capability exploded during a test.“You have to learn those hard lessons, and I think sometimes the aerospace industry shies away from failure in the development phase—it looks bad politically, it’s tough, and the media certainly makes a lot out of failures,” SpaceX president Gwynne Shotwell said ahead of the Demo-2 launch. “Candidly, I think that those beginnings and those roots are critically important to our success.”To date, the company has landed a Falcon 9 first stage 45 times, and it has launched 31 boosters that had already flown to space. One first stage launched five times before SpaceX failed to land it again.“We’re going to do it our own way, we’re not going to necessarily do it the old way,” the Smithsonian’s Levasseur says of SpaceX’s approach to spaceflight. “We’re able to change the shape of it ourselves, we’re able to change the way it works.”After taking people to the ISS, SpaceX is aiming for the moon and Mars. The company is currently designing and testing a new rocket called Starship—a vehicle that has blown up frequently during testing, most recently on May 29. NASA recently awarded SpaceX $135 million to develop Starship into a potential lunar lander.“We envision a future where low-Earth orbit is entirely commercialized—where NASA is one customer of many customers, where we have numerous providers that are competing on cost and innovation and safety,” says NASA administrator Jim Bridenstine. “It's an era in human spaceflight where more space is going to be available to more people than ever before.”",
"The International Space Station is a mere silhouette as it transits the sun, as seen from Frederiscksburg, Virginia. NASA astronauts Bob Behnken and Doug Hurley, aboard the station since May 31, returned to Earth today in SpaceX's Crew Dragon spacecraft.After more than two months aboard the International Space Station (ISS), NASA astronauts Bob Behnken and Doug Hurley returned to Earth today, parachuting through the planet’s skies in a SpaceX Dragon capsule. The pair splashed down at 2:48 p.m. ET in the Gulf of Mexico—a site off the coast of the Florida Panhandle and far enough west to avoid the winds and rain of Hurricane Isaias.The pair’s journey home concludes a history-making test flight called Demo-2, which returned crewed spaceflight capabilities to the United States after a nearly 10-year hiatus. The mission lifted off on May 30, marking the first time NASA astronauts piloted a spacecraft that’s owned and operated by a commercial company, rather than the space agency itself.Now, with a successful round trip on the books, SpaceX will launch at least six more NASA flights to the ISS. The first of these, called Crew-1, is scheduled for late September at the earliest. On the second flight—scheduled for spring 2021—Behnken’s wife, astronaut Megan McArthur, will launch aboard the same SpaceX Dragon that he test flew.“She’s super excited to be assigned to a SpaceX mission,” Behnken said from the ISS before reentry. “I definitely have some advice about living inside of Dragon and where best to pack all your personal items.”Behnken and Hurley blasted off from Cape Canaveral, Florida, riding a blinding column of rocket fire into the overcast sky and leaving a curly, corkscrewed cloud in their wake. They docked their spacecraft with the ISS on May 31 and joined a three-person team that was already on the station.SpaceX’s Crew Dragon spacecraft, far right, docked to the International Space Station on July 1. The craft brought NASA astronauts Doug Hurley and Bob Behnken to the space station after a launch on May 30, 2020—the first vessel to carry humans into space from U.S. soil since 2011. During their 63-day stay aboard the ISS, the two astronauts, along with NASA astronaut Chris Cassidy and Russian cosmonauts Anatoly Ivanishin and Ivan Vagner, took many photos of the crew at work and of Earth.Hurley works on the International Space Station's intermodule ventilation system on July 7, monitoring airflow and inspecting components.Behnken takes a "space-selfie" in his space suit with his helmet visor up on July 21.Behnken captured the sunrise from the ISS on July 27 in this four-photo sequence. The space station circles the Earth about every 90 minutes, passing in and out of the sunlight.“It’s been fantastic to have buddies at the chow table to reflect on the day, think about tomorrow, and talk about world events,” U.S. astronaut Chris Cassidy, who flew to space on a Russian Soyuz capsule in April, said from the ISS.During their stay, the Demo-2 crew helped out with station maintenance and science experiments. Behnken and Cassidy performed four spacewalks, upgrading power systems and prepping the station for a future airlock. And of course, the astronauts put Crew Dragon through its paces.“We did habitability testing, we tested interfaces, we tested emergency comm … and just generically how we work with Dragon docked,” Hurley said. ”Most of that went exactly as we planned. There were a couple of little tweaks here and there, but for the most part we’ve had pretty good luck.”On the eve of Dragon’s return to Earth, mission managers selected the waters off Pensacola from seven potential splashdown sites near Florida’s coasts. The decision was determined primarily by weather and ocean conditions, which need to be calm enough for speed boats and a recovery ship to reach and retrieve the capsule quickly.“What looks like land is actually a Saharan dust cloud that has blown over the Atlantic Ocean and is nearing the Caribbean Sea,” Hurley tweeted along with this photo taken June 21.“Snapped this photo of the storm [Hurricane Hanna] in the Gulf of Mexico on Friday as it was starting to have observable structure from the International Space Station,” Hurley tweeted with this photo taken July 26."Two of the best ever spacewalkers [Bob Behnken, left, and Chris Cassidy], each on their 10th EVA [extravehicular activity] today. Congratulations on an amazing accomplishment,” Hurley wrote on Twitter to commemorate his fellow astronauts, who ventured outside of the space station to perform maintenance on July 21.“This light blue ocean swirl caught my eye as we flew over the South Pacific,” Hurley tweeted along with this photo taken June 15.Earlier in the day, Cassidy and his fellow ISS crewmates, Russian cosmonauts Anatoly Ivanishin and Ivan Vagner, held a farewell ceremony for Behnken and Hurley. Cassidy presented Hurley with a well-traveled U.S. flag—the same flag that astronauts carried into space during the first space shuttle mission in 1981, and which Hurley later delivered to the space station when he piloted the last shuttle flight in 2011.“This flag has spent some time up here, on the order of nine years since we dropped it off,” Hurley said. “I’m very proud to return this flag home and see what’s next for it.”Then the two spacefarers undocked from the ISS tucked into the space capsule, which they have dubbed Endeavour in a nod to the first space shuttle they both flew on as rookie astronauts—Behnken in 2008 and Hurley in 2009.“It’s relatively small, so if you tried to put a full crew of seven, like we had on the space shuttle days, inside that volume, it would be a stay-in-your-seat situation,” Behnken said. “I wouldn’t say it’s a phone booth ... but it definitely is cozy if you were to get up to four people.”After a series of autonomous engine burns to separate from the space station, Endeavour set itself on a course for Earth. The spacecraft dumped its disposable trunk, a 6,400-pound compartment filled with trash below the crew cabin, to burn up in Earth’s atmosphere.The crew portion of Endeavour, however, hit the atmosphere at a blazing 17,500 miles an hour, protected by a heat shield that was previously covered by the trunk. Drag during reentry slowed the spacecraft to 350 miles an hour, and then the capsule released a series of parachutes to further slow its descent to the sea. After that, it was just a matter of splashing down in the Gulf. Now, they are waiting to be picked up by a ship and flown back to Houston.With its nose cone open for docking, SpaceX’s Crew Dragon makes its historic approach to the International Space Station on May 31. Southwestern Turkey is in the background.Historically, water landings have been known to make astronauts queasy, as long-term space travelers are already disoriented by the return of gravity, which can dramatically affect fluids in the inner ear that are crucial for orientation and balance. Recognizing that, Behnken and Hurley both noted that Endeavour had been equipped with the “appropriate hardware” necessary to deal with intense bouts of seasickness.“There are bags if you need ’em, and we’ll have those handy. We’ll probably have some towels handy as well,” Hurley said. “It certainly wouldn’t be the first time that’s happened in a space vehicle.”But aside from a bit of possible nausea, Behnken and Hurley are safely back on Earth, and both veteran astronauts say they’re most eager about passing medical checks and reuniting with their families.NASA astronauts Bob Behnken and Doug Hurley return to Earth in a SpaceX Dragon capsule after more than two months in space.",
"With its nose cone open for docking, the SpaceX Crew Dragon capsule successfully arrived at the International Space Station on May 31 after a 19-hour journey.Cape Canaveral, FloridaAfter a nearly 19-hour cruise, SpaceX’s Crew Dragon spacecraft arrived at the International Space Station and successfully docked with the orbiting laboratory. Piloted by NASA astronauts Bob Behnken and Doug Hurley, Dragon is the first vessel to carry humans into space from U.S. shores since 2011.Named Endeavour by its crew, the spacecraft docked to the ISS at 10:16 a.m. ET as the station passed over the border between China and Mongolia. The astronauts will work to equalize the pressure and temperature between Dragon and the ISS before Behnken and Hurley make their way into the station, where they will stay for between one and four months.“It’s been a real honor to be just a small part of this nine-year endeavor, since the last time a United States spaceship has docked with the International Space Station,” Hurley said after docking.Behnken and Hurley, both veteran astronauts and military test pilots, used the last portion of their flight to the ISS to put the Dragon through its paces. Just 650 feet from the space station, the pair tested Dragon’s manual flight capabilities, which allow the astronauts to take control of Dragon if the autonomous docking mode fails. The spacecraft then inched to within 65 feet of the station and docked autonomously. Now berthed, Dragon will siphon power from the station instead of using its own batteries and solar arrays.“Welcome aboard the International Space Station, Bob and Doug. Glad to have you as part of the crew,” said NASA astronaut Chris Cassidy, a member of the crew currently aboard the space station.Dragon blasted off from Florida’s Kennedy Space Center at 3:22 p.m. on May 30. This flight is the final test of a brand-new spacecraft capable of carrying humans into orbit, and if the rest of the mission goes well, Crew Dragon will be certified for future flights. NASA can then begin operational missions to fly astronauts to the ISS on the spacecraft, with the first mission called Crew-1 targeted for late August.Yesterday’s launch was the second attempt to send Dragon to space with Behnken and Hurley aboard. Clouds and lightning forced SpaceX and NASA to call off the first attempt on May 27, and as the backup date approached, weather forecasts looked dubious again. But as the countdown proceeded on Saturday, the skies cleared and conditions were declared “go” for launch.Crowds gathered along Florida roadways, on beaches, and on rooftops in Cape Canaveral to watch as Dragon took flight atop a blinding plume of rocket fire, punching through low-hanging clouds and leaving a twisted, cloudy trail in the fortuitously blue sky. As Behnken and Hurley raced to the space station, celebrations on the ground hailed a successful return of human spaceflight from the United States and the opening of a new chapter in space exploration in which commercial companies can build and operate their own crew-ready spacecraft.",
"A Russian Orthodox priest blesses the Soyuz MS-07 spacecraft at the launch pad of the Russian-leased Baikonur Cosmodrome on December 16, 2017. The next day, the Soyuz carried three people to the International Space Station.Space may be the final frontier—but sometimes getting there is half the fun. Today, dozens of sites around the world host spaceports, the specialized facilities built to send and receive rocket-powered vehicles on flights into the cosmos.Sputnik 1, the first human-made satellite to orbit Earth, launched 61 years ago today from what is now the Baikonur Cosmodrome in Kazakhstan. Between then and 2017, a total of 29 spaceports managed to send craft into orbit or beyond, according to the Center for Strategic and International Studies. Twenty-one of these are still active today, including the only three that have ever sent humans into space.Geography and physics conspired to place our first gateways to space in the mid-latitudes, in sparsely populated areas as close to the Equator as feasibly possible. Due to Earth's rotation on its axis, the ground underneath you is moving faster the closer you are to the Equator, just like the outer edge of a spinning record. This means equatorial launches leave the planet with more oomph, making the launches more efficient.More poleward launch sites, such as northern Russia's Plesetsk Cosmodrome, offer different advantages. The farther north or south you are, the easier it gets to launch a satellite into an orbit that passes over Earth's poles. (See how abandoned rocket parts provide villages near Plesetsk with toxic, valuable resources.)The first spaceports went up at the height of the Cold War, as the U.S. and Soviet Union raced for supremacy in space. In the 1970s and 1980s, countries such as China, India, and Japan built spaceports of their own, giving them independence to launch their own missions—and membership in the exclusive group of spacefaring nations.Now, spaceports are at a moment of transition. As low-Earth orbit gets more commercialized, private companies are jostling to offer relatively affordable rides into orbit—and they too need space to launch.“This was all wrapped up in the battle for prestige,” says space policy expert Michael Dodge, a professor at the University of North Dakota's Department of Space Studies. “We're seeing a different geopolitical world [today]. The prevailing motivation is one of cooperation and economic modeling for the future.”SpaceX has leased Kennedy Space Center's Launchpad 39A—the site that sent Apollo 11 aloft on its trip to the moon in 1969. The company will use the NASA facility at least until the 2030s, and it's building a private spaceport in Brownsville, Texas. SpaceX's competitor Blue Origin also has a Texas launch facility and a leased Cape Canaveral launchpad. And in January 2018, American startup Rocket Lab successfully launched small satellites into orbit from its own launch site on New Zealand's Mahia Peninsula. (And as more billionaires race to space, who will win?)Across the U.S., states are trying to spur hiring booms by building new spaceports. According to the Federal Aviation Administration, the U.S. currently has 11 bona-fide spaceports, with one in Colorado getting its license in August. While this construction may fuel the future space economy, supply is overshooting today's demand. As WIRED noted in September, there were 90 orbital launches in 2017, but only 29 of them left from U.S. soil, and they did it from only three facilities.If and when the space economy takes off, spaceports will have to grapple with their newfound popularity. For one, bustling spaceports could complicate countries' airspace, posing challenges to air traffic control. Dodge also points out that like any major facilities, spaceports will have environmental impacts, from noise pollution to possible spills of rocket fuel.For now, U.S. spaceports must report their environmental impacts from construction and ongoing operation. But as our presence in space expands, how will the quest to explore the stars affect things on Earth?“As we proliferate these spaceports, they need to be cognizant of the impact they'll have,” says Dodge. “They're a necessary thing for the future, but we need to be sure we're balancing that with our relationship with the environment.”",
"At the heart of northwestern Russia's Arkhangelsk Oblast lies Plesetsk Cosmodrome, a missile base built during the Cold War that's now one of the world's most active rocket launch facilities.But as the saying goes, what goes up must come down.Each rocket launched from Plesetsk jettisons fuel containers and spent boosters, many of which fall back down to earth in the northern Mezensky District, a restricted area more than 200 miles northeast of the base. The area's largest settlement is the town of Mezen, population 3,575.Life in and around Mezen isn't easy. Each summer, the rivers that crisscross the area flood, overwhelming the local roads and forcing people and their goods to ford multiple rivers.A miniature rocket stands guard near the railway station of Plesetsk, a town about 2.5 miles from the cosmodrome of the same name.So after jettisoned rocket parts fall from the skies above Mezen, villagers salvage the wreckage. Bits of fuselage become boats called rocketa and hunting sleds; gold and titanium pried from the wrecks find their way into the black markets of Arkhangelsk, the region's largest city. And fragments of some rockets even stand tall in villagers' gardens, as if the plots had sprouted metallic trees.“I could not believe it, to see it with my own eyes,” says Italian photographer Rafaelle Petralla, who visited the area in 2017 and 2018 to document the villagers' unusually aeronautic way of life.The Plesetsk Cosmodrome began as an elaborate Soviet secret. The Western public didn't know about the base until 1966, when students and teachers at a U.K. grammar school deduced its presence. It'd take another 17 years for the Soviet Union to officially acknowledge its existence.Secrecy still shrouds the area. The northern Mezensky district falls within Russia's “border security zone,” which means that authorized visitors must be approved by Russia's FSB security services. The requirement makes foreigners—let alone foreign photographers—a scarce sight.The economy of the village of Sovpolie rests on selling horses. The area's breed is known for its tolerance of cold and strength in carrying loads.By capturing images of life in the region, Petralla hopes that his work will help spread the stories of its inhabitants. In particular, he says that villagers he spoke to remain concerned about toxic compounds spread by the rockets.“The government doesn't want to recover it, because it's too expensive, but at the same time, they have toxic materials,” says Petralla. “NASA, for example, goes to recover rockets in the Atlantic Ocean. Why doesn't the Russian government?”When they crash to Earth, Plesetsk's spent booster stages still contain heptyl, a rocket propellant that's highly toxic and probably carcinogenic. Researchers are actively studying heptyl contamination around Baikonur Cosmodrome, a launch site in Kazakhstan.While cancer records for Arkhangelsk Oblast, the region containing Mezen and Plesetsk, don't show unusual spikes relative to the rest of Russia, Petralla says that local villagers are adamant about heptyl's toll.Bulat Kenessov, an analytical chemist at Al-Farabi Kazakh National University who studies Baikonur's heptyl, says that Plesetsk's health hazards merit a closer look, especially larger propellant spills at the cosmodrome itself.“The human health risks are there and should be studied,” Kenessov says. “[Local researchers have] world-class equipment and highly qualified staff. They do as much as possible, but their abilities are limited by the low funding.”A charming settlement flanking the Mezen River, the village of Kimzha was named one of Russia's most beautiful villages in 2016. Since the 1960s, dozens of rockets have fallen into the forests surrounding Kimzha.",
"On July 8, 2011, the space shuttle Atlantis launched from Kennedy Space Center, marking the last time a U.S. astronaut was launched into space from American soil. For the seven years since then, NASA has relied on Russia's pricey Soyuz spacecraft to ferry American astronauts to the International Space Station (ISS).To move beyond reliance on Russian transport, NASA tapped Boeing and SpaceX in 2014 to craft a sequel of sorts to the Space Shuttle: private, Apollo-style “space taxis” built and launched in the United States. Now, we know the names of those launches' first passengers.At a Friday press conference at NASA's Johnson Space Center, NASA administrator Jim Bridenstine revealed nine of the astronauts that will make the first four crewed flights of Boeing and SpaceX's spacecraft, the CST-100 Starliner and Crew Dragon.“This is a big deal for our country, and we want America to know we’re back,” Bridenstine said in a speech. “We’re flying American astronauts on American rockets from American soil.”Boeing's first test mission will send astronauts Eric Boe, Nicole Aunapu Mann, and Chris Ferguson aloft.Ferguson isn't currently a NASA employee, though he served as an astronaut from 1998 to 2011 and commanded the final Space Shuttle mission. Ferguson now works for Boeing and is poised to become the first-ever private company astronaut.Boe, a veteran NASA astronaut, has logged more than 28 days in space across two Space Shuttle missions. Mann joined the astronaut corps in 2013, and she is a lieutenant colonel in the Marine Corps and test pilot. The test launch will be her first trip to space.“It's absolutely the opportunity of a lifetime,” said Mann. “I'm just grateful to be able to usher in this new era of American spaceflight. As a test pilot, it doesn't get any better than this.”SpaceX's first test launch will ferry NASA astronauts Doug Hurley and Bob Behnken into space. Both have been in the astronaut corps since 2000; combined, the duo has four Space Shuttle missions and more than 58 days of spaceflight between them.“The 7,000 women and men of SpaceX understand what a sacred honor this was, for us to be part of this program, and for us to fly you,” said Gwynne Shotwell, the chief operating officer of SpaceX, at the Friday press conference. “Thank you very much—we take it seriously, and we won't let you down.”In addition to unveiling the test launch rosters, Bridenstine also revealed the crews of each spacecraft's second flight, which will ferry NASA astronauts to the International Space Station.Boeing's second Starliner launch and first bona-fide NASA mission will send astronauts John Cassada and Suni Williams to the ISS.Cassada, a Navy commander and test pilot, joined the astronaut corps in 2013; the launch will be his first. With 322 days in space, Williams is sixth all-time on NASA's spaceflight endurance list and second all-time among female astronauts. No female astronaut has logged more spacewalk time.“I'm just really excited that we're going to take these spacecraft and show them off to our international partners,” said Williams. “That's going to help all of us understand how to live and work in space.”“I'm sure there's at least one Russian-language instructor out there who thinks that having me fly in a U.S. vehicle is not a terrible idea,” quipped Cassada.SpaceX's first NASA mission to the ISS, in turn, will include Victor Glover and Mike Hopkins.Glover joined the astronaut corps in 2013; he is a U.S. Navy commander and test pilot with almost 3,000 flight hours logged in more than 40 different aircraft. In 2013 and 2014, Hopkins spent nearly six months aboard the ISS, logging nearly 13 hours of spacewalks.The announcement marks an important milestone for NASA's Commercial Crew program, which has paid Boeing and SpaceX $6.8 billion since 2014. By naming crews, NASA is signaling its belief that these astronauts will fly sometime soon.The space agency has reason to be eager. U.S. Government Accountability Office (GAO) officials have noted that NASA's last Russian ride from the International Space Station returns to Earth in November 2019. After that, the space agency has no guaranteed way to get its astronauts into low-Earth orbit.NASA's investment also aims to boost private industry, which has flocked into low-Earth orbit in recent years for tourism, the satellite industry, and more. (Read more about private companies' attempts to race to the moon.)Despite the fanfare around Friday's presentation, the Commercial Crew program has endured years of delays. Originally, both companies were contractually bound to meet all of NASA's requirements in 2017.Delays are normal, especially when trying to make spacecraft safe and reliable, but the companies' rosy projections despite expected snafus have drawn criticism.“Both contractors have said that their schedules are aggressive and they set ambitious—rather than realistic—dates, only to frequently delay them,” says Cristina Chaplain, the GAO director who provides oversight for NASA, including the Commercial Crew program.Boeing is currently working through technical issues with its abort and parachute systems. SpaceX is trying to fix design issues with gas vessels and cracks in its engine turbines, and it's working to ensure that its rocket fueling process—which calls for filling the rockets while astronauts are on board—is sufficiently safe.Just days before the Friday announcement, a key NASA safety board cautioned that it's too soon to set dates for the companies' test flights. And on Thursday, SpaceNews reported that the companies' timelines would slip three to four more months.SpaceX will fly an uncrewed test flight in November 2018 and another with astronauts on board in April 2019. Boeing's uncrewed test flight will slip to the end of 2018, and its crewed test will launch in mid-2019.The companies are running out of buffer. In a July report, the GAO said that NASA predicted the companies would gain full certification around the end of 2019, while acknowledging the two might not be ready until well into 2020. While there's talk of pushing NASA's last Soyuz return to January 2020, the space agency won't extend the Soyuz agreement forever. If any further delays creep up, NASA's astronauts may be temporarily stranded on Earth.“If neither Boeing nor SpaceX are ready to fly by November 2019, the U.S. risks a gap in access to the ISS,” says Chaplain. “The ISS cannot function without a U.S. presence on board to maintain and operate integral systems.”Boeing and SpaceX, though, seem keenly aware of the white-hot spotlight on the program and on America's future in low-Earth orbit.“Thanks to the American public for your patience [and] your dedication for allowing us to finish the job,” said Shotwell. “We're not going to let you down.”",
"Synergy Moon Technician Erik Reedy ponders rocket design at Interorbital Systems (IOS), backer of this international team competing for the Google Lunar XPrize. The $20 million prize will go to the first privately funded group to land a craft that travels 500 meters on the moon and beams images and video back to Earth—a small step toward potentially giant economic rewards beckoning from the moon, and beyond.This story appears in the August 2017 issue of National Geographic magazine.The youthful Indian engineers took their seats, a bit nervously, in a makeshift conference room inside a cavernous former car-battery warehouse in Bangalore. Arrayed in front of them were several much older men and women, many of them gray-haired luminaries of India’s robust space program. The first Asian space agency to send an orbiter to Mars, it also nearly tripled a previous world record by launching 104 satellites into orbit in a single mission this past February. The object of everyone’s attention was a small rolling device barely the size of a microwave oven.The members of the young crew explained their plans to blast the device into space aboard a rocket late this year, position it into lunar orbit nearly a quarter million miles away, guide it to a landing on the moon, and send it roaming across the harsh lunar landscape. The engineers of TeamIndus said their company would do all of this on a shoestring budget, probably $65 million, give or take, the vast majority of it raised from private investors.A prominent Mumbai investor, Ashish Kacholia, who has put more than a million dollars into the firm, sat at the back of the room, transfixed by the discussion. It somehow combined the intense, rapid-fire questions of a doctoral thesis defense with the freewheeling, everybody’s-shouting, laughter-punctuated atmosphere of the Lok Sabha, India’s boisterous lower house of parliament. Kacholia hardly needed to be here all day to check up on this particular investment of his—far from his largest—but he stayed just to hear the erudite dialogue on selenocentric (moon-centered) orbit projections, force modeling, apogee and perigee, and the basis for how “the kids” drew up the error covariance matrix.TeamIndus, India Weighing in at just under 17 pounds—but carrying the pride and hopes of a nation on its spindly frame—the Indian team’s rover, code-named ECA, undergoes testing in Bangalore. A large helium balloon attached to it simulates the moon’s gravity, which is one-sixth that of Earth.TeamIndus, India A concept mocked up in foam for a video echoes a prototype of the rover ECA, now ready for testing in a Bangalore lab.“It’s thrilling, really,” Kacholia explained. “You’ve got these 25-, 28-year-olds up there defending their calculations, all their work, in front of a thousand years of the nation’s collective aerospace experience and wisdom.” His friend S. K. Jain, also a well-known Indian investor, nodded in vigorous agreement. “These kids are firing up the whole imagination of India,” he commented. “They’re saying to everyone, Nothing is impossible. ”Nearly 50 years after the culmination of the first major race to the moon, in which the United States and the Soviet Union spent fantastic amounts of public money in a bid to land the first humans on the lunar surface, an intriguing new race to our nearest neighbor in space is unfolding—this one largely involving private capital and dramatically lower costs. The most immediate reward, the $20 million Google Lunar XPrize (or GLXP) will be awarded to one of five finalist teams from around the world. They’re the first ever privately funded teams to attempt landing a traveling vehicle on the moon that can transmit high-quality imagery back to Earth.The competition is modeled explicitly after the great innovation-spurring prize races of the early years of aviation, most notably the Orteig Prize, which Charles Lindbergh won in 1927 when he flew the Spirit of St. Louis nonstop from New York to Paris.U.S. XPrize noncontenders dream big too. Astrobotic Technology is building lunar landers such as Griffin in a Pittsburgh warehouse that once was a steel-stamping plant. The firm pledges to “make the moon accessible to the world,” selling MoonMail space, starting at $460, on its charter journey.Germany The Audi Lunar Quattro rover, built by PT Scientists, sits on soil heated to 250°F and under 1,000-watt lights that mimic lunar conditions. This rover isn’t an XPrize contender, but it may deliver payloads of “personal, commercial, educational, scientific, or technological value” to the lunar surface.Like the quest for the Orteig Prize, the competition for the Lunar XPrize involves national prestige. Teams from Israel, Japan, and the U.S., plus one multinational group, are vying for the honor along with India; a cavalcade of other nations participated on the 16 teams that survived into the semifinal stage last year.Almost as diverse as their countries of origin is the range of approaches and commercial partnerships involved in solving the three basic problems at hand—launching from Earth, landing on the moon, and then going mobile to gather and transmit data. To meet the last challenge, three teams plan to deploy variants of a traditional rover, while the other two intend to use their landing craft to make one giant leap for private enterprise: They will “hop” the required minimum of 500 meters on the moon rather than drive across the lunar surface.As with many early aviation prizes, whichever team prevails almost surely will spend much more to win the prize than it gets back in prize money, though all the teams hope the global publicity and “brand enhancement” of victory will eventually make their investment pay off handsomely.Think a Lunar XPrize ($20 million for first place and $5 million for second) would give a nice boost to your bank account? There are a few things you’ll need to do:Launch before December 31, 2017Land a spacecraft on the moon’s surfaceTravel 500 meters on the moonTalk to Earth, using video and imagesAt its core, this new sprint to space poses a question that would have been laughable in the Cold War era of the 1960s, when the U.S. was willing to spend more than 4 percent of its federal budget to beat its superpower foe to the moon: Can someone actually make money venturing out into the great beyond? To a demonstrably wide range of entrepreneurs, scientists, visionaries, evangelists, dreamers, eccentrics, and possible crackpots involved in the burgeoning space industry, the answer is an enthusiastic yes.President John F. Kennedy famously urged America in 1962 to “choose to go to the moon in this decade and do the other things, not because they are easy, but because they are hard.” Today Bob Richards, founder and CEO of Moon Express, the American team, offers a different, if consciously cheeky, rationale. “We choose to go to the moon,” he says, “because it is profitable!”Whether Richards is correct about that, and if so, just when it might prove true, is wildly unclear. Setbacks are the norm in the space business, and realistically, many companies will make their early money mainly from government contracts, not private customers. Nonetheless, Richards predicts that the world’s first trillionaire will be a space entrepreneur, perhaps one who mines the lunar soil for helium-3, a gas that’s rare on Earth but plentiful on the moon and an excellent potential fuel source for nuclear fusion—a holy grail of energy technology that scientists have been trying to master for decades. Or a huge fortune may be minted from the asteroids and other near-Earth objects, where robotic technology could help mine vast amounts of gold, silver, platinum, titanium, and other prized elements bound up in them.“There are $20 trillion checks up there, just waiting to be cashed!” says Peter Diamandis, a physician and engineer who is co-founder of Planetary Resources, a company backed by Avatar director James Cameron and several tech billionaires. Planetary Resources also acquired the company Asterank in 2013. Asterank’s website offers scientific data and projects the economic value of mining more than 600,000 asteroids.Diamandis is also founder and executive chairman of the XPrize Foundation, which has sponsored several other award competitions designed to push the boundaries of invention and technology in fields as diverse as artificial intelligence, mathematics, energy, and global health. The whole thrust of the Lunar XPrize competition, says Chanda Gonzales- Mowrer, a senior director at the foundation, is to help pave the way to “a new era of affordable access to the moon and beyond.”SpaceIL, Israel Wearing her official space suit costume at team headquarters in Tel Aviv, Yuval Klinger, 7, is enthusiastically tracking the Israeli organization’s progress—and contemplating whether spacefaring may be a part of her future career plans. She is far from alone in her interest. “We wanted all kids in Israel to be heads-up about this,” says SpaceIL’s leader, Eran Privman. “We want these kids to be able to explain to their parents what’s going on.”SpaceIL, Israel A partial model of the lander SpaceIL rests in an anechoic, or echo-free, chamber that absorbs electromagnetic waves, enabling engineers to test how its antennas will transmit and receive data while on the moon.Elsewhere at SpaceIL’s facility near Tel Aviv, a thermal vacuum chamber creates the same intense heat the lander would encounter during the moon’s daytime, which is equivalent to the continuous sunlight of 14 Earth days.Just as the worldwide acclaim for Lindbergh’s bravura feat sparked huge interest in civil aviation, the lunar competition is intended to fire public imagination about private space pioneers, who already are ferrying cargo to the International Space Station and deploying satellites, orbital rocketry, and test modules. Soon the crafts may be carrying passengers: Virgin Galactic, which billionaire founder Richard Branson calls “the world’s first commercial spaceline,” says it’s gearing up to take passengers on brief space tours in which they will experience weightlessness and awe-inspiring views of Earth. SpaceX founder Elon Musk announced in February that his company would fly two as yet unnamed private citizens around the moon in late 2018 aboard its Dragon spacecraft. Two months later Amazon founder Jeff Bezos said he’d be selling a billion dollars in stock a year to fund Blue Origin, his own commercial and space tourism enterprise.There are plenty of reasons to be skeptical about how soon these firms will actually be carrying private customers to space; after all, a 2014 crash of Virgin Galactic’s prototype passenger spacecraft set that company’s effort back by several years. And while the Lunar XPrize competition appears to be coming to a head, there are plenty of obstacles to contend with: the possibility of a missed deadline, failure of prelaunch rocket tests, to name just two. Plus, the impact of the race on the public imagination could well prove limited. For one thing it simply lacks the human drama and suspense of the 1969 moon landing and safe return of men to Earth, a feat that began an era of human exploration on the lunar surface that wound up lasting a mere three years. Unmanned lunar rovers have been around for decades now: When China landed Yutu in 2013, it became the third nation to put a rover on the moon.So, really, then: What’s the big deal?“What’s new is that the cost of getting to space is dropping, and it is doing so dramatically,” explains John Thornton, the chief executive at Astrobotic, a Pittsburgh-based firm whose aim is to “make the moon accessible to the world” with logistical services that involve carrying everything from experiments for universities to MoonMail for customers who just want to leave a tiny something on the lunar surface—a note, a photo, a lock of hair from a deceased loved one.“A company like ours can do the math and show investors that we really do have a feasible plan to make money,” Thornton says. “Not many years ago, that would have been science fiction.”Lunar XPrize finalists that land can compete for a pot of up to $4 million more for additional heroics on the moon.Visit and transmit from a historic lunar site: $1-4 millionTravel five kilometers: $2 millionSurvive and transmit on two lunar days: $2 millionProvide proof of the presence of water: $4 millionIf the race to put a man on the moon was the equivalent of building one of those giant, room-size, prodigiously expensive mainframe computers in the early days of high technology, today’s race is analogous to a different era of computing: the race to put an affordable computer on everyone’s desktop or, a few years later, in everyone’s telephone. Today computers are so tiny—and the batteries that power them so compact—that we can reach the moon with increasingly smaller and decreasingly expensive devices. Rather than golf cart–size rovers on the moon, the next generation of machines exploring, mapping, and even mining the lunar landscape may well be the size of a child’s Tonka truck. More than anything else, that’s the driving factor behind today’s space economy.“Think micro-rovers and miniature CubeSats,” says William L. “Red” Whittaker, legendary roboticist at Carnegie Mellon University and a pioneer in both rover and self-driving automobile technology. “It’s astonishing what’s going on. Small is the next big thing. Very small.”The physics of human spaceflight remain more complex—we are growing neither smaller nor more compact, so it still takes plenty of fuel to get us up there—but these advances could herald a smaller, nimbler, cheaper way to get people back on the moon and far beyond.In fact, some in the space industry say the moon may one day be less the object of our journey than a sort of giant Atlanta airport that we’ll have to go through on our way to somewhere else, where both the engineering and the economics of blasting off from a place with only one-sixth the gravity of Earth will make a lunar hub the ideal way station in exploring the universe.Water, now locked in the form of ice at the lunar poles, would be both lifeblood and fuel source: water to drink, water to irrigate crops, and water to be split into oxygen and hydrogen, the former for us to breathe and the latter to power our spacecraft beyond this lunar base. Again, whether that will prove true, and if so, when, is unknowable. But what is known now is that the first destination of the emerging space industry is obvious: the moon.Team Hakuto, Japan Kyoko Yonezawa reflects on the team’s progress as the launch deadline draws ever nearer. The plan is for Sorato, the Japanese rover, to hitch a ride to the moon aboard TeamIndus’s rocket and lander—and wait for the rovers to fight to the finish on the lunar surface. National pride and the optimism of youth have made the quest for the XPrize a huge story in Japan. Team leader Takeshi Hakamada says: “We’re not in this just to win, although that would be nice.”To witness a test mission of Team Hakuto—Japan’s entry in the Lunar XPrize competition—I traveled last September to a remote, windswept region of western Japan known as the Tottori Sand Dunes. For days, ferocious and very un-moonlike rain whipping off the Sea of Japan pelted the coast, drowning out proper conditions for testing a lunar rover. In a nearby youth hostel, team leader Takeshi Hakamada and his colleagues were getting restless. Dressed in spiffy gray jackets with a rabbit logo (Hakuto is a mythological white rabbit in Japanese folktales) and tossing back energy drinks, they kept fine-tuning software that carefully mimicked the communications delay of 2.5 seconds between Earth and the moon, nearly a quarter million miles away.Then abruptly one evening the skies cleared and stars emerged. Amid a crackle of walkie-talkies, Hakamada’s team carted an impressive array of laptops, tablets, and sensors through a wooded clearing and out onto the dunes. Then came—literally with white-glove treatment—a pair of roving robots designed to work mostly in tandem when they’re on the moon, but partly independently, which is where Hakamada’s profitmaking idea comes in.Team Hakuto’s entry features a four-wheel rover—dubbed Sorato by the crew, after a song by a Japanese alternative rock band—which in future missions beyond XPrize will be tethered to a separate, two-wheel tilting robot. Both units are made largely of very lightweight, strong, carbon fiber components. Hakamada, a thin, thoughtful man with a mop of unruly hair, who has been a space geek since he saw his first Star Wars movie as an elementary school student, said the smaller robot can be lowered deep into fissures, lava tubes, and caves. It will gather vital data on such spots, which could serve an essential function one day as temporary habitats for future lunar bases, shielding arriving humans for a period of time while more permanent digs are constructed.The Tokyo-based company Hakamada runs, iSpace, plans to leverage Japanese advances in technology miniaturization to probe, photograph, map, and model the moon in much higher detail than can be seen in the photos and soil-testing results from earlier lunar rover missions.“We are not in this just to win a prize, although that would be nice,” Hakamada told me shortly before the test run. “We are in this to demonstrate to the world that we have a viable technology that can produce important information that people will be willing to pay for.”With wheels that each look a bit like an old-fashioned waterwheel, the main rover reached a “drop point” on the dunes, a stand-in for the harsh lunar surface. It’s hitching a late December launch with the Indian Space Research Organisation, the government agency whose rocket will be carrying TeamIndus’s lunar rover as well. (To win the XPrize, a team must be launched by December 31, 2017, but can complete its mission in early 2018.)It was quiet out on the Tottori Dunes as the clock neared midnight, the roar of the sea muffled by the bluffs. Hakuto’s tiny rover looked a bit forlorn out on the sandy simulacrum (a simulation of the lunar surface). Hakamada and his crew coordinated a series of computer-entered commands through the lunar time lag, and suddenly the rover clicked to life, cutting cleanly through the sand, traveling just a few inches per second. It correctly sensed and navigated around several hazards placed in its path. This ability will be critical on the moon, where a large enough rock or ditch could scuttle a whole mission.Team Hakuto, Japan Members of the Japanese media assemble on the remote Tottori Sand Dunes to see Sorato undergo field tests. They look on as Hakamada carries the rover to a sandy test bed that simulates the moon’s surface. “We want to demonstrate to the world that we have a viable technology,” he says.Team Hakuto, Japan Sorato sits in a Tokyo clean room.“The rover did great,” Hakamada said later, beaming like a proud new father. In fact, he explained, his confidence in its performance was no longer his biggest challenge. “We believe that the biggest problem for space innovation now is really not technology itself but the entrepreneurship involved. To open new markets in space, you have to convince people this is for real—and thus defy all those old stereotypes about how only big government agencies can undertake this sort of exploration.“That’s what’s great about this race,” he added. “Whoever wins will show it can be done.”A few steps from the Atlantic Ocean, on a giant patch of Florida scrubland visited by alligators, sea turtles, and the occasional bobcat, Cape Canaveral’s Space Launch Complex (SLC) 17 appears at first glance to be a relic. From 1957 to 2011, the site was used for both Thor and Delta rocket launches, the former for the country’s first ballistic missiles, the latter for satellites and solar system probes and for closer observation of the sun itself.On a pleasant March evening this year, the only sound at SLC-17 was a slight breeze from the sea whistling through the rusting towers of the complex. But behind a locked door in a former maintenance shed, the prototype vehicle belonging to the first U.S. company to receive government approval for a space mission beyond Earth orbit was ready to hit the beach—on its way, ultimately, to the moon.To Bob Richards, once an assistant to famed astrophysicist Carl Sagan and now head of Moon Express, the beauty of the company’s MX-1E lander design is its dual-purpose utility. “There’s no need for a rover at all if your landing craft can provide the same function,” Richards told me. In fact, he added, the Google Lunar XPrize is too often misconstrued as a rover competition.“The greatest challenge of the GLXP is to land on the moon,” he said. “Rovers can’t land on the moon themselves, and in fact the term ‘rover’ doesn’t appear in competition rules at all, just a requirement to accomplish mobility of at least 500 meters.”Thus was born the idea of hopping to victory by bouncing along with the help of thrusters. After an initial rocket launch to low-Earth orbit, the MX-1E—a single-stage robotic spacecraft that is shaped and sized more than a bit like R2-D2 of Star Wars fame—will blast away using a super-high-test hydrogen peroxide as its main propellant to travel at bullet speed on course for its lunar goal. After establishing lunar orbit, Moon Express’s vehicle will eventually achieve what engineers euphemistically call a “soft landing”: Aided by reverse thrust, the vertical descent will nonetheless be violent enough to require cushioning by a flexible landing-leg system capable of absorbing the blow and springing back with enough life to take on the next stage of the mission. With a small amount of fuel remaining, the MX-1E will take off on a big hop—or, perhaps, a series of smaller hops—to travel the required distance to win the XPrize.With his TED Talk–worthy profundities and an industry reputation (not always a positive one) for the gift of gab, Richards makes it all sound so brilliantly achievable that you’re tempted to invest. But there are arguments for holding on to your wallet—for one thing, Moon Express is currently slated for launch not with a proven carrier such as SpaceX, with its Falcon rocket lines, but instead with Rocket Lab, a U.S.-based company whose launch site at the Mahia Peninsula on the North Island of New Zealand opened this past September.Testing is just beginning this year, meaning that the firm will be on a very aggressive timetable to achieve the XPrize’s stipulation of an actual launch by the end of the year. Previous milestone deadlines have been extended, but XPrize says it is committed to wrapping up the competition soon. Thus it could conceivably end with no winner, though a foundation official insists it “really, really wants someone to win.”The other team aiming to hop the distance needed to win is based in a small complex of industrial buildings on the outskirts of Tel Aviv. Its leader is hardly less evangelistic than Richards.Moon Express, U.S. Cape Canaveral is home base for the team building the MX-1E lander. A pocket-size model of the craft takes center stage on a conference table during a lunch-and-learn session.Outside, team members take a break from the ongoing battery of tests to position their prototype for a photo session. Says Moon Express CEO Bob Richards: “What’s trending now is our shift to a spacefaring species, perhaps as significant as the transition of amphibians from the oceans to the land.”“Our vision is to re-create an ‘Apollo effect’ here in Israel, to really inspire a rising generation of kids to excel in science and technology,” said Eran Privman, a national hero and the CEO of SpaceIL, whose eclectic résumé includes combat experience as a pilot in the Israeli Air Force; a doctorate in computer science and neuroscience from Tel Aviv University; and a range of research, development, and executive posts for several major technology companies in Israel. He was referring to the impact the Apollo space programs had on youth in the 1960s and ’70s, when the enterprise’s successful missions inspired many of the founders of today’s leading high-tech companies.Roughly the size of a small refrigerator but more circular in shape—a bit like a flying saucer—SpaceIL’s lander is expected to weigh 1,323 pounds when it detaches from a SpaceX Falcon 9 rocket, though about two-thirds of that weight will be fuel used up by the time it is ready to land. With some residual spring action in its legs similar to the MX-1E’s, it will use the little fuel left to hop the nearly one-third of a mile set by the XPrize rules.The Israeli effort began in late 2010 as “three crazy guys with not a lot of money but with the thought that it would be really cool to land a robot on the moon.” That’s how co-founder Yariv Bash described the beginning to me during a visit to the testing lab for the lander’s main computer. They struggled down to the wire to meet an initial competition deadline requiring them to show plans for a landing strategy and at least $50,000 in assets.“We asked anybody we could for money,” Bash recalled. “It got to where I was asking my wife for money in my sleep.” While short on capital, the group was not short on know-how: Bash is an electronics and computer engineer who once headed R and D efforts for Israeli intelligence forces. (“You know Q in the James Bond movies?” Bash asked me with a wink. “It was a bit like that.”)Their initial designs were far smaller—one as small as a two-liter soda bottle—than the lander they are assembling with parts from around the world this summer. And rather than a for-profit enterprise, SpaceIL has wound up as the only nonprofit in the remaining field of XPrize competitors, with generous funding from two well-known billionaires, technology entrepreneur Morris Kahn and casino magnate Sheldon Adelson. Its mission now is essentially twofold—to win the prize, of course, but also to educate and inspire a new generation of potential tech leaders in a country often referred to as Start-up Nation.As in India, national pride is clearly on the line here. Virtually every school in Israel now has a teaching unit about the SpaceIL effort, and schoolkids will be closely following the mission once it blasts off for the moon, hoping theirs will become the first country ever to send a privately funded mission to explore the lunar surface.“We wanted all kids in Israel to be heads-up about this,” said Privman, adding with a laugh: “We want these kids to be able to explain to their parents what’s going on.”Enough with the hopping already. Hakuto, TeamIndus, and a California-based international consortium known as Synergy Moon all plan to use a separate, wheeled rover to gather data, which points up an arguable loophole in the rules: Hakuto could win by subcontracting out both launch and landing, only needing to deploy its Sorato rover to achieve victory. Gonzales-Mowrer, the XPrize race director, says that would be just fine: “We wanted teams to come up with various approaches to accomplishing the mission,” she explains. From a financing point of view, the main threshold is simply that competitors must show XPrize judges that at least 90 percent of their money comes from nongovernment sources.“It’s been fun to watch the teams network with each other and with outside providers to drive down the cost,” she said. “In that sense, the ultimate goal of this competition has already been achieved.”TeamIndus, India With ECA at rest, engineer Lakshman Murthy takes a break. The hundred-plus members of the team hope for dividends far greater than prize money. “There are superbright kids out there in the cities and in the remote parts of the nation,” says Sheelika Ravishankar (nicknamed “Jedi Master” by the team). “We need them to know anything is possible. We need to reach them.”If there is to be a giant Walmart—or perhaps an Ikea—for spacefaring ventures someday, then Interorbital Systems, the primary company behind the Synergy Moon consortium, is determined to fill that role. It aims to be “the lowest cost launch provider in the commercial space industry,” says its co-founder and CEO, Randa Relich Milliron. To do this, she explains, it will build rockets in modular, standardized units; use off-the-shelf components wherever possible, including industrial irrigation tubes and microcontrollers; and experiment with lower cost fuels such as turpentine as propellants.In her office at the Mojave Air & Space Port in the California desert, a hundred miles or so north of downtown Los Angeles, Milliron pointed with pride to the company brochure, which offers a do-it-yourself TubeSat Personal Satellite Kit for around $16,000, a price that “Includes Free Launch!” and could drop to $8,000 for high school or college students. Customers will assemble the tube (there is also a more expensive CubeSat available) and outfit it with whatever small additional gear they can fit, such as a camera for tracking migratory animals from orbit or sensors that can monitor weather conditions. The company plans to launch the personal satellites into orbit 192 miles above the Earth, a sufficient height to allow them to operate from three weeks to two months, depending on solar activity, after which the devices will burn up safely after reentering the atmosphere.Milliron and her husband, Roderick, have been working on and off for more than 20 years to get the company—and its rockets—off the ground. It’s safe to say that several remaining and former competitors in the GLXP race admire their pluck but doubt their chances. Even if they reach the moon with one of their DIY rockets, their plan to use a customized “throwbot” as their roving device on the moon has also raised eyebrows. (Throwbots, throwable robots, are frequently used by the military, police, and firefighters to provide video “eyes” in a location too dangerous to enter, such as a terrorist hideout, a suspected meth lab, or a burning building.)Even so, the couple and a small crew of employees press on in their warehouse set amid the large, military-issue sheds and Quonset huts that make up the spaceport side of the dusty desert complex—the other side of the runway is a giant “boneyard,” where commercial airliners such as old Boeing 747s and DC-10s have come to die, parked for good and waiting to be cut up for scrap.The Millirons say their initial launches will be from a barge at an ocean site off the California coast. With a humble budget they decline to quantify publicly, but with grand dreams they describe expansively, it is hard to know exactly what to make of them or of the Synergy Moon entry in the space race, which their firm essentially anchors. The team does have a verified launch contract, although it appears to be essentially with itself, since it’s the only entrant in the race planning to do all the things needed to win—launching, landing, roving, and transmitting—on its own.“Sometimes we feel like renegades or outcasts, building these rockets by ourselves,” said Randa Milliron on a tour of Interorbital’s workshop. “But that’s the whole point, really. We are disrupters. We are out to show the world this can all be done at truly radically lower costs.”From this Mojave Desert outpost to the Atlantic shore at Cape Canaveral, from the outskirts of Tel Aviv to the Japanese sand dunes and a Bangalore warehouse, all five teams are forging ahead on their respective missions. Each is driven to win—but each is also surprisingly friendly with its competitors. Over the past several years, even as the number of teams officially dwindled from 29 to 16 and down to the five remaining at time of writing, one of them has hosted an annual summit meeting for everyone else, as well as XPrize Foundation officials, with each leader offering a frank presentation on successes and setbacks to date. Alliances have formed, such as an agreement between TeamIndus and Hakuto to share a ride on the Indian space agency’s rocket and the Indus lander, essentially duking it out once they reach the moon. An industry is being born.“There’s really a ‘Yes We Can’ theme going on here,” says Rahul Narayan, the charismatic leader of the 112 members working for TeamIndus. “This is the time. How it will all evolve, exactly, I don’t know. I’m not sure anyone knows. But this is the time.”",
""In front of the mirror is the reflection my daughter loves to see," says photographer Enri Canaj, "and the reflection of the society I want to see after all this is over—a colorful playground, just like the one our house has turned into."Families are fluid, constantly changing shape through birth and marriage, death and divorce, love and friendship. Until now, when coronavirus has frozen families in place.From Normandy to Moscow to Johannesburg, illness and pandemic precautions are forcing families into intense intimacy or stark separation. There is no in-between. There are only the people you see every day, all day, and the people you can’t see, unless through a window or a video screen.What do families look like when they share too small a space—or can’t share any space at all? National Geographic and Magnum Photos photographers bring you a global look at how coronavirus is affecting the worlds they see inside—and just outside—their windows."On the fourth day of confinement, I was faced with a new reality," says Jean Gaumy. "My daughter, Marie, was sick with this virus. Her children were with her: They were certainly carriers, healthy but affected. Marie, feverish and sleep-deprived, bravely assumed her role while we, grandparents, could only approach at a distance from their window. Nearby, I encountered this duo, the girl the age of my own grandchildren, the young mother the age of my daughter. At their doorstep getting some fresh air, they seemed worried and stunned, surrounded only by silence. We exchanged a few words; the regulations of confinement did not permit more. I could only feel empathy.”"Family is family—it's where home is," says photographer Ian Teh. "Mine is at home with my partner. We are sitting by our favourite spot in our apartment, looking out to the nearby houses and greenery. It's peaceful.""I took this picture on one of the last walks I could have before people were advised to stay home," says photographer Rafal Milach. "These are my friends. We had a distant chat. I took a portrait and left to document my neighborhood in quarantine.""I used to think that without photography, I am nothing," says photographer Chien-Chi Chang. "It wasn't until I had kids that I realized that without love, I am less than nothing. Due to the nationwide lockdown here in Austria, I haven't been able to see my kids as often as I would like. That has been difficult.""I had a decision to make: Go back to Bangladesh and be with my family or stay in New York," says photographer Ismail Ferdous. "I chose to stay. Every day at 7pm, New York City claps for two minutes to show gratitude for all essential workers. At these moments I’m enveloped in our collective positive energy and feel validated for staying.""Being grounded is not a problem for me at all," says photographer Olivia Arthur. "I love having the chance to just be here with us all together. The hardest part is learning how to be teachers as well as parents and to find a line between the two.""Because of the current crisis and our small house, my family had to separate," says Lindokuhle Sobekwa. "My mother lives with my two nephews, my brother with my two sisters, and I stay with my girlfriend at her place. I think about the families of five or 10 that live in a shack and how difficult it's going to be for them to social distance.""I’m spending my days in the nutty, charming, and emotional rollercoaster world of two- and four-year-olds," says Jonas Bendiksen. "The world shrinks down and we’re in some sort of state of incredible right-here-and-nowness.""My son Milligan is learning how to tie a tie, into a Full Windsor naturally," says photographer Mark Power. "No Half Windsors for any son of mine!""I'm living in the flat of my grandmother, who passed away one year ago," says photographer Nanna Heitmann. "My parents live in Germany, where my mother emigrated after the collapse of the Soviet Union. A friend asked me how I would reach my parents in case they fell sick, and I realized that all Russian borders are closed. I suddenly feel like I'm living in another era when traveling outside of the country was impossible. I found this suitcase with many old pictures, which reminded me of how few photographs I've taken of my family, even though they are so important to me.""A friend 'took me along' on a Zoom call celebrating her niece's daughter's first birthday," says photographer Thomas Dworzak. "Previously when I covered a crisis, people at home didn't really understand or always care. Now all around the world, we are in the same situation.""Zubair, my partner, finishes the first part of the Asr prayer," says photographer Gulshan Khan. "It has been a while since we prayed together. We’ve lived such hurried lives.""This morning I sat in bed with a cup of coffee next to my older daughter Ava as she woke up," says photographer Gregory Halpern. "It was the kind of thing I would never do on a typical morning when we're all racing out the door. When she woke up, she told me she had two dreams last night: In the first one, she could fly; in the second one, her friends showed up at our house.""We are stressed after learning two of our nephews have been diagnosed with Covid-19," says photographer Emin Ozmen. "They are four and six years old, living in France, far from us. My wife Cloé is sitting on the couch, lost in her thoughts and hoping for the best for our loved ones.""Nearly all my adult life I've lived far away from my family and yet they were never more than a day's flight away," says Nichole Sobecki. "In this photo, my parents, brother, and I are gathered around a birthday cake. There’s a yellow glow about the image that defines home for me. Last week Kenya closed its airspace entirely. I look up now into the cool, blue sky above Nairobi and I see distance.""I usually spend two weeks at home and two weeks away on assignment every month," says Lynsey Addario, "so being in one household with my husband and children and my extended family—the same nine people—for an indefinite amount of time is really a novelty.""My mother, who is 76 years old, has been alone for the last two weeks," says photographer Cristina de Middel. "We used to talk two or three times a week when things were normal, but since she is isolated, she has become much more dependant. I now talk to her twice a day everyday, in the morning and to say good night before she goes to bed.""My daughters Merel and Fleur are on a video call with Merel’s friend Iris, who lives 100 meters from our house," says photographer Jasper Doest. "The girls are clearly not used to this way of communication and don’t know what to say. They start to ask each other random questions about the weather situation at their place, forgetting they are practically neighbors. When I start laughing, Merel pushes me away and wants her privacy."Photographer Sim Chi Yin is expecting a baby in three weeks or less. She's been told that many parents are giving birth at home to avoid the hospitals. She and her partner are considering it, although she is an older, first-time mother. "Dear Lucas," writes photographer Sim Chi Yin to her unborn son, "we will do our best to shield you from the worst of these times.""We are so lucky to live where we live," says photographer Jim Goldberg, describing a daily routine in which the pace of emails is slower but vegetables still need to be picked for his morning smoothie. His partner, the photographer Alessandra Sanguinetti, nuzzles a mule."Gabi is my friend, my neighbor, and my tai chi teacher," says photographer Luisa Dorr. "She has been living in this house, completely isolated, for a while. There's not even electricity or tap water. The good thing is that life here is pretty frugal, basic things are less expensive then in cities, and the community engagement is strong.""This image was created to resemble memories I have from when I lived with my family," says photographer Camilla Ferrari. "It's a screenshot from one of our video calls. I asked my mom to be my eyes and frame the images following my directions — it was something very new for us, this creative collaboration. Probably it’ll become a new shared memory.""After a few weeks of covering corona in New York, I decided I wanted to ride things out with family in the D.C. suburbs," says photographer Peter van Agtmael. "My parents are in their 70s, so first there was the necessity to self-quarantine for two weeks at my folks' place on the Eastern Shore of Maryland. For the first few days I was joined by my close friend Christian Hansen, who was en route to his own family in Kentucky. We kept six feet apart with one exception: He had to help me dig out a large glass shard that got stuck in my foot."",
"The photographer’s parents, Marco Negrello, 52, and Marilena Cecolin, 52, “attend” a Sunday Mass streamed from Rovigo’s cathedral. Younger daughter Illaria, 18, is engrossed in teenage networking.The pain inflicted by the COVID-19 pandemic has been particularly severe in Italy, a nation of 61 million people. On March 27 the Italian death toll surpassed 8,200—the world’s highest and more than twice the registered toll in China, a country of 1.4 billion.Those bleak health figures translate into enormous challenges for the nation’s Catholic priests, as well as for the parishioners who turn to them for consolation.Father Enrico Schibuola and two colleagues celebrate virtual Mass alone in the 1,100-year-old Rovigo cathedral, named for the martyred third-century Pope Saint Stephen.Father Enrico will use his cellphone to transmit the virtual Mass.During live streaming of the Mass, the faithful post prayers and comments on Facebook. “Many are from neighbors who were not churchgoers before now,” says Marilena, the photographer’s mother.Some 78 percent of adults in Italy identify as Catholic, according to Pew Research, and the linked histories of Italians and the Catholic Church reach back two millennia, to the very birth of Christianity and its establishment in Rome.The legacy of that relationship is a matchless treasure trove of monuments, paintings, and sculptures. An annotated map of Italy is not simply a record of its lengthy (and sometimes uneasy) ties to the Church, it is also a chronicle of Western civilization.Yet the record is also landmarked by calamities—wars, famines, and plagues. Since March 10, when Italy was ordered into a rigorous lock-down in a desperate effort to slow the COVID-19 contagion, its parishes have struggled to maintain their pastoral commitments while observing rules that could save countless lives.Massimo, 43, barred from attending the funeral of an acquaintance—dead of causes unrelated to the virus—follows a live broadcast of the ceremony.“Normal human contact was almost completely closed,” says Father Enrico Schibuola, a priest in the agricultural town of Rovigo, 30 miles south of Padova. “We had to turn elsewhere, to telephones, computers, and social networks to keep in touch with people and address their needs.”Rovigo-born photographer Chiara Negrello has been documenting the impact of the pandemic on her own family and neighbors. Her mother, who owns a small shop, has closed her business indefinitely. Her father works in a supermarket, an enterprise regarded as essential and allowed to remain open.The Cathedral of Rovigo sits dormant on an empty street at night. According to the Cathedral's website, the origins of the church are unknown, but it likely formed around the same time as Rovigo did between the 8th and 9th century.Father Claudio Gatti, a parish priest, surveys his empty church.Erika, 53, used to attend Mass every day. Now, she follows the livestream in the evening while praying the rosary.Cautionary efforts appear to have paid off. Rovigo and its surrounding province have so far confirmed fewer than 100 coronavirus cases in a population of 250,000. The Province of Cremona, 120 miles to the west, has identified more than 3,000 cases among 360,000 residents.Special parish services, including meetings with troubled children and panic-stricken families, are now conducted via telephone or video. Streaming plans have been set in motion for the Lenten season, Easter Sunday (April 12), and the feast of the Virgin Mary (May 1). “Virtual Masses” are broadcast weekly on Facebook, YouTube, and the Diocesan radio station.Social distancing is difficult everywhere, but it’s especially hard for Italians. A life without the public exchange of warm embraces and multiple kisses was unimaginable here—until it became a matter of life and death.Mourners gather for a funeral from a distance as a blessing is invoked over the closed coffin, with the promise that a Mass will be celebrated after the pandemic ends.The shock is most evident in the trimming back of events that engender strong emotions. Baptisms and marriages are conducted in churches closed to all except parents and legal witnesses. As for deaths, “We’re advised, even when someone is clearly in their final days of life, that we shouldn’t visit them at home or at the hospital,” Father Enrico says.There are staff priests at most hospitals, he added, and exceptional permits can be secured for home visits. But requests from parish families for such permits are in steep decline, notes photographer Negrello, “probably due to fear of the virus.”",
"Megachurch pastor Jack Graham usually preaches to a congregation of 7,000 at Prestonwood Baptist Church in Plano, Texas. Now he delivers sermons from a makeshift TV studio.The Church of St. Paul the Apostle stands one block from New York’s Columbus Circle. It is the second-largest Catholic church in the city, and this is Easter Week, the busiest time on the church calendar.But St. Paul’s is nearly empty, shuttered by COVID-19.“It’s surreal. Ordinarily at Easter we worry that the fire marshal is going to come and shut us down,” says Father Eric Andrews, president of the Paulist Fathers, who have been leading worship on this site since 1858.In more than a century and a half, St. Paul’s has never seen times like this. The churches of New York have never been closed before, not even for the devastating 1918 flu outbreak. This year, the Easter Sunday congregation at St. Paul's will be a bank of television cameras. (Here's how some cities "flattened the curve" during the 1918 flu pandemic.)Worldwide, the planet’s Catholics are coming to grips with worship in the time of COVID-19. Nowhere is that more evident than in Rome, where the Paulists run the city’s official American Catholic Church.“The Pope’s Mass is going to be weird,” says Andrews. “The place will be empty except for a handful of attendants. In past years the Pope has walked the Stations of the Cross at the Coliseum. On Holy Thursday he’s washed the feet of the poor, and those of Muslim refugees. It’ll all be different this year.”In Jerusalem, the cradle of Christianity, streets that are usually teeming for Easter observances will be ghostly quiet. (See Easter traditions from around the world.)St. Peter’s Basilica in Rome was all but empty when Pope Francis conducted the Palm Sunday service on April 5. He offered a prayer for those sickened by COVID-19, their families, and their caregivers.“International pilgrims will not be able to enter Israel, and internal pilgrims will not be able to enter Jerusalem,” says Anna Koulouris, a spokeswoman for Theophilos III, the Greek Orthodox Patriarch of Jerusalem.All of which leaves one medium for group worship: the internet.The Manhattan-based Paulist Fathers have a long tradition in video. Their syndicated TV anthology series, Insight, aired weekly for 25 years. But the Catholic Church as a whole has not caught up with its evangelical Protestant brethren when it comes to TV, and it showed in the first weeks of the COVID-19 shutdown.“It’s kind of like TV in the early 1950s,” laughs Andrews, who studied film at New York University. Still, what the video Masses lack in production value they make up for in spiritual enthusiasm—on the receiving end.“We’ve got pictures of families kneeling in front of their computer screens for the Consecration portion of the Mass,” Andrews says. “After I finished one streamed Mass, a parishioner called and said, ‘We loved the Mass, but I must say the wine we had at home was much better than yours!’”Worshiping in isolation, a family kneels for a televised Palm Sunday Mass in Niteroi, Brazil. The Catholic Church released the faithful from their Sunday obligation, but millions around the globe attended Mass remotely.On any given Sunday, the 7,000-seat worship center at Prestonwood Baptist Church north of Dallas, Texas, would be packed for multiple services. A band would be clustered together onstage, playing worship songs at just-this-side of respectful decibel levels. And the church’s food court would be teeming with families sharing a meal together.But this is not any given Sunday. Today pastor Jack Graham is preaching before a camera in a darkened church activity room-turned TV studio. The band is there, but the musicians are spaced 10 feet apart. As for the congregation, they’re somewhere beyond the camera lens, scattered across North Texas and beyond.“This is surreal,” Graham says, using the same word that I heard from faith leaders nationwide. “It’s like Groundhog Day, waking up to the same thing every day.”Graham is no stranger to the TV camera. For more than two decades his sermons have aired on his syndicated program, PowerPoint. But those talks are nearly all taped live in front of his congregation. Here, he’s had to change his style.“Usually, I get pretty passionate,” he says. “But now I have to act more like I’m just talking to one person. It’s just me, you, God, and a cup of coffee.”On Palm Sunday, he said, Prestonwood’s streamed morning service—its third since closing the doors—logged around 70,000 hits, representing an estimated 200,000 viewers.But megachurches also need small groups to engender and sustain a sense of community. Prestonwood has more than 200 groups, none of which can presently meet in person.“They’re all using Zoom,” says Graham, referring to the group video chat app that has found universal use under COVID-19. “I guess some of our older people are just using their cell phones. But the important thing is, they’re staying connected.”The fire marshal has never complained about crowds at Emmanuel Episcopal Church in Corry, Pennsylvania—population 6,300. Most Sundays you’ll find three dozen of the faithful scattered around a sanctuary that holds 150. For more than a century and a half, Emmanuel’s brick profile has been a landmark in a sleepy town whose claims to fame are two major league baseball players and the inventor of the fun house mirror.Rev. Mary Norton is strolling through the sanctuary, the sun filtering through its arched stained-glass windows. Don’t look for any TV cameras. Don’t ask where the church’s media center is.“When the bishop closed all the churches, I called all my parishioners on the phone,” Norton says. “It didn’t seem right to send an e-mail. People need that personal touch. Ours is a very loving, sharing congregation. When services went away, a big part of everyone’s lives did, too.”Keeping their distance, a handful of congregants attend a Palm Sunday communion service at Godspeak Calvary Chapel in Thousand Oaks, California. Trying to balance faith and health regulations, church members cycled in for communion, ten at a time, throughout the day.Then the congregation went online together. Now, Sunday services are a virtual gathering on Zoom. (In the midst of COVID-19, housebound Italians have embraced virtual Mass.)“The moment everyone could see each others’ faces, their eyes just lit up. They were so happy,” Norton says. “And when we all recited the Lord’s Prayer together, it was almost like hearing it for the first time. Just beautiful.”Bishop Charles Johnson arose early on a recent morning, dressed, and headed down to Greater Morning Star Apostolic Ministries in Largo, Maryland, where he’s been pastor since 1986. The church is closed due to COVID-19, and Johnson is presiding over live-streaming Sunday services for the duration.“Where are you going?” his wife Sheila asked. “I’m going to church,” he said. “It’s Sunday.”She smiled and shook her head. “It’s Saturday,” she said. “That’s the way I am these days,” Johnson says. “I can’t wait to get back to church. And everybody in our church feels the same way. We miss it.”On typical Sunday mornings at Greater Morning Star Apostolic, Johnson embraces the pulpit, his voice growling out the Gospel like the Lion of Judah. The church choir launches into a soaring rendition of “Take Me to the Water” and 1,300 congregants respond with shouts and blessings.“Now I’m live streaming,” Johnson sighs. “I go up to the pulpit and look out on the church where the congregation would be, and I see maybe one or two people. I try to preach with the same attitude, the same fervor, as though they were sitting there. They’re watching online. But I know them. All they want is to be back where they belong.”“It’s a wake-up call to the world—but also to the church,” says Bishop Johnson of the pandemic. “Some seldom came to church before. They figured it would always be here. But now they want to come and they can’t. I hope that when this is over they’ll think about that. Because we don’t know when a worship time will be our last.”Preachers have always proclaimed that “the church is not just bricks and sticks,” says Pastor Graham. “Now we get to live that. Events like this remind us of the urgency of our need for God—and the hope that in the midst of a mess like this there is a miracle coming, the miracle of renewal and regeneration and redemption.”Adds Father Andrews, “I keep saying to people, ‘This has happened before. Remember all those scriptures we’ve read through the years? About God’s people in exile? That was all to prepare us for moments like these.”In the fading light of her church, Rev. Norton is reminded of the story of two dejected disciples walking along the road to Emmaus following Christ’s crucifixion.“They are so forlorn,” she says. “They’ve placed all their bets on this man who they thought would be their savior and messiah, and now he’s dead. Then Jesus comes to walk alongside them. At first, they don’t recognize him, but when they do, they’re beyond happy. I think that’s sort of what we’re going through. We’ve been deprived of what we long for, and we’re really sad about it. But so what? He’s still right here!”After Easter, the Catholic and Episcopal church calendars count down 40 days to the feast of Pentecost. Then comes a long stretch, until Advent, called Ordinary Time.This year, Ordinary Time begins June 1. Ordinary never sounded so good.",
"Women perform a traditional Easter dance in Megara, Greece, in this autochrome photo from a 1930 issue of National Geographic magazine.April 21 marks the Christian holiday of Easter this year, which summons thoughts of dyed eggs, elaborate parades, religious theater, and chocolate bunnies. The holiday celebrates the resurrection of Jesus Christ, but it also has roots in the start of spring (hence, bunnies and eggs). (Read about unusual Easter traditions around the world.)Today, Christians recognize Easter on the first Sunday after the first full moon of spring, but there wasn’t always a unified idea of when it should be. In the third century, Easter was determined by the Jewish holiday of Passover, observed two weeks after the first full moon of spring. Christians celebrated Easter shortly after Passover, but different regions celebrated it on different days. In A.D. 325, the Christian Church established a unified Easter—which continues to the present.For many Christians, celebrations don’t start with Easter; they start the week before, during Holy Week, the last week of Lent. The days of the Holy Week represent milestones of Jesus’ life: Palm Sunday is his entry into Jerusalem, Maundy Thursday his last supper, Good Friday his crucifixion, and Easter Sunday his resurrection. And so the holiday carries echoes of a somber and profoundly religious death—and the renewal of life. (See pilgrims celebrating Holy Week in Jerusalem.)",
"Deirdre Barrett, a professor of psychology at Harvard University who studies dreams, made this photo illustration of a recent COVID-19 dream she had.Ronald Reagan pulled up to the curb in a sleek black town car, rolled down his tinted window, and beckoned for Lance Weller, author of the novel Wilderness, to join him. The long-dead president escorted Weller to a comic book shop stocked with every title Weller had ever wanted, but before he could make a purchase, Reagan swiped his wallet and skipped out the door.Of course, Weller was dreaming. He is one of many people around the world—including more than 600 featured in just one study—who say they are experiencing a new phenomenon: coronavirus pandemic dreams.Science has long suggested that dream content and emotions are connected to wellbeing while we’re awake. Bizarre dreams laden with symbolism allow some dreamers to overcome intense memories or everyday psychological stressors within the safety of their subconscious. Nightmares, on the other hand, can be warning signs of anxieties that we might not otherwise perceive in our waking lives.With hundreds of millions of people sheltering at home during the coronavirus pandemic, some dream experts believe that withdrawal from our usual environments and daily stimuli has left dreamers with a dearth of “inspiration,” forcing our subconscious minds to draw more heavily on themes from our past. In Weller’s case, his long-time obsession with comics came together with his constant scrolling through political posts on Twitter to concoct a surreal scene that he interpreted as a commentary on the world’s economic anxieties.At least five research teams at institutions across multiple countries are collecting examples such as Weller’s, and one of their findings so far is that pandemic dreams are being colored by stress, isolation, and changes in sleep patterns—a swirl of negative emotions that set them apart from typical dreaming.“We normally use REM sleep and dreams to handle intense emotions, particularly negative emotions,” says Patrick McNamara, an associate professor of neurology at Boston University School of Medicine who is an expert in dreams. “Obviously, this pandemic is producing a lot of stress and anxiety.”During our dream states, stress sends the brain on a trip. The neurobiological signals and reactions that produce dreams are similar to those triggered by psychedelic drugs, according to McNamara. Psychedelics activate nerve receptors called serotonin 5-HT2A, which then turn off a part of the brain called the dorsal prefrontal cortex. The result is known as “emotional disinhibition,” a state in which emotions flood the consciousness, especially during the rapid eye movement (REM) stage of sleep, when we typically dream.Though these processes happen nightly, most people don’t typically remember their dreams. Living through the coronavirus pandemic might be changing that due to heightened isolation and stress, influencing the content of dreams and allowing some dreamers to remember more of them. For one, anxiety and lack of activity decrease sleep quality. Frequent awakenings, also called parasomnias, are associated with increased dream recall. Latent emotions and memories from the previous day can also influence the content of dreams and one’s emotional response within the dream itself.According to an ongoing study the Lyon Neuroscience Research Center in France initiated in March, the coronavirus pandemic has caused a 35 percent increase in dream recall among participants, with respondents reporting 15 percent more negative dreams than usual. A different study promoted by Associazione Italiana di Medicina del Sonno (the Italian Association of Sleep Medicine) is analyzing the dreams of Italians confined during the outbreak. Many of the subjects are experiencing nightmares and parasomnias in line with symptoms of post-traumatic stress disorder.“Not surprisingly, some years ago when we studied survivors of the 2009 L’Aquila earthquake, we found that sleep disorders and also nightmares strictly depended on the proximity to the epicenter,” says Luigi De Gennaro, a professor of physiological psychology at the University of Rome who is working on the Italian coronavirus study. “In other words, the seismic map mostly overlapped that of sleep disturbances.”Results from De Gennaro’s ongoing research and other work such as the Lyon study suggest that people closer to the pandemic threat—health-care workers, those living in epicenters, and those with affected family members—are more likely to experience outbreak-influenced dreams.Multiple studies have shown that our waking activities create a slide reel of memories that influence the content of our dreams. Emotions carried over from the day can influence what we dream about and how we feel about it within the dream itself. Reducing or restricting sources of everyday memories—by being stuck alone in quarantine—may limit the content of dreams or cause the subconscious to reach for deeper memories.It may seem obvious, but Finnish researchers have scientifically backed up the notion that peace of mind leads to a “positive dream affect,” wherein dreamers feel good about what is happening in their dreams. Anxiety, by contrast, is related to “negative dream affect,” the data show, which results in dreams that are frightening or otherwise upsetting.Deirdre Barrett, assistant professor of psychology at Harvard University and author of The Committee of Sleep, has collected and analyzed dreams from the survivors of traumatic events, including the September 11 World Trade Center Attacks. Barrett has found that dreams in which people process traumas tend to follow two patterns: They either directly reference or re-enact a version of the traumatic event, or the dreams are fantastical, with symbolic elements standing in for the trauma.In Barrett’s latest sample of coronavirus dreams, which she began collecting in March with this survey, some participants reported dreaming they caught the virus or were dying of it. In another set of dreams Barrett collected, participants replaced fear of the virus with a metaphoric element, such as bugs, zombies, natural disasters, shadowy figures, monsters, or mass shooters.“Except for the [dreams of] health-care workers, we don't see vivid visual imagery of people struggling to breathe on the ventilator,” Barrett says. “The virus is invisible, and I think that’s why it’s transformed into so many different things.”For all their variety, the one thing many pandemic dreams have in common is how weird they seem to participants in the studies. “It may be one of the mechanisms used by the sleeping brain to induce emotional regulation,” says Perrine Ruby, a researcher at the Lyon Neuroscience Research Center.For those experiencing coronavirus nightmares, there is growing evidence that so-called “dream mastery techniques” can alleviate their suffering.When Barrett works with patients on “scripting” their own dreams, she often asks how they want the nightmare to be different. After a patient figures out their dream’s new direction, they can write it down and rehearse it before bed. These scripts range from more mundane solutions, like fighting off attackers, to more “dreamlike” scenarios, such as shrinking the attacker down to the size of an ant.For those seeking to wrest some control over bad dreams, focusing on the “bizarre” may help, says Ruby, the researcher from Lyon. “Changing the context—the laws of physics and so on—may change the perspective [and] propose another angle, a shift in the understanding which may help to change or play down emotion.”",
"Rosem Morton, a nurse at a Baltimore hospital, writes her name on the hood of her powered air purifying respirator (PAPR), which attaches to a machine that filters the air. She has to wipe and reuse the hood for the duration of the coronavirus pandemic.Everyone knows, generally, about the grueling job, rough conditions, and valiant work by doctors, nurses, and aides on the frontlines of the fight to save lives from the coronavirus pandemic. Baltimore nurse Rosem Morton provides the details in her journal of eight days at the front.At the hospital where Morton works, staff are balancing caring for patients with a limited supply of personal protective gear, while trying to keep track of shifting protocols. Morton, also a photographer and a recipient of a National Geographic Explorer grant, has been chronicling her day-to-day experiences. From being fit for a N95 mask to worrying about her hours, she and her colleagues are up close and personal with the virus every day. Read on to find out what it's like to be a nurse in the time of coronavirus.Days since the first confirmed case of coronavirus in Maryland: 12Days since the first known coronavirus patient was admitted to the hospital where I work: sixMorton tucks loose strands of hair into her disposable surgical hat. She used to wear cloth hats in the operating room but she didn't want to risk transmitting coronavirus when she brought them home to wash.A sticker in the hospital locker room reminds Morton to take it one day at a time.As I scramble to leave for work, I realize my routine has changed. My lunch box is replaced by a plastic bag. I used to carry a glass container, a cloth napkin, metal utensils, and a water bottle. I cringe at the waste from single-use plastics, but I tell myself that minimizing items I bring home lessens the risk for everyone. I leave behind my purse and stuff my pockets with my badge, scissors, and a pen.Morton and her husband get ready for work. He is a nurse at a different hospital.I arrive at work before sunrise. The main rotating door is closed. In front of it is a sign reading “COVID Response,” showing the new rules that limit entry to the hospital. Hospital employees form a silent line, spaced for social distancing, to filter in through a side door. Today is one of the last days I would call “business as usual.” While much of the administrative staff has moved to working remotely, everyone else is still here.At lunch, coronavirus is all we talk about: Labor and delivery nurses have been moved to the emergency department, another hospital has only a four-day supply of personal protective equipment. Are we all wondering the same thing? What does this mean for us? (Follow our comprehensive COVID-19 coverage.)Confirmed cases of coronavirus in Maryland: 85With visitors prohibited and most surgeries canceled, the hospital feels empty.Today is the first day that medical workers will perform only emergent and urgent operations. After all the cancellations of other surgeries, there’s more staff than usual to help out. I serve as a scrub nurse assisting the surgeon for neurosurgery, one of my favorite specialties. I realize then that a lot of the surgeries I help in are emergent and urgent. Maybe I won’t feel the disruptions of COVID-19 that much after all.Many of us finish early and wonder what’s next. As a longstanding per diem employee, I know it will only be a matter of time before they cut my hours, unless I prove myself useful.Morton changes her scrubs before and after work. She used to carry a bag with her. Now she just stuffs her pockets with essentials that can easily be wiped down.Morton practices surgical hand scrubbing in the operating room.My husband, an RN, comes home from taking care of the first high-suspicion coronavirus patient in his unit. He was a charge nurse and didn’t need to take care of patients today. But he volunteered, because he recognized that many of his coworkers were nervous. This is a beautiful example of what healthcare providers all over the world are doing. (This is what physicians do and don't know about treating coronavirus.)I get a text asking if I’m willing to be floated to other roles in the hospital. I say yes.Confirmed cases of coronavirus in Maryland: 149I walk up to the front desk of the operating room to check my assignments for the day. Several powered air-purifying respirators (PAPRs) hang on an IV pole as though on display. Rows of batteries blink as they charge on a metal table. There is a box of PAPRs off to the side. Something is brewing but I don’t have time to investigate.I enter the operating room to be scrub nurse for a neurosurgery case. I throw myself into a steady rhythm, just as I have done for many years: Gathering supplies, checking sterility, and arranging instruments. I am in my own world, a mental reprieve. It's short-lived.The anesthesia staff walks in with PAPRs—hoods that go over the head and are attached to a machine that filters air. We learn that the hospital’s new recommendation for respiratory procedures, such as intubation and extubation, is for medical staff to wear PAPRs or N95 masks, because of the risk that the COVID-19 virus will spread through the air.The recommendation seems late, given how the pandemic is progressing, and difficult to fulfill. The majority of us have not been fitted for a N95 mask. We only have 30 PAPR machines in our unit to share among hundreds of staff members. The solution? Anesthesia staff get PAPRs and N95 masks and the rest of us leave the operating room during respiratory care. But if COVID-19 is indeed in the air, there wouldn’t be enough time for those particles to settle by the time we return. This is our first true glimpse of our limited resources. It doesn’t bode well for what’s to come. (Here’s why the U.S. doesn’t have enough medical supplies.)Confirmed cases of coronavirus in Maryland: 349Total deaths in Maryland: fourMy walk through the hospital is unsettling. There are “no visitors” signs everywhere. I wonder how our patients are faring, being hospitalized alone.Halfway down the stairs to the operating rooms, I pause at the sight of a crowd below. The morning staff is packed into the main hallway, wearing masks. Supervisors are giving us a quick rundown of the new rules. Procedures are changing day to day, sometimes every few hours. For now, we are shutting down some operating rooms and staggering surgeries to share the machines that power the PAPRs. It’s a huge relief to have better protection than last Friday.Morton wears a PAPR to prepare for an airway surgery. The hospital staff is being highly cautious in cases that could propel COVID-19 particles into the air.A few minutes later, I hear my name called, and a PAPR is placed in my hands. There’s an emergency case that needs COVID-19 precautions, and I am staffing it for the day.Confirmed cases of coronavirus in Maryland: 423I am assigned to another surgery, one that enters through the patient’s nose. I ask for a PAPR and realize there aren’t any. Someone decided that this isn’t an airway surgery and that staff don’t need protection. An unspoken dialogue passes between me and the other nurse. We ask for personal protective equipment before we agree to staff this surgery. We are provided with the equipment.The hospital has decided on hard rules for protective equipment. As a nurse in the operating room, I get a PAPR. But I worry that I will be limited by the number of PAPR machines we share. I use my break to get fitted for an N95 mask, just in case. There have been long lines for them throughout the week.I assumed the fit testing, as the process is called, would consist of teaching us how to wear the masks properly. It was so much more than that. Over the N95 masks, we are asked to wear a large white hood. To test the seal of the mask, a supervisor sprays a test substance through a hole in the hood and checks if we detect a bitter taste. We move our heads side to side and up and down. We read a lengthy paragraph. We walk around. It took me a couple of tries to perfect the seal.I think about the public, the people who bought their own N95s and never had access to a fitting. They are under the false assumption that they are protected. A small mistake in sealing the mask could be fatal.After another surgery, I rush to a class called “Donning and Doffing.” We practice putting on and removing the personal protective equipment health workers use in units designated for COVID-19 patients. We practice hand hygiene before donning a yellow gown, multiple layers of gloves, a bouffant scrub cap, a reusable respirator, and a face shield. We try to commit the steps to memory. Removing the protective gear is an even more meticulous process.Confirmed cases of coronavirus in Maryland: 580Staff are stationed in each hallway to help remove personal protective equipment. They serve as runners to minimize comings and goings in airborne precaution rooms. They make sure PAPRs are wiped for reuse. At a desk near the operating rooms, staff distribute the machines. They are keeping very close tabs on them. We cannot afford to lose a single one. People murmur to each other, “Have you been fit tested yet?”The hospital's operating rooms are less busy than they were before the pandemic. Only urgent and emergent surgeries are being performed and only when personal protective equipment is available.Confirmed cases of coronavirus in Maryland: 992Total deaths in Maryland: fiveThere is one more procedure to go for the day, another airway-related case. I carefully don my PAPR over my surgical mask and hat. I wear a flimsy yellow gown over my scrubs. It comes with thumb holders to secure my sleeves. I tie the gown tightly in the front. I grab the smallest blue gloves to cover my hands, and I enter the operating room.Morton takes a self-portrait of her reflection in a mirror at the intersection of two corridors. The empty hallways are an eerie reminder of the pandemic.The surgeons have been waiting for some time and want to get going but the surgical technologist has no PAPR hood. We have run out. Another nurse with a hood takes her place. During the surgery we argue about the new policies and procedures. Things have been changing so frequently that we all have different information. It has become difficult to discern fact from fiction.Confirmed cases of coronavirus in Maryland: 1,660Total deaths in Maryland: 18As I swipe my badge on the time clock, a new screen pops up. It asks if I have any symptoms of cough, sore throat, and fever. I click no and wonder what happens when people say yes. I hope I never have to say yes.Rosem Morton is still healthy and working as a nurse in Baltimore. At the time of publication, Maryland had 2,758 coronavirus cases and 42 deaths, four in Baltimore.",
"A victim of the Covid-19 virus is evacuated from the Mulhouse civil hospital, eastern France, Monday March 23, 2020. The Grand Est region is now the epicenter of the outbreak in France, which has buried the third most virus victims in Europe, after Italy and Spain.Medical studies on COVID-19 are being released at a breakneck pace, often generating confusion over simple matters such as which pain relievers to take, or how to care for sick family members at home.For guidance, National Geographic turned to leading physicians and researchers across the U.S. and Canada for their recommendations on in-home care, as well as when to seek medical attention.The good news is that approximately 80 percent of all COVID-19 cases exhibit only mild to moderate symptoms that don’t require hospitalization. Doctors recommend that these patients self-isolate, stay hydrated, eat well, and manage their symptoms as best they can.For taking care of the fever associated with many illnesses, including COVID-19, physicians suggest taking acetaminophen—known internationally as paracetamol—before ibuprofen. If the fever persists, patients should then consider switching to ibuprofen, says Julie Autmizguine, a pediatric infectious disease specialist at CHU Sainte-Justine in Montreal, Canada.She and other doctors express this preference because ibuprofen and related drugs—called NSAIDs for short—can have harmful side effects, including kidney injury, stomach ulcers, and gastrointestinal bleeding.However, this warning does not mean that ibuprofen and NSAIDs worsen outcomes with the coronavirus, as viral news stories suggested last week after the French Ministry of Health said the drugs should be avoided during COVID-19 therapy.“I don’t know that NSAIDs have been shown to be a bad problem for this disease or for any coronavirus,” says coronavirus expert Stanley Perlman, a pediatrician and immunologist at the University of Iowa’s Carver College of Medicine.Acetaminophen also comes with hazards, and people should take it only if they are not allergic or do not have existing liver damage. The medication is safe at total daily doses of less than 3,000 milligrams, but exceeding this daily maximum can risk liver injury or worse.“Acetaminophen overdose is the most common cause of acute liver failure in the United States,” says José Manautou, a toxicologist at the University of Connecticut School of Pharmacy.People should make sure to account for all the medicines they are consuming, since over-the-counter medicines that target flu symptoms and some sleep aids often contain acetaminophen. People should also avoid drinking alcohol when taking acetaminophen. The liver relies on the same substance—glutathione—to temper the toxic potential of of both alcohol and acetaminophen. If you consume too much of both, it can cause toxins to accumulate in the body. (Once your body's infected, this is what coronavirus does.)Medical teams are working nonstop to learn how to best treat COVID-19, and over the last week, U.S. President Donald Trump has joined the fray by voicing his support for two drugs that have existed for decades—the antibiotic azithromycin, and a version of the antimalarial drug chloroquine.In truth, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration has not approved hydroxychloroquine—most often used to treat rheumatoid arthritis and lupus—for use with COVID-19, though it has approved a test in combination with azithromycin that is now slated for New York. Meanwhile, health officials around the world, including Anthony Fauci, the head of the U.S. National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, are urging caution about the drugs.“Many of the things that you hear out there are what I had called anecdotal reports,” Fauci said in a press briefing on Saturday for the White House coronavirus task force. “My job is to ultimately prove without a doubt that a drug is not only safe, but that it actually works."The chloroquine narrative started with several small studies from China and France—both of which have shortcomings and offer few lessons for patients at large. The French results are based on only 36 people and focus on the patients’ viral load, or the amount of virus in the body. Indeed, the only patients to die or to be sent to intensive care in the French study had taken hydroxychloroquine.“We don’t have data from randomized, controlled trials telling us how chloroquine worked in real people,” says Annie Luetkemeyer, an HIV and infectious diseases specialist at the University of California, San Francisco, Department of Medicine.Self-medication with hydroxychloroquine and azithromycin may also come with hazards, as the two drugs might stress the heart and increase the risk of arrhythmia. On Monday, the president vowed to send New York thousands of doses of the combo for an FDA trial, not long after an Arizona hospital reported one of its patients died after self-medicating on chloroquine phosphate, a form of the compound used to clean aquarium tanks. Nigerian health officials reported two cases of chloroquine overdoses over the weekend.“The last thing that we want right now is to inundate our emergency departments with patients who believe they found a vague and risky solution that could potentially jeopardize their health,” Daniel Brooks, the medical director of the Banner Poison and Drug Information Center in Phoenix, says in a statement.ACE inhibitors, drugs that are used widely to treat high blood pressure, have also come under fire during the COVID-19 crisis, with some reports suggesting that patients should stop taking these medications if they develop symptoms.In a series of letters in the British Medical Journal, Nature Reviews Cardiology, and The Lancet Respiratory Medicine, researchers raised questions over whether ACE inhibitors might help establish coronavirus infections in people’s lungs. The concern stems from the fact that SARS and the new coronavirus enter cells by latching on to a protein called angiotensin-converting enzyme 2, or ACE2 for short. The protein abounds on the surfaces of cells in the heart and lungs, where it helps regulate a hormone that affects blood pressure constriction.One consequence of ACE inhibitors is that they may prompt cells to make more ACE2. A 2005 study found evidence of such an increase in mice, and a 2015 study in humans found increased ACE2 levels in the urine of patients who were taking a medication related to ACE inhibitors.But there is no current evidence that ACE inhibitors worsen COVID-19 outcomes in humans, according to the American Heart Association, the European Society of Cardiology’s Council on Hypertension, and a March 20 review published in the European Heart Journal. Doctors’ overriding advice is that if you’ve been prescribed a medication, continue taking it until told otherwise by your medical provider.“We should neither be starting nor stopping these medications until we have much more information,” Luetkemeyer says.People with high blood pressure and heart disease do appear to be at higher risk for COVID-19, but that probably has more to do with the underlying ailments themselves. What’s more, ACE inhibitors may have anti-inflammatory properties, which may help the lungs of COVID-19 patients better cope with the infection. (Learn how these underlying conditions make coronavirus more severe.)“That would be a key study, to compare people with high blood pressure plus or minus these drugs, to see if there’s any difference,” Perlman says. “But it’d be very hard to do, and probably very hard to ethically justify.”“By all means, if you’re having emergency breathing symptoms or something’s troublesome, we do want you to seek emergency attention,” says Purvi Parikh, an allergy and infectious disease specialist at NYU Langone in New York City. If you choose to seek help at a local hospital, here’s one example of what you might expect.At the Inova Health System’s flagship hospital in Fairfax, Virginia, staff have set up an outdoor tent to separate people reporting respiratory ailments from those with other illnesses. The two groups are processed in different parts of the waiting room, separated by at least six feet of space.Due to a shortage of tests across the U.S., doctors at Inova and other hospitals say that if people arrive with mild symptoms, these patients are told to assume they have COVID-19 and are encouraged to self-quarantine to prevent overloading the nation’s roughly 920,000 staffed beds.For those arriving with serious symptoms such as difficulty breathing, health care workers start by focusing on the patient’s oxygen levels, blood pressure, and the amount of fluid in their lungs—all in an effort to keep their condition stable. They also try to manage fever, which can cause discomfort and lead to cell damage.The most severe cases of COVID-19 require putting a patient on a mechanical ventilator—a device that cycles air in and out of a person’s lungs—for more than a week at a time. That’s why health officials are so concerned about a coming ventilator shortage. The Society of Critical Care Medicine says that up to 200,000 ventilators exist in U.S. hospitals, but some are older and might not effectively treat COVID-19. Meanwhile, one rough estimate suggests that more than 900,000 Americans could get COVID-19 and need a ventilator.The worst cases of COVID-19 can result in what’s called acute respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS), a serious lung injury that can be caused by many types of severe infections. Hospitals have well-defined methods for how to handle ARDS. Patients should be placed on their stomachs to improve the lungs’ ability to ventilate, and not be given too many fluids. In addition, ARDS patients’ ventilators should be set to cycle lower volumes of air, to minimize the stress on the alveoli, the lungs’ tiny subchambers.Inside hospital rooms, staff are taking care to minimize the use of equipment that may release respiratory droplets, such as oxygen support devices that push air into the lungs. Other hospitals are using extra caution with devices called nebulizers, which convert liquid medicines into breathable mists, since the mists could potentially hoist SARS-CoV-2 aloft. (Here's why soap is preferable to bleach in the fight against coronavirus.)Researchers and physicians around the world are now racing to properly test whether various preexisting medicines might be coopted into the fight against COVID-19. Physicians interviewed by National Geographic expressed the most hope over remdesivir, an antiviral medication being developed by Gilead Sciences.“The only one I’d hang my hat on is remdesivir,” Perlman says.Remdesivir works by mimicking a building block of viral RNA, impeding the virus’s ability to multiply. One widely reported Chinese study, published on February 4 in Cell Research, reported that remdesivir disrupted the replication of SARS-CoV-2 in the lab. But the drug is still experimental and has experienced setbacks in the past. Remdesivir was originally developed to fight Ebola, but its clinical trials in humans ultimately failed.Regardless, finding a viable treatment requires rigorously controlled human clinical trials, which will take some time to conduct. “In retrospect, it would have been nice if we had put more efforts into anti-coronavirus drugs,” Perlman adds. “Easy to say now, [but] five months ago, not so easy.”",
"Farmworkers in Ivanhoe, California climb ladders to pick naval oranges. They have been designated "essential workers" by the federal government during the COVID-19 crisis.While millions of Americans shelter in place to prevent the spread of COVID-19, farmworkers on California’s cool central coast move from row to row, carefully picking fat strawberries and packing them into boxes to ship country-wide.Farmworkers have been labeled essential workers during the COVID-19 pandemic, critical to keeping the U.S.’s food supplies flowing. But they are worried. Their communities are particularly vulnerable to the impacts of the disease, and for many of them, information and protection from the disease has not been forthcoming.So far, there are no reports of infected farmworkers. But the entire supply chain for fresh produce could be endangered if the virus sweeps through rural agricultural communities with as much force as it has elsewhere.Many farmworkers are poor, with little or no access to health care. Many suffer from respiratory diseases that make them more susceptible to COVID-19, the illness caused by the coronavirus. Many live in crowded households and commute to work together, providing them with little opportunity for social distancing. All of these things make them targets for illness.“Many are afraid to go to work, but also afraid not to,” says Juvenal Solano, a farmworker advocate in Oxnard, California.There’s no word for “virus” in Mixtec, the indigenous Mexican language spoken by many of the thousands of farmworkers currently picking strawberries in California’s Ventura and Oxnard Counties.  When the coronavirus started to take hold in nearby cities, Genevieve Flores-Haro and her colleagues at MICOP, a nonprofit that supports indigenous farmworkers along California’s central coast, scrambled to communicate the virus’ risks to their community. “There’s a sickness going around with these symptoms,” they explained in over 20 different dialects of indigenous languages like Mixtec and Zapotec, which they broadcast over and over again on their local radio station and social media channels.At Excelsior Farming, in Hanford, California, farmworkers are presented with new safety protocols intended to prevent the spread of coronavirus.“There’s a storm coming for us, and we’re worried,” says Flores-Haro.(Read about how coronavirus is impacting food insecurity on a local scale).For weeks, grocery store shelves have been unusually bare, stripped of flour, yeast, milk, beans, and more—staple foods many rely on. “This temporary supply chain disruption has been like nothing we’ve ever seen,” says Dawn Thilmany, an agricultural economist at Colorado State University.  So far, those shortages have developed because of the unprecedented demand on the system instigated by the sweeping stay-at-home orders across the nation. Shoppers, worried about shortages and trying to prepare for lockdowns, snapped up the in-stock supplies.  The complex supply chain network should be well equipped to catch up. And so far, experts say food shortages are not looming either in the U.S. or abroad. But that doesn’t mean everything will continue to be as available and plentiful as it has been. Some kinds of food, like fresh produce? That’s another question entirely, says Megan Konar, a civil engineer and supply chain expert at the University of Illinois, at Urbana-Champaign. “The main potential choke point in the supply chain is produce,” she says.Usually, the supply chain for fresh fruits and vegetables is tight, with grocery stores, restaurants, and other businesses getting just enough deliveries just in time to sell what they can without too much going to waste. But COVID-19-related disruptions—from unprecedented demand for some products to changes in staffing at stores and warehouses, and more—upended many of the systems that usually work nearly seamlessly, leaving some distribution centers overstocked but grocery stores denuded of things like lettuce.As a result, trucks of tomatoes and squash have been dumped as waste and small oceans of milk discarded. Experts don’t expect this kind of disruption to continue, assuming the people working in all those supply chain links stay healthy. But if workers get sick, the situation could change quickly.“We’re seeing this worry, when grocery stores run out of toilet paper or water, we’re seeing this chaos—just imagine if there were no fresh food,” says Joe del Bosque, a California-based farmer. Because his critical harvest season is just getting started, del Bosque says farmworkers are needed “now more than ever.”So far, there are no reports of farmworkers having come down with COVID-19. But the reliability of that information isn’t clear because testing has been limited in many of the rural regions farmworkers live in, says Andrea Delgado, the government affairs director at United Farm Workers Foundation.Farmers, farmworkers, and other people involved in agriculture have been labeled “essential” by the U.S. government, their roles deemed critical to keeping the nation fed during the growing coronavirus crisis.Carlos Gutiérrez welcomes workers as they gather their ladders and get ready for a day of picking oranges.But in the U.S., roughly 50 percent of them are undocumented and exempt from the employment relief offered by the CARES stimulus package, signed by President Trump on March 27. They’re also excluded from the expanded health care protections in the Family First Coronavirus Response Act. That means they will not receive economic support, nor do they have access to the expanded paid sick leave provided for in the acts.The stresses are already growing for many farmworkers across California, and the virus hasn’t yet hit many of the rural communities in which they live. Eugenia Gonzales, a farmworker in Parlier, California, has watched as food prices in her local store spiked, if there was even anything left to buy; bottled water became scarce and expensive; the masks she wears to protect against dust disappeared; and the nearby hospital braced for the worst.“We can’t even afford to eat right now,” she says.Right now, the picking season should just be gearing up in many parts of the agricultural West. But Gonzales is also concerned that her season won’t even start. She’s been getting ready to prune grapes in a week or two; then, she’ll care for the crops until the picking season in early autumn. But her small town is still bracing for the impact of the virus, and Eugenia is worried that local health resources won’t be sufficient to handle an outbreak.“This is a population that is considered to be essential workers, but they’re invisible,” says Myrna Martinez Nateras, a program director at the American Friends Service Committee, where she works with farmworkers in the Fresno, California region.Many farmworkers are receiving mixed or no signals from their employers about how to protect themselves, says Lucas Zucker, the police director of the Central Coast Alliance United for a Sustainable Economy. Many told Zucker that as of the last week of March, they had not received information from their employers about the virus or been given access to resources that would help them follow recommended strategies for holding the virus at bay.Farmworkers climb ladders to pick naval oranges in this orange orchard in Ivanhoe in the Central Valley.“Everything that’s a systemic problem for farmworker safety under normal times is magnified right now,” says Zucker.Some farms, though, have taken the crisis seriously. On del Bosque’s farm—which he says is some 50 miles from the nearest place to get tested for the virus‑—the finicky asparagus crop needs careful handling and workers to pick the delicate stalks. As a precaution, pickers work a row apart at all times, and del Bosque added extra wash stations for hand cleaning.“The fear is really there,” says del Bosque, “that someone could get sick and then a lot of people get sick.”But the pressure to continue to work under any and all conditions is high. In harvest season, many workers are paid by the piece—strawberry by strawberry, rather than hourly—creating a huge incentive to work as quickly as possible filling boxes. And for many workers, because they lack sick leave, taking time off work if they feel sick is somewhere between difficult and impossible.The potential economic losses across the food sector can’t yet be gauged, agricultural economists say. But some early indications hint that the sector is taking a significant hit from the economic shutdown associated with the virus. Local food agricultural markets, which serve farmers markets, schools, restaurants, and more, are looking at more than $1 billion losses between March and May unless more actions are taken to support their businesses, says Thilmany.About half of California’s produce ends up in restaurants, schools, and other institutions, says Cory Lunde of the Western Growers Association, a trade group that works with farmers. Those markets evaporated as counties and states told residents to stay home.One concern for some farmworkers is masks. Farms can get hot and dusty, and they often use N95 masks to protect their lungs as they plant and pick. But masks are in short supply now. MICOP donated thousands to local health workers, and organizers hope supply will rebound soon.The kinds of impacts Thilmany and others anticipate will occur assuming farmworkers show up to their jobs healthy. If the coronavirus spread to them, effects on the food sector would be nearly inevitable.Gonzales, like many other farmworkers, are proud to be labeled “essential” and to play a role in the effort to keep food available for millions of U.S. residents. But she’s also dismayed that more isn’t being done to support farmworkers.“If we’re essential, we need help,” Gonzales says in Spanish. “Because we’re the people feeding the country.”The Calleja brothers leave work after picking naval oranges all day, getting ready for their drive home. Many farmworkers commute to and from their job sites together. But it's difficult to practice social distancing in a car or van.",
"Volunteers hand out food and other goods to hundreds of people in Everett, Massachusetts on March 20, 2020 amid the COVID-19 crisis.In the best of times, the United States wastes 40 percent of its food annually, amounting to about 63 million tons. The collective response to the coronavirus pandemic, from panic buying at grocery stores to restaurant closures, is bound to inflate that percentage, food loss experts say, at a time when food insecurity is on the rise.The biggest source of food waste in America is households, where produce wilts, milk spoils, and leftovers lurk at the back of the fridge until they are tossed. Now, anxious consumers who have been hoarding food may discover there’s no way they can eat everything they’ve bought. Says Frank Franciosi, of the U.S. Composting Council, “We may see municipal curbside collection of food waste go up as more people eat in or take out.”Indeed, San Francisco, which has long collected both residential and commercial food scraps from curbsides, has already seen an impact.“People are cooking more at home,” says Robert Reed, of Recology, the company that handles the city’s discards. “Tonnages of food scraps from single-family homes and apartments are up.” New York City’s curbside collection of food scraps has also seen an uptick over the past two weeks.Waste at restaurants—where Americans typically spent about half their food dollars before the coronavirus hit—is plummeting as eateries shut down. But it’s likely to rise at those shifting to a take-out-only model.“This is a period of colossal readjustment,” says Andrew Shakman, founder of LeanPath, which develops technology to reduce waste in the food-service industry. “Food waste per meal tends to increase for our customers when their sales volumes are lower, so we expect operations that are running at partial speed to become more wasteful per meal served.”Then there are farms, where, even in the best of times, growers leave as much as half their crops in the field, largely because of cosmetic imperfections. Now, produce growers fear that even more crops will go unharvested. U.S. immigration policy has constrained visas for workers entering the country, and the arrival of 200,000 seasonal migrants is in doubt. And because living conditions for farm laborers are crowded, making them especially vulnerable to the coronavirus, illness could keep many from working once they arrive.With restaurants, schools, caterers, corporate cafeterias, and some farmers markets shutting down, farmers also have fewer outlets for their highly perishable produce, exacerbating a supply bulge.Finding new markets for crops that don’t keep, like leafy greens, is difficult. “Farmers planned for their sales outlets months ago when they planted,” says Ben Feldman of the Farmers Market Coalition. “If their markets are forced to close and they can't pivot to other sales outlets, that produce will rot in the field.”"Hoop houses and greenhouses were already producing in the southern half of the U.S.," says Eric J. Deeble of the National Sustainable Agriculture Coalition. "Now those farmers are sitting on a lot of produce. There's no home for it."In the face of all these coronavirus challenges to the supply chain, what can be done? At home, cooks need to learn how to maintain everything they've bought.“This is a great time to learn how to store your produce so you have more time to use it,” says Dana Gunders, executive director of ReFED, which works with businesses, nonprofits, and governments to reduce food waste and loss. “Freezing food is a really effective strategy to reduce waste,” she says.“People also need to better understand date labels on food”—there’s no reason to toss food after its “best before” date, for example—“and how to prepare batches of food that can be eaten later.” Gunders wrote an entire book on the subject, The Waste-Free Kitchen Handbook: A guide to eating well and saving money by wasting less food.Restaurateurs have taken different tacks to avoid squandering the ingredients on their shelves. Although many have simply shut their doors, others have shifted to take-out meals. Still others have reinvented themselves, if only temporarily, as grocery stores, selling off inventory from herbs to olive oil and avocados. Some restaurants desperate to avoid waste are giving food away to their furloughed workers or to the public. Before it closed its doors recently, Philadelphia’s Oyster House gave away all its unshucked oystersAmong other innovative food-waste solutions, the farm-to-table restaurant Herbfarm, in Woodinville, Washington, has repurposed its kitchen to create boxed three-course meals for medical workers. In New York City, about 30 restaurants are getting $40,000 grants from the nonprofit Rethink to pay staff, create take-out meals from other restaurants' surplus ingredients, and offer them to the public for a $3 donation.(Follow all of our coronavirus coverage here.)But food banks, which handle a much larger amount of food and serve many more people, need a more robust source of supply. Before the coronavirus outbreak, supermarkets and food companies channeled excess to food banks, moving nourishment to people most in need while also keeping surpluses from rotting in landfills. With grocery stores now working on overdrive, breaking sales records as consumers stock up on supplies, those donations are dropping off. Meanwhile, food insecurity is on the rise as millions of people lose their jobs.To unclog this bottleneck, lawmakers included $450 million in the recent stimulus package for the U.S. Department of Agriculture to buy and help distribute food to food banks. Donations from restaurants—forced to close or shift to take-out only by governors in more than half the states—have also risen.But getting their hands on pasta, beans, and tomato sauce isn't the only challenge confronting organizations that feed the food insecure. Social service agencies that have historically relied on volunteers to prepare and serve meals to the hungry are feeling a crunch right now. Demand for their services is up, but volunteers, who skew older and are at higher risk for COVID-19, aren’t showing up to work.And because congregating in crowds, whether in soup kitchens, senior centers, or food pantries, is now forbidden in many states, agencies are scrambling to find ways to deliver meals to clients sheltering in place, turning to laid-off workers, taxi drivers, and DoorDash. The California Association of Food Banks has asked the governor for 20,000 National Guard soldiers to help assemble food boxes, load trucks, and deliver aid.Moving excess prepared food to places in need from caterers, corporate kitchens or restaurants has always been fraught with challenges. Distribution is one; cold storage and liability are others. But in crisis there is opportunity.“ReFED works directly with a number of innovative and nimble food-rescue organizations,” Gunders says. “They’re trying to capture more prepared food, finding ways to use enabling technology to connect donors and recipients a little more efficiently.”Online apps are a big part of this. In Kansas City, for example, FeedKC.us lets restaurants and catering companies list their offerings, then connects them with drivers who deliver that bounty to food banks in need. Ditto with Replate, which operates in the Bay Area, New York City, Chicago, Seattle, Boston, Los Angeles, Austin and Dallas, and 412 Food Rescue, in Pittsburgh.As the weeks of confinement drag on, and consumers become less anxious about the food (and toilet paper) supply, many may stop hoarding. They may also grow increasingly familiar and comfortable with online food platforms.Gunders says such a behavioral change might have a profound effect on food waste: To the extent that consumers order groceries two or three days in advance of need, online retailers can order more precisely from their sources to meet that demand, further reducing waste.But all that is far in the future, and things are changing quickly. “These are early days,” says Gunders. “The next few weeks are going to look very different from the eight weeks that follow.”",
"In California's Salinas Valley, growers annually trash thousands of tons of fresh greens that lack sufficient shelf life for a cross-country journey. Food waste happens at all points along the supply chain, but there are solutions.Food waste, that scourge that sends more than a third of our food supply to rot and is a major contributor to climate change, seems like it should be easy to address.Waste less food, advocates cry, and you can save money! You can save time! You can save farmland and fuel, and, since agriculture drives habitat loss, you can even help save the tiger.And yet, here we are in the thick of Earth Month, on a day designated as “Stop Food Waste Day,” and you probably don’t need to look further than your own kitchen or cafeteria to see edible food dumped. In the U.S. more than 80 percent of food waste has been traced to homes and consumer-facing businesses.So why is this problem so hard to solve? Because, researchers say, we’re only human. We have some irrational tendencies, some aspirations that don’t match reality, and some major blind spots. Not to mention busy schedules that don’t always align with when the avocado on the counter finally ripens. Here in the U.S., food waste is often invisibly baked into how we shop, cook and entertain.“I do think awareness is slowly growing,” said Dana Gunders, author of the Waste-Free Kitchen Handbook. “But I think there’s still a disconnect between being aware that this is a global problem and connecting that to what you’re actually doing when you scrape your plate into the garbage.”Researchers and advocates are hopeful, but here’s some of what we’re up against:Confusion over “best by,” “sell by,” “use by,” and other date labels leads Americans to throw away an estimated $29 billion of safe food every year. Advocates are trying to educate consumers and standardize the labels, which generally aren’t regulated and are often based on quality, not safety.  To test just how far this blind faith extends, researchers at Ohio State University presented study participants with jugs of milk of varying ages—some with the “sell by” date; others without any dating.People were more likely to deem older milk acceptable when they didn’t see a date. Interestingly, one of the “younger” test milks wasn’t top quality, likely due to a processing issue. Many participants who saw its “fresh” date stamp deemed it perfectly fine; those who didn’t see the label were more likely to say it wasn’t good to drink.While ad campaigns like SaveTheFood have made food waste a more prominent issue, cultivating individual self-awareness is hard. A Natural Resources Defense Council study of food waste in several cities found that 76 percent of people think they throw away less food than the average American. Clearly the math doesn’t add up.“It’s a pretty universal response to any negative accusation,” said Ohio State Food Waste Collaborative director Brian Roe, who’s gotten similar results in his own work. “Nobody wants to admit or think that they are the problem.”Another common finding? When composting is available, people make fewer efforts to reduce the amount of food they pitch.“Perhaps the interpretation is composting lets them off the hook emotionally from feeling bad about wasting food,” said Roe, a professor of agricultural, environmental, and developmental economics. “Composting is not a bad thing, but you’d prefer to not create the food waste in the first place. It’s going to have a lot more social and environmental benefits.”When the server asks if you want your brussels sprout salad wrapped, you may say “yes” out of guilt, and you may even convince yourself that you’ll make a point of eating it. But if you don’t make it a priority, it will probably spoil. Stink bombs are easier to throw away than edible food.Laura Moreno, who studies why people waste food at home at the University of California, Berkeley, calls this “delayed disposal.”“There’s a guilt alleviation process that happens,” said Moreno, a PhD candidate. NRDC’s study of food waste in cities found leftovers to be the second most wasted category of food (behind fruits and vegetables).The freezer is another stop food often makes on its way to the trash can, said Gunders, who authored NRDC’s seminal report on food waste and now consults on the issue. To make sure food gets eaten and save prep time, she suggests eating frozen leftovers soon, as in the following week.  “I like to think of my freezer as short-term storage, not long-term storage,” she said.Moreno has spent hours peeking into people’s fridges and chatting with them about their food habits. Everyone seems to have a different sense of what should go in their mouths and what should go in the bin.Some people consider pizza crust “inedible.” Others only eat the white part of the scallion. One home visit stands out for Moreno: “The person very earnestly looked at me and said ‘I always cut off that string thing on the bottom of the carrot because I’m not sure if it’s safe to eat.”Moreno and groups like ReFED, a food-waste-focused non-profit, rank increasing food literacy as one of the most effective ways to reduce food waste. (It’s something I’m working on as well. On my website EatOrToss.com, I post images and scientific explanations of confusing food situations to help consumers make informed choices before throwing food away.)While most of us probably don’t worry about the skinny bit at the end of a carrot, biases against frozen food are pervasive. Freezer staples won’t wilt or get moldy and can help add veggies and protein to weeknight meals without constant trips to the store. But groups like NRDC and the World Wildlife Fund are stuck fighting the mushy broccoli stigma.“You need an advocate in the celebrity chef movement to promote the fact that it's still healthy and you're not sacrificing anything,” said Monica McBride, food waste manager at WWF. (Read about how "ugly" fruits and vegetables can help solve world hunger.)“Wasting food is a byproduct of other activities that typically have good intentions around them,” noted Gunders. “Feeding your family healthy food, trying something new, hosting a good party, eating healthier yourself, cooking more. The waste is a somewhat invisible byproduct of that.”Food waste solutions, said Moreno, need to acknowledge that asking people to waste less food can also mean asking them to sacrifice the feeling that they’re taking good care of their family. For many, a full fridge represents being prepared, which provides a sense of comfort.One of Moreno’s research subjects, who replaces an item the moment it’s used up, and who professed a desire to feel like she was caring for her family and friends, called it “shopping for Armageddon.”Speaking of a full fridge, consider the heaping bread basket at dinner. The loaded chafing pan at the buffet. The tall produce pyramid at the grocery store. We find abundant displays appealing and are suspicious of, say, a solo banana or the last salmon fillet.  Hotels, with their breakfast spreads and many catered events, are notorious wasters, so WWF investigated ways to green up the buffet line without sacrificing elegance. One key recommendation was to embrace luxury over abundance. So, instead of that overflowing bread basket, hotels might offer a tray of neatly arranged rolls and post a sign noting that they’re warm and fresh from the oven. To avoid the sad look of a nearly emptied tray, WWF advises putting out smaller pans of food as the event wears on; they still look full, but offer—and waste—less food.At the farmers’ market, it can be easy to envision a week of healthy, Instagram-able meals of colorful salads and herb-sprinkled veggie roasts. But, life often gets in the way. There are restaurant outings. Spontaneous invitations. Late nights at work. Not feeling like cooking. The produce doesn’t all last.“You need to match what you’re buying with the cadence of your shopping,” said Elizabeth Balkan, NRDC food waste director. “If you want to be eating fresh, but you’re trying to go the supermarket every two weeks, it’s not going to work.”As the parent of young children, Balkan says she’s sensitive to this when giving them new foods. Serve the volume of food you’d ideally like your kids to eat and you’ll easily end up feeding the floor.Groceries can add to your food waste load when food is packaged in too-big sizes or bags that are hard to seal. At home our fridges are big; our casserole dishes designed for large family meals, and our plates often oversized. Not helpful when we’re trying to cut down on food waste.“One of the great things we can do to trick ourselves is to make sure our plateware is appropriately sized,” said Gunders.“There’s also this idea,” said Moreno, “that there’s this magical place called the back of the refrigerator where everything gets lost.”Short of urging everyone to downsize their fridge, Moreno, who would like to see food waste advocacy collaborate more with other issues, is toying with this idea: what if people were encouraged to stock emergency supplies of water in rows at the back of their fridges? Then more items would be pushed to the front and fewer things would be lost.Let’s say you’re at a wedding; you’ve filled up on passed horderves and the mashed potato bar and now you can’t finish your roasted chicken entree.Asking for a box feels rude, right? But when we’re throwing away close to half our food, squandering resources and contributing to climate change along the way, isn’t it more offensive to let the food go to waste?Certainly. But the taboo remains, said Gunders. With a little nudge though, it can be overcome. She urges caterers to put out to-go containers and signs saying “help yourself.”“I think it’s up to the host to break the ice, and when they do, people tend to respond.”When it comes to mitigating climate change, Project Drawdown ranks reducing food waste as the third most impactful action, behind only better management of refrigerants and increased onshore wind power (for context, electric vehicles rank 26th). And while we can’t all install wind turbines on our lunch breaks, we all can make tweaks to our lunches and our lives in general to facilitate less waste.So, the silver lining of addressing food waste is that everyone can dial up their self awareness and make a big impact. But Moreno, who points out that we don’t need yet another food neurosis, cautions against putting all the onus on the individual consumer. Systemic efforts to do things like improve our food literacy, reimagine our grocery stores and kitchens, reform date labels, and rethink catered events can make it harder for us to mindlessly waste by adjusting our surroundings, and not guilting or shaming us.“Just because food is wasted in a household doesn't mean it’s caused by that individual person,” Moreno said. “There are a lot of factors at play.”",
"Every year some six billion pounds of U.S. fruits and vegetables go unharvested or unsold, often for aesthetic reasons.Tristram Stuart has 24 hours to produce a restaurant meal for 50 people—to plan a menu, gather food, then welcome guests to a venue in a city not his own. Complicating what sounds like a reality-show contest is a singular rule: Nearly all the ingredients must be sourced from farms and vendors intending to throw them out.After racing back to New York City from a New Jersey farm where he gleaned 75 pounds of crookneck squash deemed by the farmers too crooked to sell, Stuart bolts from a car creeping through traffic and darts into a Greenwich Village bakery. Tall and blond, with a posh English accent, he launches into his ten-second spiel: “I run an organization that campaigns against food waste, and I’m pulling together a feast tomorrow made with food that won’t be sold or donated to charity. Do you have any bread that we could use?” The bakery doesn’t, but the clerk hands him two broken chocolate-chip cookies as consolation.Stuart flings himself into the car. His next stop: the Union Square farmers market, where he spies a chef wrapping fish in squares of brioche dough, then trimming them into half circles. “Can I have your corners?” Stuart asks, with a meant-to-be-charming smile. The chef, uncharmed, declines. He’s going to make use of this dough himself. Undaunted, Stuart sails on through the market, delivering his pitch and eventually procuring discarded beet greens, wheatgrass, and apples.Near Apartadó, Colombia, activist Tristram Stuart examines bananas too short, long, or curved for the European market. Locals consume some rejected bananas, but growers in the region annually dump millions of tons of edible fruit.Eighteen hours later scores of chefs, food-recovery experts, and activists talk shop over chef Celia Lam’s squash tempura, turnip and tofu dumplings, and spiralized zucchini noodles. Stuart himself had cooked very little, but he had, without a single formal meeting, ensorcelled a half dozen people to devise a menu, gather ingredients, and then prep, cook, serve, and clean up a meal for little more than the chance to be associated with one of the most compelling figures in the international fight against food waste.Across cultures, food waste goes against the moral grain. After all, nearly 800 million people worldwide suffer from hunger. But according to the Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations, we squander enough food—globally, 2.9 trillion pounds a year—to feed every one of them more than twice over. Where’s all that food—about a third of the planet’s production—going? In developing nations much is lost postharvest for lack of adequate storage facilities, good roads, and refrigeration. In comparison, developed nations waste more food farther down the supply chain, when retailers order, serve, or display too much and when consumers ignore leftovers in the back of the fridge or toss perishables before they’ve expired.Wasting food takes an environmental toll as well. Producing food that no one eats—whether sausages or snickerdoodles—also squanders the water, fertilizer, pesticides, seeds, fuel, and land needed to grow it. The quantities aren’t trivial. Globally a year’s production of uneaten food guzzles as much water as the entire annual flow of the Volga, Europe’s most voluminous river. Growing the 133 billion pounds of food that retailers and consumers discard in the United States annually slurps the equivalent of more than 70 times the amount of oil lost in the Gulf of Mexico’s Deepwater Horizon disaster, according to American Wasteland author Jonathan Bloom. These staggering numbers don’t even include the losses from farms, fishing vessels, and slaughterhouses. If food waste were a country, it would be the third largest producer of greenhouse gases in the world, after China and the U.S. On a planet of finite resources, with the expectation of at least two billion more residents by 2050, this profligacy, Stuart argues in his book Waste: Uncovering the Global Food Scandal, is obscene.In California’s Salinas Valley growers annually trash thousands of tons of fresh greens that lack sufficient shelf life for a cross-country journey.At a Paris feast chefs simmer cosmetically challenged veggies—gleaned or donated—into a curry for 6,100 anti-waste enthusiasts.Others have been making similar arguments for years, but reducing food waste has become a matter of international urgency. Some U.S. schools, where children dump up to 40 percent of their lunches into the trash, are setting up sharing tables, letting students serve themselves portions they know they’ll eat, allotting more time for lunch, and scheduling it after recess—all proven methods of boosting consumption. Countless businesses, such as grocery stores, restaurants, and cafeterias, have stepped forward to combat waste by quantifying how much edible food isn’t consumed, optimizing their purchasing, shrinking portion sizes, and beefing up efforts to move excess to charities. Stuart himself has made a specialty of investigating conditions farther up the supply chain, where supermarket standards and ordering practices lead to massive, but mostly hidden, dumps of edible food.Fifty miles north of Lima, Peru, in the farming town of Huaral, Stuart sips a glass of freshly squeezed satsuma juice with Luis Garibaldi, whose Fundo Maria Luisa is the largest grower of mandarins in the country. Pitched forward in his seat under a poolside pergola, Stuart asks: How much do you export? How much is rejected? For what reason? And what happens to those discards? Seventy percent of his crop, Garibaldi says, is exported to the European Union and North America. But 30 percent won’t be the right size, color, or sweetness, or it might have blemishes, scars, scratches, sunburn, fungus, or spiders. To local markets most of these rejects go, netting Garibaldi just one-third the price of the exports.Stuart works through a ladder of queries that lead to a general thesis: Supermarkets’ cosmetic standards are crazily exacting—until supply shrinks, at which point they crumble like a chocolate lattice.“So grocers purchase this slightly imperfect fruit, and consumers still buy it?” Stuart asks.“Yes,” Garibaldi says, nodding.In the fragrant orchard, which lies in a valley under the parched crenellations of the Cordilleran foothills, Stuart plucks a mandarin unfit for any market but stops short of eating it. “I don’t mind maggots, actually, but that one was fermented,” he says, choosing instead a fruit with two tiny brown spots. Fundo Maria Luisa, it turns out, generates relatively little waste, thanks to its U.K. representative, who examines shipments and negotiates with any buyers poised to reject fruit for specious reasons. Often, Garibaldi says, a supermarket’s rejection of food for cosmetic reasons is merely a cover-up for its inaccurate forecasts or an unexpected drop in sales. Either way, the grower is expected to eat the loss.Thirty percent of the mandarin crop in Huaral, Peru, won’t meet exacting export standards. Most of the rejects will be eaten locally. Globally 46 percent of fruits and vegetables never make it from farm to fork.We drive 200 miles south, past tall sand dunes and wind-eroded ridges. All is ocher and dust until we reach valleys suddenly verdant with irrigated farmland—a consequence of foreign investment, favorable trade agreements, cheap labor, a warm climate, and a once bountiful aquifer. In the Ica Region, Stuart interviews a farmer who annually abandons in his fields millions of stalks of asparagus too thin or too curved or with bud tips slightly too open to export. Next a producer tells him that he dumps more than a thousand tons of infinitesimally imperfect Minneola tangelos and a hundred tons of grapefruit a year into a sandpit behind his packhouse.Grade standards—industry driven and voluntary—were devised long ago to provide growers and buyers with a common language for evaluating produce and mediating disputes. They also can help reduce food waste. If growers can sort their asparagus or tangelos into established grades, they stand a better chance of finding markets for their “seconds.” Supermarkets have always been free to set their own standards, of course, but in recent years upscale grocers have started running their produce departments like beauty pageants, responding to customers, they say, who expect only platonically ideal produce: apples round and shiny, asparagus straight and tightly budded.“It’s all about quality and appearance,” says Rick Stein, vice president of fresh foods at the Food Marketing Institute. “And only the best appearance will capture share of the consumer’s wallet.” Some of the produce that doesn’t capture share will be donated to food banks or chopped up and used in a supermarket’s prepared meals or salad bar, but most of U.S. grocers’ excess food is neither donated nor recycled. Stuart applauds some U.S. and EU supermarkets’ recent campaigns to sell “ugly” produce at a discount, but he prefers a systemic fix. “It would be far better to simply relax the standards,” he says, surveying a sea of abandoned Peruvian citrus for which no secondary market—ugly or otherwise—exists.In the Picardy region of France a volunteer helps glean 1,100 pounds of potatoes too small to harvest mechanically. The potatoes will join carrots, eggplants, and other gleaned and donated vegetables at Paris’s Place de la République. There volunteers allied with Stuart’s group Feedback will chop this bounty into a meal for 6,100 diners. Feedback has helped organize more than 30 of these public feasts around the world to raise awareness of food waste and inspire local solutions.For seven days Stuart traipses around farms and packhouses, runs through his questions, gathers data, and samples rejects. Between visits he folds himself like a fruit bat into the backseat of a crowded car and types. Tap, tap. He’s working out logistics for his next research trip, then accepting a drinks invitation from the general manager of the Food Bank of Peru. Tap, tap. An appointment with a food rescuer who just flew up from Santiago, Chile. Everywhere he goes, it seems, people want to tell Stuart an egregious story about food waste.Sleep-deprived, unshaven, and sometimes hungover—what’s the point of being in a new country if you can’t sample what’s locally fermented?—Stuart remains focused. In fume-choked traffic he arranges to meet with a Peruvian congressman trying to overturn tax laws that incentivize dumping excess food over donating it. As we careen down a serpentine road, he taps out revisions to a proposed food-waste-reduction bill in the U.K. Parliament and a letter in support of expanding the authority of the U.K.’s Groceries Code Adjudicator. Next he floats to colleagues the idea of a Lima “disco soup”—a communal meal of rejected food, similar to the feast in New York City—to be held in four days for 50 to 100 people.The possibility spurs a series of calls to his newest friends. “You are totally awesome,” he says, hyperenunciating. “Do you think we might be able to … It’s outrageous of me to ask but …” What’s the goal of the disco soup, besides rescuing food? Raising awareness and building community. This squishy stuff works. While gleaning, dicing, and dining, chefs from Lima to London have connected with charities hungry for their excess; California entrepreneurs have hatched schemes to rescue wonky-looking fruit from burial; civil society groups have fomented plans for a Kenyan food-rescue network; a Belgian brewer has been emboldened to convert stale bread into salable beer.A disco soup in Lima seems harebrained, given that Stuart is five hours from the city, has a looming appointment at a Colombian banana plantation, controls neither a dining room nor a kitchen, and has no budget and no food. But history suggests he will probably succeed.Stuart, now 38, was born in London, the last of three boys. He lived in the city part-time but at 14 took up full-time residence with his father in rural East Sussex, where the family kept a large house in Ashdown Forest, the model for Winnie-the-Pooh’s Hundred Acre Wood. Just across the valley lay what had been his grandparents’ estate, a sprawling property with enough farm staff during World War II to field a cricket team against the local village. Stuart’s father, Simon, had grown up there, and his stories about the farm’s bounty bewitched his youngest son.Simon Stuart was a talented teacher of English and an outstanding naturalist. “We could never learn everything he knew,” Tristram recalls. “So my brothers and I split it up. One did birds, another did dragonflies, and I did mushrooms.” (Dining on a $22 pizza topped with “wild” mushrooms the night before his New York City feast, Stuart lights into the waiter. “Your menu is s---. I’m a forager. I know what wild mushrooms look like, and these are from a shop.”)For more than 50 years RC Farms has been collecting Las Vegas kitchen waste and plate scrapings, like these zucchini sticks and fries from the coffee shop at Jerry’s Nugget Casino. Hauled a short distance to Bob and Janet Combs’s third-generation farm, the food scraps will be sterilized and fed to 2,500 pigs, replacing more than 800 tons of swine feed a year. Portions in U.S. restaurants have increased significantly in recent decades, contributing to obesity and food waste.Living miles from the nearest town but psychologically close to his grandparents’ self-sufficient farm defined Stuart. His father tended a large vegetable garden, and Stuart added pigs and chickens to the mix. In exchange for manure, Simon gave Tristram his vegetable trimmings. “So I had eggs and meat, and I’d go out with my ferrets to catch rabbits and shoot deer,” Stuart says. The larder was almost complete. Stuart had begun selling pork and eggs to the parents of his schoolmates, but he quickly realized that buying animal feed would bankrupt him. He started a swill route: collecting misfit potatoes and stale cakes from local shops and his school kitchen. He bred his sow, Gudrun, and he learned how much edible food the community daily discarded.Stuart’s environmental consciousness was expanding. At 12, he’d written a paper likening the burning of fossil fuels to smoking cigarettes—both were self-destructive and addictive. After spending part of a year on a French cattle farm, he entered the University of Cambridge, where he studied English literature and experienced a cruel uprooting from his agro-ecological heaven. The school food was produced “with no attention to sustainable criteria,” he says. In response he joined other campus activists who were dining on food they’d liberated from supermarket Dumpsters. He also drank cider pressed from strangers’ apples, shared the roasted brains, rolled spleens, and crisped ears of Gudrun’s many offspring, and—after learning they were tasty—slurped snails from friends’ gardens.It’s not surprising to learn that Stuart once dabbled in theater. “I quite liked it,” he says, though it eventually threatened to “get in the way of the really important work of saving the planet.” He was sufficiently self-aware to realize that privileged students plucking unopened tubs of ricotta from rubbish bins had great rhetorical potential. At that time, he says, neither supermarkets nor government agencies had any overt policies on food waste. That was about to change.An employee at Las Vegas’s Aria Resort and Casino sorts the edible from the inedible. Feeding the scraps to nonruminant animals, such as pigs, recycles their nutrients and eliminates some of the methane that food would generate in a landfill.By 2002 Stuart’s bin diving had attracted enough attention for him to help produce a food-waste documentary for a BBC politics show, and activists around the world were reaching out to him to partner on food rescues. (He was living then in London.) With enough data on where and precisely why food was lost throughout the food chain, he realized, he might actually be able to do something about it. Thus were sown the seeds of his book Waste, in which he investigated the causes and environmental toll of food waste around the globe.Waste was critically acclaimed, but Stuart knew the data-heavy book wouldn’t be read by millions, and he desperately wanted millions to support his cause. “Hence, Feeding the 5,000,” he says, echoing Jesus’ instruction in John 6:12 to “gather the pieces that are left over. Let nothing be wasted.” Launched in 2009, Feeding the 5,000 would become Stuart’s flagship event—a free public feast made entirely of orphaned food. These gatherings have now been replicated in more than 30 cities. Thousands partake of the meals, reams of ink and pixels follow, and public outcry is amplified. Soon Stuart was giving speeches around the world and sharply criticizing the food industry’s most powerful actors, many of whom he put on the defensive with his polemics. Supermarkets, in turn, considered him “a pain in the ass,” he says. “And I was.”From whence does Stuart’s formidable self-confidence spring? One hardly knows where to begin. Stuart is ambitious, aggressive, and narcissistic. But he’s also eloquent, amusing, and supremely knowledgeable on his central topic. “When he speaks, you want to join him,” says Dana Gunders, a food-waste specialist with the Natural Resources Defense Council who authored the Waste Free Kitchen Handbook. “He’s really good at not only kindling that passion in others but maintaining it, adding to the army of passionate people who want to do something about food waste.”At RC Farms, just ten or so miles from the Las Vegas Strip, hogs convert surplus potatoes from a local food processor into protein that may eventually find its way onto our plates.Stuart takes every opportunity to eat low on the hog—the better to keep what’s uncoveted from rubbish bins and to model positive behavior. On his first morning in Peru he breakfasts on congealed chicken blood. “I’ve never had that before,” he says, happily. At lunch he exults in guinea pig. On day two he orders beef tripe; on day three, tongue and a great deal of pisco. Such is his macho carnivorism that when Stuart tells me he’s procured “fried balls” for a hasty airport lunch, I assume he’s talking about testicles. They turn out to be relatives of the potato knish.The protein seems to fortify Stuart for farm and packhouse conversations that quickly grow weedy with numbers. Kilos, tons, containers, pallets, percentages rejected, recovered, left for dead. His stomach for such minutiae is large. “I want to be able to tell Europeans that their preference for a closed tip on their asparagus equals X million acres of land, X million gallons of water, and X million pounds of fertilizer wasted.” He takes a breath. “I need to make a headline, to tell people in a concise way that their choices matter.”Indeed they do. With governments fretting over how to feed more than nine billion people by 2050, a dominant narrative calls for increasing global food production by 70 to 100 percent. But agriculture already represents one of the greatest threats to planetary health. It is responsible for 70 percent of the planet’s freshwater withdrawals, 80 percent of the world’s tropical and subtropical deforestation, and 30 to 35 percent of human-caused greenhouse gas emissions. As the population grows and emerging economies develop a taste for meat and dairy products, which require huge inputs of grain and other resources for relatively little caloric gain, this toll will worsen. But converting more wildlands to farm fields may not be necessary, some experts say. If we slash waste, change our diet to eat less meat and dairy, divert fewer food crops to biofuels, and boost yields on underperforming acres, we may be able to feed more than nine billion people a healthy diet without trashing more rain forests, plowing up more prairies, or wiping out more wetlands.Staggered to learn that the U.S. wastes 30 to 40 percent of its food while one in seven people suffers from food insecurity, Doug Rauch, former president of Trader Joe’s, opened a nonprofit supermarket in Dorchester, Massachusetts. Called Daily Table, the supermarket sells discounted fruits and vegetables that are about to be discarded because they’re too close to peak freshness; it also sells inexpensive surplus goods and prepares healthy to-go meals. “Hunger and wasted food,” Rauch says, “are two problems that can have one solution.”Stuart never loses sight of this big picture, but he knows that paradigm changes are incremental. And so he stands in the desert behind an Ica packinghouse, hammering away at Luis Torres, general manager of Shuman Produce Peru. Lacking a local market for what he cannot export, Torres annually dumps 3.5 million pounds of small or imperfectly spherical onions. But he’s reluctant to blame buyers for this loss.“If I complain, the supermarket will find a new farmer,” he says, shrugging. “I am a practical person. I can do nothing to change the rules.”Standing with his feet spread and arms crossed, Stuart replies, “I can.”Three years ago Stuart spent a week running around the Kenyan countryside, hunting down ingredients for a formal dinner in Nairobi where the United Nations Environment Programme (UNEP) would highlight the problem of food waste. A hundred miles from the capital, he met a farmer forced by European cosmetic standards to reject 40 tons a week of green beans, broccoli, sugar snap peas, and runner beans—enough food to serve 250,000 people. Within a year Stuart and a camera crew returned to Kenya and discovered that farmers were grading out nearly half of their harvest in fields and packhouses, with green bean farmers losing even more product by trimming both the tips and the tails of each surviving bean. Supermarkets also routinely canceled orders at the last minute without compensating the farmers. After Feedback publicized images of the rejected beans and accused major supermarket chains of transferring their costs to relatively powerless growers, U.K. grocers were ready to talk. They eventually agreed to bear the cost of order cancellations and to expand the length of their packaging, which allowed green beans to be trimmed at only one end. Not only would less food and fewer resources be wasted, but farmers might also be able to plant fewer acres.“Tristram identified a problem, and he did something about it,” says Clementine O’Connor, a consultant on sustainable food to the UNEP. “He’s been a lone voice defending farmers from unfair trading practices, identifying barriers, and catalyzing action, often in cases where supermarkets and governments were not aware of the problem.”Imperfect, a start-up based in Emeryville, California, buys outré-looking produce from farmers and delivers it, at low cost, to more than a thousand San Francisco Bay Area subscribers. U.S. and European retail chains also have had success selling odd-looking fruits and vegetables at discount. “We’re redefining beauty, not taste,” says Ron Clark, an Imperfect founder.Feedback’s 2015 report on Kenyan green beans was just one achievement in a watershed year. By the end of 2015 the UN and the U.S. had pledged to halve food waste by 2030. The exact mechanisms of this ambitious goal haven’t been spelled out. But already countries and companies are devising and adopting standardized metrics to quantify waste. If the target is met, enough food could be saved to feed at least one billion people.On an overcast Thursday afternoon in September, Stuart strides through a muddy field in northern France. He plunges his hands into a mound of soil and extracts several thin-skinned potatoes, which, being the size of thimbles and thumbs, had slipped through the mechanical harvester’s grasp. For the next hour and a half he and a team of gleaners comb through the soil. The goal is to gather 1,100 pounds of spuds for Sunday’s Feeding the 5,000 event, to be held in Paris’s locus of civic activism, the stately Place de la République. The next day Stuart and another team of volunteers from partner organizations wash their enormous haul in a ramshackle squat in the 12th arrondissement. Standing shirtless in a cluttered room redolent of sweat and pot, with music blasting, Stuart scolds a woman for wasting time by scrubbing the potatoes twice. Feeling bullied, she blurts a two-word vulgarism. Stuart crows, “That’s what everyone says to me!”On Saturday it’s time to chop. Gathering at rows of plastic tables in the square, hundreds of volunteers come and go over a period of four hours, dicing roughly 3,900 pounds of potatoes, eggplants, carrots, and red peppers—some gleaned from farms, some donated by the Rungis wholesale market. Mostly veterans of mass production, the helpers shuttle produce from crates to giant plastic bowls and then to blue plastic bags. At 5 a.m. on Sunday the chef, Peter O’Grady, a Hare Krishna who runs a charity kitchen in London, tips those bags into chest-high metal tanks atop gas burners.As midday approaches, the park grows crowded. Musicians perform onstage, and two-legged carrots and eggplants parade and chant, “No more vegetable waste!” Stuart is absent, his presence superfluous. As 6,100 diners begin to queue up, the servers don gloves, hats, and aprons. At noon Stuart materializes. He mounts the stage and grabs the mike. He thanks everyone who made the banquet possible, calls food waste a scandal, briefly links agriculture to climate change, then withdraws from the stage. But not before shouting, “Bon appétit.”At the Benning Park Community Center in Washington, D.C., third-grader Kevin Boyd eats an after-school dinner provided by DC Central Kitchen, a nonprofit that trains chefs and provides 11,000 meals a day in shelters, schools, and other locations. Almost half these meals come from food that would otherwise have gone to waste. At the center the students do their homework and learn how to make healthy meals, such as smoothies and homemade granola. “I always tell him, Don’t say you don’t like it until you try it,” says Kevin's mother, Antoinette Boyd.",
"Unemployed domestic worker Ailde de Oliveira Dourado hangs her family’s clothes out in the alley. She lost her job as a cleaner because of the coronavirus pandemic.SÃO PAULO, Brazil Every Monday morning for the past month, Maria Raimunda Ribeiro de Almeida waits for her ride outside the McDonald’s on the main street next to Paraisópolis, the favela where she lives.Before quarantine went into effect on March 24, Almeida took the bus each day to the luxury apartment building where she works as a maid. But now the family calls her an Uber to reduce her chances of contracting the novel coronavirus, which has infected nearly 62,000 people across Brazil and killed nearly 4,200. When she arrives at work, she immediately changes out of her clothes, just in case they are contaminated.Maria Raimunda Ribeiro de Almeida walks up the steep hills of her favela, Paraisópolis, to meet the Uber her employer orders for her to lower her chances of contracting the coronavirus.She won’t be back in Paraisópolis, a favela of over 100,000 people, until Friday, because her employers told her she would have to stay at their home during the week if she wanted to keep her job. Almeida, whose 2,000 reais (US$387) is her family’s only source of income, had little choice.“We’re doing OK now with my salary,” says the 43-year-old. “But I don’t know how we would survive without it.”Across Latin America, one out of seven employed women works as domestic help, often with very little pay, long hours, and no governmental protection. Here, a maid walks to work in historic Milaflores in Lima, Peru in 2017.Across Latin America, the coronavirus pandemic has upended the lives of millions of domestic workers who exist on the margins of some of the most unequal societies in the world. Eighteen million people worked as domestic help in Latin America and the Caribbean in 2016, according to the International Labor Organization. Of those, 93 percent were women, and nearly 80 percent worked under informal conditions with no government regulation or protection.Under lockdown, domestic workers’ already precarious situations are made all the more dangerous. Many are forced to continue working despite the risk of contracting COVID-19, while others are let go without pay, left to wonder how they’ll pay rent and feed their families. (See inside Brazil's largest apartment complex during the pandemic.)Maids, cooks, and nannies continue to work in homes across Latin America, often with little protection and meager pay. Here, maids prepare lunch in individual apartments in Lima, Peru in 2010.Before the quarantine, Almeida worked nine-hour days cleaning the three-bedroom, four-bathroom apartment in an upper-class neighborhood. Now that she lives there, there’s no end to the workday. With the whole family home, she cleans up messes, cooks multiple meals a day, helps the nanny with the children, and caters to whatever need might arise, whatever the hour. She’s so busy she hardly has time to keep up with the outside world. “I don’t even know what’s going on most of the time,” says Almeida. “I usually watch the news, but now I work so late and there’s no TV in my room.”Maids, cooks, and nannies continue to work in homes across Brazil, which has the highest number of coronavirus-related deaths in Latin America. To keep families safe, the Domestic Employers’ Union of the State of São Paulo listed six recommendations on its website, from advising workers to change their clothes upon arrival to suggesting they be sent home if they present any symptoms. Nowhere do they suggest that domestic workers stay home. (Pictures reveal essential workers serving on the front lines around the world.)Almeida has breakfast with her husband Adriano Silva before she leaves for her job. One of her three adult children lives with them, and Almeida is the family’s sole breadwinner.Without paid leave or governmental protection, these women are left to the discretion of their employers. The first person to die from coronavirus in Rio de Janeiro, and the fifth in the country overall, was a 63-year-old woman who was a domestic worker for decades in Leblon, the most expensive neighborhood in Brazil. One square meter of real estate there costs an average 21,000 reais (US$4,000). Her boss had reportedly traveled to Italy for Carnival but allowed the woman to return to work without informing her she was feeling ill and awaiting COVID-19 test results. The employer recovered.When Juliana França, a teacher and actress in Rio, saw that her 57-year-old mother and 75-year-old godmother were still working despite the pandemic, she started an online campaign called “For the Lives of Our Mothers.” She rallied other children of domestic workers to demand their mothers be given paid leave and connected those out of work to donors. Since mid-March, 11 workers have been matched to donors and 42 more have signed up.“The workers are scared,” França says. “They’re afraid of doing something wrong and losing their jobs. We created this campaign so that they couldn’t be blamed for speaking up.”Rejane Santos (right) started the Adopt a Day-Maid program to help unemployed domestic workers in Paraisópolis.In Paraisópolis, community leader Rejane Santos has started a similar program to help the favela’s unemployed domestic workers. Called “Adopt a Day-Maid,” the donor-driven initiative provides food, personal hygiene items, and 300 reais (US$58) a month for three months to women who have lost their jobs because of the pandemic. Her goal was to reach 500 women. One thousand signed up in three weeks.“Most of these women are the heads of their households, single mothers,” Santos says. “They needed their payments to survive.”Dourado cooks lunch for her kids, Arthur and Camila, in their home in Paraisópolis. Five-year-old Arthur developed breathing problems after a new staircase blocked the only window in their home.For many, these programs could mean the difference between going hungry and putting food on the table. Ailde de Oliveira Dourado, a single mother of seven, used to work three days a week cleaning a three-bedroom, five-bathroom luxury apartment before the pandemic. But her employer let her go, and without the 1,000 reais a month, she can’t pay the 500 reais (US$97) rent for her two-room home. (In Brazil, indigenous people are fighting to keep their children.)So far, the 46-year-old has been able to feed her kids through donations from community organizations, but meat and milk are hard to come by. She worries about her youngest son, five-year-old Arthur, who developed breathing problems from mold after the only window in their home was blocked by construction. For a family already struggling to stay afloat, the pandemic threatens their survival.“Sometimes it’s so hard that I pray to God and say, ‘God, just take me. If I’m going to keep suffering like this, I’d rather you took me,’” Dourado says. “But I know this will pass someday. I have faith that things will get better.”",
"The Copan, in São Paulo, is the largest apartment building in Latin America, with some 5,000 residents. Built in the 1950s, it now provides an up-close look at isolation and containment in the wake of the coronavirus pandemic.The Copan building in São Paulo, Brazil, looks like a wave. It reminds me of the tilde that sits on the “a” in “São Paulo.” With 1,160 apartments, the massive concrete structure is the largest residential building in Latin America. It even has its own Zip code. Designed as a social experiment in the 1950s, the city-sized building now offers an up-close look at how a metropolis of 21 million is coping with isolation during the coronavirus pandemic.São Paulo is the epicenter of the outbreak in Brazil. As of April 15, 28,320 Brazilians have been infected with COVID-19 and 1,736 have died. Of those who perished, nearly 800 were from São Paulo state. Like other countries, the lack of testing here means the number of cases is likely much higher. A new study estimates there are likely seven times more cases in Brazil than have been officially reported. The country’s health minister, Luiz Henrique Mandetta, has warned that the public health system could collapse by the end of April.I spent the last two decades covering Latin America as a photographer. I came to São Paulo late last year and now am under a mandatory quarantine along with the rest of the city’s residents. When I heard about the Copan and its history, I knew it was a world I wanted to understand. So I rented one of the apartments and spent eight days photographing and getting to know the people who call it home. Before I moved in, I isolated myself in my apartment for 20 days and while there I followed strict safety protocols.A long camera exposure taken from the Copan’s rooftop casts the São Paulo skyline in watercolor tones. Located in the city’s bustling downtown, the building was intended to house people from all walks of Brazilian life.The Copan was the dream of architect Oscar Niemeyer, who wanted to build a place for people from all walks of Brazilian society. He succeeded. Artists, moguls, and maids are among the 5,000 residents living in apartments that range from nearly 300 square feet to more than 4,500 square feet. The building has about 102 employees.Like the man who built it, the Copan’s residents lean left on the political spectrum. Every night from their windows, residents bang pots and pans in protest of the current president’s handling of the pandemic.Longtime resident Walerio Araujo, a fashion designer, has seen the Copan’s transformation from a decrepit and dangerous place to a vibrant, hip community. Residents credit the change to the current administrator, who took over in the 1990s.Gessica Marinho, 30, is a fashion producer and model from Rio de Janeiro. She and her boyfriend, a logistics administrator for a transportation company, had lived together in the Copan for just a month when the quarantine was instituted.Pablo Resende, an architect, and Livia Tatsumi, a film editor, are fortunate to be able to do their jobs remotely while in quarantine. Other residents have not been so lucky. Some have been laid off; others are furloughed. Nearly all fear the uncertainty ahead.When the pandemic began, Andres Sandoval (left), an illustrator, moved his studio into the apartment he shares with his partner, Thyago Nogueira, so he could continue to work. Nogueira, an editor and curator, has not seen his work affected by the crisis.President Jair Bolsonaro has said he doesn’t believe that COVID-19 is a health emergency. He called it a “little flu” and has publicly doubted the announced death toll. He’s held political rallies encouraging people to go back to work. And his supporters are taking his dangerous message to the streets: This week, while chanting that coronavirus is a lie, they blocked ambulances from driving through São Paulo.Ilê Sartuzi transforms his apartment into a makeshift movie theater. Forced to stay inside, residents are finding creative ways to entertain themselves.“For weeks, Bolsonaro has been sabotaging the states’ and his own Health Ministry’s efforts to contain the spread of COVID-19 and putting the lives and health of Brazilians at grave risk,” José Miguel Vivanco, the Americas director at Human Rights Watch, wrote in a recent report.Bolsonaro could learn a thing or two from the Copan’s Affonso Celso Oliveira. Since 1993, the 80-year-old manager, whom residents call “the mayor,” has been running things at the building where he’s lived for decades. When he first heard about the virus in January, he immediately shut down the building’s roof, typically crowded with hundreds of daily visitors, and ramped up cleaning throughout the building. “I’ve instructed the doormen to watch on the CCTV when people are using the elevators,” Oliveira told me. “If they touch the surfaces or the mirrors, the cleaning personnel is called up to clean the whole elevator right away."Daniel Sabino, 14, peers out from his family’s sprawling apartment on the 31st floor of the Copan. The building is home to a cross-section of Brazilian society, from artists and freelancers to the very wealthy.Staff have fuel vouchers, instead of public transportation vouchers, so they can avoid taking crowded buses through the densely populated city. And doormen are also on alert for residents exhibiting symptoms. One woman I met had recently returned from Europe with the flu and said the staff checked in on her every day.Many thought Oliveira was overreacting, but now they call him a genius. As of press time, there are no confirmed coronavirus cases in the Copan.In a city as densely populated as downtown São Paulo, it can be easy for a highly contagious virus to get around. To keep his 102 employees safe, Affonso Celso Oliveira has given them fuel vouchers instead of bus fare, so they can avoid public transportation on their way to and from work.Still, like the rest of São Paulo, life at the Copan isn’t immune to the effects of the pandemic. While some residents are doing fine financially, others are on forced “vacation.” Still others have lost their jobs and have no prospects. All are feeling anxious.Many are like Carine Wallauer. Before the pandemic, she was a successful director of photography. In early March, as the virus was surging across the globe, she attended the Berlinale, a prestigious film festival in Berlin. Since then, she’s lost two of her three jobs. Now, she’s worried about what her life will be like next month. When I visited recently, she seemed relieved to have someone to speak to. We sat on the floor—six feet apart—and talked for three hours. Like Carine, other residents were eager to talk, after not seeing anyone for weeks. With each visit, I thoroughly washed my hands and practiced social distancing. Even with the extra precautions, you can never tell when facing an invisible disease.During my stay, I photographed nearly two dozen Copan residents and a handful of non-resident employees. Among them, the on-duty firefighter, who commutes three hours to the Copan every day; a house painter-turned-artist, who practices his violin on his lunch break; and the mailman, who distributes mail to all 1,160 apartments each day. As I got to know the men, women, and children from all walks of life living together at the Copan, I saw a strong sense of community and solidarity.After three weeks of quarantine I see movement in the city. With mixed messages from state and federal governments, non-essential businesses are keeping limited hours and people are returning to work. In a country with one of the most dramatic income disparities in the world, the fear of another economic crash like the one in 2015—the worst recession on record—outweighs the risks.Angelica Cunha, 55, is a caregiver for an elderly woman and depends on her income to get by. After feeling sick, Cunha self-quarantined for two weeks and has now returned to work. Just five years after a historic recession, Brazilians fear the coronavirus pandemic will lead to another economic crash.Every day, Fabio Rodrigues drives three hours from his home in eastern São Paulo to the Copan, where he delivers mail to the building’s 5,000 residents spread across 1,160 apartments. The building is so big, it has its own zip code.Virgina Albertini gazes out the window in her apartment. The photo conservationist and three-year resident hasn’t left her home in 11 days.I see the signs of a fragile economy in the faces of the homeless. Though the Copan has helped spark downtown São Paulo’s revitalization over the past few decades, there are still many people with no place to go. Some have taken up residence on the street just outside the Copan. With no social support system, residents have stepped in with some relief, coordinating via the building’s Facebook page. Two residents have been crowdfunding and recently organized a meal distribution system. One woman handed out water bottles—it was all she could afford.The Copan building glows in the center of São Paulo as the city around it battles the coronavirus pandemic.For all Brazilians, the pandemic has made an already uncertain future even more so. The government plans to give small entrepreneurs, freelancers, and informal workers a $115 aid check each month for the next three months. But that’s little more than half the monthly minimum wage—and not enough for cesta básica, or “basket of basics,” the amount of food and bare necessities that Brazil estimates citizens need to survive. It’s small comfort in a city where there’s always been hunger in the streets—and now there’s fear of the invisible and the unknown.",
"Three Kaiowá brothers and a neighbor play in Ñu Vera near Dourados, Brazil. The brothers’ youngest sibling was removed from the family shortly after he was born.Dourados, BrazilThe warm wind of summer whipped across the high plains of the Brazilian city of Dourados on the February day in 2015 when Élida de Oliveira’s newborn was taken away.Oliveira, a member of the Kaiowá indigenous group, had given birth to her son alone, in the makeshift house where she lived. The boy’s father had left her when he found out she was pregnant with her seventh child. Built of used scraps of wood, plastic sheeting, and tarps, her home occupies a piece of reclaimed land in the state of Mato Grosso do Sul known as Ñu Vera, just outside the perimeter of Brazil’s most populated reservation, the Dourados Indigenous Reserve, which itself borders the city of Dourados, some 75 miles from the Paraguay border. There’s no electricity or running water on this ancestral Kaiowá land and no room on the parched soil to grow the traditional food—white maize, manioc, potatoes, squash—meant to feed body and soul. (See how the coronavirus is affecting indigenous people in the Amazon.)Ñu Vera, a stretch of ancestral land outside the Dourados Indigenous Reserve, is being reclaimed by the Guarani-Kaiowá people, although the city of Dourados (top left) encroaches.A week after Oliveira delivered her son, a community health agent saw Oliveira with the baby. The agent told her to bring him to the reserve’s clinic the next day at 4 p.m. so he could be weighed, issued a health card, and later vaccinated, just as her other children had been when they were born. What the agent didn’t tell her was that a government children’s services agency had already been called.Ever since the Portuguese colonized Brazil some 520 years ago, indigenous people have struggled to regain their rights, particularly to ancestral land that is the basis of their culture and their connection to traditional food, family, language, and prayer. Today’s government—led by far-right President Jair Bolsonaro, who vowed he wouldn’t give “one more centimeter” of land to indigenous people—has exacerbated the problem, but it’s one that long predates his tenure.Now, in Dourados, indigenous people are fighting to keep their children, who are being removed from their families at an alarming rate. The families are in an untenable situation: For their culture to survive, they need to maintain their connection to ancestral land. But that land can no longer support them, opening them up to charges of neglect from agencies of a government that would prefer they just assimilate.At the clinic, Oliveira was told to take a seat as her baby was whisked into another room to be weighed. Her blood pressure would be taken while she waited, she was told. Someone put a cuff on her arm.Élida de Oliveira stands inside her home in Ñu Vera, where she gave birth to her son alone.But it was taking too long. Clinic employees dashed past, never looking in her direction as they attended to others.Finally, a staff member stopped in front of her. Normally soft-spoken, Oliveira pleaded with the woman to tell her where her son was. The woman sighed. A car had been waiting out back, she said. A representative of the government children’s services agency had taken Oliveira’s baby just minutes after he left her arms.Oliveira sat at the clinic for hours, sure a mistake had been made. She knew she didn’t have much, but she always did her best to feed her children, to keep a roof over their heads, and to make sure that those who were old enough went to school.Someone at the clinic told Oliveira she should go home and wait for a letter from a judge that would give her permission to visit her child. She finally gave in, because she needed to go home to take care of her other children. But she wondered how the letter would reach her: There were no addresses in Ñu Vera.Élida de Oliveira's grandson Widys takes an afternoon nap in the hammock that stretches across her living room.Widys is the youngest son of Carolaine, de Oliveira's 18-year-old daughter, who has her own home on the same piece of land just steps from her mother's.For 30 days Oliveira waited for a letter that would never come. She’d heard of other children being taken from their families in Ñu Vera and on the Dourados reserve, but no one seemed to know where they ended up.The Indigenous Missionary Council (Cimi) offered to help. The nonprofit, which was created in 1972, had long been working with the people living on the reserve and the surrounding reclaimed land. Along with other indigenous rights activists in the city, Cimi created a support network for Oliveira, helping her gather proper documents to request information about the whereabouts of her son, how she could see him, and how she could get him back.That’s when they found out why her baby had been taken. That’s when they told Oliveira that the government said he wasn’t hers.Less than 10 percent of the city of Dourados’ population is indigenous yet indigenous children make up the highest proportion of those held in custody: Seventy percent, according to a 2017 report from the federal government’s National Indian Foundation (FUNAI). The majority of those children—62 percent—were taken in what have been flagged as cases of negligence, usually tied to poverty. However, a federal statute decrees that “the lack of or need for material resources is not a sufficient reason for the loss or suspension of family rights.”Florencia Reginaldo, who lives on the Dourados Indigenous Reserve, was looking after her sister Elisabete’s children when authorities removed them and placed them in state care. They were there a week before their mother, who had taken a job out of town, was able to regain custody.Most of the children taken into custody come from the Dourados reserve. It’s one of seven reservations that Brazil established in the region between 1910 and 1928, to house Kaiowá and Guarani families that the government had forcibly removed from their territories. Families attempting to reclaim their land—their tekohas, a Guarani word that means “the place where we are what we are”—were forced out, often violently, and made to return to the 8,649 acres of the reserve.Now the reserve has dwindled to 7,413 acres, a change that was made between the time the decree to create the reservation was issued to the time the land was officially registered at a government registry office. That’s a far cry from what its 18,000 residents—mostly Kaiowá, Guarani, and Terena—need to thrive. Jobs are so scarce on the reserve that men leave for months at a time to get work, mainly on sugarcane farms and in mines that sit on land that was once theirs.Single mothers like Elisabete Reginaldo often have to leave their children with other family members when they go off to work. Reginaldo, a 39-year-old Terena woman, used to work as a cook on a nearby ranch and return home three days a month to see her children. While she was away, her son and daughter stayed with relatives. But accusations of neglect and abandonment led the children’s services agency to remove the two children without warning.It took Reginaldo a week, but she did regain custody of her children—a rare outcome on the reserve. She used to earn more money as a cook, but has now opened a hair salon where she can stay closer to her children because she fears losing them again.Florencia and Elisabete Reginaldo's homes sit side by side in the Jaguapiru village on the Dourados Indigenous Reserve.The tekohas that families like the Reginaldos and the Oliveiras lost supported large extended families. Indigenous people could move around the land and use it as they saw fit: to live, to plant, to hunt, to fish, to pray. Now they are stuck in place, far from their ancestral territories, the connection to their cultures broken.“The reserve is a place meant to transform indigenous people into non-indigenous people,” says Eliel Benites, a Kaiowá professor at the Federal University of Greater Dourados. “For indigenous people, everything revolves around their territory. When the tekoha is lost, so are its people.”When a Guarani woman is pregnant, she dreams of parrots. For many of the subgroups within the Guarani ethnicity, including the Kaiowá, children are considered beings constantly in motion, acting as the eyes of God within the family. The children’s souls are represented by birds, and their names—which calm their spirits and allow them to stay on this earth—are chosen carefully.Élida de Oliveira begins the two-and-a-half hour walk to Lar Santa Rita, the orphanage in downtown Dourados where her five-year-old son has lived his entire life.Yet the judge who oversaw Oliveira’s case changed her son’s name. He added the name “Raoni,” after the famous Kayapó chief known for defending the Amazon. For the Kaiowá mother, it made no sense: Chief Raoni was from another people, not hers. The boy’s full name can’t be revealed here because he is a minor under state care. But the way it was changed revealed the judge’s ignorance of the vast differences among the 305 indigenous ethnicities in Brazil, an ignorance shared by many Brazilians.For Oliveira, the indignities continued when she learned that her son had been taken to Lar Santa Rita, one of four children’s shelters in the city. At first, she was denied visitation. Two other women had come forward to say they were her son’s mother. The community health agent who had summoned children’s services to take Oliveira’s baby insisted she had never seen Oliveira pregnant so she was sure the days-old infant couldn’t be hers.The courts took more than a year and a half to run a DNA test. It proved that the baby was Oliveira’s child, but another six months passed before she was allowed to see him. Nobody could explain why other women had said they were the child’s mother or what had delayed the DNA test—but even after it proved maternity, her son wasn’t returned to her. Oliveira was deemed negligent and her home unfit. (When children’s services officials were asked about Oliveira’s case for this report, they said they couldn’t speak specifically because none of their current social workers were there when the baby was taken in 2015. The courts also declined to comment, citing confidentiality issues because the case involved a minor.)After Oliveira was denied custody, visiting her son provided its own challenges. Oliveira had to walk two-and-a-half hours from her home to the Lar Santa Rita shelter in the city center. After a handful of occasions when she couldn’t make the long journey, she was accused of abandoning her son and her visitation rights were revoked.Oliveira’s son, now five, has lived his entire life at Lar Santa Rita, and doesn’t speak her language or know her culture. He asks her to bring him things like cookies, candy, and yogurt—food he wouldn’t have encountered had he been brought up in the Kaiowá community in Ñu Vera.For Monica Roberta Marin de Medeiros, director of Lar Santa Rita, insuring that the shelter’s indigenous children maintain contact with their cultures is not a top priority.“Our indigenous people aren’t those isolated indigenous people from the Amazon,” she said. “These aren’t indigenous children and teenagers that are isolated. They want computers, they want tablets, they want cellphones.”The shelter director said she once hired an indigenous “social mother,” a woman who lived at the shelter and cared for the children as their mothers would, but that it didn’t work out because “habits, customs, things to do with hygiene” were lacking.Indigenous activists and professionals who work in the social welfare system say it is a violation of indigenous children’s rights to sever their connections to their families, communities, language, and culture.“Racism in Brazil is a reality,” said Marco Antônio Delfino de Almeida, a federal prosecutor in Dourados who focuses on the human rights of indigenous people. “The first thing a judge should do is consult the indigenous community. But the law allows the community to be substituted by a representative of the federal branch of government that takes care of indigenous policy, or an anthropologist. So FUNAI and anthropologists end up speaking for them.”Alice Rocha, a social worker with children’s services in Dourados since 2016, says the decision to put a child in state care is up to a judge and, once that child has gone to a shelter, she no longer oversees their day-to-day lives.“I think the institutions that take these kids in completely violate their rights when they don’t bother to preserve the culture of each indigenous child under their care,” she said. “What’s happening, as a whole, is genocide. It’s a genocide of indigenous peoples. It’s not of interest to the state to give indigenous peoples strength, to give them a voice.”Without enough land to grow their own garden, Oliveira’s family relied on the cesta básica—a box filled with basic food items like rice, beans, pasta, cooking oil, sugar, and coffee—provided by FUNAI. But the government agency decided at the end of last year to cut support to indigenous people in the state of Mato Grosso do Sul who don’t live on officially recognized indigenous land.For families like Oliveira’s, the agency’s decision not only means hunger, but also gives the courts another reason to keep their children in care. Even if Oliveira wanted to move to a home on the reserve, where benefits are still provided, she couldn’t. There’s no room left on reserve land, and reclaiming the Ñu Vera land is crucial to the survival of the Kaiowá.A final judgment on what will happen to Oliveira’s little boy—whether he’ll be returned to her custody or placed for adoption—is expected soon. It’s been five years of hearings and decisions, the legalities of which she says she doesn’t fully understand. All she knows is that she wants her son back.On a sunny Wednesday afternoon this past October, Oliveira watched her son run around the playground equipment in the shelter’s yard, climbing an orange plastic slide as his 11-year-old brother laughed and chased after him. She’d brought the young boy a cherry lollipop—his favorite—and smiled as he stopped next to her to take a drink of water, under a playhouse painted with colorful images of fish.“It would be the happiest moment of my life if he could come home,” Oliveira said, as she brushed the hair from his face. “I’ll always be here for my son. I’ll always be waiting for him.”",
"Brazilian officials and rights activists are warning of an impending public health calamity as reports emerge of the first deaths linked to the coronavirus among highly vulnerable indigenous populations across the Amazon region.Health workers in the northern state of Roraima reported on April 9 that a Yanomami adolescent had died of COVID-19, heightening concerns that he may have spread the disease to scores of friends and neighbors since developing symptoms three weeks ago. The youth had moved back and forth through an area rife with wildcat gold miners, and it’s unknown where or from whom he contracted the sickness. (See how coronavirus has spread around the world.)The case marks the second death of an indigenous person in Brazil. The total number of confirmed infections among the country’s tribes now stands at seven, scattered across three Amazonian states. They include four Kokama relatives infected in the western state of Amazonas by a doctor from the indigenous health service who had recently returned from a conference in southern Brazil and failed to observe self-isolating protocols.The indigenous inhabitants of Moxihatetema, in the heart of the Yanomami Indigenous Territory, in Roraima state, have assiduously avoided contact with outsiders, even with other groups of Yanomami. But illegal gold mining operations have been detected within a two-day walk of the village. Indigenous leaders blame the presence of wildcat miners for the first recorded COVID-19 death of a Yanomami, and they fear that villages such as Moxihtatetema could be wiped out unless the prospectors are expelled.In the north-central Amazon state of Pará, post-mortem tests ordered by investigators confirmed that an 87-year-old Borari woman had died of COVID-19. Mourners turned out in droves for the woman’s funeral in late March, unaware that she carried the deadly virus and could transmit the disease. The attendance of hundreds at the ceremony has stoked fears that many more cases will surface in the days ahead, potentially overwhelming already fragile health care systems in the region.“Owing to the high degree of movement of people from one state to another in the Amazon, together with a lack of public policies…COVID-19 has fertile terrain to spread rapidly among the populations that live in Amazônia, which could lead to disaster in the short and medium term,” said Roque Paloschi, archbishop of Porto Velho, Rondônia and president of the Catholic rights group Indigenist Missionary Council.Brazil’s Federal Public Ministry, as the office of the federal public prosecutor is called, warned on April 8 of the “risk of genocide” amid allegations that FUNAI, Brazil’s indigenous affairs agency, had done little to protect native communities from the coronavirus contagion. The Federal Public Ministry also repeated its call for the immediate removal of Ricardo Lopes Dias, an evangelical missionary appointed in February to head FUNAI’s Department of Isolated and Recently Contacted Indians.Dias is a veteran pastor of the fundamentalist New Tribes Mission, founded in Los Angeles in 1942 with the goal of evangelizing isolated tribes in South America. His appointment to the sensitive FUNAI post triggered concerns that he would steer the department away from its strategic role of shielding isolated tribes from the forces of the outside world.Through decades of painstaking work, field agents with FUNAI, have confirmed the existence of 28 communities living in extreme isolation in the Brazilian Amazon, and there may be as many as 80 more. Since 1987, federal policy has barred outsiders from entering the territories where isolated groups are known to be, principally to protect the tribes from communicable diseases against which they have little or no immunological defense.Critics fear that Dias will turn a blind eye to missionaries and profit-seeking groups who breach the boundaries of the territories that harbor these groups, leaving them exposed to contagion and dispossessing them of their lands and traditions.Dias dismissed the allegations, insisting that his department continues to operate 21 outposts that control access to the lands where isolated groups are present.“FUNAI’s commitment to the protection of Isolated and Recently Contacted Indigenous Peoples remains firm,” he wrote in an email to National Geographic. “We are following the guidelines of the competent health authorities, we are taking action to manage the global health crisis in the best possible way.”The Kayapó, in the Xingu River basin in the central Amazon region, struggle to preserve their cultural traditions in the face of exposure to the influences of the modern world. In recent days, Kayapó leaders have negotiated the withdrawal of gold miners from their territory for the duration of the coronavirus crisis. Elsewhere, Kayapó vigilance patrols have felled trees to block access roads leading into their reserve.The case of the virus-stricken Yanomami teenager has touched an especially raw nerve among tribal leaders and activists. Some 22,000 Yanomami live in far-flung communities in rugged upland jungle astride the Venezuela border. Many of their villages have little or no contact with the outside, but their sprawling reserve has been illegally infiltrated by thousands of gold prospectors, posing a grave threat to the tribe. Yanomami leaders have been pleading with officials for weeks to expel the miners. The youth was from a riverside community overrun by a string of mining encampments.“You should do your work to avoid the penetration of the epidemic into our homes along the pathways opened by the non-indigenous invaders,” warned the Hutukara Yanomami Association in an open letter on March 19 to federal health and indigenous affairs officials.Activists are particularly concerned over the fate of the settlement of Moxihatetema, whose several dozen inhabitants have assiduously shunned contact with outsiders, even with other Yanomami communities. (Read more about Moxihatetema here.) Prospectors found gold a few years ago just 18 miles from the village, and even before the threat of COVID-19, Yanomami leaders feared that the community could be wiped out by contagion introduced by the miners.Satellite imagery reveals that the coronavirus outbreak appears to have done little to dampen mining operations in Yanomami territory, but Dias says his department will soon open two more outposts to control the influx of miners. Even so, the government of President Jair Bolsonaro is pushing to legalize mining inside indigenous lands across the Amazon. (Violence escalates for indigenous communities as Brazil moves to weaken FUNAI.)Experts say that now more than ever, keeping remote indigenous communities separated from outsiders is the best way to safeguard them. “In my opinion, the only contingency plan that would guarantee the survival of these groups is the expulsion of invaders from these areas, and the protection of all lands where there are indications of the presence of isolados,” said Douglas Rodrigues, a specialist in indigenous health care from the Universidade Federal de São Paulo. Rodrigues has worked in native Amazonian communities for the past 40 years. “It’s the duty of the Brazilian government,” he said.Rodrigues noted that containing a contagion once it has entered a traditional indigenous village with its communal dwellings is all but impossible. “Extended families live together in the houses, with many people, and there is widespread sharing of objects and food,” he said.In the absence of robust government action, some tribes have been organizing to halt the spread of the pandemic. Along the Xingu River in the central Amazon, the Kayapó have reached an agreement with miners to cease their operations and withdraw from their territory. Along the Tapajós River in the state of Pará, the Muduruku have been posting placards prohibiting entrance to unauthorized visitors. Vigilance patrols have redoubled their efforts to protect the Raposa do Sol Indigenous Territory in Roraima, even while patrol members practice social distancing among themselves.But reports from elsewhere suggest that illegal miners, loggers, and land grabbers may be using the health crisis as cover to step up incursions into indigenous territories. In recent days, the snarling of chain saws and roar of machinery have resounded through the forests of the Karipuna tribe in the state of Rondônia. The Indigenous Association of the Karipuna People said tribal members watched helplessly from the distance as the outsiders brazenly cleared land within the boundaries of their territory. (Coronavirus may also sheild poachers in Kenya.)On March 31, Zezico Rodrigues, a leader of the Guajajara people, was found shot dead outside his village in the Arariboia Indigenous Territory in Maranhão. Investigators have yet to produce a suspect, but the Guajajara have been locked in a war with illegal loggers that has left five of its members dead since last November.Might Bolsonaro’s supporters see in the health crisis a silver lining—an unexpected opportunity to push aside the isolated tribes and grab their resources?“I think that could be a possibility to be considered, taking into account the government’s failure to implement protection measures for the indigenous populations in a timely way,” said Sydney Possuelo, retired FUNAI veteran and principal architect of Brazil’s long-standing policy to keep outsiders apart from Brazil’s uncontacted tribes—a policy that still stands, despite Bolsanaro’s avowed intention to integrate the groups into the national society and exploit the riches in their lands.",
"Moxihatetema Village, Yanomami Indigenous Territory, BrazilSpectacular new images of an uncontacted indigenous village in Brazil are stirring pleas from tribal leaders and rights advocates for government intervention to protect the settlement from illegal gold prospectors.The aerial photographs show villagers gathered in the center of a traditional, circular structure inside the Yanomami Indigenous Territory, a sprawling reserve of rivers and upland forest situated astride the border with Venezuela.The images were taken in mid-September by officials from Brazil’s indigenous affairs agency, Fundação Nacional do Índio—known by its acronym, FUNAI—on a surveillance flight over the reserve in the run-up to a joint operation with army troops and police agents to clear out thousands of wildcat gold miners. The same Yanomani Indians had been observed at a village in another location on a reconnaissance flight four years ago. But that communal dwelling was later abandoned, and officials feared for the fate of the group until the most recent sighting. Known as the Moxihatetema, the villagers have assiduously shunned contact with outsiders, even with other Yanomami communities.Moxihatetema Village, Yanomami Indigenous Territory, BrazilOfficials say they experienced both a sense of wonder and impending dread in their low-flying aircraft as they beheld the communal structure—built in an age-old style that has gone out of use among contacted Yanomami. “It’s incredible that they appear to be doing so well,” Guilherme Gnipper, the FUNAI agent who took the photographs, told National Geographic by phone from his home in Boa Vista, capital of the northern Amazonian state of Roraima. “Their gardens are huge, the people appeared to be healthy. But the gold strike is getting closer and closer.”The natives showed little fear, making no effort to hide from the aircraft, Gnipper says. And unlike other communities of so-called “uncontacted tribes” that have been photographed in recent times, the Moxihatetema village appears to be completely devoid of industrial goods—such as aluminum pots, steel machetes, and cloth. “We saw no manufactured products whatsoever,” says Gnipper. “Nothing made of metal. They are living well—in complete isolation. It was like time travel.”But that isolation could soon end, and officials as well as indigenous leaders fear it could end very badly.“I am very concerned about my brothers, the Moxihatetema,” says Davi Kopenawa, a tribal shaman and president of the Hutukara Yanomami Association, which represents the estimated 22,000 Yanomami who live within the boundaries of the Brazilian reserve. (Another 16,000 natives live in an adjacent protected zone on the Venezuelan side of the border.)Kopenawa says prospectors have been overheard on the streets Boa Vista discussing whether to launch a raid on the village. “I’m afraid the miners are going to seek out the village and kill everyone.”FUNAI officials and indigenous rights advocates say that concern is well-founded. Under the new conservative Brazilian government of President Michel Temer, FUNAI’s budget has been slashed by more than a third. The agents assigned to protect the Portugal-size Yanomami reserve are operating on a shoestring and find themselves overwhelmed by an estimated 5,000 prospectors illegally operating in Yanomami territory.Moxihatetema Village, Yanomami Indigenous Territory, BrazilMining operations have increased dramatically in recent months, and the miners are supplied not only via the vast territory’s network of rivers but by a series of clandestine airstrips as well. In an effort to curb the invasion, FUNAI has enlisted the support of a small contingent of Brazilian army troops and state military police. Government officials say that about a thousand prospectors have been expelled from the reserve since the operation began at the end of October.An active gold strike is a mere 18 miles from the village, Kopenawa says. That encampment is supported by an airstrip, complicating efforts to dismantle it and expel the miners. Even peaceful contact with the village could spell disaster, he says, bringing death through diseases for which the isolated community has no immunity. “If the miners reach their village, they will contaminate them with white man’s disease.”The Brazilian government established the Yanomami Indigenous Territory in the months preceding the Earth Summit in Rio de Janeiro in 1992. At the time, the military launched a major effort, backed by aircraft and speed boats, to clear the region of illegal miners. But little by little, the prospectors have crept back in, often with the connivance of local political bosses and businessmen.Many Yanomami Indians, who live in Brazil's Yanomami Indigenous Territory, have some contact with the world outside their homeland.“When they expel the gold miners, they’re not tackling the root of the problem, which are the local politicians and some business leaders,” says Fiona Watson, a campaigner for the rights group Survival International. The organization has been spearheading an international effort to protect the Amazon’s last isolated tribes. “Uncontacted tribes like the one in the photograph are extremely vulnerable. The fact that they’re so near the gold mining operation puts them at enormous risk. It’s the constitutional duty of the Brazilian government to protect them.”Besides the threats of violence and contagious disease, mining operations are also contaminating the waterways in the once pristine region with mercury. Widely used to separate gold from sediment, the toxic chemical accumulates in fish, posing a serious health hazard to indigenous riverbank dwellers who depend on aquatic life as a major source of protein.The Yanomami gained international renown at the start of the new millennium, when Western scientists stood accused of perpetrating a host of misdeeds among the tribe in the course of their research. Widely known as the “Yanomami Controversy,” the imbroglio roiled the field of anthropology, with professional rivals trading accusations of using the tribe as an elaborate prop to further their own careers.“The Brazilian government—FUNAI, the Federal Police, and the Brazilian army—should expel the miners from legally protected Yanomami land immediately,” Kopenawa implored. “The outside world should tell the Brazilian government to protect the Yanomami and expel the prospectors. It’s what we Yanomami want.”Scott Wallace, a regular contributor to National Geographic, is the author of The Unconquered: In Search of the Amazon's Last Uncontacted Tribes. Follow him on his website and on Twitter.",
"Members of a 2002 expedition by the Brazilian agency FUNAI paddle down the Jutaí River in Vale do Javari Indigenous Territory, in Amazonas state. The team, led by Sydney Possuelo, was on a three-month mission to gather information about an isolated tribe known as the Flecheiros, or Arrow People, without making contact with the group.Two members of the Forest Guardians, a group of 120 volunteers from the Guajajara tribe, were ambushed on November 1 by five gunmen while on a hunting trip inside their protected reserve. One of the men was killed instantly by a shotgun blast at close range. The other, wounded in the arm and back, fled for miles through forest and underbrush and is now in hiding.The Forest Guardians—three of whom were killed in a single month in 2016—have been locked in an intensifying battle with illegal loggers invading their homeland, Arariboia Indigenous Territory, in the eastern Amazonian state of Maranhão. While the other deaths occurred outside the bounds of the territory, this month’s assault marked the first time Guardians have been ambushed inside the reserve. Besides the Guajajara, Arariboia harbors several dozen uncontacted Awá nomads, whom the Guardians have vowed to defend, together with the forests they depend on for survival.The dead man, Paulo Paulino Guajajara, 26, and his fellow volunteers had been warning authorities for months that they were receiving a steady stream of death threats. Those issuing the threats cloaked themselves in anonymity. But the Guardians had little doubt who stood behind them: the same criminals who have been stealing their timber and endangering the lives of the Awá, a tribe living apart from the modern world that is especially vulnerable to contagious diseases and violence.Guajajara Forest Guardians Laercio Souza Silva, left, and Paulo Paulino, right, seen here in 2017 in Arariboia Indigenous Territory, in the eastern state of Maranhão, were ambushed inside the reserve by illegal loggers on November 1, 2019. Paulino was killed in the attack and Souza Silva was wounded.The wounded Guardian, Tainaky Tehetehar, also known by his Portuguese name, Laércio Souza Silva Guajajara, received medical treatment and was later moved to an undisclosed location for his safety.I was in Maranhão two years ago to report on the Guardians and the fate of the Awá for National Geographic. At the time, Paulino said he was using a pseudonym, Lobo Mau, or “Bad Wolf,” so “they won’t know my real name.” But loggers did know what he looked like—they had a photo of him on their cell phones. He said they’d been going around the city of Amarante, just outside the reserve, showing his image to Guajajara on the street, asking if anyone knew of his whereabouts. A friend’s tip-off had allowed him to evade an ambush and return safely to the reserve.Paulino left behind a four-year-old son and his wife, who had worried about the dangers and privations imposed by her husband’s work with the Forest Guardians. “My wife goes hungry while I’m away,” Paulino told me. “I tell her I’m defending our land for our children and our future grandchildren.”Defending the land for future generations is becoming ever more perilous for Brazil’s indigenous people—and for the officials assigned to monitor the contentious frontier regions where the country’s uncontacted and isolated tribes continue to roam. (Experts use the terms “uncontacted” and “isolated” interchangeably to refer to indigenous communities that have chosen to live apart from the outside world in near-total independence from the world’s industrial economy.)A wooden platform marks the meeting spot for a FUNAI crew and porters who are hiking through the jungle to bring supplies and gifts for the Korubo, an isolated indigenous group in Vale do Javari Indigenous Territory.Trekking in the jungle is arduous. During FUNAI's 2002 expedition in Vale do Javari Indigenous Territory, the team camped at 39 separate sites.On October 31, and again on November 3, a key outpost controlling access to the Vale do Javari Indigenous Territory, nearly 1,600 miles west of the Guajajara’s territory, in the state of Amazonas, came under armed assault from wildlife poachers. Illegal loggers or poachers have attacked the control post eight times during the past 12 months.The post is operated by the Department of Isolated and Recently Contacted Indians. The department is a specialized unit in the indigenous affairs agency FUNAI, with the unique mission of protecting Brazil’s isolated and uncontacted indigenous people from forced contact by outsiders. Over the years through arduous, on-the-ground expeditions and aerial reconnaissance, the department’s field agents have confirmed the existence of 28 isolated tribes in Brazil and are investigating the presence of up to one hundred others.Ten of those 28 tribes live within Javari Indigenous Territory, making it home to the world’s largest concentration of isolated indigenous communities in the world.Sydney Possuelo, then head of FUNAI's Department of Isolated Indians, gathers his thoughts while leading the 2002 fact-finding expedition through the land of an uncontacted tribe in Vale do Javari Indigenous Territory.During the past three decades, the department has succeeded in winning legal protection for nearly 50,000 square miles of pristine forest along 11 Ethno-Environmental Protection Fronts, where it operates frontline bases scattered throughout the Brazilian Amazon. The policy has brought benefits far beyond protecting the tribes, according to Elias dos Santos Bigio, a 37-year FUNAI veteran of fact-finding missions to delineate the boundaries where tribal nomads roam in the depths of the Amazon.“The territories of the isolados are highly preserved,” said Bigio, who retired from FUNAI in January and led the isolated Indians department for five years during the mid-2000s. “They’re important for the environment, biodiversity, the climate, for preserving sources of clean water. Those lands are crucial for the isolated groups, but they’re also important for all of us.”For months, agents from the department have been clamoring for increased protection of the Javari reserve. On November 7, they got some relief when a federal court ordered the government of President Jair Bolsonaro to provide armed security to the main base and the four other outposts that guard the reserve.Even so, current and former members of the department—all veterans of exacting campaigns in the deepest reaches of the Amazon rainforest—fear that the rhetoric and policies of the current government threaten to unravel decades painstaking work. According to field personnel, budget cuts during the past three years have greatly reduced the isolated Indians department’s operating capacity, forcing base closures and the withdrawal of personnel from key flashpoints. The proposed budget for the division of FUNAI that includes the isolated Indians department envisions even deeper cuts—a 40 percent reduction for the coming year.Members of the Specialized Inspection Group, an elite airborne unit within IBAMA, Brazil’s environmental protection agency, search for illegal mining operations in Roosevelt Indigenous Territory, in Rondônia.Veteran agents were unnerved in early October when FUNAI’s Bolsonaro-appointed president, Marcelo Augusto Xavier da Silva, replaced 15 coordinators within the agency’s hierarchy without warning. They took particular issue with the removal of Bruno da Cunha Araújo Pereira from the helm of the Department of Isolated and Recently Contacted Indians. Pereira is a veteran of years of work in the Javari Valley. In the days before his removal, he helped oversee a coordinated strike with heliborne federal police and army units that destroyed dozens of gold dredges operating illegally along the Javari’s eastern flank.“Bruno was carrying out his duties very well, with all the limitations he had to deal with,” says Antenor Vaz, 25-year veteran who retired from FUNAI in 2013 and now consults on issues involving isolated tribes. “We don’t understand why they removed Bruno from his post.”Vaz was among a group of 15 indigenous leaders and former FUNAI officials who signed an open letter on October 5th protesting Pereira’s removal. The letter warned of a “genocide in progress” resulting from budget cuts and Bolsonaro’s pledges to open up indigenous territories, including the homelands of some uncontacted tribes, to mining and logging.As early as April 2015, Bolsonaro was speaking his mind: "There is no indigenous territory where there aren’t minerals. Gold, tin, and magnesium are in these lands, especially in the Amazon, the richest area in the world. I’m not getting into this nonsense of defending land for Indians.” Then, while campaigning for the presidency in August 2018, he declared, “If I’m elected, I’ll serve a blow to FUNAI, a blow to the neck. There’s no other way. It’s not useful anymore.”A river snakes through Roosevelt Indigenous Territory. The reserve is home to 1,200 members of the Cinta Larga tribe and holds some of the largest diamond reserves in the world. The government of President Jair Bolsonaro wants to legalize mineral exploitation in indigenous territories throughout the Brazilian Amazon. Critics warn that mining will despoil the forest and pollute rivers, including those isolated tribes depend on for survival.The open letter was followed a month later by a declaration by 33 current field agents from the isolated Indians department protesting Pereira’s removal and a possible “cascade effect” that could imperil the delicate work of the department’s 11 field coordinators who oversee the fronts that defend indigenous territories where isolated tribes are present. The signatories warned of the risk of a “paralysis of activities” at the frontline bases that could result in the abrogation of the government’s constitutional duties and international commitments to insure the integrity of indigenous lands and the security of the tribes.Dating back to the start of the 20th century, FUNAI and its predecessor, the Indian Protection Service, was charged with contacting the Amazon’s indigenous peoples in advance of the expanding frontier. “Contact teams” were dispatched to woo the tribes from the jungle, seducing them with trade goods, such as machetes and axes, clothing and mirrors. It could take months, even years to bring a tribe in from the bush.But despite their best efforts to safeguard their indigenous charges, field agents—called sertanistas—found that such “first contacts” almost invariably led to decimating epidemics. Tribes lacked immunological defenses to Western-borne diseases such as measles and influenza, and mortality rates among the newly contacted sometimes ran as high as 90 percent. The survivors were reduced to listlessness, much of their ancestral knowledge and spiritual beliefs crushed by grief and an abrupt end to their hunting-gathering way of life.An Awá woman prepares food for captive pet monkeys. Most Awá have been contacted and resettled during the past three decades, but some families still live as uncontacted nomads in Arariboia Indigenous Territory and two other indigenous reserves.Awá families gather to taste wild honey gathered in the rainforest.




<!--
 /* Font Definitions */
 @font-face
	{font-family:"Cambria Math";
	panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4;
	mso-font-charset:0;
	mso-generic-font-family:roman;
	mso-font-pitch:variable;
	mso-font-signature:-536870145 1107305727 0 0 415 0;}
@font-face
	{font-family:Calibri;
	panose-1:2 15 5 2 2 2 4 3 2 4;
	mso-font-charset:0;
	mso-generic-font-family:swiss;
	mso-font-pitch:variable;
	mso-font-signature:-536859905 -1073732485 9 0 511 0;}
@font-face
	{font-family:Verdana;
	panose-1:2 11 6 4 3 5 4 4 2 4;
	mso-font-charset:0;
	mso-generic-font-family:swiss;
	mso-font-pitch:variable;
	mso-font-signature:-1593833729 1073750107 16 0 415 0;}
@font-face
	{font-family:Tahoma;
	panose-1:2 11 6 4 3 5 4 4 2 4;
	mso-font-charset:0;
	mso-generic-font-family:swiss;
	mso-font-pitch:variable;
	mso-font-signature:-520081665 -1073717157 41 0 66047 0;}
 /* Style Definitions */
 p.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal
	{mso-style-unhide:no;
	mso-style-qformat:yes;
	mso-style-parent:"";
	margin:0in;
	margin-bottom:.0001pt;
	mso-pagination:widow-orphan;
	font-size:12.0pt;
	font-family:"Calibri",sans-serif;
	mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-bidi-font-family:"Times New Roman";
	mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;}
.MsoChpDefault
	{mso-style-type:export-only;
	mso-default-props:yes;
	font-family:"Calibri",sans-serif;
	mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-bidi-font-family:"Times New Roman";
	mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;}
@page WordSection1
	{size:8.5in 11.0in;
	margin:1.0in 1.0in 1.0in 1.0in;
	mso-header-margin:.5in;
	mso-footer-margin:.5in;
	mso-paper-source:0;}
div.WordSection1
	{page:WordSection1;}
-->Awá children play at a swimming hole in Carú reserve, in Maranhão.Veteran sertanista Sydney Possuelo, overcome with disgust after supervising a series of contact campaigns during the early 1980s, led a movement within FUNAI to chart a new direction. The result amounted to a seismic paradigm shift.FUNAI would no longer force contact on tribes still living in isolation in the Amazonian forests. Rather, agents would identify the lands where the tribes wandered and seek formal recognition for those territories. They would staff control posts to block intrusions of illegal hunters, loggers, miners. They would refrain from making contact. In a heartbeat, the sertanistas’ mission shifted from “contact to save” to “save without contact.”The approach staked out a groundbreaking position later emulated by five other countries of South America that harbor uncontacted Amazonian tribes. It recognized the right of indigenous people to pursue their age-old ways of life on their own traditional lands—even for isolated communities to choose to remain apart from modern society. It embraced the notion that such groups require intact forests, abundant wildlife, and unpolluted rivers and streams to survive as vibrant cultures. It was a position that stood at the confluence of environmental protection and the defense of the right to self-determination.The Department of Isolated Indians, later renamed to include protections for recently contacted groups, was created in 1987 to carry out the new mandate. Sydney Possuelo assumed command of the unit.“The policy that I introduced is based in respect for those who are different from us,” Possuelo wrote in an email to National Geographic. At the same time, he said, it’s based in a commitment to “preserve their human rights and their immemorial territories.” (Read “Into the Amazon,” the story in the August 2003 issue of National Geographic about an expedition Possuelo led to gather information about a group of mysterious archers without making contact with them.)A group of Guajajara Forest Guardians patrols the forests in Arariboia Indigenous Territory. The Guardians are a homegrown force of indigenous volunteers who seek and confront illegal loggers and wildlife poachers in their lands.All that effort is now threatening to unravel. The government of President Jair Bolsonaro is pushing to open up indigenous lands, including the homelands of some uncontacted tribes, to mining and logging. Invasions of native territories are on the upswing. Intruders, says former agent Bigio, are taking heart from Bolsonaro’s anti-environmental, anti-indigenous rhetoric and the disarray in FUNAI created by budget cuts and unexplained reshuffling of personnel.In an official statement after the shake-up, FUNAI’s leadership said it was “natural with a new administration” to make such changes, which were “necessary for the implementation of new management goals.”Field agents complain of gag orders imposed by the upper echelons of FUNAI and the environmental protection agency, IBAMA. But Pereira, who is still a FUNAI official and plans to return to his work defending isolated tribes on the Amazonian frontier, speaks out.“The greatest concern that I have is the advance of outsiders—be they for projects authorized by the government or illegal players like loggers, miners, and land-grabbers—into the territories of the isolados,” Pereira told National Geographic by phone from his home in Brasilia. “At the same time, you have the crippling of FUNAI and the department to protect the isolated tribes. It’s a very dangerous mix.”",
"Elephants are a draw for tourists visiting the safari camp at Loisaba Conservancy, a protected area in northern Kenya. With the collapse of the tourism industry caused by the coronavirus, wild animals may face greater threats from poachers.Peter Meshemi says he’s frightened. For the past 12 years he’s worked as an armed ranger in northern Kenya, spending weeks at a time patrolling scrubby grasslands in search of poachers. Now, even as he’s constantly on high alert to protect vulnerable elephants, lions, and leopards that are targeted illegally by hunters at Loisaba Conservancy, he and his 70 fellow rangers have an added worry: protecting themselves against coronavirus.Loisaba, which sprawls over 57,000 acres, is one of more than 100 conservancies in Kenya—wildlife areas legally set aside for land preservation and managed by individuals or groups. “As a ranger you are trained to work in any situation that may arise,” Meshemi says. Yet he was not expecting to face a microscopic foe that has killed more than 79,000 people around the world and now risks—by shutting down travel and tourism—the very creatures he risks his life to protect.“We are scared of it,” he says. “The whole world is scared.”On April 8, Kenya reported a cumulative total of 172 cases of COVID-19 and six deaths. Two days earlier, the government had instituted a lockdown policy that bars most travel in and out of Nairobi County, where the majority of known cases have occurred. So far, people in the remote Loisaba area have avoided the worst in terms of human casualties. The conservancy, however, has depended heavily on money from wildlife safari tourism, a cornerstone of Kenya’s economy. In normal times travel and tourism provide more than a million jobs nationwide, but now that industry is at a standstill. Meshemi and many conservationists worry that one consequence will be increased wildlife poaching—either to provide food for hungry families or for illegal sales—putting him and his fellow rangers in even greater danger.Loisaba’s CEO, Tom Silvester, says the conservancy has lost nearly half its operating budget, which normally comes from tourism fees, and it isn’t feasible now to keep its 48-bed safari camp operations open for the occasional local traveler. Last year, he says, the Loisaba safari camps received some 2,000 visitors who each paid, on average, about $600 a night. Foreign visitors may not come here again “for possibly another 12 months, if not longer,” he says, adding that the peak tourist season, from June to October, likely will be missed altogether this year.Rangers and conservationists worry that amid the pandemic, giraffes, zebras, and other animals may be targeted to provide meat for local families to eat or for sale, along with body parts such as skins.In addition, Silvester says, Loisaba may have to shelve plans to reintroduce rhinos in the reserve. And next month, he expects to have to decrease the number of anti-poaching patrols and to ask workers to agree to a 5 percent pay cut. Even so, the conservancy still takes in some money from cattle-grazing leases and funding partners such as The Nature Conservancy, a U.S.-based nonprofit that partners with communities around the world to preserve land and water for wildlife.Meshemi says he and his colleagues are trying to keep themselves safe.“We are taking strong measures to keep our distance now,” he says. They also sometimes wear masks and gloves and are doing their best to wash their hands often. It’s a help that they spend their days in a wildlife-rich part of the country where there are few people. But when not on patrol, rangers and staff, some 200 people in all, live in close quarters for weeks at a time. With further travel restrictions likely to come, some Loisaba workers whose homes are far away have been leaving to be with their families. Anyone who wants to return later—assuming they can get back—will be monitored for symptoms and housed in solitary quarters with no roommate for the first couple of weeks. Silvester says he’s making preparations for possible local travel restrictions, such as ordering a three-month supply of food rations. “It’s a cash commitment, certainly,” he says.Loisaba hasn’t had to lay off or furlough any staff. But last week 10 of the 35 anti-poaching personnel who protect the 450-square mile Enduimet Wildlife Management Area, in neighboring Tanzania, were told they were out of a job. That’s because of the budget shortfall from the collapse of Tanzania’s wildlife tourism industry, says Alphonce Mallya, the northern Tanzania conservation manager with The Nature Conservancy, which helps support Enduimet.At Loisaba Conservancy, tiny antelopes called dik-diks are in danger of being killed by poachers, as are many other species, including lions and leopards.Enduiment encompasses about a dozen villages and abuts Kilimanjaro National Park. It’s an essential wildlife corridor for elephants, zebras, wildebeest, and impalas. Without cash coming in from safari tourism, Mallya says, it was impossible to pay all the salaries, as well as provide food and keep vehicles running. He expects increased poaching by villagers for bushmeat—everything from giraffes to dik-diks—because it’s cheaper to kill animals for meat (and possibly sell some to other local villagers) than buy it. Safeguarding wildlife in the area will be even more of a challenge for the remaining 25 workers, whose salaries will be paid by The Nature Conservancy and Big Life Foundation, an East Africa-focused conservation nonprofit that supports anti-poaching efforts, Mallya says.East African countries are not alone in their struggles. The prospect of increased poaching because of the coronavirus is “a matter of great concern,” says John Scanlon, special envoy for African Parks, a nonprofit that manages 17 national parks and protected areas across 11 African countries. He adds that such an increase hasn’t been observed yet and that the organization is continuing to carry out enforcement operations. African Parks has also deployed workers into communities to educate people about COVID-19 and hand out sanitary supplies to help protect against its spread.The World Health Organization (WHO) says it’s deeply concerned about what will happen when the virus takes hold in Africa, where the first COVID-19 case was reported in February. Since then, 52 countries have reported cases. “Infection numbers in Africa are relatively small now, but they are growing fast,” Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesu, the WHO’s director-general said in an address on April 9.Many African countries in addition to Kenya and Tanzania have imposed travel restrictions or lockdowns. Rwanda’s four national parks are closed, including the three that are home to the famed mountain gorillas, as a precaution to protect them from possible infection.Dave Wilson, head of commercial development for African Parks, says that “just because a park may be closed to tourists does not mean our work stops in any shape or form, as we are committed to fully manage these parks on behalf of governments on average for 20 years.”In South Africa, where a 21-day lockdown curbing public gatherings and travel, is in force, an expanded law enforcement presence may help deter some poaching, at least in the short term, says Dereck Milburn, southern Africa regional director for the Aspinall Foundation, a British conservation charity. “There is a lot more police presence on all the major routes, and the borders are locked down, and the number of patrols in the reserves have not changed much,” said Milburn, speaking by phone from Pretoria, the country’s administrative capital. “The rangers are doing an outstanding job.”Still, he adds, the loss of an additional deterrent—tourist vehicles in parks and reserves—may embolden poachers. There was a spike in rhino poaching in late March during the first week of the lockdown, when seven rhinos were killed. He says rangers are on the lookout for more poaching incidents.Earlier this week, “I made about 10 calls to section rangers in every part of South Africa, and it’s been pretty quiet,” says Grant Fowlds, conservation ambassador for Project Rhino, an anti-poaching nonprofit based in the coastal city of Durban. The pandemic and the lockdown, he says, has “really stopped poaching quite abruptly,” although it may be easier in remote areas for poachers to evade detection.“Since the first week of the lockdown, it’s been quiet,” agrees Nico Jacobs, founder of Rhino 911, a South Africa-based nonprofit that provides emergency helicopter response and transport for rhinos. Rhino 911 is allowed to keep flying because anti-poaching is considered an essential service.Christopher Lengini trains a bloodhound named Warrior to assist Loisaba’s 70 rangers in their anti-poaching work, more dangerous than ever now because of the coronavirus.How long anti-poaching activities can remain fully operational in South Africa will depend on whether they’re funded by the government or private entities, says Damian Aspinall, chairman of the Aspinall Foundation. Government reserves with annual operating budgets aren’t wholly dependent on tourism, Aspinall says, but “in most private reserves, anti-poaching is completely reliant on tourism and game sales.”Last week in Kenya’s Loisaba conservancy, ranger Meshemi’s scheduled six-week patrol shift ended. In normal times, he’d have gone home to his family for a two-week rest, but he was asked to stay. The 43-year-old ranger will help lead part of the team of 70 bracing for increased poaching in the coming months. “We understand the situation,” he says. “Our work is around the clock.”",
"One of the last refuges for mountain gorillas is Rwanda’s Volcanoes National Park, where nearby Singita Kwitonda Lodge is helping to protect the endangered animals through habitat restoration.From emerging wildlife havens to women-led expeditions, safaris in Africa are no longer about hunting big game or having a camera-toting adventure led by male guides. The future of African safaris has arrived.“Community conservancies like Naboisho in Kenya were an important turning point,” says Judy Kepher-Gona, one of Africa’s top ecotourism experts. “Local villagers went from mostly being porters and cooks to becoming partners and leaders in protecting wildlife.” The results are impressive—conservancies in Kenya now encompass more than 15 million acres and protect some of the world’s rarest species, including the black rhino.As governments have struggled to effectively manage their national parks, private organizations have also stepped in to help, including African Parks, a nonprofit group founded with the sole purpose of saving Africa’s parks and their wildlife by focusing on economic development and poverty alleviation. Success stories include Zakouma National Park, in Chad, which went from the edge of collapse to becoming a jewel in the crown of wildlife encounters today. “We are in a game-changing moment of innovation where local people and travelers alike are benefiting from a new safari vision,” says Keith Vincent, CEO of Wilderness Safaris, one of the continent’s most celebrated outfitters.Going on safari may once have been about hunting. The safaris of today are about conservation—a good thing for local communities and the planet.In Kenya, women-led and -operated initiatives are one of several safari trends on the rise. Nareyio Koshal of the Elelero Group (village) is a Maasai and pioneer of Basecamp Maasai Brand, a business initiative supporting female empowerment, education programs, and community wealth creation. Koshal uses her skills as a beader—a tradition preserved by Maasai women through generations—to earn money to send her two children and 30 grandchildren through school, knowing they will help her achieve her goal of owning a home in the next two years.From Liberia’s Ellen Johnson Sirleaf, Africa’s first female president, to Kenyan conservation crusader Wangari Maathai, Africa has had no shortage of dynamic women leaders. And now a new generation of African women are making it known that they have what it takes to challenge gender norms in the safari industry.“It was typical of men to insist that we did not possess the skills to be good guides,” says Tshepiso Vivian Diphupu, the head of Africa’s first all-female guide team at Botswana’s Chobe Game Lodge. “But in my experience, women are well suited to this work. We tend to be better communicators, are more sensitive to guests’ interests, and are confident and always willing to learn more.” Dubbed “Chobe’s Angels” by some, Diphupu and her colleagues, now 19 strong, are among the first—but not the only—women to break into what was once solely a fraternity.Meet Zimbabwe’s formidable female rangers.“My goal as a guide is to make every safari unique, educational, and fun,” says Maggie Duncan Simbeye, founder of Maggie’s Tour Company, one of the few safari companies owned by an African woman. “I have always loved nature, and my knowledge of plants and animals runs deep.” Working as a safari guide in Tanzania inspired Simbeye to establish the Dare Women’s Foundation, a local NGO working to empower women and girls to pursue their professional ambitions.A southern white rhino is relocated from South Africa, a high poaching area, to Botswana, by Rhinos Without Borders, an organization co-founded by National Geographic explorers Dereck and Beverly Joubert.Ecolodge Campi ya Kanzi, in southern Kenya’s Chyulu Hills, is part of the Maasai Wilderness Conservation Trust and collaborates with local Maasai in all aspects, from building to programming.From the Maasai of Kenya to the Himba in Namibia, indigenous people have long lived in balanced coexistence with nature. “We established the Maasai Wilderness Conservation Trust on our ancestral land, near Mount Kilimanjaro, to protect nature and share our traditional way of life with visitors in a more direct and meaningful way,” says chairman Samson Parashina, a Maasai elder recognized by the United Nations in 2012 as one of six Champions of the Earth.Guests stay at Campi ya Kanzi, an ecolodge in the heart of the trust’s 300,000 acres of community conservancy land, where lions, eland, and other big game roam between Kenya’s Amboseli and Tsavo national parks. “Conservancies are redefining safaris, both in terms of saving wildlife and in offering innovative guest experiences,” says Ashish Sanghrajka, president of Big Five Tours and Expeditions. Sanghrajka specializes in itineraries that support indigenous communities. “It is about being on the forefront of conservation today and also offering a great wildlife adventure. Conservancies are where the two meet.”By 2030, tourism to Africa is projected to generate more than $260 billion annually; photographic safaris are driving much of that economic growth—a vital source of jobs for locals. With so much at stake, safari companies are now funding some of Africa’s most innovative anti-poaching efforts to protect wildlife.Take the Anatolian shepherd dog project at Bushmans Kloof, a National Geographic Unique Lodge of the World, in South Africa’s Cederberg Mountains. “The Cape leopard is one of the world’s most threatened big cats, because livestock farmers kill them trying to defend their flocks. We learned that Anatolian shepherd dogs instinctually protect sheep and goats from predators,” says Brett Tollman, CEO of The Travel Corporation, of which Bushmans Kloof is a part. “So we donated these beautiful canines to local villagers to protect their livestock. And where we have introduced the Anatolian dogs, the result has been a dramatic decrease in poaching of Cape leopards.”Male elephants on the Mara Naboisho Conservancy in Kenya spar with their sharp ivory tusks, which also prove alluring to poachers. One of the conservancy’s goals is the eradication of poaching and illegal possession of wildlife products.Here’s how to take a solo safari in South Africa’s wild grasslands.Chad may qualify as Africa’s least known safari destination, but Zakouma National Park, one of National Geographic’s Best Trips 2020, is changing that. “I have spent 30 years as a private guide throughout Africa, and Zakouma is one of the most amazing wildlife spectacles I have witnessed. Nothing prepares you for the sight of millions of red-billed queleas taking flight at sunrise and elephant herds almost too numerous to count,” says Michael Lorentz, owner of Passage to Africa.More intrepid wildlife lovers are also heading to Madagascar, home to tens of thousands of flora and fauna species. Seventy percent of these, including almost all of the world’s lemurs, are found no place else. The third largest coral reef system in the world thrives here as well.Explore 17 unforgettable safaris.Then there is the west coast of Africa, never really considered a viable safari destination, until the likes of National Geographic explorer Michael Fay led an expedition to Gabon and witnessed hippos swimming in the sea, elephants roaming white sand beaches, and large gatherings of gorillas in jungle clearings.Zakouma National Park is beginning to draw more adventurous safari-goers to Chad. Founded in 1963, the park covers more than 1,100 square miles and hosts nearly 400 bird species, inlcuding black crowned cranes.The contradiction between celebrating nature and adding more pollution to the planet has not been lost on the growing number of today’s more sustainably minded travelers. In 2020, Xigera Safari Lodge will reopen in the biodiverse bonanza of the Okavango, powered by a 4,000-plus-kilowatt solar farm. A Tesla lithium-ion battery system will sport charging points for electric safari vehicles. It will also be free of single-use plastic. “Our aim is to create the eco-luxury safari lodge of the future,” says managing director Mike Myers.Read how a journey into the Okavango Delta changed these conservationists.In Rwanda, one of the last strongholds of the endangered mountain gorilla, Singita Kwitonda Lodge is also taking sustainability to the next level. Natural materials were used to build the walls, and an innovative ventilation system draws in fresh air to cool the rooms, eliminating the need for energy-intensive air-conditioning.In Namibia, andBeyond Sossusvlei Desert Lodge is located in the continent’s only dark sky reserve. “Deserts are particularly fragile ecologically. We have not only taken care to cause as little impact as possible during construction, but we also have a full recovery program once the build is complete,” says Joss Kent, CEO of andBeyond.",
"Sgt. Vimbai Kumire holds up a photo of a dead leopard on her phone. She stares at the image as the truck she’s riding in bounces over the rutted road. The cat’s neck is slashed and its bloody paws hang slack. “Before this job, I didn’t think about the animals,” she says.Now Kumire, 33, and her all-female wildlife ranger team, the Akashinga, are among the animals’ fiercest protectors. The rangers are an arm of the nonprofit International Anti-Poaching Foundation, which manages Zimbabwe’s Phundundu Wildlife Area, a 115-square-mile former trophy hunting tract in the Zambezi Valley ecosystem. The greater region has lost thousands of elephants to poachers over the last two decades. The Akashinga (“brave ones” in the Shona language) patrol Phundundu, which borders 29 communities. The proximity of people and animals sometimes leads to conflicts such as the one Kumire’s headed to now, involving the leopard.At the scene, Kumire wades into an angry crowd. Standing five feet two inches tall, she could easily get lost in the chaos, but she moves calmly and confidently through the emotionally charged group, speaking softly but firmly. Ten injured men slowly come forward. One has a bandage on his cheek, another’s arm is wrapped in blood-stained cotton. Eight others nursing scratches and punctures cluster around her.Conservation officials had collected the leopard’s carcass and accused the men of wrongdoing, inflaming the crowd. The injured men say the leopard attacked, but based on their minor wounds, the rangers are skeptical this was unprovoked self-defense. Killing wildlife without a permit is a criminal offense. But the leopard’s skin, teeth, claws, and bones—worth hundreds of dollars on the black market—represent a month’s salary in Zimbabwe’s impoverished economy.With the carcass secured and the events surrounding the leopard’s death duly recorded, the team’s job now is to remind the community they’re here to help with wildlife-human interactions. The women load the wounded men into their truck and take them to the local clinic.Scenes like this are the essence of the Akashinga’s mission and familiar scenarios for its founder, Damien Mander, a tattoo-covered Australian and former special forces soldier who has trained game rangers in Zimbabwe for more than a decade. His experiences serving in Iraq and on the front lines of Africa’s poaching war have taught him that change—be it peace among humans or attitudes about wildlife—can’t happen without buy-in from the community. “Local people have a vested interest in where they come from, where they live,” he says. “Foreigners don’t.”With that local-first mentality, Mander turned to Phundundu’s surrounding villages—specifically their women—to fill the ranks of the Akashinga. After years of training male rangers, he concluded that in some ways women were better suited for the job. He found they were less susceptible to bribery from poachers and more adept at de-escalating potentially violent situations. He also knew that research shows working women in developing countries invest 90 percent of their income in their families, compared with 35 percent for men. In this regard, the rangers demonstrate a key conservation principle: Wildlife is worth more to the community alive than it is dead at the hands of poachers.Mander sought women who had suffered trauma: AIDS orphans, victims of sexual assault or domestic abuse. Kumire joined after her husband abandoned her and their two daughters. Who better to task with protecting exploited animals, Mander reasoned, than women who had suffered from exploitation? He modeled his selection course on special forces training, subjecting the women to three days of nonstop exercises designed to test their teamwork skills while being wet, cold, hungry, and tired. Of 37 recruits who started the course, 16 were chosen for the training program; only three quit. Years ago Mander ran a similar course for 189 men. At the end of day one, all but three had quit. “We thought we were putting [the women] through hell,” Mander says. “But it turns out, they’ve already been through it.”The next morning the sun rises over the Akashinga camp—a dozen green tents arrayed on a hilltop that offers a panoramic view of the region. The women eat breakfast, and Mander briefs them on the coming night’s two raids—one on the compound of a man said to possess an unlicensed rifle used to kill wildlife, the other on the home of a suspected poacher said to be trying to sell a leopard skin.They spend the morning practicing, ensuring each ranger knows her position. Then Mander gets behind the wheel, four rangers jump in the back with a local police officer, who will oversee the raid, and the team sets off.It’s after midnight when they finally approach the home of the suspected owner of the unlicensed rifle. Mander speeds into the compound and slams on the brakes. The rangers leap out and take up the positions they had practiced. One raps on the front door. Eventually the suspect allows them inside, where they find the dried skins of several duikers, a small antelope species. The man is handcuffed and loaded into the truck.It’s a clear, black night, and the Milky Way stretches across the sky. The rangers have been up for nearly 24 hours. But the leopard skin seller remains at large. “We are not tired,” Kumire says. “We don’t tire until our job is done.”Before they return to their base the next morning, they’ll arrest the alleged leopard poacher. The next night, they’ll catch a suspected elephant poacher. In the hours between, they’ll continue their patrols, removing several poachers’ snares. It’s results like this that show Mander his instinct was right. “Women like this can change everything.”",
"Every year, flocks of eager tourists set out on safari in hopes of capturing the quintessential wildlife photo. Getting the perfect shot isn’t just about luck—you can improve your odds significantly with some careful planning. Here are a few tips for getting the most out of this once-in-a-lifetime trip.Choose a camera setup that will get you close to the action without weighing you down. The easiest way to achieve this is with interchangeable lenses—preferably a zoom lens around 200-400mm and another lens for wide landscape shots. The optimal setup is two cameras: one with a long lens and one with a wide lens. You don’t want to miss the shot because you’re switching lenses right as the lion goes in for the kill, not to mention the dusty conditions that can wreak havoc on an exposed sensor. Avoid taking a tripod since they can be cumbersome and space is limited on the vehicle. Pack extra batteries and memory cards since you’ll have few chances to charge your camera and transfer photos throughout the day. Whatever gear you decide to take, it’s essential to know the ins and outs before your trip—if you’re busy tinkering with a new camera, you’re probably missing out on the action around you.A guide from the Ol Donyo Lodge looks through his binoculars at sunset in the Chyulu Hills of Kenya. The Lodge offers incredible views of Mount Kilimanjaro.It’s tempting to try and save money by organizing a safari on your own, but it’s worth it to go with a travel specialist, like Safari Professionals. Quality travel advisors can offer small or private tours so you are not fighting for a good view or moving on before you get the shot. A good guide will also have the knowledge and experience with wildlife to ensure you’re in the right place at the right time to capture stunning images. Going at it alone or with an inexperienced operator may lead to missed opportunities and subpar photos.The essence of good photography comes down to good light, and nature photography is no exception. It doesn’t matter how expensive your gear is, without good light, your photos will be flat and uninteresting. Getting the best possible photos from your trip might mean losing some sleep. Waking up before sunrise will provide the best light and more opportunities for active wildlife since many animals retreat to rest in the shade during the heat of the day. Similarly, dusk is an optimal time to capture animals waking up from their afternoon naps as the sun sets on the horizon.It is tempting to move on from the herd of elephants after snapping a few photos, but patience pays off. In order to get spectacular images, you have to spend time watching the animals. Over time, you can better understand the animal’s behavior and relationships, which will lead to better photos.Game drives are by far the most common way people see wildlife in Africa but there a number of other options. Walking safaris provide opportunities to get on the ground and see things that might be overlooked in a vehicle. Biking tours are a great way to be more active while on safari but they are not ideal for photography since bikes and cameras don’t mix well together. For those looking to splurge, safari operators like Scenic Air Safaris will give you a whole new view of Africa. Unlike most safari companies, Scenic Air Safaris is one of the few operators that specializes in low level flying, giving you a unique view of the landscape and animals while on route to your destination. Scenic Air Safaris also offers access to leading endangered animal experts while you are on a trip. A variety of different animal experts, from cheetahs to African wild dogs, are on hand throughout your safari to provide priceless insight into each animal's behavior and what actions are being taken on the ground to preserve the species and its habitat.",
"Two lions lie on on a grassy field in Tanzania's Ngorongoro crater as stormy clouds roll overhead.Minutes into our cycling group’s first meeting, someone shares a popular YouTube video of a mountain biker getting taken out by a gazelle while riding through African grasslands. Everyone laughs, and then Justaz Mollel, the tour leader on this 13-day bike trip through Tanzania, informs the group that the clip was shot in Arusha National Park, where we’ll start our adventure the next day. Silence.Turns out, the 2011 GoPro video was actually filmed in South Africa, but point taken: Wild, unpredictable animals will be roaming freely as you pedal through some of Africa's most beautiful landscapes. The joys and challenges of trading a jeep or bus—how most people safari—for two wheels is why this Intrepid trip has been nearly sold out during its inaugural year. People are lining up to be among the first to bike in northern Tanzania's Arusha National Park, the country's smallest safari park at 212 square miles.Mollel, an Arusha native and past Mount Kilimanjaro guide, was recruited to launch the new bike route, which covers around 180 miles of dusty, rewarding trails. And with five built-in rest days across the region, the trip also allows for plenty of Big Five photo opportunities in Serengeti National Park and Ngorongoro Crater.Here are 10 reasons why you should pedal your way through Tanzania’s national parks.Nothing like a fresh brew from one of the world's top coffee producers (15 percent of Tanzania's coffee is exported to the U.S. annually) to jump-start your adventure. Take a short drive from Arusha to Tengeru cultural village, founded in 2004, for a quick tour of Mama Gladness' plantation, home to 14 species of banana, Arabica coffee beans (buy a bag for later!), and handcrafted furniture using papyrus from Lake Victoria. The environmentally conscious property relies on green energy produced by two cows, whose daily dung powers up to 20 lamps and 10 fire pits. Use a fire pit to roast newly harvested beans and enjoy a cup with a delicious home-cooked meal of lentils, rice, avocado, and mashed plantains. Don't overeat because from here you embark on your first of eight rides through the parks.The YouTube clip above confirms it's a zoo out there—sans cages. Hence, the gun-toting park ranger leading the way in his 4x4 through Arusha National Park on day two. It's more for show than necessity. “We could cycle without a ranger, but making our passengers feel safe is priority,” Mollel says. The first eight miles, out of 25 on the bike today, will be your introduction to the locals, including giraffes on the left, buffalo on the right, and … look out, an antelope in front! “It jumped in the middle of the road, maybe three feet from her,” says Mollel of a cyclist who encountered an antelope on a recent tour. “She had a lot of fun seeing it,” he says.Fight the urge to stop and take photos or catch your breath (warning: the first three miles gain more than 1000 feet). You're in the wild, so keep moving. No lions here, but there are leopards and hyena, which generally won't attack unless provoked. If you need to rest, hop in the support vehicle trailing you, then join back in later.Cyclists roll down a dirt road on the way to northern Tanzania's Mkuru Training Camp. The camp, which provides social and conservation programs in the region, is located in the biodiverse Maasai Steppe.After a short, but challenging bike ride on day two, you’ll arrive at Mkuru Training Camp, situated at the base of the country's second highest peak, Mount Meru, an active volcano that last erupted in 1910. The camp boasts safari-style tents, real beds, electricity, and hot showers—thanks to buckets of boiled water. The bathroom-with-a-view—the stunning savannah replaces the missing the fourth wall—adds a dreamy touch. The best part: The low-impact camp doubles as a research, education, and training center for resident Maasai and Meru tribes looking to adopt sustainable practices.After day three's rocky start—eight miles of short, steep hills on loose gravel and sand pits—transfer to a sleek, paved road for the 28 miles to Longido. The mostly downhill section of highway that connects Tanzania to Kenya is a welcome reprieve, inviting speeds that may otherwise seem elusive on the treacherous dirt paths. Despite being a main road, there's little traffic and lots to see. Keep an eye out for ostrich crossings and spear-carrying Maasai (ask before taking photos). Pull into the octagonal Tembo Guesthouse for the night and learn more about this nonprofit boarding school created to support Maasai girls—offering education, community support, and alternatives to early marriage and circumcision.Day four brings the bumpiest 28 miles yet. The relentless ripples in the road will force you to pedal pole, pole (the nation's unofficial tagline, meaning “slowly slowly” in Swahili). And it's all good, there's no rush. Nervous riders might want to invest in a kit with built-in armor, like the protective gear from G-Form. While padding isn't mandatory, helmets are, according to Intrepid's rules. Opt for a white helmet, like the Specialized Ambush Comp, to avoid absorbing the equatorial sun's heat.After three hours of what locals affectionately call the “African massage” thanks to so much corrugated gravel, hop on the support bus for a scenic drive—albeit still bumpy—to the wide open plains surrounding Ol Doinyo Lengai, or Mountain of God in the Maasai language. The active volcano last belched in 2007 and is set to go off again any day now, reports geophysicists monitoring the unstable mountain. Some visitors attempt a sunrise hike to the top (7,650 feet), but considering its imminent eruption, camping in the area for two nights feels risky enough.Elephants rest in the shade of a tree inside the UNESCO-protected Serengeti National Park.No biking on day five means you can lounge by the pool or under a shady tree at the lush green oasis of Lengai Safari Lodge, set atop a hill overlooking the East African Rift Valley. Keep an eye out for nearby baboons hanging out in the mornings. If you can't sit still, take a local tour to the shallow, highly acidic Lake Natron, the breeding ground for 2.5 million flamingos.Along the way, visit the famed Laetoli and Engare Sero sites, where you'll find human footprints from 5,000 to 19,000 years ago. Other roadside attractions include wildebeest, cattle, zebra, and giraffe that won't mind when your driver decides to blast Vanessa Williams' “Save the Best for Last” over the jeep stereo. Afterward, trek to a stunning waterfall before returning to camp for dinner and one more evening in the shadow of Mountain of God.Get your biking fix on barren, gravel roads for about two hours on day six before you have two days off in Serengeti National Park. Earn bragging rights for camping here without armed guards. Hakuna matata! You'll be safe in your double-occupancy, heavy-duty safari tent. Just don't leave anything attractive outside your door, including smelly shoes (cackling hyenas went to town on a pair this summer).The Serengeti does safari the ol' fashioned way: via jeep or truck. You'll be grateful for the extra barrier between you and the leopards, lions, and other badass beasts during your dawn and dusk drives. Swahili terms like twende (let's go), simama (stop), asante sana (thank you very much), and sawa sawa (all good) will come in handy when communicating with your driver. If you want to switch up your perspective, consider taking a sunrise hot air balloon ride followed by champagne breakfast once back on the ground.From the Serengeti, head to the Ngorongoro Conservation Area for more safari action on day nine. Trust us, it doesn't get old. What makes this UNESCO-protected site extra special is its eponymous crater—a deep, volcanic ravine made up of freshwater and alkaline lakes, highland plains, and woodlands.One of the world's largest intact calderas, the Ngorongoro Crater formed its unique ecosystem some three millions years ago when a giant volcano (believed to be as tall as Kilimanjaro) imploded. Sinking to a depth of 2,000 feet, the base covers about 100 square miles and is home to about 25,000 large animals, including the endangered and elusive black rhino. From the backseat of a 4x4, look for any wildlife you might have missed in the Serengeti or want to see more of (warning: you might capture some intimate moments, like big love from horny hippos).Because bringing something home is part of the lure of travel, you'll enjoy exploring the local markets in the village of Mto wa Mbu, or River of Mosquitos, which consists of 120 nomadic tribes. Bike down a long, windy, paved road (feather the breaks and don't get distracted by the roadside baboons) from Panorama Safari Camp. Local guides can take you to the village’s banana plantation, banana beer bar, woodcarving shop, and art gallery. Find a souvenir you love, test your negotiation skills, and take home a piece of this unique community.Maasai community members welcome visitors to their village with a traditional dance.Spend one of your final evenings in Africa with one of the continent's most famous tribes, the Maasai. Dressed now in colorful plaid and draped in beautiful beads, the Maasai were the first to migrate to southern Kenya and northern Tanzania. The semi-nomadic pastoralists will welcome you with a song and dance (be prepared to join!) and a goat or cow sacrifice, which gets cooked over a bonfire. Politely take a bite. “If you want to understand the real life of the Maasai, you should experience it from A to Z. This is a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity,” says Mollel, who is also Maasai.Save your appetite for dinner back at Panorama Safari Camp, where you'll enjoy a spectacular variety show of dancing, acrobatics, and music. Don't stay up too late. You'll want to wake up for sunrise to see firsthand why the camp, overlooking the breathtaking shores of Lake Manyara, got its name.",
"It pains me to say it now, but for many years I lived under the illusion that only the very rich could afford an African safari. This saddened me. My preferred strategy for wealth accumulation—Powerball—had yet to pay dividends, and sometimes I’d wonder if I’d ever see a lion without having to pay a zoo admission fee.Fortunately, as it turned out, I was profoundly mistaken. “Do you think South Africans spend $2,000 a night to see an elephant?” my friend asked. She had lived in Cape Town for many years—was even married to a South African—and knew what she was talking about. “If you really want to go on safari, travel like a local. Rent a cheap car and drive yourself. With airfare I bet it would cost less than $2,000 for a week of game viewing.”“Travel like a local.” The words were a revelation. Safaris, I’d always thought, were for men who referred to each other as “old boy” and for women who wore cravats. I did not realize there was another way—the South African way.Which is how I found myself in the town of Mkuze in KwaZulu-Natal, South Africa. I’d flown in to Durban ($750 roundtrip from Washington, D.C.) and rented the cheapest car I could find—a Ford Fiesta. Then I spent a lively day adjusting to driving on the left side of the road (apologies to the good people of KwaZulu-Natal). My plan was to visit Hluhluwe-iMfolozi Park, where I was confidently informed I’d see rhinos, before making my way through Swaziland to South Africa’s fabled Kruger National Park, an expanse of land nearly the size of New Jersey. Here one can reliably see the storied “big five”—the African elephant, the leopard, the Cape buffalo, the black rhinoceros, and the lion.Impulsive travel, of course, is the best kind of travel. What every traveler yearns for is surprise and wonder, and nothing beats following the bread crumbs of serendipity. This was my first time in South Africa, however, so I availed myself of the advice of locals. “Don’t drive at night” was the universal dictum. Be where you need to be by sunset and stay there. Crime, unfortunately, is an issue in South Africa, but for those who are amenable to common sense, a 500-mile self-guided safari tour should be as safe as a road trip to Florida.It was fall in the Southern Hemisphere, which meant warm, sunny days and temperate evenings. South Africa is one of the world’s most biodiverse nations, and as I threaded my way north on smooth two-lane highways, I noted the sweeping changes in the landscape, from the fields of sugarcane outside Durban to rolling hills of bushveld to the savanna of African lore. Occasionally I’d find a hulking Land Rover in my rearview mirror, urging me to move toward the shoulder—where a startling number of warthogs tend to congregate. As the 4x4s raced by, I imagined they were ferrying the well-heeled tourists who’d booked luxury safaris at one of the innumerable private game reserves that ring the big national parks like orbiting satellites. I didn’t envy them—well, maybe a little bit, particularly when the Fiesta went hurtling over an unexpected speed bump.I had booked a room at the Ghost Mountain Inn near Mkuze, which turned out to be a lovely single-story hotel with an expansive lawn that unraveled toward a mirror-smooth lake. In the near distance the Lebombo Mountains reflected the light of the late afternoon sun.After checking in I sauntered toward the water. A troupe of vervet monkeys scampered across the grass. The colors began to melt across the sky, with flaring streaks of crimson merging into a darkening blue void. I headed toward a dock that stretched invitingly over the water. Perfect, I thought. That’s where I’ll watch the sunset. And that’s when I noticed the sign: BEWARE OF THE CROCODILES.For real? What to do? Should I make some noise, or should I be stealthy? I tiptoed my way toward the end of the dock, my senses attuned to every ripple, every rustle of grass, when suddenly, about 20 yards from me, there was an explosion of water as a hippopotamus thundered above the surface, its gaping, toothy maw glistening with threat. I stood stunned, immobile, as I watched what many consider to be the most dangerous animal in Africa swim and belch a stone’s throw from my quivering legs.I was beginning to feel a little out of my depth. I thought of the Ford Fiesta. I was about to encounter elephants and rhinos and herds of Cape buffalo and God knows how many other creatures that could crush my subcompact rental like an errant bug.“So what do I do if I encounter an elephant inside the park?” I inquired. I was speaking with Jean, a matronly safari guide from Botswana who had moved to Hluhluwe more than 20 years earlier and never left.“You should back away slowly, particularly if it’s a male elephant in musth,” she said. This seemed like sensible advice. I had stayed up late the previous night bingeing on video after video on YouTube of elephants destroying cars in South Africa.“What about rhinos?” I pressed.“The thing about rhinos,” she said, leaning in conspiratorially, “is that they are nearly blind. So whatever you do, do not stop your car above a pile of rhino poo. A rhino could mistake you for another rhino. It will feel challenged. And then it might charge your car, which is not something you’ll want to experience.”Hluhluwe-iMfolozi Park, the former hunting grounds of the Zulu kings, is the oldest game reserve in Africa. Today it is perhaps South Africa’s best kept secret. I saw not more than a dozen other vehicles—an occasional multistory safari truck full of camera-laden tourists, a couple of antipoaching ranger pickup trucks. As I slowly drove in, the first critter I came across was a baby zebra suckling at its mother’s teat. Aww, I thought, it’s like a Disney movie.That’s when the snake appeared. It slithered across the narrow, two-lane road. Sadly, I cannot tell you what kind of snake it was—Black mamba? Spitting cobra?—because I have an Indiana Jones-level fear of snakes and had to pull to the side of the road and take a few deep breaths and go to my safe place.South Africa's fabled Kruger National Park is nearly the size of New Jersey. Here one can reliably see the storied “big five”—the African elephant, the leopard, the Cape buffalo, the black rhinoceros, and the lion.The park is a rugged mix of topography with steep forested hills interspersed with vast savannas. I encountered scores of extraordinary animals—zebras and impalas and wildebeests. I saw warthogs and baboons and monkeys. And then, through a clearing, about 50 yards distant, I spotted two black rhinos. Once upon a time there were but 25 rhinos in the park. Today there are roughly 1,800. If you would like to see a rhinoceros in the wild, this is where you go.I paused, making sure I selected a spot clear of animal droppings of any kind, rejoicing that I had found the first of the big five, and then drove onward to Hilltop Camp, where people who plan ahead can stay inside the park. Often booked months in advance for its accommodations, Hilltop Camp has a restaurant where I intended to have lunch. Alas, standing in my way on the narrow road was a herd of Cape buffalo. They seemed in no hurry to mosey on. Retreat and adapt became my safari motto.Sleep well at places such as Sabi Sabi Earth Lodge, a National Geographic Unique Lodge, noted
for its commitment to sustainability.More. This is what I heard from my neurotransmitters. Once you’ve seen something as magnificent as a black rhino, you can’t help but yearn for sightings of Africa’s other charismatic megafauna. I headed through the Kingdom of Swaziland—which I found to be a surprisingly alpine country—on what was the most direct route to 7,700-square-mile Kruger National Park. Travelers with more foresight than I should reserve a bungalow in one of the park’s rest camps. I managed to snag a last-minute room at the Protea Hotel near Paul Kruger Gate. At breakfast a vervet monkey leaped on my table and stole my banana.Day visitors to Kruger should plan on being at the gate—in my case, the Kruger Gate near Skukuza—at 6 a.m., when most of the animals are up and about in search of breakfast. There is presently a drought in southern Africa, which is bad, but for someone on a self-guided safari it made spotting otherwise reclusive animals almost painfully easy. Elephants and giraffes walked among umbrella thorn trees. Wild dogs sheltered in the nook of a marula tree. A leopard cast a furtive glance from across the river. Hippos did hippo things, while enormous crocodiles sunned themselves on the rocks.I maneuvered the Fiesta onto the dirt roads that extend like tributaries throughout the park. I was beginning to feel at ease in my car. Perhaps too at ease. I pulled into a spot next to the Sabie River. A South African couple in a weathered SUV were staring intently at something through their binoculars.“It’s a lion,” the man informed me. “Want to have a look?” Yes. Yes, I did. I stepped out of my car and reached for the field glasses. There, a short distance across the river, was a lion, a male with a rock-star mane that suddenly perked up at the sight of a human walking freely in his domain. “You might want to get back inside your car,” the man said, as I returned his binoculars. That seemed like the prudent thing to do, and as I settled into the Fiesta, I felt giddy. I have seen a lion in the wild.I patted the steering wheel. Thank you, little car.South Africa’s Kruger National Park and KwaZulu-Natal Province are best visited in spring (September-October), when you will see newborn animals, or in winter (June-August), when it’s driest—vegetation is thinner and visibility is better.Rest Camps Reservations are recommended at the rest camps inside the parks, including Hilltop Camp (hilltopcamp.co.za) in Hluhluwei-Mfolozi Park and Lower Sabie Rest Camp in Kruger (sanparks.org). Accommodations range from basic camping sites to family cottages.Protea Hotel Kruger Gate Conveniently located at the Paul Kruger Gate at Kruger National Park, this 96-room hotel is part of the Marriott network. From $120. protea.marriott.com  Ghost Mountain Inn This country inn near Lake Jozini in KwaZulu-Natal offers 50 rooms amid a five-acre indigenous garden, a spa, and two outdoor pools. From $100. ghostmountaininn.co.zaIn some places the best—and often only—option is the hotel restaurant. Inside the parks, day visitors can grab lunch inside the official rest camps.",
"Lola Akinmade-Åkerström is an award winning Nigerian born, Stockholm-based travel writer and photographer. Her unique photography and writing style are characterised by vibrancy and hope, with her assignments taking her across the globe from the Arctic Circle in Northern Sweden to the heart of the mountains in Cambodia.Lola's personal projects have included working as a field journalist on the web team during Eco-Challenge’s Expedition Race in Fiji and she currently volunteers as a photojournalist with the Swedish Red Cross and World Hope International, documenting their projects in countries such as Nicaragua, Sweden, and Cambodia.Famous for being one of the busiest ports in South Africa, Durban is a thriving 21st century city. Home of the Zulu Nation, the deep rooted traditions can be seen as part of everyday modern life in the city.A short distance from Durban lies the rolling hills of KwaZulu-Natal. From the Zulu villages around the province to the battlefields of the Zulu-Boer-British wars; KwaZulu Natal's lush landscape is full of local culture and history.Lola expresses the joy she has as a photographer in capturing the vibrancy of the people, culture and landscape through her lens, as she journeys through this majestic province of South Africa.« Previous: Pablo Corral Vega | Next: Stephen Alvarez »",
"Pablo Corral Vega has been a National Geographic photojournalist since 1995, whose work has been published in international editions of National Geographic, National Geographic traveller, Smithsonian Magazine and the New York Sunday Times.Vega is the Founder and Director of nuestramirada.org, the network of Latin American photojournalists and is the Co-Director of ‘Pictures of The Year’ Latin America. He is frequently requested to judge Global Photography competitions including World Press Photo and Pictures of the Year. His own work has been exhibited across the globe.Vega’s work focuses around the human spirit. Reflecting this in his photography, he has published a variety of books about the indigenous populations from the mountain plateaus of the Ecuadorian Andes to the deep valleys of Romania - their struggles, traditions and ways of life.Pablo has a deeply profound admiration for Nelson Mandela, not only as a man but as a politician; one which has developed through a lifelong passion to oppose political oppression in Latin America. Being able to retrace Mandela’s steps meant that Pablo was able to grow closer to the man he admired.Statues and sites throughout South Africa celebrate Mandela’s life and his achievements, and have drawn thousands of Global visitors. From his birth place in the Eastern Cape, to the Gauteng Province, KwaZulu-Natal and down to the Western Cape visitors can follow the life journey and memorials that celebrate this great leader.To plan your trip to visit these sites and attractions you now have all the information at your fingertips, thanks to a new App developed by South African Tourism in partnership with the Nelson Mandela Foundation.Search for ‘Madiba’s Journey’ and find the App now available for download from the Apple App store (iOS devices) and the Google Play store (Android devices).« Previous: Jimmy Chin | Next: Lola Akinmade-Åkerström »",
"Whether you’re looking for an ultramarathon or marathon days on the beach, hippos inland or sharks at sea, the harbor city of Durban offers proximity to some of South Africa’s most iconic experiences.Here, Durban’s North Beach attracts swimmers and sunbathers. The city’s inhabitants and visitors enjoy more than 300 days of sunshine annually.",
"Clouds roll over the rocky landscape of Cotopaxi National Park in Ecuador.You don’t necessarily need two years and legs of iron to get a good look at the Andes. You just need a sense of adventure, a little training, and a plane ticket to Quito, Ecuador, to tick off the Trek of the Condor, a five-day route between the Ecuadorian town of Papallacta and Cotopaxi National Park."There’s wild horses, 14,000-foot passes, different kinds of deer than we had ever seen before.It was amazing," says Treinish, who traveled the route on his journey across the Andes. "There’s volcanic ash everywhere, and we were walking by peaks rising more than 16,000 feet."The trek is open to anyone with the training—or, perhaps a better word is courage—to walk at over 10,000 feet for several days. The landscape is harsh, marked by rain, fog, and wind, but its wildness is a large part of what makes it so undeniably striking. While walking on the páramo, the high-altitude grasslands, trekkers encounter villagers herding their animals as their ancestors have for centuries, lagoons dotted with birds, a glacier, and the looming peaks of some of the highest active volcanoes in South America.Plan This Trip: Several outfitters offer guided treks on the Condor route, such as Ecuador Eco Adventure.Gregg Treinish hiked the entire length of the Appalachian Trail and, over two years, some 7,800 miles of the Andes. But the accomplishment Treinish is arguably most proud of is founding Adventure Scientists, an organization that connects adventurous travelers with scientific organizations in need of data in remote locales. So far, more than a thousand travelers have volunteered to collect samples and observations, from grizzly scat on the Continental Divide Trail to high-altitude plants on Mount Everest.",
"Jimmy is one of the most sought after and recognized adventure photographers and filmmakers working today. In the past decade, he has collaborated with some of the most progressive athletes and explorers in the world.He is a National Geographic photographer and has received numerous awards for his work from PDN, Communication Arts, American Society of Magazine Editors and the Lowell Thomas Journalism Awards. As a director and cinematographer, Jimmy has shot for National Geographic, The North Face, Pirelli, Working Title, and RSA Films.On the other side of the lens, Jimmy is one of the few people to climb and ski Mount Everest from the summit and has been profiled in National Geographic Magazine, Outside Magazine, People Magazine, Men's Journal and others.Jimmy says “There are moments in creating photographs when everything falls away, you aren’t focused on trying only on experiencing. That is an amazing space to be in – when you are so involved and passionate the only thing guiding you is the pure intent to do something and do it well.”In South Africa, Mpumalanga means “the place where the sun rises”, describing the region perfectly. Known for its beautiful sunrises and sunsets, Mpumalanga has long been the travellers dream. It lies in the east of South Africa, where the land rises towards mountain peaks and then terminates in an immense escarpment. People are drawn to Mpumalanga by the magnificent scenery, by the fauna and flora, and by the saga of the 1870s gold rush era and a wealth of fascinating tribal legends.Mountains, panoramic passes, valleys, rivers, waterfalls and forests characterise the landscape. It is home to the world’s most famous game reserve Kruger National Park, the world's third-highest canyon, the world's oldest cave and some of the world's best private game lodges.The entire Mpumalanga area offers exceptional opportunities for bird-watching, hiking, horse-riding and fishing. Streams once panned for gold have become the haunts of eager anglers and lazy trout. Steeped in the history of pioneers, hunters and fortune seekers, fascinating gold rush towns abound. Mpumalanga offers something for everyone.« Previous: Lee Berger | Next: Pablo Corral Vega »",
"JACKSON, WyomingAt the beginning of last winter I got a call from Jimmy Chin asking if I wanted to join him for a secret project. "Kit and I are going to try to ski the Grand Traverse," he said.Let me just point out a few things. By Kit, he means Kit Deslauriers, the first person to ski the Seven Summits, the tallest mountain on each continent. And she and Chin are two of only a handful of people on the planet who've skied off the summit of Mount Everest. So when they invite you on a "secret project" your sphincter tends to tighten a little bit. I'm just saying.The objective, as Chin explained, was to ski the most iconic peaks in the heart of the Tetons in an epic four-day push. We'd start at the south end of the range and work our way north, climbing and skiing our way up and down nine different peaks, spanning 12 miles and 20,000 vertical feet of some of the most rugged terrain in the lower 48. We'd be entirely self-supported, schlepping all our own gear and bivouacking in the saddles between the peaks.From the warmth of my living room in New Hampshire, it sounded doable. With good weather and the right snow conditions, an insanely fit and motivated team with the right mix of skills—and a hefty dose of luck—might just pull off what Chin was calling "a last great problem of North American ski mountaineering."Then again, the Grand Ski Traverse has been looming over Jackson for decades, and I had to wonder why it had never even been attempted. After all, the town is home to some of the best skiers in the country, including the grandfather of ski mountaineering himself, Wild Bill Briggs, who basically invented extreme skiing when he slid from the summit of the Grand Teton in 1971.Since then, just about every skiable line in the range has been descended at one point or another, but for some reason no one's ever tried to ski all of the Tetons' most iconic peaks in one epic journey. Still, since mountain athletes are notorious for scooping each other's prize objectives, we vowed to keep our plan secret so that no one would try to beat us to the punch.In the past, it had usually been me calling Chin and asking if he wanted to team up on my latest scheme to explore some obscure mountain range. There was the "Hey do you want to go climb seaside cliffs in Oman?" phone call a few years ago. And then there was the one that began "Hey, want to climb some sandstone towers in Chad?"Following the unwritten climbers' code of always at least pretending to be totally unflappable, I answered casually, "Sounds rad, dude. When should I come out?" But inside, I was thinking, Worst case, I can always fake an injury.At 41, Chin is having an epic moment. Not the kind of epic moment he's generally used to—not an adrenaline-infused, high-altitude ski line or a heart-stopping ascent of a sheer granite wall. Rather he's having an epic career moment.Jimmy Chin (left) and his mentor, legendary alpinist Conrad Anker, at the base of K7 in Pakistan after a failed attempt on the mountain in 2001. Anker, Chin, and climber-filmmaker Renan Ozturk made the first ascent of the Shark’s Fin on Mount Meru in India, as chronicled in the new film Meru.Over the past two decades, he has documented a slew of headline-grabbing adventures. Of course, I'm not a completely objective observer, since I've accompanied him on some of these journeys. (Full disclosure: We're both sponsored athletes for the North Face, which helped make several of these trips possible.)Be that as it may, consider the Chin résumé: He has skied and climbed his way around the world, leading or participating in expeditions to China, Pakistan, Nepal, India, Tanzania, Chad, Mali, South Africa, Borneo, and Argentina, among other places. He was part of the team that searched for—and found—the remote birthing ground of the rare Tibetan antelope. He documented Alex Honnold's stunning rope-free climbs in Yosemite. And then there was that ski descent down the world's tallest mountain.But the crown jewel in his oeuvre—and the project that has thrust him beyond the adventure world into the media limelight—is Meru, a documentary film he's spent the past seven years making, which tells the story of his attempts, along with Conrad Anker and Renan Ozturk, to climb the Shark's Fin, a mile-high fang of rock and ice jutting from the side of Mount Meru, a 20,700-foot peak in northern India that, according to Hindu tradition, is the center of the universe.The film depicts the hardships the three have to overcome just to get onto the mountain. Ozturk suffers a near-fatal head injury. Chin barely survives an avalanche, and Anker struggles to deal with the death of his best friend. But it also reveals the three friends' loyalty and commitment to each other, and their unflagging obsession with climbing a peak that many of their peers thought was impossible.Well-made mountaineering films usually have their moment within the rock-and-ice community and then fade into the "special interest" inventories of video libraries. But Meru has resonated beyond the climbing community. It won the audience award for a U.S. documentary at the Sundance Film Festival in January and opens in theaters on Friday. Already, there are whispers of a possible Oscar nomination.The story of how Chin found his path begins in the 1940s during China's Communist revolution. Chin's parents were swept up in the the mass exodus of Nationalist Party sympathizers who fled to Taiwan when Mao Zedong established the People's Republic of China in 1949.In 1962 they immigrated separately to the U.S., and both landed in the library studies program at Vanderbilt University. Ideologically, they would have been an unlikely pair in China, but their common history as refugees drew them together.Xiao Pung, Mandarin for "Chubbs"—Jimmy Chin’s family nickname, with his mother, Yen Yen, his sister, Grace, and his father, Frank, on one of the family’s many summer camping road trips to visit national parks. In 1962 Frank and Yen Yen immigrated separately to the U.S. from China. The family lived in Mankato, Minnesota.Frank Chin came from a staunchly conservative military family from Wenzhou, in southern China, and Yen Yen's family, from Harbin in the north, was ultraprogressive. The Chins eventually settled in Mankato, Minnesota, where they both became librarians at Minnesota State University. Chin's sister, Grace, was born in 1967, and Xiao Pung (Mandarin for "Chubbs" -- Chin’s family nickname), arrived in 1973.By age three, Chin was playing classical violin, practicing martial arts, and speaking English and Mandarin. By five, he was competing in swimming and tae kwon do, winning nearly every match he entered. One day when he was six, Chin came home from a particularly grueling tae kwon do practice after a snowstorm. His father was waiting for him at the end of their long driveway, which was covered by a foot of snow. "He didn't say anything and just handed me the shovel," recounts Chin. "He trained me by crushing me."The Chins were intent that their children would know their heritage, and each summer the family would travel to Taiwan, where their son was immersed in a culture deeply infused with the principles of Taoism and Confucianism. He spent long days in the classroom hunched over his calligraphy brush working diligently to master the thousands of characters that make up one of the world's oldest written languages.When Grace and Jimmy weren't in class studying Mandarin, the Chins toured the country and visited relatives. "I loved going to the Chiang Kai Shek Memorial in Taipei to watch all the old Chinese people doing tai chi and practicing kung fu," recalls Chin. "The monument was made of white marble, and it was beautiful. Sometimes my dad and I would practice with them."Whatever the endeavor—calligraphy, academics, or athletics—the unwavering mantra in the Chin household was push harder, accomplish more. "Dad's philosophy was that whatever you did, it wasn't good enough," says Grace, "because obviously you could try harder and do even better."Saturdays were reserved for swimming and martial arts competitions, followed by orchestra training. On Sundays in the winter, if he'd toed the line all week, his parents would let him go to Mount Kato, a tiny ski area only a few miles from their home. With only 240 feet of vertical it's more of a hill than a mountain, but Mount Kato was where Chin could escape from the pressures of his regimented existence, a place where he could run free—as fast as his skis would carry him.One day when Chin was 14, he called Grace and asked her to come pick him up because he'd hurt himself skiing. When she pulled up to the mountain, Grace was horrified to discover that the minor injury he'd mentioned on the phone was actually a broken leg. "He was ranting and raving, but not about his leg," recounts Grace. "He was so mad because he'd broken one of his skis, and he insisted that I take him to the ski shop before the hospital."Photographer/filmmaker Jimmy Chin found his way to storytelling by pursuing his passion for climbing, skiing, and exploration. His new documentary film, Meru, the Audience Award winner at this year's Sundance Film Festival, opens in theaters nationwide on August 14.As often happens when a child is put under too much pressure by an overbearing parent, Chin eventually rebelled. In middle school he was stealing his parents' car in the middle of the night to party with his friends. "I had a serious issue with authority," he says. The showdowns with his father—and sometimes the local police—escalated until his mother decided to ship Chin off to Shattuck-St. Mary's, an elite Episcopal boarding school in Faribault, Minnesota.For 130 years, Shattuck had been famous for its Crack Squad—one of the oldest, most decorated military drill teams in the country. The squad was essentially a secret society run entirely by students. "The first time I saw their 45-minute drill executed without a single command, I was mesmerized," says Chin. "As a kid brought up to be a multidisciplinary perfectionist, the squad was totally irresistible."By his junior year, Chin was captain of the squad, only the second time in the group's history the honor had been given to a nonsenior. "He had this way of gaining your confidence and trust," says Dan Fleak, a fellow Squaddie who was a year ahead of Jimmy. "He never demanded respect—rather showed that he deserved it through his actions."But as popular as he was with the students, Chin had ongoing issues with authority that frequently put him at odds with the school's administration. At the beginning of senior year, he was caught with a girl in his room. It was the kind of offense that normally warranted a brief suspension, but the headmaster decided to expel him."The expulsion was earth-shattering," says Chin, "especially for my parents." He'd been a straight-A student, a black-belt martial artist, and all-star athlete with a keen interest in business and the law. He'd expected to apply to Harvard, Princeton, and Stanford. Then suddenly his life veered in a new and unexpected direction.Chin enrolled in a more liberal prep school and fell in with a group of beatniks with whom he started rock climbing and smoking pot. "Getting kicked out of Shattuck had a silver lining," says Chin, "because it finally released all the pressure that had been building up inside of me since I was a little kid. For the first time in my life I was able to chill out."Later, at Carleton College in Northfield, Minnesota, Chin majored in international relations. In a comparative religions seminar, he was introduced to the Tao Te Ching and the I Ching, ancient Chinese texts that form the religious and philosophical basis for Taoism. "These books spoke to me," he says, "probably because of the Confucianism I learned from my dad and all the time I spent in Taiwan studying Chinese as a youth. Taoism taught me to focus on the process and not to be attached to preconceived ideas of what I thought the outcome should be.""Getting the rope up there is your job, Scrappy," Chin says to me, sharing a knowing look with Kit as they snicker conspiratorially. We're staring up at what they call the Spooky Face on Nez Perce. It's the first face we've planned to ski on our traverse.Ski mountaineer Kit DesLauriers, her husband, Rob DesLauriers, and Jimmy Chin were the first and currently still the only Americans to ski from the summit of Everest. Here Kit is seen at the Hillary Step. She is the first person to ski the Seven Summits.To get here, we spent the morning trudging under 60-pound packs loaded with four days' worth of food plus climbing, skiing, and camping gear. Our plan had been to reconnoiter Nez Perce this afternoon and then establish a high camp from which to explore the best possible descents. But the Spooky Face looks more like a serious alpine climb than a ski descent—a 2,000-foot rock wall with a few token patches of snow. And suddenly, exactly what we're up against sinks in, because this nightmare is just one of the nine peaks on the traverse, and even an animal like Chin wouldn't try to ski it in its current condition.We always knew that pulling off the Grand Ski Traverse would depend on the conditions, and this winter there hasn't been enough snowfall to cover this face. But the key to success—and survival—as a ski mountaineer is to know when to push and when to back off.So we decide to see how much of the project we can complete and turn instead toward the middle and highest part of the range. By late the next day, we find ourselves standing on the summit of the Grand Teton. The line I'm staring down between my skis is the exact route pioneered by Bill Briggs more than 40 years ago, and I silently tip my hat as I stare down at Jackson Hole, where he still lives to this day. This ski run is almost as steep as the Spooky Face, but since it's at a higher elevation there's a lot more snow, and the conditions are close to ideal."Don't forget," says Chin, as he slides over the edge, "don't fall."This time he's not teasing or exaggerating. It's a simple fact. If one of us were to blow a turn, we might be able to self-arrest with the ice picks attached to the grips of our ski poles, but there's a reason they call this ski mountaineering—we're skiing down a 50-degree incline that's more suited to alpine climbing. That doesn't stop Chin from swooping down onto this hanging panel of snow high on the Grand as if he were at the resort, and he deftly jump turns his way through an obstacle course of boulders jutting from the wind-blasted slope.After 15 perfectly scribed turns, he traverses onto a rib of snow and pulls out his camera. But instead of waving us on, he holds his poles up in a X-pattern. The summit is coming in and out of the clouds, and he wants us to wait for the right light to get pictures of us coming down. (This is one of the curses of skiing with a filmmaker-photographer—the light is always key.) As Kit and I fidget anxiously on the summit, our ski tips hanging over the lip of a 7,000-vertical-foot ski run, I ask her about skiing Everest with Chin and her husband, Rob, in 2007."It's funny after nine years what sticks in your mind," says Kit. "By far the most memorable part of the whole experience was our descent of the Lhotse Face." The Lhotse Face is a mile-high wall of 50-degree, hard, blue ice that lies between 21,000 and 26,000 feet on Everest's south side. At the time, it had never been skied before."As we dropped in off the South Col, it just kept getting steeper and steeper. We were all so focused on finding our own line that we got split up, and we each ended up on these different tendrils of wind-blasted snow." Every once in a while, she explained, she'd catch a view of Chin, but he never seemed to be taking photos. "I knew what we were doing was historic, and I really wanted to have some documentation," she says, "so I yelled over to Jimmy and asked him if he wanted to get some shots."Chin told Kit to wait and then skied down a ways to get in position. Kit saw him take off his pack and remove his camera, but then he immediately put it back on and kept going. Her legs began to shake as she struggled to hold an edge, but he just kept skiing, until finally she realized that he wasn't stopping. When she caught up with him a thousand feet below in the middle of the face, she asked him why he hadn't taken any photos. "I couldn't," Kit recalls him saying. "When I lifted the camera to my eye, I felt like I might lose it.""If any of us had fallen, it would have been deadly," says Kit. "I remember feeling bizarrely assured that I wasn't the only one who was thinking about the exposure and the consequences of a mistake. To this day I think it's the only time I've ever seen Chin in a position so extreme that he couldn't get the shot."It was in a similarly exposed position that Chin took his first professional photo. Sitting in a portaledge one evening on the side of Yosemite's El Capitan, Brady Robinson, Chin's climbing partner and fellow Minnesotan, showed him how to adjust the focal length, f-stop, and depth of field on his Nikon FM. A few days later, at a final bivouac on the summit, the sun bathed their campsite in early morning light, and Chin grabbed the camera and snapped a few frames of his sleeping friend. One photo turned out to be a gem, and Robinson, an aspiring adventure photographer, sold it to gear maker Mountain Hardwear for $500, and gave the money to Chin.At the end of the season, Chin called his parents to tell them that instead of applying to law or business school—as he'd promised he would after taking a year off to climb—he'd decided to go on an expedition to Pakistan. It wasn't welcome news. "It was the last time I would speak to either of them for a year," he says.As enthusiastic as he was to climb in the Himalaya, Chin didn't know the first thing about launching an international expedition. So he showed up one Monday morning at the gallery of the late adventure photographer Galen Rowell, who'd recently returned from Pakistan's Charakusa Valley.The receptionist told him Rowell was busy and offered him a seat in the waiting room. Rowell never appeared that day, and Chin spent the entire week returning to the waiting room until Friday afternoon, when Rowell finally walked up and introduced himself. "I've got to give you credit for your perseverance," he said.Rowell spent the next hour giving Chin a personal slide show of his recent expedition. Before they parted, he handed Chin a picture of the valley's most striking unclimbed tower. "Make sure you take a camera," he said.A year later at the winter outdoor retailer convention—the outdoor community's annual gear trade show in Salt Lake City—Chin's photos of Brady's and his first ascent of that tower covered the Mountain Hardwear booth.During that convention, a mutual friend introduced Chin to Conrad Anker, one of America's leading alpinists. Anker had recently returned from an expedition in Tibet where he narrowly survived an avalanche that claimed the life of his best friend, Alex Lowe. He still had scars on his face from being tossed hundreds of feet in the avalanche, and he was an emotional wreck, but he took an instant liking to Jimmy."My first impression was of a guy with charisma and intelligence but a complete lack of ego," says Anker. "He was pretty refreshing compared to some of the people you meet in the climbing world."To capture incredible images of climbers in the vertical realm, photographers often have work just as hard as their subjects. Here Jimmy Chin is seen at work on the Freestone route next to Yosemite Falls on assignment for a National Geographic magazine cover story about the iconic climbers and climbing culture in Yosemite National Park, California.Soon the pair were inseparable, and under Anker's tutelage, Chin quickly developed into an uncommonly strong climber and, more important, into one of those rare individuals who also has the talent and work ethic to document the climbing experience with his camera. And though Chin didn't realize it at first, Anker was training his young apprentice to help him tackle a climb he'd been dreaming about since he was a young grasshopper himself—a last great problem of Himalaya climbing called the Shark's Fin on Meru.  A few year's later, Anker orchestrated what turned out to be Chin's big break. Anker and Rowell, along with Rick Ridgeway, a member of the first American expedition to climb K2 in 1975, and filmmaker David Breashears were planning a self-supported 300-mile trek across the Chang Tang Plateau in Tibet. The goal of this National Geographic-sponsored expedition was to cross one of the most remote and inhospitable high-altitude deserts in the world in search of the birthing ground of the mysterious Tibetan antelope. When Breashears had to drop out, Anker suggested Chin as his replacement, even though Chin had never picked up a video camera. Chin's fluency in Chinese and his knowledge of Chinese culture and customs proved instrumental in navigating all the red tape in China—and he nailed the assignment.On the strength of Chin's performance in Tibet, Breashears hired him a year later to help shoot his Everest IMAX movie, during which Chin summited alongside Ed Viesturs. Then Viesturs hired Chin to shoot him on Cho Oyu and Annapurna, the last two peaks in his quest to become the first American to summit all 14 of the 8,000-meter peaks.Chin's career had taken off.On a fine spring evening toward the end of my stay in the Tetons, I arrive at the Chin household, on the west bank of the Snake River, to check in with Chin and to meet his wife, Chai Vasarhelyi. Chai and their 18-month-old daughter, Marina, have just flown out from New York City, where they live. Jimmy and Chai maintain separate residences in Jackson and Manhattan respectively, necessitating frequent plane trips back and forth across the country.Chai greets me at the door. She's tall and thin with piercing dark eyes. Like her husband, she's also a documentary filmmaker. They met at a young entrepreneurs conference three years ago and a few months later decided to team up on directing Meru, which Chin had been struggling to finish. Their relationship grew out of the long nights they spent in the editing room.Marina totters up, and Chin tosses her into the air. She squeals with delight, but a moment later Winnie, their Chinese nanny, who speaks only Mandarin, is wagging her finger in his face.  "Winnie pretty much runs the show around here," says Chin, handing his daughter to her before leading me to the back of the house, where a giant picture window reveals a panoramic view of the mountain range where we've been tromping around all season. A long stone hearth, covered in climbing and ski gear, is adjacent to the window, and on its end sits a dog-eared copy of the I Ching. Chin refers to it the way a Christian might a Bible and always has a copy handy.It's been almost four years since the team summited Meru, and Chin hasn't been on a major expedition since. Thumbing through the I Ching, I wonder out loud if parenthood has anything to do with his current hiatus from Himalayan climbing."Becoming a parent has changed the risk calculus for me," he says. "But it might be age too, and seeing a lot of friends die in the mountains. Will I take the same risks I took in my 20s? Probably not, but I will always push myself in the mountains."In the end our attempt to ski the Grand Traverse was doomed by Mother Nature. The mountains never got enough snow to allow us to complete Chin's dream linkup. But we took what the mountains gave us, and over the course of several attempts we managed to ski the five main summits—South, Middle, Grand, Owen, and Teewinot.In spring 2015, photographer/filmmaker Jimmy Chin, Kit DesLauriers, and Mark Synnott set out to climb and ski several peaks in the Teton Range of Wyoming. If all worked according to plan, they would climb and ski the Grand Traverse, the nine iconic peaks of the Tetons, in one four-day push. The season’s snow conditions prevented the full traverse from being completed, but they did ski five main summits of the Teton skyline—South, Middle, Grand, Owen, and Teewinot.We also succeeded in documenting a season of ski mountaineering in a way that perhaps no one has done before. Chin has taken thousands of photos and shot hours of video. But it strikes me that the one thing we haven't documented is the arduous process that he goes through every day he's in the mountains: the predawn starts, the miles of grinding uphill under heavy loads of photo and video gear, the endless wrestling with bricklike cameras, the frozen fingers and frenetic race against dying batteries—all while worrying whether he could be pushing himself harder.He doesn't say it, but it's clear the Chin mantra is still pulsing in his brain.Although we failed to complete the secret project, Chin is surprisingly unperturbed. There will be other ski seasons in the Tetons, and he's got a long list of secret projects. It's an attitude tempered by years of experience, perhaps best expressed by one of his favorite Chinese proverbs: "Trees that don't bend with the wind, won't last the storm."Mark Synnott is a writer and expedition guide based in New Hampshire. Follow him on Instagram.",
"Lee Berger is currently one of the most sought after paleoanthropologists as well as a National Geographic explorer-in-residence. He is a professor of Human Evolution and the Public Understanding of Science in the Institute for Human Evolution at the University of Witwatersrand, Johannesburg.Professor Lee Berger has made what has been hailed as the most important archaeological discoveries in recent history—two new species of human ancestors. Guided by a pair of local cavers, Berger discovered ancient fossils deep inside the Rising Star cave. There, 30 meters underground in the Cradle of Humankind World Heritage site, Berger’s team uncovered more than 1,550 fossil elements, representing an unprecedented 15 individuals. He named the new species Homo naledi.“We’ve found a most remarkable creature,” says Berger. “This new discovery is the single largest fossil hominin find in Africa to date. It shakes up our understanding of the human family tree and has the potential to transform understanding of human evolution.”Lee has been named of the Times Most Influential People.The Cradle of Humankind is one of eight World Heritage Sites in South Africa. Here the landscape is dotted with subterranean limestone caves that have turned up a rich fossil record for human evolutionary studies. These findings have led to the 'Out of Africa' theory, estimating that most human ancestors originated from one general spot … Africa.The Cradle of Humankind World Heritage Site lies about 50km north-west of Johannesburg, an area of rolling grassland, rocky outcrops and river courses typical of this land before it was overtaken by urban sprawl.It’s here where you get to see history being made – where you can witness actual real life discoveries as they are being found. Tens of thousands of visitors from across the world come here to see first-hand the fossil record that lies in the network of limestone caves beneath the surface.Find out more at http://www.maropeng.co.za/« Previous: Thomas Peschak | Next: Jimmy Chin »",
"Future singer-songwriters fill small chairs at a street corner in the Maboneng Precinct every Sunday afternoon for Sidewalk Sessions, a community-building initiative established by Kelly Grevler (pictured). She gives free guitar lessons to young neighborhood children.Read more in "A New Golden Age in Johannesburg" in the December 2013/January 2014 issue of National Geographic Traveler (subscribe here).",
"Paleoanthropologist Lee Berger is seen in the Rising Star cave near Johannesburg on September 7, 2015.A new trove of fossil bones found in a cramped South African cave is adding to our understanding of an unusual cousin of modern humans, scientists announced on September 13.Broadcasting live from South Africa’s Rising Star cave system, paleoanthropologist Lee Berger revealed that ongoing excavations have uncovered new skeletons in the Dinaledi Chamber—four years to the day after the chamber’s discovery.This site is famous for yielding the first fossils from a previously unknown human relative named Homo naledi. Announced in 2015, the tiny-brained species sports a remarkable mosaic of modern and archaic features. H. naledi’s foot is nearly indistinguishable from a modern human’s, but its shoulders and torso are more apelike.But unlike any of the previous discoveries, excavators found the new remains at the base of “the chute”—the 7.5-inch-wide, 40-foot slot that modern explorers use to enter the chamber.“One of the big questions from the beginning of the Homo naledi expedition was: did Homo naledi come down the chute?” said Berger, a National Geographic Explorer-in-Residence. “No one believed that was possible; in fact, I think most of us had our doubts.”It may seem like a small detail, but the new fossils’ location is important, since it informs ideas of how—and why—this tiny-brained human relative ended up deep within a complex cave system.Berger thinks that despite its small brain, H. naledi was no intellectual slouch. Its brain may have had a surprisingly humanlike structure, and its hands could have made and manipulated tools, he argues. For now, though, scientists have not found any stone tools in association with H. naledi.Perhaps the most controversial part of the H. naledi debate involves Dinaledi itself. Berger’s team has argued that the individuals found so far must have entered Dinaledi through the chute—but unlike today’s spelunkers, some H. naledi may not have entered the chamber alive.Instead, the team posits that some of the skeletons ended up in Dinaledi because the ancient species deliberately disposed of its dead by navigating to the chamber and tossing dead bodies down the chute. This kind of mortuary behavior is usually associated with modern humans and their large-brained relatives, including Neanderthals.The body-disposal idea has met its fair share of criticism, with some scholars suggesting that H. naledi may have entered Dinaledi through alternate passages that have since collapsed. But if H. naledi bodies had in fact entered the chamber via the chute, skeletal remains would likely have piled up in the debris cone near the chute’s mouth.Near the bottom of this debris cone, the team claims to have found bones entombed in sediment—and Berger says that they belong to H. naledi.“The importance of the discovery is that it means that H. naledi, at least some of them, did come down the chute, they did come down through those narrow confines,” he said. “That’s a major discovery for us and, I think, very exciting for paleoanthropology.”On September 26, the team reported in a livestreamed video that the debris cone contained teeth, skull fragments, articulated hand and wrist bones, and portions of a ribcage. It’s possible that these remains all came from the same individual, but scientific study of them will likely take months to years.The team also hasn’t specified which of the cave’s sediment layers contain the newfound skeletons, making it impossible at present to confirm the bones’ age. If they’re within the layer that bore the 2015 H. naledi remains, they are likely between 236,000 and 335,000 years old.Though study of the new bones is just beginning, team scientists are cautiously optimistic.“We have recovered several hominin specimens from an area near the base of the chute, from beneath the current sediment surface,” says University of Wisconsin-Madison paleoanthropologist John Hawks, a member of Rising Star team.“For this reason, we are comfortable saying that the main goal of this excavation in the Dinaledi Chamber may have been met.”",
"Thomas Peschak is an assignment photographer for National Geographic and the Director of Conservation for the Save our Seas Foundation (SOSF). He is a senior fellow of the International League of Conservation Photographers and has been named as one of the 40 most influential nature photographers in the world.Originally trained as a marine biologist, he retired from science fieldwork in 2004. He became an environmental photojournalist after realizing that he could have a greater conservation impact with photographs than statistics. Yet he remains rooted in marine science through his roles as Director of Conservation for SOSF and Founding/Associate Director of the Manta Trust. He strives to merge photojournalism and cutting edge science to create powerful media projects that tackle some of the most critical marine conservation issues of our time.Thomas has written and photographed five books and he is a multiple winner in the BBC Wildlife Photographer of the Year Awards. In 2011 and 2013 he received World Press Photo Awards for his work.South Africa’s coastline is exciting, vivid and epic. With just under 3,000km of varied coast, South Africa’s coast offers something for everyone, whether kite surfing in Langebaan, seal diving in the Western Cape or the solitude of the wild empty beaches of the Wild coast.The coast is so vast and so varied that you will never get tired of it. Some highlights include the meeting place of the Atlantic Ocean and the Indian Ocean at the Cape of Good Hope, it inspires a feeling of awe and limitless possibility.For those wishing to see marine life, there are few more exciting sights than the Penguins and the whales along the Western Cape. For more adventure, the Wild Coast suggests local authenticity and serenity.The South African coast really offers something for everyone.« Previous: Heather Perry | Next: Lee Berger »",
"Graduating with a degree in Marine Biology, and working as an aquarist at SeaWorld in Florida, Heather Perry has always had a passion for places surrounded by water.After studying at the Brooks Institute of Photography Heather started her photo career and has built an extensive portfolio of underwater and surface images, as well as aerials and environmental portraits.Her projects have included California's kelp forests, Micronesia, the Galápagos, the Caribbean and the Gulf of Maine. Having worked with National Geographic since 2004, Heather's fascination with water drew her to Cape Town—a unique city surrounded by both mountains and ocean.Boasting beautiful beaches and the stunning ‘Table Mountain’ at its heart, Cape Town is a city of outstanding natural beauty.With its unusually rich biodiversity and an estimated 2,200 species, Table Mountain has become one of the new 7 wonders of Nature, and it is an increasingly popular visitor experience to view the topography of the city from the top of the mountain.Individuality, creativity and style can been seen everywhere in this city; through the architecture, local crafts, food, markets and music. As a key hub of design and creativity it is no wonder Cape Town has been announced as the ‘World Design Capital’ of 2014.National Geographic Photographer Heather Perry feels immediately at home immersing herself in this warm, welcoming vibrant city.« Previous: Joel Sartore | Next: Thomas Peschak »",
"Joel has worked with the National Geographic Society and the magazine as a photographer for nearly two decades. During his time with National Geographic, his passion for conservation and wildlife has defined a lot of his work.From the remote Amazon rainforests to the Arctic, Europe to the US and National Parks, he has focused on all endangered species and their natural habitats, and the importance of human responsibility, so that future generations are able to enjoy and continue conservation works.Besides the work he has done for National Geographic, Joel has also completed assignments for Time, Life, Newsweek, Sports Illustrated and contributed to numerous book projects. His work has been the subject of several national broadcasts including National Geographic’s Explorer, the NBC Nightly News, CNN's Anderson Cooper 360 and an hour-long PBS Documentary.His fascination in conservation of wildlife has drawn him to South Africa, to understand more about the incredible wildlife it has to offer and also to protect.Once a derelict farm-land, Madikwe Game Reserve, has been transformed into becoming one of the most beautiful, sustainable and community-enriching projects in South Africa. The reserve is a joint venture between the state, and the private sector—with everyone reaping the benefits of the partnership.The Game Reserve, situated just three hours drive from both Johannesburg and Pretoria, covers some 75,000 hectare of stunning landscape. Boasting all of the Big 5, the reserve is home to over 8000 animals and 3 villages—whose livelihoods are sustained by Reserve.Rich in its diversity of vegetation, it ensures a wide range of topography and offers ideal game viewing opportunities, as well as a unique destination in South Africa filled with stories of optimism, pride and the knowledge that the work there is creating a better future not only for the local communities but also for the wildlife that they depend on.« Previous: Jodi Cobb | Next: Heather Perry »",
"For years National Geographic photographer Joel Sartore worked far away from home—documenting the astonishing wildlife of Bolivia’s Madidi National Park or scrambling up the three tallest peaks in Great Britain or getting too close to grizzly bears in Alaska. His wife, Kathy, stayed in Lincoln, Nebraska, and took care of the kids. “He never wanted to change diapers or be a stay-at-home dad,” she says.But in 2005, on the day before Thanksgiving, Kathy was diagnosed with breast cancer. The cancer sentenced her to seven months of chemotherapy, six weeks of radiation treatments, and two operations. So Joel Sartore had no choice: With three kids ages 12, 9, and 2, he couldn’t travel for the stories that were the mainstay of his career. Of that time, he says now, “I had a year at home to think.” He thought about John James Audubon, the ornithologist. “He painted several birds that are extinct now,” says Sartore, who has prints of Audubon’s Carolina parakeet and ivory-billed woodpecker in his home. “He could see the end for some animals, even in the 1800s.” He thought of George Catlin, who painted American Indian tribes “knowing that their ways of life were going to be seriously altered” by westward expansion. He thought of Edward Curtis, who “photographed and recorded, on early movie footage and sound,” threatened native cultures.This species of rodent, the first animal to be photographed for Photo Ark, thrives in large underground colonies in arid parts of East Africa.“And then I thought about myself,” he says. “I’d done almost 20 years of photographing in the wild, and I wasn’t moving the needle very much in terms of getting people to care.”The smallest foxes in the world have enormous ears to cool them down as they traverse sand dunes in the Sahara, where they are common. Their cuteness makes them attractive in the exotic pet trade.He had taken pictures that showed in one frame why a species was struggling—an Alabama beach mouse, for instance, in front of a coastal development that threatened its habitat—but he wondered whether a simpler approach would be more effective. Portraits could capture an animal’s form, features, and in many cases its penetrating gaze. Could they also be used to capture public attention?On a summer day in 2006 Sartore called up his friend John Chapo, president and CEO of the Lincoln Children’s Zoo, and asked if he could take portraits of some of the zoo’s animals. Even with Kathy’s illness, he could work a little close to home—and the zoo was one mile away. Chapo told Sartore to come on down. “I was mostly humoring him,” Chapo says.When he arrived, Sartore requested two things from Chapo and curator Randy Scheer: a white background and an animal that would sit still. “What about a naked mole rat?” said Scheer. He put the bald, bucktoothed rodent on a cutting board from the zoo kitchen, and Sartore started taking pictures.It might seem odd that such a humble creature could inspire what has become Sartore’s lifework: photographing the world’s captive species and making people care about their fate. But launching a planetwide mission with a tiny rodent fits perfectly with Sartore’s philosophy. “I get most excited when I do little critters like this,” he says, “because nobody’s ever going to give them the time of day.”There are estimated to be between two million and eight million species of animals on the planet. Many of them (forecasts range from 1,600 species to three million) could go extinct by the end of this century, as a result of habitat loss, climate change, and the wildlife trade. “People think we’re going to lose animals in their grandchildren’s time,” says Jenny Gray, CEO of Zoos Victoria in Australia. “We’re losing them now. And those animals are gone forever.”See photos of the some of the world's most endangered species, and learn more about the Photo Ark project to photogrpah them all.Zoos are the last hope for many animals on the verge of vanishing—but zoos shelter only a fraction of the world’s species. Even so, Sartore estimates that it will take 25 years or more to photograph most of the species in captivity.Since 2006, he’s photographed more than 8,000 animals for the passion project he named Photo Ark. He’s taken pictures of small ones: a green-and-black poison dart frog, an El Segundo flower-loving fly. Large ones: a polar bear, a woodland caribou. Marine animals: a foxface rabbitfish, a Hawaiian bobtail squid. Birds: an Edwards’s pheasant, a Montserrat oriole. And on and on and on. Sartore says he won’t stop until he dies or his knees give out. (Read more: “Aquatic Mammal With Snorkel Nose Is 8,000th Animal in Our Photo Ark.”)Sandra Sneckenberger, a biologist with the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, has seen firsthand how Sartore’s photos can move others. A few years ago the population of Florida grasshopper sparrows—a bird Sneckenberger concedes looks “drab brown” from a distance—had plummeted to about 150 pairs at only two locations. After Sartore’s image of the bird raised awareness of its plight, federal funding to help the agency conserve it soared from $20,000 to more than a million dollars.Nearly half of all primate species are in danger of extinction, and the five here—including the red-ruffed lemur—are among the world's most endangered.This female named Nabiré was one of the last of her subspecies. She died in 2015, a week after this photograph was taken. Sudan, the last northern white rhino, died in March 2018.Sartore has taken portraits of animals that may be saved—but also of animals that are doomed. In 2015, at the Dvůr Králové Zoo in the Czech Republic, he photographed a northern white rhino, one of only five left in the world at the time. The 31-year-old female lay down to sleep at the end of the shoot. A week later it died of a ruptured cyst. In March 2018, Sudan, the world's last northern white rhino died. “Do I think that the rhinos going away is sad?” Sartore says. “It’s not just sad. It’s epic.”Most of the animals in Photo Ark, which is supported by the National Geographic Society, have never been photographed so distinctively before, with their markings, their fur, and their feathers so clearly on display. If they disappear, this will be the way to remember them. Sartore’s goal “isn’t just to have a giant obituary of what we’ve squandered,” he says. “The goal is to see these animals as they actually looked in life.”Now millions of people have seen the animals that Sartore has photographed. People have met their gazes on Instagram, in this magazine, in documentaries, and projected on the sides of some of the world’s great monuments: the Empire State Building, the United Nations headquarters, St. Peter’s Basilica in the Vatican, and more.There are as many ways to photograph an animal as there are animals, but Sartore operates within some basic parameters. All the portraits are taken with a black or white background. “It’s a great equalizer,” he says. “The polar bear is no more important than a mouse, and a tiger and a tiger beetle are exactly the same.”Large animals are photographed in their enclosures, where Sartore either hangs a giant black curtain to serve as backdrop or paints a wall. At the Houston Zoo he draped 18 feet of black cloth at one end of a giraffe’s stall. The giraffe didn’t even notice, says Peter Riger, vice president of conservation at the zoo. “It just knew it was coming in to get lunch.”Small animals are placed in a soft-sided box, with Sartore poking his lens through a slit in the side. “Some of them fall asleep or eat in there,” he says. “A lot of them don’t like it at all.” He keeps the sessions short, a few minutes at most.Sartore doesn’t wrangle the animals himself; he leaves that to the zookeepers. If at any point “the animal shows signs of stress, the shoot is over,” he says. “The safety and comfort of the animals come first.” None has been injured.The baby shown here was just six days old when it was photographed. The coats of young tapirs are spotted to blend in with the dappled light of the tropical forest floor.Snowy owls live in the upper latitudes of North America, Europe, and Asia, but this one ended up in Nebraska and was starving when it was rescued by Raptor Recovery.Sartore, however, has not been so lucky. “A crane tried to blind me one time,” he says. “That was terrifying.” A mandrill, a burly type of primate, punched him in the face. A white-crowned hornbill—“the nastiest, most badass bird I’ve had to do”—struck him with its beak and drew blood. “But aren’t I asking for it, in a way?” he says.Joel and Kathy Sartore sit side by side at their kitchen table in Lincoln with the lights dimmed. His arm rests on her shoulders. He had returned from Madagascar the night before (he began traveling again in 2007) and wanted her to help him select photos of rare lemurs and pochards, a kind of duck, to post on Instagram. “The thing that draws people is the human element,” says Kathy, who often serves as his photo editor.Sartore grew up not too far from Lincoln, in Ralston, Nebraska. His parents loved nature. His father took him mushroom gathering in the spring, fishing in the summer, and hunting in the fall. His mother, who died last summer, gave him a Time-Life book about birds when he was around eight years old that may have changed his life. Toward the back, in a section on extinction, was a picture of Martha, the world’s last passenger pigeon. He remembers returning to that page over and over: “I was amazed that you could go from billions to none.”Joel and Kathy met as University of Nebraska students at a spot called the Zoo Bar. “Our dates,” Kathy recalls, “were fishing and frog-gigging,” which involves spearing frogs for their legs. The activity can be justified, Sartore hastens to explain: “They were bullfrogs; they’re an invasive species here in Lincoln.”Kathy’s cancer came back in 2012; she had a double mastectomy. That same year, their son Cole, who was 18, was diagnosed with lymphoma. Both recovered, but the illnesses have left their mark. “We don’t get uptight about too much anymore,” Sartore says.Photo Ark has changed him as well. “It has made me very aware of my own mortality,” he says. “I can see how long it’s going to take.” If he can’t finish the job—he still has thousands of species to photograph—Cole will take over. “I want the pictures to go to work,” Sartore says, “long after I’m dead.”Also known as the prehensile-tailed porcupine, the largely nocturnal species spends some 85 percent of its time in trees. Sartore’s camera caught it at rest but alert.",
"Jodi has worked in more than 50 countries, primarily in the Middle East and Asia, specializing in large-scale, global stories. Jodi is obsessed with the human condition, particularly in an increasingly interconnected world—she seeks out raw humanity in every location she visits, and was thrilled and excited by the melting pot that is Johannesburg—its people, its warmth, its creativity all contributed to a truly unique urban experience.Cobb has also photographed for the Day in the Life and Vietnam Veterans Memorial: The Wall, Here Be Dragons, and The Way Home: Ending Homelessness in America. Her work was also featured in the book Women Photographers at National Geographic.She has also won several awards, including numerous National Press Photographers Association Pictures of the Year awards and World Press awards. She was also the first woman to be named White House Photographer of the Year.There is something exciting happening in Johannesburg. The city has been redefining itself dramatically over the last few years—and has emerged butterfly-like as one of the most important cultural destinations in the world.The city is teeming with an new and exciting dynamic creative energy, and established artists and cultural spaces. The city has always been a melting pot, of cultures, ideas, visions, people and projects; and this has never been truer. New sites such as Arts on Main and 44 Stanley, are springing up around the city, providing a vibrant home and outlet for both cutting edge contemporary art and design as well as more traditional practices.Resident artists are now becoming key players on the international art scene, presenting a refreshing new interpretation on many subjects as a result of the fascinating influences of both South Africa’s and Johannesburg’s colourful history.« Previous: Stephen Alvarez | Next: Joel Sartore »",
"Stephen Alvarez, a National Geographic photographer since 1995, is renowned for producing global photo stories on exploration, conservation, culture and religion.His work at National Geographic began with an assignment that took him more than 20,000 feet up into the Peruvian Andes to photograph the discovery of a 500-year-old Inca mummy 'The Ice Maiden', named by Time Magazine as one of the Top 10 Discoveries of all time.His following assignments included exploration of the caves of Sarawak, Borneo, in an effort to aid their conservation, an expedition into Krubera - the world's deepest cave, and photographing the moai of Easter Island under the Milky Way.Alvarez has been the recipient of many awards for his work including Communication Arts and Pictures of the Year International.The uKhahlamba-Drakensberg area, spanning 243 000ha forms part of the uKhahlamba-Drakensberg Park, a UNESCO World Heritage Site. The uKhahlamba-Drakensberg is an unspoilt paradise, characterised by thousands of hectares of pristine grasslands and dominated by the dramatic Drakensberg Mountains.It is described by UNESCO as having "exceptional natural beauty in its soaring basaltic buttresses, incisive dramatic cutbacks, and golden sandstone ramparts", and its geological history lends it a distinctive character as one of the great mountain ranges of the world.The site’s diversity of habitats protects a high level of endemic and globally threatened species, especially birds and plants. This spectacular natural site also contains many caves and rock-shelters with the largest and most concentrated group of paintings in Africa south of the Sahara, made by the San people over a period of 4,000 years.With his experience of shooting magnificant landscapes across the globe, Stephen was eager to visit The Drakensberg area, finding its cinematic landscape unlike anything else he's seen in the world.« Previous: Lola Akinmade-Åkerström | Next: Jodi Cobb »",
"Rapa Nui’s mysterious moai statues stand in silence but speak volumes about the achievements of their creators. The stone blocks, carved into head-and-torso figures, average 13 feet (4 meters) tall and 14 tons. The effort to construct these monuments and move them around the island must have been considerable—but no one knows exactly why the Rapa Nui people undertook such a task. Most scholars suspect that the moai were created to honor ancestors, chiefs, or other important personages, However, no written and little oral history exists on the island, so it’s impossible to be certain.A Polynesian society blossomed in this unlikely locale after hardy souls somehow navigated a fleet of wooden outrigger canoes to this tiny speck in the vastness of the Pacific Ocean. Here, in isolation some 2,300 miles (3,700 kilometers) west of South America and 1,100 miles (1,770 kilometers) from the nearest neighboring island, the Rapa Nui developed a distinct architectural and artistic culture. That culture reached its zenith during the tenth to 16th centuries, when the Rapa Nui carved and erected some 900 moai across the island.It is generally thought that the Rapa Nui’s demise resulted from an environmental catastrophe of their own making.It’s not clear when the islands were first settled; estimates range from A.D. 800 to 1200. It’s also not clear how quickly the island ecosystem was wrecked—but a major factor appears to be the cutting of millions of giant palms to clear fields or make fires. It is possible that Polynesian rats, arriving with human settlers, may have eaten enough seeds to help to decimate the trees.Either way, loss of the trees exposed the island’s rich volcanic soils to serious erosion. When Europeans arrived in 1722, they found the island mostly barren and its inhabitants few.Today’s tourists are numerous, and most visit the Rano Raraku quarry, which yielded the stones used for almost all of the island’s moai. Rapa Nui’s ancient inhabitants left the quarry in a fascinating condition—it is home to some 400 statues, which appear in all stages of completion.Meanwhile, across the entire island, many moai are reversing the creation process and deteriorating rapidly from priceless carvings back into plain rock. The volcanic stone is subject to weathering, and intensive conservation efforts are needed to help preserve Rapa Nui’s stone legacy in its present, awe-inspiring state.Rapanui artisans carved the giant statues, called moai, centuries ago from volcanic rock at a quarry a mile away. By the 19th century all of Easter's moai had been toppled—by whom or what is unclear.It’s miraculous that Polynesian peoples ever reached Rapa Nui in the first place. Getting there today is far easier, but the island is still very far afield. Long flights service Rapa Nui from Santiago, Chile and Tahiti.High season on Rapa Nui is the Southern Hemisphere summer—January to March. Though winter can get a bit chilly, average maximums still hover around 72ºF (22ºC) and minimums dip to only 57ºF (14ºC)—so the weather is really rather pleasant year-round. Reduced crowds are an added attraction in the off-season.Cars, motorcycles, and mountain bikes are available for hire and all are good ways for visitors to explore the island’s scattered archaeological sites. While most people visit Rapa Nui to explore its cultural history the island is also home to some excellent diving, surfing, and enticing beaches when a bit of relaxation is in order.Giant moai statues dot the grassy flanks of an extinct volcano on Easter Island.",
"The African southern white rhinoceros has stepped back from the precipice, reaching a population of 17,500—large enough and genetically diverse enough to survive. The turnaround is stunning. At the end of the 19th century this fearsome yet relatively placid grass-eater, which can grow to more than 5,000 pounds, was nearing extinction, a victim of indiscriminate hunting. Then in 1895 a remnant population of 40 or fewer rhinos was located. In a long-term project, South Africa set aside a game reserve, now Hluhluwe-Umfolozi Park, to nurture them.By the 1960s private landowners had also begun building white rhino herds so trophy hunters could take a shot at a few each year; the fee is currently about $40,000. Making rhino ranching profi table was key to saving the animals, says Michael Knight, head planner for national parks. Another species in South Africa, the aggressive black rhino, lives a solitary life that makes protecting it more of a challenge. Like other rhino species, it is clinging to survival.",
"The Colorado River snakes through Grand Canyon National Park, in Arizona.The world awaits. Where will you go next? Our editors and explorers pick the planet’s 25 most exciting destinations for the year ahead. To create our annual Best Trips list we collaborated with the editorial teams of National Geographic Traveler’s 17 international editions and with our own globe-trotting experts to report on the essential and sustainable sites to see in 2020. Grab your bags and go!A replica of the 16th-century Stari Most (Old Bridge) spans the Neretva River in Mostar, in the country of Bosnia and Herzegovina.What to know: Partially destroyed during the Bosnian War (1992–1995), history-rich Mostar still bears scars of the past. Numerous buildings in the Old City, developed as a 15th-century Ottoman frontier town, have been rebuilt or restored in the 25 years since the Dayton Peace Accords established relative calm in the western Balkans. Wander around and you’ll pass newly renovated apartments next to buildings riddled with bullet holes. Local and international artists regularly decorate the abandoned structures with colorful murals. Mostar’s most tangible image of peace is the 16th-century Stari Most (Old Bridge), rebuilt in 2004. It connects the city’s predominantly Christian Croat west side with the mainly Muslim Bosniak east. —Barbera Bosma, managing editor, Nat Geo Travel NetherlandsWhen to go: May How to go: Visit Mostar as part of a 12-day National Geographic Journeys “Discover the Balkans” trip, offered in partnership with G Adventures.Women of the Longhorn Miao tribe in Guizhou province, China, wear elaborate headdresses of linen and wool on special occasions.What to know: Historically one of China’s most isolated and undiscovered provinces, southwestern Guizhou is gaining global notice as a cloud computing and big-data center. The mountainous region’s plentiful water and cool climate are draws for Apple, Huawei, and other tech powerhouses that have established or are building facilities in the provincial capital, Guiyang. This buzz around bytes has improved access to the entire province, including the traditional villages of ethnic minority groups, such as the Bouyei, Dong, and Miao. In eastern Guizhou’s indigenous villages, in particular, days unfold at a slow pace and people continue farming and textile traditions—such as spinning, embroidery, and batik—practiced since the sixth century. —Lu Yi, managing editor, Nat Geo Travel ChinaWhen to go: April–May How to go: The Guiyang–Guangzhou High-Speed Railway connects the megacity of Guangzhou (northwest of Hong Kong) with Guizhou province, including station stops in ethnic regions.Ice-covered trees, known as snow monsters, transform southern Tohoku’s Zao ski resort into a Japanese winter wonderland.What to know: Less than three hours by train from Tokyo, home of the 2020 Summer Olympic Games, Tohoku should get a gold medal for best unknown travel wonderland. Comprising the six northernmost prefectures on Japan’s main island of Honshu, this region features pristine forests, gorges and crater lakes, thousand-year-old temples and shrines, and venerable local festivals—yet less than 2 percent of international travelers come here. Walk the Michinoku Coastal Trail, which runs for 620 miles from Aomori to Fukushima. The latter was devastated by the 2011 tsunami, and the newly opened trail is a stirring symbol of the area’s rebirth. For skiers, Tohoku regularly records some of the planet’s heaviest snowfalls, and resorts such as Appi Kogen are exhilaratingly uncrowded.When to go: Year-round How to go: Base yourself at Koganezaki Furofushi Onsen, in Aomori, which offers 70 rooms and an open-air hot spring with views over the Sea of Japan.In the UNESCO World Heritage site of Hollókő, Hungary, locals mark Easter with Mass, a procession, and folk dances with girls wearing brightly colored traditional costumes.What to know: Despite its lack of soaring peaks (the highest is 3,327-foot Mount Kékes), Hungary is a dream hiking destination thanks to the country’s National Blue Trail. Meandering about 700 miles from Irottko Mountain, on the western border with Austria, to the northeastern village of Hollóháza near Slovakia, the Blue Trail (Kéktúra in Hungarian) is a wonderfully diverse web of paths labeled with white-and-blue-striped waymarkers. Originating in 1938 and recognized as Europe’s first long-distance trail, it’s part of the nearly 6,500-mile European long-distance walking route E4, which begins in Spain and ends (with ferry connections) in Cyprus. So, while you could use the Blue Trail as a launchpad for an epic, cross-Europe trek, Hungary’s historic route is best experienced as a singular destination. —Tamás Vitray, editor in chief, Nat Geo Travel HungaryWhen to go: August–September How to go: Get a Blue Trail passport to earn stamps at checkpoints along the route. Collect all 147 stamps and receive a coveted Blue Trail Badge, or complete one of the three stretches awarding section-hike badges.In Czechia, Telč’s main square is lined with pastel-hued Renaissance and baroque houses.What to know: With resplendent Italian Renaissance architecture, it’s no wonder the southern Czechia (Czech Republic) town of Telč is sometimes called the Czech Florence. Positioned midway between Prague to the north and Vienna to the south, the storybook town got its official start in the 14th century as a crossroads on the well-trodden trading routes among Bohemia, Moravia, and Austria. Stone walls and a system of man-made fish ponds helped protect Telč’s historic town center, a UNESCO World Heritage site. The triangular marketplace is bordered by a rainbow of pastel-hued burgher houses, originally constructed from wood and rebuilt with stone after fire decimated the town in 1530. From the square, walk to the Telč Chateau. The former Gothic castle was transformed into a Renaissance jewel by nobleman Zachariáš of Hradec and his wife, Kateřina, whose Italianate taste inspired Telč’s ornate style. —Tomáš Tureček, editor in chief, Nat Geo Travel CzechiaWhen to go: May–September How to go: Tour the Telč castle to see the sumptuous stucco chapel, built about 1580, as the final resting place of Zachariáš and Kateřina.Harp seal pups are born on the ice and need a stable platform to survive. Sea ice coverage in the Gulf of St. Lawrence is getting less predictable every year.What to know: When you walk on sea ice, it’s easy to forget that there’s an ocean below you. This frozen world is stripped down to essentials: impossibly blue sky, bright sun bouncing off a blanket of fresh snow, wind that vibrates like a cello, whiteness all around. Welcome to the harp seal nursery in the Gulf of St. Lawrence off the Magdalen Islands, Quebec, one of three Northwest Atlantic harp seal pupping grounds. Adult seals migrate here from the Arctic, the pregnant females searching for suitable ice to birth on, and males follow, eager to mate. Harp seals are an ice-obligate species; they require a stable sea platform of ice for pups to survive. The pups are born on the ice in late February and early March. The young seals are one of the most captivating creatures on the planet, with obsidian eyes, charcoal nose, and cloud-soft fur.When to go: February–March How to go: Liveaboard boat expeditions offer the luxury of time with the harp seals above and below the sea ice; Hotel Madelinot runs small-group excursions via helicopter. Read more: Go inside the fragile world of Québec’s harp seals.The Twr Mawr Lighthouse in Anglesey is a scenic stop along the United Kingdom’s new North Wales Way.What to know: Three new, fully mapped national touring routes, collectively called the Wales Way, showcase the best of this legend-filled land. At 185 miles, the Cambrian Way is the longest of the three roads, snaking north to south along the backbone of Wales. Sandwiched between mountains and sea, the Coastal Way is a sweeping 180-mile journey around Cardigan Bay on the country’s west coast. The castle-rich North Wales Way follows a centuries-old trading route 75 miles from northeastern Queensferry to the Isle of Anglesey. Each driving itinerary is a gateway to wider outdoor adventures. Hike in Edmund Hillary’s footsteps on Mount Snowdon; inland surf at Adventure Parc Snowdonia; or go coasteering (a new adventure sport that combines rock climbing, cliff jumping, snorkeling, and more) on the Pembrokeshire coast. —Zane Henry, project editor, Nat Geo Travel U.K.When to go: May–June How to go: Dragon Tours offers private and group itineraries tailored to participants’ interests. Owner/guide Mike Davies holds a graduate degree in medieval Welsh history and can help trace clients’ Welsh ancestors. Read more: Here’s why Wales is Britain’s adventure hub.Colossal statues of Egyptian pharaoh Ramses II guard the entrance to Abu Simbel’s main temple.What to know: Tourism to Egypt is rebounding from its steep decline in the wake of the 2011 Arab Spring revolution. However, the feeling of having a destination to yourself still can be found at Abu Simbel, deep in the south of Egypt near its border with Sudan. Originally cut into a rock cliff by the Egyptian pharaoh Ramses II (ca. 1303–ca. 1213 b.c.), the temples at Abu Simbel are at once archaeological treasures and marvels of modern engineering. Buried by sand for millennia, the towering landmarks were unearthed by archaeologists in 1813 and saved from the rising waters of Lake Nassar—the gigantic reservoir created by the damming of the mighty Nile at Aswan—by a monumental five-year relocation effort launched by the Egyptian government and UNESCO in 1960. Wander from one dimly lit chamber to another through the 98-foot-tall Great Temple, guarded by four gigantic figures of Ramses II. Stand awestruck in front of images of the pharaoh and Nefertari, his beloved queen, engraved on the walls more than 3,000 years ago. Take your time: Chances are few people will be jostling for your view. —Daphne Raz, editor in chief, Nat Geo Travel IsraelWhen to go: February–March How to go: A good way to experience Abu Simbel is as part of a Nile cruise. Outfitters cruising the river include National Geographic Expeditions, Oberoi, and Abercrombie & Kent.Visitors view the installation “Messages from the Atlantic Passage,” by South African artist Sue Williamson, at the Kochi-Muziris Biennale, in Kochi, India, December 2018. The biennale is South Asia’s biggest art show.What to know: The oldest European settlement in India is gaining notice as a buzzing new arts hub. Seaside Kochi, located in Kerala state on the southwestern Malabar Coast, was founded in 1500 by Portugal, first in a parade of colonial powers (Holland and England followed) to rule the tropical port city. This multilayered colonial past is most present in historic Fort Kochi, the waterfront district where several Dutch- and British-era properties house galleries and cafés. The four-month-long Kochi-Muziris Biennale is the largest event of its kind in South Asia. Launched in 2012, the biennale showcases contemporary international, Indian, and cross-cultural visual art and experiences, such as Singaporean-Indian artist and writer Shubibi Rao’s 2018 “The Pelagic Tracts,“ a multifaceted deep dive into a world where books are the most prized commodity. Rao is curator of the fifth biennale, set to run from December 12, 2020, to April 10, 2021. —Lakshmi Sankharan, editor, Nat Geo Travel IndiaWhen to go: December–April How to go: Visit galleries and attend a performance of Kathakali, the classical dance drama of Kerala, on National Geographic’s seven-day “South India: Explore Kerala” trip, offered in partnership with G Adventures.A herd of several hundred elephants heads toward a watering hole in Chad’s Zakouma National Park.What to know: Home to a rapidly growing African elephant population—some 559 in 2019 and a thousand expected by 2024—Zakouma National Park is an under-the-radar African safari destination. The park’s location, in southeastern Chad, one of the world’s least visited countries, makes Zakouma a best-kept secret—one worth sharing to help ensure its continued success. Poaching previously had rendered the park nearly a war zone, with 90 percent of the wild elephants killed. Funding from the European Union and the 2010 decision to transfer park management to the public-private conservation organization African Parks has brought back life to the region. In addition to its profusion of pachyderms, Zakouma is a playground for more than 10,000 buffalo and about 1,000 Kordofan giraffes. Among other wild things at home here are nearly 400 species of birds, as well as cheetahs, leopards, and servals. —Marina Conti, editor in chief, Nat Geo Travel ItalyWhen to go: March–April How to go: Stay at the eight-tent Camp Nomade, open mid-December to mid-April, or the more affordable Tinga Camp, a 20-rondavel (round hut) camp open mid-November to May.Opened in 2014, Spruce Street Harbor Park is a successful emblem of the revitalization of Philadelphia’s Delaware riverfront, once a series of dilapidated piers.What to know: There’s a lot of glimmer in Philadelphia: vibrant murals and glinting metalworks, multihued mosaics and kaleidoscopic light installations, art collectives in garages, and a traditionally Italian neighborhood famous for cheesesteaks now sprouting vegan-punk-metal coffeehouses. Think of Detroit, Cleveland, and Cincinnati: resurgent, postindustrial American cities that are channeling creative forces to reinvent themselves for a new generation. Philly is like this but better. It’s a scrappy underdog with a heart of gold and—who can resist the Rocky reference?—the eye of the tiger. Slowly but steadily Philly has changed from a city of industrial might in the first half of the past century to a city of ingenious makers. The evidence is everywhere, from buzzing BOK—a South Philly collective of small businesses and art spaces—to Bela Shehu’s chic and cutting-edge fashion line NinoBrand, in Rittenhouse Square.When to go: Year-round How to go: Base yourself at The Rittenhouse for old-school Philadelphia glamour or the new Notary Hotel, then head out to quirky culture spots the Mütter Museum and the Edgar Allan Poe House. Read more: This is why we love Philly.In Mexico, Puebla’s 17th-century Chapel of the Rosary is covered in 23-karat gold leaf.What to know: Built by the Spanish in 1531, Mexico’s fourth-largest city is a bastion of baroque architecture. Puebla’s 100-block city center, a UNESCO World Heritage site, teems with ornate 17th- and 18th-century buildings. Many are adorned with Talavera tiles: brightly painted clay mini-masterpieces blending Puebla’s indigenous and European colonial influences. Few match the opulence of the Church of Santo Domingo’s Capilla del Rosario (above), which is bathed in 23-karat gold leaf. With the goal of celebrating this art movement, the International Museum of the Baroque opened in 2016. The following year a 7.1-magnitude earthquake shook the building but didn’t deter it from its mission. The post-quake period has seen infrastructure upgrades and new hotels throughout the city. Yet Puebla remains rooted in tradition. “Puebla is not an international tourist destination,” says Antonio Prado, director of the Spanish Institute of Puebla. “So you actually get to experience an authentic Mexican city.”When to go: Year-round How to go: Begin an individual Spanish-language immersion program (1 to 16 weeks) any Monday of the year at the Spanish Institute of Puebla.Inside !Ae!Hai Kalahari Heritage Park, among the world’s darkest places, visitors can stay at the 12-chalet !Xaus Lodge and use telescopes on the open deck to observe the Southern Cross and other night-sky wonders.What to know: One of only a few International Dark Sky Sanctuaries, the vast 120,000-acre !Ae!Hai Kalahari Heritage Park is among the world’s darkest places. Distances in this remote border region between South Africa and Botswana are measured in dunes. Year-round stable temperatures, extremely low humidity, virtually zero light- or sound-pollution, and lack of cloud cover make the park—which scored an almost perfect 21.9 on the SQM (sky quality meter) scale of darkness—one of the planet’s best stargazing destinations. Stay inside the park at the 12-chalet !Xaus Lodge, staffed and co-owned by the ‡Khomani San and Mier communities. Use the telescope on the open deck to observe the Southern Cross and other night-sky sights unique to the Southern Hemisphere. —Ana Hogas, Nat Geo Travel RomaniaWhen to go: August–September How to go: Spend two nights at !Xaus Lodge on Imagine Africa’s 14-night “Off the Beaten Track South Africa” trip.The view from Lipan Point is worth the short detour off the main drive along the South Rim of Grand Canyon National Park.What to know: “The grandeur of the canyon confers dignity on every form of life that touches it,” wrote famed environmentalist Edward Abbey in the inaugural issue of Traveler, in 1984. Since its designation as a national park—the Grand Canyon celebrated its centennial in 2019—this natural wonder in northwest Arizona has dazzled visitors with its immense scale (277 miles long, up to 18 miles wide, and a mile deep) and breathtakingly stratified geology that dates back to 1.8 billion years ago. The explorer John Wesley Powell, one of National Geographic’s founders, called the canyon “the most sublime spectacle on Earth.” Experienced hikers love the Nankoweap Trail, a dramatic North Rim-to-river route. But all views are unforgettable, from both rims down to the Colorado River. Learn more in the National Geographic Atlas of National Parks.When to go: September–October How to go: National Geographic offers several trips that visit U.S. parks, including the “Grand Canyon, Bryce, and Zion National Parks” trip.The Maldives is home to one of the largest known populations of reef mantas in the world.What to know: The first nation to champion the need to address climate change in the United Nations General Assembly, in 1987, the Maldives is an environmental protection trailblazer. For the idyllic, 1,200-island archipelago in the Indian Ocean, forward-thinking sustainability initiatives—such as the effort to be carbon neutral by 2020—are a matter of survival. According to the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, much of the Maldives—which is the lowest-lying country on the planet (average elevation: five feet) and whose territory is about 99 percent water—could disappear in decades due to rising sea levels caused by global warming. The 540-square-mile UNESCO Baa Atoll Biosphere Reserve helps protect the Maldives’ fragile coral reefs, which support a high diversity of coral, fish, and bird species, as well as sea turtles, whale sharks, and other marine life. —Marie-Amélie Carpio, senior editor, Nat Geo Travel FranceWhen to go: February–March How to go: Environmental protection practices are common at many of the Maldives’ resorts, including Soneva Fushi, which recycles 90 percent of its waste; Soneva Jani, built entirely with sustainable materials; and St. Regis Maldives Vommuli, which helps regenerate reefs.The Bay of Fires, on Tasmania’s northeastern coast, got its name from the Aboriginal campfires spotted by British seafarers—but it could also apply to its orange lichen-covered boulders.What to know: Once considered a backwater, Tasmania is now one of Australia’s fastest-growing tourism destinations. Key to the appeal of Australia’s southernmost state is its raw natural beauty, which it owes largely to a combination of its remoteness (airport expansion plans are under way, but international flights are still a few years off) and the enduring green spirit of its half million or so residents. Swathed in 2,000-year-old trees and home to real-life devils (and even “tigers,” if you believe the rumors that the officially extinct thylacine lives on), it’s the stuff outdoor adventures are made of. After making the trek here, visitors find that most of Tassie’s attractions are surprisingly accessible. It takes just four hours to drive the length of the state. No matter where you base yourself, opportunities to become immersed in nature are never far away—nearly half the state is designated national park, after all. —Nat Geo Travel KoreaWhen to go: September–May How to go: National Geographic offers a 12-day “Australia: Tasmania to the Great Barrier Reef” itinerary that includes Hobart, Mount Field National Park, and Cradle Mountain–Lake St. Clair National Park. Read more: Here’s why Tasmania is an outdoor lover’s dream.In Spain, locals gather around Gijón’s old port where local sidra—cider—is poured into a glass from up high, the Asturian way, a maneuver intended to create froth and open up flavors.What to know: An autonomous region of Spain, Asturias lies along the Bay of Biscay, dense with trees that run up hillsides, dotted by wild marshland, and scalloped with tidy beaches. “Nowhere else in Spain can you find so many flavors, such incredible variety, in such a small area. It is like an entire country,” says José Antelo, an air traffic controller based in Barcelona. He comes to Asturias three or four times a year to enjoy the province’s celebrated cuisine, from Cabrales cheese to cider (poured from on high into a glass, a maneuver intended to create froth and open up flavors). The Asturian capital of Oviedo is a compact city of roughly 220,000 separated from the larger city of Gijón by rapidly encroaching suburbs. Oviedo has the better museums, Gijón has the beach. After the cities, head to the Picos de Europa (Peaks of Europe) National Park, with its spiky summits and herds of sheep. Up here, trees fall away, and the view opens to a wide sky of cotton ball clouds.When to go: May–September How to go: A network of trails covers the region, headlined by the Camino del Norte, the quieter branch of Spain’s famous Camino de Santiago. Read more: Find out why Asturias is Spain’s best-kept secret.Much of the massive Göbekli Tepe archaeological site, in Turkey, remains a mystery. These pillars, dating from about 11,600 years ago, may represent priestly dancers.What to know: Built about 11,600 years ago, the monumental limestone pillars at Göbekli Tepe, or Potbelly Hill, have been hiding in plain sight for millennia. Excavation of the megaliths only began in the mid-1990s. The archaeological site is located in southeastern Turkey, at the northern edge of the Fertile Crescent region that nurtured early civilizations. What has been revealed—primarily circles and rectangles of massive stones decorated with bas-reliefs of boars, foxes, and gazelles—comprise the world’s oldest known temple complex. The extraordinary discoveries made here have rewritten the story of how the first civilizations began. Contrary to the long-held belief that the world’s earliest permanent settlements developed due to agriculture, Göbekli Tepe suggests that the impetus was a desire for a place of worship. Researchers theorize that it was built by hunter-gatherers as a regional meeting point and that agriculture was born out of the need to feed all the people involved in the unprecedented construction effort. —Kemal Gözegir, assistant editor, Nat Geo Travel TurkeyWhen to go: March–May How to go: Before visiting Göbekli Tepe, tour the nearby Şanlıurfa Archaeology and Mosaic Museum to see a replica of the temple and artifacts from the site.The Andes form a backdrop for grape vines in Mendoza’s Uco Valley, which produces award-winning Malbec.What to know: With bodegas (wine cellars) backed by the snowcapped Andes and the world’s best Malbec, Argentina’s Mendoza province is a spectacularly scenic place to tour vineyards and satisfy the palate. Copious sunshine, bone-dry climate, and a high altitude (nearing 4,000 feet at some vineyards) nourish Mendoza’s award-winning Malbec and other varietals, such as Torrontés, Cabernet Sauvignon, and Merlot. The province’s three main wine regions—Maipú, Lujan de Cuyo, and Uco Valley—are strung along Argentina’s epic Ruta 40 (one of the longest highways in the world), within 75 miles of Mendoza’s eponymous capital city. The Spanish introduced grapes here in the 16th century, and some wineries are more than a century old. Yet it’s the locals’ warmth and their passion for winemaking that set Mendoza apart from other global wine capitals.When to go: March–April How to go: Visit wineries in two Mendoza regions on the day-long “Taste of Lujan and Maipú” small-group experience with Ampora Wine Tours.A Kamchatka brown bear searches for salmon in the Russian peninsula’s Kronotsky Nature Reserve.What to know: No roads link the rest of Russia to the Kamchatka Peninsula, the vast, thumb-shaped tail of the Russian Far East. Extending into the sea between the Japanese and Aleutian archipelagoes, 776-mile-long Kamchatka is part of the Ring of Fire, the chain of volcanoes and seismically active sites outlining the Pacific Ocean. Due to the incredible density and diversity of volcanoes, geothermal features, and wildlife found here, six separate areas of the peninsula are included within the Volcanoes of Kamchatka World Heritage site. Teeming with wildlife—including brown bears weighing up to 1,500 pounds or more—Kamchatka is an untamed, primordial place that, until recent years, was visited only by ardent adventurers. Now, thanks to an ongoing airport expansion project in the peninsula’s capital city and gateway, Petropavlovsk-Kamchatsky, it’s somewhat easier to make the trek to Russia’s wild east. Getting around is more doable too with adventure outfitters, such as 56th Parallel and Explore Kamchatka, offering an increasing number of tours: volcano hikes, bear-viewing treks, heli-skiing, river rafting, and visits to tundra reindeer camps and the awe-inspiring Valley of the Geysers. —Ivan Vasin, editor in chief, Nat Geo Travel RussiaWhen to go: August–September How to go: National Geographic Expeditions offers the “Across the Bering Sea: From Katmai to Kamchatka” cruise.The Temple of the Great Jaguar towers over the main plaza of the ancient Maya city of Tikal, in Guatemala.What to know: A treasure map created using revolutionary laser technology is leading to discoveries under the jungle canopy of the Maya Biosphere Reserve in northern Guatemala. Armed with information gathered via the Pacunam Lidar Initiative, an 800-square-mile aerial survey, archaeologists are finding long-hidden pyramids, watchtowers, and other ruins of an extensive pre-Columbian civilization considerably more complex than most Maya experts realized. While not yet accessible to the public, the latest discoveries confirm that Guatemala is the place to dive into Maya culture, then and now. Ancient roots run particularly deep in the northernmost Petén region, the jungle-cloaked heart of the Maya world. See the stone jewels of Central America’s pre-Hispanic past in Uaxactún, Yaxhá, El Mirador, and Tikal National Park. In modern, multicultural Guatemala, Maya descendants constitute more than half the population, making the country the only one in Central America with an indigenous cultural majority. Experience this culture in the Tz’utujil Maya villages around Lake Atitlán. —Erick Pinedo, editorial coordinator, Nat Geo Travel Latin AmericaWhen to go: November–December How to go: Tz’utujil Maya artisans lead tours, conduct workshops, and sell textiles, leather products, and yarns offered by Lake Atitlán-based Ethical Fashion Guatemala.A master grader at Italy’s Parmigiano-Reggiano Consortium tests the quality of a wheel of Parma’s famed cheese.What to know: Parma’s gifts to the world include “king of cheeses” Parmigiano-Reggiano, the operas of Giuseppe Verdi, and the ”Assumption of the Virgin” masterwork by High Renaissance painter Correggio. The surrounding Emilia-Romagna region produces a bounty of DOP, or protected origin, foods, such as Parma ham, balsamic vinegar of Modena, and sparkling Lambrusco wines. So no one would be surprised to learn that this northern Italian city has been named Italian Capital of Culture 2020. Plans call for special programs in local venues, including the Labirinto della Masone, home to a bamboo maze billed as the world’s largest, and the sprawling Palazzo della Pilotta, an unfinished 16th-century complex which houses Parma’s premier art museum, Galleria Nazionale.When to go: April–May How to go: Learn how to prepare a full menu (including handmade pasta) based on local Emilia-Romagna ingredients on the four-day “Chef Mattia’s Kitchen in Parma” program with Cooking Vacations.El Hierro, one of Spain’s Canary Islands, was once considered the westernmost point of land in the known world.What to know: Once considered the westernmost point of land in the known world, El Hierro is a world apart from the rest of Spain’s main Canary Islands, which are more often famed for sun-and-sand resorts. Smallest (104 square miles) and youngest in the Canary archipelago, El Hierro is a UNESCO Biosphere Reserve and a Global Geopark—and now the setting of an eponymous Spanish record-breaking hit television series. Dramatic thrills extend to the astounding diversity of ecosystems, from lush meadows to rugged coastal cliffs and lunar-like terrain. Walking trails crisscross the island, some leading to spectacular Atlantic Ocean viewpoints. On the southern slopes, palm vegetation, fig trees, and vines give way to endemic Canarian pine forests. In western El Sabinar, the open slope is dotted with centuries-old juniper trees, wind-twisted into bizarre shapes. Off El Hierro’s southern coast, the crystal-clear waters of the Marine Reserve of La Restinga-Mar de las Calmas, or Calm Sea, is considered one of Europe’s top diving destinations. —Josan Ruiz, director, Nat Geo Travel SpainWhen to go: September–October How to go: From September to June, self-guided walking tour specialists Macs Adventure offers a seven-night “El Hierro: Edge of Europe” itinerary including lodging, luggage transfers, daily breakfasts, and route maps.Białowieża Forest, which is partly in Belarus and partly in Poland, is home to Europe’s biggest land mammal, the European bison.What to know: Untamed Białowieża Forest, a UNESCO World Heritage site and Biosphere Reserve, protects remnants of lowland Europe’s last remaining primeval forests. Spanning nearly 550 square miles, and encompassing all of Białowieża National Park in eastern Poland, the vast forest creates an oasis of wilderness in the middle of a crowded continent. Spot some of the more than 250 bird species and the most iconic of the forest’s 59 mammal species: the European bison, Europe’s biggest land mammal. Białowieża’s approximately 800 bison represent the largest free-roaming population of a species that rebounded in the forest after being hunted almost to extinction by 1920. —Martyna Szczepanik, editorial coordinator, Nat Geo Travel PolandWhen to go: September–October How to go: See wild bison and take a guided hike through Białowieża’s strictly protected primeval forest area on a four-day bison safari from Warsaw with Wild Poland.The Grossglockner High Alpine Road runs north to south through Austria and packs 36 hairpin curves into its 48-mile route.What to know: Designed to maximize scenic views, the serpentine Grossglockner High Alpine Road is a testament to the value of taking the long way home. Completed in 1935, the mountain-pass toll road packs 36 hairpin curves in its 29-mile route through Hohe Tauern National Park, one of central Europe’s largest protected natural areas. The touring route allows motorists to experience pristine high alpine settings previously accessible only to mountaineers. The road, named for Austria’s highest peak, 12,460-foot Grossglockner, runs north to south across the provinces of Salzburg, Tyrol, and Carintha, from Fusch to Heilgenblut. Intended for savoring, not speeding, the route features multiple scenic overlooks and trailheads. Enjoy a leisurely lunch accompanied by views of 37 peaks and 19 glaciers at the historic Edelweisshütte inn, built in 1935. —Nat Geo Travel GermanyWhen to go: June–September How to go: Get discounted toll fees and help protect the high-alpine environment by renting an electric car. The road has charging stations at the beginning and end, and boasts Austria’s highest e-charging station.",
"Harp seal pups are born on the ice and need a stable platform to survive. Sea ice coverage in the gulf is getting less predictable every year.When you walk on sea ice, it’s easy to forget that there’s an ocean below you. This frozen world is stripped down to essentials: impossibly blue sky, bright sun bouncing off a blanket of fresh snow, wind that vibrates like a cello, whiteness all around.The Magdalen Islands lie in the Gulf of St. Lawrence, one of two Northwest Atlantic harp seal birthing grounds.Welcome to the harp seal nursery in the Gulf of St. Lawrence, located off the Magdalen Islands (Îles-de-la-Madeleine), Québec. Given its importance as one of two Northwest Atlantic harp seal whelping grounds, the area is one of Nat Geo’s Best Trips for 2020. Adult seals migrate here from the Arctic, the pregnant females searching for suitable ice on which to give birth. Harp seals are an ice-obligate species; they require a stable sea platform of ice for pups to survive. Born on the ice in late February and early March, the pups nurse for 12 to 15 days before being left on their own. The young seals are among the most captivating creatures on the planet, with obsidian eyes, charcoal noses, and cloud-soft fur.I hear the distant chorus of infant cries and stand still for some time, listening. It’s a precious moment that I want to appreciate fully before I pull out my cameras. I catch a slight movement in a ridge of snow ahead of me—a gentle and clumsy wave of a tiny flipper. I see a pup nestled inside a small snow cave molded by body heat and movement, protected from the wind. Its coloring is still tinged with a hint of yellow from amniotic fluid. When it turns, I can see its thick pink placenta.The harp seal nursery in the Gulf of St. Lawrence, off Québec’s Magdalen Islands, is one of two Northwest Atlantic harp seal whelping grounds.I choose a spot a polite distance away and kneel in the snow, watching and waiting, making a note of the date: March 8, 2019. I hear sloshing water and short grunting breaths before I see a whiskered face with big dark eyes rise and survey the surroundings from a nearby hole in the ice. The female emerges, using curved claws to pull herself onto and across the ice to her pup. They meet with a nose-to-nose kiss of recognition that establishes kinship: Are you my pup? Are you my mother? The female turns to gauge my presence, determines I am no threat, and settles onto her side, shuts her eyes, and begins to nurse.As I scan the icescape, I see larger, more active pups in their whitecoat phase. These older pups, born days earlier, have the distinct advantage of time in the increasingly unpredictable world of climate change and its impact on the ice beneath them.Late-born pups especially need an adequate period of stable ice to survive in a world where spring comes earlier every year and, with it, increasingly strong storms that demolish the ice pack like a blender. A life born to ice is difficult, and natural mortality is high; add a season of increased temperatures and decreasing ice and you have a deadly combination for the pups.The Magdalen Islands, or the Maggies, as some Canadians affectionately call them, are an archipelago of islets that resemble ships at anchor in the center of the Gulf of St. Lawrence. In 2011 a National Geographic assignment first took photographer (and my partner) David Doubilet and me to the Maggies, for a story about the Gulf of St. Lawrence’s marine ecosystem.The boat we boarded to meet the seals was a steel-hulled fishing—and seal-hunting—vessel. Magdalen Islanders have fished and hunted seal off these shores since the 1600s. It’s a controversial tradition that continues today with strict quotas and regulations (no whitecoats)—despite a substantial decline in the number of seals harvested due to decreasing market price and unfavorable ice conditions. “Given the current market situation for hunting products,” our guide, Mario Cyr, told me, “ecotourism and observation tours are the best alternative for most boat owners and hunters.”After two days of searching open water, the boat’s captain nosed the vessel into a patch of sea ice supporting a herd of more than 10,000 seals. We drifted there with the ice over several days and nights. It was extraordinary to pull on crampons and walk among this gathering of pulsating life on the ice and then to put on a dry suit, mask, fins, and snorkel and slide into their world with a camera. Life at the edge of the patch can be a busy place, with mothers coming and going beneath a dark-blue cathedral of ice pierced by shafts of light, apprehensive whitecoats peering into the sea considering their first swim, and veterans gliding about and exploring their new ocean world.Despite the challenge of finding the herd, the assignment was a photographic success, and it gifted me with a life-changing moment. On our last day on the ice, a mother seal swam to defend me from an aggressive male seal as I floated respectfully near her and her pup. The male nipped my ankles and scrabbled over my back, pushing me below the surface. She fought him off and then nudged both her pup and me through the water and out of harm’s way.With a kiss of encouragement, a mother harp seal coaxes her pup into the sea for a swimming lesson.I was still processing what had happened as our ship got under way, heading back to port ahead of a building low-pressure system. The storm tore across the gulf, whipping it to froth and frenzy. By the time we made shore, we learned that the sea ice had disintegrated beneath the herd and the pups had been lost.Our commitment to the seals did not end after our story was published in 2014. The storm had made my encounter with the mother seal bittersweet and forced me to realize that we were now facing a new truth—that the world of ice was as fragile as a dream. The realization galvanized my resolve to return each year that ice conditions allow to track the harp seals’ lives and connect others with these creatures and their diminishing realm.Fast forward to 2019. Mario Cyr called to cancel our boat charter for our annual visit to the seal nursery—the fishing boats were “iced in.” The silver lining: It was looking like a good year for seals. The situation presented the perfect opportunity to finally explore helicopter-based harp seal ecotourism. The Château Madelinot, located on Cap aux Meules, the Magdalens’ main island, operates helicopters that take travelers over the pack ice during seal pup season, landing only if conditions are safe. Which is how I find myself watching a pup nursing, as its mother soaks up the warm sun. I eventually walk back toward the helicopters. I see a girl sitting quietly next to a chubby whitecoat that stares intently back at her. Other travelers I meet include a couple on a Valentine’s Day date, a cancer patient, and a Japanese photographer and guide celebrating his 30th year with the seals. There’s the young lady who brought her toy seal from childhood, and a twentysomething man from Kingston, Ontario, who slept in his car and ate canned goods after spending his last dollar for the final helicopter ride of the season. Passion and curiosity brought them all here to learn, grow, and heal.A woman and a whitecoat observe each other on the ice. Visitors can get close to the seals but not touch them. A comfortable distance provides animals an opportunity for an encounter on their own terms.The scene in the gulf couldn’t be more different now. The winter of 2020 has been a particularly challenging one. In late February and early March, two storms whipped through the islands, ripping the ice apart. All of this year’s seals are feared lost. It’s a harsh reminder that these vulnerable animals live at the front lines of climate change.Before my snorkeling encounter with the protective mother and her pup, I was a skeptic about human-wildlife interactions. But I now accept that sometimes things happen when we least expect it. Biologists can point out why a testosterone-fueled male seal was compelled to challenge me while I was swimming with his potential mate. But they cannot easily explain why a mother seal would push me to safety with her pup. I don’t need explanations, I just embrace it.The world of the harp seal isn’t just for professional photographers or extreme adventurers. The Magdalen Islands are accessible via air, boat, or a ferry from Prince Edward Island.Flights to Cap aux Meules, the main island in the Magdalens, are less dependent on sea ice conditions but of course are more expensive than the ferry. Air Canada Express operates flights from Montréal, Québec City, and Gaspé. Pascan Airline is a local option often booked by islanders. CTMA runs year-round ferry service from the port town of Souris on Prince Edward Island to Cap aux Meules. The journey takes about five hours.Madelinots are as versatile as they are kind and spirited. The winter is a perfect time for a conversation around a fire, with a craft beer in hand. Winter activities also include cross-country skiing, ice sailing, or snow kiting. Hike the islands’ signature, red-sandstone cliffs year-round, maybe accompanied with a picnic of local cheeses, smoked herring, and artisan breads. Mid-Lent celebrations are a beloved and generations-old tradition in the Magdalens, full of music, costumes, and merrymaking.Liveaboard boat: The Magdalen Islands are one of the only places on the planet allowing snorkeling and diving access to the secret world of the harp seal. A boat-based ice safari offers the luxury of time with the harp seals above and below the sea ice. Charters are generally available from late February through early March. Expeditions last an average of six days. The ice-capable fishing boats offer basic expedition-style accommodations: communal bunk space, galley, shared toilet, and local cuisine. Liveaboard boat expeditions are subject to the uncertainty of ice conditions, but they offer advantages not provided by daylight helicopter access: unlimited time and light on the sea ice to experience sunrise, sunset, and twilight; diving and snorkeling in the sea ice with harp seals; encounters with other species that live on the ice pack; going to sleep with the sounds of the harp seal nursery echoing across the ice. Contact Mario Cyr, a lifelong Madelinot, diver, photographer, filmmaker, and expedition guide.Day excursion via helicopter: Hotel Madelinot offers small-group excursions via helicopter to search for the seal herd on the ice pack. Before heading out, participants are briefed on harp seal biology, etiquette, and safety on the ice. Helicopters set down a safe distance away from the herd, and guests get out to explore the nursery. The experience lasts about three hours and is ice- and weather-dependent.",
"With few concessions to modern life, like free Wi-Fi at inns, there’s a land-that-time-forgot vibe to Quebec's Les Îles de la Madeleine. On this archipelago in the middle of the massive Gulf of St. Lawrence, Madelinots speak their own singsong version of Acadian French. Catherine Chevrier-Turbide says the remote islands’ geography defines them. "We’re an open window to the Gulf of St. Lawrence," says Chevrier-Turbide, who works at La Méduse glassware studio and shop. "The winds shape our inhabitants, landscape, and its culture." Red sandstone cliffs jut out of the sea on the northern coasts of the 12 main islands. Sand dunes creating lagoons, adjacent wetlands, and miles of windswept beaches link most islands. While the islands' locals welcome travelers, it’s fishing—lobster, rock crab, scallops, mussels, and groundfish—that sustains the 13,000 year-round residents. In summer, brightly painted red, blue, and white commercial fishing boats line the docks at Port du Millerand. And when winter snow blankets the cliffs and dunes, tiny ice-fishing huts in a kaleidoscope of colors dot the frozen lagoons.When to Go: July through August has the best weather, although plenty of cultural events take place May to October. Early August is the annual Acadian festival in Havre-Aubert, celebrating the region’s marine history. Expect fewer crowds in spring and fall.How to Get Around: The islands are accessible via a five-hour scenic ferry from Souris on Prince Edward Island. There are also daily flights from Montreal, Quebec City, and Gaspé. Various companies offer car, bicycle, and motorbike rentals. Route 199 is the main artery connecting the inhabited islands. "Even though there's only one main road, I tell visitors they should try and get lost," says fifth-generation islander Lola Burke. "Take the side roads or go on walks and you'll discover your own beach and your own incredible views." Cycle along the coast on the Route Verte (Greenbelt), which runs about 60 miles from Havre-Aubert to Grande-Entrée. Boat and guided sea kayak tours get you around the archipelago’s uninhabited islands.Where to Stay: At the east end of the islands in the village of Grande-Entrée, the 26-room La Salicorne Auberge’s packages include breakfast and a four-course dinner. The inn also offers boating, hiking, and caving excursions. Alternatively, look into the simple Château Madelinot, with a water view and free Wi-Fi, and its sister property, Auberge Madeli, where rooms have refrigerators and beds with hypoallergenic comforters. For something a little cozier, Auberge Chez Denis à François has ten rooms close to the beach in Havre-Aubert. Ask for a room with a water view at the ten-room, century-old convent turned hotel Domaine du Vieux Couvent in Hauvre aux Maisons.What to Eat or Drink: La Table des Roy is a high-end, award-winning restaurant where the menu favors seafood and classic French. Less pricey Le Sablier is a seafront restaurant on Havre-aux-Maisons serving up traditional Québécois coastal fare such as lobster pots. If you’re self-catering, pick up Magdelan Islands lobster for bargain prices at the local wharves. Fromagerie du Pied-de-Vent’s herd of Canadiennes, a dairy breed developed in French Canada and the only dairy cow native to North America, supplies the raw whole milk for the supple and semisoft Pied-de-Vent cheese. Burke recommends stopping at Le Fumoir D'Antan to buy herring smoked there.What to Buy: Located at the entrance of the La Grave tourist area on Havre-Aubert, Artisans du Sable is a celebration of sand and its many creative uses. You can buy sand-carved plates, bowls, lamps, and sculptures. Shop the nautical antiques, hand-painted dishes, and other Québécois knickknacks at nearby Vent du Large.What to Read Before You Go: Îles de la Madeleine is the setting for the murder mystery Entry Island (Quercus, January 2014) by award-winning Scottish crime writer Peter May.Helpful Links: Tourisme Îles de la Madeleine, Quebec MaritimeFun Fact: The Îles de la Madeleine, or Magdalen Islands, are among the world's most accessible places in the world to see baby seals on ice floes. During the short three-week season in March, helicopters drop off visitors on ice floes for up-close wildlife encounters.",
"The Gulf of St. Lawrence is the sum total of everything that rolls downhill. It gathers from rivers whose finger streams begin hundreds of miles away—in cities like Montreal and in old-growth forests in New York State. It sweeps up sediment, runoff, and the litter of leaves. It churns and roils in a constant state of metamorphosis. Underwater, bacteria and plankton mix sediment with light and animate the inanimate. The accounting adds up to a density of shimmering, biting, drifting life as rich as anywhere else on Earth.Geologically speaking, the gulf is new to the world. Nineteen thousand years ago, the entire gulf was under ice more than a mile thick. The ice pressed down the land to such an extent that when it finally melted, the earth sprang back up in what one can describe only as relief. As the land rose and the ice melted, the gulf filled with water and life. Freshwater fish migrated down the St. Lawrence River; saltwater fish, sea urchins, sea stars, plankton, and whales arrived from the Atlantic.The thumb of land known as Cape Breton Island separates the southern edge of the Gulf of St. Lawrence from the sea. On the cape’s east the waters are cold and can be terrifying. On its west the waters are, if not warm, warmer, and if not calm, calmer. The first gatherers on Cape Breton were the ancestors of the Mi‘kmaq (pronounced MIG-maw), one of the indigenous peoples of Canada’s Maritime Provinces. They arrived at the gulf at least 9,000 years ago, spreading through what is now Nova Scotia and Newfoundland and gathering the bounty according to their preferences and needs: seals, seabird eggs, salmon, sturgeons, shad, and even whales.Beginning in the 1500s French, Basque, and Portuguese fishermen came and traded with the local people. Those who came later settled around the native people, for they too were dependent on the gulf’s life and subject to its cycles. Cod appeared, and boats would appear over them. Walruses appeared, and hunters would soon follow.For Europeans used to the overfished waters of their homeland, where many species had already become scarce and large mammals even more so, life in the gulf seemed large. And it was. But the discovery of this life triggered a wave of exploitation, the first industrial-scale gathering in the New World. Thousands of fish were harvested, then tens of thousands, and soon millions. By the 17th century tons of cod, whales, and other creatures had been harvested from the gulf and shipped to Europe, exceeding the value of gold and silver shipped from the Gulf of Mexico. Under such pressure, populations began to give way. What seemed infinite was finite, after all.Just how badly the species of the gulf were affected by the Europeans’ (and, with time, North Americans’) harvest depended on the size of the catch and on the tempo of those species’ lives. Whales with their ponderous babies, walruses with their bulbous accumulation of body mass, and sturgeons all grow slowly, mate rarely, and die old. They were affected first. Recently, some whale populations have begun to recover, but slowly. Walruses remain missing from the gulf, except for the odd straggler from Arctic waters. The sturgeons persist as they have for tens of millions of years, by hanging on.Many fish mature faster, breed more often, and recover faster than the big mammals, but even they are vulnerable. They multiply, from two to many, but not quickly enough to feed the multitudes who came to depend on them. The cod are now rare, on the verge, in some places, of extinction. Every so often a fisherman puts out a line to check for them, but the line comes back empty, water hanging like hope on the hook.Although numbers of cod and other predatory fish have plunged, lobsters are surging. Other species, many of them bottom-feeders, are fished too, but lobsters are now the fate to which the most lives here are tied, and the weather that draws out the boats or sends them home. The lobsters are not infinitely abundant either, but for now, at least, the crustaceans are thriving.The gulf has changed and will continue to change. Even if fishing were to stop tomorrow, populations would wax and wane with climate change, which threatens to make the gulf warmer and less salty. So far we have chosen to make the gulf and its life-forms a little less useful to humans with each generation, and a little less lovely. Case in point: We eat the big cod, and so the remaining cod mature at an earlier age and a smaller size, so they can breed before getting big enough to be dinner worthy.For thousands of years the gulf has been a place to gather from the generous waters, but times have changed. Gatherers are no longer just men and women in boats; they now include petroleum executives for whom fortune does not leap out of the water like a fish.Plans are under way to drill the first big oil well in the gulf, in an area known as Old Harry. Environmentalists see the oil as a tragedy that’s different from the old tragedies of the gulf. Maybe. You could also see it as just one more story of our choices about what we gather. We gathered the cod, as food and for oil, which fueled the lamps of industry. We gathered the whale for the same. If we gather Old Harry’s oil, it will run out faster than whale or cod, but it will fuel our daily actions, our commutes and our enterprise, just the same. Of course, if it ever spills, it will also fuel oil-eating bacteria and other species that grow at our expense rather than to our benefit.The good news is we get to choose—algal weeds or whales, oil-eating bacteria or seals. We get to choose because for now the gulf is still wild with life, with trillions of individual organisms, and a great many hopes and dreams.",
"The simple words painted on a billboard-size wall overlooking a parking lot in Swansea, Wales, read: “More poetry is needed.”A plea to locals? More likely an exhortation to the rest of the world—because poetry isn’t something I find Wales lacks. A short drive beyond any Welsh city leads to landscapes of imagination: hillsides embroidered with bluebells, lonely castle ruins on windswept crags, rocky coastlines noisy with seal song, valleys that are an encyclopedia of green. (Take a road trip through the Irish countryside’s wild beauty.)The industrial port city of Swansea is the gateway to the Gower Peninsula, the first Area of Outstanding Natural Beauty (AONB) designated by the British government, in 1956. The recognition singles out for conservation exceptional landscapes of “distinctive character.” Wales now has five AONBs, in addition to three national parks.Three new touring routes, collectively called the Wales Way, showcase the best of this ancient land—and they appear on National Geographic Travel’s annual Best Trips 2020 list, which heralds them as essential experiences for travelers. At 185 miles, the Cambrian Way is the longest of the three, snaking north to south along the backbone of Wales. Sandwiched between peaks and sea, the Coastal Way is a sweeping 180-mile journey around Cardigan Bay on the country’s west coast. The castle-rich North Wales Way follows a centuries-old trading route 75 miles from northeastern Queensferry to the cliffs at Holyhead on the Isle of Anglesey.Each route is a gateway to wider outdoor adventure. On the western Pembrokeshire coast, surfers ride the swells at Freshwater West, site of the Welsh national surfing championships. Climbers can follow in the footsteps of Sir Edmund Hillary, who trained on 3,560-foot Mount Snowdon before his 1953 Everest ascent. Elsewhere in Snowdonia National Park, the River Tryweryn is the top destination for white-water kayaking and rafting in Britain. This is poetry to get the blood pumping.In the 1980s the Welsh pioneered a new adrenaline rush called coasteering. This increasingly popular adventure sport may include rock climbing, cliff jumping, cave exploring, swimming—experiencing with all senses the impact zone where water meets land.The speed is slower on Wales’s hundreds of miles of walking trails, including the 870-mile Wales Coast Path, which follows the country’s entire shoreline, from Chepstow in the south to Queensferry in the north. Once I spent a sunny afternoon unexpectedly walking a very short section of the path from Port Eynon Bay to Oxwich Bay, in the Gower Peninsula, where I’ve been visiting relatives since I was 14 years old. I’d thought only to stroll out to one end of the bay and back, but the desire to see what was beyond the headland kept me walking. At Oxwich Bay, I found families out enjoying the unseasonably warm weather on broad golden sands. The bay flows out to the Bristol Channel, which has one of the highest tidal ranges in the world. In Wales it always pays to see what wonders lie around the bend. (Visit a wild and beautiful Scottish island owned by its residents.)Or what surprises. At Devil’s Bridge, in the northern Cambrian Mountains, a steep trail leads down a wooded gorge to Devil’s Bridge Falls. I arrived one spring at dusk and had the trail nearly to myself. I heard the rumble of the falls before I saw them. They plunge 298 feet in several cascades, the water sometimes gathering in potholes, where the bedrock has eroded. The trail wound down closer to the base of the falls, and each view seemed different, as if I were looking at a multitude of waterfalls, rather than the same one from various vantages.Its prismatic beauty attested to why this has been a tourist attraction since Victorian times. Nature’s green generosity was on display, brightened by bursts of pink and purple rhododendrons. The lushness reminded me of Hawaii. “Can such force / Of waters issue from a British source …” wondered William Wordsworth in his poem “To the Torrent at the Devil’s Bridge, North Wales, 1824.” As I made my way back up out of the valley, I couldn’t help but smile. If this is devil’s territory, then let all hell break loose. (From the magazine: What Will Become of Scotland's Moors?)Beyond lyrical landscapes, there’s the torrent of actual poetry Wales has produced. Its poetic tradition reaches back to the late fourth century and forward to the annual National Eisteddfod, a full-blown festival of poetry and music that is Wales’s biggest gathering.Some of the earliest written sources of the Arthurian tale, dating from the ninth century, have connections to Wales or were written in Welsh. Travelers search for connections to the legendary ruler and his knights at towns such as Caerleon, a supposed site of Camelot, and Carmarthen, said by some to be Merlin’s hometown.Dylan Thomas, perhaps Wales’s most famous poet, was born in Swansea and still influences artists and writers today. That parking lot billboard? It’s a work by artist Jeremy Deller, who was commissioned as part of the city festivities around Thomas’s 100th birthday in 2014. Deller was right: Even in Wales, you can never have enough of words and wonder.Long before it helped to inspire Sleeping Beauty Castle at Disneyland, Neuschwanstein was a refuge for Germany’s King Ludwig II of Bavaria who spent much of his kingdom’s fortune building castles. Neuschwanstein is the most popular, welcoming more than 1 million visitors per year. Only 14 of the castle’s planned 200 rooms were finished, and they’re impressive with opulent gold leaf, ornate woodcarving, and vibrant murals that reveal a mad king’s obsession with the myths and legends of composer Richard Wagner's operas.",
"Paths edging the Cliffs of Moher provide some of Ireland’s most spectacular views.Framed by its mighty Cliffs of Moher, the Burren region of western Ireland is a wonder of lunar landscapes, megalithic monuments, and beautiful botany. The 205-square-mile UNESCO Global Geopark is one of the only places in the world where arctic, alpine, and Mediterranean plants grow side by side. The name “Burren” derives from the Irish Gaelic for “stony place,” and the dramatic rocky setting has captivated creatives from Tolkien to Spielberg.It’ll take hold of you too, especially if you follow this route in the spring, when wildflowers paint the hillsides in hues of pink, yellow, and blue. The narrow roads are more fit for cows than cars, so drive slowly and practice the traditional one-finger salute—index finger, that is—with oncoming locals.The 55-mile route takes three days if driving at a leisurely pace—and stopping to smell the wildflowers.Roughly 30 miles from Shannon Airport, the Cheese Press in Ennistymon is the best place to stock up on road trip provisions and sample delicious bites from the Burren Food Trail. The specialty grocery, opened in 2017 by Sinéad Ní Gháirbhith of the St. Tola goat cheese company, stocks more than 40 varieties of Irish cheese plus Burren-roasted Anam Coffee, organic veggies from Moy Hill Farm, sandwiches with house-baked sourdough, and local kombucha. Check the shop’s Facebook page for events such as tastings and yoga.In this salt-swept town, Ben’s Surf Clinic has a knack for getting aspiring shredders comfortable in North Atlantic waves. Those who prefer land can forage for edible seaweed on walks with Wild Kitchen. After collecting sea lettuce, truffle-flavored pepper dulse, and nutrient-rich dillisk, you can taste them in dishes paired with elderflower “champagne.”Yes, there will be crowds, but this extraordinary escarpment is a must-see. Brave the tour buses to reach the Cliffs of Moher Visitor Centre, a concrete and stone edifice carved into a grassy headland. Displays themed around the local landscapes and culture fill the cavernous interior, while walkways lead to viewing platforms and the 19th-century O’Brien’s Tower, which marks the cliffs’ highest point (about 700 feet above the roiling sea). On a clear day, the vista extends from the puffin-peppered Great Sea Stack to the Gaelic-speaking Aran Islands. For more sights, explore the Cliffs of Moher Coastal Walk or take a boat trip with the Doolin Ferry Company.You know you’ve reached Doolin when you spot colorful sweater shops and perennial pubs such as McGann’s, McDermott’s, and O’Connor’s, where local music legends play. Check out Ekotree, a new design studio that puts a high-tech spin on traditional Irish knits.Musicians play traditional Irish tunes at Gus O’Connor’s pub in Doolin.On the drive in, crank up the Christy Moore tune “Lisdoonvarna.” Then head to Burren Smokehouse to taste the smoked salmon that’s fed three U.S. presidents. Park it for the night at Wild Honey Inn; its gastropub earned a Michelin star in 2018.The birthplace of one of Ireland’s oldest ceili dance bands, Kilfenora looks like it’s been petrified by the surrounding peat bogs. The gabled Kilfenora Cathedral is known for its high crosses, particularly the oversize Doorty Cross that depicts Saint Peter blessing Kilfenora’s upgrade from a monastic to a diocesan site in the 12th century. Agriculture’s also key here. Learn about it with Eva and Stephen Hegarty on a tour of their Burren Free Range Pork Farm, complete with samples of products made from the British Saddleback swine. A stay in the farm’s Burren Glamping trailer comes with a breakfast of thick-cut bacon, tender sausage, eggs, and toast with homemade jam.A stone wall accents a bucolic Burren landscape near Kilfenora.Tucked into the rocky highlands of the Carran, the Burren Perfumery distills the essence of the surrounding flora into small-batch fragrances, lotions, soaps, and candles. The newest perfume, launching in spring, incorporates meadowsweet and wild ivy, which visitors can smell in the flourishing herb garden out back. To get beneath the Burren’s stone surface, however, book a tour of the Slieve Carran Nature Reserve with Heart of Burren Walks. Enthusiastic guide Tony Kirby shares facts and legends about the Carran Turlough (a disappearing lake), Saint Colman’s Hermitage, ancient monuments, and the hardy wildflowers that manage to bloom from cracks in the limestone.As you head back to the coast, turn into the 300-year-old family farm that houses Hazel Mountain Chocolate. A window into the kitchen lets visitors watch as the confections—infused with Burren honey, hazelnuts, elderberry, and seaweed—are handcrafted from bean to bar. Continue to the late 12th-century Corcomroe Abbey and the adjacent remains of an Iron Age hilltop fort. Then hunt for Julia’s Lobster Truck, which slings fish and chips, steamed mussels, and lobster rolls on weekends outside Daly’s bar.Near Bell Harbour, find the ruins of 12th-century Corcomroe Abbey.If you miss the seafood truck, you can still get your fill of local scallops, crab, lobster, and gigas oysters on the waterfront at Linnane’s Bar, located in a centuries-old former cottage-pub-post office. A sweet spot for dessert is Café Linnalla Ice Cream. The most westerly ice cream parlor in Europe scoops creative flavors, from foraged blackberry to Baileys Irish Cream with sea salt to wild sea buckthorn (which tastes surprisingly like peach). Take your cone on a walk to the owners’ eighth-generation dairy farm, which supplies milk for the ice cream. Then amble out to the fossil-strewn Flaggy Shore, described by poet Seamus Heaney in “Postscript” as a place that can “catch the heart off guard and blow it open.”As twilight falls, settle in at Gregans Castle Hotel, a luxe hideaway frequented by Heaney as well as J.R.R. Tolkien and Steven Spielberg. In the rooms—named after local wildflowers, places, and people—antique furnishings sit beside family heirlooms and modern art. Tolkien fans should book the Martyn Suite, the former home’s kitchen, where the owner, Frank Martyn, and the author gathered for drinks in the 1950s. For an end-of-the-road splurge, indulge in the restaurant’s nine-course tasting menu, which features Irish delicacies such as spring lamb, rich cheeses, plump cherries, and wild mushrooms. Raise a glass of wine to the craic (good times), and say, “Slainte!”",
"Edmund Hillary (left) and Sherpa Tenzing Norgay reached the 29,035-foot summit of Everest on May 29, 1953, becoming the first people to stand atop the world's highest mountain.Excerpted From "50 Years on Everest," by Contributing Editor David Roberts, National Geographic Adventure, April 2003By today's standards, the 1953 British expedition, under the military-style leadership of Sir John Hunt, was massive in the extreme, but in an oddly bottom-heavy way: 350 porters, 20 Sherpas, and tons of supplies to support a vanguard of only ten climbers. "Our climbers were all chosen as potential summiters," recalls George Band, 73, who was one of the party. Fifty years later, Band's memory of the campaign remains undimmed. "The basic plan was for two summit attempts, each by a pair of climbers, with a possible third assault if necessary. On such expeditions the leader tends to designate the summit pairs quite late during the expedition, when he sees how everybody is performing." Anxiety over who is chosen for the summit team would be a hallmark of major Everest expeditions for decades to come. But never again would the stakes be quite so high.By the spring of 1953, the ascent of the world's highest mountain was beginning to seem inevitable. First attempted in 1921 by the British, Everest had repulsed at least ten major expeditions and two lunatic solo attempts. With the 1950 discovery of a southern approach to the mountain in newly opened Nepal, and the first ascent of the treacherous Khumbu Icefall the following year, what would come to be known by the 1990s as the "yellow brick road" to the summit had been identified.At first it seemed the Swiss would claim the prize. In 1952 a strong Swiss team that included legendary alpinist Raymond Lambert had pioneered the route up the steep Lhotse Face and reached the South Col. From that high, broad saddle, Lambert and Sherpa Tenzing Norgay then pushed all the way to 28,210 feet (8,598 meters) on the Southeast Ridge before turning back—probably as high as anyone had ever stood on Earth.Now the British were determined to bring every possible advantage to their spring 1953 offensive—including hiring Tenzing, 38, as their lead Sherpa, or sirdar. Earlier British expeditions, though impressive in their accomplishments, were often charmingly informal in style. Hunt's intricately planned assault, on the other hand, was all business. "You get there fastest with the mostest," observes mountaineering pundit Ken Wilson. "You have a military leader who is totally in tune with that philosophy, and you don't dink around in an amateur sort of clubby way."From the start, the 33-year-old beekeeper Edmund Hillary (not yet Sir Edmund) was a strong contender for one of the summit slots. "It was his fourth Himalayan expedition in just over two years and he was at the peak of fitness," Band says. The heavily glaciated peaks of his native New Zealand had proved a perfect training ground for the Himalaya. Hillary earned respect early in the expedition by leading the team that forced a route through the Khumbu Icefall. "A sleeves-rolled-up, get-things-done man," Wilson calls him.Still, logistical snafus, the failure of a number of stalwarts to acclimatize, and problems with some of the experimental oxygen sets stalled the expedition badly. The team took a troubling 12 days to retrace the Swiss route on the Lhotse Face (in part, perhaps, because the British were not as experienced on difficult ice). In despair, Hunt began to wonder whether his party would even reach the South Col.The expedition finally gained the col—the vital staging area for a summit push—on May 21. This was late enough to be worrisome, for the monsoon, whose heavy snows would prohibit climbing, could arrive as early as June 1.Because they became the first men to reach the summit of Everest, Hillary and Tenzing would earn a celebrity that has scarcely faded in 50 years. Who today remembers Tom Bourdillon and Charles Evans? Yet Hunt's plan called for Bourdillon, a former president of the Oxford Mountaineering Club, and Evans, a brain surgeon, to make the first summit bid.Despite a relatively late start and problems with Evans's oxygen set, Bourdillon and Evans crested the South Summit—at 28,700 feet (8,748 meters), only 330 feet (101 meters) short of the top—by 1 p.m. on May 26. But Evans was exhausted, and both men knew they would run out of oxygen if they went on. They agreed to turn back. Says Michael Westmacott, Bourdillon's closest friend on the 1953 team: "It was a decision Tom always regretted."So it was that three days later Hillary and Tenzing set out for the top. Their pairing was hardly an accident. "It had always been Hunt's intention, if feasible, to include a Sherpa in one of the summit teams, as a way of recognizing their invaluable contribution to the success of these expeditions," Band says. "Tenzing had already proved he had summit potential by his performance the previous year with Lambert.In fact, he had been at least 4,000 feet (1,219 meters) higher than any of us!" Indeed, Tenzing (who died in 1986) was the most experienced Everest veteran alive, having participated in six previous attempts on the mountain dating all the way back to 1935. (To those who criticize the practice of leading paying clients on Everest, Himalayan Experience founder and longtime Everest guide Russell Brice has a barbed, half-joking response: "You know who the first guided client on Everest was? Ed Hillary.")But Hillary, too, had proved his worth, seeming to grow stronger as the expedition progressed. Band notes that Hillary had also realized what a powerful team he and Tenzing would make. "During the expedition, with hindsight, one can see that he made a deliberate effort to develop a good partnership with Tenzing," Band says. "It paid off. Hillary and Tenzing were the logical second party for the summit. But this was not determined at the outset, only during the course of the expedition as it evolved."With an earlier start from a higher camp than Bourdillon and Evans's, Tenzing and Hillary reached the South Summit by 9 a.m. But the difficulties were far from over. After the South Summit, the ridge takes a slight dip before rising abruptly in a rocky spur some 40 feet (12 meters) high just before the true summit. Scraping at the snow with his ax, Hillary chimneyed between the rock pillar and an adjacent ridge of ice to surmount this daunting obstacle, later to be known as the Hillary Step. The pair reached the highest point on Earth at 11:30 a.m. on May 29.The men shook hands, as Hillary later wrote, "in good Anglo-Saxon fashion," but then Tenzing clasped his partner in his arms and pounded him on the back. The pair spent only 15 minutes on top.  "Inevitably my thoughts turned to Mallory and Irvine," Hillary wrote, referring to the two British climbers who had vanished high on Everest's Northeast Ridge in 1924. "With little hope I looked around for some sign that they had reached the summit, but could see nothing."As the two men made their way back down, the first climber they met was teammate George Lowe, also a New Zealander. Hillary's legendary greeting: "Well, George, we knocked the bastard off!"Their fame was spreading even as Hillary and Tenzing left the mountain. "When we came out toward Kathmandu, there was a very strong political feeling, particularly among the Indian and Nepalese press, who very much wanted to be assured that Tenzing was first," Sir Edmund recalls today. "That would indicate that Nepalese and Indian climbers were at least as good as foreign climbers. We felt quite uncomfortable with this at the time. John Hunt, Tenzing, and I had a little meeting. We agreed not to tell who stepped on the summit first."To a mountaineer, it's of no great consequence who actually sets foot first. Often the one who puts more into the climb steps back and lets his partner stand on top first." The pair's pact stood until years later, when Tenzing revealed in his autobiography, Tiger of the Snows, that Hillary had in fact preceded him.Neither man anticipated how much, in the wake of their success, the appeal of that patch of snow more than five miles in the sky would grow. "Both Tenzing and I thought that once we'd climbed the mountain, it was unlikely anyone would ever make another attempt," Sir Edmund admits today. "We couldn't have been more wrong."",
"Climb the rocky plateau on Eigg’s northern end for a view of the neighboring Isle of Rùm framed by the pinnacle Bidean an Tighearna, or “God’s Finger.”The familiar markers of island life immediately reveal themselves on the Isle of Eigg: salt-tousled hair, rusty cars, and the soundtrack of lapping waves. But one quickly learns island life here is different. The distinctive ridge of An Sgùrr cracks the horizon in the distance; a throng of identical, blue-eyed border collies sniff and charm newcomers; and crucial, unanimous advice is offered by all: “If you get sick, make sure it’s on a Wednesday. That’s when the doctor visits.”Though only 10 miles off the west coast of Scotland—a five-hour drive from Glasgow—Eigg seems a world away, living off its own, sustainable electrical grid. Each year, the island’s 107 residents welcome around 10,000 tourists who arrive on Eigg with walking sticks in hand, prepared for a daylong jaunt of wildlife discovery. But to dig into the island’s quirky nature and storied past, it’s best to stay awhile. (See our travel guide to all things Scotland.)The town of Eigg has a single main road, which extends nearly the five-mile length of the island, and a single stoplight—not used for streamlining traffic (what traffic?) but to alert everyone when electricity is running low. Lining the street are humble attractions like the tiny post-office-turned-museum detailing island history; a wee, closet-size shed boasting handcrafted curiosities for sale by the honor system; herds of distrustful sheep; and pit stops such as “Rest and Be Thankful,” a patio tea garden open only when the sun shines. (Here are 12 reasons to go to Scotland now.)Enjoy communal dining among locals at Galmisdale Café and Bar.Today’s peaceful community has come a long way from the “Massacre Cave” incident of the 16th century, where nearly the entire population met its gruesome demise after a contentious dispute with a clan from the Isle of Skye. And after years of neglect by the previous laird, or estate owner, the people gained ownership themselves in 1997. Now, visitors to the nicknamed “People’s Republic of Eigg” contend with nothing more dangerous than negotiating walking territory with sheep or engaging in cheeky yet informative banter with Charlie Galli, the sole taxi driver and self-proclaimed “Eigg Gazette.”After arriving via Caledonian MacBrayne (CalMac) ferry from nearby port cities Mallaig and Arisaig, visitors explore Eigg by foot, bike, or “by sticking your thumb out,” as locals advise. All outside cars are prohibited unless required for those with disabilities. Airbnb lists most accommodations, which include yurts, camping plots, or bothies (small shelters usually equipped with a modest furnace, stove, and outhouse). Summer months are best, and though midges are a pest, they can be tamed with bug spray and a light breeze. (Want to sleep like royalty in a Scottish castle?)Self-catering is the norm on Eigg, so pack provisions or stock up at the Isle of Eigg Shop or Eigg Organics. Enjoy communal dining among locals at Galmisdale Café and Bar, or head to Lageorna for a three-course meal and views of the nearby Isle of Rùm. If beer’s more your thing, embrace the jovial sloshing of pints from Eigg’s own Laig Bay Brewing Company (sip slowly, it’s potent).Take a morning birdwatching walk to spot more than 200 species, including golden eagles; lazy cows roaming the shores of pristine Laig Bay; and the ubiquitous chicken pecking for crumbs. At night, skies completely devoid of light pollution make for unforgettable stargazing. Peering into depths of the cosmos from this sheltered island is a reminder of our tiny place in the world—as long as you ignore the recently introduced WiFi.Scotland is wildest around islands such as cloud-wreathed Boreray, part of the St. Kilda archipelago, where nesting gannets stream out across the evening sky in the thousands.",
"",
"Your whims will be accommodated at the Floors Castle in Scotland.If the perfect trip takes you as far out of your own life as possible, then the ultimate adventure can be had in and among the estates of Scotland. How best to channel the royal existence for a weekend or more?You could buy a Scottish estate of your own, like the 12,000-acre Tillypronie Estate in Aberdeenshire, which was sold in 2016 and comes with an 11-bedroom stone manor, salmon river, gardens, and Scots pine-studded forest, though the price tag of $13.6 million might give pause, not to mention the payroll for all those butlers, gardeners, housekeepers, and cooks you’d need to run the place.Or, you could go to an agent who specializes in sporting “lets”—British parlance for rentals—and book a country house or estate lodge for a week. In the Highland hamlet of Old Struan there is Kindrochet Lodge on the Atholl Estates. Rents for the Victorian stone lodge, which sleeps 16, start at around $3,000 a week—internet included, but exclusive of housekeeper, cook, provisions and tips. Guests commonly dress for dinner. Tartans optional.Start with an 11th-century medieval fortress nestled between the French regions of Bordeaux and Cognac. Add 22 rooms with silky walls, rich berry-hued drapery, white marble baths, and cornice canopies. Then decide between veal with caramelized chanterelles or Ballotine quail with reduced grape and shallot chutney from Chateau de Mirambeau's Michelin-starred restaurant.It is a great way to throw a house party, says Mark Merison of Merison Sporting Ltd, based in Wiltshire. “You eat well, live well, and are in the company of good friends.”There is also Corrour Estates, a 57,000-acre property set on the edge of Rannoch Moor, offered by George Goldsmith Ltd, of Exclusive Properties and Sporting Estates in Scotland. The granite, steel and glass contemporary lodge designed by award-winning architect Moshe Safdie features a dining hall that seats 40, seven en suite bedrooms with handmade mattresses and a rooftop hot tub. Rents start from $62,000 a week, fully catered for up to 14 guests. Ruffles and flourishes are happily tailored to order. For example, Goldsmith can arrange for a bagpipe player—or for something more full-throated, a complete pipe band with 20 pipers and five drummers—to do honors. “A lovely experience, especially after you’ve had a whiskey or two,” Mr. Goldsmith says.Adherents of more traditional style might prefer the 18th-century 12-bedroom Knock House, on the 17,000-acre Benmore Estate on the Isle of Mull, listed by Robert Rattray of Perth-based Sporting Lets. Among its amenities: a 42-foot yacht that the owner is swapping out for a 50-foot boat in the coming season, tennis courts and a kennel with room for four dogs. It is priced from around $15,000 to $26,000) a week. (Find Ireland's most enchanting castle.)One of the newest players in bespoke luxury letting is Edinburgh-based Reiver Travel, owned by Ted Innes Ker. In his previous job for a similar company, Innes Ker, more formally known as Lord Edward Arthur Gerald Innes Ker, second son of the 10th Duke of Roxburghe (“My brother will be the next duke. I’m a lowly lord,” he demurs), he once arranged for a group of Texas businessmen to spend three nights at Floors, his family’s castle, with helicopter hops to three premier golf courses and a night in a 15th-century castle before returning to Edinburgh. Cost for the week: a tad over $250,000. Whims are accommodated. A young guest craving macaroni and cheese, got it—served on crested china. Before departing, guests receive a leather bag with treats like haggis-flavored chocolates and cashmere socks.A Scottish sojourn has been considered downright chic ever since Prince Albert bought Balmoral Castle in the Aberdeenshire Highlands for Queen Victoria in 1852. Current owner Queen Elizabeth II, who carries on the family tradition and spends summers there, and can sometimes be spotted motoring to Sunday services at Crathie Kirk, the nearby parish church.And if the lessee wishes to consummate the Highland Romance by buying an estate of his or her own? No problem. George Goldsmith and Robert Rattray can arrange that as well.",
"The best historical hotels offer the chance to revel in a bygone era—but with plentiful modern amenities. Ashford Castle, in Ireland’s western County Mayo, accomplishes both superbly.The original castle dates back to 1228, but much of what we see today was created by unofficial Irish royalty: the famed Guinness brewing family, who bought it in the mid-1800s. After a $75-million renovation by new owners, Ashford, a member of the National Geographic Unique Lodge collection, retains stonework that’s nearly 800 years old but now features restored interiors and a state-of-the-art spa.“It’s not just a hotel stay,” says general manager Niall Rochford. “It is an experience, living the dream of staying in a genuine castle with top technology and creature comforts.”Adventurous on-site activities include the ancient arts of falconry, archery, and clay shooting. The lakeside grounds were featured in the 1952 drama The Quiet Man (John Wayne and Maureen O’Hara stayed at Ashford while filming). You can watch the film, and other hits, in the sumptuous new cinema with red velvet chairs. Schedule a private screening for you and your entourage.Annie Fitzsimmons frequently covers luxury travel for National Geographic Traveler. Follow her journey on Twitter.",
"Scotland is wildest around islands such as cloud-wreathed Boreray, part of the St. Kilda archipelago, where nesting gannets stream out across the evening sky in the thousands.On Scotland's tiny Fair Isle, timeless traditions are the way of life. Discover the top spots countrywide for tastes, sights, and strolls.Scotland’s most popular events, such as the Highland Games (May-September) and the Edinburgh Festival Fringe (August), unleash a spirited mix of revelry and tradition, but these lesser known attractions and events satisfy the craving for connection.Edinburgh, Scottish National Portrait Gallery: Author Alexander McCall Smith compares the Scottish National Portrait Gallery to a family album: “If you want to find out what James VI looked like, there he is; or Darnley, husband of Mary Queen of Scots, who was blown up in suspicious circumstances. Mind you, so many Scots in the past died in suspicious circumstances that you might find that just about everybody featured in the collection ended that way.”Shetland, Mousa Broch: Built around 400-200 B.C. on the small, flat island of Mousa off Shetland’s coast, this 43-foot-tall Iron Age tower (broch) is one of the best preserved prehistoric structures in Scotland. Three times a week from May to mid-July, a ferry brings passengers here, leaving Shetland at 10:30 p.m.—shadowy dusk before the half-lit northern summer night. Visitors are free to explore the enigmatic tower for about two and a half hours before the return journey. Mystery writer Ann Cleeves used the starkly beautiful setting in her story The Return. The most magical thing about the place, she says, are the flocks of storm petrels that nest in the broch. “They come ashore as darkness falls,” she says. “The walls become alive with the calls of the young birds and the adults flying in to feed them.”Stirling, Bloody Scotland: At this international crime-writing festival that takes place every September, participants knock back a drink or two while discussing fictional forensics and tartan noir with established mystery writers. Fans may attend an opening gala in the Church of the Holy Rude. The very brave can step up to Pitch Perfect, in which aspiring crime writers pitch their stories to industry executives.Falkirk, “The Kelpies”: Gargoyles and stone statues are as common in Scottish parks, castles, and town squares as pigeons and terriers. But one of the country’s most arresting pieces of outdoor art is a pair of shimmering steel horse heads that shoot nearly 100 feet out of the ground at the eastern entrance to the Forth and Clyde Canal in Falkirk. It’s a monument to Scotland’s horse-powered heritage as well as the often malevolent horse spirits that inhabit Scottish mythology.After a long day on the moors and a shot of single malt, it’s easy to get misty-eyed over American conservation’s debt to Scotland. John Muir spent his childhood here before coming to the U.S. to walk its mountains, inspire Congress to establish Yosemite National Park, and co-found the Sierra Club.John Muir Way: Scotland has honored its native son with this 134-mile route that runs from Helensburgh on the west coast through the central lowlands to Muir’s birthplace in Dunbar on the east coast.West Highland Way: The most traveled of Scotland’s long-distance routes is the 95-mile West Highland Way. “The breathtaking views of the greenest mountain landscape imaginable gave me a renewed sense of possibility,” says Wilderness Society president Jamie Williams, who hiked it in 2015.Borders Abbeys Way: The southern Borders region of Scotland is one of the country’s unsung jewels, and home to the exquisite Borders Abbeys Way, 64.5 miles of hills, sparkling rivers, and a quartet of centuries-old abbeys. The towns en route are a delight. Sir Walter Scott is said to have considered Kelso the most beautiful village in Scotland, and the Sunday Times recently ranked Melrose as the best place to live in the U.K.Speyside Way: If you’d like to take a shorter, gentler, more whiskey-soaked walking tour of the Highlands, the 65-mile Speyside Way is close to some of Scotland’s most heralded distilleries. Aberlour’s distillery has a good tour for 15 quid ($20).Assynt Region: If you prefer to walk away from established routes, head to northwestern Scotland’s Assynt region. “It has very few people and a vast territory, almost like the southwestern United States,” says photographer Jim Richardson.Dining in Scotland is a convivial affair, whether you’re braving a plate of haggis in a pub, enjoying freshly caught haddock in a harborside restaurant, or tucking into one of the Sunday teas that communities in the Shetlands host during the summer.Lochaline, the Highlands: Whitehouse Restaurant This tiny restaurant in the West Highland village of Lochaline is a favorite of Alexander McCall Smith, the Scottish author of The No. 1 Ladies’ Detective Agency and a stack of other humorous novels. “They use the things that the natural larder of the Highlands can provide,” he says, “mussels straight NG MAPS out of the water, mackerel caught that morning, samphire found on the edge of a beach, and wild garlic picked from the road that follows the Morvern coast.”Shetland, Hay’s Dock: Ann Cleeves, author of the acclaimed Shetland mystery series, bases many a crime in the harbor town of Lerwick. In her own (law-abiding) life, she’s a fan of Hay’s Dock restaurant in Lerwick’s Shetland Museum. “Any item featuring Shetland fish or Shetland lamb is always delicious,” she says. Even fish-fearing diners have fallen in love with the restaurant’s creamy seafood chowder.Perth, The Roost: The small city of Perth serves as a jumping-off point for the Highlands. Stop for hearty fare en route to the mountains at The Roost, a few miles outside of Perth. Its signature aged Scottish beef is roasted in a wood-burning oven.Edinburgh and Glasgow, Haggis: The historic origins of haggis are murky—some speculate it may have been invented from the parts of the sheep left over after the lairds of old had taken all the choice meat for their feasts. But one thing’s clear: Haggis has become the savory centerpiece of traditional Scottish cuisine. So what is it exactly? Ground sheep’s pluck (heart, liver, lungs), mixed with onion, salt, suet, spices, and oatmeal, all of which is stuffed into the sheep’s stomach and cooked to perfection. Where to find the country’s best? Partisans say it’s at the Arcade Haggis and Whisky House in Edinburgh, but others swear it’s at The Ubiquitous Chip in Glasgow.Isle of Harris, Isle of Harris Distillery: Cozy up to the peatfueled hearth at this tiny distillery that has taken the spirits world by storm with a coveted gin infused with sugar kelp.From converted castles to country homes to tiny B&Bs, Scotland’s history lives in its hotels.Speyside, Craigellachie Hotel: At the confluence of the rivers Spey and Fiddich lies the Craigellachie, a classic Scottish hotel revived for a new generation with 26 homey rooms, farm-to-table dining, and proximity to some of the country’s best salmon fishing. Its Quaich bar stocks over 900 singlemalt whiskeys from the many dis - tilleries nearby and around the world.Glasgow, Crossbasket Castle: If you want to splurge on a castle hotel the night before you fly out of Glasgow, the Crossbasket has a four-story bridal tower dating to the 16th century, accessed by a stone spiral staircase. Perfect for Outlander fans.Isle of Lewis, Baile-na-Cille: On the wild coast of the Isle of Lewis in the Outer Hebrides, this bayside inn offers “stonking” (really good) views of Uig Bay’s white-sand beach.Isle of Skyle, Eilean Iarmain: “It’s beautifully done, just a great remote country hotel experience,” says Richardson, of this lodging on the Hebrides’ best known island and Scotland’s largest. “You sit in the lounge by the peat fire with your drink. They take care of you.”",
"A moor—like the scene visible from Sgorr Tuath, a peak in the northwest of Scotland—is a minimalist, melancholy sweep of close-cropped, open terrain. A substrate of contention—over ownership, conservation, and land management—underlies the surface of these tended spaces. Composite of seven images.At exactly 6 p.m. on July 30, 2015, in Kingussie, Scotland, George Pirie, the agent acting on behalf of Eric Heerema, a Dutch entrepreneur, took possession of Balavil Estate from Allan Macpherson-Fletcher, its former owner. The sale, worth about five million pounds ($6.3 million U.S.), meant that the 7,000-acre property—with its gray stone 18th-century manor designed by Robert Adam, rolling moors, three-mile beat of the River Spey, and Sarah the resident ghost—would no longer be part of a family legacy spanning 225 years.“It was a great way of life, but it was time,” Macpherson-Fletcher said later, sipping a whisky in the sunroom of a renovated crofter’s cottage in a corner of the estate he’d held back for himself and his wife, Marjorie. Macpherson-Fletcher, a warm, genial, white-haired man with round tortoiseshell glasses, dressed in madder-hued trousers and a dark blue cardigan, sounded relieved.He was 65, ready to retire. His children, “wisely,” Macpherson-Fletcher said, had no interest in taking over. The expense of upkeep was depleting of heart and wallet. “The fastest way to lose money is to own a Highland estate,” he quipped. Finally, the Scottish Parliament was about to push through a land reform bill that threatened to make ownership of such estates more costly and difficult—a plan shaped in part by long-held tensions over class and debates about the future of the moors, Scotland’s signature landscape.For Macpherson-Fletcher, it was time to ring down the curtain.In preparation for the new owners, the house had been stripped down to its hardwood floors and wainscoted walls. Down came ancestral portraits; closets were emptied of coats, breeks, caps, and waistcoats in the blue, tan, and brown estate tweed. Into storage went the glass-eyed trophy heads that hung on walls (stags, gazelles, two Cape buffalo, game birds), the mahogany dining table, silver meat domes and branched candelabras, Oriental carpets, the sterling service for 30 engraved with the Macpherson crest and motto, “Touch not the cat bot a glove” (translation: Don’t mess with me).Dougie Langlands (second from left) oversees deer stalking at the 44,000-acre Ardverikie Estate, owned by the same family for 150 years. Scotland has an estimated 400,000 red deer; both that figure and the merits of stalking are subject to heated dispute. Composite of six images.Instead of a sporting estate—a quintessentially British institution where clients pay dearly to roam the moors to stalk red deer, shoot grouse, and fish for salmon—Balavil would become a family residence. The manor, said the buyer’s wife, Hannah Heerema, would be a place “for the children to spend time.” (Last May the owners filed an application, pending as of this writing, to turn the farm buildings into a visitors center with a café, events facilities, and a parking lot with about 140 spaces for cars and buses. Communities nearby, unpleasantly surprised about the turn toward the commercial and concerned about the detrimental impact on their villages, objected.)After the closing, as if to underscore the end of a chapter, agent Pirie, who had been doggedly trailing Macpherson-Fletcher to ensure the deadline was met, drilled the garage door shut to secure the premises. What a shame that there were swallows nesting inside the garage, trapped as an unintended consequence of the sale.“Poor birds,” thought Allan Macpherson-Fletcher, the former Laird of Balavil.Balavil sits in the Scottish Highlands, bracketed between the Spey and the Monadhliath Mountains. Six thousand of the estate’s 7,000 acres are moorland—a unique landscape whipped by the same gale-force gusts of economic, social, and political change that helped sweep the estate into the arms of a foreign buyer. (With the drop in the value of the pound after the United Kingdom’s vote to leave the European Union, acquisition of Scottish estates by foreign money is likely to accelerate. International buyers snapped up half of the 16 estates sold in 2015 and 2016.)A moor is a close-shaven landscape of shrubs and grasses clawed at by wind, minimalist in feel. Think abstract art: blocklike swaths of color in a muted palette of ocher, sienna, and charcoal, with accents—depending on season and terrain—of sulfuric yellow (bog asphodel), maroon (lichen), and in late summer, a royal cloak of purple heather. The term incorporates the drier heath of the Highlands, as well as the wetter landscapes of blanket bogs in the more poorly drained regions of the country. Seventy-five percent of the world’s heather moorland is in the United Kingdom, most of it in Scotland.A moor is also the bleak backdrop of gothic literature and Hollywood epics: Emily Brontë’s Wuthering Heights, Arthur Conan Doyle’s Hound of the Baskervilles, Mel Gibson’s Braveheart. Above all, it is the iconic headliner of Visit Scotland tourist brochures. In a government survey, respondents identified a heather-carpeted moor, a loch, and an artfully placed red deer as the country’s archetypal landscape. National identity balances on the tip of a landscape tradition. For Americans it’s the Wild West; for Australians, the outback. In Scotland the mist of myth envelops the moors. The landscape of a moor, which looks as if it has always been there but hasn’t, “is wild but not wilderness,” explains biologist Adam Smith, director of the Game and Wildlife Conservation Trust in Scotland. To remain heather moorland, it must be managed by selective, periodic burning to prevent forest from reclaiming the terrain.Because of overgrazing by deer and sheep, invasion by bracken, and the setting aside of land for forest, Scotland has lost more than 25 percent of its heathland since World War II—but whether that loss is cause for concern depends on your point of view. To step onto a moor is to sink into a bog of contention, resentment, and righteousness. Not everyone agrees, but scientists such as Smith argue that moors are among the most biologically diverse habitats in Britain, populated by a multitude of birds: curlews, golden plovers, lapwings, and merlins. There are economic benefits—tourism, most of all. And environmental ones: Wet moors, those with peat bogs, are effective carbon sinks and thus mitigators of climate change.A significant percentage of moorland is managed specifically for grouse shooting, but a passionate contingent believes that such land could be put to better use. David Read, an emeritus professor of botany at the University of Sheffield, for one, thinks some of the land would be better off more thoughtfully planted with Sitka spruce for lumber. “Heather is unproductive,” he says. If there were more spruce, “at least Scotland wouldn’t have to depend on lumber imports.”Others—such as Mike Daniels, head of land management at the John Muir Trust, a conservation group—would allow moorland to revert to its natural state, a process known as rewilding. “What would you rather see,” Daniels says, in tones that would strip paint off a wall, “a golden eagle in wilderness or toffs shooting grouse?”The trip wire of ownership adds yet another layer to the debate. According to land reform specialist Andy Wightman—who has spent 20 years combing through deeds, records, and maps to research landownership—just 432 people own half the privately held rural land in Scotland.“The super-rich have always been able to buy and manage Scottish land, no questions asked,” says Lesley Riddoch, a land reform activist who believes that large country estates are emblematic of inequities and an affront to Scottish democracy. “For centuries lairds have run sporting estates, sometimes the size of small countries, without local input—evicting tenants here, tolerating crofters there.” Riddoch would like to see the land broken up into affordable parcels and made available to young families.The Scottish sporting estate is elite by tradition. In 1852 Prince Albert bought Balmoral Castle, in the Aberdeenshire Highlands, for Queen Victoria. The royal imprimatur made going to Scotland downright chic. Royals and men of means decamped to drafty manors in summer for sport and other diversions. Wealth from the industrial revolution and newly opened railway lines from London to Scotland made it possible to pop into Scotland for a few weeks of shooting. The upper class fell into a tartan swoon.The Balmoral effect persists. In the early 1990s, Mar Lodge, a 72,000-acre estate near the queen’s property, now owned by the National Trust for Scotland, belonged to the billionaire husband of a former nude model, who had hoped to be friends with the neighboring royals.Fat chance.On June 22, 2015, a Scottish government bill was introduced that, among other things, called for reinstating a tax on sporting estates and easing the way for the community purchase of estate land, thanks to a government fund.“It’s an antique structure that has to be changed,” said Michael Russell, a member of the Scottish Parliament and the committee that evaluated the bill. He spoke of fat cats tone-deaf to public interest, like the Australian hedge fund owner who proposed building a golf course on the island of Jura—just for his buddies—before community pressure effected a change of heart. “We have to take some radical action. We should have done this long ago,” Russell said.Besieged estate owners acted like stags at bay. “A Mugabe-style land grab,” Lord Astor wrote in the Spectator, deriding the bill. “Tartan Stalinists: Forced sales of country estates … Contempt for the wealthy,” howled the Daily Mail. The political windstorm affected the sale of Balavil, which languished on the market for two years, its asking price ultimately cut by two million pounds. Buyers, said Robert McCulloch, a partner in real estate broker Strutt and Parker, were wary of the uncertainty surrounding land reform, Scottish independence, and the specter of higher taxes. The bill passed in March 2016.Nine “guns”—as members of a shooting party are known—gathered in front of the manor house at Rottal Estate, in the Angus Glens, along the South Esk River, on a clear September day. The property, once owned by the Earl of Airlie, had been sold in 2005 to Hertfordshire businessman Dee Ward, who had invited his friends for a driven shoot: the sporting equivalent of Kabuki theater, a ritual with distinctive costumes and customs. One dresses for grouse. Ward wore his estate tweeds with a tattersall shirt and wool tie. It shows respect for the bird, he explained. “We are shooting red grouse,” he reminded his guests. “Snipe are allowed, but please don’t shoot black grouse or hares.”Rottal, a classic sporting estate, is managed for grouse shooting, a controversial pursuit often attached, fairly or not, to words such as “elite,” “snob,” and “toff.” A “driven shoot” is the Rolls-Royce of a noble sport, if you are a devotee, and perhaps a ridiculous pastime if you are not. Those in the shooting party that day were friends of the owner, but for paying guests, a day on the moors can cost £750 (about $935) or more per “gun.” (The client may take home two birds, called a brace; the owner sells the rest to the game dealer.) Throw in accommodation—at Inverlochy Castle in the West Highlands, for example, you may book a suite for £695 (about $870) a night—add meals, tips, a J. Purdey & Sons shotgun with a Circassian walnut stock and rose-and-scroll engraving ($80,000 and up), and you see why the sport tilts in the affordability direction of hedge fund directors and other masters of the universe.In a driven shoot, beaters—people waving flags—sweep through the moors in a line to flush birds toward the guns. Unlike a pheasant, which flies straight and high and presents a fat, complacent target, the red grouse—Lagopus lagopus—flies fast and low, like a feathered dart on an erratic trajectory. Afterward dogs retrieve the birds.The dispute over driven shoots on the moors is more bare-knuckle boxing match than debate. “A practice pursued by the few to the detriment of the many,” writes Mark Avery, whose petition to ban the sport in the United Kingdom attracted 123,000 signatories last year. “Maximizing the number of grouse means treating the moors as if they were giant chicken runs,” columnist George Monbiot argued in the Guardian.The other side argues, with equal vehemence, its own version of biodiversity and economic benefit. “We run a grouse shoot with strong conservation roots. Heather-clad moorlands are one of the rarest habitats in the world,” says Robbie Douglas Miller, owner of the Hopes, an estate in the southern part of Scotland known as the Borders. “To protect and enhance, it takes a lot of time and money. Grouse moor management is the only use for upland that does this.”The economic argument is backed up by a survey sponsored by the Game and Wildlife Conservation Trust that says grouse shooting supports 1,072 jobs, provides £14.5 million ($18.3 million) in wages, and adds £23.3 million ($29.5 million) to Scotland’s gross domestic product.But rewilding advocate Mike Daniels counters that those numbers are relevant only to those who regard nature as a commodity. “You could say cheekily that if economics was the only criterion as the sole justification for a land use, then presumably you could make a strong economic case for slavery or bear baiting.”“The truth of the matter is that if you think hunting is wrong, you will not be swayed by any argument,” says Tim Baynes, director of the Scottish Land and Estates Moorland Group, which represents owners.The Game and Wildlife Conservation Trust’s Adam Smith quietly says this of the grouse-shoot dustup: “Moors are cultural landscapes where conflict and conservation sit side by side.”The battle carries more than a whiff of class divide. “I wish,” sighed estate owner Robbie Douglas Miller, his frustration palpable, “that people paid more attention to how the land is managed rather than who owns it.”Stones are the remnants of the village of Hallaig on the island of Raasay. The village was left empty by the Highland “clearances” of the 18th and 19th centuries, a bitter time when wealthy landowners evicted tenants in a shift from farming to sheep raising. Composite of six images.So let’s consider management. Roy Dennis, an ornithologist and wildlife consultant, abhors moors managed for grouse. “Moors are as man-made as the olive groves in Italy,” he says. “Most areas that now have moors were once forest.”Dennis consults for Swedish-born philanthropist, publisher, and heiress Sigrid Rausing, owner of Coignafearn, a 40,000-acre estate in the Monadhliath Mountains, who hired him to restore the land to a natural state. He drove me out to see the restoration in progress: fences that kept deer from eating trees and shrubs and the resurgence of birch, Scots pine, wild cherry, willow, and rowan trees with their scarlet berries. A golden eagle circled in the sky.“The problem,” he said, “isn’t with shooting grouse. It’s the intensification of land used to raise high numbers of grouse that isn’t sustainable.”There are other estates with rewilding agendas, he said, naming Glenfeshie (owned by Danish billionaire Anders Povlsen), Mar Lodge (National Trust for Scotland), and Abernethy Forest (RSPB Scotland). Landownership is “not just about privilege. It’s about responsibility,” Dennis said.Ronnie Kippen, head gamekeeper of the Garrows Estate, in Perthshire, disagrees. “I think that rewilding the land is neglect. Do [rewilding advocates] employ anyone?” he asked. In his opinion, managing for grouse is about conservation and jobs, related to the shoot—gamekeepers, beaters, estate staff—and to tourism. “Management of moors brings a livelihood,” Kippen insisted. He drove me around the estate and pointed out an uncommon black grouse, a kestrel, and a meadow pipit, a small songbird. “Who says there is no diversity on a moor?” he demanded.Now meet Jamie Williamson, a man of unruly eyebrows and a mind that crackles like a Van de Graaff generator, skittering from thought to thought. He manages the Alvie and Dalraddy Estates, a combined 13,350 acres, but carries the title of laird lightly. He drives a truck, wears a plastic digital watch, and runs his property from a desk buried under an avalanche of paper. Williamson, a new breed of owner, acknowledges the past but monetizes the present.Owned by the National Trust for Scotland, Mar Lodge Estate, in Aberdeenshire, lies within Cairngorms National Park. Much of the estate is being allowed to revert to forest. “This landscape wants to go back to what it once was,” says Shaila Rao, the estate’s ecologist. Composite of two images.Walk the moors with Graeme Macdonald, Alvie’s gamekeeper, and you will learn something about cultural tradition. Macdonald, a man with a bird’s-nest beard the color of winter, knows every furrow, rivulet, and rise. He knows where stags may be found, which client is to be addressed as “Dave,” who is to be called “Sir,” and when a client misses a shot, will console with exquisite tact: “Difficult bird, Sir.”Step into the manor library. Note the leatherbound volume with “Alvie Game Book” stamped in gold. Leaf through a diary of life and death in the tally of stag, snipe, and grouse eulogized in ink. “August 22, 1908—107 grouse shot by guns JB Barrington and JFM Lawrence … fine weather.”The assumption of plenty was misguided, today’s owners admit. In 2015 Williamson canceled grouse shooting. Wet and cold weather in late spring killed insect and plant life; fledglings starved; bird numbers plummeted. The estate lost £50,000.But grouse shooting represents only 4 percent of estate revenues these days. “The toffs still come,” he says, but “we farm tourists now.” The big money—more than £500,000 ($632,000) a year—comes from renting holiday cabins and camping sites with Internet and TV hookups. Forestry, a zip line, a granite quarry, and a fish hatchery provide additional revenue.“Being a laird doesn’t make me a villain,” Williamson said. “The criticism of being one of the too few with too much is a distortion.”For Allan Macpherson-Fletcher, the former Laird of Balavil, all is moot. With the estate sold, there are no more awkward meetings with the bank manager. “In a good year the estate would break even; in a bad, we would lose money, so we had to borrow.” These days the crest on the Macpherson family silver would read: “It is not my problem.”“As I left Balavil,” Macpherson-Fletcher told me, “I took a final look round, expecting a tear in my eye. And no, there was nothing, because it was just a tired old empty house. All the atmosphere and history had gone with us. What was left was just bricks and mortar.”On the subject of ownership, the ancients leaned in on responsibility. Aristotle proposed that how one used one’s property was an indicator of virtue.“We get greedy,” said Alison Hester, a professor and biodiversity scientist at the James Hutton Institute, a research group based in Scotland focused on sustainable use of land and natural resources. The year had turned toward fall. Shadows had lengthened. Soon the soft hills would turn russet; the horizon would be smoke-smudged as gamekeepers on the great estates burned old heather to encourage new growth for grouse to eat.Landowners who lease their property as sites for turbines like these at Braes of Doune Wind Farm, near Stirling, are well compensated. But conservationist Mike Daniels considers wind farms the visual equivalent of industrial pollution. “You wouldn’t put a car factory on top of a hill,” he says. Composite of four images.As part of her dissertation, Hester studied and surveyed heather. She counted the number of shoots in an acre, then the number of flowers per shoot, then the number of seeds—each the size of a pencil dot—per flower. “Heather is absolutely beautiful,” she mused. “It hums with bees. It’s rich with the smell of fresh air and wind that blows your troubles away. As a child, we would go to the moors, fill our mouths with blueberries and listen to the curlews.”That’s different from woodland, she continued. “In woodland you have the sheltering sensation of trees and the sweet honey smell of birch in spring.” The debate over which is better, she suggested, is an impossible one.“I think it important to acknowledge up front that one reason for the love of moorland is because it’s a cultural landscape, and not to dress it up as something else. We protect other things for their cultural importance, so we shouldn’t belittle that aspect of it. Perhaps we need to step back and think about the bigger picture.”The quiet beauty of old Scots pines is doubled by the waters of Loch Maree, in the North West Highlands. Isolation excludes deer, which graze on young trees. Estates use fencing to keep out deer and aid forest regeneration, but it’s expensive, unsightly, and hazardous to low-flying birds. Composite of seven images.Maybe instead of maximizing the population of grouse, you sacrifice some moorland to wildland, she offered. “What do we really want to preserve? Whatever the decision, something is won and something is lost.”In the service of civilization, meadow yields to olive grove, prairie land becomes wheat field, moor replaces forest. How land is used depends on need, economics, and ownership. But also politics, power—and, Aristotle might say, virtue.",
"Long before it helped to inspire Sleeping Beauty Castle at Disneyland, Neuschwanstein was a refuge for Germany’s King Ludwig II of Bavaria who spent much of his kingdom’s fortune building castles. Neuschwanstein is the most popular, welcoming more than 1 million visitors per year. Only 14 of the castle’s planned 200 rooms were finished, and they’re impressive with opulent gold leaf, ornate woodcarving, and vibrant murals that reveal a mad king’s obsession with the myths and legends of composer Richard Wagner's operas.At least once in our lives we’ve twirled in a glittery dress and tiara, or tussled with fire-breathing dragons from a crenulated tower. Indoctrinated by bedtime stories of our youth, we’d close our eyes and wonder where those horse-drawn carriages went when they turned right at happily-ever-after. Now all grown up, we can still dream a little thanks to storybook abodes that really do exist, especially in Europe where hundreds of well-preserved castles dot enchanted landscapes. Here are ten that live up to our fairytale fantasies.Kimberley Lovato is a freelance journalist and author based in San Francisco who spends most days planning trips to faraway lands and dreaming of happily ever after. Follow her @kimberleylovato and on her website.",
"In 1939 a German-born shoemaker named Peter Limmer got the first U.S. patent for a “ski boot”—a stiff, square-toed leather shoe made to order. Today, gray-bearded Peter Limmer III hammers out about 200 pairs of hiking boots a year using his grandfather’s tools in the Intervale, New Hampshire, shop his grandfather opened. There’s a perpetual waiting list for the custom boots, priced at $775 and up; loyalists come from as far away as Tasmania for final boot fittings. Limmer, 63, still loves his work. “The best part,” he says, “is seeing customers dance in the driveway with their new boots on.”",
"The White House is buzzing—with bees. Beekeeper Charlie Brandts has tended several colonies since 2009, when then First Lady Michelle Obama wanted a hive to pollinate her garden. The honey is used in dishes served at the residence and is also given as gifts. Like all honeybee colonies, the ones at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue have been susceptible to loss, so hive inspections and mite testing are among Brandts’s routine tasks. Given the high-profile nature of his charges, however, this is not typical beekeeping, he says. “I do have to inform the Secret Service before I light my smoker.”",
"Taxidermy isn’t for the faint of heart. Widely considered an art form, the process of mounting animal skins can involve sawing through bone, scraping tissue, and slicing open ears and other features. The resulting hide is usually tanned, mounted on a mannequin, and sewn up. The goal is to preserve the creature in a lifelike state, for use as an educational tool or to commemorate a hunt. Timothy Bovard has preserved countless animals as the taxidermist at the Natural History Museum of Los Angeles County—but some, he says, will always be off-limits: “I won’t do my pets.”",
"Peter Bellerby wanted to make a globe for his father’s 80th birthday. By the time he delivered the gift, two years later, Bellerby had sold his house and car to launch one of the world’s only bespoke globemakers. In the 15th century, artisans etched their maps into brass printing plates in reverse. It’s still delicate work for the London-based Bellerby & Co. team. Each surfboard-shaped map section is hand-painted and stretched—a process known as goring—and many tools must be custom made. “There are no globemaker supply stores,” jokes Bellerby.",
"A rare-book conservator must have patience, an eye for detail, and the guts to deconstruct priceless national treasures. When a book is going to be exhibited, digitized, or, say, used for a political swearing in, it lands on the desk of Yasmeen Khan, one of 10 rare-book conservators at the Library of Congress. She’ll mend its pages with wheat-starch paste and tissue paper, resew its binding, or dismantle it entirely. Books that need a full renovation can take months of painstaking work. In them, Khan is able to see “the logic of the craftsmen of the past.”",
"When it comes to horseshoes, one size—or shape—hardly fits all. There are thousands of styles worldwide, and Arvin Reynolds is familiar with many of them. Reynolds is a farrier, or “horseshoe-er,” as he sometimes puts it. Based in Washington, D.C., he cares for hundreds of equine feet, including those belonging to the horses of the United States Park Police. Checkups are typically every six weeks, says Reynolds, and not because the animals get sick frequently or need new shoes. Rather, hooves, like human toenails, grow continually and require regular trimming.",
"What would a scary movie be without the ominous creak of floorboards? Sound effects—called Foley—add crucial value to any film. “The challenge,” says Foley artist John Roesch, “is to create something in sync with the picture that is totally believable.” Step one: watching a scene in silence. “I hear the sound in my mind,” says Roesch. Then with his partners, Shelley Roden and Scott Curtis, he tinkers with countless gadgets and props at the Skywalker Sound studio in Marin County, California, to try to replicate it. To “Foley” an ice-skating scene, for example, he drags crampons across concrete. And if the plot should take a perilous turn? Squeezing a water-soaked chamois cloth, says Roesch, makes the perfect “blood gooshy” sound.",
"Terry Martin carved his first surfboard at age 14, and tens of thousands more during the next 60 years. That put him in the elite ranks of the board artisans known as shapers (Surfing Magazine recognized just 720 of them in the past 100 years). Since Martin’s death in 2012, his son Josh has carried on the tradition. Today’s shapers craft surfboards with modern materials such as polyurethane foam or with wood such as balsa and coast redwood. Josh fashions boards for world-class competitive surfers, using tools that he and his dad once shared.",
"For one year Konsta Punkka traveled throughout Europe photographing Integrated Carbon Observation System research stations, which measure greenhouse gases. The stations tend to be in remote areas of the continent, but no others are as high as Jungfraujoch in Switzerland—or as accessible to tourists.Ride up a mountain: The Jungfraujoch research station looks rugged and isolated—and it is—but beneath its windswept stones lie an ice palace, a chocolate shop, and the highest train station in Europe. Like the travelers, Punkka rode a cogwheel train from Kleine Scheidegg through a tunnel under the mountain to get there. After he disembarked, he stepped into a high-speed elevator. It shot him up to the research station on top of the peak where he, unlike the tourists, was allowed to bunk with the scientists for four days.Bundling up: Punkka dressed for early spring in the Alps—in down, fleece, and multiple layers.‘A very magical morning’: Just before a spring storm hit after two days of “bad sunrises,” Punkka went out on the upper deck with his drone. “I wanted to highlight the station, to watch the mountain with the sunrise light.” He sent the drone soaring away from the peak. When it reached a good vantage point, Punkka flung his arms up in the air: “I don’t often shoot myself in pictures, but I wanted to show the scale.” It was so cold that after he got the shot, he hurried inside to pilot the drone from the relative comfort of the research station.11,745  Feet above sea level1931  Year research station was built18˚F  Average temperature",
"Summer scenery is luminous in Yellowstone National Park, but under the surface lies an alternate reality. Photographer Brian Skerry entered the otherworldly ecosystem of Yellowstone Lake to explore unique spires formed by dormant hydrothermal vents thousands of years ago. Guiding him was Brett Seymour, pictured here, a diver and photographer for the National Park Service.A change of altitude: As a kid, Skerry opted for rock kits over chemistry sets and hoped to become a geologist. Diving amid 11,000-year-old underwater hydrothermal formations was a dream assignment. But he had just returned from chasing dolphins in South Korea and was concerned about swapping sea level for some 7,700 feet above it: Yellowstone is the largest lake in North America at such a high altitude. How quickly would his body adjust? And in the depths, would he have the visibility for a good shot?Essential packing list: To insulate himself from near-freezing water, Skerry wore a dry suit, which, unlike a wet suit, has room for thermal layers underneath. By the time Skerry dived off the boat, he was wearing a hundred pounds of gear.Ready for launch: Every day for a week, Skerry and Seymour would take a boat onto the lake, gear up, and roll overboard. They’d descend into what felt like a parallel universe of monochromatic shade. The water was dark and murky, so Skerry needed a lot of lighting to show a 26-foot spire. He and Seymour brought down nine lights to set up around the spires as studio lighting. It took a week of adjustment to get the right lighting for this shot.7,732 Lake’s altitude in feet32°F Winter water temperature11,000 Spires’ age in years",
"Photographer Brian Skerry, who has spent more than 10,000 hours underwater exploring the world’s oceans with a camera, is the Rolex National Geographic Explorer of the Year for 2017.The award honors individuals who make scientific discoveries and share them to benefit the world. It is presented by Rolex, which recently entered into a new partnership with National Geographic to support exploration.Skerry’s aim is to create  “images that celebrate the sea yet highlight environmental problems.”Skerry, 55, is internationally known for his images of undersea wildlife and environments. A National Geographic photographer for two decades and a National Geographic photography fellow since 2014, he currently is at work on his 25th feature story for the magazine.“Brian’s images tell stories that celebrate the mystery and beauty of the ocean while bringing attention to the issues that threaten it,” says National Geographic Society President and CEO Gary E. Knell. To capture those images, Knell says, “Brian has lived on the bottom of the sea, spent months aboard fishing boats, and traveled in everything from snowmobiles to the Goodyear blimp.”Skerry is a founding fellow of the International League of Conservation Photographers. He lectures widely on photography and conservation and has authored 10 books.Rolex and National Geographic are longtime collaborators on the Explorer of the Year award, which is presented each June during the Society’s Explorers Festival in Washington, D.C.“We want our families, for generations to come, to be able to rely on and enjoy our oceans. This is what drives Brian,” Knell says. “It’s about giving a voice to the sea and its creatures, many of which are endangered.”",
"A message from Gary E. Knell, President and CEO, National Geographic Society:National Geographic is synonymous with exploration. It has been the core of our identity for 129 years—and no one else does it quite like we do.Oceanographer Sylvia EarleFor 63 of those years, we’ve had an incredible partner in this mission: Rolex, whose watches explorers have worn to Earth’s deepest oceans and highest peaks. Rolex has long been driven by the spirit of exploration, and it continues to support pioneering ventures in discovery and conservation.We and Rolex share a passion for exploring the unknown. We also share a deep sense of responsibility toward the planet and a recognition of the importance of protecting its wonders.This month we’re pleased to announce an enhanced partnership with Rolex—the first of its kind in National Geographic’s history—that further unifies the efforts of our two organizations.What are our shared goals in this new partnership? To advance human knowledge. To raise awareness of the planet’s challenges as well as its marvels. And to inspire the next generation of explorers as they seek solutions that will ensure a healthy and sustainable future.How will we pursue these goals? By focusing, during the next five years, on three critical attributes of our planet: the oceans, the poles, and the mountains. We’ll enable and participate in expeditions that lead to scientific discovery, foster research and invention that will yield new exploration technologies, and convene summits and activities that generate public support for conservation.To inform and inspire as many citizens of the world as possible, we’ll report on the partnership’s work via National Geographic’s trademark journalism and photography. We envision a digital storytelling hub, videos and virtual reality experiences, social media channels, television programming, films, magazine articles, and more.We’re profoundly grateful to have Rolex with us on this journey to understand and protect our world, and to support outstanding explorers like those pictured above. With many years together behind us, it’s a grand legacy on which to build.We invite you to explore with us as we dive into this exciting future.",
"Italian physicist and photographer Alessandro Cerè took a break from work at the Centre for Quantum Technologies in Singapore to venture into Hang En and Hang Son Doong, two of the top three largest known caves in the world. To get there, a punishing path and 90 percent humidity test even the fittest hiker.A walk for the fortunate few: Only a limited number of travelers are allowed to visit these caves each year, but Cerè snagged a last-minute spot through a friend of a friend. Looking at photos online, he knew he’d need a lens that could handle the light contrasts inside the caves and decided to invest in new camera equipment. As the trip approached, Cerè ran every day to prepare for the physical toll of hiking and climbing in the sweltering jungle.Essential packing list: The trip poses at least one confounding packing problem: It’s wet and muddy, but nonbreathable waterproof boots can breed foot infections.Ready for launch: The expedition members met in Hanoi for a few days to get to know each other and then took a quick flight to Dong Hoi. Entering the jungle, Cerè switched his phone off, glad to be unreachable. The narrow paths flowed up and down. The group spent four days wading through hip-high waters before traversing through and camping in soaring caves. At the end of Hang Son Doong stood the Great Wall of Vietnam, a 200-foot barrier to be conquered by both ladder and rope climbing.28 Miles hiked over four days459 Feet high inside Hang En55 Pounds of photo gear in packA cave explorer stands atop a large spiral stalagmite in the Watch Out for Dinosaurs area, a sinkhole inside Son Doong. Part of the cave ceiling collapsed, letting sunlight into the cave and allowing for grass and plants to grow.",
"At F8, Facebook’s annual developer conference in San Jose, California, the social media company shared updates on React 360, an interactive WebVR and 360 content publisher. Experiences made using the technology can show up across the web and in people’s Facebook News Feeds, effectively bringing virtual reality to its more than two billion members—no headset required.To showcase this feature, Facebook is working with National Geographic and showcasing an updated version of a 2015 National Geographic interactive VR story. In it, readers were invited to take a virtual tour of Son Doong, a recently discovered cave in Vietnam, believed to be the world’s largest.“In the social media world, this is a big deal,” says Martin Edström, the photographer who originally captured the 360 photo spheres of Son Doong for National Geographic. “Now people can literally walk through the largest cave in the world without leaving Facebook.”The new version of this virtual tour is updated from the original in several ways, including improved navigation, an informative audio guide, and better photographic tonality. The advancements help viewers feel as though they are really standing amid an eerie, alien landscape of enormous stalagmites in a cavern so large a Boeing 747 could fly through it—literally.The technology to create and capture 360-degree interactive photographs and VR content has generally outpaced its distribution mechanisms. VR photographers and filmmakers have struggled to share their work with the general population. Facebook’s efforts may indicate that VR storytelling will become a more ubiquitous part of our digital media experiences.“It's a big step toward immersive and interactive content becoming a part of the way we tell stories,” says Edström.A cave explorer stands atop a large spiral stalagmite in the Watch Out for Dinosaurs area, a sinkhole inside Son Doong. Part of the cave ceiling collapsed, letting sunlight into the cave and allowing for grass and plants to grow.In 2014, Edström, a photojournalist from Stockholm, Sweden, heard of a recently discovered cave in central Vietnam's Phong Nha-Ke Bang National Park. It was being called the world’s largest. He jumped at the opportunity to capture it in virtual reality.The entrance to Son Doong, meaning “cave of the mountain river,” was first discovered in 1991 by Hồ Khanh, a local logger. In 2009, a team of scientists and explorers, having heard tale of Hồ Khanh’s fabled discovery, contacted him and requested his help to find the cave. It took several months, but he eventually retraced his way back through the remote jungle to once again find the dark, foreboding maw in the earth.He and the team of scientists, using proper caving systems and techniques, pushed exploration into the cave.All were utterly astonished by what they saw.The cave, estimated to be between two and five million years old, is believed to be the largest cave passage in the world. It’s more than three miles long, with numerous chambers large enough to hold an entire city block of New York skyscrapers. Being the world’s largest cave, Son Doong contains many appropriately gargantuan formations, including the 200-foot “Hand of the Dog,” which might be the world’s largest stalagmite, as well as baseball-sized “cave pearls,” a type of speleothem that’s typically much smaller.Son Doong is also distinguished by two large dolines, areas where the cave roof collapsed, that let in light and created conditions for dense prehistoric flora to grow in the middle of the cave.Soon after Son Doong was discovered, tourism operators moved in to convert the natural wonder into a money-making operation. Oxalis Adventure Tours currently holds the cave’s sole tourism permit and brings upwards of 800 people per year through the remote passage at a cost of up to $3,000 per person.In 2014, another tourism company unveiled a controversial proposal to construct a 6.5-mile-long cable car through Son Doong.“Since then, a large activist network, called Save Son Doong has been touring Vietnam, showing our VR story to local people and getting people to sign a petition to save the cave from large-scale tourism,” says Edström. “They go to universities, political rallies, and schools to let people experience this cave through our VR experience.”In his last address to the people of Vietnam, President Obama stated Son Doong ought to be preserved, which has also bolstered the cause.The cable-car remains just a proposal for now. This fact very well may be credited to the power of Edström’s imagery, which showed the world the spectacular natural beauty of this cave. Edström sees Facebook’s new feature as a powerful new conservation tool.“This isn’t just a story about a cave,” says Edström. “It's a story about sustainably managing our natural heritage and making sure our grandkids still can marvel at its beauty.”",
"20ºF Night temperature at 13,000 feet15,893 Summit of Mount Baker (feet)22 Days on Mount BakerPlotting the course: I was invited to photograph a group of German geologists who were using very detailed GPS readings to measure how tectonic-plate movement is shifting the Rwenzori Mountains. Months before our departure I bought waterproof clothing and bags to protect my equipment from the wet climate. Then we planned our strategy. The range is on the border of Uganda and the Democratic Republic of the Congo. At my urging the team decided to travel on the Ugandan side to avoid rebel activity in the DRC.Essential packing list: At the base of Mount Baker, the temperature was in the 80s. As we climbed, it became cold, wet, windy—and then snowy. We went from sweating to freezing in just a few days.Ready for launch: Climbing to such a high altitude in the Rwenzoris was a dream, and I couldn’t wait to get there. I flew from my home in Panama to New York, then on to Amsterdam and finally to Entebbe, Uganda. I met the geologists there, and we drove together to the western border. In a town at the base of the Rwenzori Mountains, we arranged for 15 porters and cooks, as well as one armed guard, to accompany us up Mount Baker.",
"A volcanic dream: I’ve been wanting to document how people live and work in extreme environments, because that may teach us how to adapt to a changing planet. Mount Ijen in East Java, Indonesia, is an active volcano that contains an acidic lake and a sulfur mine. Deep in the crater, in air heavy with toxic gases, miners extract chunks of sulfur. They carry 150- to 200-pound loads to the rim and then down the mountain to sell to factories, which use sulfur in the manufacture of things like cosmetics and sugar.Essential packing list: We landed in Java and drove for three days to reach Mount Ijen. While preparing for the trip, I learned that the sulfurous gas is unpredictable. Sometimes it’s so thick you can’t see or breathe. If that happens, I was advised, don’t panic—just wait for the wind to move it along.Ready for launch: At the foot of the volcano, I rented a gas mask. From there we climbed to the mountain edge, where tourists flock after dark to see blue flames from the combustion of gases. But if you just take a beautiful picture of the flames, you miss the human story. The miners choose nighttime to descend into the crater and do their backbreaking labor because it’s cooler. I wanted to go into the mine. At 2 a.m. I followed them into the crater to spend the night.7,100 Elevation of sulfur mine, in feet1112°F Temperature of sulfuric gases released from the cracks1999 Mount Ijen’s last known eruptionSunarto, 41 years old, carries a load of sulfur out of the Kawah Ijen crater.",
"A thick veil of smoke erases the sky over Mount Ijen, the scent of burnt matches saturates the air.The noxious material that seeps from the bowels of East Java’s active volcano is incongruous with human life—it stings the eyes, burns the lungs, and corrodes the skin. But since 1968, the sulfur miners of Mount Ijen have ventured into this unpredictable labyrinth of gas clouds and superheated fumaroles to extract “devil’s gold” and carry it back down the mountain—a portrait of bone-crushing physical labor.Mount Ijen hosts one of the last remaining active sulfur mines in the world, and while its otherworldly vistas have captivated scientists and travelers for more than two centuries, in recent decades, the miners themselves have become a controversial tourist attraction.Sunarto, 41 years old, carries a load of sulfur out of the Kawah Ijen crater.Every day, miners make the arduous trek up Ijen’s 9,000-foot slopes under the cover darkness before descending another 3,000 feet into the crater, where a network of man-made ceramic pipes funnels the gases responsible for precipitating elemental sulfur.Enveloped in toxic fumes and heat, they chip away at the hardened blocks and carry 150 to 200-pound loads back up the crater twice a day, earning an average of five dollars per trip.Around 2 a.m. when the first miners begin their ascent, hundreds of tourists are already streaming across the flanks of Ijen to witness its iconic blue flames, which can only be seen at night. Its half-mile turquoise crater lake takes on an eerie glow in the darkness. Deceptively beautiful, it has a pH lower than that of battery acid—the largest acid lake on Earth, caustic enough to dissolve metal.Considered a form of cultural heritage tourism, mine tours can be found around the world from Africa to Australia. Unlike Mount Ijen, few are still active, and many have been “museumified.”Some researchers propose tourists are attracted to these sites because they elicit what philosophers have termed “the sublime”—a feeling of pleasure in seeing a dangerous but awe-inspiring object, like a violent act of nature. Victor Hugo defined it as “a combination of the grotesque and beautiful as opposed to the classical ideal of perfection.”Mount Ijen is sublime.Tourists outfitted with gas masks take pictures from the shore of the crater where Kawah Ijen Crater Lake can be seen. It is the world's largest acid lake, corrosive enough to dissolve metal.During high season, the mountain can see more than a thousand tourists per day. They often ask the miners to pose for photographs in exchange for small tips, what critics argue is a form of “poverty tourism”—the commodification of human suffering.“Tourists seem to relish narrating their tales of survival in apparently dangerous situations, an attitude not unlike that found towards other potentially hazardous recreations and ‘extreme” sports,’ explains University of North Alabama geography professor Michael Pretes in the Annals of Tourism Research.On the other hand, tourism can also be a powerful tool for economic development and expose unfavorable working conditions regardless of motivations for visiting. The tourism industry in East Java at large employs an estimated 200,000 people. Mining is one of the highest paid professions in the region, and the workers are well-respected members of their communities. Many pride themselves on their physical fitness and role in attracting visitors to the island.“Tourists are seen as the new ore to be mined, and, like metals, have the potential to provide economic booms as well as busts,” according to Pretes, who studied the active silver mines in Potosi, Bolivia. He argues that mining tourism can have a “multiplier effect” by bringing income to local hotels, restaurants, stores, transportation, and nearby historical sites.Despite these potential advantages, the risks remain high. Many miners can’t afford protective equipment like gloves and masks, or choose to forgo them because it hinders their work. Short-term exposure to highly concentrated levels of sulfur dioxide can be deadly, and chronic exposure can lead to breathing difficulties, airway obstructions, and impaired lung function, according to the Centers for Disease Control.To prevent the objectification of people living in impoverished conditions, ethical travel experts recommend that tourists refrain from taking photographs altogether or solicit permission from the subjects being photographed.The future of Mount Ijen as a tourist and mining site, however, is unclear. Indonesia is situated on the Ring of Fire—a 25,000-mile seismically active belt of volcanoes and tectonic plate boundaries that frame the Pacific basin. It is estimated that 75 percent of all active volcanoes and 90 percent of earthquakes worldwide occur in this region.About five million Indonesians live and work near active volcanoes, where farming soil is most fertile. Java alone is home to 141 million people—one of the most densely populated islands on Earth.Sunarto, one of Mount Ijen's miners, was born in the nearby village of Plambang where he now lives with his family, including his son Marko. Her earns an average of 10 dollars a day in the mines.Ibu Khairiah works in the rice fields in the Banyuwangi area, where the volcanic soil is fertile for agriculture.Lush rice fields blanket the Banyuwangi region.The most significant recorded eruption of Ijen occurred in 1817, when a series of violent explosions persisted for several weeks. According to eyewitness accounts, the ash was thick enough to block the sun, the release of acid contaminated watersheds, and debris flattened bamboo huts.Today, Indonesian and international scientists continuously monitor volcanic activity and are trying to find ways to mitigate future hazards. Not only are nearby communities under threat from earthquakes and explosive gas-charged magma–the release of the acid lake could be catastrophic.In March 2018, hundreds of people surrounding Mount Ijen were forced to evacuate their homes and 30 were hospitalized after the volcano spewed toxic gases. "Because of this incident, the public—tourists or miners—are not allowed near the crater until further notice," Sutopo Purwo Nugroho, spokesman for the national disaster mitigation agency, said in a statement.It's not the first time the volcano has been closed to visitors, and unlikely the last. But even from afar, Mount Ijen’s smoldering crater—toxic, beautiful, indomitable—is a remarkable sight.Andrea Frazzetta is a photographer based in Milan. Follow him on Instagram.Ijen volcano hosts the world's largest acidic crater lake, famous for its rich turquoise color. Scientists fear a release of the acid lake from an eruption or earthquake could be catastrophic for surrounding communities.",
"In 2014 Italian photojournalist Luca Catalano Gonzaga went to Indonesia and spent ten days inside what he calls “the womb” of the Kawah Ijen volcano in East Java. Here, men toil in arduous conditions to mine sulfur from the depths of the crater—effectively breaking their own bodies in the process.In their search for “devil’s gold,” as they call it, about 300 miners make a daily climb two miles up the mountain, then head downward more than 900 yards into the volcano, where the sulfur crystals form. Most work without any protection in darkness and stifling heat—all the while breathing sulfurous gas that burns their lungs and makes tears stream from their eyes.To retrieve the sulfur, they attack it with a metal pole to break it into slabs, then make the reverse journey bearing reed baskets that weigh 150 to 200 pounds. All this for about five dollars a day—ten if they’re able to do it twice. According to Catalano Gonzaga, their average life expectancy barely exceeds 50 years.Sulfur mining has taken place at Kawah Ijen since 1968. The volcano is famous for the striking blue glow it emits from the combustion of sulfuric gases. As the burning gases cool, they deposit sulfur around the volcano’s crater lake.Mining companies have sped up this natural process by installing ceramic pipes on an active gas vent near the lake. The pipes route the gas down the mountain and condense it into liquid sulfur, which then drips and solidifies on hard sulfur mats. This solid sulfur is what the miners break up and pack out.Read more about the Kawah Ijen volcano and its sulfur mining operation here on National Geographic.I caught up with Catalano Gonzaga over email to learn more about his photographic work.COBURN DUKEHART: Tell me about this project. How did you come to be interested in covering this community?LUCA CATALANO GONZAGA: I was aware of the existence of this reality and decided to tell it within one of my wider projects, called “Invisible People,” which tells the stories of men, women, and children whose lives have been forgotten amidst old and new forms of poverty and exploitation.COBURN: Was it difficult to gain access to the sulfur mines? Were you welcomed there?LUCA: Before taking photos, I always try to enter into [a] relationship with the community. These people’s lives are ruled by the search for sulfur, and I adapted to their rhythms. In some way, I lived at night, when almost everyone prefers to work.COBURN: What is the story you are hoping to tell through this imagery?LUCA: The harshness of an ancient and hard job, practically almost unchanged when compared to time, means, and modernity. Everything is still based on a man’s strength, on his resistance, and on his capability to carry heavy loads on his own shoulders.COBURN: Was there anything that surprised you about your time with the miners?LUCA: Rather than being surprised, I was full of admiration for the determination with which the miners wanted their children to have a better future. No resignation, no inevitability is passed down from father to son.COBURN: Either personally or photographically, what were some of the challenges you faced?LUCA: There’s no doubt that it was a very hard job from a physical point of view. At times I thought I couldn’t make it. I couldn’t breathe and the heat was really unbearable. Photographically, the biggest challenge was to capture the many shades of light and gases produced in those situations.COBURN: What are you hoping that people will learn about the sulfur miners through viewing your images?LUCA: My nonprofit group, Witness Image, was born as a humanitarian photojournalism agency. When the journalist Susanna Bucci and I founded it four years ago, we knew that we should focus on information that brings attention to the “forgotten” and “invisible” people—those who are excluded from the media circuit because they don’t make the headlines.I made this photographic report of the sulfur miners as a testimony of their everyday struggle for survival.This project has been promoted by Witness Image and funded by the Nando Peretti Foundation.See more of Luca Gonzaga Catalano’s work on his website.",
"Setting the sight line: After years of climbing up a pair of parallel limestone pillars in the mountains of Switzerland, photographer Thomas Ulrich and alpinist Stephan Siegrist wanted to walk between them. Three factors affect a highline walk: focus, balance, and altitude. Since the line crossed at the towers’ peaks, Siegrist would have no point of reference to focus on to keep his balance. “If you look straight, you see nothing—just air,” Siegrist says. To fix this, they placed a brightly colored backpack on top of the tower.Essential Preparation: A cable car took Siegrist and Ulrich halfway up the Schilthorn mountain to the towers. They climbed both spires and bolted in anchors to run a line between them. The anchors must be extremely secure to create the high tension that makes the line walkable. They also needed:Ready for launch: Rain would make the synthetic-fiber line slippery, but on this September morning there was only a light fog. Ulrich climbed a nearby ridge to get the shot, and Siegrist took a few practice steps to warm up and get a feel for the line’s tension. The first step is the riskiest: Falling too early puts you dangerously close to the rock face. “After three steps you need to relax or your nerves [transfer to] the rope,” Siegrist says. “If it works once, then it’s quite easy.”9,744 Elevation of Schilthorn in feet  1 Width of rope in inches  65 Feet from peak to peakYosemite Valley, the place where slacklining was begun by rock climbers some 40 years ago, is a must-visit location for enthusiasts.",
"A few years ago Ricardo Braz was scrolling through Instagram when he spotted a picture of a tiny island made of salt in the Dead Sea. He added it to his bucket list. In December the 24-year-old freelance photographer traveled to Israel, borrowed a drone, and set off in search of the island.Heading to the sea: Braz spent a week exploring the desert of Jordan, the ruins of Petra, and the Red Sea during a photography workshop. Then he and friends Vilma Öhrman and Guy Davies rented a car and headed to the border with Israel. The three waited hours for a military drill to finish before they could cross. From there, a shuttle dropped them in Jerusalem, and the next morning they headed off in another rental car for the Dead Sea and a small resort area called Ein Bokek.Essential packing list: The Dead Sea is nearly 10 times as salty as average ocean water. Swimming in the sea and exploring the other attractions around it require a unique set of supplies—including some that Braz wished he had thought to bring.Ready for launch: “We tried to take pictures of the island from a distance, but it wasn’t even worth it,” says Braz. After a test flight with the drone, the group drew straws to decide who would stay to operate it (Davies) while the others swam to the island. During the 15-minute swim, salt water stung the eyes and dried the mouths of Braz and Öhrman. Neither had brought goggles or a bottle of water. On the island, they basked in the sun while the drone flew overhead, snapping photos.2 hours from jerusalem, by car34% salt concentration1,424 feet below sea level",
"Qasr el Yahud, Israel — It’s a typical day here on the banks of the Jordan River. Under a late October desert sun, pilgrims from around the world descend from their tour buses.A diver is working on conserving the little artificial basin in the Jordan River where Christian pilgrims come for baptisms and to see the traditional site of the baptism of Jesus. Visitors take photos from the Jordan side of the river.An American church group pauses to pray where the Bible says Jesus Christ was baptized. A German choir group breaks into a hymn. Russian women donning white robes submerge themselves in the river’s still, brown waters. A French woman fills two plastic bottles with the supposed holy water to pour over the heads of babies in baptismal ceremonies back home.What many of these religious tourists don’t know is that this water, at one of Christianity’s holiest sites, is contaminated by sewage. Government officials are well aware of the problem, yet the only warning is a small sign near the parking lot that states, among other things, that this water isn’t potable.“It just shows how economic interests trump public health,” says Gidon Bromberg, the Israeli director of EcoPeace Middle East, an Israeli-Jordanian-Palestinian environmental peace-building organization.The baptismal site of Yardenit was built by the Israeli Ministry of Tourism in 1981 to replace a traditional site that had become unusable. This stretch of river is artificially regulated by two dams that help keep the water clean. Bathing in much of the river is otherwise not recommended because of sewage contamination.Fortunately for the group of German tourists, their guide knew better. “She warned us,” says 67-year-old Irene Beige, watching as other tourists wade in. EcoPeace offers training to tour guides on the ecological hazards lurking here and elsewhere in the region. After all, the Jordan River isn’t the only biblical-site-turned-environmental-disaster.According to Israel’s Environmental Protection Ministry, the Dead Sea—the lowest place on Earth—is receding at a rate of four feet per year. Its 30-mile length is only half of what it was a century ago. Similarly, the Sea of Galilee—where biblical legend has it Jesus walked on water—could use a modern miracle. It is Israel’s largest lake, and has long served as the country’s main source of freshwater. But today barely any water is released; its salinity is the highest it has been in 50 years and rising.Girls enjoy a water slide in Jericho, surrounded by desert.“There isn’t an Israeli that doesn’t see this as a massive tragic loss,” Bromberg says.These bodies of water are not only biblical sites, sacred to billions of people around the world. They are also crucial to the survival of the people who live here. These lakes and rivers formed the cradle of civilization since long before even Cleopatra bathed in the Dead Sea for its reputed health benefits. Many worry what could happen to this already volatile part of the world if its water sources continue to shrink. (Read more about these issues in National Geographic magazine.)“It’s not just an economic problem or an ecological problem. It’s a geopolitical problem,” says Galit Cohen, a senior director with Israel’s Environmental Protection Ministry.Israel shares these interconnected bodies of water with three less-than-friendly neighbors: Lebanon, Syria, and Jordan. Reversing the damage done will require the cooperation of nations who have failed to work together for the past century. In fact, water shortages in Syria were one factor behind that country’s civil war.While government officials blame climate change and 15 years of record-breaking drought, environmentalists and scientists say the damage is mostly human-caused, largely from government negligence. “This isn’t global climate change,” Bromberg says, referring to the Dead Sea. “This is government-licensed exploitation of our most valuable resource.”Safari Aquapark in Jericho is located just a few miles from the Dead Sea.This channel connects the northern and southern parts of the Dead Sea.In October, Israel’s state comptroller published a report slamming the government for mismanaging the nation’s water supply. The resulting water shortfalls cited by the report cost the country’s economy an estimated $300 million. The report blasted the Water Authority for allowing the Sea of Galilee to drop below the authority’s own red line, and for increasing water quotas to farmers without ensuring the country had sufficient reserves.“The Water Authority is charged with the responsibility for the country's most important natural resource but has for years managed the water in a way that is not suitable for the scale of responsibility that it entails,” the report states.The Water Authority responded by raising Israelis’ water bills.The drinking water situation is similarly fraught. Until recently, the Sea of Galilee was the main source of freshwater in Israel. The lake’s water level is now at a two-decade low, to the point where today, it wouldn’t be hard to walk on water there. This year, in fact, a new island emerged.To respond to the shrinking water supply, five desalination plants have been built along the Mediterranean coast that use reverse osmosis to make seawater potable. According to Israel’s Union for Environmental Defense, 70 percent of Israel’s drinking water now comes from desalination plants."Dead tree in sea of life": this is the title given by Amiram, a lifeguard from Ein Bokek, who planted it. This area of the Dead Sea enjoys a water level regulated by dams and canals.This supposed solution brings its own health risks, though. Researchers recently found that drinking desalinated water could lead to increased risk of heart disease, perhaps due to a lack of essential minerals. Still, Israel’s Water Authority plans to double the number of plants by 2030.According to research published in September in the journal Science of the Total Environment, agricultural overuse is the primary cause of the Sea of Galilee’s depletion. “On the one hand, Israel has done miracles in terms of irrigation, water distribution, and making the desert bloom,” says Jonathan Laronne, a geomorphologist at Israel’s Ben-Gurion University and co-author of the paper. “Yet it has failed to take responsibility for preserving water.” The farming industry’s political power is a driving force behind Israeli water policy, he says. “The decisions made regarding water use are only rational on the basis of an agriculturally driven agenda.”Jordan and Syria also divert water from the Upper Jordan River, reducing flow to the Sea of Galilee and the Dead Sea. Michael Wine, a Fulbright postdoctoral fellow at Ben-Gurion University who co-authored the report, says there’s a reason why government officials blame climate change and drought. “It’s very convenient, because the water managers are not in control of climate.”Sinkholes around the Dead Sea are a major hazard as the water level drops.Sitting on the northern shore of the Dead Sea, the Lido Hotel was a tourist hotspot in the 1960s and 70s, where visitors sipped wine and ate lunch as waves rolled up beside them. But over time, the water crept further away. Lido was ultimately forced to close its doors in the 1980s. Today it is an abandoned, crumbling cement facade. The Dead Sea is nearly a mile away and 130 feet lower than it was in Lido’s heyday.According to Israel’s Tourism Ministry, the Dead Sea is the country’s third most popular attraction, visited by 1.7 million tourists in 2017. But thousands of sinkholes have already swallowed up infrastructure around the lake, and if current trends continue, Cohen says, the Dead Sea will become inaccessible. “It’s already a problem, and it will become much worse,” she says.Yet rather than investing in saving the lake itself, the government has instead funded construction of new hotels. In 2008, it created the Dead Sea Preservation Government Company to protect hotels and infrastructure in the area.The remains of a playground that was built for a spa beside the sea, before the water receded.According to the Environmental Protection Ministry, the Dead Sea will continue to shrink a meter a year until it reaches just two-thirds its current size. The ministry says 80 percent of this depletion is due to diversion of its main water source: the Jordan River. Some 95 percent of this diverted water serves domestic and agricultural uses by Jordan, Syria, and Israel.Yet Bromberg and other environmentalists insist that 40 percent of the Dead Sea’s depletion can be traced to the region’s mining industry, which pumps out the water to extract minerals from it. These include potash, which is used as an agricultural fertilizer; magnesium, exported as metal for uses such as the auto industry; and bromide, which is often used in pesticides.Two private companies mine the Dead Sea for its valuable minerals: The Arab Potash Company operates on the Jordanian side of the southern Dead Sea, and Dead Sea Works operates on the Israeli side. The companies pump water from the deep northern end of the lake to the shallow southern end, where they use evaporation pools to isolate the minerals.That extraction, according to government figures, causes a net loss of more than 84 billion gallons of water a year. That’s comparable to 40 percent of all domestic water use in the country in 2016.So how will the growing need for water be met in an increasingly dry future? For the past 15 years, Israel and Jordan have been in talks over a plan to pump water from the Red Sea to the Dead Sea. The so-called Red-Dead project has already been negotiated, but when it will be implemented is a mystery. “It’s the million-dollar question,” Cohen says.As the sea recedes, much of the shoreline has become abandoned and dangerous.Jordan was on the verge of publishing a request for proposals to complete the project earlier this year,“but then the American embassy thing happened and Jordan stopped talking to us,” she says, referring to President Trump’s decision to relocate the U.S. embassy to Jerusalem and recognize the city as Israel’s capital, a move that was met with anger throughout the Arab world.Despite questions over how the plan would be financed and whether it would cause more environmental harm, both governments are still banking on the Red-Dead plan. “This is the only chance for bringing water to the Dead Sea,” Cohen says. “I don’t see any alternative.”Bromberg says the Red-Dead plan is dead on arrival, and instead envisions a scenario in which Israel and Jordan limit the amount of water used for mineral extraction. If, for example, the governments were to charge companies a fee for every gallon of water they pumped out of the Dead Sea, there would be an additional income stream with which the government could fund other water projects.Residents in Israel are charged for domestic water use, but the mining industry’s government contracts don’t require them to pay for or replenish the water they go through. In an emailed statement, the Environmental Protection Ministry insisted that Dead Sea Works is doing its part by paying royalties and taxes.A Nigerian tourist enjoys the Dead Sea.“It’s as if they represent the industry rather than the environment,” Bromberg says. “If they’re pumping this water for profit, they should pay for it, just like we do as citizens. This would give them an incentive to invest in technology that saves water. At this point they have no incentive, because they’re not paying for the water.”Scientists such as Laronne and Wine take it one step further in their pursuit of solutions, saying Israel should also limit farmers’ water use, to allow water to flow from the Jordan River through the Sea of Galilee all the way to the Dead Sea, as nature intended. But this is a sensitive subject. Israel is unique in that its food supply is produced almost entirely within its borders. After all, the country was founded by farmers motivated to turn a desert wasteland into a lush land to support its people. Self-sufficiency is at the core of their identity. As a result, agriculture is almost untouchable in Israeli politics.The solution the scientists suggest is strategic water allocation to farmers. In dry years, when farmers don't have enough water to grow, say, avocados, the government could tell them to hold off on watering the crop, compensate the farmers for their predicted lost income, and then import avocados instead. In the long-term, researchers say this plan would be less expensive than providing farmers unlimited access to water and then having to pay to find more water elsewhere, as Israel is doing now.Despite the disagreements, some positive steps have been taken in all three bodies of water. With Dead Sea Works’ contract set to expire in 2030, the government has started discussing a new deal that would require the industry to pay for the water it uses and change the term “exploit” in its contract to “sustainably develop.” The construction of sewage plants in Jordan, Israel, and the Palestinian Territories have reduced waste flowing into the Jordan River. And the Water Authority recently released a plan to pump desalinated water into the Sea of Galilee to bring the water level back up.“The challenges are enormous,” Bromberg says. “While the rest of the world has to deal with climate change, we also have the conflict and the lack of trust that comes with it.”This wooden pier was built around 2006 but has since been abandoned as the water receded.Yet, he says, ensuring water security in the region could prove a unifying cause for Syria, Jordan, Israel, and the Palestinians, all of whom rely on these bodies of water. “This could encourage cooperation, because there’s a common self interest,” Bromberg says. “We’re all in the same boat, and either we sink together or we swim together.”",
"Do a quick Google Images search of “Dead Sea.” The results will likely yield plenty of pictures of the sea’s signature blue waters, a few maps, and, of course, snapshots of people just sitting around – sitting around effortlessly on top of the water, that is. This environmental oddity – the lowest and the saltiest body of water on earth – sustains no life, yet it is a source of intrigue, inspiration, and income for people around the world. Many think the sea (with its buoyant, salty splendor) and the surrounding mud have healing powers. Some value it for its religious or historical significance. Others look at the sea as a means to an end; they extract the sea’s mineral-rich sediment and sell its byproducts for fertilizer, pesticides, water treatment chemicals and more.All the things that make the Dead Sea the stuff of legend, science, and tourism are at risk – from the both current situation and possibly from the proposed solution.The Dead Sea is dying. It relies on many small tributaries, but its main supplier of water is the Jordan River. Population growth in the region means more and more water is being diverted from its path towards the Dead Sea to other uses such as irrigation and drinking water. Evaporation, which makes the sea special by keeping salinity high, is also putting the Sea at risk, and the hot, arid climate and practices such as mineral extraction only exacerbate the rate of evaporation. Without an ample supply of water from the Jordan, the water level is dropping at an alarming rate (an estimated 1 meter per year).As the shoreline recedes, sinkholes and mud are left behind. The scenic beauty of the area is scarred; getting to the water proves more and more difficult; tourism suffers. If this trend continues, the allure of the Dead Sea will be lost for future generations.As a solution to this problem, the World Bank, in cooperation with Israel, Jordan and the Palestinian Authority, is pursuing a plan to convey water from the Red Sea to the Dead Sea. The potential plan is being marketed as a symbol of peace and cooperation, a potential source for hydropower, and a solution to the Dead Sea’s predicament.But is it possible to dump water from one sea into another without consequences? Is it really that simple?Not according to local scientists and geologists. The “Red Dead Conduit,” as it is often called, could have long-term environmental consequences for the Gulf of Aqaba/Eilat (where water would be taken from the Red Sea), the Arava Valley and the Dead Sea itself. Another concern has to do with the mixing of waters with two very different salinity levels and mineral compositions. Some wonder if this could even change the appearance of the Sea.Friends of the Earth Middle East (FoEME) published their concerns(pdf) after the World Bank’s recent public hearings on the subject. As of now, the World Bank is conducting studies and assessments of the plan. FoEME stresses that an independent party should carry out an intensive scientific study before any action is taken.As Al Jazeera reported, the public is concerned as well. Despite the fact that the public was notified only one day before the hearings and that many of the documents were not translated into Arabic and Hebrew, turnout was impressive. Many are questioning the narrow-minded approach of the World Bank project. Why is this the only solution being proposed? Options such as bringing in an adequate amount of water from the Jordan, or reforming the region’s water system are not even on the table yet.Raising the dead always has been tricky business.To read more about the proposed Red Sea Dead Sea “Peace Conduit” and arguments for and against the plan, check out the Global Nature Fund’s Q&A , FoEME’s Research and Analysis (pdf), or the World Bank’s Red Sea Dead Sea Water Conveyance Concept (pdf).Photo: Oscar Lopez Jimenez via FlickrSubscribe to this blog’s feed",
"For a biblical stream whose name evokes divine tranquillity, the Jordan River is nobody's idea of peace on Earth. From its rowdy headwaters near the war-scarred slopes of Mount Hermon to the foamy, coffee-colored sludge at the Dead Sea some 200 miles downstream, the Jordan is fighting for survival in a tough neighborhood—the kind of place where nations might spike the riverbank with land mines, or go to war over a sandbar. Water has always been precious in this arid region, but a six-year drought and expanding population conspire to make it a fresh source of conflict among the Israelis, Palestinians, and Jordanians vying for the river's life-giving supply.All of which makes the scene one morning last July all the more remarkable. Accompanied by military escort, three scientists—an Israeli, a Palestinian, and a Jordanian—are standing knee-deep in the Jordan River. They are nearly 40 miles south of the Sea of Galilee, under the precarious ruins of a bridge that was bombed during the Six Day War of June 1967. The scientists are surveying the river for Friends of the Earth Middle East (FOEME), a regional NGO dedicated to building peace through environmental stewardship. It's a scorching hot day in a former war zone, but if these men are concerned about the danger of heat stroke, getting clonked by a chunk of falling concrete, or stepping on a mine washed downstream by a flood, they're hiding it well."Hey, Samer," says Sarig Gafny, an Israeli ecologist in a floppy, green hat, "check this little fellow out." Samer Talozi, a tall, self-possessed young environmental engineer from Jordan, peers over his shoulder at the tiny invertebrate his Israeli colleague has scooped into a glass sample jar. "It lives!" he says with a laugh. "That is one tough crustacean!" A few yards away, Banan Al Sheikh, a stout, good-natured botanist from the West Bank, is absentmindedly wading upstream while focusing his camera on a flowering tree amid the tall reeds and other riparian species along the riverbank. "Watch your step, my friend," Gafny calls out after him, "and whatever you do, don't step on a bleeping mine."Besides lethal munitions, this stretch of the Jordan River—perhaps 25 feet wide and a few feet deep—is so polluted that any sign of aquatic life is worth celebrating. Part of the reason is water scarcity: In the past five decades the Jordan has lost more than 90 percent of its normal flow. Upstream, at the Sea of Galilee, the river's fresh waters are diverted via Israel's National Water Carrier to the cities and farms of Israel, while dams built by Jordan and Syria claim a share of the river's tributaries, mostly for agriculture. So today the lower Jordan is practically devoid of clean water, bearing instead a toxic brew of saline water and liquid waste that ranges from raw sewage to agricultural runoff, fed into the river's vein like some murky infusion of tainted blood.The fight over the Jordan illustrates the potential for conflict over water that exists throughout the world. We live on a planet where neighbors have been clubbing each other over rivers for thousands of years. (The word "rival," from the Latin rivalis, originally described competitors for a river or stream.) Worldwide, a long list of watersheds brims with potential clashes: between India and Pakistan over the Indus; Ethiopia and Egypt over the Nile; Turkey and Syria over the Euphrates; Botswana and Namibia over the Okavango. Yet according to researchers at Oregon State University, of the 37 actual military conflicts over water since 1950, 32 took place in the Middle East; 30 of them involved Israel and its Arab neighbors. Of those, practically all were over the Jordan River and its tributaries, which supply millions of people with water for drinking, bathing, and farming.Armed confrontations over the Jordan date to the founding of Israel in 1948 and the recognition that sources of the country's needed water supply lay outside its borders. Its survival depended on the Jordan River, with its headwaters in Syria and Lebanon, its waters stored in the Sea of Galilee, and the tributaries that flow into it from neighboring countries.Israel's neighbors face a similar situation. Their survival is no less at stake—which makes the line between war and peace here very fine indeed. In the 1960s Israeli air strikes after Syria attempted to divert the Baniyas River (one of the Jordan's headwaters in the Golan Heights), together with Arab attacks on Israel's National Water Carrier project, lit fuses for the Six Day War. Israel and Jordan nearly came to blows over a sandbar in the Yarmuk River in 1979. And in 2002 Israel threatened to shell agricultural pumping stations on the Hasbani, another of the headwaters in southern Lebanon.Yet fights over water have also led to dialogue. "There are few major sources of water that don't cross one or more political boundaries," says Gidon Bromberg, the Israeli co-director of Friends of the Earth Middle East. "That creates a natural interdependence between countries." Sharing resources can actually be a path to peace, Bromberg says, because it forces people to work together. In the 1970s, for example, Jordan and Israel agreed on how to divvy up water even when the countries were officially at war. And cooperation between Israelis and Palestinians over water has continued even as other tracks of the peace process hit a wall."It seems counterintuitive, but water is just too important to go to war over," says Chuck Lawson, a former U.S. official who worked on Israeli-Palestinian water issues in the 1990s. "Regardless of the political situation, people need water, and that's a huge incentive to work things out."One day last April, Bromberg led me to the natural spring that provides water to Auja, a Palestinian village of 4,500 people that climbs the barren hills a few miles west of the Jordan River near Jericho. Fed by winter rains, the spring was flowing from a small, boulder-strewn oasis, and we trekked along the narrow concrete trough that transports water to the village, several miles away. "Auja is totally dependent on this water for agriculture," Bromberg said. "As soon as this spring dries up, there'll be no more water for farming."Part idealist, part political operative, Bromberg was born in Israel and raised in Australia, then returned to Israel in 1988 to help build peace in the region. By challenging his own country to share water equitably, Bromberg has rattled the cages of hard-line Israeli politicians who see water as a national security issue—and as a resource to guard jealously.Since occupying the West Bank in 1967, Israel has built a few dozen settlements in the Jordan Valley, in addition to the 120 or so elsewhere in the West Bank. The settlers' water is provided by Mekorot, Israel's national water authority, which has drilled 42 deep wells in the West Bank, mainly to supply Israeli cities. (According to a 2009 World Bank report, Israelis use four times as much water per capita as Palestinians, much of it for agriculture. Israel disputes this, arguing that its citizens use only twice as much water and are better at conserving it.) In any case, Israel's West Bank settlements get enough water to fill their swimming pools, water their lawns, and irrigate miles of fields and greenhouses.In contrast, West Bank Palestinians, under Israeli military rule, have been largely prevented from digging deep wells of their own, limiting their water access to shallow wells, natural springs, and rainfall that evaporates quickly in the dry desert air. When these sources run dry in the summer, Bromberg said, Auja's Palestinians have no choice but to purchase water from Israel for about a dollar a cubic yard—in effect buying back the water that's been taken out from under them by Mekorot's pumps, which also lower the water table and affect Palestinian springs and wells.As Bromberg and I followed the Auja spring east, we passed a complex of pumps and pipes behind a barbed-wire fence—a Mekorot well, drilled 2,000 feet deep to tap the aquifer. "Blue and white pipes," Bromberg said. "This is what water theft looks like in this part of the world."Israel's chief water negotiator, Noah Kinnarti, disagrees. Underground water knows no borders, he says, and points out that Israelis must also purchase the water they use. "Palestinians think any rain that falls in the West Bank belongs to them," he told me at his kibbutz near the Sea of Galilee. "But in the Oslo talks, we agreed to share that water. They just can't get their act together to do it."FOEME began confronting these tough issues in 2001, during a period of intense Palestinian-Israeli violence. But by focusing first on ways to improve water quality, the NGO mobilized support and built trust through its Good Water Neighbors program, a grassroots education initiative. It's also working to establish a Jordanian-Israeli peace park on a midstream island. Perhaps most important, it has pressured governments to live up to the water-sharing commitments embedded in the region's peace agreements, seeking to make the Jordan River a model for the kind of cooperation needed to avert future water wars."People all over the world associate the Jordan River with peace," says Munqeth Mehyar, FOEME's co-director in Jordan. "We're just helping it live up to its reputation!"When I returned to Auja in early May, its spring had been reduced to a trickle, leaving the village as dry as a fistful of talcum powder. The fields around it lay empty and exhausted, while on Auja's one plot of flat ground, boys were playing soccer amid a swirling dust cloud they were kicking up, chasing an old leather ball worn to the consistency of flannel.I stopped by the home of an elderly farmer named Muhammad Salama. "We haven't had running water in my house for five weeks," Salama said. "So now I have to buy a tank of water every day from Mekorot to supply my family and to water my sheep, goats, and horses." He also has to buy feed for his animals because there is no water to irrigate crops. To meet these costs he is selling off his livestock, and his sons have taken jobs at an Israeli settlement, tending the tomatoes, melons, and other crops irrigated from the aquifer that is off-limits to Palestinian farmers. "What can we do?" he asked, pouring me a glass of Mekorot water from a plastic bottle. "It's not fair, but we're powerless to do anything about it."It was a clear day, and from his front window we could see across the parched, brown valley all the way to the thin line of gray-green vegetation marking the path of the Jordan River. For a moment, its water seemed within reach. "But to get there I'd have to jump an electric fence, cross a minefield, and fight the Israeli army," Salama said. "I'd have to start a water war!"",
"A local Jordanian Bedouin leads his camels through the desert to Wadi Rum.For veteran National Geographic Travel photographer Annie Griffiths, a chance to return to the red deserts of Jordan is like an invitation to come home.“I’ve been photographing the Middle East for more than 20 years,” she says. “But I love returning to Jordan. Jordanian culture is the most welcoming culture on earth. ‘Welcome’ is the first word a little kid learns here, and if they’re in a tourist area they will learn it in German. In English. In French. It’s very sweet and touching.”The photograph here, shot by Griffiths in the first week of November 2016, is of a Bedouin and his camels. It was taken at the end of a day, when the shadows had begun to lengthen. The caravan was headed toward Wadi Rum, a remote desert sharp-eyed film buffs might recognize as the location for Matt Damon’s The Martian.“Wadi Rum is a vast valley where the sand is very red, with exquisite sandstone rock formations that look like candles, partially melted and squooshed,” she says. “It feels so wild and beautiful. And it’s got such a yummy history. It’s where T.E. Lawrence hung out to go wreak havoc on the Turkish railway.”Griffiths chose a wide-angled lens, a Canon 27-70mm, to capture both the guide and his plodding charges, as well as the sweep of the extraterrestrial horizon while bobbing atop a camel.“What a wide-angle lens allows you to do is create intimacy against a backdrop,” she explains. “If you’re physically closer to something, it makes the viewer feel closer too. So, when a wide-angle is used right, that intimacy just happens. The viewer might not know why, but they feel closer to the image. A telephoto lens is about distance, but if you’re close to [your] subject a wide-angle lens will make a viewer feel closer, too. It’s so simple it’s almost laughable.”As for straddling a camel, Griffiths offers a one-word warning: “Don’t.”“It’s very important to not ride a camel like a horse,” she says. “Camels are so wide, you’ll never walk again afterwards.”",
"Camels in the doorway of the Treasury at Petra, Jordan, shows the enormity of the ancient building's entrance. Carved into the sandstone hill by the Nabataeans in the second century A.D., this towering structure likely began as a temple.Carved directly into vibrant red, white, pink, and sandstone cliff faces, the prehistoric Jordanian city of Petra was "lost" to the Western world for hundreds of years.Located amid rugged desert canyons and mountains in what is now the southwestern corner of the Hashemite Kingdom of Jordan, Petra was once a thriving trading center and the capital of the Nabataean empire between 400 B.C. and A.D. 106.The city sat empty and in near ruin for centuries. Only in the early 1800s did a European traveler disguise himself in Bedouin costume and infiltrate the mysterious locale.In 1985, the Petra Archaeological Park was declared a UNESCO World Heritage site, and in 2007 it was named one of the new seven wonders of the world.Several scenes from the Hollywood blockbuster Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade were filmed in Petra. The movie's fictional Canyon of the Crescent Moon was modeled on the eastern entrance to Petra, a 250-foot-high (76-meter-high) sandstone slot canyon known as the Siq that leads directly to Al Khazneh (the Treasury)—perhaps the most stunning of Petra's dozens of breathtaking features.In the film's climactic final scenes, actors Harrison Ford and Sean Connery burst forth from the Siq and walk deep into the labyrinths of the Treasury in their quest to find the Holy Grail. But, as usual, archaeological fact bowed to Hollywood fiction when Indy came to Petra.In reality, the Treasury is nothing more than a facade with a relatively small hall once used as a royal tomb."You can't really say that anything in Indiana Jones is accurate," Haifa University archaeologist Ronny Reich said. "I was once asked in the United States if one of the responsibilities of Israeli archaeologists is to chase down Nazis. I told them, 'Not any more.'"A giant urn carved above the entrance to the Treasury bears the marks of hundreds of gunshots. Bedouin tribesmen living in and among the ancient ruins say the damage was caused when local men would open fire with rifles, seeking the loot thought to be inside the urn (actually made of solid stone).There are dozens of tombs and other carved or constructed structures and sites within Petra.The Nabataeans, before they were conquered and absorbed into the Roman Empire, controlled a vast tract of the Middle East from modern-day Israel and Jordan into the northern Arabian peninsula. The remains of their innovative networks of water capture, storage, transport, and irrigation systems are found to this day throughout this area.Scholars know the Nabataeans were in Petra since at least 312 B.C., says archaeologist Zeidoun Al-Muheisen of Jordan's Yarmouk University.Al-Muheisen, who has been excavating in Petra since 1979 and specializes in the Nabataean period, says no one has yet found any archaeological evidence dating back to the fourth century B.C. The earliest findings thus far date back only to the second and first centuries B.C.But more clues remain beneath the surface. "We have uncovered just 15 percent of the city," he says. "The vast majority—85 percent—is still underground and untouched."Numerous scrolls in Greek and dating to the Byzantine period were discovered in an excavated church near the Winged Lion Temple in Petra in December 1993.Researchers at the American Center of Oriental Research in Amman, the capital, are now analyzing the scrolls and hope they will shed light on life in Petra during this period.Once Rome formally took possession of Petra in A.D. 106, its importance in international trade began to wane. The decay of the city continued, aided by earthquakes and the rise in importance of sea trade routes, and Petra reached its nadir near the close of the Byzantine Empire's rule, around A.D. 700.Visitors today can see varying blends of Nabataean and Greco-Roman architectural styles in the city's tombs, many of which were looted by thieves and their treasures thus lost.Today, local Bedouins selling tourist souvenirs hawk their wares not far from the place where Arabs believe Moses struck a rock with his staff, causing water to burst forth.A person standing in the doorway of the Monastery at Petra, Jordan,  shows the enormity of the ancient building's entrance. Carved into the  sandstone hill by the Nabataeans in the second century A.D., this  towering structure, called El-Deir, may have been used as a church or  monastery by later societies, but likely began as a temple.",
"The idea to shoot an ascent of the Totem Pole, a stone tower in Tasmania, came to adventure photographer Krystle Wright in a dream. Years later, as she dangled from a line she’d rigged across nearby rocks, with a drone lighting the scene from above, she finally got her shot.An unseen route: Jutting from the waters along the Tasman Peninsula, the Totem Pole is one of the world’s most dramatic column climbs. The sea stack is often photographed from the more accessible north side; Wright wanted to capture a southern ascent along a route called the Sorcerer. Climber Mayan Smith-​Gobat would have to descend the neighboring rock face and swing herself across a channel on a rope to grab a handhold. Wright, Smith-Gobat, and a film crew plotted for months how to complete and document the climb.Essential packing list: Supplies for rock climbing, swimming, and photography filled two bags. The stormy Tasmanian weather required backup down jackets.Ready to shoot: After two days of trials and setup, Wright drove to the peninsula, hiked two hours on a trail, rappelled a 330-foot cliff, tied a rope around her waist, jumped into the ocean, swam across the channel, and climbed up the other side. Clipping herself into a harness, she hung from a tightrope as Smith-​Gobat scrambled up the Totem Pole. At the “blue hour”—around 5:30 p.m.—Wright radioed the drone operator. When a flash from the drone overhead illuminated the rock, she pressed the shutter.213 Height of Totem Pole, in feet10+ Average rainy days in September1968 Year the rock was first climbed",
"Go fly a kite? Don’t mind if we do—at the International Kite Festival, January 6-14, in Ahmedabad, India. Fancy flyers, from long-tailed dragons to eerie aliens, draw global kite experts and superfans.Mudlarking is more than simply scavenging for historic objects on a river’s foreshore. It can be a meditative act in which looking is as enjoyable as finding, writes Lara Maiklem in Mudlark. Travelers can try London mudlarking with tours led by Thames Explorer Trust and others.It’s nesting time for Magellanic penguins. The monogamous pairs and their chicks can be seen in colonies along the coasts of the Falkland Islands (above), as well as Argentina and southern Chile.Lush rainforests, soft sand beaches, and tiny thimble jellyfish (above) are just some of the treasures in the National Park of American Samoa, the only U.S. national park south of the Equator. Its far-flung location, about 2,600 miles southwest of Hawaii, means that travelers hike, snorkel, scuba dive, and explore Samoan culture with few crowds.",
"On the rocky shores of Steeple Jason, a distant island in the Falklands archipelago, I am awed by the magnificence before me. More than 440,000 black-browed albatrosses, the world’s largest colony, nest on steep cliffs. Along the beach below, southern rockhopper penguins call loudly. The always relentless striated caracaras—known as Johnny rooks—scout for penguin chicks or carrion to eat.The frigid waters host South American fur seals, orcas, Commerson’s dolphins, Peale’s dolphins, and sei whales. Underwater I swim through a majestic kelp forest that sways gently. Gentoo penguins dart above me, southern sea lions in hot pursuit. Lobster krill line up on the seafloor, pincers raised, as if for battle.The imagery is fitting. I am, after all, in the Falklands. War is a common theme. About 250 miles off the coast of Argentina, the British territory consists of more than 700 islands and islets, sparsely settled by about 3,200 people. Best known for the long history of disputes over the land, involving France, Spain, Argentina, and the United Kingdom, the archipelago wears the scars of war openly. The last conflict, when Argentina invaded the islands it claims as the Malvinas in 1982, ended after a brief but intense engagement with the United Kingdom. Roughly 20,000 land mines have not been accounted for, burned-out helicopters mar the landscape, and the Royal Air Force still has an active airfield on East Falkland.But for all the conflict—and despite extensive sheep farming—the islands appear surprisingly utopian. From the nutrient-rich ocean waters to the rain-sprinkled mountains, I’ve rarely encountered such an intact ecosystem in almost three decades as a photographer.Steeple Jason and neighboring Grand Jason, two islands untouched by war, might be the greatest Falklands success stories. Sheep and cattle grazed relentlessly on the otherwise uninhabited islands for nearly a century before a British bird lover acquired them in 1970. He turned the islands into a private sanctuary, and the vegetation began to recover. In the 1990s, New York hedge fund pioneer Michael Steinhardt bought the islands, and in 2001 he and his wife, Judy, donated them to the Wildlife Conservation Society, which owns and manages them. Researchers and tourists have been allowed only on carefully controlled visits.A male southern sea lion, about nine feet long and 800 pounds, looms over a female and two pups on an island informally known as Stick-in-the-Mud. The population declined in the mid-20th century when the animals were hunted and also had trouble finding food in a period of warm ocean temperatures. Now they’re the most abundant marine mammal in southern South America, with about 7,500 in the Falklands.A black-browed albatross on Steeple Jason feeds a chick that’s a week or two old. Mating pairs return to the same nest year after year and tend to a single egg.No more than a week old, gentoo penguin chicks nestle against a parent on Steeple Jason. Gentoos typically lay two eggs. They stay year-round in colonies linked to the sea by pathways that experience rush hours in the morning when they head out and in the evening when they return.Fast-forward to today, and the resiliency of nature is in evidence everywhere around me. The diversity on display is as if the Pacific Northwest, the West Indies, and Antarctica had collided in the South Atlantic. On five-mile-long Steeple Jason, 48 bird species have been observed. But the extraordinary profusion of Falklands wildlife still faces man-made risks: pollution, degraded habitat, oil slicks, baited hooks dragged behind fishing vessels, and, notably, climate change. The ocean may cool around the islands and warm farther away, disrupting the food web that nourishes seabirds and marine mammals. Increased oil exploration near the islands has also raised concerns about a devastating spill. The Falkland Islanders, though, have a growing incentive to embrace conservation. With more than 60,000 tourists visiting a year, ecotourism is now the second largest source of revenue, behind fishing and ahead of sheep farming.As a trained biologist, I can’t help but be obsessed with the difference between the islands left alone and the islands touched by our heavy hand. What can we learn from Steeple Jason’s abundance? There is hope, and there is healing, if we choose to let nature be. Exploring the island’s sloping grasslands and looming mountains is like walking back a thousand years in time. The ecosystem pristine. The wildlife extravagant. The animals unafraid of us.Predatory birds, such as this brown skua, are the main threat to albatrosses and penguins on Steeple Jason. Skuas often nest close to penguin colonies, where they feed on eggs and chicks.Eggshells lie scattered where they were discarded by predators. Adult albatrosses and penguins guard their nests until chicks can defend themselves.Mischievous Johnny rooks try to steal items out of my camera bag. Albatrosses hover overhead, suspended on the constant updrafts that blow off the Atlantic. One taps the back of my head lightly with its feet as it passes above me. I imagine it does so on purpose; these are precise birds. Where else can animals feel so free to engage in play with the likes of us? More important, how can we help them remain so unafraid? If we keep treating our fragile Earth simply as a place for resources to be extracted, it will continue to suffer. I see Steeple Jason as a testament to Earth’s resiliency but also a call for urgency. We need more Steeple Jasons, more places where we stop waging war on the environment and give nature the time it needs to flourish.",
"Ofu Island's coral reef lies within the 13,500 acres of National Park of American Samoa, the first U.S. national park in the Southern Hemisphere.Location: American Samoa Established: October 31, 1988 Size: 13,500 acres (9,500 land, 4,000 marine)For some 3,000 years, the people of Polynesia's oldest culture have been keenly attuned to their island environment, holding it to be precious and managing it communally. The name they gave their land reflects their attitude: Samoa means "sacred earth."Located roughly 2,600 miles southwest of Hawaii, American Samoa, a United States territory, comprises ten volcanic islands (five inhabited) and two coral atolls (one inhabited). In 1988 Congress authorized the land for a national park. In 1993, Samoan chiefs agreed to sign a 50-year lease that enables the National Park Service to manage an area of rain forest, beach, and coral reef on three islands. Samoans help manage the park, and their villages offer a few guest facilities (ask the park about its unique homestay program).The park protects hundreds of plant species in five distinct rain forest communities: lowland, montane, coast, ridge, and cloud. It is the only such rain forest on American soil. Among the fauna visitors can see are tropical birds and the endangered flying fox—a fruit bat with the wingspan of a barn owl.On Tutuila, American Samoa's largest island, lofty volcanic ridges overlook the deep blue waters of Pago Pago Harbor. Except for a few villages, and the scenic drive that skirts the harbor and the dramatic southern coastline, there is little level land. Atop this crumbled terrain and plunging steeply toward the sea on the island's northern side lies the park area—about 2,500 acres of land and some 1,200 acres of ocean.Parkland on Ta'u, the easternmost island, encompasses about 5,400 acres—including Lata Mountain, American Samoa's highest peak—and 1,000 acres offshore. Unforgettable is the panoramic view from the cloud forest toward the rugged cliffs of the southern coast. Small, remote Ofu Island includes what many call American Samoa's loveliest beach. Its main attraction is the 350-acre coral reef.There are flights to Pago Pago from Honolulu twice a week that take 5.5 hours. Time from California is about 14 hours, including a 3- or 4-hour Honolulu layover. From the airport, taxi or rent a car to the Sadie Thompson Inn, Sadies by the Sea Hotel, Pago Airport Inn, Tessarea Vaitogi Inn, Tradewinds, or Motu-o-Fiafiaga Motel. From any of those accommodations you can reach the park visitor center in Pago Pago by bus or car. Accommodations are also available on Ta'u, Ofu, and Olosega. To get to Ta'u requires about a half-hour flight from Pago Pago while Ofu visitors are transported to Ofu Island by local fisherman. Ofu's park begins at the edge of the airport; parkland on Ta'u is about a half-hour walk from the airport.Any time. The islands are 14 degrees south of the Equator, giving them a hot and rainy climate year-round. The heat and rain abate slightly from June through September.Contact the park headquarters before you visit. For information, write National Park of American Samoa, Pago Pago, American Samoa 96799, talk by phone at +1 684 633 7082 ext. 22, or visit the website. You can also drop in at the visitor center, located in Pago Pago across from the Pago Way Service Station.The National Park of American Samoa is the only National Park Service site south of the Equator.An elder of the Banjo tribe hunts for fish off the coast of Sampela, Indonesia.",
"<b>Left:</b> A damselfly—one of photographer Remus Tiplea’s favorite summer subjects—obligingly pauses in front of a blue inflatable kiddie pool. <b>Right:</b> When the weather is warm, Tiplea spends hours in his garden in Romania, looking at damselflies. Occasionally he catches their eyes staring back.First they were looking at him—and then he started looking back. Photographer Remus Tiplea noticed the damselflies perched on foliage in his garden in Negrești-Oaș, Romania. Staring with bulging eyes, the delicate insects looked inquisitive, Tiplea thought, and a little imposing. Long afternoons photographing damselflies became his summertime ritual.Through hours of watching, Tiplea learned the behaviors of the damselflies, a close relative of dragonflies but with slimmer bodies and narrower wings. He observed when they got hungry, when they reproduced (see why female dragonflies fake death to avoid sex), and what caused them to suddenly take flight. He saw how they behaved in rain and how they chose where to sleep. With time, he could tell their gender and the dominant qualities in mate selection. If he saw multiple damselflies in one frame, he’d have a few seconds to shoot before they’d show themselves as territorial rivals (by starting to fight) or lovers. “They would ignore me completely,” he says.As years have passed and summers have grown warmer, Tiplea has noticed fewer damselflies at his garden pond. “Their number is inconsistent,” he says—but “the important thing is that we are together in the same backyard.”",
"The mating ritual of the moorland hawker dragonfly—common around the ponds and wetlands of Europe, Asia, and North America—begins with what biologist Rassim Khelifa calls “an acrobatic aerial copulation.” While in flight, the female Aeshna juncea contorts so that her genitals, which are near the end of her body, connect with the male’s genitals, which are near his thorax. Thus joined in a lopsided-heart shape, they land and complete the sex act, whereupon the female will head off to lay her eggs.Before she can do that, other males may show up seeking sex. Evolution predisposes her to resist: She has limited eggs, her reproductive tract can be damaged by repeated copulations, she’s already been inseminated by the mate she chose, and the dragonfly penis is structured so that it removes any sperm present before making a new deposit. So to avoid further sex, she may fall down dead—or more precisely, she may fake death, dropping from the air and lying motionless in the ground cover.At the University of Zurich, Khelifa conducted a study of the females’ death feigning and found that usually “their strategy works.” Most males buzzed the crash site briefly, he says, then flew off to look for other conquests. Once the males left, the lifeless-looking females stirred and went on their way.Assuming a lifeless-looking, immobile state in an effort to discourage or ambush a predator is known as tonic immobility, death feigning, or thanatosis. It’s been seen in a wide variety of vertebrates and invertebrates.Hognose snake: To make their fake death throes as convincing as possible, hognose snakes of the North American genus Heterodon have been known to secrete a foul-smelling fluid and even spew blood.Virginia opossum: When threatened, an opossum will faint and look quite dead—from its prone posture to its drooling, tongue-lolling grimace—which led to the phrase “playing possum” to refer to feigning death.Predatory cichlid: At least two species of this fish may lure prey by sinking to the bottom of a river or lake and lying still as a corpse. If small fish approach to scavenge, the cichlid lunges and makes a meal of them.",
"For cartographers and cartophiles, Harold Fisk’s 1944 maps of the lower Mississippi River are a seminal work. In the mid-20th century the geologist charted the river in stunning detail and accuracy, using aerial photos and local maps. The centerpiece of his report was 15 maps showing the meandering Mississippi and its historical floodplains stretching from Missouri to southern Louisiana.More than seven decades later, Daniel Coe, a cartographer for the Washington Geological Survey, wanted to re-create Fisk’s maps with greater accuracy and a new aesthetic. Coe had the advantage of hyperprecise U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) data collected using lidar, a system of laser pulses sent from aircraft to measure topography. The lasers detect the river’s shape along with everything around it—every house, tree, and road. Strip away these layers of vegetation and human add-ons, and Coe’s maps show the river’s bare-ground geomorphology: once lazy bends replaced by direct flow, old floodplains cut off by levees and dikes.USGS scientists collect lidar data (almost all of it open-source) to visualize how land evolves, and enterprising mapmakers can interpret the data in new ways. Slight changes in elevation can be the difference between a peaceful river and a devastating flood. Excessive soil runoff from agriculture can cause river migration and create longer shipping routes.All of the above makes a river’s past behavior the best indicator of how it might react to future landslides, floods, or erosion. “The most surprising thing is how much of an imprint is still left on the landscape,” says Coe. “It’s like seeing fingerprints the river left behind.”",
"What did past civilizations leave behind? For archaeologists, that question can be difficult to answer. Remnants of buildings and other sites can be almost impossible to spot. Blame the ravages of time and nature, which can cover old walls and foundations in trees, vegetation, water, soil, and more.Then turn to LiDAR, one of archaeology’s most exciting modern tools. Light detection and ranging, or LiDAR, has changed the face of archaeology by making it possible to measure and map objects and structures that might otherwise remain hidden.Modern LiDAR relies on laser sensors that are deployed from the air or via handheld units. As lasers shine on the area to be mapped, they emit brief pulses of light. The amount of time it takes for those pulses to reflect back to the instrument is measured, and each measurement is plotted using GPS. Computers then use that data to construct a 3-D map of the area.One of LiDAR’s strengths is how well it can pinpoint tiny surface anomalies that indicate small sites like graves or big ones like sunken cities. But LiDAR has its limitations: It can’t reach beneath the ground, and trees in densely wooded areas can sometimes cause features to be missed.Still, its accuracy is prized by archaeologists, who use it to map topography, plan excavations, and spot archaeological sites they’d never be able to see with the naked eye. It is relatively quick and inexpensive compared to archaeological excavations, and can offer a high-level view not accessible to researchers who focus on just a few sites on the ground.The technology was invented for military use, but was first applied widely by meteorologists intent on studying clouds. The first LiDAR prototype was built in 1961 by Hughes Aircraft Company, which had built the first laser a year earlier. One of the earliest beneficiaries of LiDAR was the United States’ space program; the technology was used to map the moon during the 1971 Apollo 15 mission. Today, LiDAR is more down to earth, and is used to find archaeological clues both on the surface and in the water.Remote sensing has been credited with an “archaeology revolution” that is shifting the way researchers think about their work. In the early 2010s, archaeologists looking for evidence of hard-to-find Maya sites were astonished when LiDAR revealed a lost Maya city.In another case, researchers used LiDAR to spot more than 20,000 archaeological features of a seemingly minor site in Mexico that actually had been home to an ancient city. “In 45 minutes of flying, the LiDAR team accomplished a decade’s worth of archaeological survey,” said anthropologist Christopher Fisher in a release. Bathymetric LiDAR even revealed a Roman villa in Croatia.LiDAR doesn’t just reveal what is hidden: It can also document what has already been found. The technology is being used on the ground to map structures like the Notre Dame cathedral in Paris and Florence, Italy’s Salone dei Cinquecento.",
"Washing dishes—the most ordinary of chores—led photographer Ernie Button on a decadelong discovery of a fantasy universe. While placing an empty whisky glass in the dishwasher, he noticed at the bottom a thin residue of evaporated alcohol—specifically, Scotch, the term for a whisky aged more than three years in oak barrels in Scotland. When the last drops of alcohol dried up, they left sediment from the whisky’s distillates. Button took the glass to his studio, laid it on its side, and took pictures.The whisky-sediment patterns are like snowflakes; each has a unique design. They all, however, are light gray until Button lights them with multicolored lamps. The gray lines and swirls spring to life and make the rich designs resemble colorful landscapes of planets and moons. “I think of it as drinks and a show,” he says. Through trial and error, Button found that only Scotch whiskies accumulate enough sediment. The oldest he’s photographed is a 25-year-old whisky. (Verdict: no big difference.)In contrast to photographers who shoot epic scenes in exotic locales, Button looks inward and stays local. Before photographing spirits, he created landscapes with breakfast cereal boxes and chronicled the disappearance of coin-operated rides at grocery stores. Button’s work proves there are wild things to be observed in everyday life, even in dirty dishes.Any celestial body might have its creation story—but how many come with a recipe? Consider the moonlike images here, which actually are pancakes. As they prepared breakfast, web designer Nadine Schlieper and photographer Robert Pufleb were struck by the lunar features they saw in pancakes, from the cratering bubbles as the batter fried to the mottled finished product. The pair ended up making and photographing scores of hotcakes, and reflecting on how images can mislead. They called their project Alternative Moons, in a play on “alternative facts,” a term coined by a Trump White House spokesperson. Schlieper and Pufleb turned the project into a book, complete with the pancake recipe below; the book won first prize at the Vienna PhotoBook Festival in 2017.Alternative Moons Pancakes Ingredients:Instructions:The objects in Christopher Jonassen’s photo project look like they might be found in deep space. In reality, the Norwegian photographer found them deep in kitchen cabinets and campers’ mess kits. That’s why Jonassen titled the project Devour. Although they resemble planets, the orbs are the homely bottoms of cooking pots and pans. Jonassen’s been taking the photos since 2003, inspired by kitchen items in a home he was sharing. The beat-up utensils told stories of everyday use and the wear and tear it causes—and yet theyhad an otherworldly beauty. Over the years Jonassen has photographed hundreds of pans and revealed what he calls “the planets hidden inside,” using only lighting and basic Photoshop to heighten the effects. Some of his favorites sprang from utensils that served especially rough duty: the pots and pans that Boy Scouts used when cooking over campfires.",
"Berndnaut Smilde creates fluffy clouds in locations where nature never would place them. The Dutch artist’s sculptures last five seconds—10 seconds tops—before they disappear.Smilde’s ongoing project, called “Nimbus,” explores the visual effects of clouds. A church or museum interior looks different behind a cloud, and an everyday cloud is peculiar in a castle or a canyon. Each scene is made more intense by lasting only moments.Smilde's creations in gallery spaces include a sky-grazing cloud at the De Groen Fine Art Collection in Arnhem, the Netherlands.The ingredients for Smilde’s clouds: just smoke and water vapor. He requires a cold and damp space with no air circulation, lest the clouds never form or fall straight to the ground. He mists an area with a spray bottle to put water vapor into the air. Then he turns on fog machines that spout tiny particles, and the vapor condenses around them.Smilde runs around the forming cloud, coaxing it into a shape about 10 feet across and six feet tall. Then he steps back long enough for a photographer to snap several images. Once the air clears, he’ll start over, repeating the process dozens of times until he’s happy with the results. Later, he’ll retouch the photos to remove his tools.The artist regularly fields invitations to create clouds on command, like a tropospheric party trick. Often he declines. He says he only attempts new images when the setting offers him something fresh as an artist. To him, the crucial takeaway is not the wonder of a fabricated cloud but its transience—that it exists for a moment and then is gone forever.Each creation is “about being at the right place at the right time,” Smilde says. “If you’re seeing a photo, you already missed it.”See more of Smilde's unique creations here.",
"Berndnaut Smilde makes clouds and rainbows from scratch.The Dutch artist loved tinkering when he was a child, building and breaking apart endless Lego cities in efforts to make real-life objects match the mirages in his mind. In art school, he painted for a few years before he found himself drawn back into the tactile world of sculpture. One day, he wondered if he could sculpt a cloud.Clouds are simultaneously very simple and infinitely complex. Each one is a mass of water droplets squeezed out of air that’s so drenched it can’t hold any more liquid. The water vapor then condenses around any little particle it encounters—maybe a mote of dust, a floating organic molecule, or a fleck of black carbon—to form the fluffy blobs or wispy tangles we see in the sky."At Teresa's," Breaking Light series. 2015.To create clouds on demand, Smilde did some homework and started experimenting in his studio. First, he wetted down the floor of his studio and sprayed a fine mist of water into the air to saturate it with vapor. He then bought in a smoke machine, like the ones used to make fog at a haunted house, which spit out tiny droplets of material on which the vapor could condense.Soon he could puff a tiny cloud into a brief existence. He started to pose them in dramatic architectural environments, like a gothic church, a hammam in Turkey, or a tile-covered hallway in France. He’d rush to capture a photograph in the few seconds before the cloud disintegrated (and later retouch images to remove the cloud-making equipment from the picture).Smilde says he likes to put pieces of the natural world in unexpected positions and let this juxtaposition elicit strange feelings from viewers.Smilde demonstrating the prism at MU artspace in Eindhoven, the Netherlands.Behind the scenes at Kunst Station, Cologne, Germany.“There are all these cultural references and ideas about weather phenomena like clouds” he says. “People, they make up stories about them and interpret them in all their own different ways.”In 2015, Smilde found himself mulling a new project idea. He often played with a small prism he had lying around in his studio, turning it over and watching the way it split white light into a rainbow that painted the walls with color.Maybe, he thought, he could make that rainbow bigger and put in somewhere that would make people see this popular natural phenomenon in a new way.He knew that if wanted to make a giant rainbow, he’d have to make a giant prism. At the time, Smilde was an artist-in-residence at the Boulder Museum of Contemporary Art in Colorado. He connected with Steve Tomczyk, a scientist who worked on solar physics at the National Center for Atmospheric Research.Smilde tinkered and Tomczyk calculated, and before long they had designed the oversize prism, which they had manufactured by a local plastics company. They left it hollow and filled it with mineral oil, which has the same optical properties as the one-inch-thick plastic outer shell, so it breaks the light identically.Cape Leeuwin Lighthouse.Rainbow projected onto the side of the Klokgebouw in Eindhoven, the Netherlands, for the 2016 exhibition Weather or Not.They tested the prism on a dark evening at a farm outside Boulder. Using an enormous floodlight—a “Batman light,” Smilde calls it—the prism successfully splashed a wide rainbow over the side of a barn about 330 feet away.But what Smilde really wanted to do was split light onto an even wider canvass.Eventually, he convinced the managers of the Point Leeuwin lighthouse in Australia to let him install his prism in front of its thousand-watt bulb. He fussed over the positioning all afternoon. Then, as dusk fell and the lightbulb started to burn, the rainbow appeared. Every seven and a half seconds, the beam swept past the prism, flashing the rainbow out onto the landscape.Smilde wants to bring his clouds and prisms to many more places around the world, to push himself and others to look at a given vista in new ways.“I’m not interested in trying to create something that lasts forever,” he says. The art he makes dissipates and disappears, so that each piece is rooted in a time and place. For him, that means there is always more art to create and a new place to go.",
"Photographer Nicolas Ruel usually takes eight seconds to make his long-exposure images. Why not less time—or more? “Eight is the number of infinity,” he says, referring to what he hopes is the endless wonder of looking and looking again at his double-take images of cityscapes around the world.He starts with an urban place filled with people, energy, and motion. Train stations work well, as do churches, libraries, and stadiums—anywhere that people gather. He sets his tripod and takes a four-second exposure in one direction (most photo exposures are about 1/60 of a second or less). Then, with the shutter still open, he’ll swivel the camera to a different view for another four-second exposure—creating, ultimately, an eight-second one-frame documentary.Long exposures typically show motion blur. Double exposures often mesh two images. But using both techniques from the same point offers a sense of depth, allowing the viewer to stand in a single spot and take a look around. Human places, rather than wild spaces, attract Ruel most. They’re dramatically different from one second to the next, constantly changing. As a result, New York’s Times Square or London’s Oxford Circus, two of the world’s most photographed locations, spring to life through Ruel’s camera with views not seen before.Ruel searches for new places to photograph in urban spaces, the more vibrant the better. A series that started with eight cities now has 68, and Ruel’s goal is 100. But he leaves open the possibility that just like the images, the series may, in a way, be infinite.",
"What makes a tradition—and why do people keep traditions alive? You might ask any of the children chosen to be Las Mayas in Colmenar Viejo, a town in Spain. Each spring, a few girls typically between the ages of seven and 11 sit in elaborate altars decorated with fresh flowers to mark the new season.As crowds pass by for two hours, the girls are to sit perfectly still, their facial expressions a sign of how seriously they take their roles. Families are honored if their daughter is selected from the dozens of young girls who apply to participate in this local tradition with ancient roots. But taking part means weeks of feverish activity preparing the elaborate altars and dresses.Photographer Daniel Ochoa de Olza has spent his career documenting Spanish traditions, from the serious to the sublime. At each, he wonders why they continue. He recalls a festival in Piornal, Spain, where villagers pelt an armored, devil-like character with turnips. And there’s the famous festival of San Fermín in Pamplona, Ochoa de Olza’s hometown—the running of the bulls. “It’s stupid and it’s dangerous, but it’s our tradition,” he says, admitting that he’s run nine times.The Maya girls create the compositions in which they star, so the portraits aren’t photographically daring, says Ochoa de Olza. But they’re revelatory in the sense that, even in one’s own country, there are always new customs to discover—practices with vibrancy and beauty, even if they may be fleeting.The magic of being a Maya tends to fade as the girls grow beyond childhood, says Ochoa de Olza. As teenagers, onetime Mayas tend to laugh off their past participation, projecting cool by disavowing their youthful enthusiasm. And yet, as former Mayas have daughters of their own, the tradition continues.See more of Ochoa de Olza's surreal photos.",
"The festival of Las Mayas, Colmenar Viejo, SpainEvery spring, families in the Spanish village of Colmenar Viejo with daughters between the ages of 7 and 11 gather to decide which of their girls will have the honor of being chosen as this year’s stars of “Las Mayas”, a collective rite of spring dating back to medieval times.The participating families build and decorate altars with aromatic flowers and herbs gathered from the surrounding countryside. The four or five mayas dress in costumes, a wreath of flowers adorning their heads. There are no written rules – everything has been passed down orally from generation to generation.On festival day, the mayas must sit in serene stillness on their altars on the streets of the village for two hours as the people living in the village pass by, admiring and commenting on the displays. A band of musicians roves from altar to altar, extolling the beauty and elegance of each girl. 10-15 other girls dressed in long white dresses and black jackets who serve as the mayas’ attendants, asking for coins from spectators in exchange for cleaning their jackets with brushes. Afterwards, everyone heads to church for mass. Sitting in the midst of them is like being in the middle of little angels, says photographer Daniel Ochoa de Olza.(The scene is surreal but probably no less so than the Jarramplas festival he goes on to describe where a man dressed in body armor is pelted by turnips as symbolic punishment for stealing cattle.)Ochoa de Olza balances his job as a staff photographer for the AP with his personal passion for documenting Spain’s arcane festivals, of which, he says, there are many. His work on a bullfighter Juan José Padilla won a World Press Photo Award in 2013. This year, it is his portraits from Las Mayas, a festival particular to this small village about 18 miles outside of Madrid.These tableaux bring to mind Catholic icons, woodland fairies and a dash of Frida Kahlo. The scene may be visually rich but it is photographically straightforward. “The pictures are very simple,” he says, “but they have layers. That is what I like about shooting traditions. It’s another way of telling the story of my country. And I am discovering those traditions myself. They will last a bit longer than the breaking news that will be gone on a week – traditions will evolve over time, some will disappear completely.”What is also interesting to him is observing the human figure in the midst of the flowers and decorations – a human whose character and attitude are apparent by the look on her face, whether her eyes express a smile or annoyance at having to endure two hours on display.Ochoa de Olza hopes these pictures are a chance for people to understand how something that may seem exotic is part of our collective experience as human beings. “We are all doing strange things in all parts of the world,” he continues. “Everything is mixed with religion in Spain,” he says. “And I find it interesting in the 21st century we are still doing these festivals – it is a way to see where we are going and where we have come from – looking back to look forward.”",
"Known as Drummies, drum majorettes began appearing in Cape Town street parades in the 1970s. Today they’re part of competitive clubs, often in schools. Though open to everyone, these teams tend to attract girls from marginalized communities. The long hours of repetitive practice are appreciated as a way to build confidence, pride, and a positive work ethic.Girls as young as five and women into their 20s are drawn to the mix of cheerleading and marching band. They rehearse elaborate routines for regional competitions, where their appearance and precision earn them accolades. But they’re also judged on leadership and character.South African photographer Alice Mann started taking pictures of drummies in 2016. She was attracted by their energy, femininity, and empowerment. Mann watched the girls practice and perform. She noticed how a girl’s body language changed the moment she put on her uniform. And she saw the hopes of parents—particularly the “drummy mummies”—who support the clubs by raising money and repairing uniforms.Enthusiasm and energy are renewable resources. But the activity has lately been in decline, a consequence of struggling schools and, perhaps, more opportunities for young girls to connect, especially online.Still, there are plenty of drummies in Cape Town who come for all-day competitions and who see the long-term value of such a demanding activity. “To be a drummy is very affirming,” says Mann. “It teaches them things they can apply throughout their lives.”",
"Whenever photographer Gabriele Galimberti meets people on his travels, he asks the same question: Can I see what’s in your medicine cabinet? Some are shy; others proud to do so. “The medicines reveal who the people are,” says Galimberti. “Their desires, their wants, their diseases. It’s very intimate.”What can our medicines say about us? For one, how affluent we are. Cabinets in developed countries tend to overflow with pharmaceuticals. People in less developed countries collect medications more slowly or not at all. A Haitian woman had not a single pill in the house: “If I get sick, I’ll buy a pill from the street vendor,” she said.The medicine cabinet series, “Home Pharma,” is part of a larger ongoing project, called “Happy Pills,” in which Galimberti and three colleagues document humans’ never-ending pursuit of happiness through chemistry. People take pills to be stronger, to sleep more (or sometimes less), to age more slowly, to be more virile, to promote pregnancy, or to prevent it. The reasons people buy medicines—and hoard them—are just as plentiful: because they’re cheap or because more advanced medical care isn’t cheap, because we’re anxious about being unprepared, or because we were once prescribed them and don’t know how to dispose of the rest.View the different cabinets’ contents, and cultures start to take shape. In Paris and New York, Galimberti saw large numbers of antidepressants and antianxiety pills. Indian people tended to choose medicines with Indian labels, independent of quality or potency. African cabinets had drugs from China, often unlabeled. Yet all the people photographed had something in common: None of them were sick.",
"“You see, I put the ampicillin next to the Tylenol—a packet of pink pills, a packet of blue pills. The colors have to look good together. If my display doesn’t catch the eye, no one will buy anything.”Aristil Bonord adjusts the blue plastic bucket on his right shoulder as he speaks. Inside it, a steeple of multicolored pills in blister packs rises like a totem. A pair of scissors, used to divvy up the medicine, pokes out at the top. The whole thing is held together with rubber bands.For more than 20 years Bonord has roamed the streets of Port-au-Prince with this tower of treatments, this chemical Babel. But he is not a pharmacist. He is a vendor.In a little apartment in the Pacot neighborhood of the Haitian capital, merchants like Bonord are lined up to have their portraits taken by Paolo Woods and Gabriele Galimberti. The two photographers—working on a project about medical access in over two dozen countries—have long been fascinated by the city’s wandering druggists.Street dispensaries, they say, are the main source of medicine for many Haitians. “Pharmacists are an endangered species,” explains Lionel Étienne, a local drug importer. “Medicine is considered an ordinary consumer good.”Julène Clerger, 37, has five children at home. She’s thinking about quitting the pharmaceutical business and selling bananas and boiled eggs instead.Clerger’s husband, Pélège Aristil, 35, may eventually leave the trade as well. Later this year, when he finishes his theological studies, he’ll be an accredited evangelical pastor.The portable pharmacies may look like contemporary art installations or candy store displays, but they can be as dangerous as Russian roulette. The government’s lack of oversight allows untrained merchants like Bonord to obtain and sell pharmaceutical products: generic medicines from China, expired pills, counterfeit drugs imported from the Dominican Republic.The activity is technically illegal, but the laws are rarely enforced by the Ministry of Public Health and Population. So the vendors sell anything they can get their hands on, from abortion pills to Viagra knockoffs. Sometimes they give bad advice to their clients. One seller told a teenager to take powerful antibiotics for his acne.“Every time I see a street vendor, it is like a slap in the face,” mutters the ministry’s pharmacy director, Flaurine Joseph. “They are like time bombs, and we have almost no way to stop them.”Ady Dumé, 38, sells his pharmaceutical products on the street. Some vendors have stands or kiosks in local markets. Others pack their pills into suitcases and ride the public buses of Port-au-Prince, in search of additional sales.Aristil Bonord, 36, peddles pharmaceuticals on the streets of Port-au-Prince.To make these portraits, Woods and Galimberti used an 8 x 10 large-format view camera with film and a medium-format digital camera. A white wall served as the backdrop.As the vendors waited to be photographed, they eyed their neighbors’ goods, rarely speaking. It was their only respite from a long day in the brutal sun. They were glad for the break but worried that they were losing clients.Woods and Galimberti say they want to make people aware that access to medicine, taken for granted in developed countries, is a challenge in many places. In Haiti vendors and customers alike have to make do with what they can.“I chose this profession because times are hard here,” says Bonord. “I want my children to go to school. And everyone needs medicine.”Berthony Mélord, 24, roams Port-au-Prince with a portable kiosk of medicine.Rébert Février, 39, is an urban pharmaceutical vendor. Many Haitians—especially in the countryside, where pharmacies are very rare—rely on plant-based remedies. In cities they might mix those with pharmaceuticals. But that may be changing. “The young do not trust the leaves anymore,” says Février. “They prefer our ointments and tablets.”",
"I first went to Normandy in 1974. I was a 27-year-old news photographer shooting the French presidential election, and my visit happened to coincide with the 30th anniversary of the D-Day landings. I was amazed that the French still welcomed American veterans as their liberators—a warm feeling between the countries that still exists today.JUNE 2014 An infrared image shows American graves in a cemetery at Colleville-sur-Mer, France.JUNE 1974 A French soldier returns to Pointe du Hoc, where Rangers scaled cliffs to capture German artillery.JUNE 1974 U.S. Army Rangers reenact the invasion of Omaha Beach on the 30th anniversary of D-Day.MAY 1994 Remnants of German fortifications still stand on Cap Blanc-Nez.JUNE 2014 Before dawn on D-Day, some 13,000 U.S. paratroopers dropped from planes above the French countryside. In this infrared image made 70 years later, the landing was reenacted near the town of Sainte-Mère-Église.Since that trip, I’ve returned to the beaches nearly a dozen times in the past half century, with each visit observing those hallowed sands and bearing witness to how the past refuses to be erased. I’ve met countless veterans who at first seem perfectly ordinary, like the guys I grew up with who ran the hardware store or pharmacy. I’ve had to pull their extraordinary stories out of them—each one a remarkable memory of a pivotal moment.JUNE 1944 Robert Capa’s well-known photograph shows Omaha Beach on D-Day. The invasion of Allied forces into German-controlled France shifted the balance of military power in World War II.I see my responsibility as bridging the gap with photography to help people, particularly young people, understand the importance of what happened there—not just the soldiers who died, but also how the Allied invasion of German-occupied France changed the world. I’ve always been a fan of Edward R. Murrow, the American radio correspondent who delivered nightly radio reports from London during World War II. I like to play his reports on my cell phone when I’m walking on Omaha Beach and take in the accounts of what happened there in June 1944.History has a way of receding. Our recollections become secondhand, then thirdhand, and eventually just words in a history book. But I’m not sure the same fate awaits Normandy. I’ve never met anybody, young or old, who walked on Omaha Beach and didn’t feel the history of that place. There’s something very powerful about putting your feet on the sand.",
"Tropical plants aren’t abundant in the northern latitudes of Montreal, Canada. Nor are the planet’s most diverse animals, insects. Even so, Montreal-based artist and photographer Raku Inoue finds a way to showcase both with his colorful portraits of insects and other animals made from flowers, leaves, twigs, seeds, and stems.“Insects have always been symbolic for me,” says Inoue, who grew up in Japan. Each summer his grandmother would leave the door open to cool their house in the countryside near Hiroshima and welcome in dragonflies, an insect that she believed represented the presence of her late husband.Now Inoue makes dragonflies, beetles, ants, and whatever else inspires him, using materials from his own backyard. He takes leftover rose petals and baby’s breath from nearby florists, and occasionally people will send him plants from other parts of the world to challenge his creativity. During a recent trip to the American Southwest, he wanted badly to see a scorpion. When none appeared, he did the next best thing: He collected twigs and seeds, and made one.",
"Beaches across the planet share many characteristics: sand, water, ocean breezes—and plastic. At Floyd Bennett Field in Brooklyn, New York, the coastal area where artist Barry Rosenthal goes collecting, trash piles up fast and in layers, as if at an archaeological site.Plastics will indeed be the artifacts of our era, particularly in oceans, where the material invades ecosystems and floats around the world. More than five trillion pieces of plastic already fill the seas, with some nine million tons added each year.Rosenthal observed how bottles, toys, and food wrappers fade, wear out, yet never disappear. He started building and photographing sculptures of ocean trash to illustrate the problem of marine pollution. Eventually he began to gather the detritus to use as his art materials, cleaning a small section of the coast over and over again. “I started to just collect as much as I could and go back to my studio to sort it out,” he says. Each sculpture has a theme, by color, shape, or intended use, such as the motor oil containers below.A project begun for aesthetics has acquired a second purpose: raising social and environmental awareness. Now Rosenthal travels to speak about ocean pollution and what might help clean it up. The most meaningful advance, he says, would be to rethink our method of consuming.“We need a paradigm shift in all packaging design,” he says. “Not just plastic bags and straw bans to make people feel good.”",
"Pelagic red crabs swim at Cortes Bank, a seamount off San Diego. These small, filter-feeding ocean animals play a role in the distribution of microplastics throughout the water column, a new study says.For many years, scientists have tried to account for the amount of plastic waste that should be in the world’s oceans, given how much is estimated to leak into the seas every year. So far, the tally points to the largest concentrations on the surface and in coastal waters. But much of it remains “missing.”And scientists can’t fully assess whatever harm plastics cause to the environment until they learn where they are. Now, new research off the California coast suggests an even larger plastics reservoir: deep offshore pelagic waters, the largest habitat on Earth.Scientists at the Monterey Bay Aquarium Research Institute found high concentrations of microplastics in Monterey Bay, a deep submarine canyon ecosystem that lies in the California Current, which flows southward along the North American coast from British Columbia to Baja.They conclude, in a study published Thursday in the journal Scientific Reports, that this deep-water repository of small plastic debris “extends much further and more extensively into the waters, sediments, and animal communities of the deep sea.” The research adds to the growing body of work by scientists to locate the “missing” plastic in the oceans.“We found microplastics everywhere we looked, in every sample and specimen we looked at,” says Anela Choy, an oceanography professor at Scripp’s Institution of Oceanography in San Diego and the paper’s lead author.The word pelagic is derived from the ancient Greek word for open. The pelagic zone is “open ocean,” which extends over 330 million cubic miles. Although microplastics have been found throughout the oceans, from sea surface to the deepest crevice in the sea floor, efforts to assess the density of microplastics in the pelagic zone are expensive and difficult.Choy and her team also found confirming evidence that small filter-feeding ocean animals, including red crabs and tadpole-shaped organisms known as giant larvaceans, transport microplastics throughout the water column, introducing plastic particles into marine food webs from near-surface waters down to the deep seafloor.The crabs and larvaceans are among some 700 marine organisms that consume microplastics. But both can spread the tiny plastic bits throughout the water column, according to Kakani Katija, a bioengineer at the aquarium and co-author of the study. The crabs, found in large numbers near the surface, are consumed by larger fish, including tuna.The larvaceans create mucus filters, known as a “house” or a “bubble” that expands the creature to the size of a muffin and collects organic material, including plastics. When the filters become clogged, the larvaceans shed them. As the filters sink to the ocean floor, they are consumed by other marine animals. Larvaceans also transport plastic particles around the deep waters by expelling them in fecal pellets that sink rapidly, carrying the plastic bits with them.The new findings on marine organisms build on research both scientists published in 2017 that explored how successfully the larvaceans transported microplastics to the deep sea. In that study, they injected small plastic beads into the water around the larvaceans and watched as they ingested them. In the new study, the team did not feed the crabs or larvaceans.“What we learned with the animals we collected is that they were ingesting plastics in the environment already,” says Katija, who is also a National Geographic Explorer.In a surprise to the team, the scientists found a strong link between the particles in the water column and those in the red crabs and discarded houses of larvaceans.“They were similar types and similar sizes,” Choy says.Choy’s team used underwater remote operated vehicles to collect samples at two locations of depths that ranged from 16 to 3,280 feet below the surface. Samples were collected just offshore, but most were gathered just over 50 miles from shore in the deep waters of Monterey Canyon.The found concentrations greater than the microplastics that collect in the Great Pacific Garbage Patch, a collection of trash that floats on the ocean surface. Most of the microplastics found in the new study were made of plastics like polyethylene terephthalate (PET), commonly used to make disposable plastic packaging.Marcus Eriksen is co-founder of 5 Gyres Institute, a nonprofit named for the five main ocean gyres, said the finding is not a surprise. He is one of the authors of a 2015 study that estimated the number of microplastics in the ocean ranged from 15 to 51 trillion pieces, weighing between 93,000 and 236,000 metric tons. He was not involved in the Monterey study.“it makes sense that there would be concentrations of microplastics in deeper waters,” he said. “What’s unknown is how long microplastics can remain in the water column as they ride deeper currents around the world.Scientists have known that some plastics have lower and others higher densities than water, meaning that some sink more rapidly while others remain buoyant.“I would still suspect the majority of plastics are near the surface and the heavier plastics are all sinking soon after flowing out to sea,” says Eriksen.“Early models of vertical distribution suggested that half of plastics in the ocean were in the first meter and the rest slowly descending vertically, while moving horizontally for thousands of miles. Of course, at the end of the day [end of the century] the majority of the world's plastic waste will reside on the seafloor, being defining material for the Anthropocene.”The Monterey microplastics were “highly weathered,” suggesting that they had been in the ocean for months or years, Choy’s team concluded. The team found very few of the kinds of plastic used to make fishing gear, further suggesting that the microplastics in the deep water column were transported there by ocean currents.The team concluded that since plastic waste is predicted to grow for the rest of the century, efforts at mitigation must consider the “enormous spatial (both horizontal and vertical), and ecological scale of the problem these new findings reveal.”Choy cautioned that deep sea work is needed globally to determine how extensively microplastics saturate deep waters. “It’s an open question. This is one study and a lot of work. But the findings need to be replicated by others in other parts of the ocean to see if they hold it,” she says. “It’s likely there will be a lot of variability due to changes in ecosystems. The more data we have, the better we can understand why.”",
"There’s the plastic waste we can see—bottles, bags, discarded fishing nets, and all manner of other objects littering shorelines and bobbing in oceans. And then there’s the plastic waste we can’t see: microplastics, whittled by sun, wind, and waves into bits so small that some are visible only under a microscope. Scientists are just beginning to understand the impact these particles are having on fish, the food chain, and ultimately, us.For this month’s story about microplastics—part of National Geographic’s Planet or Plastic? initiative to reduce plastic waste—photographer David Liittschwager documented the ubiquity of plastics in ocean water samples. Writer Laura Parker’s reporting took her to a National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration lab in Honolulu, where oceanographer Jamison Gove and fish biologist Jonathan Whitney study microplastics in the slicks where larval fish spend their first days of life.In some of those slicks there are more plastics in the water than fish. That raises the odds that just hatched fish will mistake plastic bits for food and eat them. “The most critical moment is that first feeding,” Whitney said. “If they get a piece of plastic, that could be it. A single thread in the stomach of a larval fish is potentially a killer.”Fish that ingest plastic and survive raise other concerns, Parker writes: “Flying fish appear to eat plastic especially frequently. Besides serving as prey for larger fish, including sharks, flying fish are primary prey for 95 percent of Hawaiian seabirds. Are birds ingesting plastic with their flying fish, and is that affecting them? For every question the researchers answer, Gove says, 10 new ones come up.”Most of us won’t see microplastics’ harm at the level that scientists do. But with about nine million tons of visible plastic waste washing into oceans each year, we see clearly how it’s hurting turtles, seabirds, whales, and many other species. Isn’t that reason enough to join the global effort to reduce plastic waste?So far in our Planet or Plastic? initiative, more than 150,000 people have pledged to use nearly 200 million fewer single-use plastic items. I’d call that a good start.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.",
"Not long ago I went snorkeling in the Pacific Ocean, a half mile off the southwest coast of Oahu. The flanks of the Hawaiian island are steep there, and the bottom quickly disappeared beneath us as we motored out to the site. Looking back, I could see the green slopes of the Waianae Range rising to 4,000 feet behind the beach. Normally the mountains shield the water here from the trade winds. But on that day a breeze created a light chop that nearly obscured what I had come to see: a thin, oily slick of surface water, rich in organic particles, in which newborn fish were feeding and struggling to survive their first precarious weeks.Plunging my face into the sheen, I found myself looking inside a fish nursery: The water was dotted with life you would ordinarily never notice. Fish eggs drifted like tiny lanterns, their yolk sacs glowing in the sunlight. Fish larvae small as ladybugs darted about. A sergeant major damselfish the size of a dime appeared huge by comparison as it fluttered past. Below us, a school of 12-inch, bigeye scad—like mackerel but with enormous eyes—fed on everything that had the misfortune of being small.My guides that day, oceanographer Jamison Gove and fish biologist Jonathan Whitney of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration in Honolulu, are nearly three years into a research project that aims to make sense of this chaotic scene. The larval stage is the “black box” of fisheries science: Fertilized eggs go in, and young fish come out—but what happens inside remains sketchy. The larval fish are so small and fragile they’re exceedingly difficult to study. The overwhelming majority will never become adults. Yet fish populations around the world, and the animals that eat them, depend on just how many larval fish make it, and in what condition.What Gove and Whitney have found lately—and what David Liittschwager’s photographs of their water samples document—is that fish and wholesome fish food are not the only things collecting in the slicks off Hawaii. Microplastics, tiny shreds of human trash, are there as well, and in such abundance that larval fish are eating them in their first days of life.For newborn fish, to eat is to live another day; if their first meal is plastic, they’re not consuming the calories they need to sustain them until the second. “They’ve beaten a lot of odds to get this far,” Gove says. “They hatched, they found the slick, they’re feeding and growing. This is one-tenth of one percent that made it this far; they’re the lucky ones. And now plastics are coming in.”“The most critical moment is that first feeding,” Whitney says. “If they get a piece of plastic, that could be it. A single thread in the stomach of a larval fish is potentially a killer.”Plastic waste, mostly from rivers or careless dumping on land, washes into the oceans at an average rate of about nine million tons a year, according to a 2015 study by Jenna Jambeck of the University of Georgia. The visible trash, along with heartbreaking images of its impact on everything from turtles to birds to whales, has generated a public outcry. But sunlight, wind, and waves eventually break down ocean plastic to bits that are barely visible. One of the biggest unknowns—and concerns—is the effect that these microplastics, smaller than a fifth of an inch, might be having on fish.Fish provide critical protein to nearly three billion people and countless seabirds and other marine animals. But fish stocks worldwide have fallen by half since 1970, surveys show. Populations of the largest predatory fish, such as tuna, have fallen even more. The decline is largely because of overfishing, but pollution and waters warmed and acidified by climate change are having a growing impact.As long ago as the early 1970s, scientists were finding plastic pellets—the material used to manufacture plastic goods—in the stomachs of fish caught off New England and Great Britain. More recent studies have documented the presence of even smaller microplastic particles in a growing array of adult fish. Larval fish have been studied much less but are likely to be more vulnerable to microplastics, as they are to everything else. “Any stressor will likely have more of an impact on early life stages than later life stages,” says Susanne Brander, a toxicologist at Oregon State University who is studying how plastics might affect the growth of fish.Most ocean fish are terrible parents. A few species guard their eggs on the seafloor; others protect them inside their mouths. But most fish release thousands or even millions of eggs and sperm into the wide ocean and never see their offspring. When eggs hatch a day or two later, they’re on their own.Newly hatched fish look misshapen, heads oversize, tails barely formed. They have to eat like crazy to grow into their body. Whereas human babies develop in the shelter of the uterus, fish mainly develop after they emerge into an unforgiving world.“They hatch super early,” Whitney says. “They have small brains; some fins aren’t even formed. Their liver isn’t fully developed. Or their hearing or seeing. They are only partially developed, but they are actively swimming, eating, fending for themselves.”Predators or starvation will get most of them. “That’s why fish spawn so many eggs,” says Su Sponaugle, an Oregon State University marine ecologist who specializes in the early life stages of fish. “They have to hedge their bets.”The larval phase is treacherous every step of the way—starting with the need for the larvae to find food, which they do in a surface slick. Surface slicks form mostly in coastal regions around the world, wherever currents, tides, or subsurface waves cause water to converge and concentrate the organic gunk that floats in it. Slicks can be seen by satellite as long, squiggly ribbons that run parallel to coasts.Some larval fish swim to slicks, some drift, as do eggs not yet hatched. Predators converge on slicks too. If a baby fish manages to avoid being eaten and to find enough food, it will be about two inches long when it heads back to its permanent habitat—a reef, say. The right current will transport it there, the wrong one out to sea.“If you miss an island, good luck with that. If there’s no reef, you cannot complete your life cycle,” Sponaugle says. Life for larval fish was a crapshoot even before they met our plastic trash.Pushed into a surface slick by converging currents, they’re separated in the lab by a technician with tweezers. A computer program counts the plastic pieces and measures each one; the technician uses a microscope to identify the creatures.Whitney and Gove came to ocean science and Hawaii by happenstance. Whitney, 37, grew up in New Jersey with a kid’s plan to become a veterinarian. He arrived in Honolulu in 2006 as a volunteer for a census of humpback whales. In graduate school he worked his way down to the tiniest organisms of the sea.Gove, 40, grew up in San Diego and learned to surf before he could read. A summer job with NOAA convinced him the ocean was more than a playground. After helping to cut 70 tons of abandoned fishing gear from Hawaiian coral reefs, Gove enrolled in graduate school to become an oceanographer. He specialized in how winds, tides, and waves affect ocean ecosystems and surface slicks in particular.Slicks are transient—they break up in rough weather—which makes studying them a challenge. Gove and Whitney took me to see a slick off Oahu because it was close to their lab, but their main research site is on the west side of Hawaii, the Big Island, where two large volcanoes provide an even better wind shadow than Oahu’s Waianae Range. The steep drop-off of the seafloor has proved to be a surprise bonus: The slicks attract an oceanic convention of not only reef fish but also fish from greater depths, including commercially important mahi-mahi, swordfish, and marlin.“One of the coolest things we found was the diversity,” Whitney says. “We’ve got deep-sea fish, mid-ocean fish, and reef fish, all interacting at the surface for the first few weeks of their lives. It was incredibly unique. I can’t think of any other place on Earth where babies from different areas share nursery grounds.”He and Gove expected to find plastics in their slicks; the Hawaiian chain is in the drift pattern of the Great Pacific Garbage Patch. But they never intended to join the growing hunt for microplastics that has overtaken the work of so many marine scientists. Their focus was basic research on larval fish. Their samples contained such loads of plastic, however, that they had to revise their project.The preliminary results indicate that slicks concentrate plastics even more than they do larval fish. In the water outside slicks, Whitney and Gove found nearly three times more larval fish than microplastics. Inside slicks, the situation was reversed: Microplastics outnumbered larval fish by more than seven to one. On average there was almost 130 times as much plastic inside slicks as outside.“We didn’t have any idea we would find such concentrations,” Gove says. One of the first fish they dissected had plastic in its gut.In this sample, a blue plastic bag has begun to disintegrate. Two gnarled rope ends from a fishing net are collecting algae and other organisms. A striped mahi-mahi larva (center right), just under two inches long, turns away from the rope; an inch-long triggerfish (upper left), about 10 weeks old and almost of an age to head back to the reef, noses up to a triangular shard of white plastic.What harm such plastic is causing is still unsettled science. But in lab tests, some clues have emerged. Plastic reduces the appetites and growth rates of fish that consume it. That could affect reproduction and ultimately population size. “The larger a female fish is, the more eggs she can carry and the higher number of offspring she can produce,” Brander says.In their lab, Whitney and Gove oversaw the dissection of more than 650 larval fish, most of them between one-third of an inch to half an inch in length. They found plastic in 8.6 percent of the ones caught in slicks. That doesn’t sound like much, and outside slicks the percentage was less than half that—but scientists know that small changes in the survival of larval fish can translate into large changes in fish populations, with cascading effects up the food chain.The NOAA researchers found tiny blue strands of polyethylene and polypropylene, commonly used to make fishing gear, in the stomachs of larval swordfish, marlins, and five other species. The strands look a lot like the food that larval fish crave: tiny copepods, bluish crustaceans with long, skinny antennae.In larval mahi-mahis, Whitney and Gove found no plastic. They’re not sure why. Was it because eyesight develops earlier in mahi-​mahis, making them better than other species at distinguishing plastic from prey? Or was it because the mahi-mahis that ate plastic had died and escaped detection?Flying fish appear to eat plastic especially frequently. Besides serving as prey for larger fish, including sharks, flying fish are primary prey for 95 percent of Hawaiian seabirds. Are birds ingesting plastic with their flying fish, and is that affecting them? For every question the researchers answer, Gove says, 10 new ones come up.The smallest fish he and Whitney found with plastic in its stomach was just a quarter inch long, about six millimeters. But the plastic fibers the fish are eating are smaller.“They are less than one millimeter, things you can barely see with the naked eye,” Whitney says. That is “the shocking part: The pieces we can’t even see are the problem.”",
"Plastic packaging like these clamshells can be recycled. It doesn't mean that they always are.The scissors were on sale for $3. Suspended between two thick layers of tough plastic, they looked permanently imprisoned. Ingenuity, and no small amount of effort, would be needed to free my excellent deal from its clamshell prison. But there was also a risk that blood would be spilled—my blood. Thousands of people seek medical treatment every year with cuts and other injuries from attempting to open clamshells and other similar packages.Clamshells have not only been voted the worst design ever, they've spawned the term “wrap rage” as exemplified by comedian Larry David’s attempt to open one. Despite all this, products inside clamshells line the shelves of retail stores and supermarkets.Product packaging generates more plastic waste than any other industry. In Europe it accounts for 59 percent of all plastic waste by weight. In the United States that is likely closer to 65 percent, experts say. The global packaging market is a $700-billion-a-year industry and growing at 5.6 percent per year. Plastics account for one-third of this, making packaging the largest single market for U.S. plastics.Clamshells, like most packaging, are single-use plastics and while technically recyclable, few are recycled in the U.S. That needs to change quickly if product manufacturers and the plastics industry are to meet their commitments to recycle or recover all plastics and greatly increase their use of recycled plastic in packaging.Thomas Jake Lunsford is credited with inventing the clamshell, although he called it a “Separable Packaging and Display System” when he filed for a patent on September 15, 1976. Clamshells look a bit like their namesake as they are made from two identical plastic "shells" that fit around the product and hinge on one side. When the sides are pressed together, snaps form a seal, some of them harder to unfasten than others.Lunsford made no mention of using a heat seal on the edges to make clamshells impossible to open without tools. Scissors, even when they aren’t trapped in a clamshell, don’t work well on tough, slippery plastic. And, like boxcutters, they pose some risk of hand injury. Tin snips work better, but there is a tool whose only purpose is to open clamshells.To help his 90-year-old mother open sealed clamshells, retired dentist Steve Fisher invented the battery-powered Zip-it Opener 10 years ago. It’s very popular with seniors, people with arthritis and others with diminished hand strength, Fisher said in an interview.Clamshell packaging remains popular with retailers because the product is visible on both sides, it can be hung or freestanding, and it’s harder to shoplift since the package is bigger than the product inside. It’s much lighter than cardboard or other alternatives—saving energy during transport—cheaper to make, and more durable. The food industry accounts for more than 60 percent of all clamshell packaging.“There’s a huge variety of clamshell and blister packaging, “ says Sara Greasley, who runs a popular blog about packaging and works in the industry.Blister packs are usually a clear bubble of plastic mounted on a piece of cardboard. Batteries are still sold this way. But the terms are often used interchangeably, so it can be confusing, Greasley said. The type of clamshell packaging used is usually driven by the retailers, particularly volume buyers like the club stores (i.e. Costco) who have specific packaging requirements, she said. For example packaging may have to withstand shaking, crushing, and dropping tests to ensure there’s no damage.The enormous variety and abundance of plastic packaging turns out to be a big headache for the recycling industry. “It’s a big challenge,” acknowledges Steve Alexander, President of The Association of Plastic Recyclers.“Clamshells are usually made out of PET plastic, so they are highly recyclable,” says Alexander.There is big demand for recycled PET (Polyethylene terephthalate) content in new clamshells, particularly those used in the food industry. However, clamshells aren’t being recycled because they aren’t being collected, and if collected, most existing material recovery facilities can’t sort them out from the other materials. And if they can sort them, sticky labels or food residues can be a problem to remove, as is the cardboard backing on blister packs, he said.The public is increasingly buying products that are more sustainable—and come in appropriate packaging—at twice the rate of other products, a 2018 Neilson survey showed.Starting in August vendors on Amazon will have to meet waste-efficient packaging standards, including no clamshells or other plastic packaging for medium- and large-sized products, or face $1.99 chargeback per package, said Kim Houchens, director of customer packaging at Amazon.“Previously we paid vendors a dollar for each package that was redesigned for the e-commerce market,” Houchens says in an interview.Three things you can do to be part of the solution:1. Recycle clamshells, making sure to remove any stickers.2. Advocate for your recycling center to accept clamshells and other packaging if they don't already.3. Bring your own reusable containers to a restaurant for leftovers, or to-go orders.Over the past decade Amazon’s sustainable packaging initiatives have reduced Amazon’s packaging waste 16 percent; the overall reduction target is 25 percent, she said. To that end the company has developed a fully recyclable padded-paper envelope mailer to replace the ubiquitous yellow plastic-bubble envelopes.Multinational giants like PepsiCo, Coca Cola, and Walmart, and 400 others, have set ambitious recycling goals under the New Plastics Economy Global Commitment, started in 2018 by the Ellen MacArthur Foundation. The goal is a circular economy for plastic in which it never becomes waste; packaging is its first target. To that end companies have agreed to increase the amounts of recycled plastic used in packaging to an average of 25 percent by 2025, compared with the current global average of just 2 percent. That too is a big challenge, Alexander said.“To meet those goals we need 3.5 times more PET from what’s currently collected and sorted,” he says.Plastic bottles are also made of PET and are the primary source for recyclers. An investment of at least $3 billion in processing plants alone will be needed over the next decade to achieve companies' goals, according to a report by research and analysis firm Wood Mackenzie. That doesn’t include additional investments in collection or improved material recovery facilities.Only 50 percent of U.S. household have curbside collection, so how do recyclers get their hands on the material, Alexander asks. Less than five percent of plastics in the U.S. is recycled. The rest is landfilled, burnt or exported. In 2017 two billion pounds of plastic waste were sent to China and Hong Kong, the same year China said it will no longer accept it.So now shiploads of U.S. waste plastic are going to countries like Thailand, India, and Indonesia where most waste is mismanaged. And up to six times more plastic was burned in the U.S. in 2018 than was recycled. Burning plastic produces CO2 and can release toxins.“We need a sweeping discussion in this country on how to solve this problem,” says Alexander.Recycling aside, the reusability of the clamshell is what Lunsford, its inventor, claimed was its advantage over existing plastic packaging. But there in the store, I had a thick plastic heat-sealed clamshell in my hand, with a pair of $3 scissors securely trapped inside. They were sturdy scissors, good enough to open all manner of packages. But like Larry David did, I would have to destroy the package to get them out, rendering the clamshell worthless. Were they worth the effort and risk to somehow free them from their plastic prison?I put them back on the shelf.How your toothbrush became a part of the plastic crisisWhy carrying your own fork and spoon helps solve the plastic crisisThe sticky problem of plastic wrapCigarette butts are toxic plastic pollution. Should they be banned?How the plastic bottle went from miracle container to hated garbageHow tampons and pads became so unsustainableTires: The plastic polluter you never thought aboutCan medical care exist without plastic?Your shoes are made of plastic. Here’s why.",
"Around tables strewn with Exacto knives, bowls, cutting boards, tape, funnels, and bags of hemp powder, mushroom parts, and sugar, a dozen graduate students from the packaging and industrial-design departments at Pratt Institute, in Brooklyn, New York, brainstormed.Their brief? To create new forms of food packaging to replace the unsustainable designs upon which modern life seems to depend: single-use plastic beverage cups, lids, straws, and bottles.Focusing on the long-lived detritus that typically accompanies take-out meals, the students baked and 3D-printed straws made of sugar and agar—a gelatinous substance derived from seaweed. They hand-shaped bowls from mycelium, the threadlike roots of mushrooms. One team designed sheets of black plastic that folded into take-out containers (seen in image above) and could be returned to a collection point, sanitized, and reused ad infinitum by a consortium of take-out chains. Another duo crafted an ingenious paperboard box with a fold-it-yourself fork/spoon combo that diners tear from a perforated edge (above). When lunch is over, everything gets pitched into a compost bin, which in an ideal world is, of course, never far away.“We’re seeing a tremendous acceleration in the demand for packaging alternatives as the unintended consequences of plastics become more visible, both locally and globally,” says Kate Daly, of Closed Loop Partners, a social-impact investment fund that focuses on waste.Of the 78 million metric tons of plastic packaging produced globally each year, a mere 14 percent is recycled. Lightweight and floatable, plastic that escapes collection flows into our oceans—nine million tons annually—most of it from developing nations that lack the infrastructure to manage it. The problem is expected to get worse as those nations grow richer and inevitably start consuming more packaged foods, and as many others in an increasingly convenience-obsessed world continue to purchase meal-kit and grocery services—which generate considerable packaging—and take-out foods.More conscientious recycling would be a boon, but it’s no panacea. Recycling requires energy, water, and the transport of materials. Most recycled plastics get shredded, melted, and reformed into goods—like lumber, fleece, or carpeting—still eventually bound for landfills. Manufacturers continue to make bottles and shrink-wraps ever thinner, but the fact remains: plastics are made from nonrenewable resources, either oil or natural gas, and most never see a second life.But plastic is quite good at what it does, which makes replacing it so devilishly difficult. Plastic protects food over long journeys, guarding it against pressure, humidity, light, and the bacteria that accelerate rot. (Shrink-wrap a cucumber in polyethylene and its shelf life stretches from three days to 14. The wrap, however, may last more than a century.) Plastic is strong and clear, enabling consumers to see what they’re buying. And the feedstock for plastic is widely available and incredibly cheap. At least for now.Soon after the turn of the 20th century, food companies began using a flexible wrap called cellophane, made from plants. Chemists later imitated this bio-based polymer with polyvinyl chloride and later less toxic polyethylene, creating Saran Wrap. While cellophane was compostable, the oil-based films—and the rigid plastic containers that followed—were not. The stage was set for a throwaway future.In the 1970s, Capri Sun began pouring its juice drinks into gusseted pouches that weighed less than a plastic bottle of equivalent volume. Made of melded, ultrathin layers of plastic and aluminum foil, the pouches could be shipped flat—saving room—and they kept food fresh without refrigeration. Today the pouch is ubiquitous, holding everything from tuna to tomato paste, pet food to pickles. It’s estimated that Americans go through 92 billion pouches a year. But their end-of-life prospects are bleak. Pouches, it turns out, are kryptonite to recycling companies, which can’t separate their heterogenous layers.Often working together, designers, engineers, biologists, investors, and recyclers are now striving to develop packaging that falls within the mandates of what’s known as the circular economy.It’s a design framework that eschews the linear “take, make, waste” model that leads from oil well to refinery, manufacturing plant to supermarket, consumer to landfill. Instead, it envisions supply chains that continuously cycle old materials back into high-value products—with an emphasis on long-lasting design, remanufacturing, and reuse—and business models that favor sharing and leasing (washing machines, cars), rather than ownership. In the circular economy, material goods cycle in two separate loops. One recovers technical nutrients—like metals, minerals, and polymers—for reuse, and the other returns biological materials—fiber, wood—to nature through composting programs, or it converts them, through anaerobic digestion, to carbon-neutral energy.To imagine the packages of the future, many designers are looking to the past for inspiration. RISE, a Swedish research institute, has prototyped a nearly flat cellulose-based container that soup makers, for example, could fill with freeze-dried vegetables and spices. As diners add hot water, the container’s origami folds stretch into a full-fledged, and fully compostable, bowl. The Pratt students shaped a bowl from mycelium, which grows in a week and composts in less than a month.Harvard University’s Wyss Institute created “shrilk,” a low-cost, clear plastic that’s completely compostable. Made of chitosan, derived from shrimp shells, and a silk protein derived from insects, shrilk can be used to make film or rigid shapes. But it hasn’t yet found its way into food packaging, alas, because it requires manufacturers to tweak their machines.Of course, a compostable future depends upon universal access to—and consumer participation in—municipal compost systems, which collect organic materials for their conversion to fertilizer or energy. Hundreds of municipalities in the EU, Canada, and the U.S. are moving in this direction, but setting up a system can present a chicken-and-egg problem. In New York City, for example, the volume of available material far exceeds the capacity of nearby processors. But without a guarantee of that stream, investors are reluctant to build facilities.And then there’s the problem of human nature. Fred Skeberg, a Swedish product developer and founder of the food and design website Ateriet, once found himself at a music festival where vendors served food on “edible” corn starch-based plates, meant to be tossed into compost bins. But people assumed their bowls and plates would disappear in nature, Skeberg says, “and they threw it everywhere. So that backfired.” As the United Nations soberly noted in a report, “Labelling a product as biodegradable may be seen as a technical fix that removes responsibility from the individual.”Until systems and people are in sync, a great deal of compostable packaging will end up in landfills, where it can generate greenhouse gases. If compostables mistakenly land in recycling plants—many plant-based plastics resemble their oil-based cousins—they’re considered a contaminant. And if they drift into the ocean? Compostable plastics are designed to degrade at temperatures around 135°F and with exposure to ultraviolet light. Since degradables are heavier than oil-based plastics, they are likely to sink and linger for many years.Considering these challenges, some designers prefer to stick with plastics, since recycling systems are, in the developed world at least, already established. More than thirty different plastics are currently used in packaging, but some innovators are on the hunt for a single polymer group, a super-plastic that meets a multitude of performance requirements, is affordable for manufacturers, demands few changes in machinery, is widely accepted by municipal recycling systems, and easily converted into new packaging. But so far this product remains elusive.Meanwhile, some designers are intent on eliminating disposable packaging altogether. Consider the plastic straw: Starbucks committed to phasing it out by 2020, in favor of an elongated sipping spout on a lid. The new lid will weigh more than the old, but a larger chunk of plastic is more likely to make it through a recycling plant.The same idea—doing without—could apply to pasta, commonly packaged in a recyclable paperboard box fronted by a nonrecyclable plastic window. “Just because materials exist, you don’t have to add them,” says Dayna Baumeister, cofounder of the consultancy Biomimicry 3.8. “Why can’t we accept a photo of the pasta, as we do with dry cereal, and get rid of the window?”Or perhaps the entire package? The U.S. company MonoSol produces a range of transparent ethylene-based polymers that dissolve in water. Most commonly used for dishwasher or laundry pods, the polymer can also be safely used to contain food, according to European and U.S. regulators, and has no effect on smell, texture, or taste (unless flavorings are added). The food-service industry is already using melt-away packaging: MonoSol envisions a future where retail portions of hot cocoa, oatmeal, rice, pasta, or other foods cooked with hot water are commonplace.Similarly, the Swedish design studio Tomorrow Machine developed a line of food packaging, dubbed “This Too Shall Pass,” that includes a small bottle of cooking oil made from caramelized sugar coated with wax. The bottle is cracked like an egg to release the oil, and the wax shell can be composted (but don’t hold your breath: it takes years for wax to break down). For refrigerated liquids, the firm designed a pouch from seaweed, claiming it will “wither at the same rate as its contents.” For rice and other dry goods, it fashioned a pyramid-shaped package made of colored beeswax, to be peeled open like an orange. The designs attracted a great deal of attention for their beauty and hopefulness, but they remain, at this point, merely concepts.As part of his “Disappearing Package” thesis project, New York-based designer Aaron Mickelson eliminated the outer container and plastic shrink wrap of boxed tea bags by impermanently gluing the bags into an accordion-style book. The user tears off one tea bag at a time, and the book eventually shrinks to nothing.Loliware, based in the U.S., makes FDA-approved edible (and therefore compostable) cups from seaweed mixed with organic sweeteners, flavors, and colorants. Containing 135 calories each can hold cold or room-temperature drinks, and cost a dollar apiece. Like ice cream cones, they come with a paper sleeve, “to make the user comfortable,” says Chelsea Briganti, Loliware’s cofounder. The company also makes a kelp-based edible straw. In talks with major food and beverage retailers, Loliware is rapidly scaling up, with plans to lower its price and replace a billion plastic straws a year.Inspired by the way nature separates insides from outsides—think grape skins—scientists are experimenting with edible membranes to contain liquids. The startup Skipping Rocks Lab created a package-free swig of water, dubbed Ooho, by dipping ice balls into extracts of plants and brown seaweed, which form a water-tight membrane. The consumer bites the ball, releasing a few swallows of cold water, then swallows the membrane itself. The balls will be produced by a compact machine at their point of sale, eliminating the need for cups.Harvard University’s David Edwards created his own version of edible skin, called WikiCells, using fruit and other organic molecules to coat single-bite balls of soft, perishable products. Stonyfield used the technology on its Frozen Yogurt Pearls, which debuted in 2014, but sales were tepid and the pearls disappeared. “It was a great attempt,” Stonyfield CEO Gary Hirshberg says. “But consumers found grabbing an unwrapped product incomprehensible, even though they could wash it.” (The company is experimenting now with bamboo-based yogurt cups, which degrade in backyard compost piles, an advance over materials that compost only in industrial facilities.)Today, WikiCells can be found encircling PerfectlyFree fruit snacks. But consumers don’t pluck these products from bulk containers: the snacks come in nonrecyclable plastic pouches or trays. “We have tried some products with a very minimalist packaging design,” says Marty Kolewe, director of research and development at IncredibleFoods, which owns PerfectlyFree, “but it turns out that consumers—and also the business infrastructure surrounding food distribution—is a ways off from accepting truly package-less products.”Ultra-packaged meal-kit delivery services, which ship ingredients and recipes for a single meal, are a $1.2 billion market that some analysts expect to more than quadruple by 2023. But it’s accompanied by mountains of non-recyclable or hard-to-recycle ice packs, bubble film, and Styrofoam packaging.A three-year-old company called Temperpack has responded to one part of this waste challenge with a completely recyclable insulated shipping box that eliminates the need for expanded polystyrene packing peanuts, which are made from oil and gas and aren’t welcome in recycling plants.How does the Temperpack—which is used by the nation’s largest meal-kit company—keep a camembert from getting squished or from melting? Its layers of Kraft paper are stuffed with Climacell, a bio-based foam that melts to cellulosic fiber, alongside the box itself, inside a pulping plant. According to Temperpack, manufacturing Climacell foam generates one tenth the greenhouse gases generated by making polystyrene peanuts. But an enormous amount of nonrecyclable waste remains: one industry investigation of three different mail-order meals revealed a total of 72 plastic packages, of which just 23 could be recycled.While designers and psychologists struggle to resolve these issues, governments can also institute policies to reduce packaging waste, such as imposing higher taxes on fossil fuels used to make single-use plastics. They can enact minimum recycled-content laws, which require manufacturers to make new stuff from old, and require deposits on packaging, to ensure more of it is recovered for reuse. And, of course, they can ban single-use plastics—including bags, straws, and cups.Some retailers are already on it: Ekoplaza, a supermarket in the Netherlands, devotes an aisle to more than 700 “plastic-free” offerings, wrapped or contained in cardboard, metal, glass or certified compostable plastic. And the British retailer Iceland plans to eliminate plastic from all its own-branded products within five years, in favor of returnable glass bottles, paper and pulp trays, and plastics, like cellulose, that are compostable.Some critics say a far better solution would be challenging individuals to adopt a radically different model of consumption: one that doesn’t involve any single-use packaging.MIWA, a Czech packaging and delivery system that won Ellen MacArthur Foundation’s Circular Design Challenge, seems to fulfill this mandate. After ordering food using the MIWA app, producers and wholesalers place their items– whether cookies, chopped liver, or celery—in durable, reusable containers and capsules, then deliver them to nearby stores or consumers’ homes. When the capsules are empty, MIWA collects, sanitizes, and returns them to producers who refill them.MIWA is, so far, a thought experiment, but it points to solutions already in play today: bringing washable bags and jars to shops that sell bulk foods or are willing to slice provolone and salami into your containers; shopping at farmers markets for naked cucumbers; buying beer in refillable growlers; and eschewing convenience foods wherever possible.“Technology isn’t going to get us out of our waste conundrum,” says Dayna Baumeister. “Human psychology has to change. At some point, you just have to say enough is enough.”",
"At a plastics goods store in Hong Kong, plastic straws are kept in plastic packaging.At the beginning of July 2018, Seattle became the largest U.S. city to ban plastic straws.They’re not alone.Starbucks plans to phase out plastic straws by 2020. McDonald’s recently announced it will ban plastic straws at its U.K. and Ireland restaurants. Bon Appétit Management, a food service company with 1,000 U.S. locations, announced last May it will phase out plastic straws. Alaska Airlines will be one of the first airlines to phase out plastic straws and stirrers, in part thanks to an environmentally conscious girl scout.These groups are responding to public outcry demanding action against a product that, on one hand, seems very simple—but which is harming the world’s oceans, experts warn.In just the U.S. alone, one estimate suggests 500 million straws are used every single day. One study published earlier this year estimated as many as 8.3 billion plastic straws pollute the world's beaches.Eight million tons of plastic flow into the ocean every year, and straws comprise just 0.025 percent of that.  But that hasn't stopped the straw from becoming the major focus of recent environmental campaigns. This is in part because, for most able-bodied people, the straw is something you can easily do without. Eliminating plastic straw usage rarely requires a drastic change in behavior.  But if they're so easy to do without, how did they become so ubiquitous in the first place? (Read more about efforts to reduce plastic straws.)While plastic straws are a recent invention, humans have been using hollow, cylindrical tubes to bring liquid to their lips for centuries. Ancient Sumerians, one of the first societies known to brew beer—5,000 years ago—submerged long, thin tubes made from precious metals into large jars to reach the liquid sitting below fermentation byproducts.  A man named Marvin Stone was the first to file a patent for a drinking straw, in 1888 . The Smithsonian Institute cites a widely touted legend saying Stone was drinking a mint julep on a hot summer day in 1880 when his piece of rye grass, then used as a straw, began to disintegrate. Stone, a paper cigarette holder manufacturer, decided he could make something better.  He wrapped strips of paper around a pencil, glued them together, and soon had an early prototype of paper drinking straws. He patented his design in 1888, and by 1890, his factory Stone Industrial (today a part of Precision Products Group) was mass producing them.  It wasn't until the 1930s that straws gained the ability to bend. Watching his daughter struggle to easily reach her milkshake through a straight paper straw, inventor Joseph Friedman inserted a screw into the straw, wrapped floss around the screw's grooves, and took out the screw. With indentations, the straw could easily bend without breaking. Friedman patented his invention and created the Flex-Straw Company to churn out his design.  Hospitals were among the first to embrace bendable straws, because they allowed patients to drink while lying in bed.In the decades that followed, the popular paper straw found its way into sodas and milkshakes across America.Americans were still embracing paper straws when plastic manufacturing began to take hold.First invented in 1870 by an American named John Wesley Hyatt, the first plastic products were made from a material called celluloid that imitated animal products like ivory. Other plastic compounds took hold in the following decades: Bakelite was used for household items, nylon for stockings, and acrylic in military planes.Both durable and cheap, plastic was being churned out of factories at unprecedented rates during the second world war. When the conflict ended, American manufacturers needed a new consumer market. In her book Plastic: A Toxic Love Story, science writer Susan Freinkel describes a wartime plastic production infrastructure suddenly devoid of wartime plastic to produce. Manufacturers turned their attention to a growing market for cheap consumer goods. No longer bogged down by wartime frugality, Americans wanted more and at lower costs.“Thanks to plastics, newly flush Americans had a never-ending smorgasbord of affordable goods to choose from,” writes Freinkel.Straws were among the many throw-away products being rapidly manufactured by large corporations. Plastic straws quickly became cheaper to produce and more durable than paper. They could easily wedge between the crosshairs of a fast food restaurant’s to-go lid without ripping or tearing.Throughout the 1960s, the manufacturing infrastructure to mass produce plastic straws was put into place.  In 1969, Friedman’s Flex-Straw Company was sold to the Maryland Cup Corporation. The Baltimore-based company produced a wide variety of plastic items and soon became one of the country’s largest producers of plastic straws. The Fort Howard Corporation bought the Maryland Cup Corporation in 1983 and continued producing the plastic product.“It was better, it was cheaper, and they didn’t fall apart,” says David Rhodes, the global business director for paper straw manufacturer Aardvark Straws, a division of Precision Products Group. “It truly was a better product at a cheaper price, and in that era, no one looked at the future impact it would have on our environment.”New takes on the plastic straw, like jumbo straws and crazy straws, were produced in the 1980s.  A number of large manufacturers met the demands of a society increasingly looking for convenient items that could be taken on-the-go. Plastics Europe, one of the world’s largest plastic producers, reports that 1.5 million tons of plastic were produced in 1950, but by 2015, the world was producing 322 million tons of plastic.The world is now struggling to recover from its plastic pollution hangover.  Corporations, municipalities, and even national governments are proposing and implementing bans on plastic straws. Some companies have jumped into the fray by manufacturing metal and glass straws that environmentally conscious consumers can buy for personal use, though they lack the disposability of paper and plastic from which restaurants benefit.  The same businesses that once benefitted from public excitement over plastic are increasingly feeling public pressure to use alternatives.  Steve Russell is the vice president of plastics for the American Chemistry Council (ACC), a trade organization that represents plastics manufacturers, among other industries. He says regulation that focuses just on straws, or any one specific product, misses the point.  “The focus on individual products takes our focus away from more necessary discussions on how we bring waste management to places that need it the most desperately,” he says. “We think it would be better if straws weren't automatically provided but available should a consumer need one.”  Russell says the ACC is focused on waste collection as the best way to prevent more plastic refuse from entering the ocean.  Environmental groups, however, say plastic straw bans are an important step toward their ultimate goal: ending the circulation of single-use plastic.  “It's taking a stand on plastic pollution... and really taking a stand on what needs to happen, a ban on all single-use plastic products,” Greenpeace's Kate Melges told Seattle news station KIRO 7 after the city's straw ban went into effect on July 1.Rhodes believes that plastic straws will one day be an anomaly. When Aardvark Straws was created in 2007, he says it was in part because of a demand from zoos, aquariums, and cruise ships that wanted to promote an eco-friendly image to their customers.He thinks cost is the only thing standing between plastic straws and extinction.“There’s no getting around that a paper straw will cost about a penny more than a plastic straw,” he says. For large corporations, that equals hundreds of millions of dollars, but the cost to the marine environment, you can’t put a price on that.”Learn more about what National Geographic is doing to reduce single-use plastic.",
"Plastic straws jut from cocktails at a resort on the island of Nosy Mitsio, Madagascar. Hotels and resorts are increasingly banning single-use plastics like these straws.In 2015, a disturbing video of an olive ridley sea turtle suffering from a plastic straw stuck in its nose went viral, changing many viewers’ attitudes toward the plastic tool that is largely a convenience for most people.But how can the plastic straw—a diminutive item used briefly before being thrown away—cause so much damage? For starters, it easily finds its way into oceans due to its lightweight nature. Once there, it does not biodegrade. Instead, it slowly fragments into smaller and smaller pieces known as microplastics, which are frequently mistaken for food by marine animals.Secondly, it can’t be recycled. “Unfortunately, most plastic straws are too lightweight to make it through mechanical recycling sorters, so they end up in landfills and waterways and, eventually, our oceans,” explains Dune Ives, executive director of Lonely Whale. The nonprofit facilitated the successful Strawless in Seattle marketing campaign supporting the Strawless Ocean initiative.In the United States, we dispose of millions of plastic straws each day. In the U.K., at least 4.4 billion straws are estimated to be thrown away annually. Hotels are some of the worst offenders: Hilton Waikoloa Village, which became the first resort on the island of Hawaii to eliminate plastic straws earlier this year, used more than 800,000 straws in 2017.Of course, straws are just part of the monumental waste that goes into our oceans. “Over the last 10 years, we have produced more plastic than in the whole of the last century, and 50 percent of the plastic we use is single-use and is immediately thrown away,” says Tessa Hempson, operations manager for Oceans Without Borders, a newly launched foundation from luxury safari company &Beyond. “One million seabirds and 100,000 marine mammals are killed annually from plastic in our oceans. Forty-four percent of all seabird species, 22 percent of whales and dolphins, all sea turtle species, and a growing list of fish species have been documented with plastic in or around their bodies.”But now, the plastic straw has finally started to become an endangered species itself, with some cities in the United States (Seattle, Washington; Miami Beach and Fort Myers Beach, Florida; and Malibu, Davis, and San Luis Obispo, California) banning them, and some countries limiting single-use plastic items, which include straws. Belize, Taiwan, and England are among the latest countries to propose bans.Still, a company doesn’t have to wait for the government to institute a ban before implementing one on its own. Soneva banned straws in 2008, and Cayuga has been using bamboo straws since 2010. Hotels like these have paved the way for a movement and the travel and hospitality industries are finally starting to catch on.Hotel brands initiating plastic straw bans include Four Seasons, AccorHotels North and Central America, Marriott International in the U.K., EDITION hotels, the Doyle Collection, Six Senses, Taj Hotels Palaces Resorts Safaris, Experimental Group, and Anantara. Cruise lines and tour companies including Carnival, Hurtigruten, Peregrine Adventures, and Coral Expeditions have reduced or eliminated their use of plastic straws on their ships. And luxury safari companies like &Beyond and Wilderness Safaris are both working toward removing plastic straws from their lodges.While individual actions can have a significant impact on the enviornment and influence in the industry, a ban from a single hotel chain can remove millions of straws in a single year. Ananatra and AVANI estimate their hotels across Asia used 2.49 million straws in 2017 and AccorHotels estimates using 4.2 million straws in the U.S. and Canada last year as well.“Plastic straws are one of the worst offenders in terms of plastic pollution. By putting in alternatives and eliminating their use across &Beyond’s lodges, we are doing our part to keep plastic out of the oceans,” says Hempson.While not using a straw is best, some people prefer them or need them, like those with disabilities or sensitive teeth or gums. If you want to use a straw, reusable metal or glass straws are ideal. Final Straw, which claims to be the first collapsible reusable straw, is currently raising funds through Kickstarter.Hospitality brands eliminating plastic straws have looked to various disposable alternatives. Paper is popular, with many U.S. establishments using Aardvark to supply American-made, FDA-approved straws that take 30 to 60 days to decompose. Another choice is compostable straws made from PLA (polylactic acid), a plant-based bioplastic made from materials like cornstarch instead of petroleum. These straws are compostable under the proper conditions but do not break down in water.A more creative option is uncooked pasta, which is currently being used at Paradise Cove Beach Café in Malibu and tested by Terranea Resort in Rancho Palos Verdes, California. At the Taj Exotica Resort & Spa, Andamans, bamboo straws and stirrers are used.And some establishments are using actual straw as straws, just like when straws first came into use. The Mandrake Hotel in London offers straws made from rye stems, which they get from German company Bio-Strohhalme.“Most people just don’t think about the effects the simple act of reaching [for] or accepting a plastic straw has on their lives and the lives of generations to come,” says David Laris, chief creative officer and chef at Cachet Hospitality Group, which does not use plastic straws. “The hospitality industry has an obligation to begin reducing the amount of plastic waste it generates.”In recent weeks, organizations continue to ban or reduce the use of plastic straws. Including McDonalds, Royal Caribbean, and Alaska Airlines.This article originally published on May 16, 2018. It has been updated to reflect new announcements in the industry.Devorah Lev-Tov is a food and travel writer based in Brooklyn; find her on Instagram @devoltv.",
"A zero-waste store in Nantes, France, where plastic packaging is off the menu.Brooklyn, New YorkAt Precycle, an airy grocery store in Brooklyn’s Bushwick neighborhood, shoppers can find spices and fruit, grains and pastas, fresh olives and tofu, toothbrushes and floss, and many other household basics. What they won’t find? Plastic.Precycle is one in an expanding cohort of grocery stores that use little, if any, plastic packaging. As awareness of our ever-growing plastic pollution problem has swelled, some shoppers have looked for places where they can buy food free from the cling wrap and Styrofoam trays that fill many modern grocery stores.In the last few years, more and more plastic-free food stores have opened their doors, springing up from Hong Kong to Germany to Ecuador. These stores are testing the models that grocers have long relied on, searching for ways to de-plasticize both the food supply chain and their customers’ carts.“I opened the store because I had this little blister on my brain telling me there was a different way to do things,” says Katerina Bogatireva, the founder and owner of Precycle. Once she saw how pervasive plastic was in her life, she wanted to do something to help herself and others break free from it.“It was like I was dropped in the middle of the sea and I couldn’t see the coast, but I had to swim forward toward a solution,” she says. And what she came up with was a plastic-free grocery store.Plastic is ubiquitous in most grocery stores, so common it’s almost invisible.But the moments when its presence is felt can be dramatic. The internet erupted in outrage in 2016 when Whole Foods packed pre-peeled oranges in plastic containers. A few months later, it erupted again when a Canadian company marketed pre-halved avocados, the green hemispheres individually vacuum-sealed in a thick layer of plastic. “The avocado comes in its own NATURAL PACKAGING,” typed commenters on Reddit. “What kind of person would do this?” typed others.Others defended the moves, saying, like plastic straws, the pre-peeled oranges and avocados can be important resources for people with disabilities and mobility issues. People with arthritic hands often struggle to peel oranges, for example.But avocado fiasco was, in some ways, the logical outcome of a long, complicated story about something else: Food waste.Plastic food packaging established its reign over the modern grocery store because it served a crucial purpose in preserving perishable food items for much longer than their natural life.A cucumber, picked even a little early, only lasts about two weeks maximum. But wrap that same cucumber in an impermeable plastic sleeve and the decay slows down. In the cutthroat world of grocery stores, where profit margins are thin and every bruised apple that doesn’t sell represents a loss, that extended life makes a big difference.Plastic took over because it was cheap, light, and convenient. As supply chains daisy-linked longer and longer, the weight and size of a package became more critical, so a quart of milk encased in a few-ounce plastic jug was better, shipping-costs-wise, than that same quart glugging in a hefty, breakable glass bottle. Produce, carefully nestled into specially molded plastic trays, stacked in light, sturdy plastic crates, and loaded on cheap, sturdy plastic pallets, could survive weeks rather than days.At the same time, consumer behavior also changed. With the advent of refrigerators, shoppers shifted away from buying just what they needed for a day or two and started shopping for a week or more. And where cars were abundant, shoppers could buy more—not just what they could carry but what they could load into trunks and backseats.Taken together, it meant that consumers were looking for products that would last longer. Airtight plastic packaging helped that happen.The trickle of plastic food packaging, though, is now a deluge. Packaging makes up nearly a quarter of all the trash that goes to U.S. landfills, according to the EPA—and much, if not most of that waste, was at some point attached to a food or beverage item.But, “packaging plays an important role in helping to protect food, so getting rid of it all is not the answer,” says Liz Goodwin, the director of the food loss and waste program at the World Resources Institute. “Unfortunately, it's not as simple as that.”What’s a shopper—or a store manager—to do?“Like with almost anything sustainability related, the model is both something very new and innovative and also something that draws from things that have been around for a long time,” says Elizabeth Balkan, the director of the food waste program at the Natural Resources Defense Council. “There have been local health food stores and co-ops around the country for 30 or 40 years that have been placing bulk food at the center of their commerce.”For Bogatireva of Precycle, the challenge was to figure out how much plastic snaked through normal supply chains and into the hands of consumers—and then get rid of it. Providing bulk foods that customers can scoop into their own containers to take home was a central concept.But she also looked upstream. It wasn’t enough for her that customers didn’t see the plastic, if it was just lurking behind the scenes, secretly peeled off before their eyes could land on it.Plastic-wrapped fruits and veggies were a no-no, so produce would have to come from local sources who could deliver bushels of apples in reusable crates. Then, she tried to find tofu that didn’t come in a throwaway plastic container. No luck, for individually sized blocks. Eventually, she linked up with a manufacturer who will deliver big blocks of tofu in a five-gallon bucket that they’ll pick up after it’s emptied and refill. So there’s still some plastic in the chain—but it’s far from single-use.The other part of the challenge was helping her customers maintain a sense of ease and convenience. It’s better if they come in with their own empty jars to fill or egg cartons to re-stock, but if they don’t, she has ones they can pick up. Since the produce options she has are often dependent on what the farmers bring in, there’s a shelf of cookbooks to browse for ideas.“It’s learning to think about shopping in a different way,” she says.At bigger stores, the drive to slim down the plastic footprint is also taking hold, if less comprehensively.Kroger, which operates over 2,700 grocery stores across the U.S., recently began to phase out plastic bags from their various chains. The impact adds up fast, says Jessica Adelman, the vice president of corporate affairs for Kroger. The company calculated that they handed out about 6 billion plastic bags a year, about six percent of the total number of bags distributed annually across the country. That’s the equivalent of about 32,000 tons of plastic, or enough to fill over 3,000 moving trucks jam packed with bags.Trader Joe’s has also begun the process of peering into its supply chain to peel away unnecessary plastic use. Matt Sloan, VP of marketing for Trader Joe's, is realistic about how much work it will take to de-plasticize the grocery business. Think about a tea bag, he explains. There’s plastic in that packaging that lets the tea stay fresh for months. But the biodegradable or bio-sourced plastic alternatives aren’t yet good enough to maintain that same freshness, so changing the packaging would disrupt the product, and lead to more waste.Each change seems like it should be simple, Sloan says. But, “we're at a point where we understand the practical realities to be so underdeveloped” for both alternatives to traditional plastic packaging and to recycling solutions that even the smallest changes can generate big, cascading challenges.“We’re often running down this path and then hitting the proverbial wall, and I think we’re getting to the fascinating and frustrating point where we’re understanding there's no simple thing that has in it the all-encompassing solution.”But more awareness and pressure from consumers will keep the projects moving forward, says Balkan of NRDC.“There's been some really powerful shifts in consumer awareness around single-use items, straws and bags lately,” says Balkan. “People are starting to see that the dependence we've formed on these things—we can undo it, if we wish to. And not having them—it might not make our lives any harder or more complicated; it could even make them much better.”",
"Jesse Heideman works for Compost Pedallers, which got its start when one Austin entrepreneur saw an opportunity in organic waste. Heideman is on a 43-house run to collect vegetable scraps, crayons, eggshells, and more—his cargo bicycle can haul up to 800 pounds. He and other cyclists reach out to some 700 homes and businesses each week.Austin residents and businesses are pitching in to put their leftovers to good use. And there are plenty to go around: Austin annually wastes more than 190 million pounds of food, worth at least $200 million.Those numbers are big, but they’re not out of line with national trends—some 40 percent of food in the nation goes to waste. Put in plain terms, that’s enough to fill a 90,000-seat stadium each day. (Read about how food waste adds up.)Austin is aiming for “zero waste”—a 90 percent reduction of materials sent to landfills and incinerators—by 2040, a goal set by a handful of other U.S. cities.As part of that initiative, a new ordinance requires large-scale restaurants, grocery stores, and hotels to divert their organic waste from landfills. Business must now find a use for food waste, or risk fines. (Smaller food-service companies would need to comply by October 2018.)“When we pay to bring food into the city, then pay again to dispose of our food waste, we pay twice,” says Robert Young, a University of Texas at Austin professor and recycling expert. “Instead of a win-win, it’s a lose-lose.”For many, the answer is in donation. Austin City Limits, one of the city’s signature festivals, gives all leftover food to the Central Texas Food Bank. Of the 38 million pounds the food bank distributed last year, more than half was “rescued” from being wasted. This year the festival contributed over 300 pounds of meat, 800 pounds of produce, and 1,300 pounds of breads and pastries.At the other end of the spectrum, a solution can even involve the minutiae of a knife: Grocer Whole Foods, headquartered in Austin, cuts fish so that it can use the extra parts in soup.Both fall within what experts call the “hierarchy” of food waste disposal, from the most preferred method (reduce the volume of food generated) to the least preferred (landfill or incineration). Here’s how Austin is handling the levels in-between.Johnson’s Backyard Garden, the largest organic farm in Texas, helps customers avoid what owner Brenton Johnson calls “veggie shame,” from letting produce expire. The farm offers downsized CSA boxes along with storage tips and recipes. As for getting customers to buy "inglorious vegetables"—produce that’s less than perfect—Johnson says "it’s an uphill battle.” The farm has found more willing takers in local companies that make juice, pizza, and salsa.Businesses and households alike struggle with buying the right amount of food. Austin start-up Full Fridge, a fledgling meal-delivery service, tackles this problem on two fronts: “Full Fridge came about because, basically, we were seeing a lot of people not knowing how to cook,” says co-founder Mokshika Sharma. In her own household, she and her roommates would buy groceries, then not know what to do with them, and end up discarding a lot, an issue that plagues many busy students and professionals. Her business hopes to end that problem by providing ready-made meals for only five dollars each. Sharma and her partners also minimize waste by stopping sales two days before delivery, so the chef and shopper can plan precisely. “When we cook food, we make sure we only buy ingredients for the amount of customers that we have,” she says.Chef Jesse Griffiths of Dai Due curbs food waste at the outset by purchasing food more conservatively and using more animal and plant parts than other restaurants might. And he doesn’t mind changing the menu multiple times during a single dinner service to reflect sold-out items. (Read about this Bon Appétit-awarded chef and his philosophy of food.)Snap Kitchen, a chain known for gluten-free, healthy fare, has several locations in Austin and provides up to a hundred meals every day to Keep Austin Fed. These will nourish some middle school students (and their families) who don’t have enough nutritious food to eat.Lisa Barden, program director for Keep Austin Fed, collects food nearing its expiration date. Her group gathers 55,000 pounds of food each month, the equivalent of 42,000 meals. Her challenge isn’t in receiving food—it’s in finding volunteers to distribute it.It isn’t easy to connect people who have too much food with those who don’t have enough—about 18% of the population in Austin’s Travis County. But that’s the mission of Keep Austin Fed, a volunteer-driven nonprofit. Program director Lisa Barden says the organization saves some 50,000 pounds of food from being wasted every month. Its roster of donors includes grocers like Whole Foods and Trader Joe’s, prepared-food retail stores, and any office or caterer that finds itself with extra food.One of some 200 Keep Austin Fed volunteers—often before work or on their own lunch hours—drives a personal vehicle to pick up donated food, pack it into coolers and deliver it to a site like Arbor Terrace, an apartment building for people transitioning from homelessness. “Usually their residents are standing out in the hall, waiting for the food to get there,” says Barden.(Read about how Austin is adapting to a new food future.)Aus­tin’s 24,000 chickens divert more than 1,000 tons of food from landfills each year. This one belongs to the Community First! Village, a 27-acre site with a farm and a free weekly produce market for its limited-income residents.Austin’s 24,000 chickens are widely touted as one of the city’s best tools for combatting food waste: Chickens will eat most any produce scrap and turn it into nutrient-rich eggs.But one-time Austin bartender Robert Nathan Allen has another idea: Feed waste to flies, then feed the fly larvae to chickens. Black soldier flies will eat much more than chickens do—just about any food scrap, including bones and meat as well as vegetable trimmings. “With the soldier fly larvae, we’re able to up-cycle that food waste,” says Nathan. “It’s really one of nature’s perfect decomposers.”Through his nonprofit, Little Herds, he’s working on a decentralized system, by which an urban farmer raises the grubs on his own land, in a specialized container, thereby making his own chicken feed. It could help small farmers avoid expensive organic feeds that easily gobble up a slim profit margin. Ultimately Nathan plans to pick up waste from restaurants and deliver it—along with soldier fly eggs—to farms as part of his service. “We’re really talking about table-to-farm,” he says.Jesse Heideman does his part for Austin’s goal to achieve “zero waste”—a 90 percent reduction of materials sent to landfills and incinerators—by 2040. Through Compost Pedallers, he collects bags of organic material from customers once a week, delivering the neighborhood haul to a compost pile at a local garden.Compost Pedallers simply follows the food: Next week employees will cycle in the wake of 20,000 runners in Austin’s Turkey Trot, a charitable Thanksgiving footrace. Last year the event yielded some 1,500 pounds of banana peels, napkins, and leftover muffin parts in only two hours.Austin’s restaurants and grocery stores typically contract with composting companies to dispose of much of their food waste, then sell it as fertilizer. To combat waste at the residential level, the city is piloting a curbside compost pickup program that currently serves 14,000 households.Meanwhile, one entrepreneur is filling in the gaps with bicycle-powered compost collection. “The average American is making about five pounds of trash a day,” says Dustin Fedako, who launched his company, Compost Pedallers, in 2012. “A third of that or more is compostable.”His team rides bicycles fitted with trailers and fill them at some 700 homes and businesses with everything from avocado peels to coffee grounds, dirty tissues, and broken crayons. They deliver their haul to area farms and community gardens, each bike ferrying up to 800 pounds.“We play the dot-connecter,” says Fedako, “getting the material from those of us who are making it to the people in the community who use it as a resource to grow more food, and to grow better quality food.”Follow Austin-based author Beth Goulart Monson on Twitter.This article is part of our Urban Expeditions series, an initiative made possible by a grant from United Technologies to the National Geographic Society.",
"At first, years ago, it was just an occasional piece of plastic trash that Kahi Pacarro, the founder of Sustainable Coastlines Hawaii, picked up on the beach cleanups he organized around the state. A straw here, a takeout container there. But one day Pacarro spotted something particularly surprising in the beach detritus: a toothbrush.Now, in any given Hawaii beach cleanup, he says, it’s not uncommon to pick up 20 or even 100 toothbrushes.The reason is simple. The total number of plastic toothbrushes being produced, used, and thrown away each year has grown steadily since the first one was made in the 1930s.“I like to ask people, what’s the first thing you touch in the morning? It’s probably your toothbrush,” says Pacarro. “Do you want the first thing you touch every day to be plastic?”For centuries, the basic toothbrush was made from natural materials. But during the early 20th century, the giddy early days of plastic innovation, manufacturers started substituting nylon and other plastics into the design—and never looked back.Plastic has so fully infiltrated toothbrush design that it’s nearly impossible to clean our teeth without touching a polymer. And because plastic is essentially indestructible, that means nearly every single toothbrush made since the 1930s is still out there in the world somewhere, living on as a piece of trash.Now, some designers are looking for ways to reimagine this crucial, classic object in a way that puts less stress on the planet. But to find solutions to the toothbrush conundrum, we have to understand how we got here.It turns out people really love having clean teeth. In MIT’s 2003 Lemelson Innovation Index survey, the toothbrush rated higher than cars, personal computers, or cellphones as the innovation respondents couldn’t live without.Humans have apparently felt this way for a very long time. Archaeologists have found “tooth sticks” in Egyptian tombs. The Buddha chewed sticks into fluffy-ended scrubbers to clean his teeth. The Roman author Pliny the Elder noted that “it makes teeth firm to pick them with a porcupine quill,” and the Roman poet Ovid proclaimed that it was a good idea to wash the teeth each morning.Tooth care even occupied the mind of the reigning Chinese emperor Hongzhi in the late 1400s, who designed something that looked a lot like the brush we know today. It featured a short, dense pack of boar bristles, shaved off the neck of a hog, set into a bone or wood handle.That simple design endured, essentially unchanged, for centuries—but not for everyone. Boar bristles and bone handles were fancy, expensive materials, meaning that only the wealthy could afford brushes. Everyone else had to make do with chew sticks, scraps of cloth, their fingers, or nothing at all. As late as the early 1920s, only an estimated one in four people in the United States owned a toothbrush.It wasn’t until late in the 19th century that the concept of tooth care for everyone, rich and poor alike, started to trickle into the public consciousness. One of the drivers of that transition was war.Around the time of the American Civil War in the mid-1800s, guns were loaded one shot at a time, with powder and bullets that had been pre-wrapped in twists of heavy paper. Soldiers needed to tear the twists open with their teeth, but many potential fighters lacked even the six well-anchored opposing teeth to rip the paper apart. This was obviously a problem.The few dentists serving the Union Army despaired at the state of the teeth around them, but dental care failed to take hold as a priority for the North. The Confederate Army, in contrast, conscripted a cadre of dentists who stressed preventative care; one army dentist pushed the message so successfully that soldiers in his unit shoved their toothbrushes in their buttonholes, readily available at all times.It took two more major military mobilizations to get toothbrushes into nearly every bathroom. By the advent of World War I, the U.S. military recognized that they had a problem, a variant on the cartridge-ripping issue from the Civil War. The otherwise healthy young men they wanted to recruit into service needed six healthy opposing teeth in order to eat the tough, dry military rations. Young man after young man failed that test.“It’s a little unbelievable, looking from today’s vantage point,” says Alyssa Picard, a historian and the author of Making the American Mouth. “[The military] had a standard, and it’s pretty basic—have six teeth in your mouth so you can chew—and people are not meeting those standards. People who would otherwise be available for fighting? Off the list.”By World War II, soldiers were instructed in the care and keeping of teeth; dentists were embedded in battalions and toothbrushes were handed out to troops. And when the fighters came home, they brought their tooth-brushing habits with them.Simultaneously, across the country cultural expectations around teeth were changing. Bad teeth, dentists believed, could be signs of disease, poor nutrition, and general disregard for personal hygiene. “[Dentists] saw themselves as the ministers of the health-care process,” says Picard—not just caretakers of the mouth, but of the whole body, and even of the public health writ large.Dental experts started framing the question of dental care as a social, moral, and even patriotic issue. Public campaigns touting the benefits of healthy teeth spread across the country. “If bad teeth could be prevented,” one dentist opined in 1904, “the gain to the state and individual would be of tremendous value, as it is wonderful how many diseases can be traced indirectly to bad teeth.”In many cases those campaigns were targeted at poor, immigrant, or otherwise marginalized populations. Dental hygiene was often wielded as a way to “Americanize” communities the primarily white dental professionals at the time saw as not fully assimilated into the dominant culture, according to Picard.“I know that a clean mouth and a talk on hygiene has started many [immigrant coal miners] on the right road to good American citizenship,” said one Pennsylvania dentist in the early 20th century.As demand for toothbrushes soared, production followed, aided by the development of exciting new materials called plastics.In the early 1900s chemists discovered that they could make a strong, glossy, moldable—and occasionally explosive—material from a mixture of nitrocellulose and camphor, a fragrant, oily substance derived from the camphor laurel tree. The material, called “celluloid,” could be made into shapes practical, fanciful, and cheap, perfect for toothbrush handles.Soon, bristles also succumbed to the siren song of synthetics. In 1938 a Japanese national laboratory came up with a fine, silky substance it hoped would be a substitute for the silk used to make more durable parachutes for its military. Nearly simultaneously, the U.S-based DuPont chemical company rolled out its own smooth, thin-fibered material: nylon.The silky, sturdy yet flexible material turned out to be a perfect substitute for expensive and brittle boar bristles. In 1938, a company called Dr. West’s started packing the heads of their “Dr. West’s Miracle-Tuft Toothbrush” with nylon threads. The synthetic material, it said, was “100 percent waterproof…with greater cleansing and longer life” than the old natural-bristle brushes. Dr. West's rolled out the new design nationwide, selling them for 50 cents apiece, about $8 in today’s dollars.Since then, new types of plastic replaced celluloid in the handle, and bristle designs became more complicated, but the basic plastic-packed design has proved as durable as the material itself.“It’s quite remarkable, actually, that the design [of the toothbrush] has stayed so similar throughout the years,” says Charlotte Fiell, a design historian from the U.K. “Basically, the function hasn’t changed, has it?”But now designers are beginning to ask: Can we remake this essential object using little or no plastic?The American Dental Association suggests that everyone replace their toothbrushes every three or four months. At that rate, brushers in the U.S. alone would go through over one billion toothbrushes each year. And if everyone around the world followed those recommendations, about 23 billion toothbrushes would get trashed annually. Most are traditional toothbrushes, but some 55 million U.S. brushers use electric toothbrushes each year, so some number of those plastic-handled, battery-containing objects also end up in the waste stream each year.Many toothbrushes are unrecyclable because the composite plastics most are now made of are difficult, if not impossible, to break apart efficiently.In response, some companies have pivoted back to natural material, like wood or boar bristles. Bamboo handles can solve part of the problem, but most of the bamboo brushes on the market still have nylon bristles, so at least that part of the brush has to be thrown away.Other toothbrushes, like the Radius, pack more, sturdier bristles into their heads. That helps them last longer so they need to be replaced less often—only two brushes a year instead of four.Some companies have gone back to a design that was originally introduced nearly a century ago: toothbrushes with removable heads. Goodwell, in Portland, Oregon, produces metal handles it hopes brushers will keep for years. The head pops out when the bristles wear down, and a new one snaps in, reducing the total amount of waste to less than 30 percent of a normal brush, says Patrick Triato, one of the company’s founders.It’s very hard to find plastic-free brush options. Biodegradable or bio-based plastics aren’t always better for the planet than their more traditional plastic counterparts, either because they don’t actually break down particularly well or because they have complicated environmental footprints in their own right.But any option that reduces the total amount of material used and packaging is a step in the right direction. Getting people thinking about the tools they use to clean their teeth? That’s a big step too.Why carrying your own fork and spoon helps solve the plastic crisisThe sticky problem of plastic wrapThis common plastic packaging is a recycling nightmareCigarette butts are toxic plastic pollution.Should they be banned?How the plastic bottle went from miracle container to hated garbageHow tampons and pads became so unsustainableTires: The plastic polluter you never thought aboutCan medical care exist without plastic?Your shoes are made of plastic. Here’s why.",
"A plastic shopping bag buried in soil for three years could still hold a full load of groceries.Richard Thompson, a British marine biologist who devoted his career to studying plastic waste, has long wondered how well biodegradable shopping bags actually degrade.So in 2015, he and his graduate students at Plymouth University buried a collection of bags labeled as biodegradable in the school’s garden.Three years later, when the bags were dug up, they not only had remained intact, they still could carry almost five pounds of groceries.“It did surprise me that after three years you can still carry shopping home in them,” he said in an interview with National Geographic. “They didn’t have the same strength as they had when they were brand new. But they hadn’t degraded to any meaningful extent.”The indestructible qualities of biodegradable bags are just one of the findings in a first-of-its-kind study published today in the journal Environmental Science & Technology. The research documents deterioration of five types of shopping bags that were immersed in water, buried in soil, or exposed to outdoor air as if litter. Thompson and his team tested bags commonly dispensed in retail shops around Plymouth and concluded that none of them–including compostable bags­–reliably deteriorated enough over three years to give them any environmental advantages over conventional bags. (Read more about potential problems with bioplastics.)The study highlights how the term “biodegradable” can confuse consumers, lulling them into thinking the bag will simply disappear if thrown away. If consumers think they are being even more responsible by adding biodegradable bags to their recycling bins, that can destroy efforts to collect conventional plastic bags for remanufacture into new bags, the scientists warn. Chemical additives in biodegradable bags can contaminate the mixture, rendering it unusable.“If you’ve got bags with a self-destruct function, the recycler doesn’t want that mixed in with other bags,” Thompson said. “They need known and consistent material. So the issue becomes how do you separate biodegradables from conventional plastics? How is the consumer supposed to know how to dispose of it?”The study is likely to rekindle a controversy that erupted last summer after the BBC reported preliminary results showing one of the biodegradable bags had not degraded after two years.Symphony Environmental Technologies, which made the bag that was still intact at two years, criticized the study and called into question Thompson’s credentials, noting “he is not a polymer scientist.”Thompson, who was awarded the Order of the British Empire by Queen Elizabeth for his research on plastic waste, said he stands behind his group’s research.“We are entirely confident in the work, as we have been all along,” he said. “And it’s been through full peer review.”Disposable shopping bags are one of the world’s most widely used plastic products. They are often used for only moments, and the European Union is estimated to use about 100 billion bags every year, with annual use per capita exceeding 450 bags per year in some EU countries. As the world searches for solutions to the growing accumulation of plastic waste on Earth, products advertised as biodegradable have been marketed with increasing frequency, offering the promise of an easy answer to using disposable bags. But in many cases, biodegradability may be just that—only a promise.“There is no magical degradable material that will breakdown in a very short time in all environments that you expose it to. That does not exist,” says Ramani Narayan, a chemical engineer at Michigan State University and expert on biodegradables. He did not participate in the Plymouth study.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.Both the United Nations and the European Union have staked out positions against biodegradables. The UN, in a report published in 2016, flatly declared that biodegradable plastics are not the answer to marine plastic pollution. And the EU last year, with some controversy, recommended banning oxo-biodegradables, which contain additives that are designed to hasten breakdown of polymer molecules, sometimes, according to Britain’s largest manufacturer of oxo products, Symphony, “in the same way as a leaf and leaving nothing behind.”That process causes the bag to disintegrate into small microplastics, raising concerns that they are adding to the growing collection of microplastics in the world’s oceans.Thompson and his team tested five types of bags, including one compostable bag, one conventional high-density polyethylene bag, and three kinds of biodegradable bags. Two of the biodegradable bags were oxo-biodegradable. The other biodegradable bag was manufactured in a way that promotes its breakdown differently.Bags were exposed to environmental conditions in three different sites. For the experiment, some of the bags were cut into strips and placed in mesh pouches that exposed them to outdoor elements at each of three different test sites. Whole bags were also used in each of the test locations.For the soil test in the university garden, samples were buried almost ten inches deep. For the outdoor exposure test, samples were placed on a wall in the garden with a southern exposure. For the marine test, samples were submerged more than three feet beneath the surface of Plymouth Harbor. A fourth laboratory test site was set up as a control.Samples were set out July 10, 2015, and inspected regularly for signs of surface loss, holes, or disintegration. Samples were also measured for tensile strength, meaning how easily they broke under tension.At the harbor site, all the bags and test strips had acquired a microbial biofilm on the surface after a month. The compostable bag disappeared after three months.At the open-air site in the garden, all of the bags and test strips had become too brittle to test further or had disintegrated into microplastics after nine months. They could not be tested further.At the soil site in the garden, the bags remained intact. Although the compostable bag survived in its original shape for 27 months, it was unable to hold any weight without tearing.Narayan, the chemist, says the study provides real world data revalidating the limitations of biodegradables. But he questioned the inclusion of a compostable bag in tests that compostable bags are not designed to endure. Compostable bags, he says, are intended to be disposed of in industrial composters and regulations in the United States and most other nations require label instructions that clearly describe that.“That is where the confusion is,” he says. “The compostable bag is biodegradable only in the industrial composting environment and is meant to be disposed of in that environment.”Vegware, the maker of the compostable bags used in the study, said in a statement to the Guardian newspaper it has updated its description of its bag labels to say: “commercially compostable where accepted.”Likewise, Symphony says oxo-biodegradables are not intended to degrade in landfills or submerged at depth in the seas. Rather, oxo-biodegradable bags are intended to degrade if they become litter on the open landscape or ocean surface, said Michael Stephen, Symphony's deputy chairman, in an interview.Oxo-biodegradables contain stabilizers to give the bags a “useful service life,” Stephen said, and keep them from falling apart while the customer is carrying groceries to their car. Usually, he said, bag companies want the stabilizers to function 18 months.“When the stabilizer has been exhausted and the product has come to the end of its useful life, then the catalyst kicks in and it starts to degrade,” Stephen said.The timeline for degradation varies. “In a warm environment, it will degrade within a year. In a damp, cold environment, maybe two or three years, but it will be a whole lot quicker than conventional plastic,” Stephen said. "Do you want two years or 100 years?"Imogen Napper, who led the study as part of her PhD and a National Geographic Explorer, said she noticed “very little change” in the samples in the soil over the three years. Still, she was skeptical they would hold groceries. But she loaded a bag with box of cereal, cans of Coke, bananas and oranges, crackers, and pasta. “The bags were discolored and disgusting, but they were still usable,” she said.Thompson said the study should not be read as an argument against development of biodegradables or compostables. Instead, he says, the study argues for rethinking which products work best as biodegradables. “We’ve got to link these products to appropriate uses,” he said.Contained environments, such as football stadiums, may be better suited to use biodegradable or compostable products than retail shops. Shopping bags can end up anywhere at the end of their lives. But in a stadium, disposable food containers and wrappers, even those containing uneaten food, can be gathered in one place, and all of the waste can be processed in an industrial composter. “The idea that all of that can go into the same waste stream makes sense,” Thompson said.A better future for plastic bags, he suggested, may be to reverse course and stick with the property that made them so popular in the first place–durability. That is the study’s final conclusion: “A bag that can and is reused many times presents a better alternative to degradability.”",
"Bioplastic is becoming a popular alternative for single-use plastic items like straws and utensils.More than eighteen trillion pounds of plastic have been produced to date, and eighteen billion pounds of plastic flows into the ocean every year. It ensnares the marine animals we cherish and the fish we put on our plates, it appears in the table salt we use, and it’s even found in our own bodies.  As more research on the impact of using so much plastic comes to light, consumers and manufacturers are left scrambling for an alternative to the ubiquitous material, and bioplastics have emerged as a potential alternative.  At a glance, the name sounds promising, with a prefix that hints at an Earth-friendly product. But is bioplastic the panacea for our environmental woes? An easy-to-use single-use item that feels like plastic minus the guilt?The answer?It’s complicated, say scientists, manufacturers, and environmental experts, who warn its potential merits rest on many “ifs.”Bioplastic simply refers to plastic made from plant or other biological material instead of petroleum. It is also often called bio-based plastic.It can either be made by extracting sugar from plants like corn and sugarcane to convert into polylactic acids (PLAs), or it can be made from polyhydroxyalkanoates (PHAs) engineered from microorganisms. PLA plastic is commonly used in food packaging, while PHA is often used in medical devices like sutures and cardiovascular patches.Because PLA often comes from the same large industrial facilities making products like ethanol, it’s the cheapest source of bioplastic. It’s the most common type and is also used in plastic bottles, utensils, and textiles.“The argument [for bio-based plastics] is the inherent value of reducing the carbon footprint,” says chemical engineer Ramani Narayan from Michigan State University, who researches bioplastic.About eight percent of the world’s oil is used to make plastic, and proponents of bioplastic often tout a reduction in this use as a major benefit. This argument rests on the idea that if a plastic item does release carbon once it’s discarded, as it degrades, bioplastics will add less carbon to the atmosphere because they’re simply returning the carbon the plants sucked up while growing (instead of releasing carbon that had previously been trapped underground in the form of oil).A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.However, that’s not the end of the story. One 2011 study from the University of Pittsburgh found other environmental issues associated with growing plants for bioplastic. Among them: pollution from fertilizers and land diverted from food production.Using a substance like corn for plastic instead of food is at the center of a debate over how resources should be allocated in an increasingly food-scarce world.  “The other value proposition is that plant biomass is renewable,” Narayan adds. “It's grown all over the world. Oil is concentrated in regions. Bioplastics support a rural, agrarian economy.”  Bio-based plastics have benefits, but only when taking a host of factors into consideration, says environmental engineer and National Geographic explorer Jenna Jambeck, who is also at the University of Georgia.  “Where is it grown? How much land does it take up? How much water is needed?” she gives as examples of important questions.  Whether bio-based plastics are ultimately better for the environment than oil-derived ones “is a big question based on many 'ifs,'” she says. In other words, there’s no clear answer at present.Depending on the type of polymer used to make it, discarded bioplastic must either be sent to a landfill, recycled like many (but not all) petroleum-based plastics, or sent to an industrial compost site.Industrial composting is necessary to heat the bioplastic to a high enough temperature that allows microbes to break it down. Without that intense heat, bioplastics won't degrade on their own in a meaningful timeframe, either in landfills or even your home compost heap. If they end up in marine environments, they'll function similarly to petroleum-based plastic, breaking down into micro-sized pieces, lasting for decades, and presenting a danger to marine life.“If PLA [bioplastic] does leak out, it also will not biodegrade in the ocean,” says Jambeck. “It's really not any different from those industrial polymers. It can be composted in an industrial facility, but if the town doesn't have one, then it's not any different.”One of the largest manufacturers of bioplastic in the U.S. is Colorado’s Eco Products. They buy raw corn-based PLA from NatureWorks, a chemical manufacturer in Blair, Nebraska.Eco Products deferred questions about their products to the Plastics Industry Assocation (PLASTICS), who said that demand for bioplastics has increased in the past decade or so.Consumer interest in sustainable alternatives to plastics and more efficient technology are driving that growth, says PLASTICS Assistant Director of Regulatory and Technical Affairs Patrick Krieger.Addressing criticism that bioplastics may divert land away from growing food, Krieger said companies represented by Plastics partner with groups like the World Wildlife Fund’s Bioplastic Feedstock Alliance to ensure crops are grown sustainably.But environmentalists still say a serious dearth of industrial compost sites mean bioplastics will do little to curb the amount of plastic entering waterways.  Dune Ives is the executive director of the Lonely Whale, an environmental non-profit geared toward business-oriented solutions, particularly around plastics. In 2017, the group headed a “Strawless in Seattle” campaign to lobby for a plastic straw ban. As part of that effort, Lonely Whale investigated whether they would tout bioplastic straws as an alternative. One of the things they learned: Among local businesses that did have compost bins, few reported bioplastic items actually making it into the appropriate places, says Ives.  “We quickly realized that the idea of compostable plastic sounds very interesting, especially if you look at an area like Seattle, but there's still that human element of you and me,” she says.  Dune adds that without adequate composting infrastructure and consumer know-how, bioplastic products can end up an example of greenwashing, a phrase coined by environmentalists to indicate when consumers are misled about how sustainable a product truly is.  “The marketing is getting us to feel good about what we're buying,” she says, “but the reality is the systems aren't in place to accommodate for those materials.”  The Biodegradable Products Institute (BPI) is a non-profit formed to advocate for biodegradable products and waste infrastructure. They see bioplastics and industrial composting as untapped potential.  “Composting is inherently local,” says Rhodes Yepsen, the executive director of BPI. “It won't make sense to ship food waste to another country. It rots quickly, and it's primarily water. It's heavy and messy.”He points out that recycling is often inefficient, capturing less than a fifth of recyclable material produced in the world.“Fifty percent of the waste we generate is biodegradable waste like food and paper,” says Narayan, who also serves as a scientific adviser for BPI. He thinks landfills should be eliminated altogether and replaced by more robust and comprehensive waste collection.“Landfills are tombs. We are preserving garbage. That makes no sense,” he says.Ives points to opportunities to create sustainable alternatives that don’t have any plastic.Plastic made from petroleum or plants like corn is among the cheapest material for things like packaging, but smaller-scale manufacturers are developing even more natural alternatives. In the U.K., one boutique is growing fungus into lightweight furniture, and in the U.S., the Department of Agriculture is using a milk film to create packaging that keeps food fresh.“This is a field right now for entrepreneurial investors. There’s no shortage of incredible opportunity for alternatives that are marine degradable, that don’t overtax the land and our food production system,” Ives says.Correction: An earlier version of this story incorrectly stated products manufactured by NatureWorks. This article has also been updated to clarify that PLA is made from plant sugar, not contained in the plant itself.",
"Salt is produced on Madura Island, Indonesia, by evaporating seawater, an ancient technique. A new study found that salt made in this region contains some of the highest microplastics sampled.Microplastics were found in sea salt several years ago. But how extensively plastic bits are spread throughout the most commonly used seasoning remained unclear. Now, new research shows microplastics in 90 percent of the table salt brands sampled worldwide.Of 39 salt brands tested, 36 had microplastics in them, according to a new analysis by researchers in South Korea and Greenpeace East Asia. Using prior salt studies, this new effort is the first of its scale to look at the geographical spread of microplastics in table salt and their correlation to where plastic pollution is found in the environment.“The findings suggest that human ingestion of microplastics via marine products is strongly related to emissions in a given region,” said Seung-Kyu Kim, a marine science professor at Incheon National University in South Korea.Salt samples from 21 countries in Europe, North and South America, Africa, and Asia were analyzed. The three brands that did not contain microplastics are from Taiwan (refined sea salt), China (refined rock salt), and France (unrefined sea salt produced by solar evaporation). The study was published this month in the journal Environmental Science & Technology.The density of microplastics found in salt varied dramatically among different brands, but those from Asian brands were especially high, the study found. The highest quantities of microplastics were found in salt sold in Indonesia. Asia is a hot spot for plastic pollution, and Indonesia—with 34,000 miles (54,720 km) of coastline—ranked in an unrelated 2015 study as suffering the second-worst level of plastic pollution in the world.In another indicator of the geographic density of plastic pollution, microplastics levels were highest in sea salt, followed by lake salt and then rock salt.The new study is the fifth on salt published in recent years. Others have been done in Spain, China, the United States, and by a group from France, Britain, and Malaysia.Sherri Mason, a professor at the State University of New York in Fredonia, who partnered with researchers at the University of Minnesota on a separate salt study, said in an interview the new findings add “another piece to the puzzle” to assessing the impact of microplastics.“That fact that they found higher counts in Asia is interesting. While not surprising, you still have to have the data,” she says. “The earlier studies found traces of microplastics in salt products sold in those countries, but we haven’t known how much.”A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.The new study, she says, “shows us that microplastics are ubiquitous. It’s not a matter of if you are buying sea salt in England, you are safe.”The new study estimates that the average adult consumes approximately 2,000 microplastics per year through salt. What that means remains a mystery.A separate study by the University of York in Britain that sought to assess the risks of microplastics to the environment, published Wednesday, concluded not enough is known to determine if microplastics cause harm.The review of 320 existing studies found “major knowledge gaps” in scientific understanding of the impact of microplastics. The studies examined different types of microplastics, including microbeads, fragments, and fibers, leading to a “mismatch” of data that makes comparisons akin to comparing “apples to pears,” Alistair Boxall, a University of York geography professor and co-author of the study, said in a statement.“Based on our analysis, there is currently limited evidence to suggest microplastics are causing significant adverse impacts,” he said. “There is an urgent need for better quality and more holistic monitoring studies alongside more environmentally realistic effects studies on the particle sizes and material types that are actually in the environment.”That new study, funded by the Personal Care Products Council, an industry trade group, was published in the journal Environmental Toxicology and Chemistry.Boxall added that the focus on microplastics may divert attention from worse environmental (and more easily identifiable) pollution problems, such as small particles released from car tires.",
"The inevitable has happened. Microplastics have already been found in birds and fish and whales, so it should have come as no surprise that they have now been discovered in humans. To be specific but indelicate, tiny plastic particles and fibers have been found in the stool of eight people who provided samples as part of a pilot study.This news confirms the predictions of researchers who have tracked microplastics to remote locations, and identified these tiny particles in drinking water, beer, table salt, and seafood. But the implications in this particular case remain unclear.The fact that this is the first documentation of such materials in humans is significant. Yet such a small survey can’t begin to answer the unknowns that hang over the science of microplastics: Where precisely did these plastic fragments originate? And what are the potential risks to human health?Food packaging can shed small fibers. So can household carpeting, clothing, and other plastic-based items that populate our everyday lives. Could the fibers in the stool have come from airborne dust that fell onto the study participants’ food before they consumed it? Or did the microplastics come from the food or packaging itself?The questions don’t stop there. Once inside the human body, can plastic nanofibers—some five times smaller than the width of a human hair—work their way into the bloodstream, lymphatic system, or perhaps even reach a person’s liver? To date, all of that remains a mystery.“I’d say microplastics in poop are not surprising,” says Chelsea Rochman, an ecologist at the University of Toronto, who studies the effects of microplastics on fish. “For me, it shows we are eating our waste—mismanagement has come back to us on our dinner plates. And yes, we need to study how it may affect humans.”Every year, an average of eight million tons of plastic waste, most of it single-use varieties, flows into the world’s oceans from coastal regions. There, sunlight and wave action break these waterborne plastics down into bits the size of grains of rice. Fibers from synthetic clothes such as polyester and acrylic make their way into freshwater systems via washing machines. You can see this in action with a fleece jacket; just scratching the arm of the jacket can shed invisible fibers. As a result, tiny plastic fragments and fibers have now spread all over the planet. They're in deep sea trenches and in the air we breathe.Marine life—from the smallest plankton to the largest whales—eat these plastics, including those tiny enough to be considered microplastics. And encounters with plastics often prove fatal. So far, much of the research into the consequences of this spread has focused on birds and other animals. Microplastics have been found in more than 114 aquatic species, and studies have shown the potential damage to reproductive systems and the liver.Philipp Schwabl, the physician-scientist who conducted the human stool experiment, says he hopes his findings will hasten research into the effects of microplastics on human health.“Based on the research, it was highly likely that microplastics would be present in humans,” he says. “But nobody ever investigated if microplastics also reach the human gut. Now this discussion can be taken up in humans.”Schwabl, a gastroenterologist at the Medical University of Vienna, will present his findings Tuesday at a United European Gastroenterology conference in Vienna. The findings have not yet been peer-reviewed or published; Schwabl says he hopes to have both those steps completed in November. He added that he wants to expand the study to a larger group.The study involved three men and five women, aged 33 to 65, from seven different European countries and Japan. Participants kept a food diary for a week and then provided a stool sample for testing. All stool samples tested positive for plastic.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.The diaries also provided information about potential sources of the plastics. Two of the eight participants chewed gum daily. Six ate seafood. Over the course of the week, they all consumed food that had been wrapped in plastic. On average, participants drank about 25 ounces of water daily from bottles made of PET (polyethylene terephthalate, the material widely used to make plastic bottles.)Schwabl cautioned that the study is too small to draw conclusions about individual factors, such as the chewing gum or fish or the participants' household routines or where they lived.The Environmental Agency in Austria tested the stool samples for 10 different types of plastic. They found nine of them, most commonly PET and polypropylene (PP), a common component of plastic food wrappers and synthetic clothes.In terms of quantity, the stool samples contained, on average, 20 particles of plastic, ranging in size from 50 to 500 micrometers. (For comparison, a human hair is about 100 micrometers thick.)Richard Thompson, a marine scientist at the University of Plymouth in the U.K., says he was surprised by the amount of plastic in the stool. The figure is higher than he would have expected based on the amounts of plastics that are reported in seafood.Thompson and four other scientists published a study earlier this year that compared potential exposure from airborne plastic fibers that fall onto food during meal preparation to the amounts of microplastics ingested by edible mussels in Scotland. The group found that the risk of plastic consumption to humans was greater from exposure to airborne fibers than from eating the mussels.That raises questions, Thompson says, about the sources of plastic found in the stool study.He says the PET could be coming from plastic bottles and food packaging, but it is also possible that it is coming from carpets or curtains or clothing and just falling onto the plate. “If we can understand what the pathway is, it helps understand a little bit about the solution.”But even knowing the pathway, Thompson adds, “That doesn’t tell me anything about harm.”Schwabl himself cautions against drawing too many conclusions from an eight-person sample.“We didn’t study harm,” he says. “We showed there are microplastics in human stool. Up to now, people believed it, but now we know it. That’s important.”",
"Bits of plastic blow over the Earth, and they eventually break down into tiny particles.In what looks like a pristine, remote mountain region, tiny pieces of plastic pollution were found raining down from the sky—raising questions about the global extent of plastic pollution—a first-of-its-kind study has found.Scientists recorded a daily rate of 365 microplastic particles per square meter falling from the sky in the Pyrenees Mountains in southern France.“It was incredible how much microplastic was being deposited,” said Deonie Allen, a researcher at EcoLab in the School of Agricultural and Life Sciences in Toulouse, France. There were no obvious sources for the microplastics within 60 miles (100 kilometers), said Allen, the lead author of the study published Monday in Nature Geoscience.“Microplastic is a new atmospheric pollutant,” Allen said. (Read more about the emerging science of microplastics.)Microplastics are very small pieces of plastic waste. Their presence in oceans and waterways has received a great deal of scientific and media attention in recent years. However, only two previous studies have looked for the presence of microplastics in the air. Both were in cities and their results were comparable, says Allen. Microplastics in the air appear to be ubiquitous.“If you go outside with a UV light, set at a wavelength of 400 nanometers, and shine it sideways you’ll see all kinds of plastic particles in the air fluoresce,” she said. “It’s almost worse indoors. It’s all a bit terrifying.”Allen and colleagues collected microplastics over a period of five months at a meteorological station about 4,500 feet (1,400 meters) above sea level using atmospheric deposition catchers that look like tall funnels. They counted and analyzed the plastic fragments, fibers, and films at the bottom of the collectors that were less than 300 microns in size. The human hair averages between 50 and 70 microns in diameter. The smallest particle a human eye can see is about 40 microns.More than 50 percent of the microplastics found at the station were fragments less than 25 microns in size.Researchers studied wind patterns to find a source of the microplastics collected, but found none within a 60-mile radius of the region—which is sparsely populated and without industrial, commercial, or large agricultural activities. A quantity of orange quartz-like fine dust was also collected, said co-author Steve Allen. This was likely Saharan dust, as past studies have shown such dust particles, which are as large as 400 microns, can travel thousands of miles. But “no one knows how far microplastics can travel,” he added.Scientists have warned we are creating a “plastic planet”. Some 420 million tons of plastics were produced in 2015, up from just over two million tons in 1950. Over this 65-year period roughly six billion tons ended up either in landfill or in the natural environment, a 2017 study estimated. Plastic waste that starts out as bottles, packaging, and so on degrades over time to microplastic particles or much smaller nanoparticles. One study estimated there are 15 to 51 trillion microplastics particles floating on the surface of the oceans. A trillion is one thousand billion. A trillion seconds is nearly 32,000 years.People are exposed to microplastics through food and air, but the health effects are unknown, said Stephanie Wright, a researcher at the Centre for Environment and Health at King’s College London in the United Kingdom.“We’ve only recently recognized human exposure to microplastics through the air,” said Wright, who wrote a detailed review article on human health and microplastics in 2017.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.What is known is that microplastics smaller than 25 microns can enter the human body through the nose or mouth and those less than five microns can end up in lung tissue. “We do know that other types of small particles do have health impacts,” Wright said.There is a great deal of concern about fine particulates in the air formed by burning fossil fuels, including black carbon or soot. These have been linked to a wide range of health impacts from asthma to heart attacks to impairing children’s memory and IQ. Most countries have air pollution standards to limit the volumes of particles less than 10 microns, and especially those below 2.5 microns, respectively known as PM 10 and PM 2.5 standards.It’s also known that microplastics tend to be sticky and can accumulate heavy metals like mercury and persistent organic pollutants (POPs), including brominated flame retardants and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs). Those materials have known health impacts, said Wright.The volume of microplastics in the environment is likely going to increase with the rising amounts of plastics being produced, including synthetic textiles, the scientists warn. Plastics are now being used in roads, bricks, concrete, paints, and a host of other things that might not always be obvious to the public. Yet “there’s too much we don’t know about microplastics in the environment,” Wright said.Far less is known about nanoplastic particles. Nano means really, really small: A billion nanoparticles can fit on the head of a pin.“No one should be surprised that microplastics are everywhere,” said Roman Lehner of the University of Fribourg in Switzerland. Nanoplastics are also everywhere but the technology to detect them doesn’t yet exist, said Lehner, who is working on the problem.Nanoparticles can have markedly different chemical and physical properties than the same materials at micro or larger sizes. One of the unique characteristics of nanoplastics is that because they are so small more atoms are on the surface of a particle compared to its volume. This makes them more chemically reactive. The potential risks to human health and the environment of nanoplastic particles maybe different from microplastics, said Lehner, who co-authored a new review of the potential risks.Lab studies have shown adverse impacts of nanoplastics on aquatic organisms. Studies have shown that polystyrene nanoplastics ingested by aquatic organisms passed through cell walls. This appeared to change behavior and affected endocrine function of fish and other marine species. Lab experiments have also shown nanoplastics cross cell walls in samples of human intestines.Almost no research is being done on nanoplastics in the air and their impacts on human health and the environment, Lehner said. “We don’t yet know all the hazards. However it is likely the environmental impacts are significant and much more research is warranted.”Even as more research is needed it would be prudent to use fewer plastics, said S. Allen. Single-use plastics like shopping bags and straws need to be eliminated. Recycled plastic just delays its degradation into microplastics, so it is far better to reduce plastic consumption, he said.As for bioplastics or biodegradable plastics? They still turn into microplastics you can’t see, S. Allen said.Climate change is yet another reason to reduce plastic consumption, a new study published at the same time warns. Nearly all plastics are made from fossil fuels and this industry resulted in emissions amounting to 1.7 billion metric tonnes of CO2 in 2015, according to a new study in Nature Climate Change. With volumes of plastics produced doubling every decade, by 2050 CO2 emissions could reach 6.5 billion tonnes, or about 15 percent of the global carbon budget.If the plastics industry were a country it’d be the fourth largest CO2 emitter behind China, the U.S., and India. However, aggressive application of renewable energy, recycling, and biomass as a feedstock could keep emissions in 2050 on par with 2015 levels, the study noted. That said, there would also be four times as much plastic being produced.",
"Like many plastic items, cutlery often finds its way into the environment, where it poses dangers for animals and can take hundreds of years to break down.Plastic cutlery is everywhere, and most of it can be used only once. Billions of forks, knives, and spoons are thrown away each year. But like other plastic items—such as bags and bottles—cutlery can take centuries to break down naturally, giving the plastic waste ample time to work its way into the environment.The Ocean Conservancy lists cutlery as among the items “most deadly” to sea turtles, birds, and mammals, and alternatives have proven particularly difficult to come by, though not impossible.A logical solution is to carry your own, but you’ll likely draw a few stares. For centuries, though, it would have been a faux pas to not travel with a set.“You would come with a little carry case, and it would be your own personal knife and spoon,” says Sarah Coffin, who curated the 2006 exhibit Feeding Desire: Design and the Tools of the Table, 1500-2005 at the Cooper Hewitt design museum in New York.Toting your own eating implements was not only a logistical must—none were usually provided—but also helped avoid illness. “If you come with your own,” explains Coffin, “you don't have to worry about someone else's germs in your soup.” What you ate with, she said, was also a status symbol of sorts. “It was a little like a pocket watch.”Cutlery for the masses was commonly made of wood, stone, or shells. More ornate sets could be made of gold or ivory, or even be collapsible for traveling light. By the early 1900s sleek and rust-resistant stainless steel started to make an appearance. By World War II, an even newer material had worked its way into the cutlery mix: plastic.At first, plastic cutlery was considered reusable. Chris Witmore, a professor in archaeology and classics at Texas Tech University, remembers his grandmother washing her plastic tableware. But as the post-war economy boomed, the frugal habits instilled by the Great Depression and an agrarian history faded.“After the mid-twentieth century overabundance comes to define how the majority live,” says Whitmore. That, he says, gave rise to a “throw-away culture.”Making plastic utensils bright and poppy contributed to also making them very popular, historians say.“The Americans were the disposable kings,” says Coffin. Among other inventions was the plastic spork, which The Van Brode Milling Company patented in 1970. But Coffin said the French affinity for picnics also helped spur the single-use boom.Designer Jean-Pierre Vitrac, for example, invented a plastic picnic tray that had a fork, spoon, knife, and cup built right into it. You’d break them off to use, and just throw everything away after you were done. The sets were even available in bright colors—which Coffin said also helped make plastics popular.That marriage of culture and convenience led to companies such as Sodexo, a French firm that's one of the world’s largest food-service providers, to turn to plastic. “[Convenience] really made this whole disposal space become part of our everyday life,” says Judy Panayos, Sodexo’s senior director of sustainability in supply management.Today, the company buys 44 million disposable utensils per month in the U.S. alone. Globally, plastic cutlery is a $2.6 billion business.But convenience has come at a cost. Like many plastic items, utensils often find their way into the environment. According to beach-cleanup data compiled by the non-profit 5Gyres, utensils are the seventh most commonly collected plastic item.“Food and beverage disposables are overwhelmingly at the top of the list,” said Anna Cummins, executive director of 5Gyres, intentionally highlighting the whole category.She argues that environmentalists’ recent focus on individual items—whether bags, straws, or otherwise—isn’t working and that the sector needs to be addressed more holistically. “A focus on single products, while it's important, is not going to move the needle to the degree that we need.”In January, a Hi Fly plane took off from Lisbon, bound for Brazil. As on the Portuguese airline’s other journeys, the attendants served drinks, food, and snacks—but with a twist. According to the airline, this was the first passenger flight in the world to be completely free of single-use plastics.Hi Fly used a range of replacement materials, from paper to plant-based disposables. The cutlery was made from reusable bamboo, which the airline planned to take back to its catering facilities and wash—as many as 100 times.The flight, the airline said, was its first step toward eliminating all single-use plastics by the end of 2019. Others have followed suit; Ethiopian airlines marked April’s Earth Day with a plastics-free flight of its own.Cutlery is part of the broader anti-plastics backlash. In 2016, France was the first country to ban plastic dinnerware. People around the world are experimenting with alternatives to plastic that range from potato starch and areca leaves to grain-based edible cutlery.Sales of such plastic substitutes remain relatively low, often hindered by higher costs and sometimes questionable environmental benefits. So-called bioplastic options, for example, made from plant-based materials, can require specific conditions to break down, and even they take energy and water to produce. But the market for them and for other forms of biodegradable cutlery is growing.Three things you can do to be part of the solution:1. Carry reusable cutlery.2. If you use disposable cutlery, make sure it's made of a biodegradable or compostable material.3. Choose to eat at establishments that don't use plastic utensils.A host of companies are creating utensils from plant-based materials, including wood. Some of them source materials from fast-growing trees like birch or bamboo; Canadian brand Aspenware includes excess wood from the lumber industry in its utensils.A line of disposable wooden cutlery called Clickeat is one example. A set of thin utensils (fork, knife, and an optional spoon) that’s linked at the handle, it snaps apart into individual instruments that can be disposed of after they’re used.“It's compostable and biodegradable,” says founder Steven Adler.Adler first realized the extent of the plastic waste issue about 10 years ago, while surfing with a friend in Chile. The beach was covered in plastic litter. Alarmed, Adler started talking with others about how to best address the issue.“Everyone was talking about plastic bags and bottles, but no one was talking about utensils,” he remembers. Setting out to design an alternative, they founded their company, Simplo.While Adler sees Clickeat as preferable to many other options out there—especially bioplastics—he insists he’s not trying to keep people from finding other solutions, like carrying their own cutlery; he merely wants to provide better options.“Our goal is not to replace reusable things,” he said. “We're trying to redefine the concept of single use.”In China, environmentalists have campaigned for people to carry their own chopsticks. The online marketplace Etsy has a whole section dedicated to reusable cutlery. And the BYO cutlery movement appears to be gaining steam.“I carry them around in my backpack,” says Panayos of her reusable cutlery.Sodexo has more broadly committed to phasing out single-use plastic bags and polystyrene foam food containers, as well as making straws a “by request” item.But Panayos says plastic utensils remain particularly vexing to replace on a large scale. Problem spots include facilities that have limited dishwashing capabilities and places like prisons where more pliable, less dangerous, options are necessary.Says Chris Whitmore, the Texas Tech professor: “When plastics turn out to be everywhere and ingested by everything, the only direction one can go is reduction."How your toothbrush became a part of the plastic crisisThe sticky problem of plastic wrapThis common plastic packaging is a recycling nightmareCigarette butts are toxic plastic pollution. Should they be banned?How the plastic bottle went from miracle container to hated garbageHow tampons and pads became so unsustainableTires: The plastic polluter you never thought aboutCan medical care exist without plastic?Your shoes are made of plastic. Here’s why.",
"Plastic wrap was discovered in a lab by accident in the 1940s. Now there are more than 100 brands of the covering to choose from.The slick, transparent film we now know as plastic wrap was originally a mistake of chemistry, a residue clinging stubbornly to the bottom of a beaker in a 1930s laboratory. The military originally used it to line boots and planes. Today, consumers around the world, and the grocery stores they shop in, have more than a hundred brands of the super water-resistant substance to choose from.Plastic wrap is popular in the United States. One industry research group found that, in the past six months, nearly 80 million Americans had used at least one roll of plastic wrap, but more than five million Americans had gone through more than 10 million boxes. Commercial uses in supermarkets and shipping account for the additional three million tons of plastic wrap companies expect to make in 2019.Though the portable, cheap wrap keeps leftovers fresh for longer, there are several catches: Plastic wrap contributes to the larger plastic pollution crisis, it’s difficult to recycle, and it’s made from potentially harmful chemicals, especially as they break down in the environment.“If you look back to the 1950s when we didn't have as effective food storage like we do now, you can see why it was so popular,” says Leah Bendell , a marine ecotoxicologist from Simon Fraser University.“We didn't have plastic 70 years ago, and then in the post-war boom, you had chemists who were going to provide us with this brave new world. Pesticides, herbicides, and plastics were a big part of that,” she says.When Ralph Wiley discovered polyvinylidene chloride (PVDC) while working in the physicals lab at Dow Chemical in Midland, Michigan, he nicknamed it eonite after a fictional, indestructible material in the comic strip "Little Orphan Annie."His task had been to create a new product out of hydrocarbon and chlorine, two by-products of manufacturing the dry-cleaning agent perchloroethylene.The newfound chemical was so water-resistant that it couldn’t be washed clean from its distillation flask. PVDC molecules bind together so tightly, they’re nearly impenetrable by oxygen and water molecules. Those properties made the material attractive in war efforts and in American kitchens as Saran Wrap.By the 1960s, the Australian company GLAD had created its own—though less clingy—version of plastic wrap from polyethylene. Saran Wrap too is now made from polyethylene after consumers grew concerned about the health impacts of wrapping their food in a plastic made with chloride.Global consumers can buy plastic wrap made of PVDC, PVC, polyethylene, and waxed cotton.Today, consumers around the world have plastic wrap brands at their disposal made of PVDC, PVC, and polyethylene.Thin, flimsy, plastic-like bags are difficult to recycle; without specialized equipment they clog machines. And even when plastic wrap is recycled, it's costlier than using virgin materials. When it ends up in landfills or incinerators, both PVC and PVDC can release a highly toxic chemical called dioxin, says the World Health Organization.In marine environments, plastic wrap contributes to a larger plastic pollution crisis, but unlike other plastics, scientists are finding that PVC and PVDC do great jobs of picking up bacteria and metals. Those contaminated pieces of microplastic then harm the fish that mistake them for food.While environmental activists tend to advocate for ditching the product altogether, manufacturers point the finger at outdated infrastructure.Scott Defife, the vice president of government affairs at the Plastics Industry Association, says plastic films could be easily recycled if our infrastructure for collecting waste wasn't “lacking.”“We want the federal government to make investments,” he says. “They should think of it as a critical public utility like roads and bridges.”The Plastics Industry Association touts plastic wrap as an effective way to reduce food waste by keeping food fresh.“Each of these materials was developed for a reason,” Defife says.PVC and PVDC differ by the slightly different chloride compositions in each molecule. Saran Wrap includes some vinyl chloride, often 13 percent, and both typically have toxic additives, said Bendell. The Food and Drug Administration regulates both, permitting less than a fraction of one percent of PVC and PVDC food wrap from migrating into food. At that exposure level, it's highly unlikely someone could be poisoned by their plastic wrap.“If you have a dinner plate made out of PVC, is that posing a risk? Probably not,” says Rolf Halden, an environmental scientist at Arizona State University's Biodesign Institute. “But if we surround ourselves with PVC and phthalates, they can leach or ooze out of the products. That creates an unwanted exposure.”In order to make plastics softer, more flexible, and more transparent, they are often mixed with plasticizers, particularly for food packaging, says Ramani Narayan, a chemical engineer at Michigan State University. One common class of plasticizers is a group of molecules called phthalates—a category that contains carcinogens—although PVC plastic wrap doesn't contain them anymore. It does contain a plasticizer called DEHA, or diethylhexyl adipate, but its effects on human health are unclear.Three things you can do to be part of the solution:1. Switch from plastic wrap to a reusable wax wrap.2. Store leftovers in glass containers.3. Cover foods with aluminum foil instead of plastic wrap.Stretch-Tite makes plastic wrap that contains PVC. In an email, they noted that their product is free of cancer-causing chemicals like BPA and phthalates, and they claim that safety concerns over plastic wrap aren’t based in sound science.Says Halden: “Unlike infectious pathogens, the effects of toxic chemical exposures may take decades to manifest.” And an increase in cancer rates, for example, would be challenging to tie directly to chemicals in plastic wrap.Wax paper was frequently used in the decades before plastic wrap was stocked on supermarket shelves, and it's a reusable form of wax paper that’s now offering an alternative to throwaway plastics.Bee's Wrap is made by coating bee's wax, jojoba oil, and tree resin onto a thin strip of cotton. Warmth from your hands loosens the bonds, making it more pliable and sticky.Co-owner of a start-up called Etee, Steve Reble says he was inspired by the ancient Egyptian wraps on mummies when he created his own version of a reusable food wrap by coating a thin strip of cotton in a waxy barrier.While still relatively new companies—Bee’s Wrap was founded in 2012 and Etee in 2017—they’ve effectively captured a demographic of consumers searching for alternatives to single-use plastics.Reble says Etee food wraps have been able to eliminate more than 100 million square feet of plastic wrap in the past two years. Katie Flagg, a representative from Bee’s Wrap, says the company grew by 87 percent last year.Consumer research group Nielsen estimates that U.S. consumers will spend $150 billion on a wide variety of sustainable products by 2021.“We’re becoming much more savvy about how we interact with our resources,” says Flagg.How your toothbrush became a part of the plastic crisisWhy carrying your own fork and spoon helps solve the plastic crisisThis common plastic packaging is a recycling nightmareCigarette butts are toxic plastic pollution. Should they be banned?How the plastic bottle went from miracle container to hated garbageHow tampons and pads became so unsustainableTires: The plastic polluter you never thought aboutCan medical care exist without plastic?Your shoes are made of plastic. Here’s why.",
"Over the past decade, dollar stores have grown exponentially, expanding into urban pockets of high poverty and flooding rural American towns unserved by big-box stores. While these stores have filled a void, they may also be exposing families to harmful chemicals such as PVC and phthalates, mostly found in soft plastic products.Dollar stores, those ubiquitous businesses that sell everything from bathroom cleaner to eggs, are starting to take action that begins to right what consumer advocates call a clear wrong: Many of the plastic products on their shelves contain chemicals that can have grave health effects for their customers.Earlier this month, Dollar Tree—one of America’s largest dollar store chains— signed onto a program that would help the company phase out heavy metals such as lead and harmful chemicals including the plastic additives bisphenol A (BPA) and phthalates from their products.The Chemical Footprint Project measures a company’s chemical footprint and then tracks their progress toward using safer alternatives throughout their supply chain. Any company involved with the CFP formally submits data to the program, beginning with a survey that establishes a baseline score.Usually, financial risk and fierce competition between chains drives companies to sign onto the CFP. But with dollar stores, which serve largely low-income communities of color, there was pressure to do right by vulnerable groups.“Dollar Tree is a case where we felt it was also an issue of social justice,” says Alexandra McPherson, a project manager for the Investor Environmental Health Network, an investor collaborative that encourages companies to join the project. “Are people who can’t afford organic products inadvertently being sold the most toxic ones?”For the past five years the Campaign for Healthier Solutions—a coalition of organizations stretching from Texas to Maine—has called for dollar stores to phase out hazardous chemicals from their products. While their efforts have translated slowly into action, including Dollar Tree’s recent pledge, the dollar chains haven’t always factored into public concern. The campaign was born when environmental justice advocates realized that although stores such as Target and Walmart were being pressured by consumer groups to address toxic chemicals in their supply chain, that same scrutiny was missing the four major dollar store chains: Dollar Tree, which recently acquired Family Dollar, Dollar General, and the 99 Cents Only Store.“We have always understood that as people of color in low-income communities, we had a disproportionate exposure to chemicals,” says José T. Bravo, the campaign’s national coordinator. “And it’s these communities that are basically peppered with dollar stores.”Martha Cisneros, who has been involved with the campaign through the female farmworker network, Lideres Campesinas, lives in one such community. Arvin, California, a town of 30,000 people, predominantly Latino farmworkers, is home to two dollar stores, but is 20 miles away from any big-box grocery store. Without a car, that’s an impossible trip for Cisneros and even if she could get there, the mother of four is not sure she could afford it. Instead, she walks less than a mile from her one-bedroom mobile home to the nearby Dollar Tree. At the dollar store, Cisneros says, she knows that each item—from the half-dozen eggs her family relies upon to the school supplies for her youngest daughter—will cost just one dollar each. But they come with a risk.“I feel bad shopping at dollar stores,” she says. “But I was never aware; no one told me about the harmful chemicals.”In 2014 members from the Campaign for Healthier Solutions collected more than 160 dollar store products, such as pencil cases and silly straws, that were then tested for chemicals. They found that 81 percent of products tested hazardous for at least one chemical of concern, such as lead or polyvinyl chloride (PVC) plastic. Among the most pervasive, however, were phthalates—a group of chemicals, including DEHP and DIBP, that make plastic soft and malleable.Phthalates, like BPA, are known endocrine disruptors, chemicals that can interfere with the body’s hormones. Given that they are only loosely bonded to the plastics they’re added to, they easily leach out of products and cause exposure through ingestion, inhalation, and even skin contact. Glittery pencil cases, shell-shaped bathtub mats, and plastic headbands were among the products found to have phthalate levels above U.S. regulatory limits. They are also the kind of bright, cheap, plastic items synonymous with children and with dollar stores.“If you go into a dollar store, it smells like plastic,” says Carmen Messerlian, an assistant professor of environmental reproductive, perinatal, and pediatric epidemiology at the Harvard T.H. Chan School of Public Health. “You can smell the phthalates.”Messerlian is part of the Environment and Reproductive Health Study based out of Boston, Massachusetts, an ongoing body of research that explores how environmental chemicals can affect reproductive health. A 2016 paper published by the team found that among women undergoing medically assisted pregnancy, those with the highest concentrations of DEHP—one kind of phthalate—in their urine were 60 percent more likely to miscarry prior to 20 weeks than those with the lowest concentrations, according to Messerlian. The study is the first to look at how phthalate exposure may affect the very early stages of pregnancy among couples with fertility problems.Other observational studies and animal-based research have linked phthalate exposure to reproductive problems, obesity, type II diabetes, and neurodevelopmental issues in children.For Deyadira Arellano, the latter is especially worrying. At her daughter’s three-year-old pediatrician appointment, the doctor said he was concerned about her neurological development. Arellano, a frequent dollar store customer and a community health worker for the Houston-based organization Texas Environmental Justice Advocacy Services, became involved with the Campaign for Healthier Solutions while pregnant. The campaign’s findings left her suspicious of dollar store products made from shiny metal or pliable plastic. After the appointment, she began to question everything.“I started wondering, could it be the air, the water, the baby food, something I bought?’” Arellano says. “You get stuck in this mind trap of ‘what have I done?’”Exposure to endocrine disruptors, including phthalates, is significantly higher among low-income and minority communities, many of whom are already exposed to other pollutants. One study found that disproportionate exposures to endocrine disruptors may account for the higher rate of diabetes among black and Hispanic communities. More recently, a study broke down exposure to endocrine disruptors by race and found that minorities disproportionately bore the costs and health burdens of diseases associated with endocrine disruptors, including IQ loss and obesity.“It’s a big concern that segments of the population, people who we generally consider more at risk of health problems, have less access to products with fewer of these chemicals in them,” Messerlian says. “It means they’re more likely to buy products that are less regulated than what we'd want.”Just over a decade ago, Congress banned the sale or manufacture of “toys and childcare items” with phthalate concentrations of more than 0.1 percent. Eight phthalates including DEHP and DIBP are currently regulated by the act. In California, Maine, and New York state policy further restrict phthalates in children’s products, while Washington state’s governor is expected to sign into law the nation’s strongest phthalate regulation. But while policy plays an important role in protecting human health, it can also be slow moving and limited in scope.Phthalate levels in common household items such as plastic table covers and non-slip bathtub mats are unrestricted yet are easily accessible to children. Then there’s the issue of banning individual phthalates rather than the entire group. That approach, Messerlian says, leaves researchers and regulators playing a game of “Whack-a-Mole,” where one chemical is banned and another appears in its place. Moreover, research has shown that replacement phthalates can be just as harmful as those that are regulated, as was the case when DINP and DIDP replaced the more common DEHP.Rather than wait for government policy to force them to adapt, members of the Campaign for Healthier Solutions have instead encouraged dollar stores to emulate retailers such as Target and Walmart and phase out known chemicals of concern. Dollar Tree, which declined to comment for this article, has already made progress. Bravo and other campaign leaders have also met with executives from Dollar General.In a statement to National Geographic, Dollar General representatives said the company is committed to selling safe products that meet or exceed their standards as well as legal and regulatory requirements.“Customers can shop at Dollar General stores with confidence, knowing we firmly stand behind our products and the communities we proudly serve,” the statement says. “We appreciate ongoing and positive dialogue with the Campaign for Healthier Solutions and Mr. Bravo.”Following a protest outside their Los Angeles headquarters in early April, a representative of the 99 Cents Only Store also agreed to meet with campaign members. 99 Cents Only Store did not reply to National Geographic’s requests for comment.While Bravo considers even the meetings a small victory, he would like to see dollar stores go beyond what is required of them and become conscious retailers that do right by their customers, workers, and the environment. After all, for most people involved in the campaign and the low-income, rural, and communities of color they represent, the dollar store is often their best and only option.“We said at the beginning of the campaign that this is not about boycotting dollar stores,” Bravo says. “Why? Our communities lack major supermarkets and even if they existed, they’re way out of our budget. For us, there’s no alternative.”",
"More than the roar of motorbikes fills the air in Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam, where bicyclists are now a minority. There's also acrid smoke, rich in polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs), chemicals from incompletely burned fuel that can cause cancer in lab animals.My journalist-as-guinea-pig experiment is taking a disturbing turn.A Swedish chemist is on the phone, talking about flame retardants, chemicals added for safety to just about any product that can burn. Found in mattresses, carpets, the plastic casing of televisions, electronic circuit boards, and automobiles, flame retardants save hundreds of lives a year in the United States alone. These, however, are where they should not be: inside my body.Åke Bergman of Stockholm University tells me he has received the results of a chemical analysis of my blood, which measured levels of flame-retarding compounds called polybrominated diphenyl ethers. In mice and rats, high doses of PBDEs interfere with thyroid function, cause reproductive and neurological problems, and hamper neurological development. Little is known about their impact on human health."I hope you are not nervous, but this concentration is very high," Bergman says with a light Swedish accent. My blood level of one particularly toxic PBDE, found primarily in U.S.-made products, is 10 times the average found in a small study of U.S. residents and more than 200 times the average in Sweden. The news about another PBDE variant—also toxic to animals—is nearly as bad. My levels would be high even if I were a worker in a factory making the stuff, Bergman says.In fact I'm a writer engaged in a journey of chemical self-discovery. Last fall I had myself tested for 320 chemicals I might have picked up from food, drink, the air I breathe, and the products that touch my skin—my own secret stash of compounds acquired by merely living. It includes older chemicals that I might have been exposed to decades ago, such as DDT and PCBs; pollutants like lead, mercury, and dioxins; newer pesticides and plastic ingredients; and the near-miraculous compounds that lurk just beneath the surface of modern life, making shampoos fragrant, pans nonstick, and fabrics water-resistant and fire-safe.The tests are too expensive for most individuals—National Geographic paid for mine, which would normally cost around $15,000—and only a few labs have the technical expertise to detect the trace amounts involved. I ran the tests to learn what substances build up in a typical American over a lifetime, and where they might come from. I was also searching for a way to think about risks, benefits, and uncertainty—the complex trade-offs embodied in the chemical "body burden" that swirls around inside all of us.Now I'm learning more than I really want to know.Bergman wants to get to the bottom of my flame-retardant mystery. Have I recently bought new furniture or rugs? No. Do I spend a lot of time around computer monitors? No, I use a titanium laptop. Do I live near a factory making flame retardants? Nope, the closest one is over a thousand miles (1,600 kilometers) away. Then I come up with an idea."What about airplanes?" I ask."Yah," he says, "do you fly a lot?""I flew almost 200,000 miles (320,000 kilometers) last year," I say. In fact, as I spoke to Bergman, I was sitting in an airport waiting for a flight from my hometown of San Francisco to London."Interesting," Bergman says, telling me that he has long been curious about 1'BDE exposureinside airplanes, whose plastic and fabric interiors are drenched in flame retardants to meet safety standards set by the Federal Aviation Administration and its counterparts overseas. "I have been wanting to apply for a grant to test pilots and flight attendants for PBDEs," Bergman says as I hear my flight announced overhead. But for now the airplane connection is only a hypothesis. Where I picked up this chemical that I had not even heard of until a few weeks ago remains a mystery. And there's the bigger question: How worried should I be?The same can be asked of other chemicals I've absorbed from air, water, the nonstick pan I used to scramble my eggs this morning, my faintly scented shampoo, the sleek curve of my cell phone. I'm healthy, and as far as I know have no symptoms associated with chemical exposure. In large doses, some of these substances, from mercury to PCBs and dioxins, the notorious contaminants in Agent Orange, have horrific effects. But many toxicologists—and not just those who have ties to the chemical industry—insist that the minuscule smidgens of chemicals inside us are mostly nothing to worry about."In toxicology, dose is everything," says Karl Rozman, a toxicologist at the University of Kansas Medical Center, "and these doses are too low to be dangerous." One part per billion (ppb), a standard unit for measuring most chemicals inside us, is like putting half a teaspoon of red dye into an Olympic-size swimming pool. What's more, some of the most feared substances, such as mercury, dissipate within days or weeks—or would if we weren't constantly re-exposed.Yet even though many health statistics have been improving over the past few decades, a few illnesses are rising mysteriously. From the early 1980s through the late 1990s, autism increased tenfold; from the early 1970s through the mid-1990s, one type of leukemia was up 62 percent, male birth defects doubled, and childhood brain cancer was up 40 percent. Some experts suspect a link to the man-made chemicals that pervade our food, water, and air. There's little firm evidence. But over the years, one chemical after another that was thought to be harmless turned out otherwise once the facts were in.The classic example is lead. In 1971 the U.S. Surgeon General declared that lead levels of 40 micrograms per deciliter of blood were safe. It's now known that any detectable lead can cause neurological damage in children, shaving off IQ points. From DDT to PCBs, the chemical industry has released compounds first and discovered damaging health effects later. Regulators have often allowed a standard of innocent until proven guilty in what Leo Trasande, a pediatrician and environmental health specialist at Mount Sinai Hospital in New York City, calls "an uncontrolled experiment on America's children."Each year the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency reviews an average of 1,700 new compounds that industry is seeking to introduce. Yet the 1976 Toxic Substances Control Act requires that they be tested for any ill effects before approval only if evidence of potential harm exists—which is seldom the case for new chemicals. The agency approves about 90 percent of the new compounds without restrictions. Only a quarter of the 82,000 chemicals in use in the U.S. have ever been tested for toxicity.Until recently, no one had even measured average levels of exposure among large numbers of Americans. No regulations required it, the tests are expensive, and technology sensitive enough to measure the tiniest levels didn't exist.Last year the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention took a step toward closing that gap when it released data on 148 substances, from DDT and other pesticides to metals, PCBs, and plastic ingredients, measured in the blood and urine of several thousand people. The study said little about health impacts on the people tested or how they might have encountered the chemicals. "The good news is that we are getting real data about exposure levels," says James Pirkle, the study's lead author. "This gives us a place to start."I began my own chemical journey on an October morning at the Mount Sinai Hospital in New York City, where I gave urine and had blood drawn under the supervision of Leo Trasande. Trasande specializes in childhood exposures to mercury and other brain toxins. He had agreed to be one of several expert advisers on this project, which began as a Sinai phlebotomist extracted 14 vials of blood—so much that at vial 12 I felt woozy and went into a cold sweat. At vial 13 Trasande grabbed smelling salts, which hit my nostrils like a whiff of fire and allowed me to finish.From New York my samples were shipped to Axys Analytical Services on Vancouver Island in Canada, one of a handful of state-of-the-art labs specializing in subtle chemical detection, analyzing everything from eagle eggs to human tissue for researchers and government agencies. A few weeks later, I followed my samples to Canada to see how Axys teased out the tiny loads of compounds inside me.I watched the specimens go through multiple stages of processing, which slowly separated sets of target chemicals from the thousands of other compounds, natural and unnatural, in my blood and urine. The extracts then went into a high-tech clean room containing mass spectrometers, sleek, freezer-size devices that work by flinging the components of a sample through a vacuum, down a long tube. Along the way, a magnetic field deflects the molecules, with lighter molecules swerving the most. The exact amount of deflection indicates each molecule's size and identity.A few weeks later, Axys sent me my results—a grid of numbers in parts per billion or trillion—and I set out to learn, as best I could, where those toxic traces came from.Some of them date back to my time in the womb, when my mother downloaded part of her own chemical burden through the placenta and the umbilical cord. More came after I was born, in her breast milk.Once weaned, I began collecting my own chemicals as I grew up in northeastern Kansas, a few miles outside Kansas City. There I spent countless hot, muggy summer days playing in a dump near the Kansas River. Situated on a high limestone bluff above the fast brown water lined by cottonwoods and railroad tracks, the dump was a mother lode of old bottles, broken machines, steering wheels, and other items only boys can fully appreciate.This was the late 1960s, and my friends and I had no way of knowing that this dump would later be declared an EPA superfund site, on the National Priority List for hazardous places. It turned out that for years, companies and individuals in this corner of Johnson County had dumped thousands of pounds of material contaminated with toxic chemicals here. "It was started as a landfill before there were any rules and regulations on how landfills were done," says Denise Jordan-Izaguirre, the regional representative for the federal Agency for Toxic Substances and Disease Registry. "There were metal tailings and heavy metals dumped in there. It was unfenced, unrestricted, so kids had access to it."Kids like me.Now capped, sealed, and closely monitored, the dump, called the Doepke-Holliday Site, also happens to be half a mile (0.8 kilometers) upriver from a county water intake that supplied drinking water for my family and 45,000 other households. "From what we can gather, there were contaminants going into the river," says Shelley Brodie, the EPA Remedial Project Manager for Doepke. In the 1960s, the county treated water drawn from the river, but not for all contaminants. Drinking water also came from 21 wells that tapped the aquifer near Doepke.When I was a boy, my corner of Kansas was filthy, and the dump wasn't the only source of toxins. Industry lined the river a few miles away—factories making cars, soap, and fertilizers and other agricultural chemicals—and a power plant belched fumes. When we drove past the plants toward downtown Kansas City, we plunged into a noxious cloud that engulfed the car with smoke and an awful chemical stench. Flames rose from fertilizer plant stacks, burning off mustard-yellow plumes of sodium, and animal waste poured into the river. In the nearby farmland, trucks and crop dusters sprayed DDT and other pesticides in great, puffy clouds that we kids sometimes rode our bikes through, holding our breath and feeling very brave.Today the air is clear, and the river free of effluents—a visible testament to the success of the U.S. environmental cleanup, spurred by the Clean Air and Clean Water Acts of the 1970s. But my Axys test results read like a chemical diary from 40 years ago. My blood contains traces of several chemicals now banned or restricted, including DDT (in the form of DDE, one of its breakdown products) and other pesticides such as the termite-killers chlordane and heptachlor. The levels are about what you would expect decades after exposure, says Rozman, the toxicologist at the University of Kansas Medical Center. My childhood playing in the dump, drinking the water, and breathing the polluted air could also explain some of the lead and dioxins in my blood, he says.I went to college at a place and time that put me at the height of exposure for another set of substances found inside me—PCIBs, once used as electrical insulators and heat-exchange fluids in transformers and other products. PCBs can lurk in the soil anywhere there's a dump or an old factory. But some of the largest releases took place along New York's Hudson River from the 1940s to the 1970s, when General Electric used PCBs at factories in the towns of Hudson Falls and Fort Edward. About 140 miles (225 kilometers) downstream is the city of Poughkeepsie, where I attended Vassar College in the late 1970s.PCBs, oily liquids or solids, can persist in the environment for decades. In animals, they impair liver function, raise blood lipids, and cause cancers. Some of the 209 different PCBs chemically resemble dioxins and cause other mischief in lab animals: reproductive and nervous system damage, as well as developmental problems. By 1976, the toxicity of PCBs was unmistakable; the United States banned them, and GE stopped using them. But until then, GE legally dumped excess PCBs into the Hudson, which swept them all the way downriver to Poughkeepsie, one of eight cities that draw their drinking water from the Hudson.In 1984, a 200-mile (321.9-kilometer) stretch of the Hudson, from Hudson Falls to New York City, was declared a superfund site, and plans to rid the river of PCBs were set in motion. GE has spent 300 million dollars on the cleanup so far, dredging up and disposing of PCBs in the river sediment under the supervision of the EPA. It is also working to stop the seepage of PCBs into the river from the factories.Birds and other wildlife along the Hudson are thought to have suffered from the pollution, but its impact on humans is less definitive. One study in Hudson River communities found a 20 percent increase in the rate of hospitalization for respiratory diseases, while another, more reassuringly, found no increase in cancer deaths in the contaminated region. But among many of the locals, the fear is palpable."I grew up a block from the Fort Edward plant," says Dennis Prevost, a retired Army officer and public health advocate, who blames PCBs for the brain cancers that killed his brother at age 46 and a neighbor in her 20s. "The PCBs have migrated under the parking lot and into the community aquifer," which Prevost says was the source of Fort Edward's drinking water until municipal water replaced wells in 1984.Ed Fitzgerald of the State University of New York at Albany, a former staff scientist at the state department of health, is conducting the most thorough study yet of the health effects of PCBs in the area. He says he has explained to Prevost and other residents that the risk from the wells was probably small because PCBs tend to settle to the bottom of an aquifer. Eating contaminated fish caught in the Hudson is a more likely exposure route, he says.I didn't eat much Hudson River fish during my college days in the 1970s, but the drinking water in my dorm could have contained traces of the PCBs pouring into the river far upstream. That may be how I picked up my PCB body burden, which was about average for an American. Or maybe not. "PCBs are everywhere," says Leo Rosales, a local EPA official, "so who knows where you got it."Back home in San Francisco, I encounter a newer generation of industrial chemicals—compounds that are not banned, and, like flame retardants, are increasing year by year in the environment and in my body. Sipping water after a workout, I could be exposing myself to bisphenol A, an ingredient in rigid plastics from water bottles to safety goggles. Bisphenol A causes reproductive system abnormalities in animals. My levels were so low they were undetectable—a rare moment of relief in my toxic odyssey.And that faint lavender scent as I shampoo my hair? Credit it to phthalates, molecules that dissolve fragrances, thicken lotions, and add flexibility to PVC, vinyl, and some intravenous tubes in hospitals. The dashboards of most cars are loaded with phthalates, and so is some plastic food wrap. Heat and wear can release phthalate molecules, and humans swallow them or absorb them through the skin. Because they dissipate after a few minutes to a few hours in the body, most people's levels fluctuate during the day.Like bisphenol A, phthalates disrupt reproductive development in mice. An expert panel convened by the National Toxicology Program recently concluded that although the evidence so far doesn't prove that phthalates pose any risk to people, it does raise "concern," especially about potential effects on infants. "We don't have the data in humans to know if the current levels are safe," says Antonia Calafat, a CDC phthalates expert. I scored higher than the mean in five out of seven phthalates tested. One of them, monomethyl phthalate, came in at 34.8 ppb, in the top 5 percent for Americans. Leo Trasande speculates that some of my phthalate levels were high because I gave my urine sample in the morning, just after I had showered and washed my hair.My inventory of household chemicals also includes perfluorinated acids (PFAs)—tough, chemically resistant compounds that go into making nonstick and stain-resistant coatings. 3M also used them in its Scotchgard protector products until it found that the specific PFA compounds in Scotchgard were escaping into the environment and phased them out. In animals these chemicals damage the liver, affect thyroid hormones, and cause birth defects and perhaps cancer, but not much is known about their toxicity in humans.Long-range pollution left its mark on my results as well: My blood contained low, probably harmless, levels of dioxins, which escape from paper mills, certain chemical plants, and incinerators. In the environment, dioxins settle on soil and in the water, then pass into the food chain. They build up in animal fat, and most people pick them up from meat and dairy products.And then there is mercury, a neurotoxin that can permanently impair memory, learning centers, and behavior. Coal-burning power plants are a major source of mercury, sending it out their stacks into the atmosphere, where it disperses in the wind, falls in rain, and eventually washes into lakes, streams, or oceans. There bacteria transform it into a compound called methylmercury, which moves up the food chain after plankton absorb it from the water and are eaten by small fish. Large predatory fish at the top of the marine food chain, like tuna and swordfish, accumulate the highest concentrations of methylmercury—and pass it on to seafood lovers.For people in northern California, mercury exposure is also a legacy of the gold rush 150 years ago, when miners used quicksilver, or liquid mercury, to separate the gold from other ores in the hodgepodge of mines in the Sierra Nevada. Over the decades, streams and groundwater washed mercury-laden sediment out of the old mine tailings and swept it into San Francisco Bay.I don't eat much fish, and the levels of mercury in my blood were modest. But I wondered what would happen if I gorged on large fish for a meal or two. So one afternoon I bought some halibut and swordfish at a fish market in the old Ferry Building on San Francisco Bay. Both were caught in the ocean just outside the Golden Gate, where they might have picked up mercury from the old mines. That night I ate the halibut with basil and a dash of soy sauce; I downed the swordfish for breakfast with eggs (cooked in my nonstick pan).Twenty-four hours later I had my blood drawn and retested. My level of mercury had more than doubled, from 5 micrograms per liter to a higher-than-recommended 12. Mercury at 70 or 80 micrograms per liter is dangerous for adults, says Leo Trasande, and much lower levels can affect children. "Children have suffered losses in IQ at 5.8 micrograms." He advises me to avoid repeating the gorge experiment.It's a lot harder to dodge the PBDE flame retardants responsible for the most worrisome of my test results. My world—and yours—has become saturated with them since they were introduced about 30 years ago.Scientists have found the compounds planetwide, in polar bears in the Arctic, cormorants in England, and killer whales in the Pacific. Bergman, the Swedish chemist, and his colleagues first called attention to potential health risks in 1998 when they reported an alarming increase in PBDEs in human breast milk, from none in milk preserved in 1972 to an average of four ppb in 1997.The compounds escape from treated plastic and fabrics in dust particles or as gases that cling to dust. People inhale the dust; infants crawling on the floor get an especially high dose. Bergman describes a family, tested in Oakland, California, by the Oakland Tribune, whose two small children had blood levels even higher than mine. When he and his colleagues summed up the test results for six different PBDEs, they found total levels of 390 ppb in the five-year-old girl and 650 ppb—twice my total—in the 18-month-old boy.In 2001, researchers in Sweden fed young mice a PBDH mixture similar to one used in furniture and found that they did poorly on tests of learning, memory, and behavior. Last year, scientists at Berlin's Charité University Medical School reported that pregnant female rats with PBDE levels no higher than mine gave birth to male pups with impaired reproductive health.Linda Birnbaum, an EPA expert on these flame retardants, says that researchers will have to identify many more people with high PBDE exposures, like the Oakland family and me, before they will be able to detect any human effects. Bergman says that in a pregnant woman my levels would be of concern. "Any level above a hundred parts per billion is a risk to newboms," he guesses. No one knows for sure.Any margin of safety may be narrowing. In a review of several studies, Ronald Hites of Indiana University found an exponential rise in people and animals, with the levels doubling every three to five years. Now the CDC is putting a comprehensive study of PBDE levels in the U.S. on a fast track, with results due out late this year. Pirkle, who is running the study, says my seemingly extreme levels may no longer be out of the ordinary. "We'll let you know," he says.Given the stakes, why take a chance on these chemicals? Why not immediately ban them? In 2004, Europe did just that for the penta- and octa-BDEs, which animal tests suggest are the most toxic of the compounds. California will also ban these forms by 2008, and in 2004 Chemtura, an Indiana company that is the only U.S. maker of pentas and octas, agreed to phase them out. Currently, there are no plans to ban the much more prevalent deca-BDEs. They reportedly break down more quickly in the environment and in people, although their breakdown products may include the same old pentas and octas.Nor is it clear that banning a suspect chemical is always the best option. Flaming beds and airplane seats are not an inviting prospect either. The University of Surrey in England recently assessed the risks and benefits of flame retardants in consumer products. The report concluded: "The benefits of many flame retardants in reducing the risk from fire outweigh the risks to human health."Except for some pollutants, after all, every industrial chemical was created for a purpose. Even DDT, the archvillain of Rachel Carson's 1962 classic book Silent Spring, which launched the modern environmental movement, was once hailed as a miracle substance because it killed the mosquitoes that carry malaria, yellow lever, and other scourges. It saved countless lives before it was banned in much of the world because of its toxicity to wildlife. "Chemicals are not all bad," says Scott Phillips, a medical toxicologist in Denver. "While we have seen some cancer rates rise," he says, "we also have seen a doubling of the human life span in the past century."The key is knowing more about these substances, so we are not blindsided by unexpected hazards, says California State Senator Deborah Ortiz, chair of the Senate Health Committee and the author of a bill to monitor chemical exposure. "We benefit from these chemicals, but there are consequences, and we need to understand these consequences much better than we do now." Sarah Brozena of the industry-supported American Chemistry Council thinks safeguards are adequate now, but she concedes: "That's not to say this process was done right in the past."The European Union last year gave initial approval to a measure called REACH—Registration, Evaluation, and Authorization of Chemicals—which would require companies to prove the substances they market or use are safe, or that the benefits outweigh any risks. The bill, which the chemical industry and the U.S. government oppose, would also encourage companies to find safer alternatives to suspect flame retardants, pesticides, solvents, and other chemicals. That would give a boost to the so-called green chemistry movement, a search for alternatives that is already under way in laboratories on both sides of the Atlantic.As unsettling as my journey down chemical lane was, it left out thousands of compounds, among them pesticides, plastics, solvents, and a rocket-fuel ingredient called perchlorate that is polluting groundwater in many regions of the country. Nor was I tested for chemical cocktails—mixtures of chemicals that may do little harm on their own but act together to damage human cells. Mixed together, pesticides, PCBs, phthalates, and others "might have additive effects, or they might be antagonistic," says James Pirkle of the CDC, "or they may do nothing. We don't know."Soon after I receive my results, I show them to my internist, who admits that he too knows little about these chemicals, other than lead and mercury. But he confirms that I am healthy, as far as he can tell. He tells me not to worry. So I'll keep flying, and scrambling my eggs on Teflon, and using that scented shampoo. But I'll never feel quite the same about the chemicals that make life better in so many ways.Extras: See photos, field notes, and more from this National Geographic article.",
"Concerns over BPA's potentially toxic effects led manufacturers to develop a range of similar-looking alternatives. But mounting research suggests these, too, may pose health risks.The study started as an accident. Geneticist Patricia Hunt of Washington State University and her team were investigating the reproductive effects of BPA in mice. Housed in BPA-free plastic cages, the test group got doses of BPA through a dropper; the control group didn't.Everything seemed rosy—until it wasn't.“Our control data just started to get really wonky,” Hunt says. The differences between it and the test group vanished, and many control mice started showing genetic issues. Though initially confused, the team discovered that some of the plastic caging was damaged and was leaching bisphenol S, or BPS—an alternative to the now infamous plastic component BPA.It was like déjà vu, Hunt says. Twenty years ago, she’d had the same issue with BPA in polycarbonate mouse cages. Now her study of the effects of several BPA alternatives, prompted by the latest accidental findings, suggests that these replacements impact reproduction in mice in much the same way.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.Of course, it's hard to draw conclusions between the effects in these tiny furry critters and those in our comparatively massive fleshy forms, but the latest work adds to a growing body of evidence that suggests all is not safe in the world of BPA-free plastics. What's more, the study underlines a broader issue in commercial compound development: When chemicals are removed from the market, they're often replaced by others that not only look similar—but act similarly in our bodies.“We have to play catch up as disease detectives,” says Leonardo Trasande, director of the division of environmental pediatrics at NYU Langone Health, who was not involved in the research. But this detective work is a losing proposition, he says likening it to a game of “chemical whack-a-mole.”Bisphenol A, or BPA, is a common building block in resins and some types of plastic. It's what's known as an endocrine disrupting compound. In the body, these chemicals can act like hormones or disrupt normal hormone functions.“What's kind of disturbing about this is hormones regulate almost everything in our bodies,” says Johanna Rochester, senior scientist with the nonprofit The Endocrine Disruption Exchange, who was not involved in the work. In the case of BPA, concerns surround its estrogen-mimicking effects.In the past couple decades, research on BPA has exploded. A slew of studies document negative reproductive, developmental, and metabolic effects in a menagerie of wildlife— rhesus monkeys, zebrafish, nematodes, and mice. Even human studies have linked BPA to a range of health issues.In the 1950s, BPA was used in the first epoxy resins. Soon after, Bayer and General Electric discovered the molecules had a nifty trick: They could link together with a small connector compound to form a shiny, hard plastic known as polycarbonate.Soon, BPA was everywhere: reusable water bottles, plastic plates, the liners in canned foods, sippy cups, grocery receipts, and even some dental sealants. But as people drank from their water bottles and ate their microwaved dinners, they were unknowingly dosing themselves with small amounts of BPA that leached from the plastic containers into their food and drink.The compound has since become so ubiquitous that of the 2,517 people tested in the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's 2003-2004 National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey, 93 percent had detectable levels of BPA in their urine.Mounting public pressure pushed companies to move away from BPA, leading to an influx of products touting their “BPA-free” status. But the FDA only officially bans the compound from use in baby bottles, sippy cups, and infant formula packaging. According to the FDA website: "Studies pursued by FDA's National Center for Toxicological Research (NCTR) have shown no effects of BPA from low-dose exposure."Since BPA-free became trendy, manufacturers went on a plastic-developing spree, creating more variations than scientists can keep track of: BPS, BPF, BPAF, BPZ, BPP, BHPF, and the list goes on. They all have “BP” in their names because they share the same basic chemical structure of a bisphenol. Each new version has only slight differences, as if swapping a blue Lego block for a red one.The latest study adds to the mounting research that suggests consumers aren't off the hook buying BPA-free plastic. The results show that common BPA replacements—BPS, BPF, BPAF and diphenyl sulphone—can interfere with what Hunt characterizes as “the very, very, very, very earliest part of making eggs and sperm.”Mice—and humans—normally get one copy of genetic material from each parent and then splice together bits of each to form the chromosome they pass on to the next generation. Hunt and her team found that BPA and its alternatives disrupt this process in a way that could eventually cause a decrease in sperm counts in males and a reduction in egg quality in females. What’s more, the changes can be passed down to subsequent generations.Though gaps remain in understanding how the range of BPA alternatives affect humans, researchers are concerned. “They look a lot like BPA,” says Hunt. “It stands to reason that they're going to behave a lot like BPA.” Rochester agrees, saying that such a conclusion “is not a huge leap.” And this is hardly the only study suggesting negative effects from BPA alternatives. Dozens have been published in the past year alone.“It speaks to the reality we need to regulate chemicals, not one by one, but in a class—in a way that allows us to tackle compounds that function with similar structure,” Trasande says.Scientists have a term to describe this analogous chemical swapping: regrettable substitutes. And the issue isn't limited to BPA. Many groups of compounds are suffering from the problem of too-similar replacements, including flame retardants (used in furniture, vehicles, and electronics), phthalates (used in cosmetics, personal care products, adhesives, plastics, and pharmaceuticals), and polyfluoroalkyl substances (used in nonstick products like teflon).There are startlingly few regulations to keep this from happening. And many of the tests to identify endocrine disruptors such as BPA are outdated. “The old standard toxicology testing methods were devised decades ago,” says Hunt. “And they're pretty crude techniques.”While many government studies only show effects of BPA at high doses, numerous independent academic researchers have demonstrated BPA's low-dose negative effects as well. To reconcile these differences, three government bodies—the National Institute of Environmental Health Sciences (NIEHS), the National Toxicology Program (NTP), and the Food and Drug Administration (FDA)—recently teamed up with a group of independent researchers to undertake a massive multimillion-dollar study called CLARITY-BPA (Consortium Linking Academic and Regulatory Insights on BPA Toxicity). Each team looked at different effects, but all used the same basic experimental framework. Ultimately this type of work could lead to better toxicology testing, says Hunt.The final results of their tests will be released Thursday, after this story is published. But scientists are already perturbed by the draft report released last February that details the regulatory side of the results. Overall, the results of the draft study again conclude BPA has “minimal effects” at low doses. The FDA did not reply to a request for comment.“It's a great idea; it was really what we need to improve toxicology testing,” says Hunt, but she adds, “there's a lot of problems with the CLARITY.” From issues with controls to selection of study animals to contamination of the system—much like what inspired Hunt’s latest study—outside scientists argue that many factors futzed with the final result.There’s a small glimmer of hope at the end of the plastic rainbow. “The good news is, if you can eliminate all of these things from the face of the world, we could go back,” says Hunt. The latest study found that if the researchers stopped dosing the mice with BPA alternatives, the males returned to normal in just four generations.Consumers can also take steps to avoid BPA alternatives entirely, notes Trasande. He suggests steering clear of plastics with the recycling numbers 3, 6, and 7, which all contain compounds of concern. Don’t put plastics in dishwashers or the microwave, which can damage them and cause them to leach more BPA or its alternatives. Throw away plastic when it looks aged or scratched. And opt for glass or steel containers rather than lined aluminum cans whenever possible.For regulators, Rochester says there's no time to waste in making moves away from BPA alternatives. “We don't really want to wait another 20 years for all these human studies to show that there is a problem,” she says. “We can't go down that road again.”",
"Smokers around the world buy roughly 6.5 trillion cigarettes each year. That’s 18 billion every day. While most of a cigarette’s innards and paper wrapping disintegrate when smoked, not everything gets burned. Trillions of cigarette filters—also known as butts or ends—are left over, only an estimated third of which make it into the trash. The rest are casually flung into the street or out a window.“There's something about flicking that cigarette butt,” says Cindy Zipf, executive director of Clean Ocean Action. “It's so automatic.”Cigarette filters are made of a plastic called cellulose acetate. When tossed into the environment, they dump not only that plastic, but also the nicotine, heavy metals, and many other chemicals they’ve absorbed into the surrounding environment.Cigarette butts are the top plastic polluters, with an estimated two-thirds of the trillions of filters used each year tossed into the environment.A recent study found that cigarette butts inhibit plant growth. They also routinely get into waterways, and eventually oceans.Zipf said cigarette butts have long been at or near the top of the list of items her organization finds during beach cleanups. The billions more that remain in the water are hazardous to marine animals, which can eat them, she said.“They look a lot more like a morsel of food on a sea surface,” says Zipf.The pollution problem has only gotten worse in recent years as e-cigarettes have become more popular, she said, because those too are largely made of plastic.“It's becoming so pervasive,” says Zipf, of both e-cigarette use and the accompanying plastic waste. “It's just a different form of the same thing.”People have been smoking or chewing tobacco for millennia. By the 1800s paper cigarettes had joined cigars, pipes, and snuff as common forms of tobacco consumption. But the invention of the cigarette rolling machine at the end of the century—which drastically increased production—started the cigarette on its path to popularity.The 20th century saw an explosion of smoking. In 1900 American adults smoked an average of 54 cigarettes per year. By 1960, that number had climbed to more than 4,000. For most of that period, cigarette filters were nonexistent. But, slowly, the health impacts of smoking became clear.Starting in the late 1930s, scientists began making connections between cigarettes and public health risks. In 1957 the Surgeon General officially declared a causal link between smoking and lung cancer. By 1964 the agency had commissioned and released a comprehensive report highlighting “a 70 percent increase in the mortality rate of smokers over non-smokers.”As public concern mounted, the tobacco companies scrambled for solutions, one of which was cigarette filters.“There was this whole attempt to reduce tar and nicotine,” says Tom Novotny, an epidemiologist at San Diego State University who was one of the first people to research the environmental impacts of cigarettes.By the late 1950s, sales of filtered cigarettes had overtaken those of unfiltered cigarettes.Tobacco companies, Novotny said, tried a variety of different filter materials, such as cotton, charcoal, and food starch, before landing on a plastic fiber called cellulose acetate, which remains the polymer of choice today.“There's still widespread misunderstanding about what [filters] are made of,” says Novotny. “A lot of smokers think it's biodegradable already.”Filters store some of the chemicals that smokers inhale—not really enough to help smokers' health, but enough to kill fish that live near discarded butts leaching toxins.Filters can take years to degrade and, even as they do, they break down into tiny pieces of plastic, called microplastics, which are an increasing hazard in waterways and oceans. Cigarette butts also carry a heavy load of toxic materials that can be harmful to nearby marine life, a threat that Novotny tested in the lab.“One cigarette butt in a liter [of water],” he said of his findings, “kills half the fish.”When Cindy Zipf goes out on her beach cleanups, it’s normal for her to find cigarette butts. But about five years ago Zipf started to see a new kind of plastic item: e-cigarettes.“They're hard plastic all around,” she says. “They look like little drives for computers.”Electronic cigarettes generally consist of four components: the cartridge or pod that holds the “e-juice” solution, a heating element, a battery, and a mouthpiece. While the pods are now replaceable, at first the whole contraption was entirely single-use. The plastic and circuitry all went straight into the garbage—or the street.The use of e-cigarettes has skyrocketed. The leading manufacturer, Juul, for example, saw its sales increase nearly sevenfold between 2014 and 2017. The FDA called the rise in use among youth especially “startling.” Today, more than 10 million Americans use e-cigarettes.As the prevalence of e-cigarettes has grown, so has the need to get rid of the waste. But their mix of electronic components and nicotine puts them in a grey area for disposal, said Yogi Hendlin, a professor at the University of California, San Francisco and one of the leading researchers on the subject.“E-cigarettes are viewed both as hazardous waste and e-waste,” he explains, noting that when he goes to high schools, he often finds “hundreds” of Juul pods in the parking lot. “From the regulatory side we haven't been able to find a way to deal with this.”The effects of e-cigarette waste on the environment are only starting to be studied. Novotny, for instance, has begun looking into the toxicity to marine life, as he did with cigarette butts.On beaches, Zipf said the plastic pods were piling up so fast that her organization was considering making them a permanent fixture of the collection scorecard that volunteers take with them as they tally items.Zipf says: “We seem to keep coming up with new and different uses—wasteful uses—for plastic.”Three things you can do to be part of the solution:1. Quit smoking.2. Roll your own.3. Don’t use e-cigarettes unless they can be recycled.The city of San Francisco spends some $7.5 million a year cleaning up cigarette butts, and is far from the only municipality dealing with such waste.“It’s the last remaining acceptable form of littering,” says Novotny. “People are more likely to pick up their dog poop than cigarette butts.”Novotny proposes a radical solution: Ban cigarette butts altogether.Filters, he said, haven’t been shown to improve health outcomes. They may even be making the problem worse because they make smoking a less harsh experience and give people a sense that they are doing less harm. He also notes the environmental benefits, and has argued for a ban on single-use plastic filters, a step that the California state senate is currently considering.“It's a major intervention that I think could work,” he says.Hendlin agreed that change was only likely to come through legislative pressure. He pointed to documents showing that the R.J. Reynolds tobacco company was exploring biodegradable filters as far back as the 1970s, yet cellulose acetate remains the standard today. Most companies, he says, have also explored alternative filter materials, but “haven't pulled the trigger because they haven't been forced.”"They are ready, if unwilling," says Hendlin.Companies argue that filters are key to keeping emissions in line with regulations and that it’s consumers who are holding up adoption of filter replacements.Imperial, one of the largest tobacco brands in the country, tested paper filters in France, but according to a spokesperson, “Sadly, it was commercially unsuccessful.” Consumers, he said, didn’t like the taste.As Simon Cleverly, with British American Tobacco, puts it: “There is currently no feasible alternative to cellulose acetate for filters.”A number of companies claim to make more environmentally friendly products, such as Smokey Treats and Greenbutts. The president of Greenbutts, Tadas Lisauskas, says the company is in negotiations with major manufacturers to implement their filters. But both Novotny and Hendlin are skeptical that startups like these address the root of the problem: people's proclivity to litter cigarette butts.E-cigarettes pose a similarly vexing plastic problem. The pods must be rinsed before being thrown in the normal trash and as of 2018, Juul tweeted, it didn’t “currently have a recycling program available.”Hendlin says reengineering e-cigarettes to use less, or no, plastic would be an expensive proposition that companies seem loathe to undertake. He suggests that a deposit system, such as the one for propane canisters, might be a better route.“When you went to buy your next set of pods,” he says, “you exchange your old cartridges for your new ones and you get your [money] back.”A spokesperson for Juul Labs says the company is already exploring a similar option and testing it internally. “We are committed to responsible stewardship and environmental sustainability,” he says in an email. “We take environmental impact seriously.”There have been some steps toward addressing the plastic hazards that cigarettes pose. In 2016 India banned the use of plastic packaging for tobacco products. This year in New Jersey, a law went into effect that limits smoking and vaping in public parks and on beaches. But Zipf says many people will probably continue to flick their butts or drop their pods—and the plastics that accompany them—where they aren’t supposed to.“I think it's ignorance of convenience,” she says. “There's really no excuse for it.”How your toothbrush became a part of the plastic crisisWhy carrying your own fork and spoon helps solve the plastic crisisThe sticky problem of plastic wrapThis common plastic packaging is a recycling nightmareHow the plastic bottle went from miracle container to hated garbageHow tampons and pads became so unsustainableTires: The plastic polluter you never thought aboutCan medical care exist without plastic?Your shoes are made of plastic. Here’s why.",
"A million plastic beverage bottles were purchased each minute as of 2017. The plastic bottle's journey from convenience to curse has played out quickly—in a single generation.The moment the modern plastic beverage bottle changed the world’s drinking habits is difficult to pinpoint. The day New York supermodels began carrying tall bottles of Evian water as an accessory on fashion show catwalks in the late 1980s surely signaled the future ahead. Billions of bottles were sold on the promise that bottled water is good for hair and skin, healthier than soft drinks and safer than tap water. And it didn’t take consumers long to buy into the notion that they needed water within reach virtually everywhere they went.Plastic bottles and bottle caps are the third and fourth most collected plastic trash in the Ocean Conservancy’s annual beach cleanups.What sets bottles apart from other plastic products born in the post-World War II rise of consumerism is the sheer speed with which the beverage bottle, now ubiquitous around the world, has shifted from convenience to curse. The transition played out in a single generation.“The plastic bottle transformed the beverage industry and it changed our habits in many ways,” says Peter Gleick, co-founder and president emeritus of the Pacific Institute in Oakland, California, and author of Bottled and Sold: The Story Behind Our Obsession with Bottled Water.“We’ve become a society that seems to think if we don’t have water at hand, terrible things will happen. It’s kind of silly. It’s not as though anybody died from thirst in the old days,” he says.By 2016, the year sales of bottled water in the United States officially surpassed soft drinks, the world had awakened to the burgeoning crisis of plastic waste. The backlash against the glut of discarded bottles clogging waterways, polluting the oceans and littering the interior has been swift. Suddenly, carrying plastic bottles of water around is uncool.What is cool is wearing them: Hip fashion translates into designer clothes made of recycled water bottles. There’s even a growing market of luxury, stainless steel refillables, including a limited-edition bottle covered with thousands of Swarovski crystals that sells for almost $2,000.Plastic bottles and bottle caps rank as the third and fourth most collected plastic trash items in the Ocean Conservancy’s annual September beach cleanups in more than 100 countries. Activists are zeroing in on the bottle as next in line for banning, after plastic shopping bags. The tiny towns of Concord, Massachusetts and Bundanoon, Australia already have banned bottles, as have numerous public parks, museums, universities, and zoos in Europe and the United States.The developing world—where 2.2 billion people still do not have access to clean drinking water, according to the United Nations, and bottled water is often the only safe option—is getting out ahead of the problem. In June, Kenya announced a ban on single-use plastics at beaches and in national parks, forests, and conservation areas, effective in June 2020, and the South Delhi Municipal Corporation banned disposable water bottles in all city offices.Consumers have been drinking bottled beverages for more than a century, first in glass bottles, then in steel and, later, aluminum cans. Early plastic bottles showed promise as a lightweight alternative, but they leached chemicals and failed to contain carbonated drinks. If the bottle didn’t explode, the carbonation fizzled. It wasn’t until the 1970s when a miracle plastic known as PET came along and changed the game.Polyethylene terephthalate has been around since 1941. Du Pont chemists developed it while experimenting with polymers to make textiles. In 1973 Nathaniel Wyeth, another Du Pont scientist, patented the first PET bottle. It was lightweight, safe, cheap—and recyclable. In other words, it was the perfect container to set the stage for the bottle binge that followed.Perrier and Evian crossed the Atlantic at around that time, launching the bottled water craze. PepsiCo finally joined the water business and introduced Aquafina in 1994. Coke followed with Dansani in 1999. Both brands use refiltered tap water. Between 1994 and 2017, water sales in the United States had grown by 284 percent, according to Beverage Marketing Corp. data published by the Wall Street Journal.Between 1960 and 1970, the average person bought between 200 and 250 packaged drinks ever year, Elizabeth Royte reported in her book Bottlemania, citing data from the Container Recycling Institute. Most of those purchases, she added, involved refillable bottles. As of 2017, on a global scale a million plastic beverage bottles were purchased every minute, according to data from Euromonitor International’s global packaging trends report, published in 2017 by The Guardian. Today, plastic bottles and jars represent about 75 percent of all plastic containers, by weight, in the United States, according to the Plastics Industry Association.Ramani Narayan, a chemical engineering professor at Michigan State University, cautions that to focus entirely on the numbers and overuse of plastic bottles is to miss the essence of the problem.“There is an overuse of plastic bottles that needs to be curtailed,” he says. “But the problem is misuse of bottles at the end of their life. The issue is recovery of the product and incentives to recycle, and the commitment on the part of regulators, as well as brand owners, to only use bottles that contain at least 50 percent recycled plastic. Or 60 percent. They are not making that commitment.”As the public’s focus on the plastic waste crisis narrows, the world is awash with solutions for bottles. Generally, they fall into two categories: efforts to reduce the use of plastic bottles and efforts to find new ways to deal with bottles once they’re thrown away.Just in London, efforts to reduce plastic bottles abound. Mayor Sadiq Khan announced plans to build 100 new fountains for refillable bottles. Last spring, runners in the London Marathon were handed edible seaweed pouches at mile 23 containing a sports drink to slake their thirst. And Selfridges, London’s century-old department store, has vanquished plastic beverage bottles from its food court in favor of glass bottles, aluminum cans, and refilling stations.Once bottles have become trash, entrepreneurs around the world are turning them into printer ink cartridges, fence posts, roofing tiles, carpets, flooring, and boats, to name only a few items. Even houses have been constructed from bottles. The latest is a three-story modern on the banks of the Meteghan River in Nova Scotia, promoted as able to withstand a Category 5 hurricane. It only took 612,000 bottles.In laboratories, new versions of bottles claiming to be biodegradable or compostable appear regularly, and plastic industry chemists are experimenting with “chemical recycling” that returns the polymers to their constituent monomers, enabling them to be remade multiple times into new plastic bottles.Many of the solutions are not scalable to a level that would make a noticeable difference, and most of them—including biodegradables—still require that the most elemental and least functional part of the bottle’s lifespan be performed: Someone needs to pick them all up.Recycling rates remain low. In 2016 fewer than half the bottles bought worldwide were collected. In the United States, new PET bottles contain only 7 percent recycled content, said Susan Collins, executive director of the Container Recycling Institute. Although consumers of soft drinks dutifully returned glass bottles and collected the refund in the decades before PET was invented, beverage companies have long strongly promoted recycling, and vigorously opposed bottle deposit legislation, arguing bottle bills cost them too much money.Beverage companies have pledged to use more recycled bottles in manufacturing, a goal that aims to reduce the production of new resin and boosts recycling numbers by adding value to bottle recovery.PepsiCo pledged to increase recycled content in all its plastic packaging 25 percent by 2025. Nestle Waters vowed to make all of its packaging recyclable by 2025 and increase recycled content in bottles to 35 percent by 2025 globally and to 50 percent in the United States, focusing on Poland Spring. Additionally, recycled content for European brands will increase to 50 percent by 2025.Coca-Cola pledged to recycle a used bottle or can for every one the company sells by 2030 and increase recycled material in plastic bottles to 50 percent by 2030.Three things you can do to be part of the solution:1. Carry a reusable bottle.2. Choose aluminum cans over plastic when possible.3. Recycle all plastic bottles.Mark Murray, executive director of Californians Against Waste, says recovery of plastic waste won’t improve much until it is given greater value, achieved through additional cost of the product.“If a company chooses to sell me water in a single-serving container, I should have to pay the full cost of delivering that water in a single-serving container, which includes recovering that container as waste. These voluntary efforts are nice. But the key is getting the pricing right.”Ben Jordan, Coke’s senior director of environmental policy, said Coke was reevaluating bottle deposit programs around the world, as well as five major types of recycling systems globally to determine at the local level how to maximize recovery of plastic waste. He noted that Coke’s Mexico City operations recycle virtually 100 percent of PET.“We all agree on the issue,” he says. “Are there ways that don’t require packaging at all? Are there places where you can bring your own packaging? For all the packages out there, whether a PET bottle or aluminum can, how can we make it more sustainable than it was yesterday?”Bart Elmore, a professor at Ohio State University and author of Citizen Coke: The Making of Coca-Cola Capitalism, says beverage companies would be wise to take a lesson from their own history. Put a price on a bottle and you’ll get it back.How your toothbrush became a part of the plastic crisisWhy carrying your own fork and spoon helps solve the plastic crisisThe sticky problem of plastic wrapThis common plastic packaging is a recycling nightmareCigarette butts are toxic plastic pollution. Should they be banned?How tampons and pads became so unsustainableTires: The plastic polluter you never thought aboutCan medical care exist without plastic?Your shoes are made of plastic. Here’s why.",
"Drinking from a single water bottle left in the hot sun won't hurt you, but experts say consumers should avoid persistant exposure to plastic containers left in extreme heat.Millions of people along the East Coast and in the Midwestern United States are under a heat watch this weekend as a massive heat wave bears down. This scorching July weekend follows what NOAA recently reported was the hottest June on record.But before you reach for a plastic water bottle to keep hydrated, you might think twice about whether it too has been wilting under a hot sun.“The hotter it gets, the more the stuff in plastic can move into food or drinking water,” says Rolf Halden, director of the Center for Environmental Health Engineering at Arizona State University’s Biodesign Institute.Most plastic items release a tiny amount of chemicals into the beverages or food they contain. As temperature and time increase, the chemical bonds in the plastic increasingly break down and chemicals are more likely to leach. According to the FDA, the amounts of the chemicals are too minuscule to cause health problems, but scientists looking at the long-term effects of filling our lives with plastic say all those small doses could add up in a big way.Most of the water bottles you find on supermarket shelves are made of a plastic called polyethylene terephthalate, or PET. It’s recognizable by the recycling number one and accepted by most curbside recycling programs.A study conducted by scientists at Arizona State University in 2008 looked at how heat sped up the release of antimony in PET bottles. Antimony is used to manufacture the plastic and can be toxic in high doses, the NIH reports. In mild, 70-degree weather, the researchers measured safe levels of the chemical in the bottled water. But the hotter the day, the less time it took for water to become contaminated.A hot car can reach temperatures over 150 degrees Fahrenheit in the summer. In experiments, it took 38 days for water bottles heated to that temperature in a lab to show levels of antimony that exceeded safety recommendations.“As a general rule, yes, heat helps break down chemical bonds in plastics like plastic bottles, and those chemicals can migrate into beverages they contain,” emails Julia Taylor, a scientist who researched plastic at the University of Missouri.In 2014 scientists found high traces of antimony and a toxic compound called BPA in water sold in Chinese water bottles. In 2016 scientists found high antimony levels in bottled water sold in Mexico. Both studies tested water under conditions that exceeded 150 degrees Fahrenheit, representing worst-case scenarios.According to industry group the International Bottled Water Association, bottled water should be kept in the same conditions that consumers keep other groceries.“Bottled water has an important role in emergency situations. If you’re at risk of dehydration, it doesn’t matter what container that comes in. But for the average consumer,” says Halden, “there is really no benefit for using all these bottles.”Water bottles that can be used repeatedly are most often made from high-density polyethylene (HDPE) or polycarbonate. HDPE is largely accepted by recycling programs (recycling code number two), but polycarbonate is more difficult to recycle (recycling code number seven).To make those bottles hard and shiny, manufacturers often use bisphenol-A or BPA, a compound that has come under fire for its toxicity. BPA is an endocrine disrupter, which means it can disrupt normal hormone function and lead to a slew of dangerous health issues. Studies have linked the compound to breast cancer.The FDA bans BPA from baby bottles and sippy cups, but has found no evidence to support additional restrictions.Regardless, many manufacturers have responded to consumer concerns by making their products BPA free.“’BPA free’ does not necessarily mean ‘safe,’" says Taylor. She notes that bisphenol-S is often used as an alternative even though it’s "structurally similar to BPA and turns out to have very similar properties.“(Learn more about why “BPA-free” doesn’t always mean better.)Fewer studies have been done on what happens to water when left in reusable water containers in high temperatures, but research done by pouring boiling water into polycarbonate indicated that more BPA leached out as a result.“The bottom line is that glass is better than plastic, wherever possible,” says Taylor. “Otherwise, the message should be to keep the water bottle in a bag or covered when not in use (not exposed to bright sunlight for long periods of time) and not to leave plastic bottles in a hot car as temperatures rise fast at this time of year.”Ultimately, the amount of trace chemicals a person might consume from a plastic food or beverage containers left in the heat won’t derail their health. But Halden says we should be concerned about how much plastic we surround ourselves with on a daily basis.“If you drink water from one PET bottle, will that hurt your health? Probably not,” he says. “But if you go through 20 bottles a day, then the question of safety is an entirely different one.”He notes that the cumulative effect of being surrounded by plastics in the goods we buy or microplastics in our water has the biggest potential health impact.Personally, Halden opts for a metal water bottle instead of a reusable plastic one when trying to stay hydrated on the go.“If you don’t want it in your body, don’t increase the material flow of it into society,” he says.",
"Children play on the shore of Manila Bay in the Philippines, which is polluted by plastic waste.Plastic pollution has become one of the most pressing environmental issues, as rapidly increasing production of disposable plastic products overwhelms the world’s ability to deal with them. Plastic pollution is most visible in developing Asian and African nations, where garbage collection systems are often inefficient or nonexistent. But the developed world, especially in countries with low recycling rates, also has trouble properly collecting discarded plastics. Plastic trash has become so ubiquitous it has prompted efforts to write a global treaty negotiated by the United Nations.Plastics made from fossil fuels are just over a century old. Production and development of thousands of new plastic products accelerated after World War II, so transforming the modern age that life without plastics would be unrecognizable today. Plastics revolutionized medicine with life-saving devices, made space travel possible, lightened cars and jets—saving fuel and pollution—and saved lives with helmets, incubators, and equipment for clean drinking water.The conveniences plastics offer, however, led to a throw-away culture that reveals the material’s dark side: today, single-use plastics account for 40 percent of the plastic produced every year. Many of these products, such as plastic bags and food wrappers, have a lifespan of mere minutes to hours, yet they may persist in the environment for hundreds of years.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.Some key facts:Most of the plastic trash in the oceans, Earth’s last sink, flows from land. Trash is also carried to sea by major rivers, which act as conveyor belts, picking up more and more trash as they move downstream. Once at sea, much of the plastic trash remains in coastal waters. But once caught up in ocean currents, it can be transported around the world.On Henderson Island, an uninhabited atoll in the Pitcairn Group isolated halfway between Chile and New Zealand, scientists found plastic items from Russia, the United States, Europe, South America, Japan, and China. They were carried to the South Pacific by the South Pacific gyre, a circular ocean current.Once at sea, sunlight, wind, and wave action break down plastic waste into small particles, often less than one-fifth of an inch across. These so-called microplastics are spread throughout the water column and have been found in every corner of the globe, from Mount Everest, the highest peak, to the Mariana Trench, the deepest trough.Microplastics are breaking down further into smaller and smaller pieces. Plastic microfibers, meanwhile, have been found in municipal drinking water systems and drifting through the air.Millions of animals are killed by plastics every year, from birds to fish to other marine organisms. Nearly 700 species, including endangered ones, are known to have been affected by plastics. Nearly every species of seabird eats plastics.Most of the deaths to animals are caused by entanglement or starvation. Seals, whales, turtles, and other animals are strangled by abandoned fishing gear or discarded six-pack rings. Microplastics have been found in more than 100 aquatic species, including fish, shrimp, and mussels destined for our dinner plates. In many cases, these tiny bits pass through the digestive system and are expelled without consequence. But plastics have also been found to have blocked digestive tracts or pierced organs, causing death. Stomachs so packed with plastics reduce the urge to eat, causing starvation.Plastics have been consumed by land-based animals, including elephants, hyenas, zebras, tigers, camels, cattle, and other large mammals, in some cases causing death.Tests have also confirmed liver and cell damage and disruptions to reproductive systems, prompting some species, such as oysters, to produce fewer eggs. New research shows that larval fish are eating nanofibers in the first days of life, raising new questions about the effects of plastics on fish populations.Once in the ocean, it is difficult—if not impossible—to retrieve plastic waste. Mechanical systems, such as Mr. Trash Wheel, a litter interceptor in Maryland’s Baltimore Harbor, can be effective at picking up large pieces of plastic, such as foam cups and food containers, from inland waters. But once plastics break down into microplastics and drift throughout the water column in the open ocean, they are virtually impossible to recover.The solution is to prevent plastic waste from entering rivers and seas in the first place, many scientists and conservationists—including the National Geographic Society—say. This could be accomplished with improved waste management systems and recycling, better product design that takes into account the short life of disposable packaging, and reduction in manufacturing of unnecessary single-use plastics.",
"A bottled water plant in Hollis, Maine, has reduced the plastic in its half-liter bottles by 62 percent since 1994. But the industry could do even more to reduce plastic pollution, some countries say.Nairobi, KenyaIt didn’t take long after the recent United Nations environmental assembly in Kenya ended for environmentalists to sharply rebuke the United States for allegedly derailing global ambitions to prevent plastic debris from flowing into the oceans.“The tyranny of the minority,” their statement declared as environmentalists denounced the Americans for what they said was slowing progress on marine plastics by diluting a resolution calling for phasing out single-use plastic by 2025 and blocking an effort to craft a legally binding treaty on plastic debris.Yet that unsparing critique doesn’t fully reflect the negotiations that played out in a small roof-top conference room on the UN’s campus in Kenya’s capital city of Nairobi. What happened is perhaps best viewed not as tyrannical but as isolationist, more akin to the U.S. withdrawal from the Paris climate agreement. Yes, the U.S. won concessions in Nairobi to the wording on two resolutions involving the fate of marine plastics, but it waged the argument essentially alone, with backing only from Saudi Arabia and Cuba.“I would not say the U.S. is making itself irrelevant,” says David Azoulay, a Geneva-based lawyer for the Center for International Environmental Law, who observed the negotiations. “But it is true that the U.S. is setting itself further apart, as it did with the withdrawal from the Paris accord, from addressing the critical challenges of our generation. The whole world is addressing the plastic challenge at its roots. The EU is doing it, India is doing it. The world is moving forward.”The Americans sought to define marine debris as an issue solved exclusively by waste management, said Hugo-Maria Schally, the European Union’s lead negotiator on marine plastics, in an interview, while “virtually everybody else in the room was focused on the idea that there is a problem with production and the use of single-use plastic.”So, the goal of “phasing out” single-use plastics was replaced by the vaguer wording to “significantly reducing,” and target dates for action slipped from 2025 to 2030. The documents that emerged are not legally binding. But in the end, a deadline remains in place, and a UN working group on marine plastics will continue to work the problem, with the full backing of the UN purse.“It's fair to say that the UN environmental assembly has put out a very clear message,” Schally says. “Single-use plastics are a problem. There are a variety of ways to address the issue. Waste management is one, but not the only one. We need to look at alternatives and reduce the use by 2030. That's the global message."Ola Elvestuen, Norway’s minister for climate and environment, expressed disappointment after a panel discussion about the best solutions, but not defeat. “We didn’t get the wording we wanted,” he said. “But we have enough to continue.”The only existing international treaty addressing marine debris on a global scale is MARPOL, adopted by the International Maritime Organization, which banned ships from dumping plastic waste into the oceans as of 1988–so long ago, that in the fast-accelerating world of plastics production, it is almost antique. Age aside, the trouble with MARPOL is that 80 percent of the estimated 8 million tons a year that flows into the oceans originates on land, according to research published in 2015.Not surprisingly, as the visibility of plastic waste has become more prominent, so have calls for a new international treaty that gets to the crux of the problem. In 2017, a group of seven marine scientists tracking how microplastics have altered genes, cells, and tissues in marine organisms—causing death and decreased reproduction—reviewed those findings in an opinion piece published in PNAS that urged the UN to write a new treaty on plastic pollution.Later that year, at the UN’s last environmental conference, 193 nations, including the U.S., endorsed a Clean Seas pact. It was nonbinding and toothless, though significant enough that Norway called it a strong first step.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.Adopting global treaties is not supposed to be easy. The UN is, by design, slow-moving, cumbersome, bureaucratic. It took more than a decade, Azoulay points out, for the UN to adopt a treaty protecting human health from mercury poisoning.What’s notable is how far marine plastic moved up on the agenda for this year’s conference.Delegates pushed for substantial action. Guðmundur Ingi Guðbrandsson, Iceland’s minister for the environment and natural resources, arrived in Nairobi with hopes the conference would lay the groundwork for a legally binding treaty on marine plastic.“It’s production of plastics that needs to be tackled,” he said in an interview. “We need less plastics. We need to look at how much we are putting into the system and we need to reduce that. We need to increase reuse of what we already use so that we are trashing as little as we can. Industry needs to find more solutions than we already have today and they may need a push from governments to do something.”Siim Kiisler, the UN assembly president, who also serves as Estonia’s minister of environment, opened the assembly by urging delegates to take strong action on marine debris, and called for the phasing out of single-use plastic by 2025.Even the visuals focused on plastics. A large dhow made from discarded plastic bottles and flip-flops stood tilted, as if tacking along the UN’s entry driveway, as its makers announced plans to sail from Kenya to Zanzibar to further the campaign against the plastic menace. A separate Clean Seas venue hosted day-long panel discussions throughout the entire week that drew in dozens of scientists, engineers, politicians, and activists from all corners of the world to debate best solutions.Joyce Msuya, acting director of the UN Environmental Program, cautions that global ambition “is one thing, but you have to translate that into what it means for the local condition.” Member states, she says, do not start “from the same baseline. We have to customize and look at what can be done and share the experience of what has worked elsewhere.”The two marine plastics resolutions under consideration included a proposed legally binding agreement, promoted by Norway, Japan, and Sri Lanka. The phase-out of single-use plastics, contained in the second resolution, was argued by India, drowning in an estimated 550,000 tons of mismanaged plastic waste every year, with strong support from the Philippines and other Pacific island groups.Few were surprised when the United States balked at targets, deadlines, and any reference to bans or levies on various plastic products or reductions in plastic production and consumption. The U.S. negotiators declined to be interviewed; a State Department spokesman said in a statement that the U.S. considers marine plastic “a growing issue” needing urgent action and that improved waste management is the fastest way to achieve that goal.“We support reducing the environmental impacts from the discharges of plastics,” the statement says. “And we further note that the majority of marine plastic discharges comes from only six countries in Asia where improved waste management could radically decrease these discharges.”Stewart Harris, director of marine and environment issues at the American Chemistry Council, an industry trade group, echoes the U.S. stance on waste disposal as the most practical immediate solution to reducing the flow of plastic litter to the ocean.“We are looking at actions that will make the largest impact in the shortest amount of time,” he says. Product bans, he says, do not fall into that category: “They are not the most effective and not the best use of our time and resources. They fail to address that underlying cause–the lack of infrastructure to manage waste.”By the UN’s own estimates, two in five people–or 40 percent of the global population–lack access to waste disposal systems. So far, no global entity has come up with any plan to address waste disposal on that scale.One reason other nations are also seeking reductions in single-use plastics is the growing unease that even creation of the most comprehensive waste disposal systems may not be enough to keep up with the accelerating pace of plastics manufacturing. The plastics industry has grown so rapidly that half the plastic on Earth has been made since 2005, and production is expected to double in the next two decades. Disposable plastic products account for 40 percent of that production and are largely blamed for the plastic mess that’s been made of the seas.Yet even as bans proliferate around the globe, Harris say consideration of reductions in production or consumption of plastics is premature. Too many unanswered questions remain about the effectiveness of various solutions, he says, adding: “Other discussions need to be had before that. The best answer is we’re not there yet.”The United States’ go-it-alone stance was underscored inadvertently by the crash of the Ethiopian Airlines plane the day before the assembly convened. Among the 157 people killed on board the Nairobi-bound flight were 25 UN staff members and more than two dozen delegates, presenters, and members of environmental and health NGOs heading to the conference.The aftermath of the tragedy was watched, with increasing incredulity, as the country-by-country groundings of the 737 Max jet unfolded over successive days, leaving the United States alone in its defense of the plane as safe to fly. Only after the U.K. and, finally, Canada grounded their own Max jets did the U.S. act to ground the world fleet.In the Clean Seas tent, no one spoke of the obvious similarities to the word-wrangling over the pair of marine debris resolutions. Instead, delegates shrugged off the setbacks and departed to do at home what they couldn’t achieve in Nairobi. Kiisler, the president of the assembly, told National Geographic: “Better to have a weak resolution than no resolution.”So far, 127 countries have adopted regulations regarding plastic bags, according to UN tallies as of July 2018. Twenty-seven countries have adopted bans on other single-use products, including plates, cups, cutlery, or straws.India, home to 1.3 billion people and the world’s second most-populated nation, continues preparations to abolish all single-use plastic by 2022 in a plan announced last year that may be the world’s most ambitious undertaking.The European Parliament is preparing to put into force a sweeping single-use plastics directive it passed last year that bans the single-use plastics most commonly found on European beaches by 2021 and sets up programs to significantly reduce containers and cups by 2028. With 28 mostly rich member nations, the EU is arguably the most influential world power after the UN. The latest measures have made it the world’s leading voice on the plastic crisis.",
"In Kalyan, on the outskirts of Mumbai, India, trash pickers look for sellable plastics at the dump. The country has big plans to reduce plastic waste.Chennai, IndiaAmudha, who goes by only her first name, sells flowers for a living in Chennai, one of India’s largest cities. She used to spend 15 percent of her profits buying plastic shopping bags for her sales. Now she saves that expense and wraps her customers’ flowers in the broad leaves plucked from a tree on the sidewalk.This small windfall‒she used to spend 60 rupees (0.84 USD) a day on bags‒came about at the beginning of this year, when the state of Tamil Nadu in the southernmost part of India banned 14 types of plastic, including the diaphanous bags Amudha used to buy.The ban in Tamil Nadu, home to nearly 68 million people, is part of an ambitious national campaign to rid the world’s second-most populous nation of plastic waste. Last June, as India hosted the United Nations’ World Environment Day, Prime Minister Narendra Modi announced its intention to eliminate single-use plastic by 2022.Modi’s crusade builds on efforts to ban certain single-use plastics that began in 2009, when the state of Himachal Pradesh in northern India became the first to ban plastic shopping bags. Delhi, India’s capital city, adopted a more expansive ban that included bags, cutlery, cups, and plates in 2017.By the beginning of this year, local governments in more than half of India’s 29 states and 7 territories had crafted legislation taking aim at single-use plastic. Bans on thin plastic shopping bags are the most common regulations. State government officials are also working to reduce the manufacturing of plastic by shutting down factories and preventing import of plastic products.They are also refining an effort begun in 2016 to establish “extended producer responsibility,” or EPR guidelines that require manufacturers to pay for the collection and recycling of waste their products become. And, local administrations at the city, town, and village levels have been asked to ensure that consumption, distribution, and sale of banned plastic is prevented.To people like Tania Banerjee, a writer in Mumbai, these changes couldn’t come soon enough.“Large chains like McDonald’s are no longer providing plastic straws,” she says. “I have also stopped buying bottled water and soft drinks.”India has a fairly low per capita use of plastics (24 pounds or 11 kilograms a year, compared to 240 pounds or 109 kilograms in the United States), but with a population of 1.35 billion, this translates into more than 550,000 tons of mismanaged plastic waste reaching the ocean every year.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.The Ganges and Brahmaputra Rivers, which flow thousands of miles from their headwaters in the Himalaya Mountains, both carry huge loads of plastic to their deltas in the Bay of Bengal. The Ganges alone, which provides drinking water for more than 400 million people, transports an estimated 110,000 tons of plastic every year to its mouth and ranks second only to the Yangtze River in China on a Top 20 list of rivers, published in 2017, that move the most plastic waste to the seas.In spite of India’s relatively low consumption of plastics, nearly 40 percent of the country’s plastic waste is neither collected nor recycled. It ends up polluting water supplies and soil, including agricultural land, and is consumed by stray animals, including the occasional elephant as well as India’s sacred cows. (An informal network of scrap dealers separates recyclables collected by waste pickers, but that almost never includes flimsy plastic packaging which has little or no commercial value.)Success of the bans, so far, is mixed. The types of banned products vary from state to state and both consumers and retailers say there has been confusion over what’s banned and what’s exempted, as well as uneven enforcement and buy-in from leaders.Governments face resistance from manufacturers and wholesalers of plastic products. The All India Plastic Manufacturers Association contends the ban in Maharashtra has cost manufacturers millions of dollars and tens of thousands of workers their jobs, and the Tamil Nadu Plastics Manufacturing Association has challenged the Tamil Nadu ban in court.In other regions, traders have gone on strike and some argue that the ban disproportionately and unfairly affects small retailers.Convincing consumers to shift away from the convenience of plastics is not easily accomplished. Two states that tried to ban plastics locally in 2016 and 2017 discovered how hard it is to change behavior. In Karnataka, even public officials defied a ban of single-use laminated paper cups and candidates for office used polythene banners during their campaigns. In Assam, a state heavily reliant on the Brahmaputra River, many retailers openly ignore a ban on plastic shopping bags announced last year.Delhi and Kolkata, with populations of 25.7 million and 14.7 million respectively, have the highest per capita consumption of plastic products in the country. Yet so far, neither city has strictly enforced their bans.In contrast, Mumbai, state capital of Maharashtra, India’s commercial nerve-center, began enforcing a ban last June that imposes tough penalties for people caught selling or buying 22 banned items, including disposable polystyrene plates and plastic shopping bags. First-time offenders can be fined 5,000 rupees (70 UDS)‒a stiff penalty for Mumbai’s large population of migrants who survive on the city’s thriving street food culture. Third-time offenders face a fine of 25,000 rupees (350 USD) and the possibility of spending three months in jail.By the end of last year, nearly 400 companies and manufacturing plants dealing in the banned materials were shut down. Maharashtra has issued a directive to large companies asking them to create a reserve fund for buying back and recycling single-use plastics used in food packaging.Yet progress is visible on some fronts. The restaurant and food-service industries are among the most heavily impacted; yet Swiggy, one of India’s largest food delivery apps, has vowed to provide its restaurant partners in Maharashtra and Tamil Nadu with sustainable packaging.Research into such biodegradable and plant-based materials has accelerated, even though experts have pointed out there can be problems with the way some of this stuff breaks down in the environment. Pepsi is considering a pilot project for its industrially compostable packaging in India. A recent study in the Journal of the Science of Food and Agriculture suggests that using a combination of starch, protein, and glycerol could create thin films with enough strength and flexibility to be used as an alternative to plastic.And in a number of states, the bans have been enthusiastically embraced. Maharashtra, for example, reported a 40 percent drop in plastic waste in the seven months since the ban began there.In Tamil Nadu, a government effort to educate consumers and manufacturers is considered a help. Tamil Nadu is India’s second-largest economic engine after Maharashtra and is widely seen as a relatively well-governed state‒an all-too-rare governmental condition they hope will give the plastic bans a better chance to succeed. Last summer, government offices and institutions there were asked to eliminate single-use plastic ahead of the state ban.Officials also put some of the state’s highest-ranking public administrators in charge of overseeing the launch of a ban that outlawed disposable cutlery, laminated paper cups, plastic bags, and 11 other plastic items. The Tamil Nadu Pollution Control Board also is monitoring inter-state checkpoints to prevent the influx of banned products from other regions.Those efforts have been bolstered by infomercials featuring local celebrities in the local media and a consumer education program that linked single-use plastic to pollution, poor health, overflowing drains, and breeding mosquitoes. Universities and schools have been asked to conduct workshops for students.By the first of January, street vendors who used to have small mounds of plastic waste near their shops started switching to reusable materials, paper, and plant fibers to pack and serve food. Women’s self-help groups are swamped with orders for bags made of cotton and jute. Inmates of a prison started selling cloth bags at the prison bazaar.Vendors by the beaches now give their customers paper straws with coconut water or other purchases. “Fifty or sixty years ago, straws were usually made of paper,” says Murugan, one of the vendors. “We are simply returning to the past.”Some say rural residents of Tamil Nadu are benefiting financially from the plastic ban, as demand rises for such natural materials as banana leaves (lining plates), hollow papaya stalks (straws), and lotus and areca nut leaves (packaging material).Many Indians live in multi-generational homes and there is living memory of using sustainable alternatives. Kamakshi Subramaniyan, a 93-year-old civic activist in Tamil Nadu, says she is thrilled to see people carrying bags made of cotton and jute. “We used to take metal containers with tight lids to buy oil. That should restart as well,” she adds.Like Amudha using leaves to wrap her fragrant flowers in Chennai, many others are making small changes to their lifestyles. They appear convinced that the bans will have a positive impact on their lives.Amudha’s act of reaching for a tree might be more than just a symbolic act towards a more sustainable future.",
"A boy holds up a plastic bag to receive rice being distributed as offerings by the temple authority on the Annakut festival in Kolkata, India. Many religious sites around the country are now taking steps to reduce plastic use.TRIVANDRUM, IndiaThere’s no scholarly consensus on when, exactly, the Aranmula Parthasarathy Temple was built, though there’s evidence that a temple honoring the demon-slaying, lady-charming Hindu deity Krishna has stood on this parcel of land in southwest India since the 8th century.Hundreds of years on, the temple appears to have absorbed objects and memories from nearly every year of its existence. There are murals from the 18th century and tarnished bronze deepam—oil lamps—that are at least a century old, as well as discolored patio chairs purchased sometime in the early aughts and gold streamers from a festival last winter.The newest addition: Notices in bold, black lettering, printed on white A4 paper, pasted all around the temple’s inner sanctum. “Inside the temple premises, there is a compulsory ban on mobile phones, cameras, and plastic carry bags,” they say.Disobey, and you may get stern looks from one of the dozen or so retirees who spend most of their days here, or be approached by a priest or administrator who will politely inform you that Aranmula is one of 1,058 temples in the south Indian state of Kerala that have pledged to eliminate plastic this year.“We are trying to go back to the ancient days, when there was no threat of plastic,” says A. Padmakumar, president of the Travancore Devaswom Board, an administrative body that oversees all 1,058 temples, and resident of Aranmula village. It was his idea to phase out plastic throughout Kerala temples, though he says religious leaders had been advocating for a ban for years.And the move is in line with national policy: in June, Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi announced plans to eliminate all single-use plastic in the country by 2022. Individual states across the country—including Kerala—have already started to phase out, if not outright ban, certain forms of of it.But convincing 1.3 billion Indians to give up the convenience of plastic isn’t going to be easy, Padmakumar says. “Already, just six months into our ban, we’re finding it difficult. Doing good is difficult,” he says.“But that is why this work has to start in temples—these are our centers of culture.” If anything will convince Indians to give up plastic, he’s betting it’ll be their love for, and fear of, God.Actually, there’s something eerily unnatural, and ungodly, about plastic, says Thantri Suryakalady Jayasuryan Bhattathiripad, a pujari, or priest at Mangaladevi temple in northern Kerala. “I’m a farmer, as well. And it is very sad to see very old plastic packaging coming out of the soil when I plough my land,” he says. “Even the emblems, the brand names will still be on there—it’s like an immortal substance.”With a laugh, he adds: “As far as I know, only Parabhrama—the Supreme Being—is supposed to last forever!”A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.The trouble is, Hindu rituals can involve lots and lots of stuff: camphor and incense to purify the air; butter, milk, and rosewater to offer at the shrine; oil to replenish the traditional lamps; turmeric and sandalwood powder to smear across the forehead and open one’s third eye. And these days, all of it is packaged in plastic, says Aneesh Mon, who sells supplies to devotees from a small stall just outside Aranmula temple.In principle, he says, he fully agrees with the temple’s new rules. “But how is it possible when everything comes in plastic covers?”Since the pledge took effect in January, Mon has made some changes. His convenient “pooja kits,” which include fruit and snacks to offer the gods, are now sold in reusable, biodegradable plates made from dried palm leaves, instead of plastic bags. But the mini bottles of oil and rosewater are still packaged in plastic.“This is how it comes, from the companies,” he shugs. “Though we’re working with suppliers to find some alternatives.”Over the past few months, he’s had quite a few frustrating conversations—with the company that supplies him with rosewater, asking them if it’s really necessary to wrap their plastic bottles in an additional layer of plastic film, and with the company that makes the incense, pleading with them to consider paper packaging. And then there’s convincing his customers to pay an extra five rupees for the camphor wrapped in paper. “They say that if they come on a regular basis, the five rupees adds up.”By next year, with help from temple administrators, he’s hoping to start buying oil by the gallon and decanting it into smaller clay or steel containers for devotees, which is a system that some temples in the region have already adopted. Other temples are avoiding packaging altogether by making their own rosewater and sourcing oil from smaller, local producers.The problem is, the mass-produced, plastic-wrapped stuff is cheap and easy, he says. “Now we can’t even think of a world without plastic.”The need to imagine, and realize, a world without plastic is growing more and more urgent, says Thirumeni Rajeevararu, the head priest at Sabarimala, a shrine dedicated to the Hindu god Ayyapan in the heart of Kerala’s Periyar Tiger Reserve.In January, a 20-year-old wild elephant in Periyar died after consuming some of the trash discarded by the tens of millions of Sabarimala pilgrims who trek, each winter, through more than twenty miles of heavily wooded forest to reach the shrine. A necropsy revealed that a large quantity of plastic had blocked up the animal’s intestines, causing internal bleeding and organ failure. Forest rangers also found a fully in-tact plastic bag in dung nearby.“The death of the elephant in Periyar disturbed me a lot,” says Rajeevararu. “The elephant is an important animal for temples”—it is metaphysically connected to Ganesh, the elephant-headed Hindu god of wisdom.“But it’s not just elephants. Other animals have died as well after eating plastic,” he says. These include deer and birds, according to local environmental non-profit Thanal.“God is in nature,” Rajeevararu says. “So I consider it our dharma, our duty, to stop using plastic.”Religious leaders at Sabarimala have been trying to phase out plastic for the past five years. “We are trying our maximum to implement a full ban,” he says, though it hasn’t been easy.Tens of millions of pilgrims carry with them bottles of water and all manner of snacks, often packaged in plastic, and they tend to tote it all around in plastic bags. There are designated trash disposal points, and for the past several years, a group of volunteers have posted themselves along the Periyar trail to help collect and manage the pilgrims’ waste. But even a couple of hundred wardens are no match for the millions who trek through the forest.To convince pilgrims to leave their plastic at home this coming winter, Sabarimala has enlisted the help of the state government and local nonprofits to fund and launch a massive public education campaign, spreading the gospel of plastic-free prayer through gurus and other religious leaders across the region.Thantri Suryakalady is confident that’ll work. “It is very clear that the preachers, astrologers, priests, we’re the ones that will get people to give up plastic,” he says. “For better or worse, people believe in us. They believe in their religious institutions.”In fact, religious institutions of all creeds in India have joined in the fight against plastic pollution. Notably, the Golden Temple, the holiest shrine for India’s sikhs, in Amritsar, banned plastic carry bags in April.Across Kerala, churches and mosques have followed suit.At the Palayam Juma Masjid in Trivandrum, Kerala’s capital city, Imam Suhaib Moulabi says he’s had a pretty easy time getting his community on board. “We believe in life after death: There is hell and there is heaven,” he explains. “I say to my people, if you are polluting the Earth, you have to reply to God’s questions after death. God will ask: Why have you disturbed the Earth?”And unless they have a good answer, “they risk going to hell.” It’s harsh, but effective, Moulabi says. This year his mosque eliminated all plastic during Ramadan, serving thousands of worshipers iftar meals on reusable plates.Across the street, St. Joseph’s Cathedral banned plastic during saint day feasts, and wedding ceremonies, starting earlier this year.“Whether a total ban in these places works or not, they’re daring to make this kind of statement against plastic, and that is very powerful,” says Shibu K. Nair, director of the local environmental group Thanal, which has been consulting with government and religious groups looking to reduce their dependence on plastic. “Believers may hear that messaging in their places of worship, and think about their use at home as well.”At Aranmula, several worshippers said the temple’s plastic ban has served as a reminder that they need to be more mindful about their habits. “At first it was difficult to remember to bring cloth bags instead of plastic,” says Rajee Nireesh, 34, who was visiting the temple with her mother. “But we are getting used to it.”Others said they were already trying to avoid single-use plastics at home. Among them is 75-year-old KR Viswananthan, a retired laborer who now likes to spend most of his days meditating, and socializing, at the temple.“Think about it this way,” he says. “Goddess Earth takes in everything we throw at her, including our feces. But she cannot take in plastic—it just doesn’t decompose. That’s got to tell you something.”",
"A man lifts a sack of recyclable materials at the Dandora dumpsite in Nairobi, one of the largest and most toxic in Africa.Nakuru, KenyaIn the open-air Wakulima Market thin plastic shopping bags have disappeared, banished by Kenya’s national bag ban. Produce sellers in this busy agricultural hub 95 miles northwest of Nairobi now pack perishables in thicker bags made of synthetic fabric.As James Wakibia, citizen activist, leads the way along narrow walkways that snake around vegetable stalls, he shrugs at the irony. Plastic bags replaced by plastic bags. He is the 36-year-old face of the social media campaign that prompted the ban in 2017 and says an imperfect ban is better than none.“Okay, they are polypropylene, but they’re reusable and they’re not the thin bags that can be carried by the wind,” he says. “The UN says that Kenyans were using 100 million bags a year by supermarkets alone, so we have saved 100 million bags. I would rate success at 80 percent.”Often described as the world’s number one consumer product, as well as the most ubiquitous, shopping bags are now among the world’s most-banned. As of last July, the United Nations counted 127 nations that have banned or taxed bags‒and bag regulations have proliferated so quickly, especially at the local level, that even an Al Qaeda-backed terrorist group joined in‒banning plastic shopping bags last summer as “a serious threat to the well-being of humans and animals alike.”This spring, the European Union took steps to ban plastic bags as part of a sweeping effort on plastic items found most commonly on Europe’s beaches. In the United States, New York this month became the second state, after California, to ban plastic bags‒and at least 95 bills relating to bags were introduced in state legislative sessions this winter, more than any other year. (Hawaii has a defacto statewide bag ban because every county banned them.)Yet as bag bans spread around the globe, their effectiveness—despite Wakibia’s sunny appraisal of Kenya’s effort—remains an unanswered question. Bag bans have spawned bans of other plastic products, including plates, cups, cutlery, straws and bottles, as part of an expanding effort to reduce single-use plastics, which make up about 40 percent of the plastics manufactured worldwide. But whether bans can significantly reduce plastic waste, which leaks into the oceans at an average rate of 8 million tons a year, remains to be seen‒especially when considering that plastic production is forecast to double by 2040, and may account for 20 percent of the world’s oil production by 2050.Even the most ardent proponents of bans are aware of the limitations.“As important as banning single-use plastic bags is in terms of reducing it as a source, it’s not going to change the world,” says Mark Murray, executive director of Californians Against Waste. “The main point, frankly, is to communicate to policy makers, the public, and to the industry that we’ve got to do something serious to reduce plastic packaging and if you all can’t figure out how to do it, we’re going to start banning your products one at a time.”It took less than four decades for plastic bags to make the transition from marvel to menace. Plastic bags were born in the post-World War II explosion of manufactured plastic household goods and became popular in the 1970s. By the end of the 1980s, grocery stores in the United States had switched from paper to plastic; plastic bags proliferated after that by the millions.Firm statistics about the number of plastic shopping bags manufactured today are elusive‒even the American Progressive Bag Alliance, an industry trade group, says it does not know the figure. The UN estimates that between one and five trillion bags are produced worldwide. Even using the lowest figure, that translates into bag use of two million bags per minute, according to the Earth Policy Institute.The proliferation of bags was enough to overwhelm even western nations’ waste collection systems. And, it hasn’t helped that flimsy film bags are among the least recycled plastic products, even though polyethylene can be easily recycled. In the United States, few sorting facilities accept them, as they tend to jam up machinery not suited to processing film.Plastic bags are in the top five items found in beach and river cleanups and the harm to wildlife has been well documented. Once in the sea, they can quickly degrade. In a dramatic experiment at Plymouth University in Britain, Richard Thompson, a marine scientist who coined the term microplastics, and two of his students fed pieces of a plastic bag to amphipods, tiny shrimp-like crustaceans, and found critters could quickly shred a single bag into 1.75 million microscopic fragments.Bags are also consumed whole by sea turtles, dolphins and whales. In the last month alone, two more dead whales, stomachs crammed with bags and other plastics, washed up on beaches, adding to a growing tally. In Kenya, it’s cattle and elephants.Bangladesh passed the first bag ban in 2002, putting the lie to the argument against bans and taxes because they disproportionately harm poor nations and poor people, who rely on free, inexpensive and sturdy sacks to carry goods and store belongings. The African continent now leads the world in bag regulations, with 34 countries adopting taxes or bans‒31 of them in sub-Saharan Africa, the world’s poorest region. Kenya’s penalties are the world’s most punitive, with manufacturers, importers, distributors, and users facing up to $38,000 in fines or four years in prison.In Denmark, which passed the world’s first bag tax in 1993, residents use, on average, four plastic bags per year. By contrast, in the United States, which is the largest generator, per capita, of plastic packaging waste, Americans use almost one bag per person daily.Political opposition to bans in the United States has gained a boost from a handful of studies that highlight the limitations of bans. In California, for example, Rebecca Taylor, an economist at the University of Sydney, found that shoppers in cities that banned bags before the 2016 statewide ban took effect used fewer shopping bags, leading to a reduction of about 40 million pounds of plastic waste. But she found in her study that sales of trash bags rose, offsetting the reduction in plastic bags to 28 million pounds.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.In the United States, the bag industry has sought legislation that would improve recycling. Meanwhile, it has invested in bins placed at store entrances in hopes that shoppers will drop off used bags that will be remade into new bags, completing the circle. But trying to persuade consumers in a nation with a nine percent recycling rate to take the extra steps and cart used bags back to stores may prove to be a Sisyphean task.“We spend literally hundreds of millions of dollars in the recycling of plastic retail bags, including stretch film, dry cleaner bags, bread bags, ice bags‒you name it,” says Matt Seaholm, the executive director of the American Progressive Bag Alliance, which bills itself as the frontline against bans and taxes. “That includes buying stuff from places that are collecting it. We would love more stores to be involved. We would love more stores to promote it more. We would love stores to have cashiers who tell folks they can bring their bags back.”In Kenya, the bag ban has faced a sequence of rocky challenges. The Kenya Association of Manufacturers unsuccessfully opposed the ban in court, warning that as many as 100,000 jobs in the plastics manufacturing industry could be lost.Once it took effect, the ban prompted the creation of “bag cartels” that smuggled illegal plastic bags from neighboring Uganda and Tanzania.Geoffrey Wahungu, director general of Kenya’s National Environment Management Authority, conceded in an interview that the government failed, at first, to consider what alternative products could be used to replace plastics that were banned. Eventually, plastics used to wrap various fresh foods, such as meat, were exempted from the ban, along with other products.Although the arrest of a roadside fruit seller caught with his apples in a plastic bag was featured in media accounts, most of the enforcement has focused on distributors, not lone sellers or consumers. Even so, enforcement has been spotty and incomplete, as has a clear accounting of the numbers of arrests and fines levied so far.“The ban had to be drastic and harsh, otherwise Kenyans would have ignored it,” says Walibia, the activist.On that, he may have a point. Litter still collects in abundant amounts on the Kenyan landscape. Still, the country appears in some ways visibly cleaner. Bags that once hung like windblown shrouds from tree branches are fewer in number, as are clumps of bags that clogged drainage systems and created breeding pools for malaria-bearing mosquitoes.“Everyone is watching Kenya now because of the bold step we took,” Wahungu says. “We are not looking back. We are not relenting.”But the government moved to widen the ban, it is confronting new challenges. The government now wants to ban non-woven shopping bags, those very “eco-friendly” bags that replaced the flimsy bags in 2017. The ban was to begin this month, but has been blocked by the court while manufacturers seek to stop it.",
"Plastic bottles fill the famous Cibeles Fountain in Madrid during an exhibit that called attention to the environmental impact of disposable plastics.The world has a plastic pollution problem and it’s snowballing—but so is public awareness and action. National Geographic magazine devoted a special cover package to plastic in June 2018. Here, we continue to track some of the developments around this important issue. We will update this article periodically as news develops.June 10, 2019Prime Minister Justin Trudeau announced Monday that in addition to banning single-use plastics, his government would take other, unspecified steps to reduce plastic pollution.Trudeau did not specify the products to be banned, but said likely candidates include plastic bags, straws, cutlery, plates and stir sticks “where supported by scientific evidence and warranted.”“You’ve all heard the stories and seen the photos,” he said. “To be honest, as a dad it is tough trying to explain this to my kids. How do you explain dead whales washing up on beaches across the world, their stomachs jam packed with plastic bags?"How do I tell them that against all odds, you will find plastic at the very deepest point in the Pacific Ocean?”Canada, which has 151,019 miles of coastline–the world’s longest–and a quarter of the world’s fresh water, joins a growing list of nations taking steps to reduce the use of disposable plastics. More than 60 nations have taken steps to reduce single-use plastics by imposing bans or taxes, according to a United Nations report published last year. In March the European Union’s parliament voted to ban the top 10 single-use plastic items found on European beaches by 2021. The EU measure also calls for 90 percent of plastic bottles to be recycled by 2025. Member states must work out the details of bans before the 2021 deadline.India’s prime minister, Narendra Modi, who was overwhelmingly reelected last month to a second five-year term, declared in 2018 that India would eliminate all single-use plastic by 2022, an ambitious plan for the world’s second most populated country.Trudeau made his announcement at the Gault Nature Reserve outside Montreal. He noted that Canada recycles less than 10 percent of its disposable plastics, and is on track to throw away $11 billion worth of disposable plastic by 2030 unless things change.He said the federal government will work with provinces and territories to introduce standards and targets for plastics manufacturers and retailers so they become more responsible for their plastic waste. Trudeau said he also supports efforts by Canada’s minister of environment to create a nationwide strategy for zero plastic waste.“This will be a big step but we know we can do this for 2021,” Trudeau said.Visitors will no longer be allowed to carry in single-use plastics into Peru's 76 natural and cultural protected areas, from Machu Picchu to Manu to Huascarán, or national museums. This ban is now going into affect and was announced as a Supreme Decree by Peru’s Environment Minister, Fabiola Muñoz, and signed by President Martín Vizcarra, back in November.The decree says the goal is replacing single-use plastics with "reusable, biodegradable plastic or others whose degradation does not generate contamination by micro-plastics or dangerous substances.”At world-famous Machu Picchu, tourists produce an average of 14 tons of solid waste per day, much of it plastic bottles and other single-use packaging.In December, Peru's Congress had also passed a law to phase out single-use plastic bags across the country over the next three years. According to Peru's Environment Ministry, the country uses 947,000 tons of plastic each year, while 75 percent is thrown out and only 0.3 percent is recycled.San Diego has joined a growing number of cities to ban containers made of polystyrene, better known as Styrofoam—the Dow Chemical trademark name for extruded polystyrene. The ban includes food and drink containers, egg cartons, ice chest coolers, aquatic toys for swimming pools, and mooring buoys and navigation markers. The ocean-side city is the largest in California to ban polystyrene.Polystyrene’s popularity as a container stems from its low cost, strength, insulation, and feather-weight buoyancy. Those properties also made it a scourge of plastic waste because it easily breaks into tiny, often airborne particles that are difficult to clean up and is generally rejected by recycling centers as too much trouble to recyclable.The San Diego City Council voted 6-to-3 on January 8 to approve the ban, despite objections from owners of small restaurants who complained that the costs of using environmentally degradable containers, such as cardboard or compostable paper, could be double. The council first approved the ban last October for a trial period. This week’s vote made the ban permanent.One New Year's resolution, to use less plastic, is no longer optional for restaurants and other service businesses in Washington, D.C., as of January 1. By July, businesses in the district will begin receiving fines if they continue to offer plastic straws.A number of local businesses have already started switching to reusable, washable straws or disposable ones made from paper or hay.The law follows Seattle's ban earlier in 2018 and aims to reduce the impact of plastic straws as litter. More than 4,000 of the disposed items were found in a recent cleanup of the Anacostia River in D.C. Straws are known to hurt wildlife and are difficult to recycle, often ending up as litter. They make up only a tiny fraction of the total marine plastic pollution problem, leading some critics to say they are a distraction, while others say they are an easy place to start.(Learn about the travel industry's war on straws and where plastic straws came from in the first place.)This week, Great Britain's Royal Statistical Society announced its statistic of the year. It's 90.5%, the estimated amount of plastic waste ever made that has never been recycled. Estimated at 6,300 million metric tonnes, scientists calculated that around 12 percent of all plastic waste has been incinerated, while roughly 79 percent has found its way into landfills or become litter.That fact comes from a study published in Science Advances, "Production, Use, and Fate of all plastics ever made," by scientists Roland Geyer, Jenna Jambeck (a National Geographic Society fellow on plastic pollution) and Kara Lavender Law.“We all knew there was a rapid and extreme increase in plastic production from 1950 until now, but actually quantifying the cumulative number for all plastic ever made was quite shocking,” Jambeck, a University of Georgia environmental engineer who specializes in studying plastic waste in the oceans, previously told National Geographic.“I am grateful to the Royal Statistical Society for the acknowledgement of the impact of this statistic, and while sobering, I am glad that it helps to spread awareness about the plastic waste management issues I see on the ground around the globe," Jambeck said in December."It’s very concerning that such a large proportion of plastic waste has never been recycled," Royal Statistical Society President Sir David Spiegelhalter said in a statement announcing the winning fact. "This statistic helps to show the scale of the challenge we all face."Collins Dictionary named "single-use" their word of the year in 2018, citing a four-fold increase in usage since 2013. The term means "made to be used once only" and refers to "items whose unchecked proliferation are blamed for damaging the environment and affecting the food chain," according to a press release from the dictionary's publisher.Single-use is most often associated with the plastic pollution crisis. Some 40 percent of all plastic produced is used for packaging, much of it used only once and thrown away.Many efforts to curb the plastic litter crisis are taking aim at single-use plastics, with the goal of encouraging more durable, reusable items.November is the month of not shaving facial hair, and now thanks to a new conservation campaign, the month of not using straws.Branded as “No Straw November,” the campaign is a push to eliminate single-use plastic. The effort is led by the Aquarium Conservation Partnership (ACP), comprising 22 aquariums in 17 different states. They're pushing 500 businesses to commit to only serving plastic straws upon request. Already, the ACP has worked with large businesses like United Airlines, the Chicago White Sox, and Dignity Health hospitals.They hope to commit the additional 500 by Earth Day, April 20, 2019.The No Straw November campaign is also lobbying cities and regional governments to pass ordinances that encourage businesses to use fewer straws. Individuals are also being asked to sign an online pledge to limit their own personal single-use plastic. The efforts are part of what ACP is labeling a joint “#FirstStep” to plastic-free waterways.Images ofmarine animals wrapped in plastic or caught with items like straws in their noses have been widely shared, raising awareness of the public. Aquariums have been leaders in phasing out plastic items at their own facilities.In an interview discussing plastic straws with National Geographic earlier this year, David Rhodes, the global business director for paper straw manufacturer Aardvark Straws, said some of Aardvark's earliest clients were zoos, aquariums, and cruise ships looking to promote an eco-friendly image to their customers.The ACP says their efforts to reduce dependence on plastic have already eliminated the need for five million straws over the past year.Earlier this week, the ACP, partnering with the U.N. and European Commission, announced plans to create a global coalition of 200 aquariums that will campaign against plastic.Two hundred and fifty organizations responsible for 20 percent of the plastic packaging produced around the world have committed to reducing waste and pollution.The initiative is called the New Plastics Economy Global Commitment, and it includes a diverse group of members including the city of Austin, clothing company H&M, Unilever, PespsiCo, L'Oreal, Nestle, and Coca-Cola.The Global Commitment touts a number of high-profile partnerships. It's a collaboration with the United Nations and is being led by the Ellen MacArthur Foundation. Other partners include the World Wide Fund for Nature, the World Economic Forum, the Consumer Goods Forum, and 40 academic institutions.Ultimately, it's working to promote a circular economy for plastic, a concept that entails reusing or repurposing plastic instead of letting it sit in a landfill. The shift would require building or improving collection and processing facilities, and five venture capital firms have pledged $200 million toward the initiative.Recycling used items into new products is one of the three targets set by the commitment. Corporations joining the commitment must also phase out single-use plastic packaging and ensure it can either be reused, recycled, or composted by 2025.“While elements of the EMF Global Commitment are moving in the right direction, the problem is that companies are given the flexibility to continue prioritizing recycling over reduction and reuse,” said Ahmad Ashov from Greenpeace Indonesia in a press release. “Corporations are not required to set actual targets to reduce the total amount of single-use plastics they are churning out.”Every 18 months, the targets will be reviewed, and participating businesses must publish data on their progress each year.Governments that join the commitment are pledging to create policies that help support a circular economy.The European Parliament voted 571-53 this week to approve a measure to slash single-use plastic across the continent. The bill still needs to pass additional procedural measures before it can go into effect, but observers say its chances look good and could begin enforcement as early as 2021.Citing a need to protect the ocean from a deluge of plastic pollution, the bill calls for a European ban on plastic cutlery and plates, cotton buds, straws, drink-stirrers, and balloon sticks, as well as reductions in other types of single-use plastics like food and beverage containers.The bill was first proposed in May (see below). Great Britain has a similar effort underway (also see below).The list of plastic items targeted was carefully selected to include items that already have ready alternatives, supporters say. Items with less available alternatives, such as cigarette filters, are being targeted for a more gradual reduction.Belgian MEP Frédérique Ries, who proposed the bill, called it "a victory for our oceans, for the environment and for future generations," according to the BBC.To keep plastic pollution from entering waterways, manufacturers either have to stop making it or make sure it's collected at the end of its life. But in some developing nations, that waste collection infrastructure is insufficient or nonexistent.Circulate Capital, a New York City-based investment firm started in 2018, says they have raised $90 million to invest in this issue in Southeast Asia, a move endorsed by conservation group the Ocean Conservancy. CEO of Circulate Capital Rob Kaplan says this investment will go toward improving plastic waste collection on the ground and creating markets for collected material.PepsiCo, Coca-Cola, Procter and Gamble, Danone, Unilever, and Dow are committed to funding the $90 million investment, and Circulate Capital says a deal will be inked by early 2019. The firm says they are also working on ways for medium and small companies to invest.“While we are working hard to ensure our packaging is designed to be circular, the reality is that it cannot be reused, recycled or composted without effective waste management systems in place,” said Danone's Katharina Stenholm in a press release. She was referring to the concept of a circular economy, in which any waste materials in an industry, such as packaging, are reincorporated into new products.The majority of the world's ocean plastic comes from 10 rivers, eight of which are in Asia, and Circulate Capital is working with scientific advisors, including National Geographic explorer Jenna Jambeck, to pinpoint where their investments can be the most effective.Plastic bottles, for example, can be collected by small local companies and sold to manufacturers to make new products. Though discarded plastic is often of lower quality, some projects already underway have proved the model can function, and Circulate Capital hopes its investment can lead to new innovations. (Read about an effort to recycle stranded fishing nets into carpet.)“There's no silver bullet to stop plastic pollution,” says Kaplan. “We're not going to be able to recycle our way out of the problem, and we're not going to be able to reduce our way out of the problem.”But, he hopes Circulate Capital's investments can serve as one piece of the puzzle. He estimates more than a billion dollars would be needed to really build out more efficient waste infrastructure in Southeast Asia. Circulate Capital hopes to bump their commitments to at least $100 million over the next few year as a move in that direction.Major companies have been taking steps to eliminate the amount of plastic waste they produce, but what about plastic already in rivers or on beaches that could easily enter the ocean?That's where NextWave, a coalition founded by companies including Dell and an environmental group called the Lonely Whale, comes in. By employing people living in coastal regions, the group collects discarded plastic within 30 miles of waterways to prevent it from making its way to the sea. So far, NextWave has focused on two types of plastic commonly found in marine environments: Nylon 6 and polypropylene.This reclaimed plastic is then shipped to manufacturers who reuse it in lieu of producing new plastic. Plastic collection sites are chosen based on where cleanup could have the biggest impact and where the plastic could more easily be taken to an existing recycling facility. These location decisions are informed by science from chemists Jason Lochlin and Jenna Jambeck, a National Geographic explorer.Today, computer company HP announced it would be joining the NextWave coalition. Since 2016, HP has been working with locals in Haiti to collect a total of 550,000 pounds of plastic that the company has since used to create ink cartridges. According to a press release, HP partnered with a non-profit called the First Mile Coalition, aimed at improving Haitian labor conditions, to create up to 600 jobs collecting plastic bottles.Along with HP, Ikea has announced that it, too, will partner with NextWave. In addition, the furniture company has committed to phasing out single-use plastics from its stores by 2020, and to designing more sustainably sourced products, including more items made with recycled plastics, by 2030.Ten companies are now members of NextWave, and they plan to source reclaimed plastics from Indonesia, Chile, the Philippines, Cameroon, and Denmark. NextWave does not yet have numbers for how much plastic they could potentially keep out of the oceans in total, but their website highlights that their partnership with Dell alone kept a total of 3 million pounds of plastic from entering the ocean over the past five years.Correction: This story has been updated to note that HP worked with the First Mile Coalition in Haiti and to clarify the types of plastic NextWave works with.After announcing this summer that they would ban plastic straws and stirrers on their flights (see below), American Airlines now says they will phase out single-use plastic in their lounges.The airline has lounges in the U.S. and around the world. A representative from the company says the lounges won't serve drinks with straws, and plastic won't be used for flatware. Plastic water bottles will no longer be served, and reusable bags will be given to customers taking food to-go.Changes to the airlines' lounges are currently going into effect, and onboard straws will be eliminated by November 1. Straws will be available for those who request one, and drink stirrers will be replaced by bamboo sticks.Cumulatively, the company says their changes will eliminate 71,000 pounds of plastic waste annually.Some 13,000 schools, workplaces, and venues will be plastic bag and stirrer free by 2019, thanks to a new sustainability push by foodservice company Sodexo.The company provides cafeteria-style meals and concessions to many such clients. Among them is National Geographic's Washington, D.C. headquarters, where compostable utensils and plant-based menus are offered.Sodexo follows in the footsteps of other foodservice giants, Aramark and Bon Appétit Management, which announced similar sustainability measures this past summer (see below).In addition to bags and stirrers, Sodexo plans to phase out polystyrene foam (colloquially called Styrofoam) containers by 2025. Plastic straws, a controversial item, will now only be available by request, which the company hopes will cut down on customer usage.The move, says a representative from the company, will eliminate 245 million single use items that would have otherwise been used at its locations.The decision is being applauded by environmental groups like Greenpeace and the World Wildlife Fund, who say that reducing consumption is a key step toward preventing plastic from entering landfills and marine environments. These non-profit groups are increasingly imploring food servers to cut back on the single-use plastic items they buy and sell to customers.“As a company serving consumers in universities, workplaces, hospitals, schools, stadiums, and so many other venues, we understand both the potential impact we can make through a commitment to reduction and the real benefit that some of these products bring to people every day,” Sodexo's vice president for corporate responsibility, Ted Monk, said in a press release.President Trump called out other nations, including China and Japan, for “making our oceans into their landfills” when he signed legislation last week to improve efforts to clean up plastic trash from the world’s oceans.“As president, I will continue to do everything I can to stop other nations from making our oceans into their landfills,” Trump said at a White House signing ceremony. “That’s why I’m please—very pleased, I must say—to put my signature on this important legislation.”The law, passed with bipartisan support, amends the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration’s Marine Debris Act and funds the program through 2022. The law fosters efforts to clean up plastic trash from the world’s oceans and encourages federal trade negotiators to prod “leaders of nations responsible for the majority of marine debris” to improve management of waste that ends up in the oceans.Trump agreed with Democratic Senator Sheldon Whitehouse, one of the bill’s co-sponsors, that trade talks with the Philippines should include plastic waste. “We’re okay with that,” he said. “I understand. A lot comes from there.”Trump also blamed other unnamed countries that “abuse the oceans” and whose trash floats to the West Coast of the United States,” creating, he said, “a very unfair situation.”“It’s incredible. It’s incredible when you look at it,” Trump said. “People don’t realize it, but all the time we’re being inundated by debris from other countries.”Comparatively, the beaches of the United States are among the world’s cleanest. Kamilo Beach in Hawaii, which faces the Pacific gyre, where ocean trash collects, is the exception. But most of the world’s plastic trash collects in coastal regions and on beaches in developing nations that lack adequate municipal waste collection systems.Japan has had for years one of the world’s highest recycling rates and earlier this year, China stopped buying the world’s trash. The United States was one of the top sellers of recycled plastic to China.The president’s full remarks are here, and the text of the Save Our Seas Act is here.The world's largest seafood restaurant company, Red Lobster, announced Monday that it will begin only offering plastic straws upon customer request starting this November in its 700 restaurants. By 2020, the company plans to only offer a more eco-friendly alternative to plastic straws.The company says the shift should eliminate more than 150 million plastic straws per year, with the goal of reducing the marine plastic pollution problem.“We are proud to be the first large casual dining restaurant company to make a commitment to eliminate plastic straws from our restaurants,” Kim Lopdrup, CEO of Red Lobster, said in a statement. “This is a meaningful step in our long-standing commitment to protect and preserve the world’s oceans and marine life. We hope our work helps raise awareness around the issue of plastic straws and encourages other businesses to make similar changes.”Red Lobster says it is looking into alternatives to plastic straws that will still meet the needs of customers with disabilities. (Learn more about plastic straw bans and how the travel industry is cutting back on plastic straws.)California has become the first state to implement a partial ban on plastic straws. Dine-in restaurants will no longer be allowed to automatically provide customers with straws. Instead, customers who need plastic straws will have to request them.Restaurants that violate the ban will receive warnings first, and repeat offenders will be fined at a maximum of $300.“Plastic has helped advance innovation in our society, but our infatuation with single-use convenience has led to disastrous consequences. Plastics, in all forms—straws, bottles, packaging, bags, etc.—are choking the planet,” California's governor Jerry Brown said in a statement.The new ban comes on the heels of previous plastic straw bans from companies and cities. Earlier this year, Seattle become the first large municipality to ban plastic straws in restaurants. Large corporations like United Airlines and Disney have also announced this year that they intend to phase plastic straws out of their offerings to customers. Many of these businesses and cities have said they will retain a stock of plastic straws available to customers upon request.While some environmentalists applaud the move to reduce single-use plastic—plastic that's used once and then thrown away—bans on plastic straws have been met with some controversy.Republican lawmakers in California opposed the ban, saying it would burden small business and do little to fight the larger plastic pollution crisis. Plastic straws make up less than one percent of the plastic found at sea.Disability advocates also say straw bans place an unfair burden on people who have conditions that don't allow them to easily drink without straws. Some alternatives like paper fall apart and metal harm the inside of a person's mouth, they say.Although California isn't the only region moving to limit single use plastic, the state has often tried to lead the nation in environmental legislation, particularly after what Gov. Brown says is a vacuum left by the Trump administration's decision to leave the U.N. Paris Climate Agreement.Read the brief history of how plastic straws took over the world.The campaign to rid the world’s oceans of plastic trash marks a turning point on Saturday as a giant, floating trash collector steams out of San Francisco on a mission to clean up the Great Pacific Garbage Patch.Over the course of the next year, the device will undergo the ultimate tests and face some tough questions: Can technology prevail over nature? Did the engineers at The Ocean Cleanup in the Netherlands invent the first feasible method for extracting large amounts of plastic debris from the sea? Or will the wilds of the open Pacific tear it to shreds, turning the cleaner itself into plastic trash? Alternately, even if a Pacific storm does not devour the device, will it attract marine animals such as dolphins and turtles and fatally entangle them?“I don’t think it’s going to work, but I hope it does,” says George Leonard, the Ocean Conservancy’s chief scientist. “The ocean needs all the help it can get.” Read MoreUnited Airlines today joined others in the travel industry by banning plastic straws and cocktail picks on their flights.The airline will instead use a biodegradable bamboo alternative, starting in November.Alaska and American airlines moved to ban plastic straws earlier this year, and some cities, like Seattle, have outlawed their use entirely.As one of the reasons for switching to a more sustainable form of straw, United cited this alarming fact: “Because straws don’t biodegrade and are nearly impossible to recycle, it’s likely that every straw ever used still exists on our planet.”“It's a small, but meaningful step to help minimize the impact plastic products have on our environment,” the company said in a press release.Danish brewer Carlsberg will become the first beer producer to ditch those evil plastic multipack rings that hold beer and other cans together for holders made of recyclable glue, according to a company press release.Carlsberg also says it will cut the amount of plastic used in its traditional can holders by 76 percent.Here’s how the glue-packs work: A drop of super-strong, temperature-tolerant glue is stuck on the side of a can, connecting it to the can next to it. If you want a beer, snap off a can. The glue will be recycled along with the can when it’s recycled.Carlsberg described the move as a "world first for the beer industry."The Walt Disney Company announced a ban on single-use plastic straws and stirrers at nearly all its theme parks and resorts. The policy, which is set to be in place by mid-2019, will cut down on the upwards of 175 million straws and 13 million stirrers that are used at these locations each year.Paper straws will be available upon request and, for guests with disabilities, the company is developing alternative options for traditional plastic straws. Disney will also eliminate polystyrene cups at its parks and cut down its reliance on single-use plastic bags. Instead of disposable bags, guests will have the option to buy reusable shopping bags.Additionally, the company will reduce the amount of plastic in guest rooms by 80 percent. Over the next few years, Disney will transition to refillable amenities in hotels and on cruise ships. When single-use plastics cannot be reduced, Disney will continue to recycle and properly dispose of waste, the company says.Disney has other conservation measures in place. In Orlando at Disney’s Animal Kingdom, plastic straws and cup lids have been banned since the park opened in 1998.Other theme parks, including SeaWorld, Busch Gardens, and Sesame Place, have announced initiatives to phase out straws and other single-use plastics. Earlier this month, Seattle banned plastic straws, and San Francisco is working to ban straws and other plastic items starting July 1, 2019.In July 2018, Disney was approved to purchase 21st Century Fox, the parent company of National Geographic.On July 25, Lindblad Expeditions, an adventure cruise company that has teamed up with National Geographic Expeditions, announced it had become 100 percent free of single-use plastics. Now, disposable plastic bottles, cups, straws, and stirrers are entirely banned from the fleet’s 13 ships.“The ocean is under major assault on so many fronts, and its protection is both a business mission and a personal passion,” Lindblad Expeditions CEO Sven Lindblad says in a press release. “The health of our planet is dependent on our oceans, and it is essential that we change our behavior with regard to plastics.”Lindblad is known for its trips all over the world, particularly to places like Alaska and the Galápagos Islands. The company began working toward this plastic-free goal in 2007 when it banned single-use water bottles from its ships. Instead, it gave guests stainless steel bottles that could be refilled at filtered water stations on the ships. According to a study by the Adventure Travel Trade Association and the nonprofit Travelers Against Plastic, the average adventure travel operator uses nearly 30,000 single-use plastic bottles each year.About 80 percent of tourism takes place near coastal areas, putting our oceans at a higher risk of plastic pollution. When packing for air travel, consider using three-ounce reusable containers for your toiletries and load them into a durable transparent washbag instead of a plastic bag. On flights, bring your own earphones and turn down “comfort bag” items wrapped in plastic. Bring your reusable water bottle with you and fill it up when you can.For more tips, read how one of our writers attempted to explore Belize plastic-free.Retail, restaurant, and consumer-facing companies could potentially make a big impact in the fight to reduce plastic straw use. They drive much of the demand for straws from plastic manufacturers.But these businesses are increasingly responding to consumer pressure.Starbucks is among the most recent companies to announce they'll ditch plastic straws—in this case by the end of 2020. Instead of getting sucked up through a straw, their cold drinks will be served in containers with special plastic lids. Those lids are less likely to get stuck up a turtle's nose and should prove more recyclable than straws, but the company has still received some pushback because the lids are still made of plastic.McDonald's is also planning to phase out plastic straws at their UK and Ireland locations, coinciding with UK and EU proposals to cut down single-use plastic.Among the other companies that have moved to reduce how much they use plastic: Bacardi Rum plans to cut their straw usage over the next two years by a billion, food service management giants Bon Appétit Management and Aramark plan to reduce their single-use plastics by 2019 and 2022, respectively, Alaska Airlines will begin phasing out plastic straws this summer, and American Airlines will begin phasing out plastic straws this summer.It remains to be seen if companies follow through on their goals, and it's clear that banning plastic straws is not going to solve the whole pollution problem. Supporters say reducing our use of straws is an easy first step, while detractors say it could distract from more important issues. In either case, taking aim at plastic straws has become rather fashionable this summer.Chile’s Constitutional Court ratified a bill that bans retail use of plastic bags across the country on July 6, ruling against an appeal that had been filed by the plastics industry. In June, Chile’s Congress had unanimously approved the new ban, citing concerns of plastic pollution in the ocean and on land.The country’s Association of Industrial Plastics had sued to block the new law on constitutional grounds. But the court rejected their arguments.Large retailers will have six months to phase out single-use plastic bags, while small businesses will have up to two years. The ban builds on a law passed under the previous president that had called for a prohibition on plastic bags along the country’s 4,000-mile coastline.In announcing the new ban, Marcela Cubillos, Chile’s environment minister, told the New York Times, “We are convinced that our coast imposes an obligation to be leaders in cleaning up our oceans.”Chile’s ban is the first country-wide one in the Americas. Similar bans have been passed in China, Kenya, France, and elsewhere. Many regional and local areas have bans or other restrictions, including taxes or fees aimed at discouraging the use of single-use plastic bags.In an attempt to reduce the amount of plastic waste polluting the land and water, Seattle banned the use of plastic straws and utensils in bars and restaurants starting July 1.The roughly 5,000 eateries in the city are being encouraged to eschew providing straws or disposable utensils, or at least to switch to paper alternatives. A less green but still legal option, according to the city, is compostable plastic straws or utensils."Plastic pollution is surpassing crisis levels in the world's oceans, and I'm proud Seattle is leading the way and setting an example for the nation by enacting a plastic straw ban," Seattle Public Utilities General Manager Mami Hara said in a statement.A similar ban that was proposed for Hawaii was defeated by opposition from industry. Other proposed bans are being debated in San Francisco, New York, and Washington, D.C., among other places.Some advocates for the disabled have warned that straw bans need to take into account special needs. (Learn more about the history of plastic straws and other efforts to remove them.)A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.In draft rules released May 28, the European Commission proposed a ban on 10 common items that it says make up about 70 percent of the litter in EU waters. This includes plastic straws, drink stirrers, plates, and more.The rules would still need approval from member states and the European Parliament to move forward. They would likely not go into effect for several years.The proposed law would also mandate that EU countries collect and recycle 90 percent of plastic bottles by 2025. Plastic producers would be on the hook for most of the expense of waste management and cleanup efforts.In April, British Prime Minister Theresa May announced her intent to establish a ban in her country on sales of single-use plastics, including straws and cotton swab handles.Calling plastic waste “one of the greatest environmental challenges facing the world,” May said she would work with industry to develop alternatives. An estimated 8.5 billion plastic straws are tossed out in the U.K. every year.On June 5, Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi announced his intent to eliminate all single-use plastic in the country by 2022. With a fast-growing economy and population of 1.3 billion, India struggles to manage its vast waste stream, and is a significant contributor to global ocean plastic.“Let us all join together to beat plastic pollution and make this planet a better place to live,” Modi said.Experts caution that Modi’s goal is far from being realized, and would likely take significant changes and investment from industry and the public. Already, industry lobbyists have taken aim at the efforts. The state of Maharashtra, home to megacity Mumbai, eased a ban on single-use plastic just a week after it unveiled the plan this summer. The state is working on a number of exemptions, for plastic of a certain thickness, products of a certain size, medical equipment, and other uses.",
"Bundles of plastic await recycling in Dhaka, Bangladesh.It just got more difficult for rich countries to ship their plastic waste to poor countries. On May 10, more than 180 nations agreed in Geneva to add mixed plastic scrap to the Basel Convention, the treaty that controls the international movement of hazardous waste.Under the amended treaty, exporters must first obtain consent from the governments of receiving nations before shipping the most contaminated, mixed, or unrecyclable plastic waste. Requiring that kind of special attention is regarded as a crucial step in helping the world gain control of a plastic pollution crisis that has already seen 100 million tons of plastic waste leak into the world’s oceans, according to United Nations figures.David Azoulay of the Center for International Environmental Law, a research and advocacy group, said in an interview that the action “shows what ambitious international leadership looks like.”Plastic waste shipments became an issue last year after China, the world’s biggest importer of plastic scrap, stopped buying non-industrial plastic scrap, upending a $200 billion global recycling industry. By 2030 China’s new policy will have displaced more than 120 million tons of mixed or contaminated plastic, according to a study published last year.As a result of that change, other Southeast Asian nations, including Thailand, Malaysia, Vietnam, and Indonesia, were quickly overwhelmed with shipments of waste that they did not have the capacity to handle. Several countries took action to stop shipments at their ports. In the West, plastic trash piled up on the docks in San Francisco and in the U.K. and other European nations, as trash exporters searched for new buyers.Although the European Union is the world’s largest exporter of plastic waste, U.S. exports are the largest for a single country. But because the U.S. is not a party to the Basel Convention, the new regulations could effectively prevent it from selling contaminated or mixed plastic waste to developing nations, according to Azoulay and another observer who attended the negotiations.A spokeswoman for the American Chemistry Council said the U.S. potentially could negotiate separate agreements with other countries that would allow trade of contaminated plastic. But, she added, the amendment to the Convention creates “new regulatory hurdles.”The new regulations were proposed as an amendment to the Convention by Norway, which, among other nations, unsuccessfully pushed for a broader global agreement on plastic waste at the United National Environmental Program meeting in Nairobi in March.In Geneva, U.S. observers argued against amending the Convention, and suggested voluntary measures to contain plastics pollution would be more effective than binding measures, according to an observer of the discussion in Geneva.The U.S. also suggested that better infrastructure in developing nations would be a more effective solution. Its suggestions carried little weight in the negotiations because the the U.S. has signed but not ratified the treaty.The Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries, a recycling trade group, said in a statement that the amendments to the Convention “will hamper the world’s ability to recycle plastic material.…” Requiring prior informed consent from importing countries, the group argued, will create “an administrative burden that will make it harder for countries without recycling capacity to export collected plastics to countries with infrastructure in place.”The Basel Convention was negotiated by the United Nations Environmental Program and is considered the most comprehensive international environmental agreement on hazardous waste. As of last year, 186 nations and the European Union are parties to the convention. Aside from the United States, a handful of smaller nations have not signed or ratified the Convention. The treaty’s full name is the Basel Convention on the Control of Transboundary Movements of Hazardous Wastes and Their Disposal.",
"When President Donald Trump signed legislation renewing the federal marine debris program, he blamed Asia for fouling the world’s oceans. He named Japan, China, and “many, many countries” for dumping plastic waste that floats over to the West Coast.“And we’re charged with removing it, which is a very unfair situation,” he said.What Trump didn’t acknowledge is that plastic waste polluting the seas cannot be assigned entirely to Asia alone. East and West are inextricably connected by their plastic trash, as wealthy nations sell their recycled plastic scrap to Asia for the simple fact it’s easier to ship it around the world than process it at home.That convenience was cast in a new light last January, when China, the biggest importer, stopped buying most recycled waste. After 25 years as the world’s salvage king, China refused to buy any recycled plastic scrap that wasn’t 99.5 percent pure–a move that upended a $200 billion global recycling industry with profound consequences on both sides of the world. (Read more about that here.)Bales of trash piled up in California, in the U.K., in Australia, and elsewhere, as exporting nations scoured the world for new buyers. Across Southeast Asia, recyclers operating in Indonesia, Thailand, Vietnam, and Malaysia bought, but were quickly overwhelmed by, the sheer volume that China once easily absorbed.By the time Trump called out Asia “as abusers” for “making our oceans their landfills,” Malaysia was drowning in plastic scrap. Malaysia’s environment minister did not miss the irony in the president’s remarks.“I hate seeing my country as the dumpsite for the developed world,” said Yeo Bee Yin, whose full title is Minister for Energy, Technology, Science, Climate Change, and Environment. She declared that “no developing nation should be the dumping site for the developed world.”And in an interview with National Geographic, she added a scold to the United States: “You have to mind your waste in your own backyard. Especially the non-recyclables.”The accumulation of plastic in the oceans has worsened as two trends reveal a bleak picture of the future of waste. The planet’s growing heap of trash in general is forecast by the World Bank to grow by 70 percent in 30 years. And, the astonishing growth of plastics production–half of the 7,800 million tons ever produced has been made since 2004, with 40 percent of it disposable–is outpacing almost all other manufactured materials as well as the ability of developing nations to deal with it. In other words, garbage is only going to get worse.At his White House bill-signing ceremony, Trump did make a relevant point about Asia’s own trash. In 2015, when the first global measurement of plastic waste revealed an average of 8.5 million tons flow offshore every year, China topped the list of 192 coastal countries as the largest polluter of plastics. Among the next 19 countries on a Top 20 list, 11 are in Asia.Among rivers that carry the most plastics out to sea, compiled for a 2017 study published in Nature, 15 of the top 20 are in Asia. Six are in China. Asia has serious problems with plastic pollution. But shipping waste to Asia only makes it worse.Imported plastic waste adds, on average, another 12 percent to the plastic waste China generates domestically every year, according to a study published in Science Advances last June. In 2016, that translated into 8.1 million additional tons on top of the 67 million tons of domestic trash created in China.Carroll Muffett, president and CEO of the Center for International Environmental Law, a nonprofit based in Washington and Geneva, says China’s closing the door to trash “exposes the myth that the United States is capable of dealing with its own plastics problem.”“The way we have been dealing with our waste problem is to export it,” he says. “It makes our plastic problems invisible by shifting them. It also demonstrates that it is not simply an Asian problem.”If the aluminum can is the world’s most perfect recyclable container, plastic is the opposite. Aluminum can be recycled innumerable times to make new aluminum cans. Plastic can be recycled only a limited number of times, and is difficult to recycle. Each variety of plastic requires a different recycling process, and plastics are made from thousands of different formulas.Even the seven most common types of plastic used in consumer manufacturing–stamped on the bottom with a number inside a triangle–are replete with inconsistent resin composition, color, transparency, weight, shape, and size that complicate and often rule out recycling. For example, a #1 soda bottle has different melt properties than a #1 lettuce container, making the lettuce container a contaminant for the soda bottle. Colored soda bottles cannot mix with clear soda bottles. Yogurt containers cannot mix with milk jugs, even though both are white. Filmy cling wrap can be recycled in theory, but is too often contaminated by food. The limitations are too many to count.Sorting all that out is a huge chore. “That’s where the economics go haywire,” says Douglas Woodring, founder of the Hong Kong-based Ocean Recovery Alliance.Wealthy nations can’t even think about hand-sorting certain plastics, even though it is sometimes the only effective way to maintain purity as plastic is reprocessed. It’s long been more economical for American recyclers to bale plastic scrap and ship to Asia, where labor is cheap and environmental standards present a lower hurdle to mount.“I never thought plastic recycling would work,” says Roland Geyer, an engineering professor at the University of California, Santa Barbara and author of the study “Production, use and fate of all plastics ever made.” “There is a viable business model around metal, but plastics never has had that. It’s too low-value, too contaminated, with too many different polymers mixed together. And you can only make it work with a really low cost of labor.”For a time, China, as the center of the global recycling trade, made it work. As it became the world’s leading manufacturer of cheap clothing and other synthetic goods, its appetite for plastic feed stock grew. After shipping goods to the West Coast, China had empty ships to fill on the return trip and offered rock-bottom shipping prices to West Coast recycling companies to sell their plastic trash. The United States quickly became one of China’s largest customers.By 2016, half the world’s plastic scrap intended for recycling was traded internationally. China has imported 45 percent of the world’s total waste since 1992. (When Hong Kong, which reverted to Chinese sovereignty in 1997 after 156 years as a British colony, is added in, China’s share becomes 70 percent.)Today, Recology, San Francisco’s employee-owned recycling company, pays $300-to-$500 to ship a container of recycled plastic across the Pacific–a fraction of the $3,500-to-$4,000 price tag for transporting that same container across the United States to plastic processing plants that are mostly located in the South, according to Robert Reed, a company spokesman.“A high level of uncertainty exists in the recycling markets today,” Reed says. “No one has a crystal ball to see or predict what is going to happen tomorrow, next week, next month, or next year.”Steve Wong, chairman of a recycling firm in Hong Hong and a one-time big player in the Chinese recycling market, estimates that China’s waste purchases this year amount to just one percent of the eight million tons it once bought every year.In the meanwhile, the U.S. is among the countries on the hunt for other Asian buyers, as Asia remains its primary destination for its exported trash. Between January and June of this year, 81 percent of American trash exports were shipped to Asia, according to an analysis by Greenpeace Unearthed, an investigative journalism project in the U.K. funded by Greenpeace. To cite one example, American recyclers sold 101 tons of plastic waste in Thailand in the first six months of this year–a 1,985 percent increase over the 4,409 tons sold during the same period in 2017. Sales of trash to Malaysia, Vietnam, Turkey, and South Korea also showed sharp increases by June of this year.With China’s door to plastic waste effectively closed, hundreds of small-operation Chinese plastics recyclers relocated to other Southeast Asian countries. They set up new factories, often illegally. They began buying imported plastic trash for reprocessing. In the first half of the year, imports of plastic trash increased by 56 percent in Indonesia, doubled in Vietnam, and rose in Thailand by 1,370 percent, according to an analysis of trade data by the Financial Times.In Malaysia, Yeo watched in dismay as plastic waste made a massive detour across Southeast Asia, and overnight turned Malaysia into the world’s largest importer of plastic trash. Between January and June, Malaysia received hundreds of thousands of tons of plastic scrap–215,000 from the United States,115,000 tons from Japan, 95,000 from the U.K., and 37,000 from Australia, according to figures provided to National Geographic by Yeo’s office.As Chinese recyclers relocated, their goal, described in Plastics Today, an industry newsletter, was to melt plastic scrap into pellets to sell to China, betting that the pellets cleaned up enough in the process to get past Chinese customs inspection. At China’s border stations, however, things have not gone quite that smoothly. Inspectors have not only been on the lookout for contamination, but also for smuggled low-grade plastic waste hidden in pellet containers. As of June, China had begun 134 criminal investigations involving 254,000 tons of smuggled trash.Meanwhile, as the renegade plants began melting scrap, their new hosts moved to shut them down. Malaysia, Vietnam, Thailand, India, and Indonesia imposed a slate of restrictions on imported non-recyclable plastic, including bans, inspections, freezes on new licenses, new taxes and fees, and raids on illegal operations.In Malaysia, Yeo and two other ministers also shut down 30 factories that had been importing plastic waste illegally. Yeo says the government is taking steps to permanently ban non-recyclable plastics and allow imports of only high-value recycled plastic.“At the height of my anger, I wanted to send it back to the country of origin,” she says. “What I realized is there is no tracking. There is a gap between what the citizens know about their waste and what actually happens to their waste. The United States is the biggest exporter of plastic waste to Malaysia. I believe Americans must know what happened and take shared responsibility as global citizens.”Yeo has been on the job only a few months. She was appointed after national elections in May changed the ruling party for the first time in 61 years. Watching what she describes as the “mushrooming of illegal factories” in her country inspired her to push for more comprehensive reforms and turn Malaysia greener, with zero single-use plastics, by 2030.The government is phasing out plastic shopping bags, starting with charging a fee on them. For a country of 32 million people, where the Malaysian Plastics Manufacturing Association estimates citizens use, on average, 300 plastic shopping bags a year, that’s called a good start. Tesco Malaysia, a division of the U.K.’s supermarket chain, announced it would give discounts to customers who reuse shopping bags. Yeo also announced a ban on straws dispensed at restaurants in Malaysia’s federal territories that takes effect in 2020.“What we are envisioning is not only reducing our plastics usage, but transforming the plastics industry in Malaysia,” Yeo says. “Is there something we can do to provide a solution to the world?”If it seems unusual for the new government to be focused so ambitiously on plastic waste while facing other major challenges, including cleaning up a world-class financial scandal that drove the former government from power, Yeo says China’s ban forced Malaysia’s hand.“It was a good wake-up call,” she says. “What the China ban told the world is that we must rethink plastic use globally and we of this generation must solve the problem. By 2050, our world will have more than 10 billion people. Can you imagine how much plastics will have accumulated by then?”",
"Soak up the breathtaking view of Machu Picchu.Here’s a cool fact to share with children visiting Machu Picchu in Peru—the place probably would never have been discovered without the help of a kid just like them.You see, after two years of research to pinpoint the location of the “Lost City of the Incas” and raise money for his expedition, intrepid American historian and explorer Hiram Bingham set off into the Peruvian jungle in 1911 with a fedora planted firmly on his head and nothing more than an educated guess as to where it might be. He eventually only found the spot with the aid of an 11-year-old Quechua Indian boy.“It fairly took my breath away,” Bingham wrote of his first encounter with the ruins in 1911 high in the Andes. “What could this place be?”A century later we’re still not exactly sure why this place was constructed on a spot that practically touches the sky—a mystery kids will surely find compelling. Nobody is quite sure when Machu Picchu was first built—educated guesses put it at around 1450—or why it was abandoned a century later. Researchers still aren’t sure what its original function might have been: a place of worship, a royal estate, an astronomical observatory? And nobody can say with any certainty what became of its original inhabitants.That’s why Machu Picchu is “one of those places that overdelivers,” says National Geographic Traveler contributing editor Barton Lewis, who has been visiting there since the 1960s. “No matter what your expectations are, it’s more than you imagined. The Inca were the end result of 5,000 years of civilization that started at the same time as Egypt and Mesopotamia. Because of conquest and disease, however, they were only around for 100 years. But they left behind this undisturbed site that is just incredible.”About a third of the ruins have been reconstructed and it’s easy to imagine how the city must have looked in Inca times, clinging to the top of an emerald green ridge in the rain forest. A main plaza flanked by stone homes, temples, workshops, bathing areas, and a royal palace, surrounded in turn by stone terraces where maize and other crops were grown. Estimates put the population at no more than 1,000 at any given time. Although the reconstructed temples are the most impressive buildings, Machu Picchu’s most important structure is the Intihuatana or “hitching post of the sun,” a mysterious abstract stone construction that ancient priests may have used to study the heavens and make astrological predictions.At the Temple of the Condor, show kids how the large stone in the middle of the structure has been carved to resemble the head and neck feathers of a huge Andean bird, and how the rocks behind are shaped into outspread condor wings. And gazing down on the Temple of the Sun, point out the Serpent Window, which according to legend was used to admit snakes to the shrine.Part of the fun of Machu Picchu is getting there. Nearly everyone takes the narrow-gauge railway from Cusco to the Urubamba Valley below the ruins. You can hop off the train at the 82‑kilometer mark and walk the Inca Trail (26 miles)—the most celebrated hiking route in all of South America—or continue up to the town of Aguas Calientes, where buses shuttle you up a series of steep switchbacks to the mountaintop.If your kids aren’t quite up to the full Inca Trail, an alternative is disembarking at the 104‑kilometer spot and hiking the last four to five hours of the route (8.75 miles).“That is the single best way to be introduced to Machu Picchu,” says Lewis. “You come up really steep steps, almost climbing with your hands. At the crest there’s a stone arch. You look down and see the citadel below and it’s astounding.”Due to its high and remote location, Machu Picchu requires some preparation, especially when visiting with children. If time permits, take a few days to acclimatize to the trail’s altitude that ranges between 6,700 and 12,000 feet above sea level.“When one sees Machu Picchu for the first time you have to stop and try to gather it in,” says Lewis. “Even without knowing the background, cosmology, or history, it’s incredibly impressive. The more you observe and see, the more you wonder about it. How did these people do this? And to what purpose?”Insider Tip: The entrance to Machu Picchu charges a flat rate no matter what time you arrive at the site. Be sure to get there early to get the most exploring in for your money.",
"The U.S. alone uses millions of straws every day.Major corporations like Starbucks, Bacardi Rum, Bon Appétit Management Company, Marriott hotels, Alaska Airlines, and American Airlines have publicly announced that they will phase out plastic straws in the coming years. And they aren't the only ones.Seattle recently became the first major U.S. city to ban plastic straws. Council members in major cities like D.C. and New York have proposed bans, and smaller municipalities like Miami Beach and Malibu have at least partially implemented bans.Though just a small fraction of all plastic pollution, straws have become a symbol of waste to rally behind and a feasible way for consumers to feel like they're making a difference. But how do such bans actually go from a pipe dream to a reality on the ground? And what impact will they have?In Seattle, the movement to ban straws first gained traction in 2008, when the city passed an ordinance requiring one-time-use food items be recyclable or compostable. The ordinance was updated in 2010, and by July of this year, plastic straws and utensils were prohibited from use.“The basis of that was grassroots energy,” says Sego Jackson, a strategic advisor for waste prevention and product stewardship at Seattle Public Utilities. “It was community groups coming to the council.”Straw bans have also been implemented from a more top-down approach. The Bon Appétit Management Company, a large food service provider with 1,000 cafes at places like colleges, museums, and workplaces, announced their own plans to phase out plastic straws last May.Maisie Ganzler, the chief strategy and brand officer for Bon Appétit, says the decision was largely spurred by the company's CEO Fedele Bauccio.“When I heard the stats and learned how much damage is being done by straws—a product of convenience—my gut reaction was, we have to change this,” Bauccio said in a press release.After what Ganzler says was just a few months of consideration, the company announced a ban they expect will take just over a year to implement.Environmental advocacy groups have also stepped in to demand straw bans. Lonely Whale, co-founded by actor Adrian Grenier, is one such organization, but rather than trying to sway potential voters, they focus on convincing businesses to lead the way.“I think, philosophically, markets need to lead the way,” says Dune Ives, the group's executive director. “Policy helps codify what the market wants.”In Seattle, city officials initially struggled to find viable alternatives to plastic for straws when bans were first proposed 10 years ago. It was similarly a challenge to find alternatives for other single-use items.“Finding a spoon that wouldn't melt in a hot soup was a challenge,” says Jackson.At Bon Appétit, finding viable alternatives was also more difficult than expected. Ganzler says it wasn't just compostable straws they were looking for. Their plastic replacements needed to be biodegradable, too.“We wanted to make sure that should our straws wind up in a waterway, it would break down in a short period of time,” says Ganzler.She says paper will be the most widely used alternative, but Bon Appétit is also considering straws made of pasta, bamboo, and hay. (Just a century ago, Americans were drinking from hollow pieces of rye grass. Read more about the straw's history.)“The biggest hurdle was finding a sustainable alternative,” says Alaska Airlines Sustainability Manager Jacqueline Drumheller. She says the airline will no longer offer plastic stir straws in its hot beverages like coffee and tea, and citrus picks will also be made from non-plastic material, but they still plan to stock compostable straws aboard flights.One of the U.S.'s largest paper straw manufacturers is a subsidiary of Precision Products Group named Aardvark Straws. It was created in 2007 after eco-friendly businesses like zoos and aquariums asked manufacturers for more sustainable alternatives to plastic. Yet they are having trouble keeping up with surging demand, the company's global business director, David Rhodes, told National Geographic in a previous interview.Bon Appétit has locations in 33 states, and Ganzler says it will be easier to phase in paper straws in regions with a higher concentration of restaurants because the demand will be higher. More sparsely populated areas may take more effort.When Seattle's ban fully went into effect this month, city officials faced criticism from disability advocates, who fear those who need straws most may not have access to them. Similar pushback is befalling other places looking to ban straws around the world.Some disability advocates say there just aren't enough viable alternatives to plastic yet.Some compostable paper straws are made from organic materials that can cause allergic reactions, they say. Paper straws can also be more difficult to use for people who have challenges swallowing or controlling their bites. And reusable straws made of materials like metal or glass can be potentially hazardous for people with some conditions.“I think there have been some misunderstandings,” Jackson says of those who worry they'll no longer have access to plastic straws at restaurants. Seattle is encouraging vendors to keep a supply of plastic straws on hand for those who request one, he says.Bon Appétit plans to do the same. Alaska Airlines says they will keep a supply of paper straws on hand.In an article published last month on National Geographic's website, Aardvark said paper straws typically cause about a penny more to make than plastic straws.Bon Appétit declined to disclose how much it is costing them to switch to using paper straws.“I think right now we're at peak straw pricing,” says Ganzler. “It went from being a niche product to being very in demand.”In Seattle, fines are only imposed on businesses using Styrofoam containers, and Jackson says the coming year will be oriented around education and outreach. He knows businesses have different opinions on plastic straw bans, but he says businesses are being encouraged only to offer straws on request rather than stocking up a large inventory of paper straws.Seattle's waste facilities are also capable of processing compostable plastic, a feature not seen in many city trash facilities. So improving infrastructure to better handle alternatives is another cost cities weighing plastic straw bans could face.The merits of plastic straw bans depend on who you ask. Some say they're an incremental step in the right direction, while others say they simply put a distracting band-aid on our cultural dependency on plastic, especially single-use plastics.Many of the recent plastic straw bans have emerged in left-leaning cities, or by companies who already tout a commitment to environmental sustainability. Ives says Lonely Whale typically reaches out to companies that are already likely to be environmental allies, versus wading into what may be more adversarial territory.“Our theory of change is to work with companies that are already on the environmental side,” she says.(Read more about what actually comprises the bulk of plastic pollution.)",
"Plastic six-pack rings were first manufactured in the 1960s. By the 1970s, environmentalists were already calling for their use to be reigned in.Much like the plastic straw, six-pack rings are often seen as enemies of the ocean. Though straws and six-pack rings account for only a tiny fraction of all the plastic trash in the ocean, images of hapless marine animals like sea turtles with plastic straws jammed into their noses or plastic six-pack rings encircling their bodies have sparked public backlash against the common items.Now, some beer companies are trying to create new, innovative ways to hold their cans together without trapping marine animals in any resulting refuse.Unlike plastic straws, however, viable alternatives aren't always readily available. When the straw was first commercially produced, it was made of paper, making the move away from plastic simply a return to the straws of yore.Plastic rings have been available for four decades, and they are now more heavily regulated than they were when first produced.In 1987, the Associated Press reported that as many as one million seabirds and 100,000 marine mammals were killed every year by six-pack rings. That figure is widely cited and still used today, but can't easily be traced to its origin. In 1984, the New York Times reported from a conference of the Washington-based Entanglement Network that 100,000 marine mammals die after encountering plastic every year.In one beach clean-up on the Oregon coast organized in 1988, volunteers picked up 1,500 six-pack rings in the course of a few hours.Manufacturing company Illinois Tool Works claims “the beverage packaging industry was transformed” when an operating unit within that company called HiCone invented six-pack rings in the 1960s. Today, that same unit manufacturers a variety of plastic six-pack rings on machines it says can package 2,400 cans per minute.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.Since 1994, the EPA has mandated that all ring carriers sold in the U.S. must be degradable. Many manufacturers meet this standard by making their rings photodegradable, which means they break down in light.HiCone uses the technique and says at most it takes three to four months for the rings to break down in cloudy, winter-like conditions. While this regulation makes it less likely animals will be entangled by the rings, it still leaves the possibility that they might consume the smaller byproducts formed as the plastic breaks down. EPA regulations say the resulting plastic fragments can range from particles too small to see with the naked eye to pieces several centimeters across.Almost 700 species are now known to have been harmed by ocean plastic, and every year, around 18 billion pounds of plastic flows into the ocean. Forty percent of that is single-use plastic—plastic that is used once and then thrown away. Marine animals from birds to mammals are impacted, not just from the entanglement risk before the rings degrade, but from ingesting micro-sized plastic particles that can eventually cause them to starve (by plugging up their digestive systems).Scientists have described microplastics as a kind of “plastic soup,” and studies say that anywhere from 15 to 50 trillion pieces of microplastic are in the ocean.Producing plastic rings also requires using petroleum—around eight percent of global oil production is to make plastic.To cut down on microplastics and carbon emissions, some companies are turning away from plastic rings altogether.In 2016, the beer company Salt Water Brewery announced all their six-packs of Screamin' Reels IPA would be packaged with a compostable holder termed E6PR (Eco Six Pack Ring). The container is designed to be completely compostable when thrown away and edible if it enters marine animal habitats. It's made with some of the byproducts produced from brewing beer, like spent wheat and barley.“I can't speak to the nutrition of barley to sea turtles, but it does seem a lot more benign if ingested than traditional six-pack plastics,” Nick Mallos, director of the Ocean Conservancy's Trash Free Seas program, told National Geographic in 2016.In June, Danish beer company Carlsberg Breweries announced they would be using a newly engineered type of glue to hold their six packs together.It took three years and 4,000 iterations to make an adhesive that was strong enough to keep the cans together but not so strong that consumers couldn't easily pick one off, says Carlsberg sustainability director Simon Boas Hoffmeyer.Hoffmeyer declined to disclose specifics about what made their glue unique or how much it cost, but noted it's not unlike other adhesives already on the market.“It's the same type of glues or adhesives found in other products, but the exact composition is different. The way we use the glue is different,” he added. “We have done tests that show there is no impact on the recyclability. We recommend to leave the glue on the cans so we ensure it doesn't end up in the wrong places.”Each six pack will still contain a “handle” made of a thin strip of plastic affixed to the two middle beer cans. Still, the beer company says it will help them avoid using 1,322 tons of plastic every year.While manufacturers hope it will make a dent in the amount of plastic pollution that enters the ocean every year, plastic rings are no where near the largest portion of plastic refuse found at sea. The Ocean Conservancy stages beach cleanups every year where volunteers collect trash. In 2017, cigarette butts were the biggest source of plastic pollution—1,863,838 were collected.",
"If you’re a beermaker in Germany, Martin Zarnkow is a guy you want to know. Students come to his department at the Technical University of Munich because it’s one of the few places in this nation of beer drinkers to get a degree in brewing science. Some of Germany’s biggest breweries come to Zarnkow to troubleshoot funky tastes, develop new beers, or just purchase one of his hundreds of strains of yeast. His lab is secured with coded door locks and filled with sophisticated chemical equipment and gene sequencers. But today he’s using none of that.Instead I find him down the hall, hunched over an oven in the employee kitchen, poking what looks like a pan of mushy granola cookies with a black plastic spatula. The cookies are made from brewer’s malt—sprouted, toasted barley grains—mixed with wheat flour and a few spoonfuls of sourdough starter. Pouring a coffee, Zarnkow tells me that his plan today is to re-create beer from a 4,000-year-old Sumerian recipe.Zarnkow, who started his career as a brewer’s apprentice, is also an eminent beer historian. He’s a big man with a full salt-and-pepper beard, ruddy cheeks, a booming voice, and a belly that strains the buttons on his short-sleeved plaid shirt. Put him in a brown habit and he’d be well cast as a medieval monk, the one in charge of stocking the abbey with barrels of ale. The former abbey next door, for example: Zarnkow’s building shares a hilltop, overlooking the Munich airport, with the Weihenstephan brewery, which was founded by Benedictine monks in A.D. 1040 and is the oldest continually functioning brewery in the world.You don’t have to be a regular at an Oktoberfest to know that Germany has a long history with beer. But Germany also has a long history with sausages. France started making wine in earnest only after it was conquered by the Romans (as did most of Europe) and has never looked back—but the French are also famously fond of cheese. For a long time that’s about how most historians and archaeologists have regarded beer and wine: as mere consumables, significant ones to be sure, but not too different from sausages or cheese, except that overconsumption of alcohol is a far more destructive vice. Alcoholic beverages were a by-product of civilization, not central to it. Even the website of the German Brewers’ Federation takes the line that beer was likely an offshoot of breadmaking by the first farmers. Only once the craft blossomed at medieval abbeys like Weihenstephan did it become worth talking about.Zarnkow is one of a group of researchers who over the past few decades have challenged that story. He and others have shown that alcohol is one of the most universally produced and enjoyed substances in history—and in prehistory too, because people were imbibing alcohol long before they invented writing. Zarnkow’s Sumerian beer is very far from the oldest. Chemical analysis recently showed that the Chinese were making a kind of wine from rice, honey, and fruit 9,000 years ago. In the Caucasus Mountains of modern-day Georgia and the Zagros Mountains of Iran, grapes were one of the earliest fruits to be domesticated, and wine was made as early as 7,400 years ago.All over the world, in fact, evidence for alcohol production from all kinds of crops is showing up, dating to near the dawn of civilization. University of Pennsylvania biomolecular archaeologist Patrick McGovern believes that’s not an accident. From the rituals of the Stone Age on, he argues, the mind-altering properties of booze have fired our creativity and fostered the development of language, the arts, and religion. Look closely at great transitions in human history, from the origin of farming to the origin of writing, and you’ll find a possible link to alcohol. “There’s good evidence from all over the world that alcoholic beverages are important to human culture,” McGovern says. “Thirty years ago that fact wasn’t as recognized as it is now.” Drinking is such an integral part of our humanity, according to McGovern, that he only half jokingly suggests our species be called Homo imbibens.Today Zarnkow is trying to connect his students with those roots. The barley cookies are a vehicle for the sourdough, which contains the yeast that will make the magic happen. When the cookies are ready—dark brown on top, still a little soft in the middle—Zarnkow carries them from the kitchen to an upstairs lecture hall. There, in front of his class, he slides them into a huge glass pitcher, then scoops in more crushed barley malt and some milled emmer, an ancient grain, as the Sumerians would have done. The final ingredient: three quarts of tap water from a sink in the hallway. Zarnkow stirs the resulting slop with his kitchen spatula until it’s a uniform, yellowish beige, like bread dough.It looks decidedly unappetizing. But by tomorrow, Zarnkow promises, this will be beer—a primitive, wild beer, one that people 5,000 or more years ago might have been intimately familiar with. “Mix three different ingredients with water, and that’s it,” he says. “Craft brewers today aren’t discovering anything new. Billions of people have brewed, over thousands of years.”All through my visit I’ve been distracted by a rich, malt aroma wafting through the open windows from the brewery next door. It’s a primal, pleasant smell, and it taps into a part of my brain that makes me want to stop, sit down, inhale deeply, and take a seat in the nearest beer garden.The story of humanity’s love affair with alcohol goes back to a time before farming—to a time before humans, in fact. Our taste for tipple may be a hardwired evolutionary trait that distinguishes us from most other animals.The active ingredient common to all alcoholic beverages is made by yeasts: microscopic, single-celled organisms that eat sugar and excrete carbon dioxide and ethanol, the only potable alcohol. That’s a form of fermentation. Most modern makers of beer, wine, or sake use cultivated varieties of a single yeast genus called Saccharomyces (the most common is S. cerevisiae, from the Latin word for “beer,” cerevisia). But yeasts are diverse and ubiquitous, and they’ve likely been fermenting ripe wild fruit for about 120 million years, ever since the first fruits appeared on Earth.From our modern point of view, ethanol has one very compelling property: It makes us feel good. Ethanol helps release serotonin, dopamine, and endorphins in the brain, chemicals that make us happy and less anxious.To our fruit-eating primate ancestors swinging through the trees, however, the ethanol in rotting fruit would have had three other appealing characteristics. First, it has a strong, distinctive smell that makes the fruit easy to locate. Second, it’s easier to digest, allowing animals to get more of a commodity that was precious back then: calories. Third, its antiseptic qualities repel microbes that might sicken a primate. Millions of years ago one of them developed a taste for fruit that had fallen from the tree. “Our ape ancestors started eating fermented fruits on the forest floor, and that made all the difference,” says Nathaniel Dominy, a biological anthropologist at Dartmouth College. “We’re preadapted for consuming alcohol.”Robert Dudley, the University of California, Berkeley physiologist who first suggested the idea, calls it the “drunken monkey” hypothesis. The primates that ventured down out of the trees got access to a brand-new food source. “If you can smell the alcohol and get to the fruit faster, you have an advantage,” Dudley says. “You defeat the competition and get more calories.” The ones that stuffed themselves were the most likely to succeed at reproduction—and to experience (while eating) a gentle rush of pleasure in the brain. That buzz reinforced the appeal of the new lifestyle.A truly drunken monkey, Dudley points out, would be an easy target for predators. In spite of widely reported anecdotes, there’s very little scientific evidence of animals in the wild ever getting enough alcohol from fermented fruit to exhibit drunken behavior. A satisfied glow is more likely. But that response to alcohol seems to be specific to humans and perhaps apes.The reason may be a critical gene mutation that occurred in the last common ancestor of African apes and us; geneticists recently dated the mutation to at least 10 million years ago. This change in the ADH4 gene created an enzyme that made it possible to digest ethanol up to 40 times faster. According to Steven Benner, a co-author of the study and a biologist at the Foundation for Applied Molecular Evolution in Alachua, Florida, the new improved enzyme enabled our ancestors to enjoy more of the overripe bounty on the forest floor, without suffering ill effects.“You could say we came out of the trees to get a beer,” Benner says. But the point wasn’t to get drunk. That would come much later, once we figured out how to make the stuff in quantity.Flash forward millions of years to a parched plateau in southeastern Turkey, not far from the Syrian border. Archaeologists there are exploring another momentous transition in human prehistory, and a tantalizing possibility: Did alcohol lubricate the Neolithic revolution? Did beer help persuade Stone Age hunter-gatherers to give up their nomadic ways, settle down, and begin to farm?The ancient site, Göbekli Tepe, consists of circular and rectangular stone enclosures and mysterious T-shaped pillars that, at 11,600 years old, may be the world’s oldest known temples. Since the site was discovered two decades ago, it has upended the traditional idea that religion was a luxury made possible by settlement and farming. Instead the archaeologists excavating Göbekli Tepe think it was the other way around: Hunter-gatherers congregated here for religious ceremonies and were driven to settle down in order to worship more regularly.Nestled inside the walls of some smaller enclosures are six barrel- or trough-shaped stone vessels. The largest could hold 40 gallons of liquid. The archaeologists suggest that they were used to brew a basic beer from wild grasses.Analyzing residues from several of those tubs, Zarnkow found evidence of oxalate, a crusty, whitish chemical left behind when water and grain mix. One vessel contained the shoulder bone of a wild ass, just the right size and shape to stir a foaming, fermenting broth of grain and water. The whole hilltop at Göbekli Tepe is filled with hundreds of thousands of animal bones, mostly gazelle and barbecue-ready cuts of aurochs, a prehistoric cousin to the cow.Add it all together, and you have the makings of an impressive feast, enough to attract hundreds of hunter-gatherers to that prominent hill. One purpose of the alcohol may have been the same one that leads South American shamans today to take hallucinogens: to induce an altered state that puts them in touch with the spirit world. But researchers here think something else was going on too. The organizers of the feast, they say, were using the barbecue and the booze brewed from wild grains as a reward. Once the partygoers arrived, they pitched in to erect the site’s massive pillars, which weigh up to 16 tons.The outlines of the deal have changed little in the thousands of years since. “If you need someone to help you move, you buy them pizza and a couple of beers,” says German Archaeological Institute researcher Jens Notroff.The idea that’s gaining support at Göbekli Tepe was first proposed more than half a century ago: Beer, rather than bread, may have been the inspiration for our hunter-gatherer ancestors to domesticate grains. Eventually, simply harvesting wild grasses to brew into beer wouldn’t have been enough. Demand for reliable supplies pushed humans first to plant the wild grasses and then over time to selectively breed them into the high-yielding barley, wheat, and other grains we know today. Some of the earliest evidence of domesticated grain—an ur-wheat called einkorn—comes from a site a few dozen miles away from Göbekli Tepe. The coincidence is suggestive.But proof is elusive. Zarnkow is quick to admit that oxalate proves that grain was present in the stone tubs at Göbekli Tepe, but not that the grain was fermented. It’s possible, he says, that the tubs were used to make gruel to feed the workers, not beer to get them buzzed.Patrick McGovern acknowledges the uncertainty but still says the beer-before-bread theory is solid. In 2004 he published evidence of a cocktail made of rice, hawthorn berries, honey, and wild grapes at Jiahu, a site in China just a few thousand years younger than Göbekli Tepe. The people there had only recently made the transition to farming. Yet the combination of ingredients, plus the presence of tartaric acid, a key chemical signature of wine, convinces McGovern that Jiahu farmers were already concocting sophisticated mixed beverages: It’s the earliest evidence for beer, wine, and mead, all in one.“The domestication of plants is driven forward by the desire to have greater quantities of alcoholic beverages,” McGovern says. “It’s not the only factor driving forward civilization, but it plays a central role.”Alcoholic beverages, like agriculture, were invented independently many different times, likely on every continent save Antarctica. Over the millennia nearly every plant with some sugar or starch has been pressed into service for fermentation: agave and apples, birch tree sap and bananas, cocoa and cassavas, corn and cacti, molle berries, rice, sweet potatoes, peach palms, pineapples, pumpkins, persimmons, and wild grapes. As if to prove that the desire for alcohol knows no bounds, the nomads of Central Asia make up for the lack of fruit and grain on their steppes by fermenting horse milk. The result, koumiss, is a tangy drink with the alcohol content of a weak beer.Alcohol may afford psychic pleasures and spiritual insight, but that’s not enough to explain its universality in the ancient world. People drank the stuff for the same reason primates ate fermented fruit: because it was good for them. Yeasts produce ethanol as a form of chemical warfare—it’s toxic to other microbes that compete with them for sugar inside a fruit. That antimicrobial effect benefits the drinker. It explains why beer, wine, and other fermented beverages were, at least until the rise of modern sanitation, often healthier to drink than water.What’s more, in fermenting sugar, yeasts make more than ethanol. They produce all kinds of nutrients, including such B vitamins as folic acid, niacin, thiamine, and riboflavin. Those nutrients would have been more present in ancient brews than in our modern filtered and pasteurized varieties. In the ancient Near East at least, beer was a sort of enriched liquid bread, providing calories, hydration, and essential vitamins.At Tall Bazi, a site in northern Syria, a German excavation revealed a clutch of about 70 houses overlooking the Euphrates River that were abandoned during a sudden fire almost 3,400 years ago. The long-ago catastrophe was a blessing for archaeologists: The fire forced Tall Bazi’s residents to flee in the middle of daily tasks such as cooking. It thus captured for all time a moment in the town’s everyday life.In each house, usually close to the front door, the excavators found a huge, 50-gallon clay jar sunk into the floor. Chemical analysis—by Zarnkow again—revealed traces of barley and thick crusts of oxalate in the jars. In effect, each of Tall Bazi’s houses had its own nanobrewery.By 3150 B.C., long before the fire that wiped out Tall Bazi, the ancient Egyptians had progressed beyond home brew: They were maintaining industrial-scale breweries of the sort that were eventually used to supply workers building the great Pyramids at Giza. Beer was such a necessity in Egypt that royals were buried with miniature breweries to slake their thirst in the afterlife. In ancient Babylon beer was so important that sources from 500 B.C. record dozens of types, including red beer, pale beer, and dark beer.Indirectly, we may have the nutritional benefits of beer to thank for the invention of writing, and some of the world’s earliest cities—for the dawn of history, in other words. Adelheid Otto, an archaeologist at Ludwig-Maximilians University in Munich who co-directs excavations at Tall Bazi, thinks the nutrients that fermenting added to early grain made Mesopotamian civilization viable, providing basic vitamins missing from what was otherwise a depressingly bad diet. “They had bread and barley porridge, plus maybe some meat at feasts. Nutrition was very bad,” she says. “But as soon as you have beer, you have everything you need to develop really well. I’m convinced this is why the first high culture arose in the Near East.”And then, of course, there is the other side of the story. There are the lengths to which people throughout history have gone to go on a bender.Before the Celtic ancestors of the French learned to produce wine themselves, they imported it from the Greeks, Etruscans, and Romans. In a wheat field at the end of a winding mountain road in central France, at an archaeological site called Corent, I get a taste of this dependency. My guide is Matthieu Poux, a Franco-Swiss archaeologist with a crew cut, blue aviator shades that match his shirt, and a firm handshake. All around us the extinct volcanoes of France’s Massif Central stab the sky.At Corent, Poux leads some 50 French archaeologists and students who are uncovering the foundations of a major Celtic ceremonial center and regional capital. In the second and first centuries B.C. it was home to as many as 10,000 people. The town had a marketplace, a temple, taverns, a theater, and hundreds of houses.Corent, Poux says, is a vivid example of alcohol’s role as cultural glue, social lubricant, and status symbol—and inciter of violence. There’s no need for sophisticated analysis to determine what the inhabitants preferred to pour. Around 140 B.C., eight decades before Julius Caesar’s invasion, Corent’s elites developed a ferocious taste for Roman wine. The evidence, in the shape of shattered clay wine jars, or amphorae, is so abundant that it crunches underfoot as Poux leads me across the site. Archaeologists have uncovered at least 50 tons of broken amphorae here; Poux estimates that 500 tons more remain on the hilltop.Bending down, he plucks a palm-size chunk of fired clay flecked with black volcanic glass from the dirt and hands it to me. “We have millions of amphora sherds, all imported from Italy,” he says. “This one has obsidian in it—you can tell it came from the countryside near Mount Vesuvius.”Roman vintners, whose elite Roman clients preferred white wines, tended vast plantations of red wine grapes for the Celtic market; traders moved the wine across the Mediterranean, in ships that carried up to 10,000 amphorae each, and then sent it north on small river barges. By the time it reached Corent months later, its value had multiplied a hundredfold. One contemporary claimed the thirsty Celts would trade a slave for a single jar.Wine was the focus of elaborate rituals that cemented the status of the tribal leaders. Things often got rowdy. “The ceremonies were pompous, official—and brutal too, with sacrificial victims and sword fights breaking out over portions of meat,” Poux says. “Warriors drank heavily before battle and went into battle drunk.” Amphorae weren’t merely opened; they were beheaded with swords. By paving their streets with the broken jars, Poux says, the rulers of Corent flaunted their wealth and power.By his calculations, the Celts living here went through 50,000 to 100,000 wine jars over the course of a century, the equivalent of 28,000 bottles a year of expensive, imported Italian red. “And wine was primarily drunk by elites,” Poux says. “We have to assume lots more beer and mead was drunk by commoners.”Still, by today’s standards, the quantities may not sound impressive. The modern world is awash in booze, and ever since the perfection of distillation in the Middle Ages, we’ve consumed a lot of it in concentrated form. Worldwide, people age 15 and over average about a drink a day—or more like two if you include only drinkers, because about half of us have never touched a drop. In the United States, alcohol abuse kills 88,000 Americans and costs $249 billion a year, according to estimates by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.Millions of years ago, when food was harder to come by, the attraction to ethanol and the brain chemistry that lit up to reward the discovery of fermented fruit may have been a critical survival advantage for our primate ancestors. Today those genetic and neurochemical traits may be at the root of compulsive drinking, says Robert Dudley, whose father was an alcoholic.Throughout history, ethanol’s intoxicating power has made it an object of concern—and sometimes outright prohibition. And through the ages, says Rod Phillips, author of Alcohol: A History, most societies have struggled to strike a balance: “Allow people to drink because it makes them happy and is a gift from the gods, but prevent them from drinking too much.”The ancient Greeks were a good example. A crucial part of their spiritual and intellectual life was the symposium fueled by wine—within limits. Mixing wine with water in a decorated vessel called a krater, Greek hosts served their (exclusively male) guests a first bowl for health, another for pleasure, and a third for sleep. “When this bowl is drunk up, wise guests go home,” the comic poet Eubulus warned in the fourth century B.C., according to one translation. “The fourth bowl is ours no longer, but belongs to violence; the fifth to uproar; the sixth to drunken revel; the seventh to black eyes. The eighth is the policeman’s; the ninth belongs to biliousness; and the 10th to madness and the hurling of furniture.”It’s been 24 hours since Zarnkow mashed together barley, bread, and milled grain in a widemouthed laboratory pitcher. The mixture spent the night sitting on a table next to his desk, covered by a paper plate.When Zarnkow flicks on the lights, I can immediately see that the slop has come alive, thanks to yeast from the sourdough. Muddy sediment at the bottom of the pitcher resembles wet muesli. Every few seconds, a large bubble of carbon dioxide percolates to the top through a scummy layer of foam. A translucent gold liquid, resembling the wheat beer brewed in massive steel tanks at the brewery next door, rests in the middle.Zarnkow says the inspiration for the brew came from a 5,000-year-old song. A hymn to Ninkasi, the Sumerian goddess of beer, it sounds a lot like the technical brewing manuals lining Zarnkow’s office shelves. “Ninkasi, when your rising bread is formed with the noble spatula, it has an aroma like from mellow honey,” one recent translation reads. “To let the fermenting vat produce loud sounds, you place it appropriately on a sublime collector vat.”He and I look at the bubbling pitcher, in my case a little uneasily. “There’s no added carbon dioxide, no hops. It’s not filtered. It’s not to European tastes,” Zarnkow warns me, managing my expectations as he strains some Sumerian home brew through a coffee filter. “But back then, the alternative wasn’t tea or coffee or milk or juice or soft drinks. This is much more tasty than warm water filled with microorganisms.”I pour a few fingers into a flimsy plastic cup. Bits of grain float to the top.I take a cautious sniff.I sip.The beer is both tart and sweet, bready with a hint of sour apple juice at the end. It’s … actually pretty good. If I close my eyes, I can almost imagine it changing the world.",
"In Hawaii two free divers explore a coral reef and some of its resident butterflyfish.The world’s coral reefs are suffering, and chemicals commonly found in sunscreen contribute to the problem. By the numbers, the problem is daunting: 14,000 tons of sunscreen are thought to wash into the oceans each year; 82,000 chemicals from personal-care products may be tainting the seas; about 80 percent of corals in the Caribbean have been lost in the last 50 years due to pollution, coastal development, and warming waters.But there are some bright ideas for offering reef relief. Some destinations, such as Hawaii and Palau, have introduced bans on harmful sunscreens; these bans will go into effect in the coming years. Here’s how you can protect both your skin and coral reefs.A diver swims above a garden of stony corals on the Great Barrier Reef, which is more than 1,250 miles long. Climate change poses a multitude of threats to this international treasure.When you swim with sunscreen on, chemicals like oxybenzone can seep into the water, where they’re absorbed by corals. These substances contain nanoparticles that can disrupt coral’s reproduction and growth cycles, ultimately leading to bleaching.Even if you don’t swim after applying sunscreen, it can go down drains when you shower. Aerosol versions of sunscreen can spray large amounts of the product onto the sand, where it gets washed into our oceans.Humans might be responsible for this contamination, but we’re also capable of helping heal these fragile underwater ecosystems. On May 1, 2018, lawmakers in Hawaii passed a bill banning the sale of sunscreens containing oxybenzone and octinoxate, another harmful chemical. Hawaii is the first state to pass such a measure, and it could go into effect as a law by January 1, 2021. (Read about a bright idea that could save the biggest reef on Earth.)On November 1, 2018, the small island nation of Palau announced it too would ban selling or using sunscreens that contain chemicals harmful to coral reefs. Palau is a pristine archipelago known for having one of the largest marine reserves on the planet.Even with government bans, certain types of sunscreen can be used to guard against burns and skin cancer. Use these tips on sunscreen and other ways to help you protect yourself and the corals.Coral reefs all over the world are threatened by pollution, and many of the most popular destinations have the most at-risk coral. Australia’s Great Barrier Reef and the bays of Hawaii, the U.S. Virgin Islands, and Israel are especially vulnerable.The Great Barrier Reef is one of the planet’s most spectacular underwater treasures. The reef’s colorful corals serve as a submerged garden for a marine ecosystem that draws visitors to the area from all over the world. Snorkelers and scuba divers can swim alongside some of the thousands of species of fish that make the reef their home. Lucky travelers might even catch a glimpse of the resident dugongs or sea turtles.Oahu’s Hanauma Bay, a state park that was formed within a volcanic cone, is another favorite destination. The area’s turquoise surf and vibrant coral gardens lure nearly one million tourists each year, making the spot one of Hawaii’s best places for snorkeling. The bay is home to 450 species of fish and has the largest mass of reef anywhere in Oahu.Visitors to Hurricane Hole at the Virgin Islands Coral Reef National Monument, located off Saint John, can snorkel in the mangroves with coral, fish, and marine invertebrates. The submerged monument protects 22 miles of marine habitat, including 30 coral species.At Israel’s popular Eilat Coral Beach Nature Reserve, bridges built above the reefs allow visitors to get a peek at the coral and the colorful fish it houses. Scuba divers can also explore the reefs for a more intimate view.If coral reefs die, we will have lost a vital ecosystem. We could also hurt our global economy—reefs are a major tourist attraction and source of income for these popular vacation spots. (Read about how one country is restoring its damaged ocean.)Known as one of the most romantic resorts in the world, architectural wonder Jade Mountain in St. Lucia perches on a cliff with dramatic views of the Piton Mountains, a World Heritage site.",
"You can spend a lifetime exploring the Great Barrier Reef and still not see all of this colorful coral realm—it’s nearly the size of Montana. Sprawling off the east coast of Queensland, Australia, the Great Barrier Reef is not a single reef but a group of more than 2,800 distinct entities. It stretches over 1,250 miles (2,000 kilometers) north to south and covers some 135,000 square miles (350,000 square kilometers) in total.The reef system is the largest structure on Earth built by living organisms, tiny hard corals that are no bigger than a fingernail. When corals die in countless numbers their limestone-secreted skeletons build upon one another to form the bedrock of the reef. The magnificent structures we see today were produced by a slow process played out over millions of years. Reefs grow only about half an inch (1.3 centimeters) a year.Some 2,000 different fish species have been identified on the Great Barrier Reef, and new ones are found each year. Scientists estimate that the reef is home to 4,000 mollusk species and over 250 different shrimp species. Even the corals that construct the reef itself are diverse—numbering some 400 species.This colorful aquatic ecosystem is home to a staggering diversity of plant and lower animal life but is also frequented by larger species like dugongs, sea turtles, sharks, and dolphins.In order to protect these biological treasures, the Great Barrier Reef Marine Park was designated a World Heritage site in 1981. Some two million tourists visit the Great Barrier Reef each year, driving an eco-economy that generates billions of dollars annually. But in recent years, the reef has suffered unprecendented coral bleeching. [Related: Tourists Try to See Great Barrier Reef Before It's Gone]Hordes of divers and other tourists descend on the Great Barrier Reef each year, but with modest environmental impact thanks to strict regulations. A much greater threat is climate change—sea-temperature rise, acidification, and more intense events such as cyclones are putting the reef at risk.Most day trips to the reef leave on boats from coastal centers like Cairns or Port Douglas. Most of the reef is dozens of miles offshore and must be reached by boat journeys of one to several hours.The Great Barrier Reef lies in tropical waters where temperatures are warm enough to offer enjoyable swimming and diving year round—though averages can vary 10°F (5.5°C) from winter to summer. Peak tourism time on the reef is April through November, but even in winter ocean water temperatures typically top 72°F (22°C). Daytime temperatures during the summer months (December to March) can be quite hot—particularly in the northern regions of the reef.High-speed catamarans take day-trip visitors to the reef, often docking at special base camp platforms equipped for snorkeling, diving, or exploration via glass-sided semi-submersibles. Other boat tours, including sailboats, provide a more leisurely experience. Private charters are available for snorkeling, diving, whale watching, or fishing adventures—including overnight live-aboard vessels for journeys to more remote locations. Aircraft and helicopter flights offer a bird's-eye view of the massive reef system, much of which lies close to the surface in clear, warm waters.",
"Experts believe the Great Barrier Reef, which sits off the east coast of Queensland, Australia, is being damaged by rising ocean temperatures.A recent survey confirms that an unprecedented number of tourists are visiting Australia's Great Barrier Reef because they are afraid the World Heritage site will soon disappear.A survey published this week in the Journal of Sustainable Tourism found 69 percent of recent tourists felt they needed to see the reef before it dies off.Half of the reef has died over the past three decades thanks to warming ocean water, pollution, coastal development, and aggressive invasive species, such as starfish.This year, the Great Barrier Reef has suffered its worst bleaching event on record, damaging more than 90 percent of the reef's 1,400 miles (2,250 kilometers).Almost half of the coral in the reef's northern and central sections have been bleached so badly that they will likely take decades to recover, scientists have warned.And the most recent government assessment of the reef's health predicted that unless the world makes good on plans to slash greenhouse gas emissions, ocean waters will continue to warm and bleaching will occur every year there by mid century. That will likely lead to the collapse of the ecosystem, the scientists warned.To gauge tourist awareness of these issues, this week's survey asked tourists to rank 15 reasons for their trip to the reef. The response “to see the reef before it is gone” came in at fourth place, surprising the researchers.This was just behind more typical reasons for the trip, including “to discover new places and things,” “to rest and relax," and “to get away from the demands of everyday life.” (See other places that tourists hope to see before they are ruined.)Corbin Forest, a student from Texas who visited the reef in July, tweeted, "Glad I can say I got to see it before it's all gone."Tourism on the Great Barrier Reef generates $5.4 billion per year and employs some 60,000 people, all of which could be in jeopardy as the reef's health continues to deteriorate.Follow Brian Clark Howard on Twitter and Google+.",
"The dugong, a distant relative to the elephant, is similarly a gentle herbivore. It is often recognized for being more closely related to the manatee.A lesser known cousin of the manatee, the dugong (Malay for “lady of the sea”) is said to have inspired ancient mermaid legends. “Seeing dugongs in the wild is an extremely special experience,” says environmental scientist Erina Molina, who got hooked on life under the sea when she snorkeled for the first time at age 15. Now, a decade later, this National Geographic explorer is dedicated to preserving the wonders of the marine world; she enlists fishers of the Philippines to help track dugongs. Here she shares tips on how to encounter this vulnerable herbivore.Molina recommends two spots where it’s very likely for snorkelers and divers to come face to face with dugongs. In the crystalline waters of Calauit Island, Philippines, locals lead conservation-minded tours that often include an appearance by Aban, a sea cow celebrity. “The best time to see dugongs here is from March to early June, when the water is calm and clear,” Molina says. In Egypt, at the lagoon of Abu Dabbab, abundant seagrass sustains dugongs and giant green sea turtles.When swimming with dugongs, go in small groups of four or five and limit encounters to 15 minutes. Keep a safe distance—around 15 feet away—and resist the urge to touch an animal. Instead, Molina advises, “keep still and be quiet.” If you’re snorkeling, move your fins slowly to avoid slapping the water. As long as they don’t feel disturbed, dugongs will keep munching on seagrass and providing great photo ops. [Read more tips for better wildlife encounters.]Don’t buy products made from dugongs (leather, charms, jewelry, traditional medicine). They are strictly regulated, and in some cases banned, by an international treaty. To help keep coastal waters clean, avoid single-use plastics.",
"Photographers capture images of emperor penguins on Snow Hill Island in Antarctica. Booking trips that offer viewing experiences in an animal's natural habitat is one way to support sustainable wildlife tourism.Have you ever thought about going diving with sharks? Or booking an expedition to see polar bears? Maybe experiencing an elephant trek through the jungle? You’re probably considering these activities for two reasons: You’re looking for excitement, and you love animals.But these trips aren’t all created equal. Your itinerary has the potential to support conservation and promote good wildlife management, but it could also encourage hidden animal abuse and wildlife snatching. To help tell the difference, we talked to experts and compiled some guidelines to keep in mind when choosing an activity.Before you embark on an animal-focused adventure, consider these six important tips.An elephant approaches a wildlife photographer inside Kenya's Maasai Mara National Reserve. For the safety of the animals and viewers, it's important to remain inside the vehicle during a safari.Safaris, whale watching, and snorkeling are among the best ways to see animals. “If you’re looking at it from the animal’s perspective, it’s better to see them in the wild to see them expressing and behaving naturally,” says Born Free’s Daniel Turner, who helped develop animal welfare guidelines for the Association of British Travel Agents.And what about swimming with sharks? It’s controversial, especially when it comes to baiting the sharks, but WWF and the Manta Trust have a guide on responsible shark and ray tourism that can help you find the best operators. Marine ecologist Rick MacPherson, who studies and evaluates the shark diving industry for Sustainable Shark Diving, recommends looking for tour operators who emphasize education, follow clear safety protocols, and never handle the sharks.If you plan on visiting a sanctuary or zoo as a more affordable option, make sure it’s professionally managed and accredited. (Learn more: What Makes a Good Zoo?)Boaters observe a gray whale lift its head above the water's surface in Baja California, Mexico. Maintaining a safe distance helps protect the wildlife and allows visitors to witness more natural behavior.Snake charmers and monkey circuses may seem enticing, but what often happens behind the scenes may horrify you. In some cases, performing animals may be housed in small, barren cages, trained using painful punishments, and kept in high-stress situations, which compromise their immune systems and psychological well-being.Elephants giving rides to tourists through the jungle also often face cruelty. In Thailand, for example, young elephants face the “crush,” a tortuous custom during which they’re beaten into submission, and there’s a history of elephants getting sick or dying in Southeast Asia after being overworked in extreme temperatures. To avoid supporting these practices, seek out a respected elephant sanctuary or take a jeep tour that will allow you to see elephants in the wild.This may feel like a major disappointment, but it’s important to understand the issues surrounding facilities that offer hands-on experiences or close contact with animals, like selfies with tigers, cuddles with lion cubs, or walks with cheetahs. “At worst, these animals have endured a lifetime of suffering,” including early separation from their mothers to encourage speed breeding and harsh training, says Neil D’Cruze, a researcher at World Animal Protection. “Even at reputable venues that do take good and responsible care of their animals, there is still a real risk that these types of activities are sending out a very harmful and misguided message to the public—that these wild big cats make great exotic pets.”World Animal Protection and Oxford University have identified 10 of the cruelest wildlife attractions based on scientific animal welfare ratings. See their full list to learn more.Visitors watch two polar bears walk across the ice in Svalbard, Norway. To ensure an animal-friendly itinerary, it can help to work with a reputable tourism company focused on sustainability.WWF’s Vice President for Travel, Tourism, and Conservation James Sano recommends choosing treks and tours that employ local people. Every local employed in tourism is one fewer person who might be forced to turn to poaching to feed a family. Plus, community-based wildlife tourism provides an incentive to protect its animals for future visitors. For example, ecotours to the Arctic to see polar bears “help local communities earn vital income and encourage residents and visitors alike to recognize the long-term advantages of conserving polar bears and their habitat,” says the conservation group Polar Bear International.If you’re really concerned about animal welfare and wildlife sustainability, consider booking with a tour group instead of arranging each activity yourself. He says it can be hard to tell from a website whether the information provided is truthful, but with a reputable tour group, “they’re doing the homework for you.”A Maasai guide walks with visiting children near three giraffes in Kenya's Maasai Mara National Reserve. Finding tours that employ locals encourages stronger community participation in wildlife conservation.You should never get close enough to alter an animal’s behavior, National Geographic recommends. It’s dangerous for you, and it could cause trouble for the animal too. Remember the death of the baby bison tourists thought they were rescuing? If you’re on safari, remember to turn your phone to silent, switch off the sounds on your camera, and keep your voice low—and please, stay in the car. Plus, of course, never feed the animals.Be sure to thoughtfully consider what you bring home from your wildlife adventure. A bottle of wine from Vietnam with a snake coiled at the bottom looks cool, but there’s a chance that snake was drowned alive. Or that it’s not actually dead. It might even have a parasite that’ll make you sick. It’s better just to avoid it. For a more complete list of souvenirs to skip, check out this list.",
"Jamal Galves, a conservation biologist and 2017 Nat Geo Photo Ark EDGE Fellow, often asks himself one question about the endangered Antillean manatees of his native Belize:“Why don't people care enough to protect them?”Galves grew up in a small village famous for its manatee population. He was just 11 when he happened upon a research expedition in a nearby lagoon and fell in love with the idea of exploration.“Before you knew it, my cousins and I were playing ‘manatee rescue’ on our lawn,” he recalls.Though just a child, Galves boldly approached the research team and asked to join them. The leader hesitated at first, but the boy’s curiosity and passion won him over. Galves hopped aboard.“I was just fascinated,” he said. “And I learned so much. Then I realized that these guys are in trouble, and I decided that I'm going to commit myself to do everything that I can to conserve and protect manatees.”More than two decades later, Galves is now the program coordinator for the Belize Manatee Conservation program at the Clearwater Marine Aquarium Research Institute, assisting with manatee captures and health assessments. Just as important, the program educates local communities about their role in saving the gentle creatures.What fires his passion? “Waking up knowing that you're saving a species that cannot save itself,” Galves beams. “Waking up knowing that you're speaking for something that can't speak for itself. Just because they can't speak doesn't mean that they don't have something to say.”Now an endangered species, Antillean manatees face numerous threats: habitat loss, hunting, collisions with boats, entangling fishing gear, pollution, and natural disasters. But the commitment to changing the narrative through dedicated conservation efforts from people like Galves is making a difference.The tireless efforts of Galves and conservationists alike have led to a shift in local attitudes and behavior. Progress like this has only fed his optimism about saving these manatees and getting people to do their part.“Not everybody cares,” he says, “but that doesn't make me lose hope. I'm still optimistic that people want to be a part of something, to feel that they are contributing to change.”“It’s one world, one people,” Galves says. “That's the approach we need to have if we're going to save this planet.”",
"With passenger numbers projected to double over the next 20 years, airports are expanding to meet the challenge with sleek new terminals, redesigned for the 21st century. Parks, gardens, movie theaters, spas, even an ice rink and a rooftop pool are among the amenities that can make a dent in that layover.The ideal airport was once a place where curbside drop-off was as close to the tarmac as possible, says Curtis Fentress, a veteran architect who has designed 25 airports.“Now airports are civic spaces,” he says. “As a gateway to a city or country, an airport is an opportunity for expression.“ Geography is often a muse. Fentress points to the Denver airport, where his firm’s tented roof mirrors the city’s mountainous backdrop. In Los Angeles, the coastal setting inspired the roof of LAX, imagined as a series of cresting waves.For Seoul’s Incheon airport, Fentress spent weeks photographing the city’s historic and cultural sites and perusing markets, looking at traditional patterns and construction. His vision for Incheon’s structure was a modern riff on Korean temple design.Korean-style gardens and local granite and steel were used in the space, and floors sourced from native wood. “We relate the building as much as possible to the place,” Fentress says. As for the user experience, Incheon consistently gets top marks from passengers for its cultural diversions and top-notch services.The art of the airport isn’t just about the building. “Food and even music are a part of it,” Fentress says. With the rise of budget carriers and reduced services in flight, restaurants now feature prominently; regional wines, cuisine, and chains are another way airports impart a sense of the city, he says.To keep their vast, complex spaces humming, airports can use as much energy as a city of 100,000. Designs now incorporate energy efficiency, particularly in the form of maximizing natural light and using the empty buffer zones around airports as solar “farms.”[See more ways that airports and flight itself are becoming more fuel efficient.]Check out Fentress’s designs in Seoul, Denver, and Seattle and seven others in our picks of innovative airports.This article is part of our Urban Expeditions series, an initiative made possible by a grant from United Technologies to the National Geographic Society.",
"Staring out into the wild blue yonder, a father and his children appear to walk in the clouds at Dong Tac Airport in Tuy Hoa, Vietnam. Built by the U.S. military to serve as an air base during the Vietnam War, the site was seized in 1975 and sat idle for years. A new terminal opened in 2013, and today it handles regular flights to Ho Chi Minh City and Hanoi. With the rise of budget carriers, air travel in Vietnam is skyrocketing, as it is in most Asian countries.Airports aren’t just necessary stops en route to a destination, they’re part of the journey. A rich mosaic of people, culture, light, reflection, and architectural forms, they can make for captivating photographic subjects.With passenger numbers on schedule to double over the next 20 years, many airports are expanding—and reengineering not only their operations but also the travel experience. Passengers are being offered more than merely views of planes taking off: daring art installations, distinctive designs, and 21st-century amenities, such as access to gardens and outdoor space.During the busy travel month of August, we asked our Your Shot community to show us their favorite #airportscenes. More than 1,600 submissions ranged from familiar sights of jet-lagged sleepers and moving walkways to rarely seen perspectives from the cockpit and the tarmac. Several photographers posted shots of extreme landing strips, like Nepal’s Lukla airport, tucked into Himalayan peaks, and the dramatic final approach above Maho Beach in Saint Martin, battered by Hurricane Irma earlier this month. Others caught a distinct sense of place, such as the airport in Wellington, New Zealand, filming location for the Lord of the Rings trilogy. More surprises included sightings of safari species, dinosaur skeletons, and air-show acrobatics.To participate in a future assignment, check out Your Shot, where you can share photos and connect with fellow photographers from around the globe.See our picks of innovative airports and how both flight and airports are pivoting toward a greener future.This article is part of our Urban Expeditions series, an initiative made possible by a grant from United Technologies to the National Geographic Society.",
"Avoiding single-use plastics like bottles and bags is hard enough at home, and can be especially difficult while traveling. When you’re on the go and trying to pack light, it’s easy to grab a plastic-wrapped sandwich and bottle of water. But eliminating single-use plastics on a trip might be easier than you think—even in a foreign country without potable water.I took on this challenge in Belize, a country that is no stranger to ecotourism. Its government recently announced a ban on major single-use plastics like bags and straws to go into effect by Earth Day 2019. And UNESCO has removed the Belize Barrier Reef from its list of World Heritage in Danger, after years of efforts to restore the reef’s long-term health.The green mindset reaches local scales, too: I loved visiting smaller cities like Punta Gorda, where a glass soda bottle is cheaper than a plastic one, because the glass bottles can be sanitized and reused.Each September, the UNESCO-protected Cape Floral Region bursts into living color with some of the greatest concentrations of floral species in the world. Bushmans Kloof, a century-old homestead turned nature reserve, cares for 18,532 acres of this rare habitat—home to endangered Cape mountain zebras and archaeological sites that include 10,000-year-old San rock paintings. “We are dedicated to Bushmans Kloof’s enduring legacy, to help protect and preserve its precious heritage through ecotourism, conservation programs, and community benefit projects,” says South African-born Toni Tollman, who oversees the reserve on behalf of her family. Sixteen lavish rooms and a private family villa serve as the base camp for daily outings or unwinding fireside (above) with a glass of the Cape’s finest vintages. 16 rooms; from $420, including full board. www.bushmanskloof.co.zaImagine if every foot of coastline around the world was stacked with five plastic grocery bags stuffed with plastic trash. That’s the amount of plastic waste that ends up in our oceans each year. This visual is staggering.Single-use plastics include plastic bags, to-go containers and cutlery, straws, those tiny shampoo bottles at hotels, plastic water bottles, plastic cups, and the packaging on pretty much anything edible in an airport. How can you explore the rivers, jungles, and islands of a country without using any of these items?I took a nine-day trip to attempt just that. After planning ahead—and lots of learning on the go—I’ve got some tips to help you get going.The Tool Kit. Reducing waste takes a bit of preparation, but not much. Though every trip is different, here’s what I packed for Belize: a reusable grocery bag, collapsible food container, bar soap and bar shampoo, bamboo utensils, a glass straw, two reusable water bottles, and a SteriPen to purify water on the go.Two Bottles Are Better Than One. I’ve never thought to pack two water bottles on a trip. If you have a backpack with a bottle holder on each side, it’s super easy, and it’s helpful for long day trips. And for shorter trips, the smaller, sleeker bottle fit right in my purse.Collapsible Food Containers Are Underrated. These containers, which fold flat when not in use, came in handy a lot more than I thought they would. Packing three sizes let me keep one filled with trail mix—a handy snack throughout the entire trip—and use the others for leftovers or mini-meals.• SAVED: 79 pieces of single-use plastic, an average of 8.8 a day• USED: 2 straws• UNAVOIDABLE USES: 4 things I couldn’t avoid without considerable effort: Daily contacts for 3 days, wrapper on reef-safe sunblock, 1 decongestant pack, luggage tags• WHAT I GAVE UP: 5 things I had to give up: A cup of fresh mango juice, bottle of lime soda, bag of nuts, airplane snacks, ice cream samplesYou Have to Ask. Carrying a straw—or food container, or a bag—isn’t helpful if you don’t say “No straw please” or “I have my own bag, thanks!” or “Do you mind putting that fresh shrimp in my container?” Sometimes you’ll get a weird look. That’s OK. Sometimes you’ll influence the person sitting next to you or working behind the counter.At one eatery, when I asked for no straw, the person said, “You know, we’ve been meaning to find a way to cut back on straws. What are some alternatives?” Perhaps if we make this request enough times, eateries will stop providing straws by default.A Little Planning Goes a Long Way! I spent a lot of time thinking, planning, even obsessing over the tools I’d need for situation I might find myself in. At the end of the trip, nine small items and a little thoughtfulness helped me avoid using 79 single-use plastics!You Don’t Always Need Tools. You can avoid some single-use plastics without replacing them. One afternoon at an ice cream shop, I had to pass on getting samples that came on plastic spoons. But by choosing a cone instead of a cup, I could enjoy a delicious ice cream break, plastic free.You Aren’t Perfect. Before taking on this pledge, I felt paralyzed by how overwhelming the process seemed—it can discourage you from doing anything at all. But doing something is better than doing nothing. Even helping a little bit—passing on airplane pretzels or filling your water bottle before you leave the house—makes a difference. I ended up using two plastic straws on this trip because, while arguably the most avoidable single-use plastics, they often come by default at restaurants. But overall, I felt good about how much I saved.Taking on this challenge on a weeklong vacation can feel like a more manageable start than overhauling your lifestyle—and you may even find yourself a changed person once you get back home.",
"Each September, the UNESCO-protected Cape Floral Region bursts into living color with some of the greatest concentrations of floral species in the world. Bushmans Kloof, a century-old homestead turned nature reserve, cares for 18,532 acres of this rare habitat—home to endangered Cape mountain zebras and archaeological sites that include 10,000-year-old San rock paintings. “We are dedicated to Bushmans Kloof’s enduring legacy, to help protect and preserve its precious heritage through ecotourism, conservation programs, and community benefit projects,” says South African-born Toni Tollman, who oversees the reserve on behalf of her family. Sixteen lavish rooms and a private family villa serve as the base camp for daily outings or unwinding fireside (above) with a glass of the Cape’s finest vintages. 16 rooms; from $420, including full board. www.bushmanskloof.co.za",
"Researchers pulled nearly 90 pounds of plastic waste out of the stomach of a young cuvier beaked whale that died in the Davao Gulf of the Philippines on Saturday, March 16. The whale starved to death because of the plastic in its belly.On Saturday, the curators at a natural history museum in Davao City, the Philippines, got a call from the local marine agency: An emaciated-looking whale in the Davao Gulf was vomiting blood, listing badly as it swam, and was very likely going to die shortly. They should come pick up its body.When Darrell Blatchley, a marine mammal expert and the curator at the D’Bone Collector Museum in Davao City, brought the whale back to the lab to open it up for a necropsy, he found something shocking: more than 88 pounds of plastic waste jammed into its belly.“Plastic was just bursting out of its stomach,” he said. “We pulled out the first bag, then the second. By the time we hit 16 rice sacks—on top of the plastic bags, and the snack bags, and big tangles of nylon ropes, you're like—seriously?”His son, who was attending the necropsy, said “Dad, how did it even live this long?”The plastic trash was so densely packed into the dead whale's stomach that it felt as “hard and compacted as a baseball,” he said, only many times bigger—more like two dense basketballs of trash, about eight percent of the juvenile beaked whale's total weight. Some of it had been in the stomach so long it had started to calcify.The curvier beaked whale, a young male about 15 feet long and weighing 1,100 pounds, likely died of starvation and dehydration brought on by the plastic stuffing its belly. Whales absorb water from the food they eat, and there was no sign that any food had made it into its intestines for many days. Its body was destroying itself from the inside: Its stomach acid, unable to break down the plastic waste, had worn holes through its stomach lining instead.(Read about how the ocean has become a plastic-filled minefield for many marine mammals).As the plastic pollution crisis grows, more and more dolphins, whales, birds, and fish are found dead with their stomachs full of plastic. In 2015, scientists estimated that around 90 percent of all seabirds have ingested some amount of plastic; UNESCO estimates that 100,000 marine mammals die because of plastic pollution each year.The cause of death varies. Sometimes, like in this case, plastic blocks food from traveling from stomach to intestine, essentially starving the animal. Other times, sharp edges poke holes in their internal organs.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.In most cases, the amount of plastic animals ingest isn’t enough to kill them, says Matthew Savoca, a Stanford-based whale expert who also studies plastic pollution. But the effects can cascade, even if only a little bit of plastic lodges in their bellies, taking up valuable space. “If you’re eating 10 percent less calories than your neighbor, day after day, that adds up,” says Savoca.“Basically, wherever we're looking for plastics, we're finding them,” says Savoca, “Now, we’re seeing that even in places humans never even have been close to, we find our trash. And not just that, but animals eating our trash.”The waters around the Philippines are particularly treacherous for many marine animals. The country is one of the most prolific plastic polluters in the world, and many of its waterways are thick with trash.The country has many laws in place that aim to curb plastic pollution, but enforcement has been light, and the logistics of managing waste disposal across the country’s more than 7,000 islands is challenging, and plastic-wrapped items are for sale nearly everywhere.Blatchley has recovered 61 whales that died in the nearby Davao Gulf. Of those, he estimates that plastics were the cause of death for about 45 of them. The problem is exacerbated, he says, by heavy fishing in the region, which has limited the amount of food available for the whales to eat, making them even more likely to try to eat plastics floating nearby.“It’s just tragic that this is becoming the norm, to expect that these whales will die because of plastic rather than from natural causes,” he says. “We’re losing them faster than they can evolve to learn not to eat the plastic.”",
"A pregnant sperm whale washed up dead on a beach in Sardinia, Italy. Its stomach was full of plastic.A pregnant sperm whale washed up, dead, on a sandy beach outside Porto Cervo, a resort town on Italy’s island of Sardinia last week. When scientists and veterinarians cut open her womb and stomach, they found a horrifying sight: A dead baby whale, and nearly 50 pounds of plastic waste jammed into her belly.The plastic filled more than two thirds of her stomach. They could also see the remains of some of the squid she'd eaten—but the nutrients from that food likely never made it into her bloodstream, because her intestines were blocked by the morass of plastic waste.“I never saw such big quantity of plastic,” said Luca Bittau, a marine biologist at SEAME Sardinia, a nonprofit organization that focuses on studying and protecting the cetaceans that live in the region. They found fishing nets; fishing lines; plastic bags, some so fresh the barcodes were still readable; plastic pipes, and even some plastic plates “like those that we have in our home,” he says. “It was like our usual life was there, but inside this stomach.” The realization, he said, was devastating.The scientists think the 26-foot long whale was part of a pod that spends its time feeding and birthing its babies in the nearby Caprera Canyon, a crevasse deep below the crystalline surface waters of the Mediterranean Sea. The region is popular with tourists and boaters, and biologists thought the biggest challenge the whales faced were the dangers of boat strikes—not plastic pollution.But under the beautiful surface of the sea, says Bittau, the situation is ugly. Plastic litters the deep ocean floor, where the sperm whales and their closely related brethren go to eat. They dive deep into the canyon, using echolocation to search for the squid they like to eat.But a plastic bag waving in the deep ocean currents could be difficult to distinguish from a fluttering squid. And once a whale ingests it, that bag is stuck there. Each mistake a feeding whale makes adds to the problem, and slowly its stomach fills with the deadly material.This whale’s cause of death has not yet been determined. Veterinarians and scientists at the nearby University of Sassari are still investigating what, exactly, killed it and the baby. But this whale is only the most recent in a long list of marine mammals that have been found dead with plastic packed into their stomachs.“Plastics are now found everywhere in the world, throughout the entire marine ecosystem and food chain, from seabirds to sea turtles to seals,” says Nick Mallos, the director of the Trash Free Seas program at the Ocean Conservancy, a nonprofit that focuses on ocean protection. “It’s a truly global problem with inputs that are at a massive scale, and we’re seeing the impacts grow and grow.”Plastic pollution has penetrated to the deepest crevasses of the ocean, and the Mediterranean is no exception. It collects waste from the countries bordering it, and because the ocean is a closed basin, that waste stays trapped in its waters—essentially forever. In a recent report, Greenpeace estimated that most of the 150,000 and 500,000 tons of large plastic debris that enters European waterways ends up in the Mediterranean each year.In response to the plastics crisis, the European Union recently passed a ban, scheduled to go into effect in 2021, on many types of single-use plastics.But that’s not soon enough to save this whale.“This is another tragic example of the real impacts that plastics have when they enter the ocean,” says Mallos. There are many challenges facing the world’s oceans, he says, “but plastic pollution is the one we know the solution to. We don't have to worry about changing ocean chemistry or about managing fish population stocks. We just have to turn off the tap of plastics flowing into our waters.”“We all felt responsible when we saw those things inside the whale,” says Bittau—from the plates, like he and his colleagues used in their own homes, to the bags, to the pipes. So it’s up to all of us, he says, to fix it.",
"Deep sea amphipods like this small shrimp-like creature are eating miscropic pieces of plastic and tiny microfibers.Plastic litter is now virtually inescapable throughout every crevice of the world's oceans, and a newly published study finds, for the first time, that the creatures living in the deepest, most remote environs on Earth are eating it in startling amounts.A British research team captured amphipods, tiny shrimp-like crustaceans that scavenge on the seabed, from six of the world's deepest ocean trenches and took them back to their lab. There, they discovered that more than 80 percent of the amphipods had plastic fibers and particles in their digestive systems, known as the hindgut. The deeper the trench, the more fibers they found. In the Mariana Trench, the deepest at more than seven miles beneath the waves in the western Pacific, the scientists found fibers in 100 percent of the samples–in every amphipod collected. Prior studies of plastic particles ingested by marine organisms caught near the surface have found far smaller percentages.The new research, published in the journal Royal Society Open Science, adds new details to earlier research that only discovered plastic bits in sea floor sediment in 2014. But it fleshes out the picture shaping up of ocean trenches as the final sink for marine debris. That is not good news.Once the plastic particles sink to the deep sea, they've got nowhere else to go.“If we could magically snap our fingers over 10, 20, 50 years time and stop making plastic, what would happen to the plastic in the river? It would flush and wash out,” says Alan Jamieson, a marine biologist at Newcastle University and the study's lead author. “The coastlines would dilute and disperse. In the open ocean, the UV and wave action would act on that plastic and the surface would be clean again. What happens when you get to the deep sea, there's no dispersal or flushing. It's only going to get more and more and more.”He adds: “This is not a one-off find. The Pacific Ocean covers half the planet. Our study sites were off Japan and Peru and Chile in places separated by thousands of miles. We can now say with confidence that plastic is everywhere. Let's not waste our time looking for more. Let's concentrate our efforts on what it is actually doing.”The research team sampled five trenches throughout the western Pacific and one deep-sea trench off the west coast of South America. Researchers deployed traps with bait wrapped carefully to avoid falsely contaminating a creature's insides with plastic.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.Once collected, they studied a deep part of the creature's digestive system called the hindgut. They wanted to ensure no plastic ingested after the amphipods were caught was making its way into their results.Inside, they found a rainbow of plastic items.Sixty-six percent of the plastic they found was blue fibers. Black, red, and purple fragments were also present, along with blue and pink fragments.No trench was fiber-free, and more than 80 percent of the amphipods contained them. When tested, the fibers were the same used in textiles, and the study suggests they entered the ocean after leaching from washing machines.Richard Thompson, a marine scientist at the University of Plymouth, whose 2014 study discovered the microplastics on the deep see floor, says the new work is “a missing piece of the jigsaw puzzle.”“The next thing is: is it causing any harm,” he asks. “It's a risk assessment. They more plastic you've got, the more likely a large number of creatures are going to interact with it. There are so few studies in the deep ocean, we are only beginning to understand it.”Jamieson says the reactions he gets to the revelation that marine life at the bottom of the sea is eating plastic falls into two categories. The first is horror that no place on the planet has escaped the plastic invasion. The other category stuns.“Believe it or not, they say, 'That's great. It means the contamination from land is now at the bottom of the sea and that’s a good result, isn’t it?'” he says. “It’s crazy that people like to think that way.”.“Humans have an odd relationship with depth,” Jamieson says. “When you talk about seven miles underwater, people freak out. Flip that 90 degrees. Seven miles is half the length of Manhattan. A marathoner could run it in 20 minutes. It’s a small world in many respects and throwing something into the sea, it can sink to places that you think are far away, which are not really.”Jamieson says the ocean should be considered in a different light—as part of one continuous body of water that covers most of the Earth’s surface, full of millions of animals all interacting with each other.”Susanne Brander, an Oregon State University toxicologist who researches the effects of microplastics on larval fish, says the amphipods are becoming a vector to transport plastic particles into the food web.“The amphipods they are finding fibers in are prey for larger fish and those larger fish are prey for even larger predators,” she says. “These zooplankton at the base of the food chain are taking up the microfibers because they are similar in size to the phytoplankton they eat. And that puts these fibers into the food web. We are finding larger organisms with intestines lined with microfibers. They found a baleen whale that had been beached and when they cut it open, the intestines were lined with these smaller particles. They give us a snapshot of what's happening in a larger sense.”There are as many as 51 trillion pieces of plastic in the ocean, and 90 percent of that ocean plastic is microscopic. Scientists have previously likened it to a kind of “soup.”Last December, researchers from Japan warned National Geographic of the urgency to learn more about these remote places. Recreating the intense pressure of the deep sea in labs is difficult, and the full impacts of plastic on deep-sea organisms is still unknown or unconfirmed.This article has been updated with additional information.",
"Mixed plastics are conveyed toward an optical sorter at a recycling plant. The industry is going through rapid changes, making it sometimes confusing for consumers.Last Earth Day, I published a column in the Washington Post on common recycling myths. I received so many comments and emails in response, often asking additional questions, that I wanted to follow up with a new list here at National Geographic.The recycling industry is changing rapidly, as are advancements in materials science and product design. The field has an increasingly global footprint and is affected by complex forces, from oil prices to national policies and consumer preferences.As investor Rob Kaplan of Circulate Capital recently told National Geographic, “There's no silver bullet to stop plastic pollution. We're not going to be able to recycle our way out of the problem, and we're not going to be able to reduce our way out of the problem.” We have to pursue both those tracks while seeking new solutions at the same time, Kaplan noted, which is why his firm is raising tens of millions of dollars to invest in new litter cleanup efforts in the developing world.Most experts agree that recycling remains an important way to reduce litter and waste and to recover valuable materials, while reducing greenhouse gas emissions and conserving significant amounts of energy and water. Here are some other things to keep in mind:A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.With the rise of “single-stream” recycling systems in the late 1990s, the number of people partaking in recycling skyrocketed. Consumers in many areas no longer had to sort their recycling by the type of material, let alone by the color of the glass or the numbered category stamped on the bottom of plastics. They could simply place all their recyclables into one container.That made things a lot easier for consumers. But it has also led to a significant amount of contamination—both in terms of damaged materials and unwanted stuff that gums up the works. Overzealous recyclers, in their desire to avoid waste, are too often tossing everything from banana peels to wooden picture frames to broken cellphones into blue bins, ignoring the posted rules.As a result, the Container Recycling Institute points out that even though single-stream systems increase participation and reduce the costs of collection, they tend to cost an average of three dollars per ton more to maintain than dual-stream systems, in which paper products are collected separately from other items. In particular, broken glass and plastic shards can readily contaminate paper, causing problems at the paper mill. Ditto for food grease and other chemicals.Today, about a quarter of everything consumers place in recycling bins ultimately can’t be recycled by the programs that collect them. This includes such items as food waste, rubber hoses, wire, low-grade plastics, and many other items that overly hopeful residents toss in. Such materials waste hauling space and fuel, jam up machinery, contaminate valuable materials, and pose hazards to workers.In response to the problem, China, which takes in a significant portion of the recycling material collected in the U.S. for processing, will now only accept shipments with a contamination rate of 0.5 percent or less.So regardless if your community follows single-stream, dual-stream, or another recycling system, it’s important to follow your local rules to keep the process running smoothly.This was a particularly common refrain when I lived in Manhattan, where one can often see people rummaging through trash bins in search of anything with a little value. But that’s not the most effective way to manage waste, and the reality is a more complex interplay of players, not an either-or proposition.Around the world, millions of people eke out a living collecting waste. They are often among the poorest and most marginalized citizens, yet they provide valuable services to society. Waste collectors reduce litter and the resulting risk to public health, and they contribute meaningfully to recycling efforts.In Brazil, where the government tracks the country’s estimated 230,000 full-time waste pickers, data show that they have helped drive up recycling rates to nearly 92 percent for aluminum and 80 percent for cardboard. (Compare that to 75 percent for aluminum and 70 percent for cardboard in the U.S.).Around the world, studies show that more than three quarters of such waste pickers are actually selling their finds to established businesses within the recycling chain. So informal waste pickers are often working with formal enterprises, rather than competing against them.One such example is Al Electronic Recycling Center in South Los Angeles, where 90 percent of the redeemable material they process is brought by local trash pickers, many of them homeless, who are paid for the material.Anthony Collins, A1’s owner, told the Huffington Post, “[Trash pickers] keep you afloat, keep you busy, keep your employees working.”Many waste pickers themselves have been organizing, unionizing, and seeking formal acknowledgement and protection from their governments—in other words, seeking to join established recycling chains, not undermine them. That’s what has happened in Buenos Aires, where some 5,000 people, many former informal trash pickers, now earn a wage working for the city collecting recyclables. In Copenhagen, the city has installed trash cans with special shelves where people can leave bottles, making them easier for informal collectors to retrieve and turn in for the deposits.When recycling first got started decades ago, the technology was more limited than it is today. Forget about trying to recycle complex items or those made up of different kinds of materials, such as juice boxes, milk cartons, or toys.Now, more than 60 percent of U.S. households have access to carton recycling, thanks to wider use of machines that can break down these items into their constituent materials. Thanks in part to consumer demand, product manufacturers have consistently been working on making packaging that is easier to recycle. If you find yourself stymied by a particular item, give the manufacturer a call to make your case.It’s always a smart idea to check the latest rules for your particular recycling provider, but many consumers no longer have to separate out the plastic windows from envelopes, or remove staples from documents. Recycling equipment is now often equipped with heating elements that melt away adhesives or with magnets that strip away bits of metal.An increasing number of recyclers are even able to deal with “less desirable” plastics like grocery bags or items made of mixed or unknown resins, as can be found in many toys and household items. This doesn’t mean you can toss anything you want into a blue bin (see Myth No. 1 above), but it does mean a wider range of products can be recycled than ever before.In fact, many common items can be recycled over and over again, with substantial savings to energy and natural resources (see Myth No. 5 below).Glass and metals, including aluminum, can effectively be recycled indefinitely, without a loss of quality. In fact, aluminum cans have consistently shown the highest value among recycled commodities and remain in high demand.It’s true that each time paper is recycled, the tiny fibers that comprise it become a little more damaged. However, the quality of paper made from recycled content has improved dramatically over the past few years. The average piece of virgin printer paper can now be recycled five to seven times before the fibers get too degraded to be useful as new paper. After that, they can still be made into lower-grade paper-based materials like egg cartons or packaging inserts.Plastic can often only be recycled once or twice into a new plastic product. Oftentimes this will be into something that doesn’t have to carry food or meet stringent strength requirements, such as lightweight household items. That’s because the polymers break down in the recycling process. However, engineers are always looking for new downstream uses, such as making all-purpose plastic “lumber” for decks or benches, or mixing plastics with asphalt for more durable road materials.Since many people don’t know what happens to their recycling after they put it on the curb, it’s perhaps not surprising that skepticism would arise. Occasional news reports warn of garbage collectors tossing carefully sorted piles into the landfill, people often decry the fuel used by recycling trucks, and critics debate the merits of using public funding to start or support private recycling programs.But according to the Environmental Protection Agency, the benefits of recycling to the planet are clear. Recycling aluminum cans saves 95 percent of the energy needed to make new cans from raw materials. Recycling steel and tin cans saves 60 to 74 percent; recycling paper saves about 60 percent; and recycling plastic and glass saves about one-third of the energy compared to making those products from virgin materials. In fact, the energy saved by recycling one glass bottle will operate a 100-watt light bulb for four hours.Recycling helps reduce litter, which has been known to spread disease like bacterial or fungal infections. And it creates jobs—some 1.25 million in the United States alone. While critics have argued that recycling can lull the public into a false sense of security in solving all the world’s environmental problems, most experts say it is a valuable tool in the fight against climate change, pollution, and other major issues our planet now faces.And in many areas, recycling is not simply a government program but rather a dynamic industry with competition and ongoing innovation, from vending machine collection systems to clever new incentives for consumers and businesses. In many cases, recycling can actually be a net positive financial benefit.",
"A shopper carries plastic bags through San Francisco's Chinatown in 2012. The city banned plastic checkout bags that October.A battle over plastic—a material so prolific the UN calls the 90 percent of it that ends up as trash a pollution crisis—is under way in Florida.Coral Gables, a small city of 51,000 people just south of Miami, wants to ban polystyrene from restaurants and grocery stores. The Florida Retail Federation does not, and an appeals court ruling delivered yesterday says they can keep the plastic product, in part thanks to a 2016 state rule that prevents cities from regulating how polystyrene is used.The court battle demonstrates how cities and states are increasingly clashing over whether it’s legal to ban plastic.California, New York, and hundreds of municipalities in the U.S. ban or fine the use of plastic in some way. Seventeen other states, however, say it’s illegal to ban plastic items, effectively placing a ban on a ban. This kind of legal maneuvering is booming. Four states created preemptions this year alone with two only narrowly failing in South Carolina and Alabama.Often, efforts to preempt plastic bans are aided by the plastics industry, which wants to ensure its products remain widely used.“First and foremost, we represent the manufacturers of plastic retail bags,” says Matt Seaholm, executive director of the American Progressive Bag Alliance, a group affiliated with the plastics industry. “We engage at a local level to provide information to local officials on the merits of any type of an ordinance that is being proposed.”Seaholm said the industry is also looking out for local retailers. He adds plastic bans drive up costs, impose confusing regulations, and put in the hands of the government a decision that should be made by consumers and business owners.Often partnering with local retail and restaurant associations, the industry is at odds with environmental groups that say single-use plastic must be urgently addressed.“The plastic industry is putting a lot of their money on preemption, and they’re winning,” says Jennie Romer, an attorney at the Surfrider Foundation, a group that advocates for pro-environment policies.Eight additional states are considering preemption measures in the coming years that could make it illegal to ban single-use plastics.When the small border town of Laredo, Texas tried to pass a bill that banned plastic bags in 2008, they wanted to cut down on the costs associated with cleaning the commonly littered item out of waterways and public spaces.With lobbying help from the American Chemistry Council, the bill was killed, according to an investigation by the Houston Chronicle.In 2014, the bill was reintroduced and passed by the city. Even the state’s multibillion-dollar cotton and cattle ranching industries supported the ban, saying the stray plastic tumbleweeds clogged machines and cows’ stomachs.Four years later, the Texas Supreme Court ruled that the ban was illegal, saying it violated a 1993 law that prevented cities or counties from banning a container or package. With it, the ruling brought down 11 other local Texas bag bans.“It was pretty disappointing,” says Jason McCombs from Austin’s waste management authority. “We lost a pretty important environmental tool to help protect our environment here.”In Colorado, it was also a 1993 statute that pro-plastic lawyers used to argue against city bans.For most states, however, no decades-old law was on the books to prevent a plastic ban. Some of the fastest legislative action in states like Pennsylvania, Arizona, and Missouri have rapidly developed after city plastic ordinances were adopted. These state bills all cite the need to create uniform laws throughout their states, a major point made by Seaholm.“If you think about a retailer with stores in multiple jurisdictions, it becomes cumbersome to adhere to different processes,” he says. “You end up with a patchwork.”When asked why the plastic industry tries to change state legislation instead of opposing city ordinances, Seaholm says it’s to ensure this uniformity.State-level preemptions are used to block a number of other city-level ordinances, from creating sanctuary cities to imposing sugar taxes.Romer says large companies are more successful at the state level where legislators are less often confronted by grass roots city activists.She also points to significant involvement from the American Legislative Exchange Council (ALEC) a right-leaning policy group that provides model legislation to states adopting plastic preemptions. Both the American Plastics Council and the Plastics Industry Association have been members of ALEC.In Austin, McCombs says city residents have still embraced reusable bags even though plastic has been reintroduced. Since the ordinance was put in place in 2013, they’ve seen a 75 percent reduction in the number of plastic bags in collected litter, and they still plan to be a zero-waste city by 2040.The American Progressive Bag Alliance often challenges the idea that plastic bans are a truly environmental option.Plastic bags, they argue, have more than a single use. They can be reused for tasks like lining trash cans or picking up dog waste. Their website cites a study in the journal of Environmental Economics and Management that found California consumers often purchased heavier trash bags to compensate.A statewide ban that led to a 40-million-pound reduction in plastic waste, was offset by a 12-million-pound increase in trash bags, the study found.The paper ultimately recommended imposing bag fees, like the five-cent charge you pay to use a plastic bag in Washington, D.C. The fee, the paper concludes, would could cost less than buying small trash bags but still encourage shoppers to bring reusable bags.The Surfrider Foundation also encourages fees instead of outright bans as the most effective way to incentivize consumers to change their behavior.To fight back against preemptions, legislators have recently begun to draft anti-preemption laws that would allow cities to reinstate bans and fees on plastic items—the dreaded ban on ban of bans.Eight states have introduced anti-preemption bills, though none have significantly progressed.",
"Mass production of plastics, which began just six decades ago, has accelerated so rapidly that it has created 8.3 billion metric tons—most of it in disposable products that end up as trash. If that seems like an incomprehensible quantity, it is. Even the scientists who set out to conduct the world’s first tally of how much plastic has been produced, discarded, burned or put in landfills, were horrified by the sheer size of the numbers.“We all knew there was a rapid and extreme increase in plastic production from 1950 until now, but actually quantifying the cumulative number for all plastic ever made was quite shocking,” says Jenna Jambeck, a University of Georgia environmental engineer who specializes in studying plastic waste in the oceans.“This kind of increase would ‘break’ any system that was not prepared for it, and this is why we have seen leakage from global waste systems into the oceans,” she says.Plastic takes more than 400 years to degrade, so most of it still exists in some form. Only 12 percent has been incinerated.The study was launched two years ago as scientists tried to get a handle on the gargantuan amount of plastic that ends up in the seas and the harm it is causing to birds, marine animals, and fish. The prediction that by mid-century, the oceans will contain more plastic waste than fish, ton for ton, has become one of the most-quoted statistics and a rallying cry to do something about it.A Chinese laborer sorts through plastic bottles at a recycling operation in Dong Xiao Kou village, on the outskirt of Beijing.The new study, published Wednesday in the peer-reviewed journal Science Advances, is the first global analysis of all plastics ever made—and their fate. Of the 8.3 billion metric tons that has been produced, 6.3 billion metric tons has become plastic waste. Of that, only nine percent has been recycled. The vast majority—79 percent—is accumulating in landfills or sloughing off in the natural environment as litter. Meaning: at some point, much of it ends up in the oceans, the final sink.If present trends continue, by 2050, there will be 12 billion metric tons of plastic in landfills. That amount is 35,000 times as heavy as the Empire State Building. (Learn about one possible future solution.)Roland Geyer, the study’s lead author, says the team of scientists are trying to create a foundation for better managing plastic products. “You can’t manage what you don’t measure,” he says. “It’s not just that we make a lot, it’s that we also make more, year after year.”Half the resins and fibers used in plastics were produced in the last 13 years, the study found. China alone accounts for 28 percent of global resin and 68 percent of polyester polyamide and acrylic fibers.Geyer, an engineer by training, specializes in industrial ecology as a professor at the University of California, Santa Barbara. He has studied various metals and how they’re used and managed. The rapid acceleration of plastic manufacturing, which so far has doubled roughly every 15 years, has outpaced nearly every other man-made material. And, it is unlike virtually every other material. Half of all steel produced, for example, is used in construction, with a decades-long lifespan. Half of all plastic manufactured becomes trash in less than a year, the study found.Much of the growth in plastic production has been the increased use of plastic packaging, which accounts for more than 40 percent of non-fiber plastic.The same team, led by Jambeck, produced the first study that assessed the amount of plastic trash that flows into the oceans annually. That research, published in 2015, estimated that 8 million metric tons of plastic ends up in the oceans every year. That is the equivalent to five grocery bags of plastic trash for every foot of coastline around the globe.“We weren’t aware of the implications for plastic ending up in our environment until it was already there,” Jambeck says. “Now we have a situation where we have to come from behind to catch up.”Gaining control of plastic waste is now such a large task that it calls for a comprehensive, global approach, Jambeck says, that involves rethinking plastic chemistry, product design, recycling strategies, and consumer use. The United States ranks behind Europe (30 percent) and China (25 percent) in recycling, the study found. Recycling in the U.S. has remained at nine percent since 2012.“We as a society need to consider whether it’s worth trading off some convenience for a clean, healthy environment,” Geyer says. “For some products that are very problematic in the environment, maybe we think about using different materials. Or phasing them out.”",
"Text by Annie HayWhen a Sydney, Australia-based beverage company proposed plans to extract water from a reservoir in Bundanoon, a 2,000-person town about 160 miles from Sydney, locals were dubious. When the company announced that the local water would be used to fill plastic water bottles that it would then sell in Sydney, and, inevitably, back in Bundanoon, locals were incensed. (Read the story in the New York Times here.)On July 8th, a town meeting of more than 400 people unanimously voted to outlaw the sale of bottled water in Bundanoon. Aside from the obvious economic reasons, locals also cited the environmentally degrading effects of the water bottles. To make up for the loss of bottled water, the town plans to add more public drinking fountains and will provide reusable water bottles, decorated with the town’s new slogan, “Bundy on Tap,” for people to fill with clean, fresh tap water. The same week that the Bundanoon decision was made, New South Whales Premier Nathan Rees announced a ban on the bottles in all government departments and agencies, urging other state governments to follow suit.The plastic bottles require a whopping 200 ml of oil per 600 ml water bottle created and emit untold amount of carbon dioxide during the creation and transportation process.While shopkeepers stand to lose money in the decision, they argue that saving the environment–and the town the humiliation of buying back its own water–is well worth it.",
"More than $100 billion is spent every year on bottled water globally.Bottled water is a drain on the environment: The U.S. public goes through about 50 billion water bottles a year, and most of those plastic containers are not recycled, according to Elizabeth Royte's 2008 book Bottlemania: How Water Went on Sale and Why We Bought It.Transporting the bottles and keeping them cold also burns fossil fuels, which give off greenhouse gases. And groundwater pumping by bottled-water companies draws heavily on underground aquifers and harms watersheds, according to the Sierra Club, an environmental nonprofit. And according to some estimates, it takes up to three liters of water to produce one liter of bottled water.Yet more than U.S. $100 billion is spent every year on bottled water globally. In many cities in developing countries where there is not a safe source of tap water, bottled water becomes a somewhat trusted option.But in the U.S., where tap water is federally regulated and often screened for dangerous pollutants, the public drinks 21 gallons (79 liters) of bottled water per capita per year on average, according to the Columbia Water Center at Columbia University's Earth Institute in New York. The bottled-water industry is so successful, it has outpaced milk, coffee, and juice in number of gallons of drinks sold—putting it behind only beer and soda.Water Bottle BansThough the sale and consumption of bottled water is still on the rise, certain policymakers and activists have taken steps to reduce it and encourage people to drink tap. In September 2009, the Australian city of Bundanoon became the first city in the world to completely ban bottled water from its stores' shelves, installing water fountains around the city instead.Among U.S. cities that have taken action are San Francisco and Seattle, which no longer buy water for city use, and Chicago, which added a five-cent tax on each bottle. Several restaurants in those cities have also given up bottled for filtered tap. Other cities are also considering taking action.The tide toward tap has boosted businesses that make reusable water bottles, especially aluminum and stainless steel varieties. Many reusable bottles are made of polycarbonate plastic, but those often contain bisphenol A (BPA), a chemical linked to reproductive problems and heart disease. In response, some polycarbonate-bottle makers have phased out BPA and advertise "BPA-free" products.(Related: "Chemical BPA Linked to Heart Disease, Study Confirms.")Health CostsNot only does bottled water contribute to excessive waste, but it costs us a thousand times more than water from our faucet at home, and it's likely no safer or cleaner, experts say. A 2008 investigation by the nonprofit Environmental Working Group found some bottled water is sullied with untested industrial chemicals and may not necessarily be cleaner than tap water.(Related: "What's Best for Kids: Bottled Water or Fountains?")Water aside, the plastic used in single-use bottles can pose more of a contamination threat than the water. A safe plastic if used only once, #1 polyethylene terephthalate (PET or PETE) is the most common resin used in disposable bottles. However, as #1 bottles are reused, as they commonly are, they can leach chemicals such as DEHA, a possible human carcinogen, and benzyl butyl phthalate (BBP), a potential hormone disruptor. And because the plastic is porous you'll likely get a swill of harmful bacteria with each gulp if you reuse the bottles.Bottled Tap WaterMore than 80 percent of recyclable plastic bottles end up in landfills each year. They do not break down naturally and release toxic chemicals when they finally do decompose, according to the Columbia Water Center.Another major problem with bottled water, according to Columbia, is that a traditionally public good has been privatized. Bottled water companies gain high profits by drawing water from public water sources, putting it in plastic containers, and reselling it at 2,900 times the price of regular tap. Some experts contend that the profits from bottled water companies could go toward improving public water supplies and infrastructure—making better water for everyone.With reporting by Eliza Barclay",
"Tampon applicators are almost always made from plastic. Some companies make applicator-free tampons.Plastic pervades modern life, and menstruation is no exception. Since the middle of the 20th century, many tampons and menstrual pads have contained somewhere between a little and a lot of plastic in their basic design—sometimes for reasons that “improve” the design, but often for reasons less crucial.Getting a handle on how much plastic waste comes from menstrual products is tough, in part because it’s labeled as medical waste and does not need to be tracked, and in part because so little research has even looked at the scope of the problem. But rough estimates for the likely output are staggering: In 2018 alone, people in the U.S. bought 5.8 billion tampons, and over the course of a lifetime, a single menstruator will use somewhere between 5 and 15 thousand pads and tampons, the vast majority of which will wind up in landfills as plastic waste.To dislodge plastic from menstrual care, though, will take more than design disruption, because the reasons plastic has lodged itself so deep in the design in the first place are tangled in a web of culture, shame, science, and more.Most American women will menstruate for about 40 years in total, bleeding for about five days a month, or about 2,400 days over the course of a lifetime—about six and a half years, all told.All that menstrual fluid has to go somewhere. In the U.S., it usually ends up in a tampon or on a pad, and after their brief moment of utility, those products usually end up in the trash.The most common menstrual products are a veritable cornucopia of plastic. Tampons come wrapped in plastic, encased in plastic applicators, with plastic strings dangling from one end, and many even include a thin layer of plastic in the absorbent part. Pads generally incorporate even more plastic, from the leak-proof base to the synthetics that soak up fluid to the packaging.For Ann Borowski, who researched the ecological impact of sanitary products, the sheer numbers were astounding.“I don’t want to contribute 40 years of garbage to a landfill just to manage something that shouldn’t even be seen as a problem,” she says. “It seems like something we should have a little more control of by now. I don't want to have that kind of burden on the planet.”In ancient Greece, menstrual blood was seen by the writers of the time as something fundamentally insalubrious, a symbol of female excess, a “humor” that needed to be expelled from the body in order to maintain balance and health. The blood itself was considered unhealthy—even poisonous. That general attitude persisted for centuries.By the mid-1800s in the U.S., the culture around menstruation had hardened into a simple narrative: Period blood was perceived as “bad blood,” both dirty and shameful, says Chris Bobel, an expert on menstruation at the University of Massachusetts, Boston.But menstruation was an unavoidable reality that had to be dealt with. Women in the pre-20th century U.S. used a “bricolage” approach to managing it, repurposing all sorts of commonplace items into pad- or tampon-like objects, historian Susan Strasser explains. That meant leftover scraps of fabric, soft strips of bark, or whatever else was available and absorbent. But the tools left much to be desired. They were often bulky and unwieldy, and they had to be washed and dried—which meant they would be displayed publicly, a less-than-desirable situation in a culture that stigmatized menstruation.In 1921, the first pack of Kotex crossed a drugstore counter. Thus began a new era: that of the disposable menstrual product.Kotex were made with Cellucotton, a hyper-absorbent plant-based material that had been developed during World War I for use as medical bandaging. Nurses started to repurpose the material for menstrual pads, and the practice stuck.Some physically active menstruators, like dancers and athletes, gravitated toward another emerging product: tampons. The tampons of the 1930s were not too different than the ones on drugstore shelves today, generally made of a wad of dense cotton or a paper-like material attached to a string.What all of the new products had in common was disposability. Marketing campaigns leaned into the idea that the new products would make menstruators “happy, well-poised, efficient modern women,” free from the tyranny of old “makeshift” strategies. (Disposables also meant that menstruators would have to stock up each month, locking them in to decades of purchases).“From the beginning, the companies pushed this idea that the way to be modern was to use these new disposable products,” says Sharra Vostral, a historian at Purdue University.The appeal and ubiquity of disposables grew as more women entered the workforce. The products offered both convenience—they were readily available in many drugstores—and discretion—women wouldn’t have to worry about bringing used cloths from work to home. It also allowed menstruators to “pass,” hiding their bodily functions from those around them, letting work continue uninterrupted.“This has been the standard,” says Bobel, “that women and girls always have to bend to norms and standards of the workplace, to be hyperefficient at all times. You can't let your body slow you down, is the message.”During a fleet of beach clean-ups in New Jersey in 2013, volunteers picked up thousands of tampon applicators.The outcome was a massive shift in the market. By the end of World War II, sales of disposable menstrual products had quintupled across the U.S.By the 1960s, chemists were busily developing sophisticated plastics and other synthetics. The technologies leapt forward so quickly that manufacturers found themselves searching for new markets into which they could incorporate their new materials.One of the markets they found was menstrual products.Pad designs began to incorporate thin, flexible, leak-proof polypropylene or polyethylene as the base (or, in patent terms, the “backsheet”). Advances in sticky-stuff technology bolstered the use of flexible plastics, allowing the pads to be attached to underwear directly rather than hanging off a complicated, bulky belt system. By the late 1970s, designers realized they could make flexible plastic “wings” that would wrap around underwear and anchor a pad in place. And designers found ways to weave thin polyester fibers into the squishy part of the pad to wick fluid away into the absorbent cores, which were getting thinner as superabsorbent materials grew more sophisticated.All these product developments sound incremental, says Lara Freidenfelds, a historian who interviewed dozens of women about their experiences with menstruation for her book The Modern Period, but they add up to big changes in experience.“Adhesive or wings—those sound like a minor product improvements, but actually people talked about them being really important. Like, wow, that was a big one, that really improved my life,” she says.In the early part of the 20th century many doctors, as well as members of the public, were squeamish about the idea that women—especially young women—might come into contact with their genitals during tampon insertion, says Elizabeth Arveda Kissling, a gender studies expert at Eastern Washington University and author of Capitalizing on the Curse: The Business of Menstruation.Maybe, inventors thought, the tampon could be inserted more “demurely” and hygienically with an applicator.The first recorded U.S. patent for tampons, from 1929, included a design for a telescoping cardboard applicator tube. Others suggested stainless steel or even glass. By the 1970s, plastics could be molded into smooth, thin, flexible rounded shapes—perfect, some designers thought, for tampon applicators.But it’s not just the applicator that’s plastic: many tampons incorporate some bits of plastic in the absorbent part itself. A thin layer often helps hold the tightly-packed cotton part together. In some cases, the string is made of polyester or polypropylene.By the middle of the century, the major players in the U.S. menstrual products market were competing fiercely for customers but running out of technological advances to trumpet. To stand out, companies came up with more and more ways to offer their customers discreet purchase, use, and disposal options.An obsession with discretion was longstanding. In the 1920s, Johnson and Johnson printed slips in their magazine advertisements for their “Modess” brand sanitary napkins. Women would cut them out and hand them silently across the pharmacy counter, receiving a nearly unmarked box in return.But as the tide turned toward disposable, portable products, and as the products themselves shrank in size, the packaging focus shifted toward individual wrapping. Menstruators needed to be able to throw products in a bag and keep them clean, to carry them from desk to restroom, and then from restroom stall to waste container.That meant plastic wrapping for everything. In 2013, the discreet packaging projects hit their heights when Kotex introduced a tampon with a “softer, quieter wrapper to help keep it secret,” designed for silent unwrapping. And disposal? There are plastics to help with that part of the process, too. In some public restrooms, little packets of scented plastic baggies sit on the bathroom stall walls, ready to enclose and disguise used sanitary products on their short path from stall to trash bin.“We're still selling shame along with the menstrual products,” says Kissling.The new plastic-packed versions of both tampons and pads vastly improved many women’s experience with their periods. But they also got generations of women and other menstruators hooked on plastic-centric products that will live on for at least 500 years after their brief usefulness has passed.It doesn’t necessarily have to be this way. In Europe, most tampons are sold without applicators. In the U.S., there’s growing interest in alternatives: In a recent survey, almost 60 percent of the women questioned were considering a reusable product (about 20 percent were currently users).Things you can do to be part of the solution:1. Try menstrual cups or reusable products.2. Choose tampons without applicators and made from natural fibers.“That’s a tectonic shift in the way women are thinking about managing their periods,” says Susannah Enkema, a researcher at the Shelton Group who worked on the survey.One of the popular alternatives is the reusable pad, a better-designed version of a very old technology. Others have embraced menstrual cups, another old technology that has recently seen a resurgence in popularity. Some companies are designing underwear that absorbs period blood directly and can be washed and used over and over, while other menstruators choose to bleed freely throughout their periods, eschewing the traditional stigma that comes from visible evidence of this most basic of biological realities.And breaking down the stigma around menstruation, says Bobel, is critical to moving toward a more socially and environmentally thoughtful future.“I’m not denying that we need something to bleed on,” she says. “And at the same time, I want to acknowledge that we are fooling ourselves if we say promoting any product is going to fix the stigma. It's not.”Change will come, she thinks, when the conversations change.How your toothbrush became a part of the plastic crisisWhy carrying your own fork and spoon helps solve the plastic crisisThe sticky problem of plastic wrapThis common plastic packaging is a recycling nightmareCigarette butts are toxic plastic pollution. Should they be banned?How the plastic bottle went from miracle container to hated garbageTires: The plastic polluter you never thought aboutCan medical care exist without plastic?Your shoes are made of plastic. Here’s why.",
"Small bits of degraded plastic from tire wear pervade the environment, including the oceans, researchers are discovering.In 2014 biologist John Weinstein and his graduate students went looking for microplastics—the small bits of degraded plastic that researchers have discovered are spread throughout the environment.The team was based at The Citadel military college in Charleston, South Carolina, where Weinstein is a professor. Working in a coastal city, they expected to find at least some evidence of microplastics, which are swept into the ocean. And sure enough, samples kept turning up.Much of what they collected came from anticipated, identifiable sources, such as broken-down plastic bags. But more than half of the pieces were black, tubular, and microscopic, with no obvious origins.“They’re elongated, almost like cigars,” says Weinstein. “It was a mystery.”Weinstein and his students looked around the Charleston harbor at common black plastic items—such as fishing nets—searching for a comparison. But there weren’t any matches. The breakthrough came when they found very similar cigar-shaped plastics in a waterway right off of a main road. Then it dawned on them what they were dealing with: tiny bits of car tires.“It was a surprise,” says Weinstein. “Usually you don't find what you're not looking for.”The find may not have been as shocking as it first seemed, however. Tires are actually among the most common plastic polluters on earth. A 2017 study by Pieter Jan Kole at The Open University of The Netherlands, published in the International Journal of Environmental Research and Public Health, estimated that tires account for as much as 10 percent of overall microplastic waste in the world’s oceans. A 2017 report by the International Union for Conservation of Nature put that number at 28 percent.“Tire wear and tear is a stealthy source of microplastics in the environment,” wrote Kole and his co-authors. “But awareness is low and currently there is no alternative for tires.”For thousands of years, wheels were made of stone or wood—no covering needed. Leather was eventually added on top to soften the ride, followed later by solid–rubber iterations. Cars were invented in the late 1800s, and pneumatic—or air filled—tires followed not long after.At the time, tire rubber came primarily from rubber trees—the cultivation of which has contributed to mass deforestation across the globe. But as the 20th century dawned and cars became less expensive and increasingly common, the world needed more rubber than was readily available. In 1909 German chemist Fritz Hofmann, working for the German chemical company Bayer, invented the first commercial synthetic rubber. Within a year the material was in car tires. By 1931 the U.S. chemical company DuPont had industrialized the manufacturing of synthetic rubber.Today tires consist of about 19 percent natural rubber and 24 percent synthetic rubber, which is a plastic polymer. The rest is made up of metal and other compounds. Producing tires still has monumental environmental impacts, ranging from continued deforestation to the climate-harming fossil fuels used to make synthetic rubbers to the assembly process. Modern car tires require about 7 gallons of oil to make, while truck tires take 22 gallons.As tires roll away the miles, they abrade, throwing off small pieces of synthetic plastic—essentially plastic—that then are washed off roads and into streams, eventually finding their way to the oceans.But what’s also becoming increasingly clear is that, as the rubber wears, tires throw off tiny plastic polymers that often end up as pollutants in oceans and waterways.“Tires,” says Joao Sousa, who studies marine plastics at the International Union for Conservation of Nature, “rank really high in terms of contribution” to the microplastics problem.Tire manufacturers Goodyear, Michelin, and Bridgestone all referred comment to The Tire Industry Project, an industry-backed research group that counts 11 major tire makers as members.“There is no globally accepted definition of microplastics,” writes Tire Industry Project representative Gavin Whitmore in an email. Their studies, he adds, “have found [that tire and road wear particles] are unlikely to negatively impact human health and the environment.”Tire tread patterns help determine a vehicle's grip on the road, as well as handling, maneuvering, and breaking. But better grip can also mean more friction. And as we drive, abrasion causes bits of our tires to break off.A 2013 report by Tire Steward Manitoba, in Canada, found that passenger light truck tires lost nearly 2.5 pounds of rubber during their service life (average of 6.33 years). The Kohl study found that Americans produce the most tire wear per capita and estimates that, overall, tires in the U.S. alone produce about 1.8 million tons of microplastics each year.Exactly how much of that waste ends up in waterways depends on many factors, says Sousa, ranging from where the road is located to the weather; rain, for example, can cause more particles to flow into the environment. Research into the topic is relatively new, he notes, so estimates will improve as more work is done. But with millions of vehicles traveling the streets every day, he says, “you start to have a grim idea about the amount of tire (particles) released.”Once tire particles have made it into rivers or oceans, they can have noticeable effects on marine life. John Weinstein, at the Citadel, exposed shrimp to tire particles in lab settings and found that the animals ate the particles, which also got stuck in their gills. Once ingested, particles balled up in the shrimp’s guts.“It doesn't die immediately,“ he says. ”There are these chronic long-term effects that really haven't been studied.”Better understood is what happens to tires once they’ve run their course and need to be disposed of—“end of life,” as the tire manufacturing industry calls it.The trajectory for used tires is, in many ways, positive. For example, the recycling of tire scraps into products such as playgrounds, sports fields, and building materials has increased dramatically over the years. The U.S. Tire Manufacturers Association (USTMA) says the re-use of tires has gone from 11 percent in 1990 to 81 percent in 2017.But that number comes with a major caveat: It includes what is called “tire derived fuels” (TDF) —the burning of tires for energy.According to Reto Gieré, an environmental scientist at the University of Pennsylvania, if tires are burned in facilities specifically designed for the task, it can be done fairly cleanly and is a decent way to recapture energy. But tires, he says, also contain high levels of potential pollutants such as zinc and chlorine, so if they’re burned in mixed-fuel facilities or without proper safeguards, he says, “we have a big mess.”Tires that aren’t recycled or burned mostly end up in landfills—some 16 percent, according to a 2018 USTMA report. The amount of landfill-disposed tires per year nearly doubled between 2013 and 2017. John Sheerin of USTMA told Recycling Today magazine that, with demand for tire derived fuels in a decline, even more tires could start heading toward landfills.The tire hasn’t seen a major redesign in decades, but there has recently been a bigger push to develop more sustainable options. In 2017, for instance, researchers led by the University of Minnesota found a way to produce isoprene, a key ingredient in synthetic rubber, out of natural sources such as grass, trees and corn instead of fossil fuels. Last year Goodyear unveiled a concept tire made from recycled rubber that has moss in the middle, which is designed to soak up carbon dioxide as it travels.Still, bits of these new tires could end up in the environment as well. Reducing tire wear, the Kole study says, would likely come at the cost of other performance metrics, such as rolling resistance, a tradeoff that may prove difficult for manufacturers to accept.“I'm not aware of any new technology to address tire or road wear,” says Weinstein.But he does see other, less direct, ways of combating the problem. Road surfaces, he suggests, could be made less abrasive or more porous to either reduce or help collect tire wear particles. He also believes that there’s room for better technology to capture tire particle runoff from roads. It’s a route that he’s currently exploring with a town near Charleston.Overall, though, what he sees as most urgent is further research and increased scientific and public awareness.“There needs to be more studies done,” he says. “I don't know if this is on a lot of people's radar right now.”How your toothbrush became a part of the plastic crisisWhy carrying your own fork and spoon helps solve the plastic crisisThe sticky problem of plastic wrapThis common plastic packaging is a recycling nightmareCigarette butts are toxic plastic pollution. Should they be banned?How the plastic bottle went from miracle container to hated garbageHow tampons and pads became so unsustainableCan medical care exist without plastic?Your shoes are made of plastic. Here’s why.",
"Astrangia poculata coral polyps consume microplastic beads (in blue) preferentially over brine shrimp eggs (yellow); these beads have the potential to be vectors of novel microbes.Scientists have for the first time shown that some wild corals are feeding on tiny shreds of plastic trash. Worse, the animals seem to prefer those ‘microplastics’ over their natural food—even when the plastic is carrying bacteria that can kill them.The new study, published in Proceedings of the Royal Society B: Biological Sciences, focused on a temperate species of coral collected off Rhode Island, one that builds small clusters no larger than a human fist. But researchers say the findings suggest that more familiar tropical, reef-building corals may also be consuming—and being harmed by—microplastics, which are defined as bits of plastic waste smaller than a fifth of an inch across.The new results add to the growing sense that microplastics are ubiquitous in the environment, from tall mountain peaks to the deepest ocean trenches. Many organisms, from fish to birds, have been found to eat small bits of plastic. So do humans, through tainted water and food sources.When Boston University coral biologist Randi Rotjan, who led the new study, first started working in marine ecosystems, she didn’t expect to be focusing on plastics. She was excited about studying corals and, as she puts it, having a conversation with nature.“Plastics keep interrupting the conversation, and it’s hard to ignore,” Rotjan said. “You pick your ecosystem, you pick your organism, and you are most likely going to find microplastics.”Rotjan and her colleagues collected four colonies of wild Astrangia poculata, a small coral that lives off the U.S. Atlantic coast from Massachusetts to the Gulf of Mexico. They chose their study site, off the coast of Rhode Island, because it was close to an urban environment—Providence is 24 miles away—that could be expected to pollute the water with plastic.Back in the laboratory, the researchers cut open the individual coral polyps and counted the number of microplastics. They found more than 100 small fibers in every polyp. Although this was the first record of microplastics in wild corals, earlier research had already shown that this same coral species consumed plastic in a laboratory setting.The team also performed lab experiments. They presented lab-raised coral polyps with fluorescent blue microbeads—bits of plastic that until recently were used in soaps, cosmetics, and medications—at the same time as a natural food, brine shrimp eggs, which are also about the size of a pinhead.Every single polyp that was given the choice ate almost twice as many microbeads as brine shrimp eggs. After those polyps had filled their stomachs with microbeads, which have no nutritive value, they stopped eating the shrimp eggs altogether.“I was totally shocked by the results,” said co-author Jessica Carilli, a scientist at the Naval Information Warfare Center Pacific in San Diego, CA. “They aren’t just passively eating any particles that float within reach of their tentacles….They unfortunately preferred plastic to actual food.”The U.S. government banned the use of microbeads in 2015, but the ban only went into effect a little over a year ago. Like other plastics, they will survive in the environment and pose a threat to corals for centuries.In an additional feeding experiment, the researchers placed the microbeads in seawater to cover them with a biofilm—a thin layer of bacteria. In the ocean, explained co-author Koty Sharp, a coral microbiologist at Roger Williams University in Rhode Island, most microplastics are likely be coated with bacteria. The researchers laced the biofilm on their microbeads with the common intestinal bacteria E. coli, dyed fluorescent green to make them easy to track.More than 48 hours after swallowing the microbeads, the polyps spit them back out. But even after that, the glowing E. coli persisted inside the coral’s digestive cavity. All coral polyps that ate the E. coli-laced microbeads died within two weeks.“This is the most interesting part of the study. No one has looked at this vector of disease pathogens before,” said Joleah Lamb, an ecologist at University of California, Irvine who was uninvolved with the study. Lamb has surveyed hundreds of coral reefs, documenting disease and pollution by large plastic trash items. Her research, published in Science last year, found that disease in corals increased by 20-fold after plastic made contact with the corals.Although E. coli is not common in the ocean, many other microbes are, and they seem to be concentrated on the surface of microplastics. Hitchhiking across the ocean on fragments of our trash, novel or harmful bacteria could be responsible for coral disease, researchers say.Other corals may not respond to microbeads or the bacteria they carry in the same way; Rotjan’s team has studied just one species so far. But those early results, she said, are very concerning.“I’m terrified of the mess we’ve created in our oceans,” Rotjan said. “But this is maybe part of the story for us to motivate cleaning it.”",
"The shoe that changed everything, according to designer D’Wayne Edwards, was the Nike Air Max 1.It was like nothing the young Edwards had ever seen. The designer, Nike’s Tinker Hatfield, had been an architect before he became a shoe designer, and he modeled his 1987 Air Max 1 after a famous building: Paris’s Pompidou Center, which wore its piping and structure on the outside of the building, rather than hidden inside.Hatfield used the same principles for the shoe to highlight a new, special technology: a puffy inflatable bladder filled with air that sat under the wearer’s heel. In the never-ending quest to build the best, lightest, strongest shoe for the athletes who were pushing the limits of human performance, the bladder was Nike’s way to soften the pressure of a hard landing on a basketball court, and was also a way to save weight, because what could be lighter than air?“As a design, it was so new and cool,” says Edwards. And, he says, it symbolized something meaningful in the history of shoe design: “This could only happen,” he says, “because of plastic.”Worldwide, more than 24 billion pairs of shoes were made in 2018, with over two billion pairs sold in the U.S. alone. That’s more than seven pairs per person each year filling up American’s closets, piling up near doorways, and eventually making their way to the trash.Many components of modern shoes are made of plastic materials, from the soles to the uppers to the eyelets.Most of those shoes are partly, or in many cases completely, fabricated from plastic and plastic-like materials, from the squishy soles to the pointy heels to the knit polyester uppers to the brittle eyelet holes. Because of their construction—usually, their many components are stitched and glued and molded together in complicated ways—they’re almost impossible to recycle. So your feet are only a short stopover in their long, long lifetimes, before they pile up in landfills and float down waterways, often living on like zombies for hundreds of years.The first stirrings of a shoe revolution are fomenting, though, and the industry is starting to look hard at the ways it can build a better, more sustainable mousetrap for your feet. But to understand how big of a challenge that is, we have to understand how we ended up in a world where most shoes are a soft, squishy mess of plastics.Until the middle of the 1800s, shoes were made from materials found in the natural world. Wood for heels. Tanned leathers for uppers and straps. Soles were rubber, or cork, or sometimes hunks of wood carved to cradle a foot. But shifting culture and materials science were coming for shoes, as they came for everything else.In the late 1800s, factory labor emerged as a dominant work type in Europe and the U.S. Once a year, usually in the summer, the factories had to close down for repairs, releasing a flood of workers out into the world, many of whom flocked to the seaside. This was the first glimpse of modern “vacations,” a new kind of leisure time that required a new suite of accessories. Instead of work boots, vacationers wanted light shoes that could withstand the damp of the beach.Around the same time, sports and leisure culture was developing. Croquet players in England wanted sticky soles to keep them steady as they aimed at their wickets. Lawn tennis players needed shoes that wouldn’t slip on close-shorn turf.The solution? Rubber. A new chemical process that kept rubber stable at warm temperatures, called “vulcanization,” was invented in the middle of the 1800s. That stable rubber material quickly made its way into tires, as seals on steam engines—and onto the soles of shoes for the athletes and vacationers of the time.“The most significant development in shoe technology in the last century was vulcanized rubber,” said Nicholas Smith, the author of a Kicks, a book about the cultural history of sneakers.The original vulcanized rubber wasn’t what we now think of as plastic. But by the middle of the 20th century, “natural” rubber products had been replaced nearly wholesale by synthetic rubbers—a close relative of the materials we know as plastics. Today, about 70 percent of all rubber used in manufacturing is synthetic, according to the American Chemical Society.(Read about the history of rubber and why we can't live without it).With the rise of rubber and leisure time—and along with it, sports like running and basketball—came a cry from athletes and shoe designers for more cushioning, more springiness, more support, less stretch. By the first few decades of the 1900s, the market for athletic shoes exploded and designs multiplied.“Fashion is a thing that often drives innovation. It’s a product of desire and design,” says Elizabeth Semmelhack, the curator of the Bata Shoe Museum in Toronto. “The capabilities of this new material to augment design pushed fashion forward, and vice versa.”As hemlines rose in the early 20th century, shoes—which had often been hidden under long skirts—became a part of the visual language of women’s fashion. In the 1920s, Jazz Age tastes for embellishment and sparkle were answered by plastics, from t-straps covered with fake crystals (themselves often made of plastic) to ultra-shiny celluloid finishes on evening shoes.Simultaneously, women started entering the American workforce en masse, a movement that only grew during war times and beyond.“These were really interesting cultural moments, when women were starting to make their own money and buy more clothes and to become more trend aware,” says Marie Brennan, a design historian at Norwich University and shoemaker. The variety and sheer number of shoes being bought for fashion, rather than purely practical purposes, grew.Plastics were making it easier and cheaper to fill that new market.By World War II, high heels had taken on strong symbolic power, says Semmelhack. U.S. soldiers serving abroad latched on to heels as a sign of idealized femininity, hanging posters of pin-up girls in sky-high heels and painting stilettoed women on the sides of their fighter planes. At home, most heeled shoes tended to be platforms or wedges made with natural bases. But those styles were not popular with the soldiers.“When the war was over, the platforms and wedges got thrown out, and that era of wartime fashion ended for women,” says Semmelhack. “Fashion sought to align women with the erotic ideals of how women were presented during the war effort. So the high heel returned with a vengeance in the postwar period.”Things you can do to be part of the solution:1. Buy fewer shoes!2. Look for shoes made of natural materials, ideally with minimal components.3. Ask your favorite brands to develop single-material shoes that can be recycled.The practical problem with high heels was technical. The heel spike had to support essentially the entire weight of the wearer. Steel worked, but it was expensive and heavy. Wood wasn’t strong enough. But new ultrahard thermoplastics were, and they could be coated with leather—and later, vinyls—to hide the ugly interior.Designers drove a subsequent explosion in the quality and types of synthetic materials available. Among them, Ferragamo designed wedges based on Bakelite and sandals that used wide strips of Nylon for the uppers, and Roger Vivier sold clear plastic booties to fashionable clients. Seventies-era disco-goers could buy sky-high platforms; one design incorporated little fishbowls in the heels.Newly unfettered by design limitations, shoes began to reflect the culture around them, including the 1960s obsession with the clear materials and plastics that were driving the space race at the time, says Semmelhenk.And the rise of skate culture in the western U.S. in the 1960s and 70s—driven in part by a spate of droughts that forced homeowners to drain their backyard pools—was nudged forward by new ways of building shoes that could withstand a skateboarder’s beatings.Simultaneously, worldwide sports culture was exploding. Running records were being set at every new world championships and Olympics, and companies like Adidas and Nike fought to get the top athletes to wear their cutting-edge designs. The same thing was happening on the basketball court.Athletes wanted shoes that wouldn’t stretch, and they wanted shoes that would give them whatever little bit of a boost they could get. Rubber soles weren’t going to cut it, and leather uppers flexed too much.“Leather is flesh,” says Edwards. “It’s always going to move with a body.”In 1972, Nikes dropped the “Cortez” sneaker—a new design for runners that they promised would revolutionize the experience. They added a foam layer between the outsole and midsole made from “Phylon,” a composite of little ethylene vinyl acetate foam pellets that were heated and then cooled into a soft foam wedge. The squishy, springy foam sole was born.Around the same time, designers got excited about using leather look-alikes for the uppers. Those materials were usually made from polyvinyl, a type of plastic. Players liked that they were flexible like leather but deformed less. Designers liked that they could produce a much wider range of colors, textures, and finishes than they could with natural leathers.From then on, springy foam technologies and vinyl-esque uppers became the name of the game. Companies hired squadrons of designers and materials scientists to tweak the chemistry or shape of their materials to eke out a tiny bit of color from the upper, or extra energy returned to the runner from the soles.“It was the obvious thing to do,” says Edwards. “You got improved strength, visual options, and easier production.”Today's foams kick about 70 percent more energy back at their wearers than the proto-foams of the 1970s; many runners think it translates to a noticeable increase in speed, though the science is still out on that. No matter what, new technologies have changed the way feet move and running motions develop. Some scientists and athletes think that technology like energy return foams were critical in Eliud Kipchoge’s sub-2-hour marathon record last week.Plastics and plastic-like substances have completely reshaped the footwear landscape, says Nicoline van Enter, an expert on shoe design who focuses on sustainability issues. They’ve made shoes better, lighter, faster, more comfortable, and more accessible to foot-havers worldwide. So the big question now is: Can they also be made in a way that uses less planet-choking plastic?Some shoe companies are looking to the past to excise plastic. Sevilla Smith, for example, builds each pair from only natural materials—strips of leather, wood, and metal nails—designing each shoe with the minimum of materials so they can be resoled or repaired nearly indefinitely.The current trend in athletic footwear design, says van Enter, is less, less, less: Think Nike Flyknits, with their stretchy knit uppers. That slimmed-down design, says Edwards, is partly inspired by aesthetics, but also by economics, because it’s much cheaper to make a shoe that requires fewer pieces to glue or sew together.That design also offers an interesting opportunity, says van Enter. Any shoe that uses mixed materials is tricky, if not impossible, to recycle, she says. So a shoe that uses only one material offers at least some hope of being recycled eventually.Adidas is working on making a shoe that fits these principles. Their “Futurecraft Loop” sneaker, in development now, is made of one single material (thermoplastic polyeurethane) that can be at least partly recycled. Simultaneously, they and other brands are making shoes out of recycled ocean plastics.But the limits of plastic recycling are currently hard. It takes energy to collect the materials, remake them into their second existence—and in many cases, that second life is their last, so recycling extends the process but doesn’t solve the underlying problem.The solution? “We’re just going to have to buy and consume a lot less,” says Brennan.Or, maybe, the future looks stranger. Edwards, laughing, explains his dream about the shoe of the future: A liquid material you’d dip your feet into when you leave the house each day, making a perfect mold of your foot. Then, when you come home, you dip your feet into another thing that breaks down the “shoe,” recycling it and getting it ready for the next day. It’s a dream for now, but creative solutions will be necessary if we’re going to kick our plastic habit.How your toothbrush became a part of the plastic crisisWhy carrying your own fork and spoon helps solve the plastic crisisThe sticky problem of plastic wrapThis common plastic packaging is a recycling nightmareCigarette butts are toxic plastic pollution. Should they be banned?How the plastic bottle went from miracle container to hated garbageHow tampons and pads became so unsustainableTires: The plastic polluter you never thought aboutCan medical care exist without plastic?",
"A Manolo Blahnik it isn't.Still, the world's oldest known leather shoe, revealed Wednesday, struck one of the world's best known shoe designers as shockingly au courant. "It is astonishing," Blahnik said via email, "how much this shoe resembles a modern shoe!"Stuffed with grass, perhaps as an insulator or an early shoe tree, the 5,500-year-old moccasin-like shoe was found exceptionally well preserved—thanks to a surfeit of sheep dung—during a recent dig in an Armenian cave.About as big as a current women's size seven (U.S.), the shoe was likely tailor-made for the right foot of its owner, who could have been a man or a woman—not enough is known about Armenian feet of the era to say for sure.Made from a single piece of cowhide—a technique that draws premium prices for modern shoes under the designation "whole cut"—the shoe is laced along seams at the front and back, with a leather cord."The hide had been cut into two layers and tanned, which was probably quite a new technology," explained Ron Pinhasi, co-director of the dig, from University College Cork in Ireland.Yvette Worrall, a shoemaker for the Conker handmade-shoe company in the U.K., added, "I'd imagine the leather was wetted first and then cut and fitted around the foot, using the foot as a last [mold] to stitch it up there and then."The end result looks surprisingly familiar for something so ancient—and not just to Blahnik."It immediately struck me as very similar to a traditional form of Balkan footwear known as the opanke, which is still worn as a part of regional dress at festivals today," said Elizabeth Semmelhack, a curator at the Bata Shoe Museum in Toronto, Canada."I thought, Wow, not so much has changed."Oldest Leather Shoe Shows Stunning PreservationRadiocarbon dated to about 3500 B.C., during Armenia's Copper Age, the prehistoric shoe is compressed in the heel and toe area, likely due to miles upon miles of walking. But the shoe is by no means worn out.Shoes of this age are incredibly rare, because leather and plant materials normally degrade very quickly.But in this case the contents of a pit in the cave, dubbed Areni-1, had been sealed in by several layers of sheep dung, which accumulated in the cave after its Copper Age human inhabitants had gone."The cave environment kept it cool and dry, while the dung cemented the finds in," said Pinhasi, lead author of the new study, published by the journal PLoS ONE Wednesday.Why Was Oldest Leather Shoe Made?Protecting the foot was probably one of the main reasons people started wearing shoes, and certainly this seems the case for the world's oldest leather shoe.Around the Armenian cave, "the terrain is very rugged, and there are many sharp stones and prickly bushes," said University of California archaeologist and study co-author Gregory Areshian, who was partly funded by the National Geographic Society's Committee for Research and Exploration. (The National Geographic Society owns National Geographic News.)Furthermore, shoes like this would have enabled people to cope with extremes of temperature in the region—up to 113°F (45°C) in summer and below freezing in winter—and to travel farther."These people were walking long distances. We have found obsidian in the cave, which came from at least 75 miles [120 kilometers] away," he said.Blahnik, the shoe designer, speculates that even this simple design was worn for style as well as substance."The shoe's function was obviously to protect the foot, but I am in no doubt that a certain appearance of a shoe meant belonging to a particular tribe," said Blahnik, who knows a thing or two about expressing identity through attire. "I am sure it was part of the outfit which a specific tribe wore to distinguish their identity from another."Not the World's Oldest ShoePreviously, the oldest known closed-toe shoes were those belonging to Ötzi, the "Iceman" found in the Austrian Alps in 1991, who died around 5,300 years ago. (See "Iceman Wore Cattle, Sheep Hides; May Have Been a Herder.")Sandals meanwhile, have an even longer history, with the oldest specimens, dated to more than 7,000 years ago, discovered in the Arnold Research Cave in central Missouri.The wearing of shoes, though, is almost certainly older than the oldest known shoes. For example, a weakening of small toe bones found in 40,000-year-old human fossils has been cited as evidence of the advent of shoes.Compared to Ötzi's shoes, the world's oldest leather shoe is strictly bare-bones, according to Jacqui Wood, an independent archaeologist based in the U.K., who studied Ötzi's shoes and who said the new study's science is sound."The Iceman's shoe was in another league altogether," Wood said. "Each base was made from brown bearskin; the side panels were deerskin; and inside was a bark-string net, which pulled tight around the foot."By contrast, the Armenian shoe is the most basic of shoes and was probably made worldwide once people decided not to walk about in bare feet." (See pictures of the Iceman.)It's true that similar shoes have been found at other sites and from other times, but study co-authors Pinhasi and Areshian think it's plausible that the style originated in Armenia."Many other inventions, such as wheel-thrown pottery, cuneiform writing, and wool production evolved in the ancient Near East," Pinhasi said. "And so Armenia may give us the earliest clues to a 'prototype' shoe, which later spread to Europe.Rebecca Shawcross, a shoe historian at the Northampton Museums & Art Gallery in the U.K., said, "You can certainly make a case for this shoe [design] being a forerunner to the North American moccasin, which has gone on to be a popular shoe style, whose influences can be seen in shoes of today—deck shoes; soft, slipper-style shoes for men; and so on."Beyond the World's Oldest Leather ShoeWith the moccasin mystery largely solved, the study team has plenty more puzzles to solve in Areni-1.Along with the shoe, the ancient sheep dung had sealed in the horns of a wild goat, bones of red deer, and an upside-down broken pot."It is a strange assortment of items," Pinhasi said, "and I wouldn’t be surprised if they have some symbolic meaning"—a meaning that could be revealed as summer, and a new dig season, dawns at Areni-1.***The discovery of the world's oldest known leather shoe was funded by the National Geographic Society, the Chitjian Foundation (Los Angeles), and Joe Gfoeller of the Gfoeller Foundation, the Steinmetz Family Foundation, the Boochever Foundation, and the Cotsen Institute of Archaeology.",
"Before our lives were inundated with things made of plastic, rubber was America's go-to manufacturing material. The 1940s saw a boom in rubber production before cheaper, versatile plastic replaced it in the next decade. Like plastic, synthetic rubber is bad for the environment. The production process releases soot into the atmosphere, and the U.S. alone discards millions of tires each year. But also like plastic, rubber used to be mass-produced with a fervor.A 1940 National Geographic article written by J.R. Hildebrand on the then-burgeoning rubber industry notes that B. F. Goodrich, now a tire manufacturer, once led the way in all things rubber, making tens of thousands of products.It's not easy to convey the breadth of products that were once made from rubber. In one factory, Hildebrand found Halloween decorations, coffin headrests, toys, beach balls, catheters, and of course, rubber bands. Rubber 70 years ago was mixed with the white latex sap commonly pulled from Amazonian sharinga trees. Today, about 60 percent of the world's rubber is synthetic, made from treated petroleum, and the other 40 percent is still sourced from sharinga trees now farmed around the world.Click through the gallery above to see what life was like when rubber reigned.",
"Sometimes you just want to spend a few hours washing your truck. It’s a beautiful day, all of northern Thailand vibrant in the spring sun, so you drive your new Isuzu into the stream that runs through your village, Tung Nha Noi. Cows and people walk by as you stand in the water, a 21-year-old guy with a hot ride, sponging it so clean that the vehicle gleams like hope in the sun.Not so long ago the chances that someone like Piyawot Anurakbranpot—“Chin” to his friends—would have a fancy truck at such a young age would have been close to zero. People in remote villages like Tung Nha Noi didn’t have the money. But recently families like Chin’s have become much more prosperous. The reason is visible in the hills behind him. Ten years ago they were covered with dense tropical forest—a profuse tangle of native vegetation. Now most of the slopes have been shaved as clean as a drill instructor’s chin and replanted with a single species: Hevea brasiliensis, the Pará rubber tree. Night after night, Chin’s family and tens of thousands of others in Southeast Asia go into plantations and tap their rubber trees, maple-syrup style. Thick white latex drips into buckets. The goo is coagulated into solids that are pressed into sheets and transported to factories, where they are processed into O-rings, belts, gaskets, insulation, and tires—lots and lots of tires. About three-quarters of the world’s rubber harvest goes to make automobile, truck, and airplane tires—almost two billion a year.Because rubber is so common, so unobtrusive, so dull, it may not seem worth a second glance. This would be a mistake. Rubber has played a largely hidden role in global political and environmental history for more than 150 years. You say you want an industrial revolution? If so, you need three raw materials: iron, to make steel for machinery; fossil fuels, to power that machinery; and rubber, to connect and protect all the moving parts. Try running an automobile without a fan belt or a radiator hose; very bad things will happen within a minute. Want to send coolant around an engine using a rigid metal tube instead of a flexible rubber hose? Good luck keeping it from vibrating to pieces. Having enough steel and coal to make and drive industrial machinery means nothing if the engines fry because you can’t cool them.To the extent that most people think about rubber at all, they likely picture a product made from synthetic chemicals. In fact, more than 40 percent of the world’s rubber comes from trees, almost all of them H. brasiliensis. Compared with natural rubber, synthetic rubber is usually cheaper to produce but is weaker, less flexible, and less able to withstand vibration. For things that absolutely cannot fail, from condoms to surgeon’s gloves to airplane tires, natural rubber has long been the top choice.Iron can be found around the globe; so can fossil fuels. But rubber today is grown almost exclusively in Southeast Asia, because the region has a unique combination of suitable climate and infrastructure. Despite all the ups and downs in the global economy, the demand for tires continues to grow, which has created something akin to a gold rush in Southeast Asia. For millions of people in this poor part of the world, the rubber boom has helped bring prosperity; Chin does not have the only new pickup in Tung Nha Noi. And rubber has helped end the region’s isolation. Brand-new “rubber highways”—the last finished in 2013—now connect previously remote plantations in Southeast Asia to tire factories in northern China.But the consequences of the rubber trade are not purely economic. Southeast Asia’s legions of Chins have set off what Jefferson Fox of the East-West Center in Hawaii calls “one of the biggest, fastest ecological transformations in human history.” In China, Vietnam, Laos, Thailand, Cambodia, and Myanmar rubber farmers have cut or burned down forests and planted row after row after row of H. brasiliensis. In the process, they are converting one of the world’s most diverse ecosystems into a monoculture as uniform as a Kansas wheat field, potentially threatening the basic ecological functions of an area inhabited by tens of millions of people. Each of the five tires on Chin’s truck—one on each wheel plus a spare—is like a small patch of tropical forest, stripped and compressed into a glossy black ring. So is every tire on my car and yours.Monocultures are intensely productive—and intensely vulnerable. Just ask Henry Ford. Giant among industrialists, control freak extraordinaire, brilliant but possibly illiterate, Ford ran his own iron and coal mines, built his own power plants, logged his own timberlands. His River Rouge factory complex in Dearborn, Michigan, had a deepwater port, a steel foundry (the world’s biggest at the time), and a hundred miles of interior railroad. Every type of material needed to manufacture automobiles was made at River Rouge save one: rubber. In 1927 Ford acquired nearly 4,000 square miles in the Amazon Basin, original home of H. brasiliensis.Native peoples had used rubber for centuries to waterproof their clothing and make rough rubber boots. By the early 19th century North Americans were buying rubber from their southern neighbors to make boots and coats of their own. But these early rubber creations melted in the summer heat and lost their flexibility in the cold. Only in the 1840s, after the amateur U.S. inventor Charles Goodyear discovered how to stabilize rubber, did it become suitable for widespread use. Goodyear’s discovery was called vulcanization. It opened the floodgates for a stream of inventions.Realizing that rubber had been transformed from a curiosity into a valuable commodity, explorers went into the Amazon forest in search of the latex-bearing trees. Boomtowns sprang up, Manaus the most remarkable. In this Brazilian city encircled by vast forest, rubber barons threw up huge mansions, paraded their bejeweled mistresses, and built an ornate opera house of imported Italian marble.European and North American governments didn’t like depending on a commodity controlled by a nation that was out of their political control. Officials at England’s Kew Gardens went looking for someone they could pay to bring rubber seeds out of the Amazon. Enter Henry Alexander Wickham, a man loathed in Brazil to this day.Born in 1846, Wickham was an entrepreneur whose ambitions were as great as his inability to achieve them. In the 1870s he and his wife were struggling to establish a tobacco and sugar plantation in the lower Amazon town of Santarém. After being contacted by Kew Gardens, Wickham gathered three-quarters of a ton of rubber tree seeds, which he loaded onto a London-bound ship. British authorities were appalled when he showed up demanding payment for every one of his 70,000 seeds. Yet sprouts from the seeds eventually were transported to British, French, and Dutch colonies in Asia. Would-be rubber kings fanned out into the equatorial forest, axes flashing, torches flaring. By 1910 more than 50 million South American trees were growing in Asia. The following year, as Asian rubber flooded the market, prices in Brazil collapsed. To the nation’s shock and fury, its hugely profitable rubber industry imploded within months.In the following decades Southeast Asia became the hotbed of rubber production, as H. brasiliensis spread across much of what is now Malaysia, Indonesia, and the southern parts of Thailand, Cambodia, Vietnam, and Myanmar. Plantation owners, suddenly wealthy, snapped up real estate in Singapore. The ever itinerant Wickham, lionized as the creator of the new industry, took to wearing a nautilus-shell tie clasp, a waistcoat fastened with silver chains, and a luxuriantly curled mustache that hung below his jaw like a flowering tropical vine.Wickham died in 1928, a year after Henry Ford obtained his land on the Tapajós River, in the lower Amazon Basin. Detesting his dependence on Asian rubber, Ford had decided to create his own supply. Thousands of workers hacked out a new, midwestern-style city from the rain forest, stocking it with rows of clapboard bungalows, Baptist churches, and a Main Street with American bakeries, restaurants, tailors, cobblers, and movie theaters. Fordlandia, as the project was quickly nicknamed, had the only 18-hole golf course in the Amazon. The scale was grandiose: The city was big enough to house several hundred thousand people. All told, Ford spent about $20 million to build it, close to $300 million in today’s money.The project was that rarest of events, an unqualified disaster. Incredibly, the company laid out a rubber plantation half the size of New Jersey without consulting a single person who knew anything about growing H. brasiliensis. For starters, the property was unsuitable for large-scale rubber cultivation. The soil was too sandy and the rainfall too seasonal. If a botanist had been on-site, Ford might have learned that there is a good reason that rubber trees are never found clustered together in the wild: They are too vulnerable to attack by South American leaf blight.Microcyclus ulei, as biologists call it, looks at rubber trees the way ant armies look at frogs: as lunch. The fungus “doesn’t kill trees straight out,” historian Greg Grandin explains in his book Fordlandia. Instead its spores tunnel into leaves, consuming their nutrients until they fall off. When the leaves regrow, the fungus attacks again; the trees, Grandin writes, “grow successively weaker, either producing dwarf shoots or dying back altogether.”The battle is silent, protracted, and for the tree, almost invariably fatal. In the wildMicrocyclus ulei spores can’t spread easily from one rubber tree to another because the trees are widely dispersed in the forest. On a plantation, trees are close to one another, like dishes at a buffet, letting the fungus hop easily between them, one plate to the next. In creating his rubber plantation, Ford had effectively spent huge sums to create an enormous fungus incubator.In 1935 the inevitable occurred. Fordlandia’s rubber trees were denuded in just a few months—an ecological cataclysm, an economic ruin. Ten years later Ford quietly unloaded the land for pennies on the dollar. In the seven decades since, every attempt to create a rubber plantation in Central or South America has failed. In the end, the fungus always won.As you drive into the outskirts of So Phisai, Thailand, the air smells like a nail salon. The smell is from formic acid, the chemical used to coagulate latex from rubber trees. You see new roofs with satellite dishes on almost every home. The smell of formic acid is also the smell of money.Many of the people in So Phisai want, in effect, to be Sommai Kaewmanee. The son of landless migrants, he borrowed money in 1992 to plant the town’s first rubber trees. At that time, he told me, everyone in So Phisai grew cassava, barely eking out an income. Young adults had to move to Bangkok to find decent jobs. Kaewmanee borrowed money to put about 1,500 trees on eight acres and persuaded three other farmers to join him, promising that people who planted rubber would become millionaires. (Most of them got pretty close, he told me.)During my visit Kaewmanee showed me the books from his growing business. If the figures had been plotted on a graph, they would have mirrored those for global automobile sales: a wiggly but inexorable march upward. Rubber riches, slowly accumulating, bought him a new home and a spiffy 4x4 vehicle and the portable electronic gadgets that his kids, home from school, were staring into. Kaewmanee had become the agricultural supervisor for his subdistrict, where 90 percent of the farmers grow H. brasiliensis. He now has about 75,000 trees. His nursery sells a million seedlings a year. Forestland is still available around So Phisai, he said, ready to be turned into tires.Kaewmanee didn’t know it, but his home and car were made possible by Chinese scientists. When rubber first came to Southeast Asia, it could grow only in the warm and wet equatorial forests of what is now Indonesia, Malaysia, and the southern tips of Thailand, Cambodia, Vietnam, and Myanmar—places that mirrored rubber’s Amazonian home.During the Korean War the United States imposed rubber sanctions on China. Furious, China developed varieties of H. brasiliensis that could grow in the relatively cool district of Xishuangbanna in Yunnan Province, on the border with Laos and Myanmar. Xishuangbanna represents just 0.2 percent of China’s land area, but it houses many of China’s species: 16 percent of its plants, 22 percent of its animals, and 36 percent of its birds. All are now threatened by rubber. Armed with the new, cold-tolerant trees, the Chinese military established state-run plantations there. Small farmers later filled in most of the land that was left. Today you can stand on a hilltop in Xishuangbanna and see nothing but rubber trees in every direction.It typically takes a month’s worth of latex from four trees to make just one tire. Xishuangbanna isn’t nearly big enough to satisfy Asia’s demand. Promoted with state programs, sought after by Chinese corporations, H. brasiliensis has spread through Laos, Myanmar, Thailand, and Vietnam like suburban sprawl, replacing swaths of native forest along the way. Global natural-rubber production has jumped from 4.4 million tons in 1983 to more than 13 million tons today.To grow that extra rubber, Southeast Asian farmers have cleared about 18,000 square miles, an area about the size of Massachusetts and Vermont put together. And that figure doesn’t include the forest logged for new processing facilities, the new homes built in the forest for new rubber workers, or the roads cut to reach the new plantations.All that production—combined with a decline in demand—has made rubber prices fall in the past few years, but nobody expects the growth to stop. The boom means that a random visitor like me can drive around northern Laos at night and see fires in the hills—set by families burning patches of forest to make room for new plantings. It means teenage Thai boys drive by on motorcycles groaning beneath a half dozen garbage bags full of homemade balls of coagulated latex. It means entire farming villages that get up at two in the morning to tap rubber trees, because latex flows best before dawn.The ecological threat posed by the rubber boom goes beyond the loss of biodiversity. The rubber trees on these new plantations are descendants of the seeds that Henry Wickham spirited out of Brazil. As Henry Ford learned the hard way, they are terribly susceptible to blight. By the 1980s scientists were cautioning that a single errant spore of South American leaf blight reaching Southeast Asia could bring the automobile age to a screeching halt. “The potential of an economic disaster increases with every transcontinental flight landing in Southeast Asia,” two researchers at Florida A&M University warned in 2012. A UN Food and Agriculture Organization report the previous year recommended that all air passengers bound for Southeast Asia who have been in South America’s blight zone within the previous three weeks should be inspected. No such program has been enacted. Although scientists in Brazil have found and begun testing resistant varieties of rubber trees, no Asian breeding program for blight resistance has been established. In four visits to Southeast Asia I didn’t encounter a single rubber farmer who was considering resistant varieties.Even ecologists have devoted little attention to the threat. Instead they focus on “more immediate issues,” says Xu Jianchu, of China’s Kunming Institute of Botany, about 200 miles northeast of Xishuangbanna. Rubber tappers, working at night, fear encountering snakes in the dark, so they drench the hills with herbicides to wipe out snake-hiding ground cover. Species that depend on the destroyed plants quickly succumb too—a further loss of biodiversity. Rain erodes the exposed earth, threatening the soil.Perhaps most serious, rubber trees consume a lot of water in the process of making latex. Producing tires is like taking groundwater from the hills and putting it on trucks for export. As a consequence, Xu says, highland wells and rivers are drying up. The industry response has been that “people can get water in plastic bottles,” he says, with a grimace. Soon rubber will cover most of Southeast Asia. The problems will spread from China to much of Southeast Asia. “Unless governments step in, it will not stop.”On a foggy and distinctly cool day I drove to the Nabanhe National Nature Reserve in Xishuangbanna. With me were the reserve’s research director, Liu Feng, and Gerhard Langenberger, an agroecologist at Germany’s University of Hohenheim. The landscape switched back and forth between plantation and wildland in a way that reminded me, to my surprise, of the patchwork of fields and forest around my New England home. We were going to the reserve because Liu and Langenberger think it hints at how rubber could coexist with a natural ecosystem.Unlike most nature reserves, Nabanhe is full of people. Its one hundred square miles include 33 small villages, with a total population of about 6,000. The land is divided into three zones. In the core, no human activity is allowed, as in a classic wilderness park. Surrounding that is a buffer zone, where people can live but are allowed only limited use of resources. And surrounding that is an experimental zone, where people can farm—that is, plant and tap rubber.The balance is difficult to maintain, Liu said. That afternoon we saw villagers ripping out illegal rubber plants. The malefactors had been turned in by their neighbors. Forestry police watched as the plants were dragged away. A few hours later we met some of the police for drinks and food in a kind of mountain saloon. One told me the villagers’ punishment hadn’t been severe—he just wanted them to be mindful of the rules.Langenberger believes that scientists should provide the facts and then let locals decide how to manage the landscape. “I don’t blame the farmers,” he said. “They’ve been poor here for so long. Now they have a crop that lets them participate in the world market.” Scientists can’t—and shouldn’t—“tell them to stop growing rubber,” he said. The logic of conservation is to forbid all human activity in the name of preserving vital rain forest. The logic of industry is to cover every scrap of land with rubber trees. Langenberger hopes it might be possible to create a state of productive tension. The Nabanhe Reserve, he hopes, could help show the way, a small effort to make things work in this tiny corner of the interconnected world.",
"German planes incessantly bombed airfields and factories on the English Coast during the Battle of Britain.On July 10, 1940, a German pilot spotted a convoy of British fighter planes and radioed base. Luftwaffe commander Colonel Johannes Fink replied with a single word: "Destroy!"Soon, 70 German planes were flying in. The Royal Air Force scrambled four squadrons of Spitfire and Hurricane fighter planes.The Battle of Britain had begun.The battle wasn’t a single fight. It was a four-month campaign against the United Kingdom waged by the German Air Force, or Luftwaffe. It was the first large campaign fought only by air forces. And it was Germany’s first major defeat in the Second World War.(Watch WWII-era planes fly over the Nation's Capitol to celebrate Victory in Europe Day's 70th anniversary.)A German plane drops more than a ton of bombs over Great Britain during an attack September 9, 1940.The casualties came to 500 British airmen, 2,600 German pilots, and 60,000 civilians. But the British victory prevented Operation Sea Lion, a planned German airborne and amphibious invasion of Great Britain.Author James Holland, who wrote The Battle of Britain: Five Months That Changed History, says some people disregard the battle’s significance because it was fought by relatively few people, and therefore suffered relatively few casualties. But in addition to strategic value, the battle also boosted a new technology that was key to the British Royal Air Force (RAF) victory … radar.Luftwaffe head Hermann Göring didn't think British radar stations were important targets, and according to The Battle of Britain, only one of the stations was completely destroyed during the battle.(Read about how Burmese Elephants helped defeat the Japanese in World War II)Some Germans even speculated the British were somehow telepathic—and in a way they were. In addition to their advanced radar network, the British had broken Germany’s secret radio code and could understand their messages.Only 3,000 pilots flew for Britain in the battle. Churchill later said, "Never in the field of human conflict was so much owed by so many to so few."The pilots also had support on the ground the Germans couldn't match. The battle was won in large part because Britain was producing at least twice as many planes as Germany could. In July, 1940, Britain produced 496 new fighters. Not only that, but many English pilots whose planes shot down would parachute to safety, only to be back in the air 24 hours later. German pilots drowned in the channel. The RAF became stronger, while the Luftwaffe became weaker.Two weeks before the fighting began a German attack seemed imminent. Prime Minister Winston Churchill addressed the House of Commons."Let us therefore brace ourselves to our duties, and so bear ourselves that, if the British Empire and its Commonwealth last for a thousand years, men will still say, 'This was their finest hour,'" he said.Historian Stephen Bungay, author of The Most Dangerous Enemy: The Definitive History of the Battle of Britain, says Winston Churchill may have been removed from power if Britain had not won the battle.(Read about the real reason Hitler launched the Battle of the Buldge)"There was quite a strong peace lobby," he says. "If the Luftwaffe had managed to establish sufficient command of the air over southeast England to threaten London ‘round the clock without opposition the invasion threat, real or not, would therefore be made credible. It was quite likely that Churchill would have lost his grip on power and be replaced by somebody else, who would have said, 'Let’s be sensible, let’s call it a day.'"Hitler even offered a peace settlement to Britain up to at least July 19, one month after Churchill's speech."[The Battle of Britain] is unquestionably one of the key turning points," Holland says. "It confines Germany to a long, attritional war on multiple fronts that they can’t ultimately win."In 1941, less than one year after abandoning the invasion of Britain, Hitler broke the pact of nonaggression signed with Joseph Stalin in 1939, opening the disastrous Eastern front.Follow Matt McCall on Twitter.",
"Unlike refusing a straw at a restaurant, it’s difficult to cut down on plastic while strapped unconscious to an operating table. Single-use plastic is facing more scrutiny than it ever has, and the medical industry could be the area where individual consumers have the least say.Practice Greenhealth, a non-profit that works to make hospitals more sustainable, estimates that 25 percent of the waste generated by a hospital is plastic. A study on a single hysterectomy found that the procedure can produce up to 20 pounds of waste, most of which is plastic.Single-use plastic can be an attractive option for hospitals—cheap, durable, and easily tossed out—and each new fresh plastic container or covering offers a newly sterile environment. That’s why clinicians cover themselves and everything they use in plastic.Yet for all the ways plastic has revolutionized the medical industry over the past century, it’s now being scrutinized for what happens after it’s done its job. Plastic can easily end up in marine environments, where it breaks down into tiny particles called microplastics that have yet-to-be-determined health consequences. And the fossil fuels required to produce those plastics can contaminate air and water.Increasingly, say medical care providers, the unfettered use of plastic is conflicting with a doctor’s promise to do no harm, but in facilities awash in blood and pathogens, is avoiding plastic even possible?“Plastics for biomedical applications have many desirable properties, including low cost, ease of processing, and [ability] to be sterilized easily,” says Bridgette Budhlall, an engineer at the University of Massachusetts Lowell.She notes that plastics can even be modified with coatings that make them particularly resistant to microbes.A fact sheet published by the American Chemistry Council, a plastic trade group, says: “Single-use plastics are the cleanest, most efficient way,” to facilitate health and hygiene in hospitals.But those working to make hospitals more sustainable say plastics have been overused.In a survey of 332 hospitals that has not yet been published, Practice Greenhealth looked at common single-use plastic items in operating rooms that had been successfully replaced by reusable items. Tools like surgical basins and sterilization wraps could be reused and would reduce waste by several tons per year. Depending on where they cut back, hospitals could also save thousands of dollars a year, Practice Greenhealth says.“It worked for a while when China took it,” says Janet Howard, the director of engagement at Practice Greenhealth, of medical plastic waste. But now, she says of hospital recycling efforts, “We’re going backwards.”In 2018, China announced it would no longer buy two-thirds of the world’s waste. That's leaving facilities little choice but to toss their commingled plastic waste into landfills or incinerators. PVC that ends up in incinerators can release toxic chemicals.“There are still certainly different types of plastics that could be recovered that aren’t being recovered today for a number of reasons,” says Kim Holmes, the vice president of sustainability at the Plastics Industry Association.“There are items used in patient care that don’t come in contact with patients so they’re not biohazards, and those could be recycled,” she adds, referencing things like packaging and storage containers.In hospitals that do attempt to sort their plastic for recycling, Holmes says producing enough material to be attractive to a recycler is a challenge for any one single hospital and more effective when trash is aggregated from a number of locations. The Healthcare Plastics Recycling Council offers a toolkit for hospitals looking for a recycling network to join.One of the most common plastic items thrown out of operating rooms is “blue wrap,” a sheet of polypropylene that covers sterilized tools that is removed and discarded before surgeries.Its single-use nature removes what Howard called the ick factor, but it also leaves a small mountain of trash behind.“It’s like after a holiday when you have that pile of wrapping paper on the floor,” she says. “That’s blue wrap in the operating room every day.”Some hospitals, she says, are experimenting with replacing the blue wrap with reusable sterilization containers that can be made clean just like the instruments they contain.Another profuse item in medical facilities is the sterilization pouch—a small, sealable pouch used to keep sterilized equipment free of germs.It was a desire to ensure their tools were free of pathogens that led two sibling dentists, David and James Stoddard, to create a pouch of tightly woven fabric to house their sterilized dentist tools. Their company, EnviroPouch, was created in 1993 and purchased by Barbara Knight in 2001.The Centers for Disease Control outlines strict standards for sanitizing medical instruments, and the pouches that contain them must be registered with the Federal Drug Administration, which EnviroPouch is.Knight says the product she sells is more effective than plastic pouches because it forms a thicker barrier around sharp tools. Each pouch eliminates roughly 200 single-use plastic pouches, she says.“The fabric weave makes it a very torturous path for a sharp [a medical term for any instrument with a sharp edge] to penetrate,” she says, as opposed to the film in a plastic pouch.Knight says the dentists who created the pouch were inspired by the story of Kimberly Ann Bergalis, a woman who died in 1991 after being one of six American patients infected with HIV at the dentist.One study has linked early exposure to PVC in intensive care units to neurocognitive disabilities later in life.The same concern over spreading HIV is what Gary Cohen, president of both Practice Greenhealth and non-profit Health Care Without Harm, credits with a large industry-wide push for single-use packaging.“It was one of the drivers that helped to fuel the use of single-use devices and excessive packaging in the healthcare sector because there was such deep concern of the spread,” says Cohen of paranoia during the AIDS crisis. “It was an overreaction.”In addition to its abundance, Cohen points out that certain types of plastics like polyvinyl chloride (PVC) can contain toxic chemicals themselves. One 2016 study found that young patients exposed to a common PVC additive called DEHP—a type of phthalate—during intensive care showed signs of neurocognitive decline later in life.On their website, the Plastics Industry Association maintains that PVC is an effective material because it’s germ resistant and easy to sanitize.The environmental non-profit Health Care Without Harm estimates that the world’s healthcare industry contributes just over four percent of the world’s emissions, much of that from round-the-clock heating and cooling. That’s the same level of emissions produced by more than five coal-fired power plants in a year.While many hospitals are implementing sustainability offices, they won’t ever truly be “zero-waste” says Howard, because “there will always be some sort of biohazard component” that needs to be mitigated.But she says to be better environmental stewards, hospitals and medical care facilities will need to reduce their plastic waste. Unlike carbon emissions, plastic trash is glaringly noticeable, and it’s something patients and doctors alike want to reduce.“We’re looking at this in a big picture. ‘What is wellness and how do we get there?’" she asks rhetorically. “We need to eat healthy foods and go back to nature, and it brings us back to hospitals as healers.”Not polluters, she adds.How your toothbrush became a part of the plastic crisisWhy carrying your own fork and spoon helps solve the plastic crisisThe sticky problem of plastic wrapThis common plastic packaging is a recycling nightmareCigarette butts are toxic plastic pollution. Should they be banned?How the plastic bottle went from miracle container to hated garbageHow tampons and pads became so unsustainableTires: The plastic polluter you never thought aboutYour shoes are made of plastic. Here’s why.",
"In 1957 it was a piece of trawling twine commonly used for fishing. In 1965 it was a plastic bag.For more than 60 years, scientists in the U.K. have been collecting data on marine plastic, assembling one of the most comprehensive datasets on how much plastic has filtered into the North Atlantic ocean since it became a ubiquitous household item.Publishing their findings in the journal Nature Communications Tuesday, the research team is the first to quantifiably confirm the drastic increase in ocean plastic since the 1990s.Calculating the amount of plastic in the ocean is difficult. Many researchers and publications refer to a 2015 study in the journal Science that estimated anywhere from 4.8 to 12.7 trillion pieces of plastic enter the ocean each year. The wide range is a result of mixed methods for calculating waste, looking at signs like waste habits, consumption, and recycling capacities.Researchers also know plastic is found throughout the ocean thanks to visual evidence like a plastic bag seen in the Mariana Trench and a plastic cigarette wrapper spotted dangling from a jellyfish.To look for increases in North Atlantic Ocean plastic, scientists turned to an old, reliable contraption called the Continuous Plankton Recorder (CPR). The torpedo-shaped contraption has been sampling the North Atlantic for plankton since the 1930s.It's attached to the back of a boat via a metal wire and hauled along the water's surface.“They're very robust,” says study author Clare Ostle, a marine biochemist at the Marine Biological Association. “They were designed in the 1920s, and the design stayed the same. That's why we have this dataset.”In the CPR's history, the small metal devices have travelled more than 7.4 million miles throughout the North Atlantic, often being dragged behind fast moving container ships and ferries.“In this sense, the CPR is susceptible to entanglement in a similar way to marine mammals that spend time in surface waters,” the study notes.Of the 16,725 trips made by CPRs, 669 were caught by plastic. Though the CPR was never intentionally used to count plastic debris, these logs of faulty trips provided a decades-old dataset.By looking back through the CPR's logs, Ostle was able to see that, since the 1960s, plastic in the ocean has increased threefold—with the most dramatic increase happening from the 1990s to the 2000s.After 2000, the most common type of plastic the researchers encountered was fishing gear. Because the North Atlantic Ocean is such a hotbed for fishing, Ostle wants to examine the connection between types of fishing gear and practices and the amount of plastic found in the sea.Knowing where plastic tends to concentrate will be important for conservation, says Ostle.“It's important for waste management and how we think about tidying up,” she says.",
"A label from the Philip Morris cigarette company is still visible on the debris.If you look closely, you can just make out the words “Philip Morris International.” The tobacco company's name can be seen on the translucent strip of a cigarette box wrapper that was photographed inside a mauve stinger jellyfish found swimming through the Mediterranean Sea.Animals trying to avoid ocean plastic have to navigate a minefield. Eighteen billion pounds of it flows into the ocean every year, making it difficult for animals, like jellyfish, to avoid.Last April, a study published in the journal Scientific Reports published the first documentation of plastic in a jellyfish.The jelly was found in the Mediterranean Ocean in 2016 by a group of scientists participating in the Aquatilis Expedition, a three-year research trip to explore the world's oceans. In their study, the researchers say multiple mauve stingers had various types of plastic trash trapped under their hoods or woven through their bodies.When twenty were netted and inspected more closely, four stingers were found with plastic in their digestive system, leading the scientists to believe the jellyfish had mistaken the plastic for food.“They are really in love with plastic, it seems,” says one of the study's authors, Armando Macali, an ecologist from Tuscia University in Italy. He says he and his fellow study authors are strongly convinced the jelly was holding on to the plastic because it was trying to eat it.Past studies have shown that marine animals accidentally consuming plastic debris is a widespread problem. Scientists think animals consume it because it resembles their prey: turtles eat jellyfish-like plastic bags, and fish eat small rice-sized plastic that resembles their normal food.Ocean plastic also smells appetizing to some marine critters. In 2016, a study in the journal Science Advances found that algae easily grows on ocean plastic, and as it breaks down, it emits an odor called dimethyl sulfide that attracts hungry animals.It's not clear why the jellyfish was attracted to the plastic, says Macali. After plastic trash enters the ocean, it begins to weather, and thin layers of biofilm coat it. Macali suspects either the biofilm or some molecule in the breaking down plastic attracted the jellies.In future experiments, he plans to expose jellyfish to various types of plastic debris in lab conditions. If scientists are able to identify specifically what's attracting the animals, he says, they could potentially work with manufacturers to make plastic that's less attractive to marine organisms.That the mauve stinger was trying to eat the plastic wrapper is a bad sign for the animal's health, the scientists note. Mauve stingers can consumer 50 percent of their body weight, and ingesting too much plastic has been shown to cause animals to slowly starve.As a prey species for other, larger animals in the Mediterranean, plastic-laden jellyfish could have similarly dangerous health impacts on the animals that consume them. Bluefin tuna, one of the mauve stinger's most abundant predators, is commonly caught and eaten by people and marine mammals, meaning the small microscopic pieces of plastic jellyfish consume may end up in the bellies of larger species, including us.It's a complicated problem, of which researchers are still trying to grasp the scale, says Macali. Understanding how jellyfish interact with ocean plastic will be one piece of a larger puzzle, he adds.“If we want to understand the fate of plastic in the ocean, we have to start at the bottom of the food chain.”",
"Plastic is used all throughout food production. Here, bananas growing on a plantation in Cameroon are covered in plastic bags to prevent disfiguring marks.The tiny pieces of plastic scientists call microplastics are everywhere. They sit at the bottom of the sea, mix into beach sand, and blow in the wind. They’re also inside us.Last October, microplastics were found in fecal samples from eight people participating in a pilot study to research how much humans might be inadvertently consuming plastic.Now, a new study in the journal Environmental Science and Technology says it's possible that humans may be consuming anywhere from 39,000 to 52,000 microplastic particles a year. With added estimates of how much microplastic might be inhaled, that number is more than 74,000.A microplastic particle is any piece of plastic smaller than five millimeters, but many are much smaller and only visible under a microscope.The study reviewed existing research on microplastics found in beer, salt, seafood, sugar, alcohol, and honey. To calculate how often one person might eat each of those items in a year, the study looked at recommendations made by the U.S. Department of Agriculture.Currently, the existing research on microplastics in food represents only 15 percent of the calories consumed by the average person.The research team also looked at studies that reviewed the amount of microplastics in drinking water and air. People who meet their recommended water intake through tap water ingest an additional 4,000 plastic particles annually, while those who drink only bottled water ingest an additional 90,000, the study found.Study author Kieran Cox expects that his conclusions are underestimates, and that it's likely people are consuming far more.“A lot of the items we considered are the ones you're eating raw. We haven't gotten to the layers and layers of plastic packaging,” Cox says. “I think it's probably the case that more plastic is being added than we realize.”One study published in 2018 in the journal Environmental Pollution concluded that people were more likely to ingest plastic through dust in their environment than by eating shellfish.So what happens to plastic once it's in your body? Does it enter your bloodstream? Does it sink into your gut? Or does it simply pass through without doing harm?Scientists still aren't quite sure about the amount of microplastics a body can tolerate or how much damage they do. In 2017, a study out of King's College in London hypothesized that, over time, the cumulative effect of ingesting plastic could be toxic. Different types of plastic have varying toxic properties. Some are made with toxic chemicals like chlorine, while others pick up trace amounts of chemicals like lead found in the environment. A build up of these toxins over time could impact the immune system.When researchers from Johns Hopkins looked at the impact of eating seafood contaminated with microplastics, they too found the accumulated plastic could damage the immune system and upset a gut's balance.Cox says scientists are scrambling to understand the dose at which microplastics start to have noticeable health effects. Like air pollution or harmful construction materials, those who have more exposure or preexisting conditions may be less able to tolerate plastic.Leah Bendell, an ecotoxicologist at Simon Fraser University in Canada, says Cox's study takes a simplistic look at a complex issue with many variables, “but the conclusion that we are ingesting lots of microplastics I think is valid.”She says it's important to remember that microplastics come in the form of fragments, pellets, beads, fibers, and film. It can be made up of from a number of different materials with hundreds of different chemical additives. For this reason, she describes microplastics as having “multiple personalities.” Some might harbor toxic chemicals, while others could be suitable vectors for bacteria and parasites.A whale shark swims beside a plastic bag in the Gulf of Aden near Yemen. Although whale sharks are the biggest fish in the sea, they're still threatened by ingesting small bits of plastic.Humans consume microplastics via many channels. We might ingest them while eating seafood, breath them in through the air, or consume food with trace amounts of its plastic packaging.For this reason, it's difficult to completely avoid them, says Cox, “if not impossible.”Certain lifestyle changes like drinking trap water instead of bottled water would reduce the amount of microplastics a person consumes, he says.Among the research they reviewed, microfibers were by far the most commonly found type of plastic. Microfibers shed from textiles like nylon and polyester. They often wash off clothes and enter the ecosystem through washing machine wastewater.Fragments of plastic like those commonly used for bags and straws were the second most common plastic found.Cox says he hopes his research highlights that plastic pollution extends beyond marine wildlife.“We haven’t considered ourselves to be a potential impact [of plastic pollution],” he says, “but we are.”",
"Puerto Rican mountain mullet reside in El Yunque National Forest. Known to the locals as dajao, these athletic fish can journey to high elevations and even jump over small waterfalls.Although freshwater environments, from creeks to rivers, brim with more than 10,000 species of fish, we may never get the chance to see many of these mysterious creatures as their populations decline. Currently, more than 20 percent of known species are imperiled or already extinct. That’s why David Herasimtschuk doesn’t just photograph fish for fun; he’s a professional photographer dedicated to raising awareness and appreciation of freshwater environments and the wildlife that live in them.Tennessee dace turn vibrant colors when they breed. They are listed as vulnerable to extinction, and some localized populations have disappeared entirely.“There's all this life that's disappearing, and nobody even knows it’s there,” Herasimtschuk says.Herasimtschuk is the photographer and cinematographer for Freshwaters Illustrated, an Oregon-based nonprofit that seeks to educate the public about freshwater ecosystems and inspire people to protect them. For almost a decade, he’s worked with Freshwaters Illustrated to document creek and river life across North America, from the mountains of Colorado to El Yunque National Forest in Puerto Rico. These environments not only are habitats for a range of aquatic plants and animals, but they support a whole web of terrestrial wildlife too, from the birds that nest in riparian areas or stop over on migrations to animals like beavers that use rivers for travel to predators who eat river-dwelling creatures.Rivers are also primary sources of drinking water for humans. They control flooding; they provide irrigation for crops; they’re harnessed for hydropower. Despite the critical role they play for both humans and in nature, they’re often overlooked.“People know more about a clown fish in the coral reef than a minnow that lives 10 minutes from their house,” Herasimtschuk says. “You're essentially exposing people to a whole new world, but it's a world that a lot of times is right in their own backyard.”Several places that Herasimtschuk has photographed, such as southern Appalachia, harbor some of the most diverse freshwater ecosystems in the world. The region sustains roughly 300 to 400 native species of fish.Southern Appalachia is also home to Herasimtschuk’s favorite amphibian: the hellbender, a giant aquatic salamander native to North America. Herasimtschuk says that if you patiently linger around these two-foot long salamanders, they’ll eventually interact with you and “accept you into their world.” That’s how he captured what may be the only photograph of a hellbender attempting to eat a snake, which earned Herasimtschuk a Wildlife Photographer of the Year award from the Natural History Museum in London. The scene was unexpected, as hellbenders tend to hunt for smaller prey. When the snake tightened around the salamander’s head, the hellbender tried to reposition its bite, giving the northern water snake the chance to escape. (Read more: Inside the fight to save the hellbender.)This giant salamander, known as a hellbender, hopes to make a northern water snake its next meal. Herasimtschuk says this photograph may be the first of a hellbender attempting to eat a snake.Every winter, rough-skinned newts visit the same pond in Oregon’s Willamette River to mate. Eight years and thousands of photographs later, Herasimtschuk finally captured “the perfect newt image.”Longnose gar are ancient fish that haven’t changed much since prehistoric times. A female gar ready to spawn is followed by a group of male gar hoping to fertilize her pea-sized eggs—all 30,000 of them.Through his lens, Herasimtschuk has witnessed many rarely seen behaviors, like shiner minnows and Tennessee dace transform into a spectacle of color when they spawn. He’s seen a river chub spend days searching for suitable rocks to build a nursery. He’s swum among longnose gar, ancestral fish that he says resemble “underwater dinosaurs,” and watched a female gar lay 30,000 pea-sized eggs—some of which stuck to his camera. And it took him eight years and thousands of attempts to properly document rough-skinned newts congregating to mate in Oregon’s Willamette River.Following spring rainstorms, thousands of buffalo fish migrate from the main stem of the Tennessee River to smaller creeks. Within a few days of arriving, the buffalo fish inundate the creeks with their eggs. Many fish species, including buffalo, need dam-free water in order to navigate their migration routes.Weather conditions can significantly impact how long it takes to capture the perfect moment. Many freshwater species spawn in elevated areas during spring and winter, so Herasimtschuk can easily spend eight to 10 hours in frigid water while he snaps hundreds of pictures.He says he can handle the cold in his dry suit, but if it rains, the photo shoot comes to an end. In the world of freshwater photography, precipitation is both a friend and foe. For example, rain attracts salmon, as it helps them move upstream. But it also turns the water into a murky abyss. It’s not the rain itself that creates the haze but rather the pollution that drains into the water during a storm.Every spring, thousands of lake sturgeon migrate from Wisconsin’s Lake Winnebago to their spawning waters in Wolf River. Oftentimes, a male sturgeon will strike a female sturgeon with his powerful tail to force her into releasing eggs. These massive fish can grow more than six feet long and live for 150 years.Although an open-jawed lamprey may look terrifying, it’s not interested in attacking humans. They can climb up 40-foot waterfalls by thrusting themselves upward using their muscular, snake-like bodies and grabbing onto higher ledges with their suction mouths. This one is actually suctioning onto Herasimtschuk’s camera.“When you see this water that looks like chocolate milk coming into a creek, you really get a sense of how that could smother creatures,” Herasimtschuk says. The EPA actually calls sediment the most common pollutant in rivers and lakes—about a third is from natural erosion, but the majority is from erosion that’s been accelerated by human activity, such as construction.Despite the demanding nature of his work, Herasimtschuk persists, because one day, documenting these animals may no longer be possible. Dams make it difficult for certain species to travel along critical migration routes, and issues like sedimentation and pollution destroy their habitats. Herasimtschuk has even seen discarded car batteries decomposing in a river and federally protected areas littered with trash.Male arctic grayling raise their butterfly-like dorsal fins to signal that they’re willing to compete for the right to spawn. The biggest male grayling will eventually defeat his smaller opponents and fertilize the eggs of female grayling that enter his domain.This isn’t just a problem for aquatic life; it’s a red flag for humans, too. Animals such as hellbenders are barometers of river health. Their presence in a river is a good sign that the water is clean and drinkable. But hellbenders are beginning to disappear, as are several other animals in Herasimtschuk’s photographs. Nevertheless, he hopes that his images will educate people and compel them to care.“Many of these species have been around for millions of years, and it's only in the last hundred that they've started to vanish,” Herasimtschuk says.",
"Dutch photographer Marsel van Oosten won the grand title with his photo of critically endangered golden snub-nosed monkeys in China.With his photo titled “The Golden Couple,” Dutch photographer Marsel van Oosten has won Wildlife Photographer of the Year, awarded by London’s Natural History Museum. The striking photo of a pair of endangered golden snub-nosed monkeys in central China’s Qin Ling Mountains is both a traditional portrait, in one sense, and magical in another, said Roz Kidman Coz, the chair of the judging panel, in a press release. “It is a symbolic reminder of the beauty of nature and how impoverished we are becoming as nature is diminished,” she says. “It is an artwork worthy of hanging in any gallery in the world.”Golden snub-nosed monkeys only live in this part of China, and their numbers are decreasing primarily because of habitat loss from commercial logging and firewood collection.Three National Geographic photographers also won awards in the competition. Thomas Peschak’s photo of a sharp-beaked finch pecking at the bloodied feathers of a much-larger Nazca booby won in the birds category. Jen Guyton, a National Geographic explorer, won the plants and fungi category with a photo of a desert plant called a welwitschia that is native to Namibia and Angola.Frans Lanting, a longtime contributor to National Geographic magazine, was awarded the organization’s first-ever lifetime achievement award.",
"It is a horror movie director’s dream of a natural history collection. You find it by driving 10 miles southeast of New Orleans, to a piece of land that is part swamp, part forest, on a bend in the Mississippi River, down a dirt track named Wild Boar Road. Alligators and water moccasins live in the tangled woods to the left. On the right stands ammunition bunker number A3, its flanks heavily bermed against the danger of explosion, its loading dock cracked and skewed forward by the more reliable detriments of time.There are 26 such bunkers, widely distributed around the roughly 400-acre property, most of them abandoned. During World War II, U.S. Navy ships stopped here to pick up artillery shells before heading out to sea. Later the Central Intelligence Agency trained Cuban guerrillas on the property for the disastrous Bay of Pigs invasion in 1961.Tulane University owns the place now, and the visitors tend to be biologists, drawn here by the nearly eight million dead fish housed in bunkers A3 and A15. (Another bunker nearby holds the University of Louisiana Monroe’s fish collection.)Inside, the fish soak in alcohol, in tightly sealed jars of assorted sizes, lined up on shelves that rise 10 feet high and run 36 feet long, in row after row after row. Some of the specimens are outlandish. A couple dozen paddlefish huddle together in a five-gallon jug with their translucent paddles raised heavenward, looking like congregants at an extraterrestrial prayer meeting. But nine of the 22 rows in the main collection are Cyprinidae, which mostly means minnows. Ordinary is really the guiding aesthetic of the place.It is the world’s largest fish collection, a title that comes with asterisks.“It’s actually the largest post-larval collection,” says Justin Mann, the 38-year-old collection manager, who spends much of his time fighting back the mildew that paints and repaints itself across the interior walls. It’s the largest by number of specimens, he adds, not species. In fact, more than a million specimens belong to a single species, Cyprinella venusta. (Yes, it’s a type of minnow.) The collection includes outliers from as far away as Indonesia. But most of the fish here originally were at home in the Southeast United States, from the Gulf Coast of Texas to the Carolinas.The Tulane collection consisted of just two mounted fish when an ambitious young fish biologist named Royal D. Suttkus arrived in 1950. Suttkus set out to change that, on the principle that you cannot understand the aquatic world unless you can see it and study it, and you are unlikely to protect what you cannot understand. Suttkus was a relentless field biologist, wading hip- and neck-deep in the waters of the region over the next 50 years, pulling one end of a 10-foot-long seine net while a graduate student at the other end tried to keep up.A tiny pocket shark, Mollisquama mississippiensis n. sp, from the Gulf of Mexico is the latest star of the collection, described as a new species in 2015.Other fish biologists often roam from place to place, collecting a little here, a little there, always looking for something new and interesting. Instead, Suttkus, who died in 2009, typically collected from the same sites on the same rivers year after year for decades, often conducting mandatory environmental impact surveys for paper mills and other polluters. The customary practice for fish biologists is to lay out the catch at the end of a run, choose a few fish worth preserving, and set the rest free. The rule for Suttkus, on the contrary, was that everything in his net ended up in a jar.Other biologists frowned. Overcollecting at the same spot once a year wasn’t likely to damage the population; it just looked bad. One of them wrote a song dubbing Suttkus “the collecting machine.” It included this horror movie–worthy verse:So you best fetch up your old hound-dog and all your goldfish tooHide your pet iguana and your talkin’ cockatooAnd keep a close eye on your children, don’t let them roam too farCause the Collecting Machine is on the loose, and he’ll stuff ’em in a jar.And yet, here’s the thing: Those systematic, take-all methods have turned out to be the enduring strength of the Royal D. Suttkus Fish Collection.They make it “a window into the past,” without the distortions that tend to creep onto the shelves of more selective museums, says Bernie Kuhajda, an aquatic conservation biologist at the Tennessee Aquarium in Chattanooga. Most fish researchers, “if they’re going to take only 10 fish, are going to take the larger ones,” he says, “so they can count scales” and the spiny rays in the fins, the traits that enable them to identify species correctly. “With Suttkus taking everything, you know what the actual age structure was at that time and place”—for example, whether it included all the age groups for a healthy population—“which is useful.”Useful how? That’s a question college administrators now often ask, with an eye to more glamorous ways of allocating budgets. The University of Louisiana Monroe recently tried to evict its fish collection on two days’ notice because administrators were keen to build a better sports facility. A consortium of institutions, including Tulane, came to the rescue, adding another 11 rows of specimens to one of the Suttkus bunkers (pending final distribution).The collection is useful because it’s a window into a particularly interesting past. Suttkus collected when rivers were still being dammed for hydropower and navigation. Pollution was largely unregulated. After a chemical factory opened in northern Alabama, says John Caruso, a Suttkus graduate student in the 1970s, “I remember pulling sunfish out of the river, and blood just came pouring out of their gills.”Now biologists studying how rampant 20th-century development changed the Southeast turn to the Suttkus collection to find out. They turn to it virtually, as well as in person, because the National Science Foundation helped make the collection one of the first natural history museums to put the data and location for every specimen online.One such study led by researchers from the U.S. Geological Survey looked at the Alabama River, where regular visits by Suttkus recorded a time-lapse of loss, with the number of species dwindling by almost two-thirds from the 1960s to the end of the century. During that period, dams completed the transformation of the old free-flowing river into a system of 16 reservoirs. Agricultural runoff, urbanization, and wastewater from sewage plants and surface mines also did their damage.Among the victims were the Alabama sturgeon, now blocked by dams from its ancient migratory routes, and the Gulf sturgeon, now largely vanished from the river.The Alabama shad, frecklebelly madtom, and crystal darter are also mostly gone, and minnows like the Mobile chub and the fluvial shiner no longer appear at sites where Suttkus commonly caught them. By 2005, 10 of the river’s fish species were listed by the federal government as threatened or endangered, with experts deeming at least 28 more species vulnerable, or worse. Without corrective action, the study warned, “fish species extinctions appear inevitable.”The real horror story, it turns out, isn’t the Suttkus collection, but what it reveals about human destruction of the world around us.",
"More than a quarter of all species assessed by the International Union for Conservation of Nature are considered threatened. Many species have moved through several of the IUCN Red List categories—from least concern to vulnerable, endangered, critically endangered, and ultimately extinct. But every once in a while, a species takes a step away from the brink—in other words, it’s downlisted. That doesn’t always happen without help. Conservation measures over the years helped improve the status of 13 animal species worldwide in 2018. Such downlistings are worth celebrating, but some scientists worry that they’ll slow the momentum required to keep an animal safe. In assessments so far in 2019 where the status changed, in every case the species declined.",
"One of the world’s most endangered marine animals is a pint-size porpoise known as the vaquita. It exists only in the Gulf of California off Mexico. No one knows exactly how many are now alive; by 2018 fewer than 19 were left, researchers estimate. Unless the species’ decline can be slowed, vaquitas likely will become extinct before 2021, which raises the question: How did we let this happen?A stocky creature about four and a half feet long, the vaquita is the smallest of the cetaceans, a family that includes whales, dolphins, and porpoises. Dark pigment edging vaquitas’ eyes gives them a bovine look; in Spanish, the animal’s name means “little cow.”Shortly after scientists discovered the species in 1950, they realized it was in trouble. Vaquitas were regularly drowning in gill nets meant for shrimp and totoabas, a fish whose swim bladder is a delicacy in China. In 1975, after the totoaba was declared endangered, Mexico outlawed fishing for it. But the work is easier, more lucrative, and less risky than drug trafficking, so totoaba fishing continues—as do the deaths of vaquitas as bycatch.In 2005 Mexico’s government made part of the gulf a vaquita refuge. But the population kept falling—from more than 200 individuals in 2008 to fewer than 30 in 2016. Unable to protect vaquitas in the wild, the government made an unprecedented attempt to protect them in captivity. In 2017 an international team of scientists, veterinarians, and conservationists gathered in Mexico to stage VaquitaCPR, a multimillion-dollar project to transfer half of the remaining vaquitas into protected sea pens until their safety in the wild could be assured. The team captured two females—but when both began showing signs of stress, they were released. One of them didn’t survive, and VaquitaCPR was discontinued.Wildlife biologist Matthew Podolsky contends that “even if that vaquita hadn’t died and the capture effort had been successful, the root of the problem would still remain”: Impoverished poachers, greedy cartels, and corrupt officials would still care more about catching totoabas than protecting vaquitas. Podolsky co-directed Sea of Shadows, a National Geographic documentary about activists’ and undercover investigators’ work to help save the species.In this fight against extinction, Podolsky sees a cautionary tale about the importance of protecting rare animals “at the first sign of trouble”—not when only a few of them remain.",
"Toughie, the last known Rabbs' fringe-limbed tree frog, has passed away.And then there were none.Toughie, the world's last Rabbs' fringe-limbed tree frog and a symbol of the extinction crisis, has died at his home in the Atlanta Botanical Garden.The famed frog's age is unknown, but he's at least 12 years old, and likely older, because he was an adult when collected in 2005.Mark Mandica, who worked with Toughie for seven years, says the frog's story isn't entirely unique. “A lot of attention had been paid to him in captivity, so he even has his own Wikipedia page,” Mandica, head of the Amphibian Foundation, notes. “But there are plenty of other species out there that are disappearing, sometimes before we even knew that they were there.”In fact, Toughie's own species (Ecnomiohyla rabborum) wasn't described until 2008, a few years after Toughie was found during a 2005 frog rescue mission by the Atlanta Botanical Garden and Zoo Atlanta. He was one of many frogs scientists raced to collect as the deadly chytrid fungus closed in on central Panama.“It was likened to just rescuing things from a burning house,” Mandica says.The species occurred in a very small range, at an elevation where the fungus proved especially deadly. Field studies suggest up to 85 percent of all the amphibians on Toughie's home turf were wiped out. It's unlikely that any of his kind survived in the wild, where they were incredible climbers and also graceful gliders—toe webbing allowed them to soar from one tree to the next. (Learn about the increasing pace of extinctions.)Mandica's son, then a two-year-old, dubbed the last survivor Toughie. Naming animals isn't the norm among scientists, but the frog's popularity as the last of his kind meant that people (and the press) kept demanding a name—and Toughie stuck.Although he gave voice to the plight of endangered species, Toughie was silent for all the years he lived at the botanical garden, until one fateful morning in 2014 when Mandica captured the only existing example of the Rabbs' fringe-limbed tree frog's call.“I heard this weird call coming out of the frog [area], and I knew it had to be him, because I knew what all the other species sounded like. I was able to sneak in and record him on my phone.” (Hear Toughie's call.)Toughie was photographed in his captive home at the Atlanta Botanical Garden.Photographer Joel Sartore recalls a curious, baseball-size creature with amazing eyes that actually hopped up onto his camera while being photographed for the Photo Ark project. Photo Ark aims to showcase our planet's incredible biodiversity and inspire people to help fight the extinction crisis while there is still time. So far, Sartore has photographed more than 6,000 species. Unfortunately, many others also represent the end of the line for their kind.“About once a year I photograph something that's the last of its kind or close to it,” he says. “I get sad and angry because I can't imagine that this won't wake the world up and get people to care about extinction. I keep thinking, OK, this is the one. This animal's story is going to do it and get people to care more about extinction than about what's on TV.“They can't care if they don't know these animals,” he adds. “They have to meet them and fall in love with them the way that I have and so many others have.”Toughie, indeed, had lots of admirers. Last year his image was even projected onto St. Peter's Basilica, and his call played, so that the world could see and hear him.The frog met race car drivers and movie directors, Sartore recalls. “A lot of people were moved to tears when they saw him. When you have the very last of something it's a special deal.”Now he's gone, and with him an entire species. And as large numbers of animals and plants continue to vanish, their loss increasingly compromises the healthy ecosystems necessary for everyone's survival—including our own. (Can extinct species ever be brought back?)“We're on track to lose half of all species by the end of the century,” Sartore says. “And it's folly to think that we can lose half of everything else but that people will be just fine. It's not going to work that way. As these species go, so do we.”",
"A black-footed ferret photograhed at the Toronto Zoo.Conservationists have been trying to save North America’s only native ferret for more than four decades. Twice it has been declared extinct. Now, scientists have come up with a pioneering plan to protect the black-footed ferret by protecting its prey against disease.It is the only effort of its kind to save an endangered species. Black-footed ferrets now number several hundred remaining in the wild, with another 300 ferrets in captivity. To succeed, scientists have two odd tools at their disposal: peanut butter vaccines and drones. (See "Once Thought Extinct, North America's Rarest Mammal May Bounce Back.")The masked prairie dwellers, which weigh just under three pounds (1.4 kilograms), survive almost entirely on a diet of prairie dogs—usually three a week. They also live in prairie dog burrows. Prairie dogs—and ferrets—are susceptible to the sylvatic plague, a flea-borne illness so devastating it can quickly wipe out whole prairie dog colonies.When colonies die off, ferrets lose not only their food, but also their home. In other words, saving the prairie dogs from the plague saves ferrets.“Plague is the largest obstacle to ferret recovery today,” says Ryan Moehring, a U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service spokesperson.Ferrets can be vaccinated individually against the plague by injection, but injecting large populations of prairie dogs is impossible. So a team of scientists at the University of Wisconsin spent 15 years developing an oral vaccine for prairie dogs, says Tonie Rocke, a research epizootiologist at the U.S. Geological Survey's National Wildlife Health Center in Madison, Wisconsin, who led the effort.In tests, the vaccine was inserted into pellet-size treats baited with blueberries, sweet potatoes, and peanut butter. “Peanut butter was the overwhelming favorite,” Rocke says.This week, the fish and wildlife agency plans to test a prototype of a treat dispenser on an all-terrain vehicle and spread the vaccine treats in prairie dog colonies in the UL Bend National Wildlife Refuge in northeastern Montana, where plague has wiped out some 2,000 of 3,000 acres (810 of 1,200 hectares) of prairie dog populations.The black-footed ferret descends from the European polecat and migrated across the Bering land bridge and settled in the vast North American prairie, where they found an endless supply of prairie dogs. (Read "The Emptied Prairie" in National Geographic magazine.)When European settlers homesteaded the Great Plains, they eradicated the prairie dog. The settlers also brought the plague with them. By the 1950s, the ferret had disappeared from the prairie and was believed to be extinct. In 1964, a ferret population was found in South Dakota, but by 1979, all had died. The ferret was again declared extinct.Then, in 1981, after a ferret was found in Wyoming, scientists launched a captive-breeding program, which has led in the years since to the release new ferret populations across the Great Plains states and Arizona, New Mexico, and Utah.Those new populations are at risk as long as the prairie dog is vulnerable to plague. (Also see "Prairie Dogs Are Serial Killers That Murder Their Competition.")For years, scientists tried to protect prairie dogs by spraying their burrows with flea powder. But the chore was labor-intensive—every burrow had to be sprayed, and over time, the fleas developed a resistance to the powder.After developing the oral vaccine, more obstacles remained: getting the prairie dogs to eat the vaccine and distributing it over large areas.In experiments, researchers put peanut butter vaccines out in the morning, when prairie dogs are most active. The treats were found within 20 minutes and all disappeared the first day. The treats also contain blue dye that stains the prairie dogs’ whiskers and feces, confirming that they’ve eaten the vaccine.The distribution plan is still a work in progress. The government agency is working to develop equipment that would attach to a drone, or unmanned aerial vehicle, and dispense the treats at a rate of 50 per acre.Prairie dogs are considered a “keystone” species, meaning they play a disproportionate role in survival of their habitat. Aside from ferrets, hawks, burrowing owls, and other carnivores are dependent on prairie dogs for survival.“If prairie dogs die out, all those other species go away as well,” Rocke says. “We are targeting prairie dogs and ferrets. But [it's] an attempt to preserve the grassland ecosystem.”Follow Laura Parker on Twitter.",
"Only 97 vaquita porpoises remain in the wild. Their steep decline is blamed largely on illegal gill-net fishing in the Gulf of California.The vaquita, a small porpoise found only in the Gulf of California, is rapidly going extinct, an international team of scientists reported earlier this month.The researchers say that the marine mammals—whose name means "little cow" in Spanish—are accidentally drowning in the gill nets local fishers deploy for fish and shrimp. A mere 97 vaquitas remain.Vaquitas are shy creatures, and rarely seen, except when they're pulled to the surface—dead—in nets. They've been known to science only since 1958, when three skulls were found on a beach. At the time, it was thought that they numbered in the low thousands. Scientists and fishers alike say the animals, with their pretty facial markings ("they look like they're wearing lipstick and mascara," one scientist said) and sleek bodies, are endearing.There's danger now that the porpoises will become the second cetacean (the first was the baiji, or Chinese river dolphin) to succumb to human pressures, most likely disappearing forever by 2018."It's a complete disappointment for everybody, because we've all been working hard to turn this around, and the [Mexican] government has addressed this from the highest level possible," said Lorenzo Rojas-Bracho, a cetacean conservation specialist at Mexico's Commission of Natural Protected Areas and a member of the team.Indeed, the Mexican government established a presidential commission on vaquita conservation in 2012, when scientists estimated the porpoise's population at 200.Failing MeasuresTo stem the vaquitas' decline, in 2005 Mexico created a refuge for them, banned all commercial fishing in the refuge's waters, beefed up enforcement, and invested more than $30 million (U.S.) to compensate fishers and encourage them to switch to other fishing methods.It also established the international scientific team to monitor the porpoise's population, reproductive rates, and habitat. Its members hail from such august conservation bodies as the International Union for Conservation of Nature, the International Whaling Commission, the U.S. Marine Mammal Commission, and Norway's Institute of Marine Research.All were optimistic then. "We thought we were going to see the vaquitas' numbers increasing by 4 percent a year," said Barbara Taylor, a marine biologist with the Southwest Fisheries Science Center in San Diego, California, and a member of the team. "Instead, they've had a catastrophic decline of 18.5 percent per year."Chinese Demand—But Not for VaquitasThat decline, Rojas-Bracho said, is "all due to illegal fishing that is out of control."In the past three years, illegal gillnetting for the totoaba, a critically endangered fish that can grow to more than six feet long (1.8 meters) and 300 pounds (136 kilograms), has surged. Unfortunately, the porpoise and the similarly sized totoaba live in the same parts of the gulf.The totoaba's swim bladder, highly prized as a traditional health food and medicine in China, can fetch thousands of dollars. Few fishers can resist the temptation."It's like trying to control traffic while someone's throwing money from the Empire State Building," said Rojas-Bracho, who learned of the extent of this illegal take from several fishers who are also on the presidential commission.The team estimates that about 435 miles (700 kilometers) of legal nets are in the water every day during the fishing season, from mid-September to mid-June. "And that's not counting the illegal nets for the totoaba," Taylor says.Last-Ditch SolutionBecause of the vaquita's timid nature (a sighting at 300 feet [90 meters] is considered close), scientists can't make visual counts of the animals. They rely instead on an array of special acoustic devices, deployed every year before the fishing season begins (they too are easily tangled in the nets), to record the sounds of the animals as they forage in the murky waters they favor. From these sounds, the researchers are able to estimate the vaquitas' numbers.Because the animal's population is so low, the team says there is only one solution: Ban all gillnetting in the gulf's upper regions, including the waters surrounding the vaquitas' refuge. The ban must be strictly applied, even to the legal shrimp and fin fish fishery, and enforced with more police patrols on sea and land."It's a hard choice," Taylor acknowledges. Such a ban will hurt all the fishers, including those who aren't engaged in the illegal fishery. But, she said, if Mexico doesn't do that, it "will lose the vaquita."Rojas-Bracho said that Mexico, China, and the United States governments also need to work together to control—if not end—the trade in totoaba swim bladders. The dried bladders are often smuggled across the U.S. border before ending up in the Chinese marketplace.There is a modicum of hope. Even at only 97 animals (25 of them believed to be females of reproductive age), the species can still be saved, Taylor believes. "Most marine mammals, including other cetaceans, that have been taken down through hunting have come back, so it's not too late. But if nothing is done, they can also go extinct rapidly, as happened with the baiji. They can be gone before you know it."The commission will meet again at the end of August to discuss what to do next to save the vaquita.Virginia Morell is the author of four acclaimed books, including Animal Wise: The Thoughts and Emotions of Our Fellow Creatures.",
"The extremely rare vaquita, a small porpoise, drowns in gill nets intended to catch totoaba, whose swim bladders are worth thousands on the Chinese market.Just last week, a friend at the United States National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) emailed me to ask if I’ve ever written about the trafficking of totoaba swim bladders, adding that she’s been working on vaquita conservation in the Gulf of California.Totoaba? Vaquitas? These were animals that definitely hadn’t been on my radar. Totoabas are large, rare fish found only in the Gulf of California, and it turns out that their swim bladders—the organ that helps them float—is in high demand in China for soups and medicines. Demand is so high that a Mexican fisherman can make more than a month’s salary if he sells just one to a trafficker (to say nothing of how much that trafficker makes when he sells it to a customer).And then there’s the vaquita. It’s an adorable little porpoise on the verge of extinction. That’s because vaquitas are getting caught in nets used illegally to catch totoaba. National Geographic actually wrote about quest to save them in 2014.Over at NOAA, they’ve been studying how to keep these species alive. But it turns out totoaba and vaquitas aren’t just on NOAA’s mind. Today the Environmental Investigation Agency, a UK-based NGO, released a briefing called “Dual Extinction: The illegal trade in the endangered totoaba and its impact on the critically endangered vaquita.”The U.S. Attorney’s Office in San Diego displays a few of the hundreds of totoaba swim bladders recovered from trafficker Song Shen Zhen, who was smuggling them out of Mexico in 2013.No one’s sure how many totoaba are left, but it’s clear they’re endangered. A century ago they were fished heavily to meet demand for swim bladders in both China and the U.S. But their population dropped, and fishing them was banned in 1975.Totoaba are now at risk from illegal fishing. Nor does it help that the Colorado River, where they go to spawn, has become so salty because of water diversion that breeding is hard for them.Poachers use gill nets to catch the fish, which can grown more than six feet long and weigh more than 200 pounds. Gill nets are literally walls of netting dropped down into the ocean to trap fish. But they also trap all kinds of other marine life, including non-target fish, dolphins, sea turtles—and vaquitas.The vaquita is the smallest member of the dolphin, whale, and porpoise family, growing up to five feet and 120 pounds. Fewer than 100 are left, making them the most endangered marine mammal in the world. Scientists have long agreed that the only way to save them is to totally eliminate gill net fishing in their habitat, the waters between Baja California and mainland Mexico.“The vaquita’s only hope for survival is that gill nets are permanently removed from its entire range in the Gulf of California,” said EIA researcher Clare Perry, echoing NOAA’s recommendation. Last April, the Mexican government expanded its ban on gill net fishing in the gulf to try to save the species.Fishermen in the area, who are now no longer allowed to use gill nets for shrimp and other fish because of the ban, are being compensated for loss of income. But gill net poaching continues.Like shark fin, swim bladders are an ingrained part of traditional Chinese culture, used to signal wealth and opulence. They’re also believed to have medicinal properties. A similar species, the Chinese bahaba, was eaten to near-extinction several years ago, which led to the current totoaba poaching crisis in the upper Gulf of California. Fisherman have been known to get thousands of dollars for a totoaba bladder, which only multiplies in price by the time it’s sold to a consumer in China.The Environmental Investigation Agency found totoaba bladders, sometimes called “maw,” openly for sale in markets in Guangzhou, China, and Hong Kong. Most sellers knew it was illegal. Online, researchers found traffickers sharing tips about the best routes to smuggle them in.“There’s a real lack of enforcement in the main totoaba markets of Hong Kong and southern China,” Perry said. As long as demand continues and enforcement in China remains lax, vaquitas will continue to drown in illegal nets off the Mexican coast.This story was produced by National Geographic’s Special Investigations Unit, which focuses on wildlife crime and is made possible by grants from the BAND Foundation and the Woodtiger Fund. Read more stories from the SIU on Wildlife Watch. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to ngwildlife@natgeo.com.",
"Some scientists contend that we’re heading toward what would be the sixth mass extinction in the history of life on Earth. Human activity has increased the rate of extinction by several orders of magnitude. A recent UN report says around one million species “are now threatened with extinction, many within decades.”That prospect is grim but not inevitable. Across the world, scientists are using new technologies and unorthodox approaches to bring species back. From lending a hand in breeding to training dogs to sniff out rare gorillas, scientists are taking extraordinary measures to save the animals they love.Kakapo (critically endangered)
With fewer than 150 adults left in the wild, kakapos can’t afford one bad breeding season. To monitor and encourage the birds’ breeding, scientists deploy high-tech gadgets. One example: Drones deliver kakapo semen to scientists so they can artificially inseminate females in the field.",
"A naked mole rat. That was photographer Joel Sartore’s first model in 2006 when he began making studio portraits of animals in captivity. The purpose: to capture for posterity species that someday might be extinct. To reflect the project’s life-preserving mission, Sartore named it Photo Ark.By the time you read this, Sartore expects to have portraits of nearly 10,000 animals in the Ark. He plans to keep going to 15,000, which could take another 10-15 years. We asked him about his project, which we’re featuring in this special issue on endangered wildlife.Of the species you’ve photographed that have since gone extinct, what’s one of the most memorable? I’d say the Rabbs’ fringe-limbed tree frog, Ecnomiohyla rabborum. A few years ago there was one left alive, a male, at the Atlanta Botanical Garden. He was a total sweetheart. I photographed him three times before he passed away [in 2016]. Making those photos felt epic because you know this animal is never going to come this way again. At those moments I think to myself, Don’t screw this up. It may be this animal’s only chance to have its story told well, and forever.How about a memorable species you photographed that was endangered but seems to be bouncing back? The Florida grasshopper sparrow is not out of the woods yet, but it’s coming back. I love this one; it’s a very small brown bird, and a handful of people cared about it enough to try to save it. There are many success stories: in the United States, the California condor, the black-footed ferret, the Mexican gray wolf, the whooping crane; and in Canada, the Vancouver Island marmot. They all got down to perhaps two dozen or fewer individuals, but they’re all recovering now because people worked to protect their habitats and to start captive-breeding programs that saved those animals from extinction.What do you want people to know about the state of life on Earth? A recent intergovernmental report says that as many as one million species are already on their way to extinction. It’s folly to think that we can throw away so much life and not have it affect humanity in a profound and negative way. The biggest question of our time is: Will we wake up and act, or will we stare into our smartphones all the way down to disaster? My goal is to get the public to care about the extinction crisis while there’s still time to save the planet and everything that lives here.",
"Can California condors be saved?Big Sur, CaliforniaHigh above this rugged coastline, a condor bursts out of a ponderosa pine. With two quick flaps of wings spanning nine-and-a-half feet, the bird slices through the still air. Seconds later another condor flaps out of the tree, circling, chasing, climbing until the pair is soaring overhead in a majestic mid-air pas de deux.Soon six more condors appear out of nowhere, landing in the pine and vying for a choice perch. Standing on a remote ridge 2,800 feet above the Pacific shore, Joe Burnett, who considers this flock of 84 condors to be his extended family, provides a running commentary: "That male has a bad attitude… Look, he's harassing that juvenile… There's his mate. Their nest is so remote we call it the abyss."Burnett has been monitoring North America's largest land birds, with their ungainly, 25-pound bodies and wrinkly pink heads, for almost 20 years. For the past decade, every spring, he has climbed into California’s towering redwoods to monitor their eggs, sometimes tracking a condor for several days before he locates its nest.“These birds are the embodiment of pure wilderness,” he says. “Peering into their world is mysterious – a real privilege.”Endangered by lost habitat, an egg-damaging pesticide, and lead bullets, California condors, which once inhabited much of the southern half of the United States as well as western Canada and northern Mexico, were on the brink of extinction by the 1980s. State and federal wildlife officials captured the last 22 in the wild so they could launch a breeding program and return them to their natural homes.Now 289 condors, still a critically endangered species, are flying free in California, Arizona, Utah, and Mexico.Burnett, a biologist with the nonprofit Ventana Wildlife Society, has been monitoring this coastal flock since the birds were released here, in forested canyons 140 miles south of San Francisco, in 1997. He climbed into a nest for the first time in 2006, when it was discovered 40 feet off the ground in a hollowed-out redwood, the first record of condors nesting in coastal redwoods since 1905.The egg did not hatch. Wanting to know why, Burnett has since peered into dozens of nests, examining the eggs, weighing newborn chicks, and watching them fledge. The information he collects helps the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, the agency responsible for protecting them, monitor condor recovery.After two decades, the human investment Burnett and other scientists have devoted to condors has helped them finally reach a milestone: Last year, for the first time in nearly half a century, more chicks fledged in the wild than adult wild condors died.With the 2015 wild chick count at 14 and adult deaths at 12, it’s a precarious gain against perilous odds that include eggshell thinning, lead poisoning and housing developments built in condor habitat. Burnett says that a species smart enough to have survived since the Pleistocene can cope with life today if enough wild places are protected to accommodate them.The efforts of Burnett and a handful of other condor climbers are helping to increase the number of wild chicks, says Jesse Grantham, former coordinator of the Fish and Wildlife Service's condor recovery program.Getting them to fledge successfully in the wild is critical to species recovery -- less expensive and more productive in the long run than raising chicks in captivity, he says."Some will make it,” Grantham says, “and just possibly they’ll be better able to handle the wild than captive reared chicks, at least in the first year."Michael Clark from the LA Zoo (top) and Joe Burnett from Ventana Wildlife Society enter a condor nest in Big Sur to check on the chick's health as mom, Condor #190 "Redwood Queen," looks on.On a 100-plus-degree June afternoon, Burnett hikes half a mile down an open slope to check on one of this year's active nests, perched in a dead-topped redwood with a bird's-eye view of the Pacific surf. Wearing a baseball cap to protect his shaved head against the scorching sun, he settles into the long-legged stride of a biologist with decades of field experience. The sunbaked surroundings are a world away from Virginia's lush Blue Ridge Mountains, where he grew up watching red foxes and raptors, and following the nesting patterns of pileated woodpeckers. "I didn't realize I was doing biology as a kid," says Burnett, now 45, with a goatee and black-framed glasses.He sets up a spotting scope in dried grass on a rounded hillside looking 500 feet down to the nest. The tree is too rickety to climb, he says, but the condor activity clearly signals nesting. Once he begins monitoring the nest, Burnett gets a surprise: not two but three adults tending it, a father and son plus a female. Is this common? That's just one of the questions the condors themselves will answer as their population grows and they reestablish their social patterns. "That book hasn't been written,” says Burnett.As a first responder, he is on alert for condor crises. Each year in January, when the birds are establishing nests, he heads into the dense vegetation of steep coastal canyons with binoculars and a spotting scope, a radio tracking antennae, lots of water, and a tolerance for poison oak. Once he locates a nest, he maps out a series of climbs to check the fertility of eggs and the health of chicks.Burnett works with a team that includes a veterinarian. When they gather at the base of a nest tree, the conversation drops to a whisper. Using ropes, harnesses and pulleys, Burnett ascends into the nest. Most are deep in the burned-out centers of redwood trees protected from predators but a short flight to beach foraging. "It's a magical realm perched far off the human map. We never would be coming here unless we found a condor nest," Burnett says.He makes as many as five climbs a year into each nest, typically four or five of them, scaling heights up to 180 feet to enter a “condor condo.” The parents are protective but not aggressive, he says. “They look at you as if asking ‘why are you here?’ ” Sometimes they block access to their chicks, a passive protection that forces Burnett to come back another day.The first task is making sure the embryo is alive. Burnett waxes poetic about "these precious glowing orbs – signs of recovery of a species we almost lost." When an egg is not viable he replaces it with a fiberglass one, custom made to the exact size, weight, and color by a volunteer Hollywood special effects prop builder. Later Burnett will swap the dummy for a captive-laid egg that will hatch in the wild for the parents to raise as a foster chick. Of the 39 infertile eggs condor climbers have swapped in California, 25 have resulted in chicks that have successfully fledged.After a chick hatches Burnett will ascend again to check its health. Many a chick has survived after a climber found bottle caps and other trash in its crop, lowered it on pulleys in a modified rubber trashcan, and sent it in for overnight surgery."Every additional chick raised in the wild means we’re that much closer to establishing a sustainable flock," says Kelly Sorenson, Ventana Wildlife's executive director.All this egg swapping has helped identify a significant cause of nest failure: eggshell thinning. Analyzing the shells of several damaged eggs, Burnett found high levels of residue from the pesticide DDT, which was banned in the United States in 1972 after it nearly wiped out bald eagles, brown pelicans, and other birds.In a study published in 2013, Burnett attributed condors’ eggshell thinning to their feasting on the carcasses of sea lions, which accumulate DDT that was dumped into the ocean off Los Angeles for more than 20 years ending in 1971.Lead poisoning is a continuing problem, too. Nine out of ten condors have elevated lead levels, and nearly half of those tested need to undergo chelation, a procedure to remove heavy metals, according to Myra Finkelstein, an environmental toxicologist at University of California, Santa Cruz. The primary source is ammunition in the carrion that condors ingest.Her recent analysis of lead exposure in feathers found the species will continue to need intensive care well into the future. Finkelstein has concluded that condors are chronically lead poisoned.Despite the $5 million-a-year condor recovery program, “this species is not on a trajectory to a self-sustaining population,” she says.The poisoning of condors was the primary motivation for state legislation banning lead ammunition throughout California. Outlawed first in condor country, it will be banned statewide by 2019. So far condors’ lead levels have not dropped, says Eric Davis, condor coordinator for the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.Within a decade condors may extend their range to the forests of the Pacific Northwest, where they have not been seen in at least a century.The National Park Service is working with the Yurok Tribe, which reveres the bird as a sacred animal, to reintroduce the bird to its ancestral lands adjoining Redwood National Park, in California’s northwest corner. Lewis and Clark saw condors on their journey west in the early 19th Century, so condors used to inhabit the mouth of the Columbia River, Davis says. How these giant birds will fare in a completely wooded environment is part of an evaluation expected to start later this year. Release of birds would not begin until at least 2019.Burnett views the extension of condor habit from Southern California and the central California coast to the Pacific Northwest as a logical expansion of their natural range. He says condors are adapters, wired for millennia to find a niche in the landscape. Despite the intensity of the human care they are provided, most of the birds are doing fine without it most of the time, Burnett says. "They breed on their own, they nest and they forage on their own."Many biologists doubt condors will achieve self-sufficiency in their lifetimes, but Burnett is more optimistic. As lead and DDE levels subside, the species could reach that goal within five to 10 years, he says.Although that would put Burnett out of a job, he looks forward to a time when he would no longer have to climb into their nests and identify every condor in the flock by sight. It would finally mean condors are truly wild and free. "I can't wait to look up and not know who that bird is,” he says.",
"Mexican gray wolves (Canis lupus baileyi) are a unique subspecies, a new study shows conclusively, and with a population of just over 100, require continued conservation measures to survive.It’s hard to believe red wolves and Mexican gray wolves are still around: Both came about as close to extinction as is physically possible. Red wolves, for example, have plummeted to a population of 35 animals or fewer.But despite incredible recoveries, both remain highly imperiled. These North American predators often come into conflict with people, especially farmers and ranchers. As part of this contention, some have questioned the science asserting the animals are unique species and worthy of protection under the U.S. Endangered Species Act.Now, a federally-commissioned study has put that question to rest. According to a report just published by the National Academy of Sciences, Mexican gray wolves are a unique subspecies (Canis lupus baileyi) of gray wolf, and red wolves are a legitimate, separate wolf species (Canis rufus). Federal law thus requires both to be protected under the Endangered Species Act.This matters because some, including landowners and local politicians, have argued that since red wolves have at times interbred with coyotes, they may not be unique enough to deserve protection. Others have contended that Mexican gray wolves are too similar to gray wolves. But that’s not the case.“The data that have accumulated have led us to a very clear conclusion,” says Joseph Travis, a biology professor at Florida State and lead author of the report.The paper examined reams of research regarding the animals’ lineages, unique behaviors and anatomy, as well as their genetics. (Is the gray wolf still endangered? Depends who you ask.)“The committee’s review was incredibly thorough and considered all lines of evidence for and against the subspecies and species designations for Mexican gray wolves and red wolves,” says Sean Murphy, a researcher at the University of Kentucky whose research contributed to the study.“Many previous studies relied on only one or two lines of evidence,” Murphy says, but this group “did an extraordinary job of synthesizing [the data].”Red wolves (Canis rufus) have interbred with coyotes in the past, but are a unique species.Species in the Canis genus, which includes gray wolves, red wolves, coyotes, and domestic dogs, are unique in that many of them have recently diverged from one another, and do occasionally interbreed. This can make taxonomic distinctions difficult, Travis says.The Endangered Species Act mandates that threatened and endangered species, in addition to distinct subspecies, be preserved and recovered. Unique groups of endangered species called “distinct population segments” are also protected.But the act doesn’t apply to some hybrids that are a cross between different species, one example being coywolves: the offspring of coyotes and wolves. (See 12 of our favorite wolf pictures.)Both Mexican gray and red wolves once roamed vast expanses of North America, and the former were once found widely throughout the U.S. Southwest. A government program to eliminate predators and widespread hunting nearly wiped them out, but a small population of five was found in Mexico in the 1970s. After successful captive breeding, 11 wolves were released into the wilds of western New Mexico and eastern Arizona in 1998, and have grown to a current population of 114, at last count.Red wolves likewise nearly disappeared, but a small population was taken from Louisiana in the 1970s and captively bred, before being released into a national wildlife refuge in eastern North Carolina. After growing to 150 in number, they have since declined to a population of 35 (and possibly as low as 25), making them the world’s most endangered wolf.Red wolves are smaller than their gray cousin, and resemble coyotes. The study found some past evidence of interbreeding with coyotes, but not enough to change their fundamental nature; given the choice, red wolves will consort with others of their kind, and will actually actively fight off and kill coyotes that stray into their territory.However, because the population of red wolves declined so much, some of these animals did mate with coyotes before researchers took them for captive breeding, Travis says.Red wolves remain especially threatened, and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service has come under intense criticism for recent weakening of rules to protect them. In June 2018, the service proposed allowing landowners to shoot the animals if they strayed onto their property, a decision that was harshly rebuked and struck down in court. The service didn’t respond to request for comment.Meanwhile, 17 Mexican wolves, also called lobos, were found dead in 2018—a record number.Scientists and conservationists expressed hope that the paper would put to rest an unhelpful debate, and allow for new progress toward the species’ conservation.“This will hopefully move the discussion at the federal policy level toward effective conservation... and away from controversies about hybridization,” says Kristin Brzeski, a conservation geneticist who studies wolves at Michigan Technological University and wasn’t involved in the paper.Murphy adds that “the immediate, overarching conservation implication is that Fish and Wildlife Service must ramp up recovery efforts without further delay, and with or without resounding cooperation from relevant state wildlife agencies.”It’s hard to believe red wolves and Mexican gray wolves are still around: Both came about as close to extinction as is physically possible. Red wolves, for example, have plummeted to a population of 35 animals or fewer.  But despite incredible recoveries, both remain highly imperiled. These North American predators often come into conflict with people, especially farmers and ranchers. As part of this contention, some have questioned the science asserting the animals are unique species worth of protection under the U.S. Endangered Species.  Now, a federal study has put that question to rest. According to a report just published by the National Academy of Sciences, Mexican gray wolves are a unique subspecies (Canis lupus baileyi) and red wolves are a legitimate, separate wolf species (Canis rufus). Federal law thus requires both to be protected under the Endangered Species Act.  This matters because some, including landowners and local politicians, have argued that since red wolves have at times interbred with coyotes, they may not be unique enough to deserve protection. Others have contended that Mexican gray wolves are too similar to gray wolves. But that’s not the case.  “The data that have accumulated have led us to a very clear conclusion,” says Joseph Travis, a biology professor at Florida State and lead author of the report.  The paper examined reams of research regarding the animals’ lineages, unique behaviors and anatomy, as well as their genetics.  “The committee’s review was incredibly thorough and considered all lines of evidence for and against the subspecies and species designations for Mexican gray wolves and red wolves,” says Sean Murphy, a researcher at the University of Kentucky who wasn’t involved in the effort.  “Many previous studies relied on only one or two lines of evidence,” Murphy says, but this group “did an extraordinary job of synthesizing [the data].”  Nearly lost  Species in the Canis genus, which includes gray wolves, red wolves, coyotes, and domestic dogs, are unique in that many of them have recently diverged from one another, and do occasionally interbreed. This can make taxonomic distinctions difficult, Travis says.  The Endangered Species Act mandates that threatened and endangered species, in addition to distinct subspecies, be preserved and recovered. Unique groups of endangered species called “distinct population segments” are also protected.  But the act doesn’t apply to some hybrids that are a cross between different species, one example being coywolves: the offspring of coyotes and wolves.  Both Mexican gray and red wolves once roamed vast expanses of North America, and the former were once found widely throughout the U.S. Southwest. A government program to eliminate predators and widespread hunting nearly wiped them out, but a small population of five was found Mexico in the 1970s. After successful captive breeding, 11 wolves were released into the wilds of western New Mexico and eastern Arizona in 1998, and have grown to a current population of 114, at last count.  Red wolves likewise nearly disappeared, but a small population was taken from Louisiana in the 1970s and captively bred, before being released into a national wildlife refuge in eastern North Carolina. After growing to 50 in number, they have since declined to a population of 35 (and possibly as low as 25), making them the world’s most endangered wolf.  [Red Wolf taxonomy card]  Red wolves are smaller than their gray cousin, and resemble coyotes. The study found some past evidence of interbreeding with coyotes, but not enough to change their fundamental nature; given the choice, red wolves will consort with others of their kind, and will actually actively fight off and kill coyotes that stray into their territory.  However, because the population of red wolves declined so much, some of these animals did mate with coyotes before researchers took them for captive breeding, Travis says.  Under threat  Red wolves remain especially imperiled, and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service has come under intense criticism for recent weakening of rules to protect them. In June 2018, the service proposed allowing landowners to shoot the animals if they strayed onto their property, a decision that was harshly rebuked and struck down in court. The service didn’t respond to request for comment.  Meanwhile, 17 Mexican wolves, also called lobos, were found dead in 2018—a record number.  Scientists and conservationists expressed hope that the paper would put to rest an unhelpful debate, and allow for new progress toward the species’ conservation.  “This will hopefully move the discussion at the federal policy level toward effective conservation... and away from controversies about hybridization,” says Kristin Brzeski, a conservation geneticist who studies wolves at Michigan Technological University and wasn’t involved in the paper.  Murphy adds that “the immediate, overarching conservation implication is that Fish and Wildlife Service must ramp up recovery efforts without further delay, and with or without resounding cooperation from relevant state wildlife agencies.”It’s hard to believe red wolves and Mexican gray wolves are still around: Both came about as close to extinction as is physically possible. Red wolves, for example, have plummeted to a population of 35 animals or fewer.  But despite incredible recoveries, both remain highly imperiled. These North American predators often come into conflict with people, especially farmers and ranchers. As part of this contention, some have questioned the science asserting the animals are unique species worth of protection under the U.S. Endangered Species.  Now, a federal study has put that question to rest. According to a report just published by the National Academy of Sciences, Mexican gray wolves are a unique subspecies (Canis lupus baileyi) and red wolves are a legitimate, separate wolf species (Canis rufus). Federal law thus requires both to be protected under the Endangered Species Act.  This matters because some, including landowners and local politicians, have argued that since red wolves have at times interbred with coyotes, they may not be unique enough to deserve protection. Others have contended that Mexican gray wolves are too similar to gray wolves. But that’s not the case.  “The data that have accumulated have led us to a very clear conclusion,” says Joseph Travis, a biology professor at Florida State and lead author of the report.  The paper examined reams of research regarding the animals’ lineages, unique behaviors and anatomy, as well as their genetics.  “The committee’s review was incredibly thorough and considered all lines of evidence for and against the subspecies and species designations for Mexican gray wolves and red wolves,” says Sean Murphy, a researcher at the University of Kentucky who wasn’t involved in the effort.  “Many previous studies relied on only one or two lines of evidence,” Murphy says, but this group “did an extraordinary job of synthesizing [the data].”  Nearly lost  Species in the Canis genus, which includes gray wolves, red wolves, coyotes, and domestic dogs, are unique in that many of them have recently diverged from one another, and do occasionally interbreed. This can make taxonomic distinctions difficult, Travis says.  The Endangered Species Act mandates that threatened and endangered species, in addition to distinct subspecies, be preserved and recovered. Unique groups of endangered species called “distinct population segments” are also protected.  But the act doesn’t apply to some hybrids that are a cross between different species, one example being coywolves: the offspring of coyotes and wolves.  Both Mexican gray and red wolves once roamed vast expanses of North America, and the former were once found widely throughout the U.S. Southwest. A government program to eliminate predators and widespread hunting nearly wiped them out, but a small population of five was found Mexico in the 1970s. After successful captive breeding, 11 wolves were released into the wilds of western New Mexico and eastern Arizona in 1998, and have grown to a current population of 114, at last count.  Red wolves likewise nearly disappeared, but a small population was taken from Louisiana in the 1970s and captively bred, before being released into a national wildlife refuge in eastern North Carolina. After growing to 50 in number, they have since declined to a population of 35 (and possibly as low as 25), making them the world’s most endangered wolf.  [Red Wolf taxonomy card]  Red wolves are smaller than their gray cousin, and resemble coyotes. The study found some past evidence of interbreeding with coyotes, but not enough to change their fundamental nature; given the choice, red wolves will consort with others of their kind, and will actually actively fight off and kill coyotes that stray into their territory.  However, because the population of red wolves declined so much, some of these animals did mate with coyotes before researchers took them for captive breeding, Travis says.  Under threat  Red wolves remain especially imperiled, and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service has come under intense criticism for recent weakening of rules to protect them. In June 2018, the service proposed allowing landowners to shoot the animals if they strayed onto their property, a decision that was harshly rebuked and struck down in court. The service didn’t respond to request for comment.  Meanwhile, 17 Mexican wolves, also called lobos, were found dead in 2018—a record number.  Scientists and conservationists expressed hope that the paper would put to rest an unhelpful debate, and allow for new progress toward the species’ conservation.  “This will hopefully move the discussion at the federal policy level toward effective conservation... and away from controversies about hybridization,” says Kristin Brzeski, a conservation geneticist who studies wolves at Michigan Technological University and wasn’t involved in the paper.  Murphy adds that “the immediate, overarching conservation implication is that Fish and Wildlife Service must ramp up recovery efforts without further delay, and with or without resounding cooperation from relevant state wildlife agencies.”The lesser long-nosed bat is one of only a few bat species that feeds almost exclusively on nectar. In Mexico, these bats drink nectar from agave plants, which inadvertently helps tequila producers pollinate their agave crop.",
"Two gray wolves walk across the snow in Yellowstone National Park. The animals were reintroduced in the region in the 1990s.After four decades of intense conservation efforts, it’s finally time to take the gray wolf off the Endangered Species List, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service recently announced.“The facts are clear and indisputable—the gray wolf no longer meets the definition of a threatened or endangered species,” David Bernhardt, acting secretary of the U.S. Department of the Interior, said in an emailed statement.“Today the wolf is thriving on its vast range, and it is reasonable to conclude it will continue to do so in the future.”Not so fast, say several scientists.For one, that definition is up for debate. According to the Endangered Species Act, a plant or animal can be considered endangered when it’s no longer in “danger of extinction throughout all of a significant portion of its range.” (See 12 of our favorite wolf pictures.)But gray wolves occupy less than 20 percent of their historic U.S. range, notes Jeremy Bruskotter, a social scientist at the Ohio State University who has studied programs to save gray wolves in the United States.“Does that constitute recovery? It seems like a stretch to suggest that it does,” he says.“I’ve been watching this for 15 years, and it’s just the same story over and over again,” says Bruskotter, who published a study in 2013 arguing against a failed federal proposal—one of many over the years—to delist the species.Before Europeans arrived, wolves roamed over nearly every inch of what’s now the U.S. Centuries’ worth of hunting, trapping, and poisoning erased the species from the lower 48 states by the 1930s. In fact, in the early 1900s, veterinarians deliberately infected wolves in the Greater Yellowstone region with mange-causing mites.Today, more than 6,000 gray wolves can be found in fragmented populations across the West and Great Lakes, thanks to a reintroduction program centered in Yellowstone National Park in the 1990s and natural colonization from Canadian packs. (Two other lineages, the Mexican wolf and red wolf, are struggling to survive in small wild populations; neither would be affected by the proposal.)It’s important to remember that gray wolves have already been delisted in many places that they now occur, says Gavin Shire, a spokesperson for the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.In 2011, Congress passed legislation that removed federal gray wolf protections and returned management of the species back to state wildlife agencies in Idaho, Montana, eastern Washington and Oregon, and northern Utah. Then in 2017, the Fish and Wildlife Service did the same with Wyoming’s wolves.If the new proposal is passed, Shire says there’d be no change for those areas of the wolf’s range. (Learn about “the most famous wolf in the world.”)What would change is federal protection for wolves in states like Minnesota, Michigan, Wisconsin, which number around 4,400 animals. Parts of Washington and Oregon would also be affected, as well as areas that wolves are just beginning to colonize, such as California.Next comes a 60-day period during which the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service accepts comments from the public. And while that can include anything from classroom letters and editorials, Shire says what they’re really looking for is “scientific information that’s going to help us make the right decision in the end.”A wolf pack investigates grizzly bear tracks in Yellowstone's Pelican Valley.“This is not a scientific determination,” says Brett Hartl, who reviewed the proposal for the nonprofit Center for Biological Diversity. “It’s simply an arbitrary policy choice to ignore how much habitat is unoccupied.”For example, Hartl points to how differently the wildlife service pursued bald eagle conservation.“We didn’t declare them recovered until they were found in every state, and probably at a level even higher than pre-European contact,” he says.It was always part of the plan to return control to the states once recovery goals were met, says Carter Niemeyer, a retired biologist who was the wildlife service’s wolf recovery manager for Idaho.For the Northern Rockies wolf population in Idaho, Wyoming, and Montana, goals included maintaining populations in each state of at least 300 wolves, with 30 breeding pairs, for three years.The problem, says Niemeyer, is that states like his native Idaho now view any individual wolves beyond those goals as “excess baggage” that can be gotten rid of with hunting and trapping.“Those were supposed to be minimums,” he says. “We don’t manage bears that way, and we don’t manage mountain lions that way, so why do we persecute wolves this way?”Many ranchers, farmers, and other landowners have been heavily opposed to reintroducing wolves, mostly due to the potential for livestock predation. Livestock owners receive compensation for any animals killed by wolves, and sometimes the wolves themselves are killed or relocated. It’s also legal to hunt and trap wolves across many western states.One hunting organization, known as the Foundation for Wildlife Management, has even been offering cash rewards of up to $1,000 for trappers who target wolves in Idaho.All of this just points to a growing anti-wolf sentiment, says Niemeyer. (Read why Americans are so divided over saving wolves.)“I’ve been part of the recovery effort since the beginning, and I just hate to see it end in an environment of persecution again,” says Niemeyer, who also wrote the books Wolfer and Wolf Land.Others support delisting, such as Neil Anderson, wildlife program manager for Montana Fish, Wildlife and Parks.“One of the more significant aspects of state management of wildlife, including wolves, is it gives the local public more ownership and a voice in managing these species,” he says.Even still, Anderson admits that wolves remain a controversial species.“Perhaps more than any other large carnivore, there seems to be more of a gap between those that want no restrictions of wolf numbers and those that want as few as possible,” says Anderson. (See unique pictures of wolves taken in Yellowstone.)Montana Fish, Wildlife and Parks just announced that its annual hunting and trapping season produced 315 wolf kills. The harvest represents nearly 40 percent of the state’s estimated population of 850 wolves.That kind of hunting probably won’t drive wolves back to extinction, says Bruskotter, but it also stands in the way of further wolf recovery.He says the new proposal would end up creating pockets of wolf populations in the wild, instead of restoring self-sustaining populations of the predators across their former range.At the end of the day, “we’re arguing about the scope of what recovery for an endangered species will look like,” says Bruskotter.",
"Fifteen years ago, a group of researchers returned from their annual field survey of Vancouver Island marmots with dire news: They had only been able to locate 22 animals. The entire wild population of this species was smaller than a kindergarten class. Conservationists estimated that within a year, it would go extinct in the wild.The bad news got worse. The marmots weren’t breeding well in captivity, and the first attempt to release captive-bred marmots failed. These captive creatures weren’t entering hibernation, which is apparently necessary for them to breed. And three of the four released marmots were killed by cougars.“It just seemed like blow after blow after blow for the population,” recalls Malcolm McAdie, veterinarian and captive breeding coordinator for the Marmot Recovery Foundation, which works to save the animals. “I sort of described it as having your heart pulled out slowly.” (Related: See efforts to save the quoll, a cat-sized Australian marsupial.)Extinction seemed inevitable, says Adam Taylor, the group’s executive director. But instead of giving up, they redoubled their efforts.And it’s easy to see why—besides being an important part of area’s ecology, the animals are, well, adorable. “They really do look like just the most absurd creatures to survive in the wild,” Taylor says, like “living teddy bears.”The Vancouver Island marmot (Marmota vancouverensis) is actually an oversized squirrel the size of a large house cat that is found only on this isle in British Columbia. Unlike its more common cousin the hoary marmot, which has a silvery pelage, the Vancouver Island locals sport a chocolate-brown coat, interrupted by white around their snouts and chests. (Quiz: How many endangered species can you recognize?)The species hibernates for five to seven months of the year and emerges in spring to breed and forage in the subalpine meadows, fattening up on colorful flowers that erupt in this harsh mountainside habitat. The marmots greet parents and mates by touching noses, and the young frolic with their littermates in play.But these are also tough creatures, making their home in the steepest avalanche chutes of the island’s mountains, strewn with precariously balanced boulders on talus slopes — sites that can be reached only by hours-long drives down remote logging roads, followed by intense ascents on foot.Exactly how many marmots historically existed on the landscape is unknown. The first inventory, done in the 1980s, returned an estimate of 300 to 350 marmots. Through the ‘90s their numbers began to plummet, a likely result of shifts in predation patterns by wolves, golden eagles, and cougars coupled with their ill-fated colonization of clear-cuts left behind by industrial logging.These tracts of clear-cut forest initially resembled the open, sub-alpine meadows that marmots call home, but years after the marmots moved into what resembled great habitat, the trees would grow back and provide the cover that predators needed to slaughter them.Following the population nadir of 2003, the Marmot Recovery Foundation resorted to several drastic measures to save the rodents.For one, they organized a field crew to create a human shield, watching over the last of the marmots 24/7 to prevent them from being eaten by predators.They also tweaked their efforts to captively breed the animals and reintroduce them to the wild. It was counterintuitive, especially with such a rare species, but the marmots essentially had to be starved in order to trigger hibernation, and if a male and female hibernated together, they would often produce offspring. (Related: "Marmots a “Wakeup Call” for Sex-Changing Chemicals.")"We spend a lot of our time essentially playing the dating game with marmots,” says Taylor. “We try and find a suitable mate that’s unpaired, and often they’ll settle down together.”Once marmots paired up and bred in captivity, getting them to survive in the wild was another matter. At first, the results were abysmal. Now, instead of introducing marmots straight to the wild, they do a phased in re-introduction whereby the captive-born marmots spend a year with the wild marmot colony on Mount Washington, where researchers can keep close tabs on them and human activity keeps predators away, before being moved to more remote wilderness.It seems that the wild marmots mentor the captive bred marmots, helping them pick up key skills such as how to interact with the colony or how to plug their hibernation burrow successfully.In the Vancouver Island Marmot’s case, captive breeding and re-introduction have provided the tiny wild population with the numbers and genetic stock it needed to grow. Since that low point in 2003, the Marmot Recovery Foundation, together with their funding partners, private donors and partnering zoos, have slowly, steadily, improved the marmot’s lot.McAdie estimates that about 10 percent of the current wild population was born in captivity. While that percentage is small, those captive-born marmots have been key in recolonizing many sites from which marmots had disappeared.Much of the marmot’s habitat had also been choked out by trees, which have been expanding as temperatures have climbed, McAdie explains. This is bad news for the marmots because they need open space to see approaching predators. So the group has been physically removing trees to preserve the meadows that these creatures need.The foundation is also working to re-establish colonies further north on Vancouver Island at sites that are predicted to be less impacted by climate change.The efforts have paid off. Today the wild population is up to 150 to 200 marmots and is producing up to 50 marmot pups a year. That bodes well for sustained population growth, but there’s still a way to go before the foundation’s goal of reaching annual pup production of 150 in the wild.“The big lesson from the Vancouver Island marmot is that we can work with species that are on the absolute brink of extinction, and we can bring these species back,” Taylor says. But “it’s not an easy road.”The news came as a surprise, albeit a welcome one, to Joel Sartore, National Geographic fellow, photographer, and founder of the National Geographic Photo Ark, who photographed this marmot at the Toronto Zoo.“I never thought I'd see this species alive,” says Sartore, who since 2005 has travelled the world photographing species before they disappear.So far, he’s photographed about 8,500 species. “I see more clearly than ever that all species are beautiful and have a basic right to exist,” Sartore says. “Besides, just think of how diminished our planet will be if we lose half of all species to extinction by the turn of the next century, as has been predicted.”Work like that of the Marmot Recovery Foundation can help save individual species, but it often requires intense and continuing effort."We have re-established the population, but we really need to keep working in order to achieve a stable population that’s able to persist on its own,” Taylor says.To that end, the group continues to breed and release marmots into the wild—with thirteen released this year so far. They also remove trees to preserve meadows and track down marmots that have strayed into unsuitable habitat and relocate them.The group is ironically working toward a day when their efforts are no longer necessary—which they would welcome, as it would mean the animal would be recovered. “Our last job is going to be to thank our partners and our donors and turn off the lights,” Taylor says.",
"The eastern quoll (Dasyurus viverrinus) went extinct in Australia, but survives in Tasmania, and now researchers are trying to reintroduce it to parts of its former range.Beauty may be in the eye of the beholder, but everyone knows “cute” when they see it. You can’t miss it in eastern quolls, adorable little spotted marsupials that are native to Australia.In March 2018, 20 quolls were transplanted from Tasmania to the mainland of Australia, where they went extinct 50 years ago.Meet the Aussie natives that are as bold as they are beguiling.With ears like a lemur, a mouse face, a cat-like body and white polka dots on their thick fur, quolls certainly have a signature look. (See “Endangered Eastern Quoll Babies Seen For The First Time In Decades.”)Their charms aren’t very visible in the wild, though. Quolls are nocturnal, mostly snoozing the day away in their dens and foraging at night.And they aren’t picky eaters. Quolls will eat insects or carrion, and will hunt rats, rabbits, birds, and lizards—even animals larger than themselves.Quolls have even been known to snatch food from a Tasmanian devil, says Wade Anthony, founder of the Devil’s Cradle animal sanctuary in Tasmania, where some of the recently released quolls were bred.“I watched a quoll lead a devil on a merry dance around a carcass—the devil would chase it away—only to beat the devil back to the food to steal a few bites each time,” he says.And why not? It’s fun to mess with your cousins, and quolls are related to Tasmanian devils. Both are carnivorous marsupials in the family Dasyuridae.Quolls are also more distantly related to the extinct thylacine, or Tasmanian tiger, says Nicholas Dexter, senior project officer at Booderee National Park in New South Wales, where quolls were recently reintroduced. (Related: Has This Aussie Trio Finally Found the Tasmanian Tiger?)Northern quolls are also endangered, having fallen prey to their prey. Quoll populations fell by 95 percent after 1935 when toxic cane toads were introduced to Australia. Some quolls, however, are averse to munching on the toads, and a recent study has found this is likely a heritable trait. Quolls with two parents showing “toad-smart” behavior were far less likely to try a non-lethal toad leg than other quolls were. Even hybrids, with just one toad-savvy parent, showed the same behavior.Quolls were driven extinct in Australia by a mixture of disease and predation by foxes and feral cats.Researchers also released a mix of pure-bred northern quolls and hybrids on toad-filled Indian Island, and after a year some of the quoll offspring still thrived among the toads despite some population decline, suggesting the gene may have been passed down.With all their skills, how did eastern quolls go extinct on Australia’s mainland? They were outfoxed.Introduced from Britain in the early 19th century, foxes “spread throughout the southern half of the continent, excluding Tasmania,” Dexter says. Many mammals were driven to extinction in the wild, including species of bettongs, bridle nailtail wallabies, and the eastern quolls.Tasmania “has acted as a Noah’s Ark for some of these species, such as the eastern quoll,” he says.The 20 eastern quolls reintroduced to Booderee in March didn’t have an easy time, either. Only four have survived, with six being killed predators, including foxes, and four hit by cars.Some mortalities were expected, Anthony says, but changes will likely be made in the existing program. Devil’s Cradle has already expanded the wild space for its pre-release quolls.Three of the 20 quolls introduced to Australia have already given birth, a sign of hope for the species.The hope is that future generations of quolls born at Booderee will be more fearful of dangers such as people, traffic, and domestic dogs, Dexter says.And the next generation is already here. This month, three of the reintroduced female quolls gave birth to five joeys each.Eastern quolls can have up to 20 offspring at a time, each “the size of a grain of rice,” Anthony says. Quoll moms have only six nipples, though, so life gets competitive right away, even during the eight weeks that babies stay in mom’s pouch.Does everyone instantly fall in love with the quolls?“Yes,” Dexter says, “especially when they stand on their hind feet and look at you like meerkats in spotty pajamas.”It’s hard to argue with that.",
"To see all that’s hopeful and appalling about the way we treat sea turtles, there’s no better place to start than the Burj Al Arab Jumeirah hotel. This shimmering tower of blue and white glass is shaped like the jib of a sailboat bound for shore. It rose two decades ago on an artificial island amid the steel forest of construction cranes that is Dubai, part of the United Arab Emirates. A royal suite, at 8,396 square feet, comes with a private cinema and 17 pillow options. A weekend stay can top $50,000. I have come here, though, to see its nonpaying guests.Passing a fleet of white Rolls-Royces, I meet British expat marine biologist David Robinson. We take an elevator down to a parking garage and walk by Lamborghinis to our destination: a labyrinth of pipes and plastic pools, the intensive care unit of an elaborate marine turtle hospital. In one tub a green sea turtle struggles with internal organ damage. One floor up, sick, critically endangered hawksbills fill aquariums.The hotel housing this rehab center is owned by a holding group whose driving force is Dubai’s emir. His Highness Sheikh Mohammed bin Rashid al Maktoum, the architect of the region’s lightning growth, wants his city to become a model of environmental stewardship. But the reptilian miseries unspooling in this epicenter of consumption reveal much about the ills we humans heap on these creatures. Workers here have seen turtles with balloons lodged in their intestines, turtles with flippers broken after getting caught in fishing nets, a turtle bashed in the head and tossed off a boat. One female green turtle was struck by a ship just down the road, near the world’s ninth busiest seaport. The impact crushed her shell, carving out a jagged three-pound wedge as big as an iron.“People are doing this,” says Robinson, a former operations manager for this facility. “Everything—every aspect, every single species of turtle, every threat that they face—is anthropogenic.”He certainly doesn’t mean just here. From Kemp’s ridleys no bigger than car tires to leatherbacks that can outweigh polar bears, six of the world’s seven sea turtle species are considered vulnerable, endangered, or critically endangered. The status of the seventh, the flatback of Australia, is unknown.And yet these beasts soldier on, despite the obstacles we place before them. Of the sea turtle nesting colonies that were reviewed in a recent analysis, more than twice as many were increasing as were trending downward. Scientists this year found that turtle populations protected by the U.S. Endangered Species Act were on the upswing. Hawaii’s green turtles, long in trouble, are rebounding far faster than anyone expected. One turtle released from Robinson’s care after 546 days of treatment for a head injury made the longest documented journey by a green sea turtle. She traveled 5,146 miles, from the Middle East nearly to Thailand, before her tracking device finally gave out.Sea turtles, it appears, may be more resilient than once thought. “I’ve seen all sorts of crazy injuries, deformities, illnesses, and they just keep going,” says Bryan Wallace, who oversees sea turtle assessments for the International Union for Conservation of Nature, or IUCN. “Where’s the dodo or the passenger pigeon of the sea turtle world?” While a few local stocks are in real danger of blinking out—Malaysian leatherbacks, for example—all seven species are hanging on regionally and globally.As we’ve plundered the seas, built up coastlines, and set about heating the planet, it’s reasonable to wonder whether we’re dooming these animals. But after months of reporting on sea turtles in several countries, I think we should consider another query instead: How might these reptiles fare with a bit more help?Spend enough time watching sea turtles and it’s hard to escape how astonishing they are. They soar through oceans with winglike front flippers, dig nests using back appendages that scoop and toss sand almost like hands, and squeeze salt water, like tears, from glands near their eyes. Their mouths are similar to bird beaks, perhaps because turtles share a common ancestor with chickens. All but leatherbacks, with their layer of thick skin, have bony external skeletons covered in scutes of keratin, the material found in rhinoceros horns and our own fingernails. But each species is different. Hawksbills help reefs by eating sponges that can smother coral. Loggerheads use powerful jaws to crush horseshoe crabs. Leatherbacks feed on jellyfish and sea squirts and can easily migrate from Japan to California.Marine turtles split from their terrestrial relatives more than 100 million years ago. They survived the asteroid that killed the dinosaurs and squeaked past a marine extinction two million years ago that cut their numbers almost in half. Today sea turtles are found on the beaches of every continent except Antarctica, and they swim in all tropical and temperate waters.Perhaps their ubiquity explains the many roles they’ve played for people. They tell our stories: In Chinese mythology, sea turtle legs hold up the sky. We turn to them for healing: Turtle meat in West Africa was once believed to fight leprosy, and bathing in a broth of loggerhead plastron, the bony undershell, was considered a tonic for lung ailments. Even today, bones and scutes are sold as medicine from China to Mexico.Through most of this shared history, turtles haven’t just survived—they’ve thrived. “The sea was all thick with them, and they were of the very largest, so numerous that it seemed that the ships would run aground on them,” a Spanish priest wrote of Christopher Columbus’s view of Cuba’s sea turtles in 1494, during his second voyage.Some scientists today believe the pre-Columbian Caribbean alone may have been home to 91 million adult green turtles. That’s roughly 10 times as many as all the adult sea turtles of every species believed to be alive today. So many occupied the Cayman Islands in the 1700s that English settlers used them to supply Jamaica with meat. It wasn’t long before West Indies turtles were being served in London pubs and John Adams was slurping sea turtle soup during the First Continental Congress. Within a century, though, Caribbean turtle populations had crashed, sending turtle hunters to new coastlines, foreshadowing a great transition.The rain is just starting on a dark Costa Rican night when Helen Pheasey and I cut across a beach with a red flashlight. Pheasey, a Ph.D. candidate who studies the black market trade in reptiles, is working with a U.S.-based conservation outfit called Paso Pacífico. In her pocket she carries a fake turtle egg implanted with a GPS transmitter, and we’re looking for its potential mom. She gestures toward an olive ridley, alone and kicking up sand in the dark. As the pregnant turtle drops her eggs, Pheasey crawls toward the turtle’s tail, reaches into the mound of Ping-Pong ball–size eggs, and places the decoy in the middle of the pile. She’s hoping hurried egg poachers will nab her fake along with their intended loot.Turtle eggs are hot commodities in parts of Asia and Latin America. They may be boiled in soup, cooked into omelets, or dropped raw into a shot glass with lemon, tomato juice, and pepper. Eggs don’t bring huge dollars, but because most turtles lay 50 to 100 or more at once and leave long sandy tracks from sea to nest, they’re easy to find and steal in volume.In most countries, selling turtle eggs has been illegal for years. Yet in 2018, police seized a pickup in Oaxaca, Mexico, loaded with garbage bags stuffed with 22,000 turtle eggs. Malaysian authorities two years earlier intercepted four Filipinos in wooden boats carrying 19,000 eggs. The $7,400 those sailors stood to make was nearly three times the average yearly wage in their community. Egg theft is often linked with poverty or drug and alcohol abuse, Pheasey says. But the hope is that fake eggs could help stop organized traffickers.On a recent Saturday near Guanacaste, Costa Rica, thieves raided 28 nests—a haul that included one of Pheasey’s fake eggs.At 7 a.m. Monday, Pheasey watched on smartphone apps as her egg traveled from the peninsula to the back of a building on the mainland. After a delay, the egg moved again, to a neighborhood in San Ramón, 85 miles from the beach. Pheasey traced the route in her car. The egg had stopped at a supermarket loading dock. There it probably changed hands before being ferried to someone’s house.Pheasey and Paso Pacífico are still working out kinks in their tactics, but even if the decoy eggs show promise in fighting smugglers, that’s just one of the many problems turtles face. We’re chewing up nesting beaches by erecting oceanfront skyscrapers, hotels, and subdivisions. We’ve illuminated coastlines with disorienting streetlights. When turtles manage to find sand in which to lay eggs, bright lights often send them wandering. Some get hit by cars. Pollution, from oily toxics to plastics, spills into coastal waters. Straws and plastic forks get sucked up turtles’ noses. Hungry leatherbacks mistake plastic bags for jellyfish.New research suggests that nine million hawksbills were slaughtered in the past 150 years, mostly for their fiery red and gold carapaces, which were fashioned into hair clips, eyeglasses, jewelry boxes, and furniture.The Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species (CITES) began banning the sale of turtle goods in the 1970s, but that hasn’t always worked. In 2012, researchers found thousands of hawksbill pieces for sale in Japan and China. Solid numbers are unavailable, but scientists estimate that only 60,000 to 80,000 nesting female hawksbills remain worldwide.Meanwhile some countries still allow subsistence hunts for turtle meat. But even in countries where that practice has been outlawed, bans are meaningless without enforcement, buy-in from local residents, and alternatives for food or income. In Mozambique and Madagascar alone, for example, tens of thousands—perhaps hundreds of thousands—of both young and adult green turtles are illegally killed each year by hunters.There has been some promise in places where residents have bought in to the idea of turtle conservation. One morning in Costa Rica I sit in a delivery truck as the ocean flickers through the royal palms. Our payload: 80 large bags filled with 96,000 turtle eggs. A few miles down the road, we back up to an open shed. Men unload this delicate cargo onto a sorting table, where women begin placing the eggs in smaller bags. Soon they’ll be repackaged and sold to restaurants and bars as far away as the capital, San José. Here it’s all perfectly legal—and may even help turtles.Every month this beach in Ostional, on Costa Rica’s upper Pacific Coast peninsula, is the site of one of the world’s largest mass-nesting events. Known as an arribada, it typically begins in the dark, as it did this morning. Female olive ridleys by the thousands congregate offshore, their forms silhouetted by the starry sky. Then, following some mysterious cue, they start crashing ashore. They come in waves, bumping and pushing past one another, oblivious to the threats around them: egg-scavenging vultures, wild dogs, hungry raccoons. Then they start digging, uncovering and crushing each other’s eggs, filling the new holes with future offspring before lumbering back to sea.The humans arrive at dawn. Barefoot men perform an odd step dance, bouncing gingerly heel to toe, feeling for loose earth with their feet. Finding some, they squat and dig until they reach eggs. Then teenagers and women begin filling bags.Ostional didn’t really become much of a community until sometime after World War II. But by the 1970s, settlers had come to rely on turtles. Soil nearby wasn’t great for farming, and there were few jobs, so residents plucked turtle eggs to feed their pigs. “Turtles were no more special to us than our chickens,” Maria Ruiz Avilés says during a break from labeling egg bags.Costa Rica began trying to prohibit egg harvests in the 1970s, but enforcement was lax. Researchers eventually recommended an arrangement: a regulated, legal, domestic trade. So many turtles show up during an arribada that they dig far more nests than the beach can accommodate. Even without poaching, up to half of the eggs on the beach were being destroyed, mostly by other turtles. Costa Rica’s national government allows the few hundred residents of Ostional to legally collect a portion of the eggs.Today Ostional’s egg harvest is viewed by many as a success. Residents take a small number of eggs, and some biologists think ridding the beach of the excess keeps microbes from killing more. Sales pay for beach patrols and enforcement to keep poachers out. Paperwork follows every sale, so buyers know the eggs are legal. Invested residents drive off predators to help remaining hatchlings get to the sea. “We do a good job,” Ruiz Avilés says.That doesn’t mean this model should be exported. Demand for eggs here is a fraction of what it is in, say, Mexico. And arribadas here offer an embarrassment of riches, because culling eggs may help more baby turtles survive. “In my opinion, Ostional should never ever be taken as an example for conservation anywhere else—ever,” says Costa Rican Roldán Valverde, a professor at Southeastern Louisiana University. While some experts suggest this legal harvest prevents far more eggs from being taken illegally, others fear that legitimizing any of this trade perpetuates the black market. Unfortunately, we’re stuck making decisions with imperfect information.In fact, it's often unclear how many sea turtles of each species remain—or how many is enough to ensure their survival. New research suggests that some population counts based on nesting beaches may be far too generous. But nest counts can also underestimate turtle numbers. “We need to understand a lot more about what’s happening in the water, where sea turtles spend 99 percent of their lives,” says Nicolas Pilcher, a sea turtle biologist who does fieldwork for governments and nonprofits.Pilcher is piloting a boat across shallow seagrass beds about 50 miles west of Abu Dhabi. He’s conducting a turtle rodeo, chasing a green turtle as it zigs and zags just below the water’s surface. Near the bow Marina Antonopoulou, with Emirates Nature-World Wildlife Fund, perches on the gunwale. When Pilcher shouts the signal, she launches onto the carapace, trying to wrestle the turtle to the surface and into the boat. But it wriggles free. Antonopoulou stands in the water, frustrated but amused. Pilcher pushes on.Antonopoulou and a team of scientists, including some from the Abu Dhabi government, are cruising the U.A.E.’s Marawah Marine Biosphere Reserve to gauge where these speedsters are headed. Near Pilcher’s feet a half dozen green turtles lounge. A quick surgical procedure will tell him whether these animals are male or female and ready to mate and nest. The team will attach tracking devices to some, then release them all. “We’re trying to link where these turtles live, which is here, with where they lay their eggs,” Pilcher says. That’s key to saving turtles.But turtles often feed in waters controlled by one government and nest on beaches controlled by another. This is especially true in the Middle East, where U.A.E. turtles may lay eggs in Oman, Saudi Arabia, Kuwait, Iran, or even Pakistan. Conservationists and the Abu Dhabi government can’t negotiate with neighboring countries for more protection without knowing which turtles go where. That matters, of course, because development in the Middle East is booming, and “nesting habitat for turtles is continually shrinking,” Pilcher says.Sea turtle conservation has made great strides in recent decades in many places around the globe. In Florida and Hawaii, coastal resorts and hotels are reducing beachfront lighting. Use of devices that let unsuspecting turtles escape fishing nets helped save Kemp’s ridleys in Mexico and loggerheads in the Atlantic and is being tried in other areas. We’ve closed fisheries and changed commercial fishing hooks to prevent accidental snagging. A few fishing fleets employ observers who document turtle interactions.Still, even as we make progress, complex new challenges are emerging. The sex of turtles is determined by the temperature of the sand where eggs gestate. Warmer sands produce more females, so as climate change drives sand temperatures higher across the tropics, more turtles are being born female.On a warm evening in a San Diego, California, bay, I watch a crew of scientists hold an adult green turtle while Camryn Allen quickly draws a vial of blood. For several years Allen, with the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, has used hormones such as testosterone to track the sex of sea turtles. Here the ratio of females to males has increased slightly, but her recent work in Australia truly alarmed her.Raine Island, a 52-acre half-moon of sand on the edge of the Great Barrier Reef, is the biggest nesting island on Earth for green sea turtles. More than 90 percent of the northern Great Barrier Reef’s green turtles deposit eggs here and on nearby Moulter Cay. But Allen and her colleagues discovered that as temperatures have risen, female green turtles born on Raine have come to outnumber males 116 to one.“Seeing those results scared the crap out of me,” Allen says.It’s not the only threat climate change poses. As hurricanes become more powerful, they’re wiping out more turtle nests. Rising seas also are flooding nest sites and drowning eggs.And yet for all that, there are hopeful signs. Turtles didn’t survive 100 million years without developing strategies to weather hard times. They can slow their metabolism and go months without eating. Some females have skipped nesting seasons for years, only to show up again a decade later. New research suggests males may mate with many females when populations are stretched thin. And sea turtles may switch nesting beaches in times of stress.Allen’s initial fear has tapered off as she’s seen turtles’ versatility. “We may lose some smaller populations, but sea turtles are never going to go away completely,” she says. “I think turtles, out of all the other species, might actually have a pretty good shot.” They just can’t do it by themselves.",
"Visitors peer over Dubai from an observation deck at the Burj Khalifa, the world’s tallest skyscraper at 2,717 feet (828 meters). Dubai aims for superlatives: It's now racing to become one of the planet’s most sustainable cities. The emirate will showcase its efforts as host of Expo 2020, also known as the world’s fair, a six-month exhibition with sustainability as one of its themes.To plunge headlong into the audacity of Dubai—the sprawling efflorescence of concrete, glass, and steel that has sprung up over the past three decades on the scorched sands of Arabia—you could start by going skiing. Smack in the middle of the flat city, the slope looks like a silver spaceship impaled in the ground floor of the Mall of the Emirates. Inside, you can window-shop at Prada, Dior, and Alexander McQueen before pushing through the glass doors of Ski Dubai. Passing a mural of the Alps, you zip up your parka, pull on your gloves. You begin to marvel then at what air-conditioning can do, when pushed to its limits.The souvenir T-shirt I bought bears a cartoon of a Celsius thermometer. “I went from +50 to -8,” it said. It didn’t feel quite as cold as minus eight (14°F) on the slope, but the temperature outside can get close to 50 (122°F) in summer. The humidity is stifling then, because of the proximity of the sea. Yet it rarely rains; Dubai gets less than four inches a year. There are no permanent rivers. There is next to no soil suitable for growing crops.What kind of human settlement makes sense in such a place? For centuries Dubai was a fishing village and trading port, small and poor. Then oil and a wild real estate boom transformed it into a city that sports the world’s tallest building, one of its densest collections of skyscrapers, and its third busiest airport. “From the point of view of sustainability you probably wouldn’t have done it here,” says Janus Rostock, a prominent architect transplanted from Copenhagen.Ski Dubai is the Middle East’s only indoor ski park, and often viewed as an emblem of the city's resource footprint. Emiratis typically learn the sport on one its five runs, which vary in difficulty, before heading to alpine resorts abroad. An even larger slope will open in 2020.And yet a sustainable city is precisely what Dubai’s government says it aims to create.Sustainable? Dubai? When camels fly, you might say. The boom years made the city a poster child for the excess that results when cheap energy meets environmental indifference. Indoor skiing is just a symbol: Dubai burns far more fossil fuel to air-condition its towers of glass. To keep the taps running in all those buildings, it essentially boils hundreds of Olympic pools worth of seawater every day. And to create more beachfront for more luxury hotels and villas, it buried coral reefs under immense artificial islands.In 2006 the World Wildlife Fund (WWF) declared the United Arab Emirates the country with the largest ecological footprint, per capita, largely because of its carbon emissions. The shoe certainly fit Dubai, the most conspicuous consumer among the seven emirates. In the decade since, the city’s population has doubled, to more than 2.8 million. The number of cars on its roads has more than doubled. A surprising number are Bentleys, Lamborghinis, and other gorgeous gas hogs.And yet, something else has happened since 2006: Dubai has started to change.Even CSAs have made inroads in the desert city, which imports 80 percent of its food. Ripe Market hosts a weekly stand at Zabeel Park to serve the rising tide of consumers seeking organic produce from local farms. Food banks have made inroads too, providing an outlet for tackling Dubai's leftovers: About 38 percent of the food prepared each day is wasted, which jumps to 60 percent during Ramadan.On one of Zabeel's 117 acres, yoga classes draw the city’s expats—90 percent of its population. Parks come at a premium, but Dubai is expanding its green space. The 350-acre DubaiLand, under way, features 55 playgrounds and paths for walking, running, and cycling.Gleaming driverless metro trains now run the length of the linear city, alongside Sheikh Zayed Road, carrying about as many people, and often faster, as the cars on that clogged 12-lane artery. On Dubai’s southern outskirts, a new housing development has opened—called Sustainable City—that recycles its water and waste and produces more energy than it consumes. Further out in the desert, Dubai is building a giant solar power plant that will soon be producing some of the cheapest and cleanest electricity on Earth.“The leadership has recognized that the growth of the economy is not sustainable without taking action on emissions,” says Tanzeed Alam, climate director for the Emirates Wildlife Society, WWF’s local partner.In Dubai, the “leadership” is His Highness Sheikh Mohammed bin Rashid Al Maktoum, the 67-year-old hereditary emir, aka the Ruler. Sheikh Mohammed took over in 2006. He has decreed that his city will get 75 percent of its energy from clean sources by 2050. He wants it to have the smallest carbon footprint in the world. Many people I met on a recent visit to Dubai, including Rostock and Alam, believe the city might actually pull that off.And if it can happen here, they say, it can happen anywhere.Echoes of Old Dubai linger around the Creek, the harbor where the city was born. The atmospheric area houses the offices of the emirate’s ruling sheikh and dozens of foreign consulates. Dhows still ply its waters for tourism and trade.Two places on Dubai’s 40-mile-long coast frame its astonishing trajectory.The first is Jebel Ali, home to a busy man-made port as well as an enormous industrial plant belonging to Dubai Electric and Water Authority (DEWA). It produces most of the city’s electricity and drinking water in the same process: Natural gas, mainly from Abu Dhabi and Qatar, is burned to generate electricity, and the leftover heat is used to distill seawater and remove the salt. As Dubai has grown, the plant has kept adding new modules, and it’s now a mile-long line of candy-striped smokestacks and evaporator tanks. It can produce nearly 10 gigawatts of electricity and half a billion gallons of desalinated water a day.The second place is in what’s left of Old Dubai, on what’s called the Creek— actually a saltwater inlet. One of the few natural harbors on this coast, the Creek is why Dubai exists at all. Beat-up wooden dhows from another century still line up to be loaded with refrigerators and air-conditioners from South Korea, which they will deliver across the Gulf to Iran. Near the mouth of the Creek is the house where Sheikh Mohammed spent his childhood.The house belonged to his grandfather, who was then the Ruler. (The Al Maktoums have ruled Dubai since 1833.) Though large, it was hardly a palace. It had neither running water nor electricity. Dubai didn’t get electricity, or its first paved road, until 1961. Running water arrived a few years later. Mohammed grew up by lamplight, in a place where water was delivered by donkey cart, in barrels filled at one of the village’s wells.In a single generation, Dubai exploded from humble port to metropolis. Electricity and paved roads arrived in 1961. Oil funded expansion in the 1970s. The building boom—including artificial islands—accelerated in the 2000s. The pace has slowed since the 2008 financial crisis, but Dubai continues to rise up and out.His father, Rashid, had grown up in the same house. In the 1930s he saw people in Dubai starve; the global depression and the invention of artificial pearls had destroyed the market for pearl diving, which was then Dubai’s main enterprise. It was Rashid who began to modernize—and diversify—Dubai, after he took over as ruler in 1958, and especially after the proceeds of oil began to materialize in the late 1960s. He built roads, schools, an airport, and in 1979, a 39-story World Trade Centre, at the time the tallest building in the Middle East.“It was built in the middle of nowhere, on the edge of the city,” says Neil Walmsley, a British engineer who has been in Dubai since 2005 and is director of urban planning for Arup, a consulting firm. “It was a vote of confidence. The city responded by growing towards it”—and then well past it. Dubai was not a center of world trade when Rashid built his centre, but it is now. When he dug a giant new port at Jebel Ali, having already dredged the Creek, even his sons were baffled by his optimism. Now that port is one of the world’s busiest.The pearl business hadn’t lasted forever, and Rashid knew he couldn’t count on the oil. Dubai had never had more than a small fraction of what Abu Dhabi had. There’s a saying attributed to Rashid: His father and grandfather rode camels, while he himself drove a Mercedes, and his son, a Land Rover. His grandson would drive a Land Rover too—but his great grandson might ride a camel again.Unless, that is, the Al Maktoums played their cards right. In Dubai, that’s the first meaning of “sustainability”: finding a way to wring a good living from a hard place, ideally without having to rely on camels again. Worrying about your footprint comes later.Tourism fuels Dubai’s economy, and many of its 15 million annual visitors flock to the Burj Khalifa for a bird’s-eye view, here from the 125th floor. The building is home to an Armani-designed hotel, 900 apartments, office space, restaurants—and to more energy-efficient systems. Solar panels heat its water supply; condensate from air-conditioning is reclaimed to cool potable water and to keep the tower’s landscaping green—about 15 million gallons a year are collected.The Burj Al Arab, or Tower of the Arabs, was one of the first of many Dubai landmarks that Sheikh Mohammed commissioned, even before he was Ruler, in the 1990s. It’s a luxury hotel built on an artificial island. As Jim Krane tells the story in Dubai: The Story of the World’s Fastest City, the hotel could have been built on the mainland, but Mohammed and the architect decided it would make a more memorable addition to the skyline if it stood just offshore. And they were right: Shaped like a three-cornered sail rising off the sea, it’s now an icon.Arab merchants pioneered the use of the three-cornered lateen sail more than a millennium ago. As Sheikh Mohammed tells that story in his own book, My Vision, the new sail helped Arab dhows outdistance their square-sailed competitors. It symbolizes his aspiration for Dubai: to be the first, the best, the smartest, the fastest—to win the race against its global competitors, not just for its own sake but for the whole Arab world. He wants to make Arabs pioneers again, the way they were in the Middle Ages.Dubai has no income tax or sales tax, and that has long made it attractive to foreigners. But in the early 2000s, it began for the first time to allow them to own property. Waves of cash flooded into Dubai real estate from Russia, from Iran, from the Arab world—from investors anywhere who were looking for a safe haven. Combined with a law that grants each Emirati citizen a plot for his own villa, it led to a surge in development. Four large developers, three of them controlled by the state, were granted great plots of land. Workers streamed in from South Asia to build new skyscrapers for the affluent. They themselves lived in camps that were often squalid, in conditions that some said resembled indentured servitude. (Read an in-depth report on Dubai’s guest workers.)Dubai’s dozen golf courses rely on precious water resources. To keep fairways—and its practices—green, the Dubai Creek Golf & Yacht Club, which features an island tee box, began irrigating with treated sewage effluent in 2010.About 30 miles outside Dubai, man-made Al Qudra Lake draws recreational riders, picnicking families, and migratory birds—more than 175 species have been recorded. But popularity has left a trace: Trash is routinely tossed in the lake. The municipality has responded with more bins and an anti-litter campaign.The city exploded down the coast. The Dubai Marina, a dense forest of more than a hundred 40-story apartment buildings, sprung up out of nothing, to be inhabited only by expats, some of them for only part of the year. The city also pushed inland into the desert, with new villa developments for Emiratis and foreigners.“When you look at how Dubai has been growing, it’s just been this obsession with building outward into the desert,” says Yasser Elsheshtawy, an Egyptian architect who has taught at the university in Al Ain for 20 years. “There were no limitations. Energy was cheap. You had cars. So why not?”The more compelling question is why Dubai would ever change. What could prompt a Ruler with a deep drive for economic growth—who had ordered up not only a sail-shaped tower but also a skyscraper as tall as the Sears Tower with the Eiffel on top, and not only three palm-shaped artificial peninsulas jutting miles into the sea but also an archipelago of 300 islands shaped like countries and arranged in a map of the world—to develop an interest in photovoltaic panels, low-flow faucets, and walkable neighborhoods?Mediterranean-themed Mercato Mall competes with three megamalls, and more are planned. But even Dubai may have reached its limit: A new report suggests the once booming retail market may be approaching saturation.In 2008 and 2009, with the global economy on the edge of collapse, tourism plummeted in Dubai. Real estate prices fell 50 percent, oil even more. Dubai had to be bailed out of debt by Abu Dhabi. But it also got a chance to take stock.“The economic crisis was the best thing that happened to us—a blessing in disguise,” says Habiba al Marashi, founder of the Emirates Environmental Group, an organization that attempts, through education and recycling, to promote environmental responsibility. ““It slowed down the crazy pace of construction.”As the city drew its breath, three factors combined to pave the way for a new focus on sustainability, says Dubai-based energy consultant Robin Mills. The first was Masdar City, a project launched in neighboring Abu Dhabi in 2006. Billed as the world’s first zero-carbon city and designed by the firm of star British architect Norman Foster, it was intended to be car free—driverless pods would ferry residents around—and to produce all its electricity with solar power.Though the financial crisis put a crimp in Masdar City’s ambitions too, it's now expanding around its compact urban core, with a new apartment complex nearing completion and plans for 5,000 homes. And the international publicity the project received from the start helped break the resistance to green ideas throughout the UAE. When Masdar began, “it was really tough,” recalls CEO Mohamed Jameel Al Ramahi. “People didn’t want to talk about it. They said, ‘It’s too expensive! Who likes it? What’s the need?’”On the outskirts of Abu Dhabi, about 75 miles south of Dubai, "low-carbon" Masdar City is growing, with residential developments being added to its active research center. It's also home to the International Renewable Energy Agency. The city draws on elements of traditional Arab architecture—such as a 148-foot wind tower that pushes a cooling breeze through narrow, shaded streets—but its goal is to create a more sustainable model of urban life in the region. "We're not going to be Ye Olde Arabian Town," says planning director Anthony Mallows. "We're modern. We're the future."And yet Dubai, says Mills, was starting to feel a strong need to reduce its dependence on imported natural gas. Just before the financial crisis, when the city was at the peak of its growth, oil and gas prices were soaring. Mills, who had once been a geologist for Shell, was working on energy at Dubai Holding, a major developer in which Sheikh Mohammed holds a majority stake. “One of the issues was how Dubai was going to source the energy to power all these enormous real estate developments,” Mills says.Meanwhile a new alternative—the third factor—was emerging. Solar power was booming in places like Germany and Spain, and prices were falling fast. In 2012 Mills wrote a report saying that solar power had become cost-competitive in the Middle East, at 12 U.S. cents per kilowatt-hour. By 2015 DEWA signed a contract for 200 megawatts worth of solar panels that would deliver power at 5.6 cents per kilowatt-hour—a world record-low. At that price, it was making a profit on solar.“For the utility, that was a eureka moment,” says Saeed al Abbar, head of the Emirates Green Building Council. It was founded in 2006, when the boom was at its height.At the Mohammed bin Rashid Al Maktoum Solar Park, in the desert south of Dubai, it usually rains only two days a year. Millions of thin-film solar panels spread over nearly two square miles produce 200 megawatts of electricity. The next 800 megawatts, to be installed by 2020, will deliver electricity for 2.99 U.S. cents a kilowatt-hour—a world record.By the time I visit the Mohammed bin Rashid Al Maktoum Solar Park at the beginning of February, DEWA has shattered that record: Masdar’s parent company—the largest exporter of renewable energy in the Middle East—has agreed to furnish the next 800 megawatts of power at 2.99 cents a kilowatt-hour. “Solar is clearly by far the cheapest form of electricity,” Mills says.The site, about 30 miles southeast of the city, was chosen for its insolation, a DEWA engineer says. We climb out of the shade of a transformer building onto its roof to gaze out over the field of solar panels, slanted toward the sun. They already cover well over a square mile and produce 200 megawatts, two percent of DEWA’s total generating capacity, but there’s room for a lot more—a thousand megawatts will be here by 2020, 5,000 megawatts by 2030, DEWA says. And unlike some utilities in the United States, which see solar power as unwelcome competition, it’s also actively encouraging citizens to put solar panels on roofs.“The solar potential is so great here,” Mills says. “Millions of acres of empty desert, and plenty of roof space. Electricity generation—for me it’s almost ‘problem solved.’”DEWA, however, is afraid to count on any one solution, however limitless. So by 2030 it plans to get seven percent of its electricity from four nuclear power plants that Abu Dhabi is building; the first is expected to switch on this year. More troubling, DEWA is constructing a plant that will burn coal. It’ll have to be imported, probably from Australia or Indonesia. The electricity will cost 40 percent more than solar power. It makes neither environmental nor economic sense—other than as a hedge against Dubai’s nightmare, an energy shortage that might limit the growth of the city.The compact streets of the Sustainable City (center) contrast with the adjacent neighborhood’s larger lanes, lots, and homes. The 114-acre development—inspired by Davis, California’s West Village, a net-zero energy community—is grouped into five clusters holding 500 villas, each outfitted with solar panels. About half are now occupied.Building orientation was a critical design choice at the Sustainable City, where homes face north and shade each other. By limiting direct sun exposure, air-conditioning units are 40 percent smaller.After the profligate boom years, Dubai is also attempting to restrain demand for electricity and water. Prices used to be heavily subsidized, but DEWA raised them substantially, and introduced a progressive scale that rises with consumption. Dubai residents now pay roughly as much for electricity as I pay in Washington, D.C., and about 50 percent more for water—unless they happen to belong to the 10 percent of the population who are citizens of the UAE. Citizens pay less.New buildings in Dubai aren’t built as if energy and water are limitless, says Al Abbar. Old buildings from before the boom weren’t either: Sheikh Mohammed’s boyhood home featured thick walls, small windows, and wind towers that caught the breeze and funneled it into the shaded courtyard where he played ball. Even the World Trade Centre had deep-set windows and white walls to reflect the heat. But if you stand on its 31st floor today, in the offices of Sheikh Mohammed’s educational foundation, you look out over a city of glass towers.“There is an expectation from the tenants—they want to see floor-to-ceiling glass,” Al Abbar says. Developers can’t necessarily fight their clients’ desire for spectacular views, he adds; an unoccupied building is an unsustainable one.Visitors find a lost world at the Green Planet, a biodome that shelters rain forest habitat and more than 3,000 species of plants and animals, including sloths, snakes, and exotic birds. Walkways traverse four levels. The structure itself is green, one of the city’s rising number of LEED-certified buildings.Since the economic crisis, Dubai has tightened its green building regulations, as part of a strategy to reduce energy demand by 30 percent. New buildings must have solar water heaters, as well as operational systems that lower lights and thermostats when people are absent. To reach the city’s goal of retrofitting 30,000 older buildings, regulations allow third-party contractors to renovate buildings and take their profits from a portion of the energy savings. “What I’ve seen is a huge change,” Al Abbar says.The city government is not just imposing rules on building owners, says the municipality’s director general, Hussain Nasser Lootah, an engineer by training. It’s also collaborating with manufacturers on rolling out efficient products for the Dubai market. Philips is making a one-watt LED bulb that will soon be in buildings across the city, Lootah says. And a new Scandinavian low-flow faucet will be installed in all the local mosques this year, inshallah. Observant Muslims practice ritual ablutions before prayer five times a day, washing face, hands, and feet. “They use too much water!” Lootah says. The new faucet delivers 40 percent of the water with 100 percent of the noise, reassuring the faithful that they’re being adequately cleansed.Faris Saeed, developer of the Sustainable City, which stands (for now) on the edge of the sprawling and less sustainable one, traces the origin of his own project to the financial crisis. A Jordanian engineer who has lived in the UAE since 1995, Saeed runs Diamond Developers. At the height of the boom, he built six towers containing 1,300 apartments in the Dubai Marina. Those days are gone now. “We took a decision as a company that we could never go back to business as usual,” he says.More than two million people depend on the Dubai Electricity and Water Authority plant at Jebel Ali, where natural gas is burned to produce electricity and to desalinate seawater for drinking. Much of the gas is imported. Solar energy could increase Dubai’s security—and its sustainability.Some desalination at Jebel Ali is done by reverse osmosis: Pumps drive seawater through salt-capturing membranes inside stacked white pipes. The process is cheaper and more efficient than using heat from burning gas, and it can be powered by solar electricity. DEWA plans to scale up on that effort.Saeed’s new development, which will eventually include a school, hotel, an “innovation center,” and a riding stable, currently consists of 500 villas on a compact 114-acre site. The L-shaped houses stand close together on narrow, verdant streets, facing north, such that they shade each other—sun falls onto the windowed facades only in the early morning and late afternoon.That simple design choice, Saeed says, allows the air-conditioning units to be 40 percent smaller. Extra insulation, reflective windows and paint, and LED lights further cut energy consumption to around half what would be expected for a 3,000 to 4,000 square foot villa in Dubai. “It’s a myth that sustainable has to be more expensive,” Saeed says.The Sustainable City produces more electricity than it consumes, thanks to solar panels that shade roof terraces and parking lots. Each roof also has a solar water heater. All waste is recycled—the organic stuff is composted and used in a series of dome-shaped greenhouses that occupy a “farm” at the center of the development. “We’re self-sufficient in herbs,” a public relations person says. For other food, residents can walk to the grocery store, just off a central plaza that will be lined with restaurants. On summer evenings they can sit and watch their children play in small squares cooled by wind towers, like the ones at Sheikh Mohammed’s boyhood home, but augmented by fans.For this sustainable idyll, Saeed says, residents will pay no more than they would at one of the other developments nearby. He’ll even throw in a $10,000 subsidy for an electric car, which leads to the one apparent flaw of Sustainable City: It’s a longish drive from any of the multiple centers of Dubai.At Jumeirah Beach, which faces the iconic Burj Al Arab, a solar-powered, 21-foot “Smart Palm” provides shade and much more—Wi-Fi, charging station, lamppost, bulletin board, security camera, emergency call button. Over a hundred will be installed at city beaches and parks. Wind-powered poles that will floodlight the sea—and inaugurate nighttime swimming—are coming next.On a wall in Lootah’s office, a framed series of aerial pictures shows how Dubai has evolved since 1935, when it was an impoverished fishing village huddled around the Creek. At the center is a visualization of the future: It shows a coast even more clogged with artificial islands and peninsulas than it is today. This city has no intention of slowing down. It lives off its expanding footprint: Nearly a quarter of the population works in construction.Less than a decade ago, tanker trucks were pulling up to modern apartment buildings to pick up sewage, some of which was dumped illegally in the desert. Now nearly all parts of the city—all but the industrial areas and the labor camps, Lootah says—are connected by pipes to two modern sewage treatment plants. A third plant is about to open, and Lootah expects to build several more to keep up with growth. Dubai sees its population doubling, to more than 5 million, by 2030.“When I was in the States,” Lootah says—in the late 1970s he studied in Pittsburgh, and after that proved too cold, Arizona—“people asked where you come from. ‘Emirates? Where is this? Where is Dubai?’ Now, you ask anybody: They say they love to come to Dubai!”Lootah credits the Ruler with putting the city on the map. A large portrait of Sheikh Mohammed hangs behind Lootah’s desk, as it does in most Dubai offices. A two-story-high portrait hangs on the façade of the municipality building, alongside that of the Emir of Abu Dhabi, who is president of the UAE. (Sheikh Mohammed is vice president.)Passengers savor a driver's-seat view on a fully automated (driverless) Dubai Metro train. A monorail, tram, hybrid trolley line, and buses round out the network in the city, where mass transit use is steadily growing. Dubai spurred others in the region—Doha (Qatar) and Riyadh (Saudi Arabia) now have metro lines under construction.All over Dubai, from Emiratis and expats alike, I heard testimonials to the decisive leadership of Sheikh Mohammed. “We don’t have a lot of formalities,” Lootah says. “Here projects take days to be done, elsewhere years.” It’s not just the lack of red tape that speeds things up—it’s the lack of democratic institutions. Without a free press, political parties, or free elections, there’s little chance of public opposition to projects endorsed by the Ruler.Planners of Washington, D.C.’s Metro system started sketching a Silver Line to Dulles Airport in the late 1960s; it’s still not finished. Dubai’s Red Line, of comparable length, was planned and built in less than a decade, and its first stretch opened in 2009, at the height of the financial crisis. Even sustainability mavens, aware of how much needs to change, find a lot to cheer in the can-do spirit that trickles down from the Ruler.“This country has developed so quickly,” says Tanzeed Alam of WWF. “It can change quickly too—because the leadership gets behind it.”Dubai’s glittering landmarks outpaced infrastructure. Until recently, tankers had to individually drain buildings and ferry sewage out of town, some of it dumped illegally in the desert. Now most of the city is connected by pipes to two modern treatment plants. More are in the works to keep up with population growth.“As long as they’re making decisions that are good and make sense,” the lack of democracy “is not that big an issue,” says Janus Rostock, chief architect in the Dubai office of Atkins, the firm that designed the Metro, the Burj Al Arab, and most recently, the Dubai Opera, which is shaped like a dhow and opened last year.Between 2011 and 2016, while the population of Dubai grew by 35 percent, water and electricity consumption grew a bit slower—in other words, per capita consumption is falling, a sign that city efforts are bearing fruit. Per capita carbon emissions have fallen dramatically since the UAE’s world-champion days, according to Dubai Carbon, a government think tank. They’re now comparable to those of the United States, at less than 18 tons per year. “Dubai is pursuing carbon-neutral growth,” says Ivano Iannelli, who heads Dubai Carbon. “The idea is not to increase emissions” as the population grows. But for the foreseeable future, total emissions will keep rising.Dubai residents may emit no more carbon than average Americans, but they emit nearly three times as much as the average residents of New York City. That’s in part because of Dubai’s legacy of heedless expansion—it’s a sprawling, car-centered city built to be taken in at 75 miles per hour, Rostock says.Aviation has soared with the city’s growth, accounting for a third of its GDP and employing 30 percent of its workers. More than 83 million passengers transited through Dubai International Airport in 2016, making it the third busiest, behind Atlanta and Beijing. A second airport—optimistically called World Central— is being expanded to meet forecasts and cement its status as a superhub.He and others are trying to change that. Rostock has led an effort to transform the area around the Burj Khalifa (“a fortress,” he says) and the new opera into a district of ground-floor shops and restaurants that invites people to stroll. And near the Mall of the Emirates, Sheikh Mohammed’s own Dubai Holding has master-planned a mile-long development, called Jumeirah Central, where hundreds of apartment and office buildings are to be laid out on small, walkable blocks. They’ll be linked by trams and gondolas to the Mall and its Metro stop.Hereditary rulers, it’s sometimes said, can take a longer view than democratically elected ones. Habiba al Marashi tells me about another saying attributed to Sheik Rashid: Humans need to live in harmony with nature, she says, paraphrasing the father of modern Dubai, “so we have the blessings of our grandchildren and avoid being cursed by future generations.”But Rashid also didn’t want his descendants to have to ride camels again, and if Dubai succeeds in its current shift toward sustainability, it will be for reasons of hard-headed economics. Dubai is pivoting now, says Rostock, because it has to—because it’s competing with other global cities for business and people, and sustainability is in.“What we have is a willingness and a push to change Dubai and how it’s perceived by the world,” Rostock says. “Dubai is unique in its dependence on the surrounding world. Dubai doesn’t have the oil. It has to be attractive to two billion people within a four-hour flight.”Sheikh Zayed Road, Dubai’s main artery, glows at dusk. The city designed for cars is now focused on creating smaller, walkable blocks as well as districts of ground-floor shops and restaurants that invite strolling, including the area around the Burj Khalifa, where this image was taken.On my last evening in Dubai, I finally went skiing. It’s a peculiar experience: You’re in a giant fishbowl, being watched through tall windows by people in the mall. But it’s real skiing, with real snow. As my legs fell into the familiar rhythm, I felt the old familiar pleasure. In a former life, I had spent many winter holidays in the French Alps, and this reminded me of the bunny slopes where my children had learned to ski. To be sure, the only Alps here were painted ones—but there were plenty of real and happy children, playing in the snow and cutting in front of me in the lift line. They seemed blissfully unaware of the unsustainability of their activity, though I admit I didn’t ask.Once we’ve converted to solar energy, we won’t have to worry about carbon emissions from air conditioning, even on ski slopes. Dubai and the UAE could easily pioneer that transition. By the time the whole world makes it, however, it may get very hot along the Persian Gulf. In Dubai at the height of summer, people already go outside as little as possible. By 2100, according to one recent study, there may be days so hot and humid that going outside could kill you.Water may become a choke point even sooner. At the National Center of Meteorology & Seismology in Abu Dhabi, meteorologists monitor every cloud that passes over the UAE; if a cloud looks promising, the pilot of one of six planes on standby 24/7 is guided to the right spot to seed it with salt crystals. Researchers say they can tease a few extra millimeters of rain out the atmosphere each year, which helps a bit to recharge the country’s depleted and polluted aquifers.But those are drops in the bucket; Dubai will always depend on desalination for its drinking water. The problem is not so much the tremendous energy it takes—that will eventually come from the sun—but the hot brine that’s left over and discharged into the Gulf. A shallow, almost closed sea, the Gulf is already 20 percent saltier than the ocean, and it’s getting saltier: In addition to the hypersaline brine pouring into it, dams in Turkey and Iraq are diverting fresh water and climate change is increasing evaporation. In time the Gulf could become too salty to desalinate economically or to support much in the way of marine life. “We still feel we can cope,” says Lootah. With technology, “everything is possible.”Emiratis take in the new Dubai Canal—a two-mile-long waterway leading to the sea—the culmination of a plan first envisioned in 1959 by Sheikh Rashid, Dubai's modernizing ruler. The project increases the city’s waterfront space, which will be used for retail, parks, housing, marinas, and a ferry service.Should this city even be here? I put the question to Tanzeed Alam. We’re sitting in the Sustainable City—where the Emirates Wildlife Society is about to move into new offices “to walk the walk,” he says—but I’m asking about Dubai.“That’s the wrong question,” Alam says. “It’s more about accepting where we are today, and how do we make that better. It’s a question of the right to develop, and of human beings’ right for a better future. How do we make cities better?”At Ski Dubai, I don’t stop at the wooden chalet in the middle of the slope, where you can sip hot chocolate in front of an open fire. I’m in a hurry to get on my 14-hour flight back to Washington, where the traffic is among the worst in the U.S.; where the Metro system is on the edge of collapse; where, because of my apartment’s antique heating system, I must leave the windows open in winter to keep the temperature inside below 80 degrees; and where the new administration has promised to dismantle government efforts to address climate change.As I drive to the airport, a light, tentative rain begins to spatter the taxi’s windshield. I take it as a hopeful sign.This article is part of our Urban Expeditions series, an initiative made possible by a grant from United Technologies to the National Geographic Society.",
"The Endangered Species Act is credited with saving grizzly bears and more than 200 other animals from extinction.The Crow tribespeople call the grizzly bear their ancestor, the Elder Brother who protects their home, which is the land.They have grizzly bear songs, grizzly dances, grizzly names for their children, grizzly lullabies that women sing to infants, and grizzly spirits that guide warrior societies and guard tepees, transform into human beings, and beguile their daughters.So when the United States Fish and Wildlife Service said that grizzly populations in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem—encompassing portions of Wyoming, Montana, and Idaho—would be removed from the U.S. government’s endangered species list this year and opened for hunting, I traveled to Montana to meet the chairman of the Crow Nation, A. J. Not Afraid, who has lobbied to stop the delisting.We stood on a promontory in the Big Horn Mountains called Pretty Eagle Point, where Not Afraid showed me the grizzly habitat on the 2.3-million-acre reservation. In the distance there were snowbound peaks where grizzlies in summer eat army cutworm moths, and broad plateaus where the bears graze the grass and dig for grubs.There were forests of fir and pine, watersheds feeding the streams that over millions of years carved the dark chasms of Big Horn Canyon and Black Canyon, where the bears like to amble in the rushing flow looking for fish.A. J. Not Afraid, chairman of the Crow Nation in Montana, is fighting to keep grizzlies—which are sacred to Native Americans—protected under the Endangered Species Act.Not Afraid, 43, had testified before Congress a few weeks before my April visit. He said he believed that delisting the grizzly would be a calamity for the animal.He said that grizzly populations in the region did not appear to have recovered since being protected 42 years ago, as the Fish and Wildlife Service claimed, that Crows hardly ever see them anymore on the reservation, and that the trophy hunting unleashed with delisting would be an affront to tribes that hold the creature sacred.“Fall of 2013 was the last time I saw a grizzly,” he said. He was hunting elk. There was a buffalo carcass on a slope where the bear had been feeding. The bear passed before him at a lope, 50 yards away. He recalled the vision sadly. “Because of the decrease in grizzlies, we encounter them only every few years now.”I told him that I had listened recently to the last recorded words of one of the tribe’s greatest chiefs, Joe Medicine Crow, who spoke of the grizzly’s future. “It’s not grizzly bears that are problematic; it’s man,” said Medicine Crow, who died in 2016 at the age of 102. “We have to control man himself and keep grizzly bears alive. The government needs to keep protecting them.”“Joe Medicine Crow hit it right on the head,” Not Afraid said.The grizzly bear, federally protected since 1975, is alive in the lower 48 states only because of the Endangered Species Act (ESA), one of the most powerful environmental statutes in the U.S. and one of the world’s strongest species protection laws. (Read more: Endangered species, explained.)It was the first law of its kind to argue, in the words of the man who wrote it, Representative John Dingell, a Michigan Democrat, “that only natural extinction is part of natural order.”The Fish and Wildlife Service, which manages the endangered species list, says that grizzlies in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem have rebounded from 136 in 1975 to roughly 700 today. Before Europeans settled America, an estimated 100,000 or more of the bears ranged across the West, from present-day California to Kansas, from the Dakotas to northern Mexico.But today, with both the House and the Senate in the hands of a Republican leadership that has declared war against environmental regulations, and with a president who has expressed similar views, the ESA itself may be as threatened as the grizzly.From the moment Congress approved it, in 1973, the law has been attacked by those who believe it overly burdens the American economy and the ability of businesses and industries to prosper.Idaho Republican Representative Raul Labrador, a member of the ultraconservative Freedom Caucus, said in a recent speech that the ESA “severely hinders our nation’s ability to provide necessary public services and discourages investment in critical projects needed to boost our economy.”Since 1973 six federal circuit courts have considered and rejected challenges to the ESA's constitutionality, leaving the law intact. In Congress there have been scores of attempts to weaken it by little cuts.ESA advocates, including conservation groups and most elected Democrats, warn that Republicans are now gearing up for an unprecedented assault. “The Republicans are pushing bills to divert protection funding, prioritize corporate land development, and sidestep science,” says Representative Raul Grijalva, a Democrat from Arizona. “These are blatant efforts to place corporate interests over species survival.”Bald eagleDuring the past five months Republicans have introduced 25 proposals to skirt, hamper, defang, or undermine endangered species protections. These include bills to amend the ESA to abandon its requirement to use “best available science” in listing decisions and to hand oversight of some of the law’s key management and decision-making provisions to state governments historically hostile to the act.Other bills aim to free oil and gas development on federal public lands from ESA considerations, allow water diversion projects in California without ESA review, waive ESA rules in the logging of national forests in the Pacific Northwest, ignore ESA procedures in the delisting of now protected wolves in the Great Lakes states, and add layers of bureaucracy to the Fish and Wildlife Service.For many species, wildlife biologists say, the ESA has been remarkably successful in doing what Dingell designed it to do. Because of the ESA we still have in the wild not only the grizzly bear but also the bald eagle, the California condor, the Columbian white-tailed deer, the Florida panther, the peregrine falcon, the North Atlantic right whale, the American alligator, the wood stork, the spotted owl, and the gray wolf, among many others.Scientists have concluded that 227 species would have gone extinct between 1973 and 2005 without the ESA’s protections. Its broad mandate that vast stretches of habitat require protection in order to preserve the creatures living in them has produced cascading benefits for ecosystems in the Pacific Northwest, the Everglades, the Chesapeake Bay, Shenandoah National Park, and along the New England coast.Since 1973 more than 1,600 animal and plant species have been declared endangered or threatened, and the great majority are headed toward recovery because of the ESA, researchers say. (See a little-known endangered species in each U.S. state.)Republicans say the ESA needs updating to meet the demands of 21st-century America. That push is led by the House Natural Resources Committee, chaired by Rob Bishop, a Utah Republican who exercises broad purview over wildlife legislation. Bishop declined to be interviewed for this article. But at a House hearing last December, he spoke candidly of his intentions. “I would be happy to invalidate the Endangered Species Act,” he said.Recently I called up John Dingell to ask him about the outlook for the law he authored. “With this Congress we should be in terror,” he said.This little fish, the snail darter, was at the center of a 1976 Supreme Court case finding that species listed as endangered should be afforded the highest protections.Dingell served in Congress for 59 years before retiring in 2015, and at age 90 he is known as the lion of endangered species protection. Don Barry, a conservation lawyer who worked for the Fish and Wildlife Service as chief counsel during the 1970s, told me, “Without John Dingell, we wouldn’t have the ESA.”Dingell was a ranger for the National Park Service before he became a lawmaker. He worked at Rocky Mountain National Park and Rainier National Park. He trapped errant bears, fixed outhouses, conducted search and rescue in the backcountry. His first love was hunting, fishing, camping.After he went to Congress—he was elected in 1955—Dingell built a log cabin on a hundred acres near the Shenandoah Valley, a few hours southwest from the Capitol. “The bears’d run right up and down the driveway. That was heaven.”“I wrote much of the Endangered Species Act in my head while I was driving to and from work,” Dingell said. “If I wasn’t going to be in the wilderness, I was going to use my time out of it to write legislation to protect it.”The ESA passed the House and Senate by margins that in the current partisan climate would be astonishing: 92 to zero in the Senate, 390 to 12 in the House. President Richard Nixon, a Republican, signed the law without hesitation.I asked Dingell if he could get the ESA passed today.Bog turtle“I don’t think I could pass the Lord’s Prayer in that nuthouse,” he told me, referring to Congress. “The ESA was written so that scientific principles would be used to protect species. Science would make the decisions, science would decide the case. Today we have a bunch of antiscience ignoramuses and vicious lying people in Congress. And we’re going to pay a hellacious price.”Last March the House Subcommittee on Oversight and Investigations, part of the House Natural Resources Committee, held a hearing on what were described as the ESA’s “impediments to economic and infrastructure development.” Representative Labrador chaired the hearing, and opened it by calling the ESA “dysfunctional.” (Labrador’s office did not respond to requests for comment.)The subcommittee heard testimony from the general manager of the Idaho-based Hecla Mining Company, Douglas Stiles, who claimed that the ESA had held up one of Hecla’s mining projects for close to 30 years. Stiles said the act’s requirements were “complicated, expensive, and time-consuming” and an obstacle to “bringing much needed economic development to rural America.”Labrador noted that the project in question, the Rock Creek silver and copper mine, in Sanders County, Montana, “would have generated many local jobs and benefits to rural Montana” but was “held up” by the Fish and Wildlife Service’s “shifting requirements.”Noah Greenwald, the endangered species director at the Center for Biological Diversity, a nonprofit advocate for species survival, told me that the Rock Creek project “has not been stalled by the Fish and Wildlife Service’s shifting requirements but rather by massive local opposition and questions by the Forest Service about potential impacts on water quality, endangered species, and wilderness.”Last among the witnesses was Ya-Wei Li, an endangered species attorney at Defenders of Wildlife who has investigated allegations that the ESA is bad for local economies.I called up Li a week after the hearing. “We hear all these claims about killing jobs, driving down the economy, because [the ESA] is supposedly being implemented like a blunt hammer,” Li told me. “But the evidence doesn’t show it.”The petroleum industry successfully sued to have the lesser prairie-chicken taken off the endangered species list last year. Conservationists are fighting to reverse that decision.In a study in the Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences, Li and colleague Jacob Malcolm examined the results of 88,290 ESA-mandated consultations from January 2008 through April 2015. They concluded that during the seven-year study period “no project was stopped or extensively altered” as a result of ESA-mandated consultations.One of the proposals to change the ESA, introduced in April 2017 by Senator Dean Heller, a Nevada Republican, would require any decision to protect a species to “be made only with the consent of the Governor of each state in which the endangered or threatened species is present.”This echoes a common refrain among those seeking to weaken the ESA: Endangered species protections would be more adroitly handled by state governments and state wildlife agencies.“We can better protect endangered species by empowering state leaders to implement a strategy more tailored to their specific circumstances,” said co-sponsor Senator Rand Paul, a Kentucky Republican who co-sponsored the proposal. He said the change would put “local needs first” and guard against “bureaucratic overreach.”One example of the Fish and Wildlife Service deferring to western states on species protection serves as a cautionary tale. The lesser prairie-chicken, a species of the grouse family, ranges across the shortgrass prairies and oak shrub steppe of eastern New Mexico, the Texas Panhandle, and parts of Oklahoma, Kansas, and Colorado.Once numbering in the millions, prairie-chickens have plummeted to roughly 25,000 birds on less than 17 percent of their original range because of habitat fragmentation caused by oil and gas drilling, agricultural land conversion, and other activities. As a result, in 2014 the Fish and Wildlife Service listed the bird as threatened.As part of that listing decision, the Service opted to “streamline the regulatory process” under a section of the ESA that allows the agency to “customize prohibitions” and provide “regulatory flexibility.”In its streamlining process for the prairie chicken, the Service in 2013 made an agreement with the wildlife departments of the five western states where the bird is found. Those departments, represented by the Western Association of Fish and Wildlife Agencies, produced a “rangewide plan” that the Fish and Wildlife Service approved. The idea was to limit the economic effects of any species protections by allowing continued oil and gas drilling and other potentially damaging activities in bird habitat.Encounters with wind turbines are a threat to species like the endangered Indiana bat.Don Barry, the former chief counsel for the Fish and Wildlife Service, closely followed the process. Barry helped the Service draft the core rules for implementing the ESA, and he authored many of the early legal opinions that still govern the agency. The Western Association of Fish and Wildlife Agencies, Barry said, “scrambled to put together a management program to keep the species from declining. The Service waived its own regulations and deferred to the state plans—which effectively have done little to protect the lesser prairie-chicken.”When the Fish and Wildlife Service issued its 2016 progress report on the association’s rangewide plan, it found that the association had not completed “any qualifying restoration activities during this reporting period” and that not enough data had been collected to assess the plan’s overall progress.In 2014 the Permian Basin Petroleum Association, which represents oil and gas companies in prairie-chicken habitats, filed suit in federal court against the Department of the Interior to try to stop federal protections for the bird. A U.S. district court backed the oil group, saying federal protections were unnecessary because of the efforts by the states and the Western Association of Fish and Wildlife Agencies.“Lesser prairie-chickens are now in worse shape than they were even two years ago,” Bethany Cotton, wildlife program director of the conservation group WildEarth Guardians, told me.Those fighing the ESA in Congress like to point to what they claim is the major failing of the law: Fewer than 2 percent of the 1,653 listed species have been declared recovered and removed from ESA protection, according to Parish Braden, communications director for the House Natural Resources Committee.“The ESA’s primary goal to recover and protect species has been largely unsuccessful,” Braden said in a statement to National Geographic. Braden added in an email: “Reforms are needed so that success isn't measured by the number of species listed, but instead by recovering and de-listing those that are currently listed.”Hunters in Alaska display grizzly trophies in 1906. Scientists argue that removing ESA protections for grizzlies in the lower 48 today would be rash.Cowboys in Wyoming pose with a gray wolf they lassoed on the range in 1887, nearly a hundred years before the animals received ESA protection.“Nobody who cares about endangered species would ever measure success by the number of species listed,” Noah Greenwald said.Ninety-nine percent of the species on the list have been spared extinction, if not fully recovered. And it is true, says the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, that less than 2 percent of species have been declared recovered. “This is perhaps because it took decades for them to decline to the point of endangerment,” Greenwald told me. (Fish and Wildlife Service spokesman Brian Hires, writing in an email, concurred with this assessment.)And it could take many more decades for them to come back to the point where scientists can agree that their populations are healthy, in habitat that gives them a chance to thrive. It takes time for a species to recover. Consider the bald eagle, one of the first species to be listed and declared recovered only in 2007 after 34 years of protection. Nearly half of all listed species have been protected for less than 20 years.Greenwald and others say that if ESA critics really want to modernize the law for the 21st century, if their real concern is recovery and delisting, they could do something lawmakers in Washington haven’t done in decades: Increase funding for the Fish and Wildlife Service.A grizzly bear on the move in Yellowstone National Park.“My main aggravation,” said David Parsons, a senior biologist who worked for the Fish and Wildlife Service in a career spanning 24 years, “is the degree to which the agency embraces and caters to constituencies, interest groups, and politicians that are hostile to the mission of the agency. Agency biologists operate in an atmosphere of intimidation and fear of reprisal,” he said.When in April 2016 the Fish and Wildlife Service made public its proposal to remove ESA protection for the grizzly bear in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem, it received more than 850,000 comments from the public. Delisting would involve, among other measures, the opening of a hunting season. Grizzly bears would be killed not for meat, but for trophies. (Read National Geographic's coverage of Yellowstone National Park).Among the dissenting comments was a 73-page document submitted by a retired National Park Service biologist, David Mattson, who has studied grizzlies in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem since their listing under the ESA in 1975.One of the problems in the 2016 delisting proposal, according to Mattson, is that it downplays the effects of climate change on food sources integral to the health of grizzlies. Those foods—cutthroat trout, whitebark pine nuts, and army cutworm moths, all found in high rugged remote elevations or in places unfrequented by people—are diminishing.“The Fish and Wildlife Service claims this is not an issue,” he told me.Equally troubling, Mattson said, is the Service’s claim that the number of grizzlies has been increasing steadily in recent years. Mattson has evidence showing the opposite. “We’ve had record-breaking mortality the last three years running, because bears are resorting to foods that are incredibly hazardous,” he said. They now look for elk in areas where game hunters travel—or for grasses and berries at lower elevations where there are more tourists, or they eat cattle—all of which places them in conflict with human beings who respond with mortal force.Mattson thinks the Fish and Wildlife Service is “caving to the pressures from the proponents of delisting, which are the state wildlife management agencies, state elected officials, the Congress members, and the governors of Idaho, Montana, and Wyoming.”Mattson worries especially about the impact that the unprecedented pace of climate change could have in bear habitat areas. A population limited to fewer than 700 bears in the Greater Yellowstone is not one that can easily ride out the accelerating changes, he said.“If we’re looking realistically at ensuring the survival of the grizzlies,” Mattson told me, “those numbers are not enough to guard against the destructive trends afoot. We’re not being cautious.”In March, Crow Chairman A. J. Not Afraid traveled to Washington, D.C., to lobby Congress about the need to keep the ESA protections of the grizzly in place. Not Afraid was joined by Chief Stan Grier, of the Piikani Nation, part of the Blackfoot Confederacy.A camera trap snapped this grizzly visiting the yard of a historic house along Yellowstone’s northern boundary.Trash is food to wildlife. A predator-proof container is tested at the Grizzly and Wolf Discovery Center in West Yellowstone, Montana.In a recent letter to the United Nations Special Rapporteur on the Rights of Indigenous Peoples, Grier wondered why the Fish and Wildlife Service had designated Amec Foster Wheeler, a multinational consultancy whose clients include major oil and gas corporations, to manage the scientific peer review of grizzly delisting. “When you learn that a former Halliburton executive, Jon Lewis, is now CEO of Amec, you start to understand why,” Grier wrote.He added: “There are presently 21 oil and gas ‘Plans of Operation’ for Greater Yellowstone upon the delisting of the grizzly. Those will threaten cultural and environmental harms to Tribal Nations’ sacred and historic sites, and to treaty lands in the region.”Not Afraid and Grier were among those who signed a 2016 treaty with more than 125 tribes. It demanded that the U.S. government—meaning the Fish and Wildlife Service—consult fully with the tribes before issuing a decision about the fate of the grizzly. The Service has not done so, according to the tribes, and they consider this a breach of their sovereignty.One day standing on Pretty Eagle Point, on the Crow lands, I asked Not Afraid if the Crow people kept the stuffed heads of grizzlies on the walls of their homes. He seemed stunned by the question. One of his associates, a lively man named Truman Jefferson, Jr., cut in, “We don’t do it. We don’t hunt bear. We let it be. It lets us be. I read something that we just lost the white rhino. We’ll never see it again.”We discussed the words of Joe Medicine Crow, who said that man is the most dangerous animal. “He’s the most dangerous animal,” Not Afraid said, “because he can take away forever something that belongs only to Mother Earth.”Gray wolves in Wyoming were taken off the endangered species list in March, shifting management of the animals from the federal government to the state.Christopher Ketcham is a roving correspondent in the American West working on a book about the public lands and last wild places. He can be reached at cketcham99@mindspring.com. Or find more of his work at his website: www.christopherketcham.com.",
"Polar bears were listed as a threatened species under the U.S. Endangered Species Act in 2008.The word “threatened” can conjure alarming images of a species on the brink of disappearing forever. The term’s actual meaning, however, is not necessarily that dire—depending on who you ask.There are two common systems of classifying a species’ extinction risk: The International Union for Conservation of Nature’s Red List of Threatened Species (IUCN) and the U.S. Endangered Species Act.Established in 1964, the Red List indicates the global conservation status of animals, plants and fungi. It keeps track of species that have undergone global assessments of their extinction risk and sorts them into eight categories: data deficient, least concern, near threatened, vulnerable, endangered, critically endangered, extinct in the wild and extinct. Under Red List guidelines, species that are rated vulnerable, endangered, or critically endangered are also considered threatened.The status of a species on the Red List changes periodically. A plant or an animal that is considered threatened today may not be threatened a year from now. The Red List category that a species falls into depends on its population size, geographic range, past reductions in population, and probability of extinction in the wild.Scientists count the number of each species in as many places around the world as possible and estimate the total population size with statistical methods. Then they determine the likelihood that it will go extinct in the wild by considering its history, habitat requirements, and threats.In 1973, the U.S. Congress passed the Endangered Species Act to try to prevent species from becoming extinct. The law classifies plants and animals as endangered if they’re at risk of extinction through all or most of their geographic areas. Species are listed as threatened if they’re likely to become endangered in the foreseeable future.To classify a species, the U.S. Fish & Wildlife Service considers damage to its habitat, overuse of it, disease or predation, inadequate protection, and other factors. It’s illegal under the Endangered Species Act for a person to hunt, kill, capture, or otherwise harm a threatened animal without a permit. States might also have separate laws governing activity that involves endangered and threatened animals.Unlike species listed as endangered, those classified as threatened under the Endangered Species Act can be taken from the wild for exhibition in a zoo or for educational reasons. State natural resource departments also can move threatened species if it’s part of a conservation effort. To protect a threatened species, the Fish & Wildlife Service can add other conservation-minded regulations.The ultimate goal of the Endangered Species Act is to take species off the list of species that the act protects. When a plant or an animal is no longer marching toward extinction, the federal law has done its job.",
"Consider the shoebill, whose photo opens this article. It’s a one-of-a-kind species on the verge of extinction—exactly the type targeted for protection by the Evolutionarily Distinct and Globally Endangered species program, aka EDGE of Existence. But when I started the EDGE initiative in 2007, the challenge was getting people who’d never heard of those animals to commit to protecting them.Ideally I could have gone to the leading marketing agency for nature and asked what to do to get people to emotionally connect with these weird and wonderful creatures. But no such agency exists—and we’ve only begun to develop both the art and science of making this vital connection.Tim Flach photographed the birds in this article; all are in his book Endangered, to which I contributed. Flach has a unique ability to capture an animal’s essence and an affinity for unusual, obscure creatures. We saw the book as a great opportunity to explore which images of species and habitats would elicit an emotional response.Were people connecting to species that were larger? More colorful? Or that had traits similar to human babies’, such as big eyes? Was it more powerful if species were pictured in portrait style or in their native habitat? Did the viewer connect through seemingly shared emotions or behaviors, such as maternal gestures, fear, and vulnerability?Flach’s images have helped start the discussion. Now we at National Geographic, through our Making the Case for Nature grants program, are inviting experts to offer ideas about how to better connect humans with the natural world. It’s a critical question; our future depends on it.National Geographic is partnering with the National Audubon Society, BirdLife International, and the Cornell Lab of Ornithology to celebrate the centennial of the Migratory Bird Treaty Act. Watch for more stories, books, and events throughout the year.",
"Tarsiers, tiny nocturnal primates from Southeast Asia (pictured, a Philippine tarsier), are often cited as having huge eyes for their body size.When Dwayne LaGrou asked Weird Animal Question of the Week what animals have the largest eyes for their body size, we were sure the answer would be guilty-looking dogs.The actual candidates proved to be some real eye-openers.Because animals are built so differently, figuring out which has the biggest eyes can be tricky, Sönke Johnsen, a biologist at Duke University, says via email. (Read more about eyes, nature's most exquisite creation, in National Geographic magazine.)But some tiny marine animals, such as some hyperiid amphipods, clearly come out ahead.These include Cystisoma, a genus of transparent crustaceans whose giant compound eyes face upward on a head that takes up about a third of its seven-inch (about 18-centimeter) long body, Johnsen says.Paraphromina, another clear amphipod, has unique compound eyes, which look like rows of runway lights that face both upward and sideways. These peepers take up 45 percent of its clear, tiny body, which is only 0.3 to 0.7 inch (one to two centimeters) long.Clear bodies help these animals to avoid detection, and these enormous upward-facing eyes likely help spot predators swimming above. (Also see "Flounders’ Eyes Face Skyward. How Do They See the Ocean Floor?")At an inch (about 2.6 centimeters) long, giant ostracods dwarf their smaller cousins, which can be just 0.004 inch (0.1 millimeter) long. The retinas of these clear, globe-shaped crustaceans sit in front of a mirrored plate that focuses light, causing some to compare their large eyes to car headlights (watch video).This giant ostracod lives at depths of up to roughly 6,500 feet (2,000 meters) in the North Atlantic Ocean.Vampire squid also have a high eye-to-body ratio. The deep-dwelling cephalopods grow up to a foot (0.3 meter) long, with eyes about an inch (about 2.6 centimeters) wide. These big eyes are helpful at ocean depths of up to 8,200 feet (2,500 meters). (Related: "Vampire Squid’s Surprising Diet Revealed.")Michael F. Land, co-author of the book Animal Eyes, agrees that since so many animals have large eyes, finding the biggest relative to size is a tall order.But some nocturnal spiders, such as ogre-faced spiders, "come pretty high on the list," Land, a neurobiologist at the University of Sussex, says via email.Of their eight eyes, the two largest, front-facing ones are enormous, helping the arachnids in their nighttime quest for prey.Among insects, dragonfly eyes "are probably the biggest, with 30,000 lenses per eye" that collect overlapping images from every angle, says Katy Prudic, an entomologist at the University of Arizona. (See amazing pictures of colorful insect eyes.)The rufous net-casting spider of Australia uses its two giant eyes to find prey at night.And yes, there are some big-eyed animals of the cute-and-cuddly variety.Tarsiers, tiny nocturnal primates from Southeast Asia, are often cited as having huge eyes for their body size, with a body length between 3.9 inches (10 centimeters) and an eye width of 0.6 inch (16 millimeters).“One eye is larger than their brain,” Rafe Brown, a herpetologist at the University of Kansas Biodiversity Institute, says via email.Unlike humans, their eyes are fixed in their sockets, so “they swivel their heads all the way around to look behind them” 180 degrees, like a rain forest version of The Exorcist.If we were this cute, we'd be taking selfies all day.Weird Animal Question of the Week answers your questions every Saturday. If you have a question about the weird and wild animal world, tweet me, leave me a note or photo in the comments below, or find me on Facebook.",
"From a polar bear and her cubs in Canada to a dolphin and her calf in Japan, these animal moms are there to help when babies get hungry.To celebrate the 25th anniversary of World Breastfeeding Week, we’ve collected incredible photos of 30 different animals nursing their offspring. World Breastfeeding Week is recognized every year from August 1 to 7 to encourage breastfeeding and improve the health of babies around the world.Sneak a peek at these photos of animal mothers and their kin in these National Geographic Creative photos, which showcase the unique work of award-winning photographers and cinematographers.",
"The lesser long-nosed bat is one of only a few bat species that feeds almost exclusively on nectar. In Mexico, these bats drink nectar from agave plants, which inadvertently helps tequila producers pollinate their agave crop.The rate at which humans are driving other species to extinction has reached new heights. Scientists estimate that dozens of plant and animal species go extinct every day, most of which go unnoticed. At this rate, more than half of all species on Earth could be lost by 2100.But this grim future is not set in stone; we have the power to save these species.Over the last half century, dedicated scientists and conservationists have changed the fate of several species on the verge of extinction. From the iconic giant panda, pushed to the brink by poaching and deforestation, to the island fox brought down in part by opportunistic eagles, humans have helped numerous species recover from dire straits. Here are a dozen heartwarming examples of the power we have to bring species back from the brink.These fluffy brown bats made history in 2017 when they became the first of their kind to be removed from the U.S. endangered species list. Thirty years ago, fewer than a thousand remained in existence. Now, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service estimates that there are more than 200,000 of these bats spread out across the United States and Mexico.Famous for their role in pollinating the plant used to make tequila, the lesser long-nosed bat is one of only three bat species in the U.S. that feeds on nectar.The bats were driven to near extinction by a combination of habitat loss and indiscriminate culling. Attempts to rid Mexico of its rabies-ridden population of vampire bats resulted in the incidental killing of hundreds of long-nosed bats.After being declared endangered in 1988, government agencies on both sides of the border began protecting caves and abandoned mine shafts where the bats were known to roost. In Mexico, some tequila producers altered their agave cultivation practices to benefit the animals and some brands now market their products as bat friendly. (Learn more about the first bat removed from U.S. endangered species list.)Named after the state where it’s recognized as the official mammal, this Louisiana ursine is one of 16 subspecies of American black bear. This southern subspecies has a longer, narrower skull than other black bears.Found only in Louisiana, east Texas, and western Mississippi, the subspecies was declared endangered throughout its range in 1992. During the early 20th century, much of the Louisiana black bear’s habitat was lost to agricultural development.Since the species was added to the U.S. endangered species list, government agencies and private landowners have restored more than 700,000 acres of the critical black bear habitat. These efforts have been so successful that scientists estimate that the number of Louisiana black bears has doubled since the subspecies was listed. Delisted in 2016, an estimated 500 to 750 Louisiana black bears now exist in the wild.The Louisiana black bear is the official mammal of its eponymous state, but its range extends into Mississippi and eastern Texas. These bears have dark fur but some sport a distinct white patch on their chest.The Morelet's crocodile, also known as the Mexican crocodile, is a modestly sized reptile found in freshwater swamps and marshes in Central America that averages 10 feet in length.Unlike most of its crocodile cousins, the Morelet’s crocodile doesn't have bony plates embedded in its skin, which allows the skin to be more easily made into leather.During the 1940s and 50s, the demand for their skin was so high that hunters killed all but a few hundred individuals. In 1970 the species was listed as endangered and conservation efforts began. Crocodile farms began to spring up all around Mexico, where they’re raised for conservation and commercial purposes.These efforts allowed the population to recover and to be de-listed in 2012.Przewalski's horses are the last truly wild horses. The so-called wild horses that roam Australia and North America's western plains and East Coast barrier islands are actually feral descendants of domesticated ancestors.  Named after the Russian explorer who first described it in the late 19th century, Przewalski’s horse once roamed free in grasslands across Europe and Asia. Numbers dwindled as a result of intensive poaching and habitat loss.These horses disappeared from the wild in the 1960s, but have since been reintroduced in Mongolia through captive breeding programs. Roughly 1,900 Przewalski's horses are alive today, all of which are descended from 14 horses that were caught in the wild between 1910 and 1960.The Vancouver Island marmot is a comically large rodent found only in the high mountains of Vancouver Island in British Columbia.In the 1990s logging companies clear-cut much of the area’s forests and the number of marmots began to fall. By 2003, a survey revealed their population had dwindled to less than two dozen individuals.  In response to the marmot’s dire situation, a group known as the Marmot Recovery Foundation significantly ramped up their conservation efforts. The foundation posted a field crew on the island to monitor the marmots 24 hours a day to ensure they weren’t eaten by predators.This round-the-clock monitoring, combined with adjustments to their captive-breeding techniques, gave rise to a small but stable population of Vancouver Island marmots. Of the 150 to 200 marmots alive today roughly 10 percent was born in captivity.“I never thought I'd see this species alive,” photographer Joel Sartore told National Geographic in August. Sartore, who has been photographing rare and endangered species since 2005, photographed every animal on this list and thousands more. (Read more about how Canada's most endangered mammal was saved)This iconic species has become the poster child for wildlife conservation. In 1980s excessive poaching and deforestation decimated China’s population of giant pandas. When all but a few hundred bears remained a global movement to save them was born.Millions of dollars are spent on habitat restoration, captive breeding, and protection enforcement for the giant panda each year, and it's paying off. There are now 1,864 giant pandas in the wild and another 300 in zoos and breeding centers.Nearly two-thirds of all wild panda now live in protected wildlife reserves and a handful of captive-bred pandas has been released into the wild. (Watch this video showing pandas being returned to the wild.)These elegantly adorned birds are the tallest birds in North America, and they were once one of the most endangered. Migratory and non-migratory flocks of the birds are spread across the United States and Canada, but fewer than a thousand individuals currently exist.The current population is a mere four percent of its historic size. European settlers hunted the birds on a massive scale during the late 1800s. Habitat loss and one particularly destructive hurricane also contributed to the downfall of the whooping crane. By 1941 less than 20 individuals remained.When the species was declared endangered in 1967, protections and captive breeding programs were quickly established. Successful breeding and reintroductions have bolstered their ranks by several hundred birds. The wild population currently consists of roughly 600 birds, 400 of which are part of the last truly wild flock.These statuesque birds live in tight-knit family groups and spend most of their day foraging for shellfish, insects, fish, and aquatic plants in marshes and lagoons.The recovery of the sea otter is considered one of the greatest successes in marine conservation.Nearly one million of these undeniably adorable marine mammals once inhabited coastal waters from Alaska to Baja California and around the Pacific Rim to Russia and Japan.But in the 1700s, trappers began killing otters by the thousands for their luxurious fur, and soon the animals disappeared from much of their range. By 1911, fewer than 2,000 sea otters remained.Without sea otters to keep invertebrate populations in check, kelp forests across the North Pacific became overrun with sea urchins, leading to an impoverishment of coastal ecosystems.Protections for sea otters were put in place throughout their historic range. Eventually, the remnant populations in eastern Russia, western Alaska, and California started to show signs of recovery. Their global population now consists of just over 100,000 otters.Sea otters have the densest, and arguably the most luxurious, fur in the animal kingdom. Every square inch of fur contains an around one million individual hairs. Unlike other marine mammals, sea otters don’t have blubber. Having such dense fur allows sea otters to trap air next to their skin, allowing them to stay dry and warm in the chilly waters of the pacific ocean.The turquoise parrot has made a remarkable recovery over the last century. The Australian avian came close to extinction in the late 1800s as a result of habitat loss and poaching.Although these pint-sized parrots can fly, they spend most of their time on the ground in search of seeds. When large-scale cattle farming was introduced to Australia in the early 1800s, much of the parrot’s grassy woodland habitat was converted to pasture. To make matters worse, the hollowed-out eucalyptus trees that turquoise parrots nest in were removed in many places to make way for agricultural development. The birds also became a popular filling in Australian meat pies.The species was presumed extinct in 1915, but in the 1930s the birds began popping up in New South Wales.In recent years, farmers and conservationists have worked together to restore habitat for the bird. This includes encouraging landowners to leave hollow trees on their property. In 2,000, scientists estimated that the wild population had reached 20,000 birds.The six subspecies of island fox are spread across six of the eight Channel Islands, off the coast of southern California. Each subspecies is unique to the island it lives on. All six subspecies of the island fox are descendants of the mainland gray fox, but they're about two-thirds the size.In the 1990s scientists noticed that the number of foxes on three of the northernmost islands—San Miguel, Santa Rosa, and Santa Cruz—was falling fast. By 2,000 local extinction seemed like an inevitability. Widespread use of DDT had poisoned the native bald eagle population, creating an opportunity for golden eagles from the mainland to move in. Unlike the bald eagles, the golden eagles prey on foxes. Between 1994 and 2000, the predators had eaten all but a few dozen foxes.In response, researchers and conservationists from the National Park Service, Nature Conservancy and Catalina Island Conservancy flocked to the island to facilitate a recovery.Golden eagles were relocated, non-native competitors such as feral pigs and cats were removed and island foxes were collected and bred in captivity. This effort took nearly two decades, but it was largely successful.Both island foxes and bald eagles have returned to the island. More than 6,000 of these foxes now roam the isolated islands, and their numbers are growing. (Read more about how California's "dwarf" fox came back from the brink)Just 16 years ago, less than 25 blue iguanas remained in the wild. Now, there may be as many as 1,000.Found only on the Cayman Islands, the blue iguana once numbered in the thousands. Perfectly adapted to their tropical island habitat, these plant-eating lizards thrived on the islands for thousands of years until real estate development and the arrival of rats and feral cats threw the island ecosystem out of whack. By 1990 habitat loss and the proliferation of invasive predators had pushed the blue iguana to the brink of extinction.The species was declared functionally extinct in 2005, but that didn’t stop conservations from trying to save it. Captive breeding programs coupled with improved management of federal land and feral pet populations has helped the species avoid extinction. In 2012, the number of wild blue iguanas rose to approximately 750 and the species was downlisted from critically endangered to endangered. (Watch: How one of the rarest reptiles made an epic comeback)Across the Great Plains of North America, the black-footed ferret is making an unexpected comeback. One of only three species of ferret in existence, the black-footed ferret once numbered in the tens of thousands. But in the 1900s habitat loss and diseases brought in from overseas all but wiped them out. By 1986, the entire population consisted of 18 captive ferrets.Efforts to bring them back by means of captive breeding have been surprisingly successful. As of 2016, the population consists of nearly 500 ferrets spread out across 17 reintroduction sites in Canada, Mexico, and the United States. Conservation efforts are ongoing as scientists say 3,000 ferrets are needed to facilitate a full recovery.",
"",
"A new study examines the scale of the trade in endangered hawksbill sea turtle shells over the span of nearly 150 years.The shell of an adult hawksbill sea turtle consists of about a dozen overlapping scales colored with streaks of gold, brown, orange, and red. Hawksbills have long been hunted for their shells—the ancient Romans, for example, fashioned the scales into combs and rings.Hawksbill scales are still being carved and polished into decorative and functional objects—tortoiseshell jewelry, trinkets, sunglasses. But the difference today is that killing hawksbills is forbidden. That’s been the case since 1977, when the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES), the body that regulates cross-border trade in wildlife, assigned the hawksbill sea turtle its highest level of protection.Meanwhile, the International Union for the Conservation of Nature (IUCN), which sets the conservation status of animals and plants, lists hawksbills as “critically endangered.”They’re among the least abundant sea turtles, with an estimated population of fewer than 25,000 nesting females across their range in the tropics. Although hawksbills are widely distributed, the largest concentrations of nesting females are found in the Caribbean region, which accounts for between 20 and 30 percent of the population, according to the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.Though hawksbills are widely distributed, the IUCN lists them as critically endangered, with an estimated population of fewer than 25,000 nesting females across their range in the tropics.Nearly nine million hawksbill sea turtles were hunted between 1844 and 1992, researchers say.Now, a new study published today in the journal Science Advances paints a grim picture of the historical impact of the hawksbill trade.According to the paper, which drew on data from the Atlantic, Pacific, and Indian Oceans, nearly nine million hawksbills were hunted for their shells during the 148-year period from 1844 to 1992. Because information about hawksbills in the Atlantic and Indian Oceans was spotty, the researchers say, their analysis likely doesn’t represent the full magnitude of the global hawksbill trade. (Read more about how GPS can help save these endangered sea turtles.)The numbers, says Emily Miller, assistant research scientist at Monterey Bay Aquarium and the study’s lead author, are “staggering.”David Godfrey, executive director of Sea Turtle Conservancy, a Florida-based nonprofit dedicated to ensuring the survival of sea turtles in the Caribbean, Atlantic, and Pacific, says “It’s not overly shocking to hear that the numbers were so large because we know how seriously the populations declined.” Godfrey says the study helps give a sense of the turtle’s historic population size and that the new information will help conservationists develop recovery plans for hawksbills. “It’s so hard to get historical data about the abundance of these animals,” he says.Previous hawksbill trade studies, in 1987 and 1989, informed a 2008 IUCN report, which estimated that about 1.4 million of the animals were taken from the wild from 1950 to 1992. The new study extends the time frame back 106 years, based on trade data obtained from Japanese customs archives by Yoshikazu Uni, a professor at Tokyo University of Agriculture, in Abashiri, Japan.According to Miller, previous assessments didn’t account for the varying ages and sizes of turtles and assumed instead that all traded turtles were adults. This assumption skewed estimates toward fewer turtles because studies used shipment weights determined from import records to estimate the number of adult turtles.Early on, when the turtles were more abundant, Miller says, it’s likely that the easiest targets would have been taken first—in this case nesting adult females. But as adult turtles became harder to find, smaller young adults and juvenile turtles would have been targeted. Smaller turtles weigh less, so shipments with a mix of ages and sizes contain more individuals.This “fishing down” theory was supported by the team’s analysis of seizures of contemporary turtle shipments, which were composed mostly of juveniles, indicating that today fishermen are indeed targeting smaller animals.The most intense hawksbill exploitation—three-quarters of the entire trade since 1844—occurred between 1970 and 1985, the researchers found, with exports from Indonesia, Malaysia, the Philippines, Belize, and Honduras all increasing before the 1977 CITES trade ban.The paper calls out China as a major present-day consumer of shells, traded illegally from Indonesia, Malaysia, and the Philippines.Sea Turtle Conservancy says Japan’s black market also constitutes a threat to the survival of the species. Hawksbill shell combs have been popular in Japan for more than 300 years, and many women use them in their wedding attire.Hawksbills have been hunted for their shells for centuries. Even though the turtles have been off-limits for trade since 1977, tortoiseshell is still trafficked—especially to China and Japan—for objects such as jewelry, trinkets, combs, and sunglasses.According to the IUCN, hawksbills are also compromised by loss of habitat because of residential and commercial development, which encroaches on nesting grounds. Other threats include oil and gas drilling, fishing, pollution, and rising ocean temperature and acidity associated with climate change, which is degrading the turtles’ coral reef habitats. Sea turtles are important ocean grazers and help maintain the health of coral reefs and sea grass. According to the study, sea turtle population declines have likely altered sea ecosystem dynamics.The researchers noted a connection between trade patterns and trends in illegal, unreported, and unregulated (IUU) fishing. They mapped areas with the highest levels of shell exports, and, Miller says, found that those areas “matched really closely with the countries that have the highest levels of IUU fishing.” Six countries—Indonesia, Thailand, India, the Philippines, Malaysia, and Vietnam—had a close match between historical turtle exports back to 1844 and IUU fishing rates, with Indonesia topping the list for both.Miller says it’s likely that hawksbills are targeted in small-scale, artisanal fisheries with connections to international networks and that they’re also netted as bycatch by fishermen going after other species. “The strong links between IUU fishing and marine wildlife poaching and trafficking underscore the need for integrated monitoring and management of small-scale coastal fisheries and high-seas commercial fleets,” the study says.Miller adds that consumers can help by buying sustainably sourced seafood to avoid sellers who are potentially involved in the illegal fishing practices that threaten hawksbills.Kyle Van Houtan, director of science at the Monterey Bay Aquarium and another author on the study, says he hopes that by pointing out the magnitude of the hawksbill trade, the team’s findings will “really shine a bright light on the most endangered species of sea turtle we have.”",
"Glass frogs were among the more than 500 species considered for protections at this year’s CITES international wildlife trade meeting in Geneva.GENEVANine animals received increased protections from international trade, and more than 130 species won protections for the first time at a two-week summit aimed at managing the multibillion-dollar cross-border wildlife trade while preventing endangered animals and plants from sliding to extinction.Not every country went home happy. “What I sense in the room, and what I’m concerned about is there’s a bitterness,” says Ivonne Higuero, secretary-general of the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Fauna and Flora (CITES). “There’s a discussion of ‘This is not working for me, it hasn’t been working for me for some time.’”From August 17 to August 28, 182 countries and the European Union considered proposals for more than 500 species, and their votes often broke down based on political, economic, and geographic lines. Southern African nations, for example, squared off against many other African nations on their differing approaches to elephant conservation and how to fund it.Until now, CITES decisions about levels of protection for species have been based exclusively on science—knowledge accumulated by biologists and ecologists, for example—but disagreements arose over how much weight CITES should now give to other factors, including the needs and desires of rural communities that live alongside wildlife. Economic and social benefits, for example, such as revenue from hunting and ecotourism to benefit villagers, are increasingly seen as integral to discussions about levels of protection.Every three years CITES members convene to discuss the treaty, which was enacted in 1975. Eight themes emerged from this year’s conference. (Read more about the major CITES decisions here).Decisions to increase protections for mako sharks, wedgefish, and guitarfish came on the heels of a resolution proposed by Antigua and Barbuda to stop all marine species from being listed under CITES until it can be demonstrated that CITES protections do in fact make a difference. The resolution was roundly rejected, but this wasn’t a new notion.“There’s long been this idea that somehow CITES isn’t a tool for marine species, and that idea to us is absurd,” says Matt Collis, director of international policy at the International Fund for Animal Welfare.CITES was set up to deal with terrestrial species, leading some to say that marine species should be excluded and that regulation should be left to regional fishery bodies. This idea is a relic from when CITES began in the 1970s, says Luke Warwick, assistant director of the sharks and rays program for the nonprofit Wildlife Conservation Society.This year, Warwick says it seems that a consensus was finally reached: In a “weird” but “positive anticlimax,” Japan, which opposed the mako shark proposal, surprised conservationists when it didn’t reopen the mako shark debate in the final session. That’s when proposal decisions must be confirmed or rejected and countries have a chance to reopen debates. This shows the idea that CITES is for sharks is becoming mainstream, Warwick says.“There’s a growing recognition that CITES does marine and it does it well,” he says.The Indian star tortoise, considered a “vulnerable” species, is one of the world’s heavily trafficked tortoises. CITES members voted to ban it from international commercial trade.More than a third of the proposals this year related to reptiles and amphibians that are now threatened, largely because of their popularity as exotic pets in the United States, the EU, and elsewhere. Those species include the Indian star tortoise and the tokay gecko. Two otter species—the Asian small-clawed otter and smooth-coated otter—similarly have suffered from their popularity among exotic pet collectors, particularly in Southeast Asia. Collectively, more than 20 of the 56 proposals up for CITES consideration had listings spurred by the pet trade. Almost all mustered enough votes to increase protections. Only one proposal—to list all 104 species of glass frogs—failed to pass.The long-standing debate over how to fund conservation efforts came up again this year, notably in the debate over elephant and rhino protections.Eswatini proposed opening its commercial rhino trade, which would allow it to sell abroad its nearly 730-pound stockpile of horn, valued at $9.9 million. Fears that a legal trade would stimulate demand and smuggling of rhino horn led to the rejection of the proposal, but the question remains unanswered: How will countries such as Eswatini fund conservation?Some conservationists have suggested ecotourism or donations could help. During the debates, the representative from Eswatini angrily invited opposing countries and nonprofit organizations to step up and pay to protect its rhinos.“Opinion seems to come not with responsibility,” he said of the opposition. “If the finance is not available to protect them, rhinos will continue to die, and so will people.”Debate about how to manage the trade in charismatic large animals and products from them, including ivory and rhino horn, was intense. Southern African countries, such as Botswana, Namibia, and Zimbabwe, had very different views from the countries that have come together as the African Elephant Coalition, a consortium of more than 30 countries that seek to preserve African elephant populations and want a world free from trade threats to the animals. Officials from the former said they should have the right to trade their animals and products from them and believe they should be rewarded for their conservation. Coalition members such as Kenya, for example, argued that these species still need to be preserved and shouldn’t be involved in global commerce beyond current levels. (For more, see our related coverage here).At the start of the conference, not all 28 EU countries had been fully credentialed. As a result, when a major vote came up about banning the sale of wild African elephants to countries outside where they live, the EU, even though it opposed the proposal, couldn’t vote. Had the EU voted, the proposal would have failed. (The EU later reached a compromise with other countries and, after adding amendments that create certain exceptions for such sales, ultimately supported the proposal.) Yet the EU’s outsize influence enabled it to scuttle a separate effort to protect glass frogs (popular in Europe as exotic pets) from trade, despite impassioned defense of the proposal by Costa Rica, El Salvador, and Honduras—countries where the animals live in nature. Meanwhile, a new level of protection for mako sharks squeaked by. Observers say the vote would have gone the other way if the EU hadn’t signed on as a co-sponsor.“The 28 EU member states are a powerful force at CITES—and generally a force for conservation,” says Susan Lieberman, of the Wildlife Conservation Society.Glass frogs, so named because of their transparent skin, are regularly traded as pets, particularly in the United States and Europe.A 2019 United Nations report on extinction rates found that about one million species of animals and plants are in danger of disappearing, many within decades, because of humans. The vast majority of animals traded from country to country aren’t protected under CITES.Neil D’Cruze, global wildlife advisor for the international animal welfare nonprofit World Animal Protection, wonders if CITES decisions come quickly enough to save species. D’Cruze says he’s spent years researching the vulnerable, and declining, Indian star tortoise, one of the world’s most heavily trafficked tortoises. Despite discussions about its trade status at previous CITES meetings, a ban on their international commercial trade wasn’t instituted until now. Similarly, all eight species of pangolins weren’t given the highest level of protection until 2017, although, according to the wildlife trade monitoring group Traffic, an estimated million were trafficked between 2000 and 2013.“CITES is an important conservation and wildlife protection tool, but given the rapid rate of global biodiversity loss, there is always the wish that CITES, government, and NGOs could move faster,” D’Cruze says.A frequent complaint is the lack of transparency at many of the controversial votes at CITES meetings, including those relating to marine animals and elephants. The convention allows for secret ballot votes, and in such cases, one country can ask for a matter to be voted on by secret ballot. As long as 10 countries second that bid, the public will never know how a given country voted—unless that country asks for its vote to be put on the record. That’s a problem because countries need to be accountable to their public, says Lieberman.Another common complaint: Now that the treaty has 183 members and scientists have learned a lot more about the dire situation facing a variety of species, the conference agenda has grown dauntingly long. Before this year’s meeting, CITES Secretary-General Ivonne Higuero told National Geographic, “With each Conference of the Parties, we are increasing the number of documents and proposals that are being considered. This one has 20 percent more than the last, at South Africa. And that [conference] had a larger agenda than the one before.” She added, “A very big concern of mine as the new secretary-general is: Are we going to be as effective in general at CITES?”Another criticism of the treaty is that the emphasis now is too heavily on restricting trade. Moreover, many observers say that CITES doesn’t treat poorer nations on par with richer ones—disproportionately sanctioning the former for failing to comply with or enforce the treaty. “It’s also fair to say that countries with well established and well staffed CITES authorities are much better versed at defending themselves,” says John Scanlon, who served as secretary-general from 2010 to 2018. (See this story on the sanctions process: Does CITES have teeth?)CITES meetings generally happen every three years, although they’re meant to occur biannually. More frequent meetings would drive up the costs of managing the treaty but could shorten agendas, streamlining the process. Still, the three-year cadence seems unlikely to change: At the conclusion of this meeting, the next Conference of the Parties was announced for 2022, to be hosted by Costa Rica.8. New elephant protections underscore evolution in thinking about these intelligent, sensitive creatures.Although public attention is drawn toward charismatic creatures such as elephants and rhinos, most illegal wildlife trade actually involves timber, plants, and marine life. (Learn more: The fight to protect the world’s most trafficked wild commodity.) Still, the most contentious debates at this summit, as in previous ones, swirled around elephants—with proposals about opening up ivory trade, closing down domestic ivory markets, and loosening the restrictions limiting Zambia’s elephant sales. All three failed to pass, leaving the status of elephants largely unchanged.But one elephant measure was approved: a near-complete ban on capturing and sending African elephants from some countries to zoos and other captive facilities abroad. The issue, which stemmed largely from concerns about recent sales of young elephants to China and the U.S., preoccupied the concluding discussion. Zimbabwe, in particular, has recently sought to sell some of its elephants. (See this related story.)",
"A female eastern black rhino (Diceros bicornis michaeli) named Imara, at Great Plains Zoo in South Dakota.The Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora, often referred to as CITES (SIGH-teez), is an agreement between governments that regulates the international trade of wildlife and wildlife products—everything from live animals and plants to food, leather goods, and trinkets. It came into force in 1975 with the goal of ensuring that international trade does not threaten the survival of wild plants and animals.There are about 5,800 species of animals and 30,000 species of plants protected by CITES currently. They’re categorized into one of three appendices, depending on how at risk from trade they are.As of June 2019, CITES had 183 party governments, which must abide by CITES regulations by implementing legislation within their own borders to enforce those regulations.CITES was first conceived of at a 1963 meeting of the International Union for the Conservation of Nature (IUCN), the global authority on the conservation status of wild animals and plants.There are three appendices: Appendix I, II, and III. Each denotes a different level of protection from trade.Appendix I includes species that are in danger of extinction because of international trade. Permits are required for import and export, and trade for commercial purposes is prohibited. Trade may be allowed for research or law enforcement purposes, among a few other limited reasons, but first the source country must confirm that taking that plant or animal won’t hurt the species’ chance of survival. (This is known as a “non-detriment finding.”) The Asiatic lion and tigers are two species listed as Appendix I.Appendix II includes species that aren’t facing imminent extinction but need monitoring to ensure that trade doesn’t become a threat. Export is allowed if the plant, animal, or related product was obtained legally and if harvesting it won’t hurt the species’ chance of survival. American alligators are listed on Appendix II, for example. They were overhunted through the 1960s for their skin, but their numbers are now on the rise. CITES Appendix II listing helps ensure the alligator skin trade doesn’t become a threat again.Appendix III includes species that are protected in at least one country, when that country asks others for help in regulating the trade. Regulations for these species vary, but typically the country that requested the listing can issue export permits, and export from other countries requires a certificate of origin. While honey badgers are listed as of least concern by the IUCN, their Botswana population is on CITES Appendix III because of concerns that they would be exploited in other African countries for use in traditional medicine and as bushmeat.Every two to three years, CITES parties meet at what’s called the Conference of the Parties (or “CoP”) to evaluate how the convention is being enforced. The purpose of this two-week meeting is to consider new proposals for listing or removing species from appendices, to debate other decisions and resolutions about implementation of regulations, and to review conservation progress.Appendix changes, the main event at the CoP, are proposed if a species is thought to need more—or less—protection from trade. For example, in 2016, the proposal to increase protections for pangolins, scaly, armadillo-lookalikes that are among the world’s most trafficked mammals, by moving them from Appendix II to Appendix I passed almost unanimously.CITES has plenty of critics. Some say conservationists flock to the two-week meeting every few years, fiercely debate the fate of endangered animals, and then go home, patting themselves on the back for a job well done. Meanwhile, the actual enforcement of the CITES regulations is left to the countries themselves—some of which don’t have the resources or political will to enforce regulations.A 2019 analysis in the journal Science found that in nearly two-thirds of cases, CITES protections lag after a species is determined to be threatened by international trade. For example, while pangolins were finally added to Appendix I in 2017, an estimated million were trafficked between 2000 and 2013. Of the eight species of pangolins, half are endangered or critically endangered. The vast majority of animals that are in the wildlife trade are not protected by CITES.If a party violates the convention, CITES can respond with sanctions, which prevent a country from trading in CITES-listed species. But countries are rarely sanctioned and the process can become highly politicized. What’s more, because CITES membership is voluntary, a country could simply leave CITES rather than accept sanctions.Still, some say regulations are an important first step. Before CITES existed, international wildlife trade was largely a free-for-all—while individual countries tried to restrict the trade of threatened species, illegally exported products could be legally imported into many countries.One success story CITES touts is the vicuña. In the mid-20th century, populations of the once-abundant llama relative had dwindled to about 10,000 animals because commercial demand for its fur led to widespread poaching. But after enacting conservation measures, including a CITES listing in 1975, populations rebounded. Today, the vicuña’s conservation status is least concern.",
"Crocodile skinks have become popular pets, yet no one knows how many of these small lizards are caught in the wild, and international law does not regulate their trade.Adorable isn’t a word usually applied to lizards, but crocodile skinks check all the boxes. With their large, anime eyes, dinosaur-like head plates, and body spines that resemble, well, crocodiles, these hand-size lizards look like they crawled straight out of the Pokémon universe. Not surprisingly, they make for popular exotic pets in places like the U.S.Anecdotally, international trade in all 10 crocodile skink species, which come from New Guinea, the Solomon Islands and Indonesia, seems to be on the rise. Yet no one has any idea how many of these lizards are caught in the wild each year, where they wind up, or whether or not their populations are being affected. This is because, like thousands upon thousands of other species, they aren’t included in the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES), the 45-year-old treaty that’s supposed to ensure that international commercial trade of wildlife doesn’t send plants and animals careening toward extinction.For species like crocodile skinks that are overlooked by CITES, trade “is largely a free for all,” says Chris Shepherd, executive director of Monitor, a nonprofit organization that works to end illegal and unsustainable wildlife trade. “We’re losing many of them because the trade is going on unnoticed.”Based on species’ conservation status, under CITES, animals and plants are added to one of three lists that determine levels of permitted trade. Highly endangered species are usually barred from trade, while less threatened ones can be traded with permits. Signatories to CITES—nearly every country in the world—record all their trades in an open database.But plants and animals aren’t automatically listed under CITES. Instead, it’s up to the individual country to add species that are potentially threatened by trade to the appropriate list.According to Shepherd, countries usually wait until a species reaches crisis mode before they propose a CITES listing. At that point, it may be too late to reverse the losses. And in many cases, crocodile skinks being one, studies of an animal or plant in the wild may be scarce, making it impossible to say how their populations are faring.The problem, Shepherd says, is staggering in scope: “There are as many, or perhaps even more, non-CITES-listed species in international trade as listed ones.” Only 8 percent of the world’s 10,700 reptile species, for example, are recognized by the treaty. The crocodile skink isn’t one of them.Only 8 percent of the world’s reptiles are listed under CITES, the treaty that regulates international wildlife trade. Ball pythons like these, exported from West Africa by the millions, are among that small percent.To shed light on this, Shepherd and co-author Jordi Janssen undertook a case study, published this month, of international trade in crocodile skinks. The Solomon Islands issues domestic protections for their crocodile skinks, and Papua New Guinea bans export of the lizards, while Indonesia issues annual export quotas for 3,500 individuals.Few countries report trade in non-CITES species, but the U.S. and, to some extent, Europe, are exceptions. Shepherd and Janssen mined U.S. and European trade and seizure data for all traces of crocodile skinks. They also tried to examine imports into Japan—another large market for exotic pets, many of which are not listed under CITES—but found that the country’s customs agency doesn’t provide a more detailed description beyond “lizard.”According to the study’s findings, 15,630 crocodile skinks entered the U.S. between 2000 and 2014. Nearly all were caught in the wild. Most came from Indonesia, but some came from the Solomon Islands, despite domestic laws that prohibit their capture and export. European authorities monitor only a few select species of crocodile skinks, but they still recorded 6,805 imports between 2000 and 2016. The researchers also spotted a number of crocodile skinks for sale at Japanese pet shops and expos, indicating that Japan is importing them.All told, the available data for the crocodile skink trade were “confusing, irregular and far from complete,” Shepherd and Janssen reported. The sparse data they were able to dig up depended entirely on the diligence and willingness of importing countries to actually create records and make them publicly available.Indeed, most countries’ customs agencies only concern themselves with CITES-listed species, says John Scanlon, the former Secretary-General of CITES, who was not involved in the research. If animals arrive that aren’t on that list, “there is no check on whether the specimens have been legally sourced and there is no mandated reporting on the trade.”This includes many threatened and even critically endangered species, and many more that are protected domestically in their home ranges. “They’re not on CITES because no one has championed them yet,” says Vincent Nijman, an anthropologist at Oxford Brookes University, in the U.K. “If no one proposes a listing, then nothing will happen.”The problem disproportionately affects reptiles, amphibians, songbirds, invertebrates, fish, and small mammals—easily overlooked species that are nevertheless traded in the hundreds of thousands to millions each year. Local hunters in many countries increasingly report that many such animals are becoming harder to find or even have disappeared, Shepherd says, but most policy makers, activists, and conservationists remain oblivious to those species’ plights.“By and large, people have a very limited view of what international wildlife trade is, because they always see the same few species, all of which are mammals and all of which are traded, at most, in the tens of thousands,” Nijman says. “For people who are actually more aware of the full scope of wildlife trade, tens of thousands is a Wednesday afternoon.”Expecting countries suddenly to add tens of thousands of overlooked species to CITES is not realistic. “Who has time to look into all of these species and to figure out what the scope of international trade is and how it affects wild populations?” Nijman says. “You’d need an army of people—it’s simply not workable.”To get around that, rather than list one species at a time, Shepherd advocates for adding whole groups of actively traded plants and animals, as was previously done for parrots, primates, raptors, orchids, and cats. This would behoove countries to monitor and report trade in all species that fell under the protective group umbrella, providing an early warning if populations begin to decline.“Sure, people will complain that there’s a lot more paperwork, but I’d rather see a lot more paperwork being done than species disappearing,” Shepherd says. “If countries care about the conservation of their wildlife, then preventing overexploitation is essential.”",
"A female eastern black rhino (Diceros bicornis michaeli) named Imara, at Great Plains Zoo in South Dakota.GenevaEvery three years, there’s a global meeting to talk about the international wildlife trade—worth billions of dollars annually. At issue is an overarching question: How to balance this international commerce—which includes exotic pets, furs, and timber—without driving species to extinction.The meetings are convened by the members of the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES), a treaty enacted in 1975. (Learn more about the treaty here: CITES, explained.)Among the matters the 183 members will address at the latest meeting—which runs from August 17 through August 28 in Geneva, Switzerland—are the future of the ivory trade, illegal killings of rhinos and the rhino horn trade, management of African elephant populations, and the booming exotic pet business.Wildlife Watch will be closely tracking the event. Find our stories from CITES here and read briefs below on this news ticker, which will be updated live throughout the conference. You can also follow our tweets at @Dina_Maron, @rfobar, @Rachael_Bale.August 29 – During the final two days of the meeting – a time known officially as the plenary – almost all the decisions from earlier in the summit were approved. But one key issue was reopened and took up a large portion of the debate. Learn about that decision and its implications: African elephants can now rarely be caught in the wild and sent to faraway zoos.-Dina Fine MaronGuitars and violins are often made with dense, tropical hardwood called rosewood, though the greatest demand for this wood is for traditional-style furniture in China. The world’s most trafficked wild product by value as well as by volume, rosewood is now listed under Appendix II of CITES.Today the Conference of the Parties accepted a proposal from Canada and the European Union that would allow certain exemptions of rosewood use—including for finished musical instruments and component parts that contain rosewood, following the recommendation of a working group on this topic. Other finished rosewood products, such as small handicrafts weighing less than 10 kilograms per shipment, would also be exempt (that’s a change from an earlier proposal that had put the limit at 500 grams per item).Charles Barber, the director of the forest legality initiative for the nonprofit World Resources Institute and a member of the rosewood working group, said, “The exemption for finished musical instruments is a common-sense measure that rectifies a key implementation barrier for the otherwise essential rosewood listing decided at COP-17 in October 2016.”Barber explains, that with the change, “Rosewood raw material that goes into instruments remains regulated under CITES, but once it is transformed into a finished musical instrument, it will no longer need CITES documentation. This removes a major administrative burden on CITES authorities that did not have any substantive conservation impact. The driver of the illegal and unsustainable global rosewood boom is the China-based hongmu replica antique furniture industry, and this is where the focus of CITES regulation and implementation should [be].”-Dina Fine MaronAlmost 20 amphibian and reptile proposals considered today—including one to increase regulations protecting the Union Island gecko and controversial proposals for the tokay gecko and Indian star tortoise—stemmed from concerns over the burgeoning appetite for the exotic pet industry.They all passed, with two exceptions—a proposal that was withdrawn before any debate and another that sought to list the more than 100 species of glass frogs, which failed to get the required two-thirds majority.Amphibians and reptiles are often popular as pets for their attractive coloring or rarity. The proposal today to list a shy Caribbean lizard called the Union Island gecko on Appendix I, a designation that would ban all international commercial trade, was accepted by consensus with no objections.This little lizard (sometimes known as the Grenadines clawed gecko) was discovered in 2005, yet poachers soon smuggled so many from Saint Vincent and the Grenadines for the exotic pet industry that local officials and herpetologists abroad became concerned. There are now estimated to be no more than 10,000 of them left—an 80 percent loss in the wild, according to a representative for Saint Vincent and the Grenadines. (Learn more: This lizard is now a coveted pet and critically endangered. How did this happen?)Separately, the tokay gecko—poached for both the exotic pet trade and for wide use to combat various maladies in traditional Chinese medicine—netted an Appendix II listing today, with a vote of 103 in favor, 17 opposed, and 18 abstentions. That listing means the trade in the species will still be allowed, but only with proper paperwork. The lizard, which lives throughout Southeast Asia, is one of the world’s largest geckos—sometimes reaching 15 inches long. China objected to the listing.The tokay protection proposal had been brought by the European Union, India, the Philippines, and the United States. The U.S., a top destination for them as pets, said tokays taken from the wild are often falsely claimed to have been captive bred and that the new listing will help in monitoring and regulating their trade to protect them from a slide toward extinction. (Learn more about the trade in tokay geckos: How the international trade in geckos is a scam.)The Indian Star Tortoise, which received approval for an Appendix I listing today, has no known captive breeding facilities and is heavily poached for the exotic pet industry. The species lives only in three countries (India, Pakistan, and Sri Lanka), and Sri Lanka said it’s “critical” to give it immediate Appendix I protections, which would ban all international commercial trade. The EU, which supported the proposal, said that tens of thousands of Indian star tortoises are taken for the illegal trade each year.Glass frogs—the only proposed species in this block that failed to get new protections—are popular among collectors in the EU and the U.S. because of their unique appearance: Their internal organs are visible through their skin.Costa Rica, El Salvador and Honduras had proposed putting all 104 species of glass frogs on Appendix II. They wanted all species to be regulated in case protecting one type of glass frog led to increased poaching of other lookalike species that hadn’t previously been in demand. In addition to losses from poaching, many species are being undermined by habitat loss. The effort just failed to garner a two-thirds majority, with 75 in favor, 40 opposed, and 11 abstentions.Of the raft of new amphibian and reptile protections, Jordi Janssen, a program officer with Monitor, a British Columbia-based organization dedicated to combating illegal wildlife trade, said, “For many of these species, their listing on the CITES appendices will result in much-needed monitoring and regulation of the international trade. For example, the tokay gecko is traded in the millions every year. If trade is not monitored, we might only find out if trade is threatened its survival after it’s already too late. We therefore need these mechanisms to keep a finger on the pulse and ensure trade is not at threat to these species.”South Africa noted during comments on a proposal to list the Grandidier's Madagascar Ground Gecko in Appendix II (which passed by consensus) that CITES listing decisions alone won’t go far enough to solve the exotic pet trade problems. To truly safeguard species, South Africa suggested, programs to change attitudes and behavior are needed.-Dina Fine MaronA controversial proposal to list woolly mammoth as a regulated species under CITES has been officially withdrawn after it looked unlikely to pass. If the bid had passed muster with the Conference of the Parties, it would have been the lone example of an extinct animal being treated as an endangered species.The proposal, put forward by Israel, was intended to enhance protection of elephants from the illegal ivory trade, because carved mammoth ivory is largely indistinguishable from that of elephants. The trade in mammoth ivory—sometimes known as ice ivory—has grown in recent years as permafrost in Siberia has melted, making the remains of these long extinct animals more accessible. (For more context on today’s decision, and details about the mammoth ivory trade, read: Woolly mammoths are extinct. Here’s why they may be considered ‘endangered.’)Neither the scale of the mammoth ivory trade nor the rate of mislabeling elephant ivory as mammoth is well documented, and Israel had hoped to get a clearer picture with an Appendix II listing for woolly mammoth products since the listing would have required proper paperwork for any trade in mammoth ivory.Russia, the main exporter of mammoth ivory, opposed the proposition. Representatives from Canada, the United States, and the European Union also objected, saying there’s insufficient evidence that an Appendix II listing would help elephants and a lack of data establishing that mislabeling elephant ivory has become a significant problem. In addition, Canada and the U.S. said that the listing would put a significant burden on law enforcement and exporters.In place of its original proposal, Israel ultimately offered an alternative. It asked for a study on the trade in mammoth ivory and its contribution to the illegal trade in elephant ivory and elephant poaching. That proposal passed by consensus.Shira Yashphe, a member of Israel’s CITES delegation, said they hope to get the study’s results in time for a CITES panel meeting next spring or summer, leading to a reopened, and informed, discussion at the next Conference of the Parties, three years from now. The study would be conducted by an external group, yet to be determined, and will require funding by CITES members and NGOs.All decisions must still be finalized by the plenary and will not be reopened for discussion unless one-third of CITES members request reconsideration.--Dina Fine MaronThe world’s smallest otter—the Asian small-clawed otter—gained new protections in a vote today that, if confirmed by the plenary, will ban all international commercial trade.The animal was once widespread in Southeast Asia, but poaching and wetland habitat loss have contributed to a population decline of more than 30 percent during the past three decades, according to the International Union for the Conservation of Nature, which sets the status of endangered species of animals and plants.India, Nepal, and the Philippines proposed moving the otter from Appendix II to Appendix I—which would ban all international commercial trade—but Indonesia said yesterday that uplisting the species was inappropriate because it believes that trade in the animal for its pelt, for traditional medicine, and for the exotic pet industry has been mainly from captive-bred, not wild-caught otters. Indonesia instead suggested setting a zero quota for exports of wild-caught Asian small-clawed otters.Nepal, India, and the Philippines declined this alternative suggestion after considering it overnight, but it was voted on today in accordance with convention rules. It failed, with 79 opposed, 30 in favor, and 22 abstentions.The original proposal—to add the species to Appendix I—passed with 86 percent of the vote— 98 votes in favor, 16 opposed, and 14 abstentions.“The #cuteotters craze on social media is driving small-clawed and other otters to extinction,” says Paul Todd, senior attorney at the Natural Resources Defense Council. “People must realize every ‘like’ on an Instagram post of otters in a café or in someone’s living room could mean an otter family group was killed so the pups could be taken for trade. Wild otters won’t last long this way, but today’s decision will help.”The Asian small-clawed otter listing decision, like all CITES committee decisions, must still be finalized by the plenary, which begins proceedings tomorrow.-Dina Fine MaronRead the latest on the decisions against decreasing protections for southern white rhinos in Eswatini (formerly Swaziland) and Namibia: Proposal to open up rhino trade rejected.-Rachel FobarThe growing interest in otters as an exotic pet propelled discussions about two proposals to move the Asian small-clawed otter and the smooth-coated otter from Appendix II to Appendix I of CITES—changes that would end all legal international trade in the animals.Yet in a surprise move today, Indonesia argued that the Asian small-clawed otter trade largely comes from captive-breeding so it opposes the proposal, suggesting instead an amendment that would create a zero quota for commerce in wild-caught Asian small-clawed otters. Instead of voting on the proposal, Indonesia will now meet overnight with the three sponsors of the original proposal—India, Nepal, and the Philippines—and the issue will be discussed further tomorrow.The vote on banning all international trade of smooth-coated otters did go to a vote and passed with 102 for, 15 against, and 11 abstentions. All trade of smooth-coated otters will now be banned, assuming this decision is confirmed by the plenary.“Although the levels and impact of international trade on this otter’s populations are poorly known, the decision to list the smooth-coated otter in Appendix I could spur enforcement efforts,” Kanitha Krishnasamy, the director of the Southeast Asia division of the wildlife monitoring group Traffic, said in a statement. The move will give governments a needed foundation to investigate any claims of captive-breeding operations and to prevent illegal trade and laundering of wild caught otters, Krishnasamy said.Most Southeast Asian countries have enacted their own laws banning the capture, sale, possession, and transport of the creatures, but a black market for both otters continues to thrive. They’re caught for their pelts, for use in traditional medicine, and, increasingly, for sale as pets. Learn more: Wild otters are the latest exotic pet trend.Currently, the hairy-nosed otter is listed on Appendix II of the treaty, and another species, the Eurasian otter, has been on Appendix I since 1977.-Dina Fine MaronRead the latest on the decision to list both species of mako shark under Appendix II: Mako sharks get new protections from trade.-Rachel FobarRead about the latest big elephant and ivory decisions: Proposals to strengthen elephant protections and reopen ivory sales come to a head at global wildlife treaty meeting.-Dina Fine MaronThe saiga antelope, a Central Asian animal listed as critically endangered since 2002, didn’t net enough votes today to move to CITES Appendix I—a designation that would prohibit any international trade in the species. They will still be listed under Appendix II, which allows trade with proper paperwork.Found in Mongolia, Kazakhstan, Uzbekistan, Turkmenistan and Russia, saiga are poached for their horn, coveted for traditional medicine use in China and elsewhere. Saiga also have suffered in recent years from disease and extreme weather.Today’s vote, however, resulted in one change to the saiga’s protections: An annotation was added placing the quota for international commercial trade in wild-caught saiga at zero. With minimal captive breeding of saiga, this change effectively would eliminate any trade in saiga horn. (The vote still needs to be finalized at the plenary.)The annotation is a “step in the right direction” that will “hopefully galvanize more attention on the need for enhanced enforcement in consumer countries,” says Susan Lieberman, vice president of international policy for the New York-based Wildlife Conservation Society. Still, she notes, “I am concerned that some horn could get misidentified as captive bred, but there is a CITES process to deal with that.”-Dina Fine MaronAccording to the International Union for Conservation of Nature (IUCN), giraffe populations have declined up to 40 percent during the past three decades, largely because of habitat loss and fragmentation.Parties today voted to adopt a proposal to restrict trade in giraffes, hunted for their skin, meat, bones, and tails. Several African countries proposed that giraffes, listed by the IUCN as vulnerable, be moved to Appendix II under CITES. This would restrict allowable exports to giraffes that had been hunted legally, as long as those hunts wouldn’t compromise the survival of the species. This decision will be finalized at plenary at the end of Conference of the Parties.Evidence of genetic differences among giraffes has emerged in recent years, suggesting that there are actually four species rather than a single species and nine subspecies as had long been thought. (Read more about how Masai giraffes were recently declared endangered.)“This is wonderful news for giraffes, and we’re grateful for the U.S.’s and all the international support for everyone’s favorite long-necked mammal,” says Tanya Sanerib, international legal director at the Center for Biological Diversity. “With fewer giraffes than elephants in Africa, it was a no-brainer to simply regulate giraffe exports.”-Rachel FobarThis afternoon in Geneva, a proposal calling for the closure of all domestic ivory markets was voted down. Instead, the Conference of the Parties called for countries to report back about their domestic ivory market plans by the next Standing Committee meeting, which will likely take place in the spring or summer of 2020.Although most of the CITES proposals on the elephant ivory trade are focused on international commerce, conservation groups and dozens of country representatives have argued that domestic ivory markets create opportunities for laundering ivory.The proposal to call for domestic market closures had been brought forward by a coalition of mostly African nations that included Burkina Faso, Côte d’Ivoire, Ethiopia, Gabon, Kenya, Liberia, Niger, Nigeria, and the Syrian Arab Republic. The decision could still be reconsidered at the plenary next week, but was decided by consensus so it is unlikely to be brought back.While the United States, United Kingdom, and China have closed their domestic ivory markets in recent years, Japan and the EU have faced criticism for keeping theirs open. (Some EU nations, including France and Luxembourg, however, have banned domestic trade.) Japan’s domestic ivory market has been described by the wildlife monitoring group Traffic as “one of the largest in the world.”“Legal ivory markets and a lack of action against large illegal markets in certain countries continue to provide opportunities for criminal syndicates to traffic ivory,” Matt Collis, head of the International Fund for Animal Welfare’s delegation to CITES, said in a statement following the vote. “We urge countries whose legal domestic markets remain open, particularly Japan and the EU, to close them as a matter of urgency, and hope they will be in a position to report back on such steps at the next CITES conference.”-Dina Fine MaronParties have voted to allow South Africa to increase its annual export quota for black rhino hunting trophies. The current quota allows for five adult male trophies, but the new quota will allow a number not exceeding half a percent of the country’s total black rhino population—a maximum of about 10 animals. Adult males will be targeted to protect breeding females.South Africa argued that the money raised from trophy hunting helps support conservation. Black rhinos are threatened by poaching, but according to the conservation nonprofit Save the Rhino, populations in the country increased from about 800 in 1992 to more than 2,000 by the end of 2017.Botswana, Zimbabwe, Eswatini (formerly Swaziland), the EU, and Canada also supported the measure.This matter must now be confirmed or rejected at the plenary, at the end of the Conference of the Parties, when all appendix change proposals, resolutions, and decisions passed in committee are officially adopted.-Rachel FobarIn a surprise early vote, parties voted in committee to amend a resolution to limit the trade in live, wild-caught African elephants to range countries only. This issue has received international attention following the shipment of young elephants from Zimbabwe to China in 2015 and from Eswatini (formerly Swaziland) to U.S. zoos in 2016.Zimbabwe, the U.S., and the European Union spoke against the move. "Live sales are part of our management tools," the Zimbabwe delegate said, and those sales raise funds for conservation.Kenya, Niger, and Burkina Faso spoke in support of it. "We all agree these are intelligent creatures with complex social links," the Burkina Faso delegate said of elephants, arguing that they cannot thrive in captivity.The European Union, which acts as a bloc but has 28 individual votes, asked for the vote to be postponed, but the chair rejected the call.There were 46 yes votes and 18 no votes, with the European Union neither voting nor abstaining. Had they voted no, the resolution would not have passed. The proposal must now be confirmed or rejected at the plenary, which comes at the end of the Conference of the Parties and is where all appendix change proposals, resolutions, and decisions passed in committee are officially adopted. While many elephant campaigners were pleased at the show of support, they are concerned that the debate could be reopened at the plenary and that the EU parties would vote no, reversing today's approval.-Rachael Bale-Dina Fine Maron",
"To address what it says is an elephant overpopulation problem and make some money, Zimbabwe has sold young elephants to China in recent years.GenevaYesterday at the 18th triennial meeting of an international wildlife trade treaty, countries approved a proposal that limits the export of wild African elephants. It says that elephants from Botswana, Zimbabwe, Namibia, and South Africa can only be exported to African countries where elephants live or used to live. There’s one exception: Export may be allowed if a country can prove that there’s a real conservation benefit to sending an elephant elsewhere.The proposal proved to be one of the most contentious topics of the entire two-week meeting of the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Fauna and Flora (CITES), in which 182 countries and the European Union gathered to discuss trade regulations. (Learn more: Read about other big decisions from the conference.)Animal welfare groups and many conservation organizations lauded the decision, although some southern African countries objected vehemently, and the U.S. and a European zoo association expressed reservations.“It’s a huge victory for animal welfare that the abduction of baby elephants from their families to be held in zoos has been banned,” says Frank Pope, CEO of the Nairobi-based nonprofit Save the Elephants. Many other animal welfare and conservation organizations echoed these sentiments.The capture and sale of live elephants has come under increasing criticism as scientists have learned more about the complexities of elephant behavior and intellect. Elephants often refuse to leave their sick or dying behind. They’re smart, social creatures with family bonds that last a lifetime. And in recent years, evidence has stacked up that they use tools, work together to achieve common goals, mourn their dead, and are capable of empathy. During certain times of the year African savanna elephants are highly gregarious, with hundreds gathering together.Taken together, those facts make it particularly troubling to many scientists and animal welfare groups when elephants, often young ones, are separated from their families in the wild to be sold to zoos.“Like us, elephants feel joy when reunited with family and grief when brutally separated. Like us, they need friends and space to thrive. The physical and psychological harm caused to individual elephants by their traumatic capture and their impoverished lives in captivity is well-documented,” says Joyce Poole, an elephant behavior expert and National Geographic Explorer. Young elephants are particularly vulnerable. Family separation can cause psychological trauma, resulting in conditions that include depression, anxiety, aggression, and, sometimes, premature death.A few southern African countries—notably Zimbabwe, which has an estimated 82,000 elephants, and Botswana, with some 130,000—say they’re increasingly faced with two problems that require such sales: keeping these wild animals away from humans and their lands, where they can destroy crops and kill people, and offsetting the costs of conservation by profiting from the nations’ wildlife.A solution, those countries argue, is to sell elephants to zoos around the world. Zimbabwe, for example, has made a recent habit of selling calves to China, and Eswatini (formerly Swaziland) shipped 17 of its elephants to U.S. zoos in 2016, saying they would have been culled otherwise.Wild African elephants are sold to zoos around the world. On August 27, a majority of the 183 members of the international treaty that regulates the global wildlife trade concluded that continuing this practice is unacceptable. Many elephant experts decry forcibly taking these intelligent, sensitive, social animals away from their herds.The shipment of mostly young wild elephants from Africa is a relatively new phenomenon. Before the mid-1990s, calves typically were captured only as a by-product of adult culling operations, according to documents submitted to CITES.Chinese zoos, for example, have imported more than a hundred young elephants from Zimbabwe since 2012, according to Humane Society International. The imports have drawn international condemnation from that group and other animal welfare advocates. Zimbabwe officials say their country should be allowed to manage its wildlife as it likes.Yesterday during debate, the EU suggested that the proposal be amended to allow the export of elephants beyond range states in “exceptional circumstances.” That would require demonstrating that the transfer of those elephants provides conservation benefits to the species. Elephant expert groups at CITES and the International Union for Conservation of Nature (IUCN), which sets the conservation status of species, would need to be convinced of the benefits for approval to be granted.The United States voted against the amended proposal. A spokeswoman for the U.S. delegation to CITES, Barbara Wainman, told National Geographic that the U.S. rejects any limitations on where elephants can be sent that are based on geography, rather than “on suitability of a facility being equipped to house and care for elephants.”Wainman said that the U.S. stance is that a different provision of the treaty adequately lays out the science-based approach for decisions about where to send elephants. She said that further provisions aren’t needed to define what destinations are “appropriate and acceptable.”Meanwhile, the European Association of Zoos and Aquaria (EAZA) said in a statement, “EAZA welcomes the practical outcome of the vote, which will prevent the import of wild caught elephants to inappropriate destinations.” But EAZA expressed concern that the new restrictions could undermine the CITES regulatory framework by treating elephants that are in a category with less stringent protections from international trade (such as those in Botswana and Zimbabwe) as essentially equivalent to elephants that have been given the highest level of protection.It’s unclear whether this decision will have any impact on U.S. zoos’ ability to import elephants. Dan Ashe, president and CEO of the Association of Zoos and Aquariums, which accredits 236 facilities in the U.S., says that having elephants in zoos supports the animals’ conservation beyond the funds that zoos contribute for their conservation in the wild. “Does it benefit elephants to have a public aware of what is happening?” he says. “It’s absolutely essential to conservation of wildlife that people…have an emotional connection and feel empathy for animals.” Seeing them in well managed zoos creates that connection and understanding of their status in the wild, Ashe says.Elephants are a draw for the zoo-going public, but the IUCN African Elephant Specialist Group has long expressed concern about “the poor breeding success and low life expectancy of captive African elephants.” Zoos, therefore, sometimes look abroad to add elephants to their facilities.“Merely sending a wild elephant to a zoo doesn't meet this requirement” of having a conservation benefit, notes Colman Criodain, a wildlife practice policy manager at the World Wildlife Fund. The IUCN African Elephant Specialist Group also holds this view. The key, Criodain says, will be how zoos demonstrate the benefit.The IUCN African Elephant Specialist Group also says it doesn’t believe there’s any conservation benefit for wild elephants taken into captivity and “does not endorse the removal of African elephants from the wild for any captive use.” This seems to imply that the IUCN will set a high standard for what constitutes “exceptional circumstances.”Mark Jones, the head of policy for the United Kingdom-based Born Free Foundation, a group that opposes taking any animals from the wild, says of yesterday’s vote, “This outcome may not be perfect and watertight, but it is an outcome that sets a strong precedent and takes us much further down the road toward permanently ending the taking of elephants from the wild for captive facilities.”Moreover, he says, it’s concerning that the new determination applies only to elephants that don’t have the most stringent CITES trade protections. Countries with elephant populations at particular risk of extinction, such as Eswatini, which shipped 17 elephants to three U.S. zoos in 2016, wouldn’t be covered and potentially could still make a case to export elephants.When introducing the amended proposal, the European Union said that it hasn’t imported any live elephants during the past decade and has no intention of doing so in future. During the debate, China didn’t indicate its future intentions. Neither did the United States.",
"It has become rare for wild African elephants to live to old age, thanks to their brutal slaughter by ivory poachers. Rarer still is the chance for scientists to observe elephants as they cope with the death of their family leader.Shifra Goldenberg, a Colorado State University doctoral student, is among the lucky few. She watched the final days as Queen Victoria, one of the last surviving old matriarchs in the Samburu National Reserve in northern Kenya, died of natural causes in 2013, with her family members close by. When Goldenberg returned to the carcass a few weeks later, she encountered elephants from three separate families inspecting the bones. Were they paying respect?Goldenberg’s 15-minute video of the elephants’ investigation, made available exclusively to National Geographic for the first time, is an important new addition to the growing body of research about the complexity of elephant thought and perception and their responses to death. The video not only captures an important ritual of elephant behavior, but reveals new insights about the strength of social bonds.Although the three families were not related to Victoria, they knew her, Goldenberg says, and clearly showed a connection to her by lingering over her carcass.“What the family was doing was interesting, but what her non-relatives were doing is also important,” Goldenberg says. “You see their investigation of the body. You see calves walking past and smelling it. It is amazing to see that level of fascination. Her family was distressed that she wasn’t getting up. But the larger population also was interested in her death.”Elephants have long been regarded for their ability, along with dolphins and chimpanzees, among others, to express emotion, even empathy. But their response to death remains a mystery. Do they have the human characteristic of grief? The examples are mounting, though the science remains incomplete.Other animals do not show great interest in the bodies of their dead. African elephants do. They have scattered their family members’ bones. They have been known to raise a foot over an elephant body. The relatives of Eleanor, another matriarch at the Samburu Reserve, pulled and pushed her carcass for nearly a week after she died in 2003. Some rocked back and forth, while others stood silently.Elephants also distinguish between elephant remains and other large mammals. In tests to measure their interest, they chose the skull of an elephant over the skulls of a buffalo and rhinoceros.George Wittemyer, a Colorado State University conservation biologist who has been studying elephants at the Samburu Reserve since 1997, says elephants have “a fascination with death” that is difficult to interpret.“Elephants have respect for their dead, but their interaction with their dead is not something we fully understand,” says Wittemyer, who also heads Save the Elephants’ scientific board.“Every time it happens, it’s not the same, but it is striking behavior—not based on survival or necessity, but based on some sort of emotion," he says. "The fact that they interact and have behavioral interactions with their dead in a form that is not explainable in any simple, evolutionary context speaks to the deeper emotional lives of elephants that we can’t easily study.”But he stops short of diagnosing grief. To know that is to know what animals are thinking.Barbara King, emeritus professor of anthropology at William & Mary in Virginia and author of How Animals Grieve, disagrees.“I have no doubt that elephants grieve,” she says. “We know these are smart and emotional creatures. We don’t need to know what they are thinking. With grief, we have to know that the survivor’s behavior is significantly altered from normal baseline, such as altered social withdrawal, feeding, sleeping, body posture that is sustained in some way.”In the three years since her book was published, King says, reports of animal grief, based on altered behavior, are accelerating and a database is gaining heft. She adds: “It’s also very important to know when there isn’t grief.”Victoria headed an elephant group known on the Samburu Reserve as the Royal family, a group of about 20 elephants all named after kings, queens, and other royalty around the world. The Royals is one of the largest and most dominant families in the reserve, with four large breeding females, including Victoria’s sisters, Anastasia and Cleopatra, now the new de-facto heads of the family.Victoria was born in 1958, five years before Kenyan independence. When she died on June 12, 2013, at age 55, the reserve had been under siege for several years from poachers targeting older matriarchs, and enduring a severe drought that killed an additional number of older elephants, leaving a much younger elephant population today.“Families like the Royals remind us of what the society should look like,” Goldenberg says. “While it saddened us to see her die, dying naturally on a quiet afternoon by the river, surrounded by her family was a far more peaceful way to go than what other elephants have been experiencing across Africa.”Goldenberg saw Victoria the day before she died when the family stopped for water in the heat of the day in a favorite spot along the banks of the Ewaso Ngiro River.“She looked stressed, but she was feeding and seemed relatively normal,” she says. “Her temporal glands behind the eyes were streaming, which they do when elephants are emotionally elevated.”The next day, when Goldenberg returned, Victoria lay in the bushes near the river, and when the family moved away from the river bank, she did not get up. Her daughter Noor, 10, lingered before rejoining the group. Victoria’s son Malasso, 13, poked her with his tusks, possibly in an effort to help raise her onto her feet. The day after Victoria died, other family members, including Malasso and Margaret, an adult female, visited her body.Predators moved in immediately, and by the time Goldenberg returned, the carcass had been worked over. Still, the other elephant families were undeterred from their inspection of the bones.“I wouldn’t say they were mourning,” she says. “That would be to know what they are thinking. But there is clear interest there and they are taking it in. There is something going on.”Follow Laura Parker on Twitter.",
"Asian elephants caress each other when stressed.The short list of animals that console stressed-out friends just got longer … and heavier.Asian elephants, like great apes, dogs, certain corvids (the bird group that includes ravens), and us, have now been shown to recognize when a herd mate is upset and to offer gentle caresses and chirps of sympathy, according to a study published February 18 in the online journal PeerJ.Joshua Plotnik, a behavioral ecologist at Mahidol University in Kanchanaburi, Thailand, and primatologist Frans de Waal, director of Emory University's Living Links Center, have shown through a controlled study what those who work with elephants have always believed: The animals, in this case captive Asian elephants (Elephas maximus), offer something akin to humans' sympathetic concern when observing distress in another, including their relatives and friends.Intimate GesturesThe scientists studied 26 elephants of varying ages at the Elephant Nature Park in the Mae Tang district of Chiang Mai Province, Thailand. (Adult male elephants were excluded for safety reasons.)It would be unethical to set up stressful situations, so they instead waited patiently for such moments to occur naturally.A stress-inducing situation might be a dog walking by or a snake rustling the grass, or the roar or just the presence of a bull elephant. Sometimes the stressor was unknown. Regardless, scientists know elephant distress when they see it: erect tails and flared ears; vocalizations such as trumpeting, rumbling, or roaring; and sudden defecation and urination tell the story.Over the course of a year, they spent up to two weeks per month and three hours daily observing the animals.During these observations, the scientists witnessed bystander elephants—those not directly affected by a stressor—moving to and giving upset elephants physical caresses, mostly inside the mouth (which is kind of like a hug to elephants) and on the genitals. (Also see "African Elephants Understand Human Gestures.")Bystanders also rumbled and chirped with vocal offerings that suggested reassurance. Sometimes the empathetic animals formed a protective circle around the distressed one.There was also evidence of "emotional contagion," when herd mates matched the behavior and emotional state of the upset individual. In other words, seeing a "friend" in distress was distressing to the observers. Those animals also consoled one another."With their strong bonds, it is not surprising that elephants show concern for others," says de Waal, who describes empathy as a "general mammalian trait.""They get distressed when they see others in distress, reaching out to calm them down, not unlike the way chimpanzees or humans embrace someone who is upset."Still, "I was surprised at how consistent the elephants' consolation behavior was," says Plotnik, who is also the founder of the nonprofit Think Elephants International."Whenever an elephant showed signs of distress, a reassuring friend was sure to come console them. The number of times when elephants showed distress without a response from others was very rare."Empathetic ElephantsElephants, whose herds are headed by a matriarch and made of generally related females, babies, and immature males, have long been known to bond strongly with their kind.They celebrate births and mourn the dead. (Watch a video of elephants grieving.) Females will "allomother" (help to raise another's baby) and respond fully and quickly to cries from other mothers' young.Elephants will also aid a weaker animal—such as by helping the injured along—a sign of being able to consider and empathize with another's perspective.Still, points out de Waal, "many people are impressed by elephant intelligence, but actual hard data are scarce. We need to study them just as carefully as we do primates, dogs, or corvids." (Read "Elephants Use Their Trunks to Ace Intelligence Tests.")Keeping the peace is certainly valuable to all animals in a group, so one animal "making up" with another after a conflict makes sense for all. But bystander empathy—just being a concerned friend—takes things to a different emotional level.The Road to KindnessPlotnik says not only is this work fascinating from the "what other animals are capable of" perspective, it's also a wonderful example of convergent evolution, which occurs when similar traits or behaviors (in this case empathy/consolation) evolve separately (for example, in apes and elephants) as a result of similar environmental pressures."I find this very exciting, because it suggests that the buck does NOT stop with us humans when it comes to smarts!" he says. (Read "Inside Animal Minds" in National Geographic magazine.)Also, "the more we learn about how elephants think; make decisions; and see, hear, and smell their worlds, the better perspective we will have when trying to find ways to mitigate conservation problems," he says.In the meantime, it will require more studies to figure out exactly how both givers and receivers benefit from this caring display by elephants. But the nonhuman road to kindness appears to be reaching new lengths.Jennifer S. Holland has written about animal empathy in her two books Unlikely Friendships and Unlikely Loves. Follow her on Twitter.",
"Another elephant may have inflicted a tusk wound on this female in the Qingyuan quarantine facility, in China’s Guangdong Province. The bulge on the inside of her left back leg is likely an abscess, says Scott Blais, of the Global Sanctuary for Elephants. In July, 24 young elephants were flown to China from Zimbabwe.New photographs and video exclusive to National Geographic suggest that two dozen young elephants flown to China from Zimbabwe in July are being mistreated and are slipping into poor health, according to analysts who have examined the images.The elephants—many no more than two or three years old—are being held in at the Qingyuan quarantine facility in Guangdong Province, awaiting transfer to Chimelong Safari Park, also in Guangdong.In late 2014, the elephants were taken from their mothers and families in Zimbabwe’s Hwange National Park, where they were held in a capture unit before the airlift.Several conservation and animal welfare groups have decried the export and confinement of the youngsters—wild animals recognized for their high intelligence, emotional capacity, and cooperative nature. The concerns about the elephants—and about the Zimbabwe’s controversial decision to capture the animals and sell them to Chinese interests—come at a time when elephants across sub-Saharan Africa increasingly are threatened by poachers who often kill elephants for their ivory, which is particularly coveted in Asia.The images of the elephants were taken surreptitiously by Chunmei Hu, a project manager with Nature University, a Beijing-based organization. She has gone into the quarantine facility twice during the past three months to take pictures and video of the elephants. Her first foray went without incident. But the second time, she says, she was caught by security guards and taken to the local police station. Officers demanded her camera’s memory card, but she refused to give it up. She was later released, and the images were made available to National Geographic.It’s clear, said Blais after reviewing images of the elephants, that the animals aren’t getting medical treatment for their injuries. “Every day,” he says, “they’ll become less and less who they are supposed to be.”Two young elephants, around four years old, greet one another. According to Joyce Poole, cofounder of ElephantVoices, a research group in Kenya, says the elephant on the right has a swelling on her abdomen that “could be caused by an infection. In the wild, we see such swellings on elephants when they have a spear or arrow wound, or sometimes, after giving birth.”Seven of the elephants mill about under a netting, which may be intended to provide shade. One of the handlers walks away carrying a long pole used to discipline the elephants. According to Poole, the elephant in the foreground is watching him with a mixture of aggression and fear.This elephant, taken from her mother in the wild in Zimbabwe months ago, may not be even two years old, Poole says.National Geographic asked Joyce Poole, who is widely viewed as the world’s leading elephant communication specialist and is co-founder of ElephantVoices, a Kenya-based research and advocacy group, to review the video and photos. Poole said that what’s happening to the elephants is “tragic and morally reprehensible.”She said the elephants appear to be struggling physically and mentally. They’re “pushing, shoving, and tusking each other, and this is likely the cause of the larger abscesses and open wounds that are visible on a number of elephants.”According to Poole, this abnormal behavior “is caused by their being held captive without adequate space and without older elephants to protect them and to intervene in disputes.”Hu’s video appears to show two men with long poles scaring three calves from their outdoor pen into the adjoining indoor enclosure.Scott Blais, CEO of the Global Sanctuary for Elephants, a Tennessee-based organization that aims to create a network of refuges for captive elephants, also analyzed the photos.Blais said it appears that the elephants’ wounds aren’t being treated. He noted that urine and fecal stains are present on every elephant. “Due to their small confines,” Blais said, “it’s impossible for them to escape their own waste at night.”Officials in China have declined to comment. But on Thursday, China’s Xinhua News Agency released photographs of about half of the animals at Chimelong. The elephants appear to be in better shape than those in Chunmei’s images. Caption information supplied by Xinhua said that “24 African elephants were imported from Zimbabwe … as a part of (an) international African elephant conservation program.”On Friday, China President Xi Jinping and U.S. President Barack Obama made a joint pledge to try to end the ivory trade, the White House announced. The move followed Xi’s announcement in May that China would crack down on that country’s domestic ivory trade.Export of elephants is sanctioned under the Convention on International Trade in Wild Species of Fauna and Flora (CITES), as long as the trade of individual animals or plants doesn’t threaten the long-term survival of the species. (See “Why It’s So Hard To Stop Zimbabwe’s Export of Baby Elephants”).Zimbabwe officials have justified the sale of elephants to China on grounds that Hwange National Park has too many elephants and that it’s a way to help fund its impoverished park system.The grass at the center of the enclosure is too short to provide forage, Poole says, and there are no other signs of food for the roughly 14 elephants here. “They’re all gravitating to the edge of the enclosure where tree trunks provide shade and protection for grass to grow.”According to Poole, the skin of these elephants looks in poor condition. A couple of elephants’ tusks appear to have broken off at the lip. “This is highly unusual for young elephants, and I am curious to know the cause,” she asks. “Possibilities? Fighting with one another? Breaking them on the bars of the enclosure? Damage during shipment?”Poole acknowledged that the capture and international trade of limited numbers of elephant calves doesn’t endanger the species as a whole.But, she said, “it certainly causes enormous and life-long suffering to individual elephants. What are we, the international community, going to do to stop this outright cruelty that is being sanctioned by an international treaty? We need to either revamp CITES or start a new organization that will.”Zimbabwe exported eight elephants to China in 2012, according to the CITES database."We are only aware of four arriving into China,” says Dave Neale, animal welfare director with Animals Asia, an advocacy group based in Hong Kong. “Three of these four are dead.”",
"The rangers were slogging their way up the mud-slick mountainside in Thap Lan National Park when a hand signal brought our patrol to a sharp halt. A scout up ahead had found a letter “K” carved into the side of a tree. It was the signature of a timber poacher, rumored to be Cambodian, who had evaded capture for months, taunting them each time he pushed deeper into protected Thai territory.Captain Morokot and his scout rushed forward hoping to catch the loggers by surprise, only to find a makeshift abandoned camp. Red Bull energy drink cans and cigarette butts littered the ground.“The poachers have their own lookouts, so it’s getting harder to sneak up on them,” Morokot sighed. “We know some of them were soldiers [because] when we get close, they have no problem shooting at us.”In the mountain jungles of eastern Thailand, a shadowy war is ramping up between poachers and the ill-equipped rangers tasked with stopping them. Surging Chinese demand for so-called “red timbers”—Tamalan, Padauk, Siamese rosewood—has fueled the destruction of forests across Southeast Asia’s backcountry and now threatens to drive some tree species to extinction.Captain Morokot, a ranger in Thailand's Thap Lan National Park, hunts for signs of timber poachers. Many of them target valuable Siamese rosewood.Thap Lan and adjoining parks—part of a complex that has UNESCO World Heritage status—are home to everything from black bears and crocodiles to elephants and tigers. Nearly 150 bird species have been documented in Thap Lan alone, including the green imperial pigeon and stork-billed kingfisher. By cutting down trees and hunting for bush meat, timber thieves are threatening one of the most biodiverse corners of Asia.Linked to multinational criminal syndicates that have systematically clear-cut swathes of neighboring Cambodia, the logging gangs operating in Thailand are well armed, coordinated, and prepared to kill. In 2014, seven Thai rangers died in gun battles with illegal loggers. Two more were killed in a late-night ambush following a November raid on an illegal logging site.“These trees belong to our people,” said Morokot, who first came to Thap Lan as a tourist and was so moved by the richness of the place that he applied for a job to protect it. Now he’s one of dozens of rangers who patrol the 860-square-mile (2,235 square kilometers) reserve, teams so ill-equipped that some men don’t even have guns, and bullets are always in short supply.As timber elsewhere in Thailand runs out, loggers are making more brazen incursions deep into Thap Lan to steal the most prized timber of all: Siamese rosewood. With its darkly rich hues, density, and fine grain, rosewood has long been a favorite in China, where it’s carved into elaborate furniture and religious statues known as hongmu, an antique style that originated centuries ago.Reproduction hongmu furniture has become a status symbol of China’s new rich. A 2011 report by the Environmental Investigation Agency, a U.K.-based NGO, says demand for Ming and Qing dynasty-era replica products soared in the run-up to the Beijing Olympics in 2008 and has stayed high. Prices hover around $20,000 a ton, with some varieties spiking as high as $80,000.A smaller, but significant, amount of illegally harvested rosewood makes its way from Southeast Asia via China to the U.S. These exports range from hongmu items sold in Asian furniture emporiums to name brand mail-order coffee tables.Protecting trees is a dangerous job for ill-equipped Thai rangers, who lack sufficient guns and bullets to defend themselves against brazen poachers.“For the last two or three years, it’s just grown out of control,” says Tim Redford, of the Freeland Foundation, an organization funded by the U.S. government that monitors wildlife and trains rangers to combat rosewood poachers. “They’re going in with AK-47s, M-16s, hand grenades detonators.” As rosewood becomes scarcer, he adds, the risks the timber thieves are willing to take are increasing.“What most consumers don’t understand in America is that this wood came from an illegal source,” says Redford, who acknowledges the difficulty of tracing a product’s origins. “People have risked their lives for that timber.”In Thailand, Laos, and Myanmar massive tracts of virgin forest have been razed to sustain the rosewood trade, but no country has lost more than Cambodia. By some estimates, more than a third of its forests disappeared during the past four decades, despite a moratorium on logging and a 2013 ban on the harvesting, sale, and export of Siamese rosewood.In Cambodia, poverty drives many men to timber poaching. One veteran smuggler, who declined to give his name, said he logged rosewood on the Cambodian side for years until the trees ran out. (We were introduced by a local journalist, and he agreed to talk because he was frustrated over the lack of economic opportunities in Cambodia.) Then, under cover of darkness, he began making forays into Thailand, hacking down trunks and selling whatever planks he managed to haul out to army soldiers.A land mine blew off half of his right leg, but with no other way to earn a living, he still crosses the border to search for rosewood, at times taking fire from Thai rangers. “Everybody knows it’s a dangerous job,” he said, “but there’s no choice.”Although Thap Lan rangers haven’t taken any casualties, Wichai Pomleesansumon, the park’s superintendent, says Cambodian poachers operating inside Thailand have been helped out with arms and logistics support from members of the Cambodian military.Valuable "red timber" planks await export in a Cambodian warehouse. Soaring Chinese and U.S. demand for the wood feeds the illicit trade.“A few years back, our rangers were finding Cambodian soldiers' cards left in the jungle, which led us to believe they were the ones doing the logging,” he said. “Now it appears they’re hiring out labor to log for them.” (Cambodia’s military command didn’t respond to requests for comment, but authorities have arrested some soldiers for poaching.)Freeland’s Redford says that stolen wood smuggled on the backs of amphetamine-addled workers or packed in secret truck compartments makes its way to private depots run by a politically connected timber mafia, where it’s mixed in with domestically harvested timber. Paperwork is then issued for export, mainly to China.Ouch Leng, an independent Cambodian investigator who tracks the illicit rosewood trade, says the Cambodian government has bent its own rules to accommodate timber tycoons who in turn provide hefty kickbacks. The first strategy is for officials to grant land concessions, nominally for agriculture purposes, that allow timber to be clear-cut and sold in the process.The second is to convert state public property to private property under the pretext of using it for development. Here again, timber is razed and sold off by the companies. “The country is for sale,” Ouch Leng said.According to Global Witness, a U.K.-based nonprofit that tracks resource exploitation, a timber tycoon named Try Pheap is “at the helm of an illegal logging network that relies on the complicity of officials from government, the military, police and customs to clear rare trees like Siamese Rosewood, traffic logs across the country and load them onto boats bound for Hong Kong” in what amounts to “daylight robbery.” This includes the exclusive right to buy timber seized by any enforcement agenciesRangers in Thap Lan National Park search for traces of illegal loggers, who've become increasingly organized.A February 2015 report alleges that Pheap and his companies have grown rich with illicit logging profits thanks to close ties with Prime Minister Hun Sen, for whom he once served as a personal adviser. Pheap has donated tens of thousand of dollars to the ruling party and holds a royally conferred honorific title—oknha—as a result.Based on the findings of an unpublished 2012 investigation by an international environmental group, the Phnom Penh Post alleged that Pheap made some $220 million trafficking illegally logged rosewood during a recent three-year period.Last month, Pheap was singled out again when a provincial governor told officials gathered at the first meeting of a new anti-logging task force that Pheap had been granted illegal concessions on property inside a wildlife sanctuary—land previously confiscated from companies that had violated the law.Local journalists and investigators who cover logging say they face death threats and have lived in constant fear since the 2012 murder of Chut Wutty, a prominent activist who helped expose a government sell-off of national parkland. He was shot dead by military police. “No one can do anything against the timber mafia because it belongs to Try Pheap,” Ouch Leng said. “He’s the rosewood king.”Prak Vuthy, a Try Pheap Group spokesman, dismissed the allegations.“Maybe all of these accusations are not true,” he said, adding that his boss has operated his businesses within the law, with official paperwork to back it up.Workers in China's Fujian Province craft furniture made from rosewood, long favored for its darkly rich hues, density, and fine grain.Pheap is secretive and avoids interviews, but a museum he’s putting up on the outskirts of Phnom Penh offers a vivid illustration of his wealth and priorities. Made almost entirely out of wood, it rises several stories atop columns of giant rosewood trunks, with a vaulted tile roof and ornate hand-carved molding—a temple to an allegedly tainted fortune.In a separate complex behind the museum, a large anteroom full of polished rosewood furniture—king-size beds, thrones, busts of Khmer kings—opens up to a warehouse stacked high with raw planks of red timber. At first Vuthy denied that any of it was rosewood, calling it “ordinary wood.” But when pressed, he conceded that some was rosewood, handing over documents with Cambodian forestry department stamps confirming its legal provenance.The museum is supposed to open this year, but Try Pheap’s staff says it may be delayed by a shortage of large rosewood trunks.Some of the last virgin rosewood tracts lie just across the Cambodian border in Thailand. Park authorities in Thap Lan confirmed that poachers are coming across in unprecedented numbers, gauged by the volume of arrests and numbers of poachers recorded by camera traps.On the third day of Morokot’s mountain patrol in Thap Lan park, slowed by driving monsoon rains, his scout spotted another “K” carved into a tree. The red hue of the cut indicated it was fresh. Their nemesis might be at hand.Once again, the two men charged ahead in pursuit, with rifles at the ready. They slashed through thorny vines and razor-edged palm leaves the loggers had cut down to slow their advance until a river cut them off.Had the poachers walked upstream, then doubled back in the direction the rangers had just come from? Or had they crossed to the opposite side? Perhaps just one poacher had crossed, as a diversion, while the others double backed up the river.With the trail going cold, and unsure of which way to go, the rangers stuck to their planned route alongside the river, which eventually brought them to a dirt track: the end of another patrol. Dog tired and empty-handed, they were demoralized.At this rate of destruction, Morokot reckoned, all the rosewood trees in Thap Lan would disappear. “Right now we’re just buying more time,” he said.Jason Motlagh is a multimedia journalist and filmmaker. He has won a National Magazine Award for News Reporting and has been a finalist in the reporting category. Follow him on his website and on Twitter.Read more stories about wildlife crime and exploitation on Wildlife Watch. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to ngwildlife@natgeo.com.",
"The Union Island gecko was revealed as new to science in 2005. Poachers have since smuggled so many of the tiny lizards from Saint Vincent and the Grenadines for the exotic pet industry that they now may number no more than 10,000.Father Mark da Silva greeted the two American herpetologists at an airstrip on Union Island, one of more than 30 specks of land in the Caribbean that make up the country of Saint Vincent and the Grenadines. It was a June day in 2005, and they’d come to see a gecko.Not any old gecko. Months earlier when the Catholic priest and avid nature observer was studying plant life on the island, he came upon a creature he’d never seen before. It was a tiny lizard, about two and a half inches long from snout to tail, covered with bull’s-eye patterns of red and black with white centers.Da Silva snapped a photo and asked around if anyone recognized the animal. No one did.Then the herpetologists got involved. Robert Powell, a biology professor at Avila University, in Kansas City, Missouri, and Robert Henderson, a vertebrate zoology expert with the Milwaukee Public Museum, in Wisconsin, had traveled to Saint Vincent and the Grenadines to lay the groundwork for an upcoming student trip. When officials in the country’s forestry department mentioned da Silva’s find, the scientists were intrigued and hopped the short flight to Union Island in the hope of encountering the gecko.Da Silva agreed to show the way, and together the group drove to the lush forest overlooking Chatham Bay, where they retraced his steps. It wasn’t long before Henderson spotted not one but two of the geckos. “We were quite pleased,” Powell remembers in the understated language of scientists.They asked da Silva to co-author a scientific paper describing the discovery—or at least to let them name the gecko after him—but he demurred, Powell says. So in December 2005, they published a scientific paper about the discovery of the Union Island gecko, also known as the Grenadines clawed gecko. They included a note at the end crediting da Silva as the discoverer.What Powell and Henderson didn’t anticipate was how their paper, and subsequent detailed descriptions of the Union Island gecko’s location, would serve as a treasure map for lizard collectors. “When you put this gecko in its natural habitat—a rock crevice or cave or leaf litter—that tends to break up its outline, so rather than being a bright signal, its coloring makes it harder to see,” Powell says. “It serves a biological purpose, but unfortunately it’s attractive enough that it’s appealing to pet connoisseurs.”Under the Saint Vincent and the Grenadines Wildlife Protection Act of 1987, it’s illegal to remove the geckos (or any other wildlife) without written permission. But such is the insatiable appetite for new and exotic pets that collectors learning of the discovery soon descended on the island in search of the tiny reptiles. They smuggled out so many of them that in 2011 the International Union for the Conservation of Nature (IUCN), the body that sets the conservation status of wildlife, categorized the Union Island gecko as critically endangered.But poachers kept coming. Between 2010 and 2018 the density of the geckos in much of their described range shrank by roughly 80 percent, says Jenny Daltry, a senior conservation biologist and head of the Caribbean office for the nonprofit Fauna and Flora International. “It’s surprising how quickly their numbers have dropped. You hear a lot about lions and tigers but not the sheer number of reptiles being traded,” she says.It’s possible, she says, that no more than 10,000 of the geckos now remain on Union Island. Extensive searches in the region by Powell and his team have revealed no geckos outside their forest home above Chatham Bay, an area no bigger than about two city blocks. If that patch of forest is destroyed, the geckos could go extinct. “We hold out hope that there may be others elsewhere, but despite our best efforts we have not found them,” he says.Chris Shepherd, executive director of Monitor, an organization in British Columbia, Canada, dedicated to combating illegal wildlife trade, says demand for pet geckos appears to be on the rise. The animals are particularly popular, he says, because they’re so small and relatively easy to smuggle.The geckos live only in a tiny patch of forest on Union Island. Local warden patrols and motion sensor cameras have been set up to help protect the critically endangered lizards.Recently, Shepherd has found that Union Island geckos are showing up in a variety of European markets, sold as prized pets. He and his colleagues note that at least 36 were advertised online during the past four years. They were listed most often in Germany, the Netherlands, and Austria. Five of the animals were explicitly billed as coming from the wild.Although those numbers may seem insignificant, Shepherd notes that the wild population is quite small and confined to a single area, so each removal could “deal a devastating blow to the long-term survival of the population.” Also, he says, “it’s not known what damage and disruption to the habitat was done when the animals were collected.” Getting a full picture of the illegal trade remains impossible, he adds. “For all we know,” those 36 ads “could be the tip of the iceberg.”With poachers scouring scientific literature for new animals to exploit for the pet industry, the plight of the Union Island gecko is a familiar one.The Roti Island snake-necked turtle, for example, became critically endangered after it was identified as a unique species in Indonesia and described in a journal in 1994. As the IUCN noted in its listing for the turtle, “populations were decimated within five years and the species is now considered commercially and ecologically extinct on Roti.”Similarly, the earless monitor lizard, found only in Borneo, was first described in 2012 in a paper in the Journal of Threatened Taxa. The authors purposely were vague about the lizard’s location, writing that because of “the species’ rareness and its high conservation value, it cannot be ruled out that pet reptile collectors and traders may misuse this additional information.” Although they omitted specific geographic coordinates, the details they provided were useful enough for the most dogged collectors, and soon the animals were being sold in international markets. (The earless monitor lizard’s numbers haven’t yet been formally assessed by the IUCN.)This dire consequence of the scientific process isn’t limited to reptiles. As the discoverers of a rare orchid that grows only in one part of Borneo noted in 2011, although the plant was being sold before they formally described it, the very fact of its documentation will make it a target for commercial collecting. They wrote: “We are presented with a moral issue as taxonomists; describing a new, possibly critically endangered species will increase its commercial value and will further endanger the population.”The year before, a Vietnamese orchid, Paphiopedilum canhii, had been all but wiped out by commercial collectors who removed 99 percent of the plants shortly after its discovery. The rush was driven by the publication of its image on the Internet, by an article in a trade magazine, and by its description in a scientific journal.These days, Powell says, researchers rarely list the precise coordinates of plants and animals.Some journals are also taking the initiative to mitigate the poaching problem. Zhi-Qiang Zhang, chief editor of Zootaxa, for example, describes a policy the journal put in place to safeguard newly discovered species. Scientists may list the location of a species at the county or city level but must not give details of the exact habitats or sites, he says. “For species with sensitive status, such as Union Island geckos, we allow editors to make [a] decision about the details required for publication. We also allow authors to make a statement that [they] can provide detailed info about the site to genuine researchers when they request these in writing,” Zhang wrote in an email.To help protect Union Island geckos, the government of Saint Vincent and the Grenadines is working with environmental groups such as Flora and Fauna International to set up remote surveillance equipment, including camera traps, and oversee local patrols in the area around the animal’s habitat.Wardens patrol the area daily and community groups have also begun tours for tourists to raise awareness about the threats of poaching and development, as well as to highlight the importance of preserving the gecko’s forest habitat.Lizard advocates also hope the 182 countries and the European Union that are the signatories to the treaty that regulates cross-border trade of wildlife—the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Fauna and Flora (CITES)—will vote at their upcoming meeting to ban any international trade of the Union Island gecko. Separately, the Roti Island snake-necked turtle is also under consideration for the strictest level of protection at the meeting, which was to be held in Sri Lanka but has been postponed because of the terrorists attacks there.Even though it’s illegal under Saint Vincent and the Grenadines law to export the geckos, little can be done to stop the global trade unless the animal is listed under CITES, says Rebecca Drury, Fauna and Flora International’s head of wildlife trade and a National Geographic explorer. A CITES trade ban would mean that officials in the EU and elsewhere would have legal grounds to confiscate smuggled geckos.Meanwhile, the little lizard has become something of a darling for the islanders. “They’re quite proud of the geckos,” Drury says, adding that “they’re now featured locally on postcards and on t-shirts sold to tourists.”Reflecting on his team’s original decision to publish the details of the Union Island Gecko’s habitat, Powell says, “If we had to do it over again, we wouldn’t have been as precise in describing the location. I don’t think we could have described the species without saying it was on Union Island, but we would not have narrowed it down as precisely as we did.”Still, he adds, “realistically speaking there are many people on Union that know this is the best patch of intact forest, so someone coming to the island and asking around would be quickly directed to that site. That’s a conundrum.”",
"Pangolins are believed to be the world’s most trafficked wild mammal, killed for their meat or for use as traditional medicine.Traditional Chinese medicine is going global. Earlier this year, Chinese state media reported that 57 traditional medicinal centers were under development in places as far-flung as Poland, the United Arab Emirates, Germany, and France. By some counts, TCM can now be found in more than 180 countries—almost all the world’s recognized nations—and the industry is worth more than $60 billion a year.Now, for the first time, the World Health Organization (WHO) is planning to include traditional medicine diagnoses in its influential medical compendium—making it easier for a traditional Chinese medicine diagnosis such as “wood overacting Earth” to come to a clinic near you. The condition involves stress-related indigestion and is often treated with acupuncture and herbal medicine.Uses of TCM date back more than 2,500 years and are based on concepts such as finding harmony between opposing yet complementary forces. To treat or prevent health problems, practitioners use remedies derived from herbs or animal parts, as well as various mind and body practices, such as tai chi. Robust scientific evidence for the effectiveness of many of these measures is limited.Including traditional medicine in this WHO list, the International Classification of Diseases (ICD), is “a really positive step recognizing traditional Chinese medicine as a medical option to help people,” says Lixin Huang, executive director of the American College of Traditional Chinese Medicine, at the California Institute of Integral Studies, in San Francisco. “I think at the beginning, this will be symbolic because many doctors do not have knowledge of how to include this in their treatments, but now they will recognize this would be an option.”Some conservationists fear that growing interest in Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM) could trigger a boom in the illegal market for pangolin scales. These products are sometimes used in China to help breastfeeding women lactate or to treat asthma—despite a lack of evidence supporting these uses.Although many TCM remedies are derived from herbs, some formulas exploit threatened species, such as the Chinese softshell turtle, an animal believed to have the power to help treat night sweats and muscle spasms.In the United States, TCM practices already have a large following. Acupuncture illustrates how widespread some aspects of TCM have become in hospitals and doctor’s offices. “Forty years ago in the U.S. no one would recognize acupuncture, and it would be illegal to practice, but look at today,” Huang says. The American College of Traditional Chinese Medicine states that acupuncturists are licensed as a profession in 44 states and the District of Columbia, with approximately 27,000 providers offering services.Not everyone is sanguine about greater reliance on TCM. Some conservationists worry that the WHO’s decision, on top of TCM’s growing popularity, may seal the fate of endangered species historically used for traditional curatives—and even send ones not currently threatened into a death spiral because of elevated demand.“It would be totally wrong if respecting the cultural beliefs of one country, China, led to the extinction of Africa’s biological heritage,” says Cathy Dean, chief executive officer of Save the Rhinos, a London-based charity that raises money for rhino conservation. Rhinos and pangolins, she says, are among the beleagured species trafficked to Chinese markets for TCM, and she hopes that the WHO “will take a strong line against the use of animal products, let alone those from endangered species.”The WHO document, which includes all the international codes for medical diagnoses, is scheduled to be submitted to the executive board in January and then be adopted at the World Health Assembly, in Geneva, in May. More than 400 of its codes will pertain to traditional medicine, and each has a specific definition, says Marilyn Allen, who served on the WHO committee incorporating traditional medicine into the ICD. The codes describe a patient’s condition as defined by traditional medicine so there won’t be direct codes for any herbs, says Allen, the public relations and marketing director at the American Acupuncture Council—a group that sells acupuncture malpractice insurance.The ICD could still be modified “based on scientific evidence and needs from the field,” according to the WHO. Some environmental groups are pushing for decision makers to take a second look and more clearly spell out caveats around what wildlife could or should be used—something this compendium for medical diagnoses typically wouldn’t do.“It’s no coincidence that the species most sought after with the TCM trade are the most critically endangered species,” says Chris Shepherd, executive director of Monitor, a British Columbia-based organization combating illegal wildlife trade. “There are a number of species that are already threatened or critically endangered because of the traditional medicine trade. Any growth in that area or in demand for these species could be devastating,” he says, pointing to pangolins, big cats, rhinos, and other threatened animals.The change to the official International Classification of Diseases is not just a matter of paperwork. The ICD is the foundational document for all health trends and statistics globally. It provides the international standard for reporting diseases and health conditions. And it’s used to make insurance reimbursement decisions.In its current draft form, the WHO document explains that the eleventh version of the influential compendium will include codes for “disorders and patterns which originated in ancient Chinese medicine and are commonly used in China, Japan, Korea, and elsewhere around the world. This list represents a union set of harmonized traditional medicine conditions of the Chinese, Japanese and Korean classifications.”Because scant standardized data exist for traditional medicines, the WHO maintains that internationally comparable data on such diagnoses would be a good thing—providing a basis for doing further research into and evaluation of their efficacy. Creating diagnostics categories to report this information in a standardized and internationally comparable manner acknowledges that a condition exists and that it should be counted and compared, the WHO told National Geographic.“Inclusion in the ICD is not a recommendation of a treatment’s efficacy; inclusion acknowledges that a disease or symptom or condition exists and that it should be measured,” WHO spokesman Gregory Hartl wrote in an email. It “does not mean we recommend or condone the use of animal parts such as rhinoceros horns: WHO recommends the enforcement of the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES), which protects rhinos, tigers, and other species,” he said. Hartl says the WHO acknowledges the growing demand for better integration of TCM into mainstream health care and that this ICD addition will help smooth the way.Despite existing legal prohibitions for endangered species, the black market in illegal animal products is flourishing, with many poached animals destined for China—both for traditional medicine and other uses. Pangolins, for example, which are believed to be the most trafficked mammal in the world, are barred from international trade by CITES. Nevertheless, the International Union for the Conservation of Nature, which sets the conservation status of species, estimates that more than a million have been poached from the wild during the past decade. The scaly animals are used in traditional medicine in China and Vietnam and are also poached for their meat.“While species may be protected by national laws and listed by CITES,” Shepherd notes, “It doesn’t mean trade is being adequately regulated; that’s just on paper.”Monitor’s Shepherd, along with his colleague Jordi Janssen, recently published a paper in the peer-reviewed Journal of Asia-Pacific Biodiversity noting how species that aren’t officially regulated by CITES could be threatened by international trade for various purposes. “A lot of trade is not listed by CITES, and often these are low-profile species, not tigers or lions,” says Shepherd. (Read more: The vast majority of animals in the wildlife trade are not protected.)Separate work has found that TCM, in particular, is a driver for such trade. One example Shepherd has studied is the tokay gecko a creature which may be dried and used to combat various maladies. “The tokay gecko is harvested from much of its range in Southeast Asia and sent to China where it is used in TCM by the millions,” he says. “This species is not yet on CITES but surely should be. Many other species of reptiles (snakes and lizards) are exported to China for use in TCM, however very little work has been done on this issue.” (Learn more about the trade in tokay geckos: How the international trade in geckos is a scam.)TCM advocates counter that growth in traditional medicine practices need not harm vulnerable species. There’s never just one traditional treatment for any given malady, Huang says, and students of TCM are taught hundreds of different formulas.More than two decades ago when the World Federation of Chinese Medicine Societies—the official group that dictates what can be used in traditional Chinese medicine—removed rhino horn and tiger bone from its list of products approved for use on patients, substitutes were available to treat the maladies rhino horn and tiger bone were targeting, Huang notes. (Recently, China lifted the ban on using those products for medical purposes but then quickly reinstated it, pending further research.)Alternative options in TCM are often not a one-to-one substitution but instead a formula of various products. Take pangolin, which could be prescribed to reduce swelling or to disperse blood stasis. Depending on the diagnosis, 125 alternatives are available, says Steve Given, a California-based acupuncturist, TCM expert, and American College of Traditional Chinese Medicine dean involved in some of the WHO negotiations. Indeed, practitioners can find alternatives—and need to use them so these species do not go extinct, he says.“Traditional practitioners such as myself in the United States have very successful, happy careers without ever endangering a species,” Given assures. And “many folks in the United States that use TCM are often likely to be vegetarians and don’t want to use any animals.” Instead of using antelope horn—traditionally used to curb tremors—alternative plant substances include Unicaria rhynchophylla (sometimes called cat’s claw herb because of its curled leaves) or an herb in the orchid family called Gastrodia elata, he says. And instead of using tiger bone—traditionally used to treat pain and strengthen ligaments and tendons—a variety of plant products can be substituted in, Given explains. For pain, one could use a plant in the mint family called Salvia miltiorrhiza (otherwise known as red sage) and to help strengthen tendons and ligaments, one could use a different plant in the mistletoe family called Sāng jì sheng (otherwise known as Taxillus chinensis Danser).Conservationists and TCM advocates also agree that the responsibility to safeguard wildlife also extends to consumers themselves. People need to become informed about what cures they’re using and whether their status in the wild is satisfactory, says Thomas Lovejoy, a George Mason University professor and senior fellow at the United Nations Foundation who’s a leading proponent of biodiversity studies.“This is a real concern because we’re in a world where we are running out of ecological resources,” he says. “What may have been a reasonable thing to do—say, using whatever animal or plant for traditional medicine—50 or 100 years ago may not be reasonable to do today.”",
"Using rhino horn and tiger bone for traditional Chinese medicine imperils these endangered creatures, experts say.In China, rhino horn and tiger bone may now be legally used in medical research or traditional medicine following a controversial announcement by the government this morning. The animal specimens may be obtained only from farms, according to the announcement, but conservationists say this surprising move may open the floodgates for a surge in illegal activity and threaten vulnerable animal populations.The move is “very concerning,” says Leigh Henry, director of wildlife policy at the World Wildlife Fund. Discerning what animals were obtained legally from farms rather than illegally from the wild would be incredibly difficult, so this decision would give cover to traffickers, she says. Rhinos and tigers are both endangered in the wild, and their trade is prohibited. “WWF urgently calls on China to maintain the ban on tiger bone and rhino horn trade which has been so critical in conserving these iconic species. This should be expanded to cover trade in all tiger parts and products,” she says.China’s action stands in sharp contrast to the country’s moves to combat poaching in recent years. The country has had a 25-year-old ban in place preventing the import or export of these products. And the World Federation of Chinese Medicine Societies—the official group that dictates what can be used in traditional medicine—also removed rhino horn and tiger bone from its list of products approved for use on patients (though the market still existed for them).Two years ago, China also announced that it would close its domestic ivory market by the end of 2017, earning widespread praise. Conservation groups championed the move as a necessary step to help reduce ivory demand and tamp down poaching of African elephants.Debbie Banks, Tiger Campaign Leader at the Environmental Investigation Agency, a nonprofit with offices in London and Washington, D.C., says that today’s announcement undermines China’s stance on wildlife protection. “China’s reputation as a leader in conservation following their domestic ban on the sale of ivory now lies in tatters,” she said in an email. “The news today,” she says, “seriously jeopardizes the future survival of wild tigers by stimulating demand for their body parts instead of eradicating demand,” adding that it also puts rhinos at risk in their African and Asian range countries. “The news today is a staggering display of brazen disregard for global opinion.”The reason China took this step remains unclear. Chinese officials did not immediately respond to requests for comment. But the growing number of tiger farms in China and efforts to farm rhinos there may be a key driver, environmental groups say. “We’ve been concerned for a long time about the tiger farms in China and the increasing numbers of farms there,” Henry says. “Captive tigers are incredibly expensive to feed and care for, so as these numbers grew, so did pressure on the Chinese government to allow a regulated trade in tiger products. China's decision is what many of us have feared for over a decade.” The Environmental Investigation Agency had reported in 2013 that at least several thousand tigers were being kept at hundreds of farms across the country. Moreover, China also has reportedly started importing rhinos for potential farming. (Learn more: What you need to know about tiger farms.)Susan Lieberman, vice president for international policy at the Wildlife Conservation Society, a New York-based nonprofit working on global conservation, also believes that the growing number of farmed tigers may be a major factor behind China’s decision. The new legality of tiger bone and rhino horn use, she says, will be a major win for traffickers. “You would want there to be a legal market to hide behind,” she says. Without DNA tests of these products, there’s no way to know if their source is a farm or the wild.Rhino horn is made from keratin—a protein found in fingernails and hair—and the product is falsely said to help treat everything from cancer to gout when consumed in its powder form. There are no proven medicinal benefits in humans from either product. The most sparing evidence has been brought to bear claiming that rhino horn may somehow help lower fever, at least in rodents. Certainly, cheaper, more readily available medicines such as acetaminophen or aspirin are far more effective, Lieberman says. Tiger bone crushed and made into a paste has been said to be usable to treat a variety of ailments, including rheumatism and back pain. But Lieberman says, “I know of no evidence for that.”",
"Diane's Bare-hearted glass frog was named after Janet Diane Kubicki, the mother of Brian Kubicki, the study's senior author.Calling all Muppets fans: A new species of see-through glass frog found in Costa Rica looks just like Kermit.The lime-green amphibian, which took the Internet by storm this week, has bulging white eyes with perfect black pupils, much like Jim Henson's musical puppet. (Also see "See-Through Frogs With Green Bones Discovered in Peru.")But this frog can't carry a tune. In fact, it has a long whistle like that of an insect, which, according to a new study, may be why scientists didn't notice it for so long—Costa Rica's last glass frog discovery occurred in 1973.Dubbed Diane's Bare-hearted glass frog (Hyalinobatrachium dianae), the inch-long (2.5 centimeter) amphibian is described February 19 in the journal Zootaxa.Glass frogs, found in Central and South America rain forests, live high in tree canopies near streams and creeks, descending when it's time to breed. (See another picture of a glass frog.)The glass frog's name originates from its translucent, organ-revealing bellies—though the lack of pigmentation is still a mystery to scientists.Their green coloration, on the other hand, helps the nocturnal frogs stay camouflaged on the undersides of leaves during the day.The new frog may look like Kermit, but it's not quite as cuddly: Male glass frogs are very territorial, and will grapple fiercely with other males who trespass on their territory, says Andrew Crawford, a batrachologist at the University of Los Andes in Colombia who wasn't involved in the new research.The purpose of the newfound frog's translucent underside is a mystery.The newfound species inhabits eastern Costa Rica's mountainous forests, which range between 1,300 and 2,500 feet (400 to 800 meters)—prime territory for amphibians, according to biologist Steven Whitfield, who studies frogs in Costa Rica.It's also the altitude at which the deadly chytrid fungus is most widespread. The fungus, which attacks amphibian skin, has resulted in several frog species disappearing from Costa Rica and worldwide since the 1980s, says Whitfield, a National Geographic grantee who was also not part of the new study. (See "Deadly Frog Fungus Pops Up in Madagascar.")Frogs are also threatened by habitat loss due to deforestation, adds Crawford.Considering these threats, finding a real-life Kermit is even more special.Says Whitfield: "It's pretty cool to see that they've found a new species, when there are so many that may have been lost."Follow Ralph Martins on Twitter.",
"Woolly mammoths, long-buried in permafrost—until now—are valued for their “ice ivory.” When carved, their tusks are hard to distinguish from those of elephants.One of the most surprising proposals under discussion at the giant global wildlife trade treaty meeting in Geneva, Switzerland, is about woolly mammoths—creatures that once wandered huge tracts of North America, Europe, and northern Asia—and went extinct more than 4,000 years ago.The move to consider adding an extinct species to the list of living, regulated animals is controversial, since the objective of the CITES treaty is to help prevent species today from being driven to extinction because of the international trade in wildlife products. The treaty doesn’t specifically preclude the listing of extinct species, but it does state that they “should not normally be proposed for inclusion.”The reason for the proposal, which was submitted by Israel? To clamp down on elephant ivory smuggling.“Since mammoth ivory trade is almost totally unregulated and undocumented, and because mammoth ivory is not easily distinguished from elephant ivory, there is a tangible risk of illegal international trade in elephant ivory being facilitated by deliberately mislabeling specimens of elephant ivory as mammoth ivory in order to avoid the requirements of this Convention,” the proposal explains. (Learn more about the ivory trade: under poaching pressure, elephants are evolving to lose their tusks.)Worked ivory from woolly mammoths and elephants have few physical differences. One difference, often invisible to the human eye: Mammoth ivory has an iron phosphate called vivianite, which can cause blue-green or brownish blemishes. Otherwise, the ivories are largely identical. Whole mammoth tusks, though, are easily identified because—unlike those of elephants—they grow in spiral form, resembling a corkscrew.As permafrost has melted in recent years, woolly mammoths long trapped beneath the ice are now increasingly accessible in Siberia, and Russia has become a major exporter of mammoth ivory—a substance sometimes called ice ivory.Between 1993 and 2003, more than 22,000 whole tusks from woolly mammoths and 500,000 carvings were imported into the United States, according to data from the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service Law Enforcement Management Information system. Meanwhile, analysis from the International Union for Conservation of Nature and the wildlife trade monitoring group Traffic notes that, “Evidence from mainland China, Hong Kong SAR, Myanmar, and the USA suggests that some vendors are mislabeling elephant ivory as mammoth ivory, but there is no comprehensive assessment to suggest how widespread this practice is.”Israel originally decided to put forward this mammoth proposal in partnership with Kenya (which, unlike Israel, has elephants to conserve). The two countries have worked together in the past on conservation issues, and Israel has helped train some Kenyan rangers over the years, says Simon Nemtzov, Israel’s CITES scientific expert and head of international affairs at the Israel Nature and Parks Authority. But Kenya missed a deadline along the way, leaving Israel as the only official sponsor.“We proposed already at the last CITES meeting three years ago to encourage parties to stop the trade in mammoth,” Nemtzov told National Geographic in an interview in the months leading up to the conference.“Now, we’re going one step further to have mammoth listed in Appendix II, which would not ban trade but would require registration of all this trade.” It would mean that before an export permit can be issued, “the exporting country has the onus to prove it’s really mammoth ivory.” (The treaty, however, doesn’t lay out a verification protocol.)Nemtzov said the proposal could succeed because provisions exist under CITES to list an extinct species if it’s a look-alike of a living endangered species, but he expects Russia, as the main mammoth ivory exporter, to oppose it.“Right now, mammoth ivory doesn’t go through the CITES system so there’s no good information on what’s being traded, and where it’s coming from,” Nemtzov said. “The idea is to keep track of it, and an appendix listing will allow that to happen."If the proposal passes, delegates from the 183 parties to CITES would essentially treat Mammuthus primigenius—which last walked the earth in the early Holocene—as an endangered species, with necessary trade restrictions.",
"The discovery of a nearly complete mammoth skeleton last week in Michigan raises the question of not only this animal's fate, but also what happened to the rest of the woolly mammoths. Did humans drive the Ice Age’s great beasts to extinction?In news reports, University of Michigan paleontologist Dan Fisher proposed that prehistoric people killed and butchered the newly found mammoth, refrigerating what they didn’t immediately eat by sinking the rest of the carcass in a frigid lake. Other scientists say we can't be certain what killed the creature until the bones are examined for cut marks and other clues.As for the rest of the woolly mammoths, whether humans are to blame for their disappearance, as well that of 36 other North American mammal species that went extinct at the end of the Ice Age, remains hotly disputed. The other leading contender: a changing climate.Farmers digging a soy field near Chelsea, Michigan, were surprised to uncover the bones of a woolly mammoth that trod the region about 12,000 years ago.Fisher excavated the bones, including a skull complete with tusks. While woolly mammoths have been found from Europe through Asia and North America, only about ten woolly mammoth skeletons have been dug up in Michigan, compared with around 300 of their more primitive cousin, the American mastodon.Mammoths were probably rare in Michigan, Illinois State Museum paleontologist Chris Widga says, because of the waxing and waning of the glaciers there. “Michigan was under ice when mammoths were the only elephants on the landscape,” Widga says, the elephants grazing the cold grasslands south of the great ice sheets. “By the time the ice melted, mastodons were out-competing mammoths.”The occurrence of even one more mammoth is reason to celebrate. “Even though this is just one site on the landscape, we’ve gotten better about eking out as much information as we can about individual animals,” Widga says, citing Fisher’s work on figuring out the life histories of particular mammoths through details preserves in their tusks.Other experts are urging caution before chalking the new mammoth up as an Ice Age kill site. “It is fairly common to find mastodons and less commonly, mammoths, in lake or bog sediments dating to this time period,” Widga says.In the absence of other lines of evidence such as cut marks on bones, there are other explanations for scattered elephant skeletons in the remnants of ancient lakes and bogs throughout the Midwest, such as the way bodies “blot and float” before gradually falling apart. “We can’t truly evaluate it until it is adequately investigated and published,” he adds.Farmers recently uncovered the remains of a woolly mammoth in a Chelsea, Michigan, soy field. Here, the skull is lifted onto a trailer for transport, with straps and ties to secure to cracks in the tusks.Definitive evidence that humans hunted or scavenged mammoths is fairly rare, says University of Washington zooarchaeologist Donald Grayson. In a paper released earlier this year with Southern Methodist University colleague David Meltzer, Grayson notes that of 76 proposed Ice Age mammal kill sites, only 12 in the whole of North America suggest human hunting. That, the authors write, suggests that humans were not the primary drivers of North America’s Ice Age extinctions.Climate may have been key to the recent catastrophe. At the same time humans were moving onto the continent, the global climate was rapidly changing, moving from cold and dry to warm and wet.This changing climate rapidly winnowed away the cool, arid grasslands that woolly mammoths preferred. Combined with other ecological changes, such as the arrival of bison from Eurasia and forests springing up where “mammoth steppe” once spread, mammoths were squeezed out of their former range. The very last of the woolly mammoths, isolated on Wrangel Island off northern Siberia, perished about 4,000 years ago.Extinction is rarely the outcome of a single cause, however, and the reason the last member of a species went extinct may not be the same reason that it became vulnerable in the first place.Perhaps, as the Chelsea mammoth slowly yields its secrets, it will add a little more to the continuing discussion over life and death at the edge of the Ice Age.Read Brian Switek's blog Laelaps at National Geographic. Follow him on Twitter, Facebook, and Instagram.",
"Southern white rhinos like this one in a game reserve in South Africa live in more open country and are less rare than black rhinos, making them easier targets for poachers.GenevaCountries have voted against decreasing protections for southern white rhinos at the 18th Conference of the Parties for CITES, the wildlife trade treaty, underway in Geneva, Switzerland. International trade in rhino parts has been banned since 1977, but at this year’s conference, Eswatini (formerly Swaziland) and Namibia proposed loosening restrictions for their respective countries. The vote still needs to be finalized at the plenary session at the end, when all appendix change proposals passed in committee are officially adopted."I was encouraged and relieved to see parties resoundingly reject the proposal calling for legal international trade in rhino horn," says Taylor Tench, a wildlife policy analyst for the Environmental Investigation Agency. "Rhino populations remain under immense pressure from poaching and illegal trade, and legalizing trade in rhino horn would have been disastrous for the world’s remaining rhino populations....Now is simply not the time to weaken protections for rhinos."Other countries, including Kenya and Nigeria, worry that legalizing the trade would undermine the survival Africa’s wild rhinos.“Humankind can do without rhino horn,” said a representative from Kenya during the debate. “It is not medicine.”Thought to be extinct in the late 1800s, the southern white rhino is classified today as near threatened by the International Union for the Conservation of Nature (IUCN), which determines the conservation status of species. There are about 18,000 in protected areas and private game reserves today, almost all in South Africa, according to the IUCN. Black rhinos, which are smaller and have a hooked rather than square lip, are classified as critically endangered, with only about 5,000 remaining. They’re found mostly in Namibia, South Africa, Tanzania, and Kenya.In 2005, Eswatini allowed the noncommercial trade in live rhinos and hunting trophies but not rhino horn. The country put forward a failed proposal to open the commercial rhino horn trade at the last CITES Conference of the Parties, in 2016. Eswatini’s white rhino population reached 90 in 2015, but following one of the country’s worst droughts in recent history, it had fallen to just 66 by December 2017. This year, the country re-upped a proposal to allow for commercial trade in their rhinos, including horn and parts. In a 25-102 vote by secret ballot, this measure was defeated.Meanwhile, Namibia proposed that CITES downlist its southern white rhinos from Appendix I to Appendix II, with an annotation allowing for trade in live rhinos and export of hunting trophies. Though this move would technically weaken protections, conservationists said it wouldn’t have any significant implications in practice, since Namibia is already allowed noncommercial trade in live rhinos and hunting trophies under the Appendix I listing.In the proposal, Namibia argued that its population no longer warrants the highest protection under CITES and that the restriction preventing export for “primarily commercial purposes” has held the country back from generating revenue for conservation. From 2008 to 2018, Namibia exported 27 white rhinos to Angola, Cuba, the Democratic Republic of the Congo, and South Africa. Namibia’s proposal anticipates creating “access to a far larger market for white rhinos,” especially with its primary trading partner South Africa. The country has nearly a thousand rhinos, and according to the CITES secretariat, the population is “increasing.”“We are deeply concerned that unjustified trade restriction on the Namibian white rhino population, if not removed, will only deprive Namibia of their required resources to manage its populations effectively,” said a representative from Namibia during the debate.Nonetheless, says Tench of the EIA, Namibia’s rhinos are at risk from poaching, which has intensified since 2014. The proposal was narrowly rejected in a 39-82 vote.Hundreds of rhinos are poached every year—an average of about three a day, according to Tench—mostly for their horns. Made of keratin (the same protein that makes up our hair and fingernails), rhino horn is often used as a cure-all in traditional medicine in China, Vietnam, and elsewhere in Asia. Because southern white rhinos are more abundant and live in more open habitat, they’ve borne the brunt of the poaching, Tench says. (Go inside the deadly rhino horn trade.)Eswatini says it has nearly 730 pounds of stockpiled rhino horn, with a commercial value of $9.9 million. Funds from sales of that rhino horn, it contends in its proposal, would have helped conservation efforts.“Money is at the very core of the matter,” said a representative from Eswatini during the debate. “If the finance is not available to protect them, rhinos will continue to die.”Opening the commercial rhino horn trade could have had disastrous implications, Tench says. It could have spawned a parallel illegal market, stimulated new demand for rhino horn, increased poaching, and created an enforcement burden for officials, who would have been tasked with the impossible responsibility of distinguishing legal from illegal rhino horn. “It ultimately could just kick off a new wave of demand that would be met by increased poaching. And Eswatini—it’s not the country that even could hope to supply rhino horn internationally. They have 66 rhinos.”What’s more, the trade in rhino horn is illegal in China and Vietnam, where demand for rhino horn exists, leading conservationists to ask: Who would have engaged Eswatini in the rhino horn trade?Neither China nor Vietnam has declared any intention to legalize the trade, although China flirted with the idea last October, when the government announced that tiger bone and rhino horn could be used legally in medical research or for traditional medicine. Soon after, a senior official announced that China was postponing lifting the ban on rhino and tiger parts, pending further study.“The suggestion that there’s value in the rhino horn that Eswatini has is kind of false anyway, because they’re projecting that based on a black-market value and an assumption that those legal markets would open up again,” says Matt Collis, director of international policy at the International Fund for Animal Welfare, an animal welfare and conservation nonprofit that does works to prevent rhino poaching.Collis says it’s unclear what Namibia hoped to achieve with its proposal—since under current regulations, noncommercial trade in live rhinos and trophies is already allowed in the country.So, he says, this could have been a first step toward liberalizing trade in the future, because the proposal would have moved Namibia’s rhinos to Appendix II.“It’s not necessarily clear what the motivation is, unless it’s for something for the longer term,” Collis says.Going forward, Collis says conservationists need to help countries who bear the burden of protecting these species find another way to fund their efforts. “It does need a concerted effort from the international community to offer alternative ways of financing,” he says.",
"The ban on international trade in rhino horn that has been in force since 1977 will stay in place.Johannesburg, South Africa Some conservationists are breathing a sigh of relief: The prohibition of sales of rhino horns across borders that has been in force since 1977 will remain in place.A proposal that would have lifted the ban was rejected Tuesday by the parties to the Convention of the International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES), the global wildlife trade treaty composed of 182 nations and the European Union. Government representatives have gathered in Johannesburg for a two week conference to set international wildlife trade policy.The proposal, submitted by Swaziland, would have allowed the country to sell the horns of its white rhinos across borders. The nation's representative, Ted Reilly, argued during the debate that the sales would bring in much needed money for wildlife conservation. “We all know the ban is not working,” he said.But in a 26-100 vote, with 17 abstentions, the committee rejected the measure to allow a trade in the horns of white rhinos.The largest of the five rhino species, white rhinos are also the most abundant, with 20,400 remaining—that’s two-thirds of the total rhino population. They’re found in nearly a dozen African countries, with South Africa home to 70 percent. Hunting almost drove the 5,000-pound animals extinct toward the end of the 19th century, but they made an astonishing comeback thanks to conservation efforts.  Now the animals are severely threatened again, and everyone is scrambling to figure out how to save them. New wealth in Vietnam and China has boosted demand for horns, and last year alone poachers shot and killed more than a thousand rhinos. The horns are made of keratin—the same stuff in our hair and fingernails—and are made into valuable carvings and erroneously used to cure everything from cancer to rheumatism. (See: "Can Fake Rhino Horn Stop the Poaching of a Species At Risk?")It’s against this backdrop that Swaziland submitted its proposal to open the international trade, an idea that’s already ignited fierce debate among rhino range countries, wildlife managers, rhino breeders, economists, and conservationists.  Swaziland asked permission to sell nearly 730 pounds of rhino horn from existing stockpiles to licensed retailers in “the Far East” for $9.9 million. It asked to sell another 44 pounds of horn a year by cutting the horns off live rhinos, a procedure that can be performed on sedated rhinos. The horns grow back, like our fingernails.During the meeting, most rhino range countries—including South Africa—supported the plan, saying that proceeds from the sales of horns could help Swaziland protect its rhinos. “A sustainable and non-detrimental trade in rhino horn is possible under the right conditions,” the representative from South Africa asserted.  Meanwhile opponents argued that a legal trade would stimulate demand, complicate efforts for law enforcement, and allow legal horn to provide cover for illicit horn. Most major conservation groups share this view.  “Our concern is that legal trade right now would confuse consumers and undermine demand reduction efforts of not only conservation organizations but governments as well,” said Leigh Henry, a senior policy adviser for the World Wildlife Fund. She applauded a measure passed by the parties on Sunday that allows for CITES to crack down on Mozambique and Vietnam—the biggest hub of illegal rhino horn trafficking—if they don’t intensify enforcement efforts.If it had passed, Swaziland’s trade proposal could have paved the way for neighboring South Africa to at some point sell horns from its stockpile, which is much larger than Swaziland’s. South Africa's Private Rhino Owners Association estimates that its members have about six tons of rhino horn and that the government has close to 25 tons, according to a Reuters report. (Related: “Special Investigation: Inside the Deadly Rhino Horn Trade")  In fact, some conservationists have accused Swaziland of acting as a proxy for South Africa in a bid to legalize the rhino horn trade. It was widely believed that South Africa would submit its own proposal, but days before the deadline it decided that selling horns to other countries wouldn’t benefit its rhinos. Then Swaziland—seemingly out of nowhere—submitted an 11th-hour proposal of its own.Separately, South Africa is currently embroiled in a court battle over domestic rhino horn sales, with the environment ministry fighting to keep its domestic ban in place and the plaintiffs, rhino owners with millions of dollars worth of horn in storage, fighting to lift it.With virtually no South African market for rhino horn, opponents of the trade worry that a legal domestic trade would allow rhino horn to leak onto the international black market. The government has appealed a decision that would have lifted the ban, so the horn sale prohibition remains in place—for now.This story was updated on October 4.(Read more stories out of the CITES meeting in Johannesburg here.)",
"The Asian small-clawed otter has become a popular pet in Southeast Asia. People in Indonesia, Thailand, Japan, and elsewhere can pay thousands of dollars to own one.She goes for walks on a leash. She sleeps in a bed, plays with a ball, and clings onto her stuffed animal toy. This pet isn’t a dog or a cat or a rabbit or a hamster. She’s a small-clawed otter, an Asian species that in the wild hunts for fish and crustaceans and frolics in streams and mangroves.Her name is Sakura, and videos on YouTube and Twitter of her life in Japan have made her a social media sensation.Small-clawed otters and to a lesser extent the three other otter species found in Southeast Asia—the Eurasian otter, the smooth-coated otter, and the hairy-nosed otter—have become new stars of the regional pet trade. Researchers believe that people are stealing them from the wild in Indonesia, Thailand, and other countries in Southeast Asia to sell them as pets there and in Japan.“The cute factor is unfortunately the appeal,” says Kanitha Krishnasamy, director of the Southeast Asia branch of the nonprofit Traffic, the main organization that monitors the global wildlife trade. “These animals are very, very popular.”Otters found in Southeast Asia are intelligent and winsome, with slender little bodies, chubby legs, and baby faces. People will pay thousands of dollars to own one of these creatures.According to a recent Traffic report, researchers counting the number of otters for sale on Facebook in five Southeast Asian countries documented at least 700 between January and mid-May 2018. Most sellers offered young small-clawed otters, smaller (at less than 10 pounds) than their longer-clawed counterparts.The four otter species aren’t on the brink of extinction, but they’re not exactly thriving. They ingest dangerous pesticides and have been losing habitat to development. They’ve also long been poached for their dense fur—made into coats and hats that are especially popular in China—and for their blood, fat, and bones, all believed in certain parts of Asia to have healing powers.The pet trade, however, has emerged as the most pressing threat to these otters in the wild, the Traffic report states.Breeding them in captivity, Krishnasamy says, is possible but difficult. To keep the cubs and parents healthy, owners have to feed them a highly specialized diet and give them shots to prevent infection, such as distemper.To stay healthy in captivity otters need specialized food. Fed dog food and kept in a small cage, this otter, named Ophelia, became obese.“It’s not like breeding kittens,” says Nicole Duplaix, who teaches about otter ecology at Oregon State University, in Corvallis, and is chairwoman of the otter specialist group for the International Union for the Conservation of Nature, which sets the conservation status of species. “There’s no such thing as otter mills.”To protect the animals, most Southeast Asian countries have enacted laws banning their capture, sale, possession, and transport. The small-clawed otter, the smooth-coated otter, and the hairy-nosed otter are also listed on Appendix II of the Convention on the International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Flora and Fauna (CITES), which regulates the global wildlife trade. This means that people need a permit to export them and that the permit can be granted only if the source government determines that taking an otter from the wild won’t jeopardize the survival of the species.Some nations want to prohibit international trade of certain otter species, and at the major upcoming CITES meeting in May, countries will discuss new proposals to move the Asian small-clawed otter and the smooth-coated otter to Appendix I of the treaty. The uplistings would prohibit all international commercial trade of those species. The Eurasian otter has been listed on Appendix I since 1977.Despite these constraints, illegal commerce in pet otters flourishes on social media platforms that have popularized all sorts of exotic animals—from venomous spiders to big cats to talking birds—and made it easier for people to sell them.“Online trade has unfortunately unwittingly encouraged exotic pet ownership because it’s so difficult to police what’s going on online,” Krishnasamy says.According to the Traffic study, the vast majority of Facebook ads were from Indonesia, followed by Thailand. (Researchers counted none out of the Philippines, and about 30 from Malaysia and Vietnam combined).In Indonesia and Thailand, owning exotic pets is “deeply ingrained in the culture,” according to Krishnasamy. The ads appeared to target local buyers, she says, but seizures of otters at checkpoints indicates that there’s also some trade across borders.Last year, a woman was detained at Thailand’s Don Mueang International Airport, in Bangkok, for attempting to smuggle 10 baby otters to Japan, which is experiencing a boom in pet otters. (The animals have popped up in cafés, are stars on reality shows, and even compete for most adorable in an annual contest called the otter general election.)One U.S.-based seller, James Lilly, wrote in a text message that he breeds otter species found in Southeast Asia and that they make good pets. They’re playful and behave quite like house cats, he says.But according to Duplaix, they’re destructive, make loud whistling noises, and can become aggressive when they don’t get what they want. She likens their sharp bite to that of a sewing machine piercing fabric. “A wolf cub might be very sweet, but it’s going to grow up as a wolf,” she says. “Same thing with an otter.”Wildlife Friends Foundation Thailand, a nonprofit that rescues and rehabilitates wildlife, says it can’t keep up with the surge in unwanted pets. Here, a vet with the foundation feeds a rescued baby otter.Tom Taylor is the program director for Wildlife Friends Foundation Thailand, a nonprofit that rescues wildlife, including otters, from exploitative domestic situations in the country. “We can’t keep up with the amount of unwanted pets,” he wrote in an email.Keeping otters as pets isn’t good for the animals, either, Taylor says. In the wild, the freshwater-loving carnivores live in family groups of up to 15. This contrasts with their lives in captivity, where they’re isolated from other otters and often get no more than a dunking in the bathtub. “Most pet otters are treated like toys—we see them on pet leads, wearing dolls’ clothing, and fed very bad human diets,” Taylor says.Krishnasamy and others are pushing for better enforcement of existing regulations and stronger laws to protect otters from the pet trade. In Japan, for example, it’s legal to keep small-clawed otters. And, according to the Traffic report, Indonesia hasn’t explicitly outlawed the sale of wild otters. It’s only illegal to sell them there because the country hasn’t set a quota for legal sales.Duplaix and others also want to spread the word that otters shouldn’t be kept as pets. As she says: “It isn’t cool.”",
"Mesmerized, fixated with horror, I’m watching a Mexican fireleg tarantula on the move. Huge, hairy, with legs the color of carrots, this one isn’t crawling around my house (phew!) but across my computer screen, in video form.It amazes me that anyone would want to keep a fireleg tarantula for fun. But people do.A fireleg was one of the more than $40,000 worth of spiders, insects, and other crawlies stolen from the Philadelphia Insectarium and Butterfly Pavilion in late August in a suspected attempt to sell them into the pet trade. Earlier that month, a man in Singapore was fined $12,800 for illegally keeping 92 tarantulas in his home and trying to smuggle six more—stuffed in plastic containers in the back seat of his car—into Singapore from Malaysia, according to local media.These aren’t isolated incidents. Scientists report a significant amount of illegal activity involving tarantulas, believed to be fueled largely by hobbyists willing to pay hundreds of dollars apiece for pet spiders. According to conservation biologist Sergio Henriques, the market for preserved tarantulas is also driving the illegal trade, but to a lesser extent.Young tarantulas crawl around a glass container at the Tarantulas of Mexico breeding facility, which is run by spider researcher and enthusiast Rodrigo Orozco. He opened the facility in 2003 hoping to shut down trafficking of wild tarantulas by flooding the market with captive-bred ones.Containers at Tarantulas of Mexico hold hundreds of baby spiders. In addition to selling tarantulas, Orozco plans to introduce some into the wild.Tarantulas have been found in Primavera Forest National Park, near Rodrigo Orozco's breeding facility. Habitat destruction threatens the spiders around the world.“Smuggling is rampant—it’s widespread globally,” says Henriques, chairman of the spider and scorpion specialist group for the International Union for the Conservation of Nature (IUCN), which assesses how animals are faring in the wild.The illegal tarantula trade is a little known corner of the black market in wildlife, a multibillion-dollar industry that’s harming animal populations around the globe. Elephants and rhinos have been among the hardest hit, but smaller, more obscure animals are sought as pets or for use in traditional medicine and as novelty items, among other things. That includes tarantulas.Found in tropical and desert regions worldwide, the eight-eyed arachnids are highly diverse, with more than 900 species of varying sizes and colors, from cobalt blue to salmon pink. Some live in trees, others in underground burrows.Many nations ban or require special permits for the export of tarantulas and for the capture of certain species or species in particular areas, such as national parks. In addition, a global wildlife treaty offers some protections for 22 species deemed too vulnerable for unregulated commercial trade. But cracks in legislation—along with growing commercial interest in exotic animals, more people traveling to areas that have tarantulas, and greater awareness through social media—have fueled the illegal trade, Henriques says.As they grow, tarantulas periodically shed their skins, leaving behind exoskeletons like these on display at Tarantulas of Mexico. Many people are afraid of tarantulas, which generally aren't aggressive toward humans.To keep up with demand, some traders hire local people to hunt tarantulas in the wild. The spiders are smuggled out, then sold to breeders or collectors looking for the newest, most colorful, or otherwise most distinctive creature. Some tarantulas are snatched, killed, and mounted in display boxes or encased in resin, a clear substance used to make key chains, paperweights, and other decorative items.Tarantulas are especially vulnerable to poaching because they’re long-lived (some reach 30 years old), and females reproduce late and infrequently. According to Jorge Mendoza and Rodrigo Orozco, Mexican breeders and researchers, poaching has taken a toll on brachypelma, a genus found in Mexico that includes the fireleg tarantula and the popular red-kneed tarantula, known for the flame-colored spots on its legs.It’s unclear how poaching affects most other tarantulas, but scientists fear that over-collection compounded by threats such as climate change and habitat destruction could wipe out species before there’s time to study them in the wild.Each year Rodrigo Orozco breeds 7,000 tarantulas at his facility, according to his website. The Mexican red-kneed tarantula is especially popular for its docile nature.“It takes them quite a while to recover from a harvest event,” Henriques says. “They don’t bounce back quickly.”Tarantula losses probably aren’t a top-of-mind worry for most people. It’s no secret that many people consider them one of the scariest denizens of the animal kingdom. Tarantulas are cast as the spookiest symbols of Halloween and feature in movies as killers out to get every human they come across.There’s no good reason to fear tarantulas. Most would rather hide or even play dead than attack by biting or spraying prickly hairs from their abdomen. And if they do feel threatened enough to sink their fangs into a perceived aggressor, their venom is mostly less potent than a bee’s.But there are very good reasons to care about them. Proteins in their venom have helped scientists understand more about pain and diseases such as epilepsy, they spin silk that hummingbirds collect to help build their nests, and they help control agricultural pests such as crickets and beetles, which they eat.For all those who shrink from tarantulas, some folks just can’t get enough of them.Take the members of Arachnoboards.com who refuse to name their favorite species. “I love all my babies and can’t choose,” one tarantulaphile wrote on a discussion board. “You cannot make me choose one,” wrote another.Self-proclaimed bug lover Eduardo Chavez Guevas inspects his pampas tawny red, a South American species. Serious hobbyists might keep hundreds of tarantulas as pets.In Naucalpan, Mexico, Raul Campos checks up on his pet red-kneed tarantula. These mild-tempered spiders have suffered losses in the wild because of the illegal trade.Yanei Badillo shows off her pet fireleg tarantula in Mexico City. Some collectors are on the lookout for the newest or most colorful species.Or take Bob Herndon, a U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service inspector for the port of Louisville, Kentucky, and the self-proclaimed go-to law enforcement guy for all things tarantula. Herndon, 61, says he used to keep hundreds of tarantulas but now has a modest 18 he bought or received as gifts from friends who breed spiders.He got hooked on spiders after reading Charlotte’s Web as a kid.“To me they’re more than just animals,” he says. “They’re really beautiful creatures.”Herndon says poaching took off in the 1970s, when people became interested in tarantulas as pets. To capitalize on demand, people began breeding tarantulas and trading them legally across borders. But this requires obtaining permits, insuring the spiders, paying for their inspection, and the like. As Herndon says, it’s cheaper and easier to flout the rules.“It’s always been an issue, and this isn’t just for tarantulas,” he says. “Any animal, if there’s a real marketable value, there are people who don’t want to play by the rules.”Herndon points to the gooty sapphire ornamental—an eye-catching, critically endangered metallic-blue tarantula discovered in a single locale in India in 2001. Traffickers began smuggling them to Europe where they were advertised for sale.Then there’s the case of the psychedelic tarantula, another Indian species, touted for sale in online exotic pet markets in the U.S. and Europe a mere eight months after its discovery was described in a research journal in 2014. “I was heartbroken,” Zeeshan Mirza, a wildlife biologist who helped make the discovery, told The Hindu.Tarantula enthusiasts gather at a bar in Mexico City's Morelos market to strut their spiders.Authorities have seized tarantulas everywhere from Australia to The Netherlands to Brazil. They’ve been found stuffed inside Nintendo cartridges, hidden in shoe containers, bundled in packages of drinking straws. Many more likely slip across borders undetected: Some spiderlings are no bigger than a pencil eraser, and adult tarantulas can easily be packed in suitcases or shipping boxes.Carol Fukushima, a researcher at the Finnish Museum of Natural History, in Helsinki, who has studied tarantulas, says snagging spider criminals may not be a high priority for law enforcement officers. “If they’re looking at bigger things they consider more important, maybe they don’t care about tarantula trafficking,” she says.For Bob Herndon, though, understanding the tarantula trade is a mission. In January he was contacted to help open a box in Cincinnati, Ohio, after the Fish and Wildlife Service received a tip that the shipment might contain smuggled animals. The consignment, which came from the Philippines, was labeled as toys.When Herndon opened the box, he found 17 baby tarantulas in two bottomless styrofoam cups that had been taped together. They survived and were sent to zoos in Tennessee and Kentucky.Spiders get short shrift among scientists too. For those who choose to study them, it’s hard to secure funding to do research on an animal that’s decidedly not cute, cuddly, and relatable.“It’s sad to say, but we don’t know the ecology of these animals,” Fukushima says. “We don’t know how many of these animals are found in nature, the range of these animals.”According to Sergio Henriques, of the more than 900 tarantula species, the IUCN has assessed the conservation status of just 15. That means no one has any clue how more than 99 percent of tarantula species are holding up in the wild.Victor Daniel Gutierrez Martinez leaves no stone unscrutinized as he hunts for tarantulas near his house in Naucalpan de Juarez, Mexico. The tarantula breeder says development and pollution keep most tarantulas away from the area.With so few resources devoted to tarantula science, Henriques says it’s difficult to figure out what’s harming them most. Fukushima, who like him wants to find out how the trade is affecting tarantulas, has launched a multiyear research project to learn everything she can about it, including the source regions, the trade routes, and details about what’s driving it.It’s an ambitious endeavor, Fukushima admits, but tarantulas need to be protected. “They’re super, super important,” she says.Formerly a staff reporter for Wildlife Watch, Jani Actman is now a freelance journalist based in California.",
"Aloïse Amougha clearly recalls the night 30 years ago when a spirit visited him and changed his life. “You have to plant iboga,” it instructed. “And with that iboga, you have to heal the world.”This vision came to Amougha while he was gripped in the mystical throes of a Bwiti initiation ceremony, a traditional ritual practiced by many of Gabon's roughly 50 ethnic communities. Bwiti initiates eat or drink Tabernanthe iboga—a shrub-like tree whose roots contain a powerful psychoactive compound called ibogaine. Named after the Tsogho word “to heal,” iboga grows in several Central African countries. But its strongest cultural ties are in Gabon, where an estimated 5 percent of the country’s 2.3 million citizens practice Bwiti, and more still use iboga in an informal context.Iboga creates a waking dream-like state in which people may encounter their ancestors or see themselves in past lives. They may be shown core truths about who they are or, as in Amougha’s case, be visited by spirits. Amougha says his spirit neither specified how many iboga seeds he was to plant nor explained why he was to do this. Amougha trusted that the answer eventually would be revealed. So he and his wife, Jacqueline, started planting iboga—and never stopped. Three decades later, a veritable jungle of more than 4,000 trees surrounds their modest home in northeastern Gabon.In February, Lee White, Gabon’s environment minister, issued an authorization that marked the couple’s iboga as the first to be exported legally from Gabon, as well as the first psychoactive material to be traded under the Nagoya Protocol, a supplementary agreement to the Convention on Biological Diversity that came into force in 2014. The protocol aims to prevent cultural and natural exploitation by establishing benefits-sharing for the people and places from which genetic resources originate.Tomorrow, a little over two pounds of the couple’s iboga will be sent to Terragnosis, a Canadian company established to source and distribute iboga traded in accordance with the protocol. In Canada, it will undergo chemical analysis and be processed into pure alkaloids that will be delivered to Ambio Life Sciences, a group of clinical facilities in Mexico serving as a pilot for the new legal trade program. There, therapists will use the iboga extract to treat a primarily American clientele for substance use disorders and trauma.If all goes well, this will be the first of many harvests that make up a new fair trade iboga industry built on principles of equity, reciprocity, and sustainability. “At the same time addicts are healing themselves in the West, they will be supporting communities in Gabon,” says Yann Guignon, the French and Gabonese founder and co-director of Blessings of the Forest, a nonprofit that’s leading the fair trade iboga effort."I and my wife, Jacqueline, hope this tree will bring the best to the world,” Amougha adds of the pilot shipment.Ibogaine is sought increasingly outside Gabon for treating post-traumatic stress disorder, especially among combat veterans. Meanwhile, scientists are still trying to understand how ibogaine helps people with substance use disorders break their addictions and skip the painful withdrawal process. If ibogaine does prevent relapses, it “may prove to be truly transformative for addiction medicine,” says Deborah Mash, an emeritus professor at the University of Miami and CEO of DemeRx, a company working toward FDA approval of ibogaine.But behind the mounting stories of lives changed and saved lurks an uncomfortable truth: Most iboga and ibogaine used by clinics around the world originates from plants poached from Gabon’s forests and smuggled out of Cameroon.“We know that iboga leaves Gabon to be sold on the internet,” says Natacha Nssi Bengone, a deputy director general at Gabon’s Ministry of Waters and Forests, the Sea, and the Environment. “This is done without agreement from Gabon.”According to Max Ondo, head of the social department at Conservation Justice, a non-profit group focused on ending illegal wildlife trade in Gabon, Cameroonians are the main iboga traffickers. They buy an iboga tree for “something like $16,” Ondo says, and back in Cameroon, they sell the roots “for more online to Europeans or Americans.”While ibogaine “does save lives,” says Kirran Ahmad, a psychedelic research clinician at Imperial College London who’s in charge of ensuring mutual benefit between Gabon and the West at Blessings of the Forest, what’s usually missing from the Western experience of the drug is the “narrative of what’s happening in Gabon. Gabon is where slaves were extracted from, and to me, this is another extractive process that’s going on with iboga.”The new fair trade iboga program is meant to address this problem by offering a legal, sustainable alternative. The effort is not without critics, however, and it’s yet to be seen whether practitioners and clinics abroad will support the program by choosing fair trade iboga rather than continuing to buy cheaper, most likely poached product online. What hangs in the balance, according to Denis Massande, president of the Association for the Development of the Culture of the Pygmy Peoples of Gabon, are the rights of Gabon’s Indigenous communities and the future of a key piece of cultural and ecological heritage.“We’ve never refused to share iboga with other people,” Massande says. “But now that this commerce of iboga is known across the world, if there is no regulation put in place, iboga will disappear.”Archaeological evidence from traces of charcoal discovered in a cave in Gabon indicates that Indigenous people there have been using iboga for at least 2,000 years. Legend has it that somewhere along the way, Babongo Pygmies stumbled upon iboga’s psychoactive effects after observing animals consuming the plant. Pygmies shared what they learned with Bantu people, who make up the majority of Gabon’s population today.In the West, French and Swiss pharmacologists isolated ibogaine from iboga roots in 1901, and soon, pharmacies in France were marketing ibogaine tablets for treating a range of maladies and for assisting with “greater than normal physical or mental efforts by healthy individuals.” In the 1960s, a handful of psychiatrists in Chile and the U.S. began using ibogaine as a therapeutic agent, and the drug’s ability to quash addiction came to light a year later when Howard Lotsof, a New York City native, found that it relieved him of his desire to use heroin, without any symptoms of withdrawal.The U.S. banned all use and virtually all study of ibogaine in 1970 under the newly created Controlled Substances Act, and a number of other countries have bans, especially in Europe. In South Africa, New Zealand, and Brazil’s São Paulo state, ibogaine is a prescription medication; in most other places, it falls into a legal grey zone—not explicitly approved for medical use but not expressly forbidden, either.The patchwork of global legislation has led to an explosion of ibogaine-related medical tourism, with 80 to 100 iboga providers—primarily in Mexico, Brazil, Costa Rica, Colombia, and South Africa—serving mostly North Americans and Europeans who often pay $5,000 to $15,000 for a single therapeutic session. Demand is growing, and new clinics are “constantly popping up,” says Juliana Mulligan, founder of New York City-based Inner Vision Ibogaine, which provides consultation services for people undergoing ibogaine treatment and for ibogaine clinics.Estimates of the number of people outside Gabon who have tried ibogaine since the 1960s vary from 10,000 to 40,000, according to Tobias Erny, executive director of the Global Iboga Therapy Alliance, a nonprofit dedicated to supporting sacramental and therapeutic uses of iboga. “In 2006, it was roundabout 3,000 people who have done ibogaine outside of Africa, but we estimate that this figure has skyrocketed massively since then.”Data collected from some Western users point to iboga’s therapeutic potential. From 1996 to 2005, Mash ran an ibogaine clinic on the island of St. Kitts where she supervised treatment of 277 patients, most of whom detoxed successfully from opioids or cocaine after just one dose. “I saw this really transform people by taking someone in an intractable cycle of drug dependency and breaking them free,” Mash says.A 2020 study of 51 U.S. Special Operations Forces veterans who received therapy in Mexico with ibogaine and 5-MeO-DMT, another psychedelic substance, revealed “very large reductions” in the participants’ PTSD symptoms, among other things. Most veterans also described the experience as one of the most spiritually significant events of their lives. “Ibogaine dives into some deep stuff and helps you to make sense of it in a way that traditional rehab doesn’t even come close to doing,” says Mulligan, who used ibogaine to end a seven-year opioid dependency after mainstream treatments failed to bring relief.Ibogaine can be made in a lab but has yet to be developed that way at scale, and it can be derived from certain other plant species, especially Voacanga africana, a tropical African tree. Iboga also grows outside Gabon. Ralf Vogtel, a German citizen, launched an intensive iboga plantation in Ghana in 2016 after learning that demand was increasing and natural supply dwindling. He now has 40,000 trees on 170 acres and ships all over the world. “It’s a tradable commodity, the same as cocoa or bananas,” he says. “The demand is going up worldwide.”But iboga from Gabon, in particular, is seen as imbued with the goodwill of eons of traditional use and as containing an ecologically ordained chemical complexity that can’t be replicated elsewhere in the wild or in the lab.In Gabon, iboga is legal to harvest outside protected areas for traditional use. But except for the pilot shipment going out this week, anyone who has imported it from Gabon has broken the law and likely supported poaching, Guignon says. “When you ask clinics where they get their medicine, they don’t answer.”Gabon has yet to carry out a country-wide survey of iboga, so it’s impossible to know whether poaching is causing a decline, and authorities don’t track seizures of contraband. But the local price has risen by 800 percent over the past decade, and some people say it’s becoming scarcer or even has disappeared from certain areas.Solange Ngouessono, deputy director of operations at Gabon’s National Parks Agency, knows of 20 iboga-related arrests from 2011 to 2012 when he was working at Mayumba National Park. He and his colleagues seized 88 bags of iboga roots weighing about 20 pounds each, plus two large bottles of powdered roots. “The culprits intended to sell their products in Libreville and beyond,” Ngouessono says.In December 2018, rangers in Mayumba National Park seized some 90 bags of iboga totaling an estimated 2,000 pounds. A few months later, Nssi Bengone says, photos of “huge quantities” of iboga were found on the mobile phone of a Cameroonian citizen apprehended in Gabon for ivory trafficking. “That ivory poacher was probably also interested in iboga,” she says.In February 2019, Gabonese authorities passed legislation forbidding iboga’s export without a government permit. “Until now, we’ve never given such authorization,” Nssi Bengone says. “But we can see for sale on the internet iboga advertised as ‘This is from Gabon.’”Indeed, within days of joining an ibogaine-themed Facebook group, a user messaged me offering “top quality iboga products” for $800 per half-pound. I could use the iboga, the user said, to treat “all type[s] of addiction, healing, depression, stress and psychological issues,” as well as for “spiritual sacrament.”“My iboga comes from Gabon,” the user added, trying to clinch the sale.Because iboga has “universal value,” the threat poaching poses to the species is “not only a Gabonese problem,” says Henri-Paul Moubeyi Bouale, president of the National Association of Bwiti Missoko. “It concerns the whole world to protect this plant.”Yann Guignon, of Blessings of the Forest, is a brusque former businessman and at first seems an unexpected leader in the push for fair trade iboga. But he’s always had an affinity for African cultures and an antipathy to racism. The son of a white French father and multiracial South African mother, he grew up in a diverse neighborhood in Angers, where most of his friends were Black and he often got into fights with white kids who made racist comments.In the early 2000s, Guignon got a job in Paris with an information and communications technology company as the sales director for sub-Saharan Africa. Cocaine and alcohol were common in his workplace, and he began using both substances, sometimes to excess.In 2004, a Gabonese project manager at an IT engineering service company noticed Guignon’s cocaine habit and offered to facilitate an iboga session for him. Guignon had never heard of iboga but agreed. “It was like I was reading the story of my life in a very different way, and it really explained to me why I was the way I was,” he recalls of that difficult but profound first experience.Guignon never took cocaine again, and within a few years, he’d quit his job and moved to Gabon. He was initiated into Bwiti, got his Gabonese citizenship, and became a mentee to Jean Noël Gassita, a pharmacologist and leading iboga expert who died in March 2022. Gassita explained that the West had poached Gabon’s iboga for two centuries and that it was now becoming more difficult for Gabonese to find and afford the sacred plant. Guignon agreed to help find a solution. “For me, it’s exactly the same as when I was a teenager—I’m fighting racism,” he says.In 2011, Gassita introduced Guignon to Sylvia Bongo Ondimba, Gabon’s First Lady, who suggested that Guignon research iboga within the context of the Nagoya Protocol. Guignon put together an exhaustive report outlining all available information about iboga, including the threats poaching posed to the plant. He his colleagues at Blessings of the Forest spent the next decade developing a legal and social framework that could meet the growing demand for iboga abroad while simultaneously benefiting rural Gabonese and protecting the environment.Now, in theory, anyone in Gabon can export iboga under Gabon’s legislation, modeled on the Nagoya Protocol, as long as certain benefits-sharing and environmental requirements are met.Blessings of the Forest is helping facilitate this for rural residents by encouraging them to form associations and providing the financial and technical support to establish iboga plantations. Blessings also connects village associations with international buyers and helps with export paperwork. In return, communities agree not to cut down any large trees to make way for iboga; not to illegally exploit wildlife or timber; and to reinvest at least half of what they make from iboga sales into community projects such as schools and infrastructure.So far, 13 village associations representing a thousand people have entered into this partnership, planting more than 24,000 iboga trees on 14 plantations. Working with Blessings of the Forest is a “win-win,” according to Hubert-bled Elie-Nloh, president of A2E, an association that’s established two plantations near Makokou. (Amougha and Jacqueline are members.) “It represents conservation of our culture, first, and also conservation of biodiversity,” Elie-Nloh says. “Iboga is the war horse leading the charge for community development.”When the fair trade program is running smoothly, Blessing of the Forest’s next priority, Guignon says, will be convincing—or, if necessary, legally obligating—ibogaine clinics and pharmaceutical companies around the world to engage in some form of reciprocity for Gabon. He also plans to help Bwiti leaders challenge current and future patents sought in the West for ibogaine—which he calls “Columbus syndrome”—on the basis that intellectual property rights already belong to Gabon. “They claim to have discovered things that were already known by people here,” Guignon says. “It’s biopiracy.”Some international groups strongly support these efforts. Ricard Faura is a program manager at the International Center for Ethnobotanical Education, Research, and Service and an advisor at the Indigenous Medicine Conservation Fund, which supports Blessings of the Forest. He points out that if nothing is done, “then in a not-so-far away future, we will see no more iboga in the wild, and people won’t have the chance to practice their tradition.”There are people, however, who fear that Gabon’s new legal framework will be wielded to benefit some groups and exclude others. “The idea of Blessings of the Forest is very noble,” says Tobias Erny, of the Global Iboga Therapy Alliance. But he worries that the new rules will be used “to help a certain clique who are very close to the ruling class of Gabon to make a kind of iboga monopoly.”“All the exploitation of resources in Gabon are controlled by the families with power,” adds Georges Oberdeno Essongue, co-founder of SoVaTer, a Gabonese company that aims to also engage in fair trade iboga. Oberdeno Essongue fears that he and his colleagues will not be among the “few people” likely granted authorization to export iboga.For the iboga trade to be truly equitable, it needs to be “tethered to the Indigenous people,” says Massande of the Pygmy association. “That’s a way for us to get something back for what we brought into the world.”Responding to these concerns, Nssi Bengone emphasizes, “the Nagoya Protocol is for everybody—in particular, local communities.”It remains to be seen whether fair trade iboga will take hold. But on an overcast morning in November, at Amougha and Jacqueline’s home, such a future felt possible.Amougha led a group of A2E and Blessings of the Forest members across his yard, a slurry of tawny mud after a storm. He stopped in front of the first iboga tree he’d planted back in the early 1990s—a 13-foot-tall beauty, its leaves glistening a brilliant shade of lime green—while the group bowed their heads behind him. “I’m calling on the spirit of God,” Amougha said, addressing the tree in a reverent voice. “People of this Earth and people from all around, this wood will make you better and strong. Make them know it came from Gabon.”Amougha asked for the tree’s permission to cut it and relayed its answer to the crowd: “It’s time for me to go to allow space for other trees to breathe.”With that, machetes swung and shovels plunged into the rich earth. An hour later, the old tree and several others had been reduced to a few bags of mud-caked roots. Each of the five A2E members was paid $16 for work that would normally earn them less than a dollar. For the roots themselves, both the A2E association and Amougha and Jacqueline got payments of more than $900—about four times the average monthly salary in Gabon. In this impoverished rural region where elephants eat farmers’ crops, diseases are rife, and basic services such as electricity are lacking, iboga can “heal the whole community, in the sense of making life easier,” Amougha says.The roots from that first harvest were delivered a few miles down the dirt road to a group of waiting priestesses adorned in Bwiti regalia, their bodies painted pale white and faces decorated with red dots arranged in striking geometric patterns. The women spent the night ceremonially preparing the iboga for shipment. Sitting on the floor, they meticulously scraped the outer layer off each root strand as they sang to the intoxicating strums of a ngombi, a kind of harp said to bridge the spirit world with the earthly one. Working in batches, Delphine Minko nee Akoumanlo, a Bwiti master of ceremonies, roasted the clean roots over an outdoor fire and pulverized them into a fine powder. “Iboga can show us the way of life,” she said, the moon illuminating a plume of smoke that framed her face. “It’s like the big school of life.”The following morning, Guignon and his colleagues picked up the blessed and processed iboga, paid the women $79 each, and began the bumpy, 14-hour drive back to Libreville. Very soon, a precious package, the first ever to be sent in a spirit of reciprocity, would cross the Atlantic and arrive in a new continent where the real journey will begin—in the minds of the people who will take it for healing.And in those intensely personal journeys, Amougha’s benediction—issued to a tree he spent half his life tending—perhaps will shine through the darkness to ease their passage.",
"Europe’s demand for frog legs has long threatened the animals—first at home and now in other regions around the world, according to new research.Frogs were taken from the wild in Europe in such quantities by the 1980s that they were disappearing locally, leading the European Union to ban most species from trade. Suppliers satisfied Europeans’ continuing taste for frog legs by importing them, legally, from other countries.Little has been known about the nature of this trade or its impact on global frog populations, but a study published last month in Nature Conservation fills in some of the gaps.Millions of wild frogs are killed each year for their legs, the authors found. This poses a threat of extinction, locally or globally, for multiple species and the ecosystems where they play important roles, such as eating insects, providing prey for other species, aerating the soil with their burrows, and, as tadpoles, filtering water.“Amphibians are highly susceptible to pollution, the climate crisis, and deadly chytrid fungus,” says Sandra Altherr, one of the authors and the co-founder of Pro Wildlife, a German conservation organization. “On top of this, the EU’s huge and ongoing hunger for frogs’ legs is decimating wild frog populations in an increasing number of countries.”The EU, Altherr and her colleagues note, is the world’s largest importer of frog legs but has taken no apparent steps to ensure that the trade is sustainable.Jorge Rodríguez Romero, head of the Unit for Global Environmental Cooperation and Multilateralism, the branch of the European Commission that deals with wildlife trade issues, did not reply to a request for comment.Delving into the frog leg trade, the team discovered that “nothing is transparent,” says co-author Mark Auliya, a herpetologist at the Leibniz Institute for the Analysis of Biodiversity Change, in Bonn, Germany. The EU, for example, doesn’t require reporting on the species or quantities of frogs imported by member states—only the weight of generic “frog legs.”Using this information, the researchers inferred that between 2011 and 2020, the EU imported about 89.7 million pounds of frog legs, equating to an estimated 814 million to two billion frogs. Belgium and France accounted for most.To learn more, the team tapped disparate sources, including databases kept by various countries and organizations, scientific studies, news stories, and assessments of species on the International Union for Conservation of Nature’s Red List, the world’s most comprehensive inventory of the conservation status of wild animals, plants, and fungi.Globally, at least 190 frog species were traded—almost certainly an underestimate because the animals are easily misidentified. In one 2017 study, for example, scientists bought frog legs from grocery stores in France and, using DNA analysis, showed that 206 out of 209 specimens labeled as Javan giant frogs were other species.Of the frogs identified in the study, the IUCN lists 58 as threatened with extinction and 10 as critically endangered. But these numbers too are likely underestimates, says co-author Alice Hughes, a conservation biologist at the University of Hong Kong. That’s because the status of some traded frogs hasn’t been assessed, and many existing assessments don’t provide comprehensive information about threats to overall populations of each species.The frog leg trade has been harmful. In Indonesia, for example, large-legged species such as Blyth’s giant frog and the Malesian frog have declined so much that the country switched to exporting smaller, more common crab-eating frogs. In Albania, overexploitation is contributing to the disappearance of the Albanian water frog, a threatened species. And exports of Anatolian water frogs to Europe from southern Turkey caused population declines of 20 percent a year, with extinction of the species likely by 2032 if the trade isn’t controlled, according to scientific findings.People conflate legal trade with sustainable trade, “but in reality, the two are completely divorced,” Hughes says. “Without legislation from buying countries, we’re not going to see sustainability.”In addition to population declines caused by the trade, the researchers found that frogs captured for their legs typically are dismembered while still alive and left to die. “Everyone who wants to have this little snack should be aware of the extreme cruelty behind it,” Altherr says.Only two frogs traded for their legs are listed under CITES, the global treaty to ensure that the wildlife trade doesn’t threaten the survival of species. In 1985, CITES gave trade protections to Euphlyctis hexadactylus and Hoplobatrachus tigerinus in response to population declines in India and Bangladesh driven by exports of their legs to Europe.“Nothing’s been done since then to regulate trade in the remaining species,” Auliya says.This absence of protection for frogs “can cause a false sense of security and a lack of adequate conservation attention,” says Jonathan Kolby, a herpetologist who was not involved in the research. “If anything, the trade is even greater than what the authors were able to describe, due to the absence of standardized reporting and data.”The Nature Conservation study suggests several solutions to the lack of transparency and sustainability for the frog leg trade.The EU could supervise and centralize the gathering of reliable information about population sizes of species and threats they face, apply science-based decisions to the regulation of trade volumes, and track imports. It could formulate and oversee industry standards for humane treatment of frogs and start testing for pesticide contamination in frog meat to ensure consumer safety. The authors also call for monitoring the number of frogs that die during transport and processing before their legs are exported. None of these measures are now in place, they say.It’s also important for the EU to take the lead on initiating CITES listings for all imported species, Hughes says. “We have to start putting responsibility on those driving demand. It must be looked upon as irresponsible to be importing many thousands of animals from the wild with no data to assess the impact of that trade on wild populations.”Without EU involvement, things aren’t likely to change, says Annemarie Ohler, a frog specialist at the National Museum of Natural History, in Paris, who was not involved in the research. “European countries are transferring the responsibility to the source countries that consider frog trade as a financial resource,” she says. “Clearly, Europe should take responsibility.”",
"Some international travel companies promote activities that exploit animals, according to a new report by World Animal Protection (WAP), a U.S.-based animal welfare nonprofit.The report assesses companies’ public animal welfare policies, their efforts to include wildlife-friendly options, and whether they feature interactive animal attractions that cause “irreparable and lifelong harm,” such as elephant rides, dolphin shows, and cub petting. The University of Surrey, in the U.K., carried out the independent analysis.The report examined 10 companies that offer activities or experiences with wildlife: Airbnb, Booking.com, Expedia, GetYourGuide, Groupon, Klook, The Travel Corporation, Trip.com, TripAdvisor’s Viator, and TUI Musement.“These companies would likely agree that they are a trusted resource for their customers,” says Cameron Harsh, programs director at World Animal Protection. “Whatever they put out—in terms of an option for people to book or information about a venue—is going to be perceived a certain way by their customers as ‘this is acceptable to do.’”Up to 6 million people visit wildlife tourist attractions every year, according to a 2015 study, and a 2019 survey by World Animal Protection of 12,000 people in 12 countries showed that nearly 80 percent of travelers said they’d pay more for activities that assured animals didn’t suffer. The organization’s new report gives guidance on “what companies are protecting wild animals and which are failing them, with the hopes of putting that pressure point on them,” says wildlife campaign manager Nicole Barrantes. (Learn more about how to engage in ethical wildlife tourism.)Top scorers for their animal welfare policies were the California-based Travel Corporation, with 75 percent, and Airbnb, with 67 percent. Neither Hong-Kong based Klook, which connects travelers and local tour operators, nor U.S.-based Groupon has animal welfare policies. Both received the lowest rating of 4 percent.The Travel Corporation’s policy references the five domains of animal welfare, which include rights to good nutrition and mental stimulation. Airbnb worked with WAP in 2019 to draft a company policy that prohibits exploitative wildlife experiences such as elephant rides; interactions including feeding or petting; selfies with wild animal selfies; and the use of captive marine mammals in entertainment.The WAP report focuses on four “flagship” species—dolphins, elephants, primates, and big cats—because of their complicated needs, their ability to experience emotion, and their prevalence in tourism attractions. (Read more about what happens when elephants live alone.)Half the companies list experiences with flagship animals. Klook and Trip.com (rated at 6 percent) offer elephant rides and selfies with tiger cubs. GetYourGuide (7 percent) offers primate interactions and elephant bathing, and travelers can book elephant interactions on TUI Musement (51 percent).These animals “may have very complex social behaviors, foraging needs—things that cannot be adequately met at these facilities where their lives revolve around being used for human interaction,” says Kate Dylewsky, senior policy advisor at the Animal Welfare Institute.TUI Musement hasn’t offered interactions with wild cats or added any "unacceptable" new activities with wild animals “for several years now,” Stephen Denton, head of external communications, says, adding that the World Animal Protection report “does not truly reflect” the action TUI has taken “in support of animal welfare.” If vendors don’t pass the company’s animal welfare audits, “we drop the activity,” he says.Meanwhile, in a report last year, WAP called out Groupon for routinely partnering “with some of the cruelest captive wildlife venues in the U.S.,” including roadside zoos and animal sanctuaries with recent welfare violations. For example, it lists discounted tickets for Suncoast Primate Sanctuary, which has violated the Animal Welfare Act several times, most recently in December, and it offers discounts to visit SeaQuest, which offers interactions with stingrays and sloths. Zoos, aquariums, and animal attractions “are among the most popular on our marketplace,” says Groupon spokesperson Nicholas Halliwell. But if those merchants are “not in good standing” with the proper oversight bodies, “we take action—including removing them from our platform.”The new WAP report notes that in November 2021, Expedia, which scored 64 percent, banned sales of tickets to dolphin and whale performances and interactions—but it still offers sea lion interactions. Expedia is “committed” to “educating travelers about wildlife tourism, so they’re able to make better decisions on how they travel and interact with animals,” a spokesperson says, adding that the company works with animal nonprofits and routinely examines its product catalog to make sure prohibited experiences aren’t offered, according to its wildlife guidelines.Brian Hoyt, TripAdvisor’s head of global communications and industry affairs, says his company “has one of the tourism industry’s first and most comprehensive animal welfare policies, and we continue to be proud of efforts we make.” TripAdvisor’s policy prohibits selling tickets to physical interactions with captive animals, non-sanctuary captive cetacean facilities, and wild animal performances.Klook, Booking.com, the Travel Corporation, and Trip.com didn’t respond to requests for comment. Airbnb responded with their animal welfare guidelines. GetYourGuide didn’t respond, but a spokesperson has been quoted as saying that the company would “sharpen its guidelines and offerings” in response to its rating.Interactive tourist experiences often involve unseen animal suffering. For example, lion and tiger cub petting promotes speed breeding, in which young cubs are prematurely removed from their mothers’ care to allow for faster reproduction. As cubs grow too big for petting, they’re often killed or kept in cramped, barren enclosures, Cameron Harsh says. Dolphins that swim with humans often are confined in small tanks, where they’re seen chewing at the walls and bars from stress and boredom. At roadside zoos that sell elephant rides, the animals likely were “broken” as babies through such training methods as painful goading with bullhooks to make them docile around humans. As adults in captivity, they spend hours standing on hard, concrete surfaces, causing foot injuries, and when not giving rides, they’re usually kept in chains. (Learn more about the unseen suffering behind wildlife tourism.)“No matter what a facility may claim about how they treat the animals, if there is direct contact between people and animals, then there is always going to be mistreatment behind the scenes,” Dylewsky says. Interacting with wildlife is risky for humans too, she adds. “Most people would not walk up to an elephant in the wild and think that they could pet it or seek out a wild tiger and think that they could do a photo op.”Any time travelers engage in wildlife tourism, they should approach it “with a healthy dose of skepticism,” Dylewsky says. She advises people to seek out places to view animals from a distance in a natural setting and to look for genuine wildlife sanctuaries, particularly ones accredited by institutions like the Global Federation of Animal Sanctuaries.Consumers share responsibility to make sure their travel is wildlife-friendly, but ultimately, “travel companies are the middlemen between the traveler and the venue,” says World Animal Protection’s Nicole Barrantes. It’s “their responsibility to make sure that where they're sending tourists is not causing harm or suffering.”",
"On a raw December day, as Christmas music blares over loudspeakers, an African elephant named Asha walks in tight circles in an enclosure at Natural Bridge Zoo, a roadside attraction in Virginia. Her living quarters consist of a barn and three outdoor yards—a fenced patch of grass about 90 by 40 feet, a dirt patch with a few logs scattered about, and a yard where she gives rides to children for $15 and her massive feet have worn a ring into the grass. Her space is barren—no shrubs, trees, or watering holes.Elephants, like humans, are social animals. In the wild, females typically live in herds of eight or more, yet Asha, who’s nearly 40 years old, has been confined mostly alone for more than 30 years.Three decades ago and thousands of miles away, an inmate entered solitary confinement in California’s Pelican Bay State Prison, in Crescent City, California. He had no documented psychiatric problems when they locked him in the 80-square-foot room, barren except for a toilet, a sink, and a bed.The prisoner spent more than 22 hours a day for several months in the white, concrete cell, lit by the glow of an overhead fluorescent light. Within weeks, a prison psychiatrist noted that he couldn’t sleep. He was haunted by a desire to kill someone—or himself. During one hallucinatory episode, he repeatedly kicked the cell door. He said “entities” were visiting him. “I can see them through the walls, black evil,” he said. “I fear I’m going to die.”In 1993, inmates at Pelican Bay filed a class action lawsuit against the prison over what they alleged were inhumane conditions. Federal judge Thelton Henderson agreed. He ruled that prison officials had violated the Eighth Amendment, which prohibits cruel and unusual punishment, in part because of the suffering inflicted by solitary confinement. Inmates “can go weeks, months or potentially years with little or no opportunity for normal social contact with other people,” Henderson wrote. During a tour of the prison, he noted that “some inmates spend time simply pacing around the edges of the pen; the image created is hauntingly similar to that of caged felines pacing in a zoo.”Decades of research indicates that anyone who spends more than 10 days in involuntary solitude suffers at least some emotional, cognitive, social, and physical health effects, ranging from trouble sleeping to panic attacks and hallucinations. Neuroscientist Bob Jacobs of Colorado College, who has studied both human and animal brains, says other social mammals may react similarly. “In general, all mammals follow the same basic blueprints in terms of brain structure and function,” he says.In the United States, at least nine elephants now live alone—in unaccredited roadside businesses such as Natural Bridge Zoo and in zoos accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums (AZA). In some facilities with lone elephants, their handlers believe they’re better off alone, but in others, the elephants show signs of stress and depression.“From everything we know about the brain, there’s no reason to think that an elephant brain would react any differently to solitary confinement than a human brain,” Jacobs says. For better or for worse, he says, brains of all types are designed for specific environments, and they’re sensitive to changes in those environments.Natural Bridge Zoo owner Karl Mogensen says Asha has a good life at the zoo. “She was a product of a culling operation in ’85,” he says. “She’s what we call a family elephant—totally bonded to us and the people [here], has a tremendously good life … We’re very comfortable with the way we take care of her.” She has constant attention and “beautiful facilities,” he adds. “Yes, she is solitary, but she’s a family pet.”On its Facebook page, the zoo has positioned itself in opposition to “radical” animal groups who would take Asha away. “In a perfect world, she would be in Africa, FREE,” the zoo wrote in June 2018. “But because of the ivory trade, poaching, and deforestation, these incredible animals face certain destruction.” (African elephants are endangered, mainly because of poaching.)In a recent review of scientific literature, Jacobs hypothesizes how sparse, captive environments affect large-brained mammals such as elephants. Of course, elephants are difficult to study: “You don't want to have a laboratory animal that's capable of killing you,” he says. Scientists can’t create controlled experiments for such large animals in a laboratory, and they can’t put them in an MRI scanner and take a look inside their massive skulls. As a result, Jacobs says his research is a matter of extrapolating based on the conditions that elephants live in and how other animals’ brains respond to stress and different environments.Few laws or regulations prevent elephants from isolation. The AZA requires that zoos with female elephants must “have a minimum of three females (or the space to have three females)”—meaning that a zoo can maintain its accredited status even if it has one elephant, as long as the facility has enough space for three elephants. Elephants ideally would be grouped together, AZA president Dan Ashe told National Geographic last year, but he added, “sometimes animals don’t want to be in a group.” The Animal Welfare Act, which is enforced by the U.S. Department of Agriculture, has multiple regulations addressing the social needs of animals, including primates, dogs, and marine mammals—but none for elephants.Captive elephant numbers have been dwindling in the U.S., and as more elephants in zoos are dying than being born, the number of solitary elephants will increase. More than 30 North American zoos have phased out their elephant exhibits since the 1990s for various reasons, including the cost and difficulty of caring for elephants.“You're going to have facilities that are down to one elephant,” says Delcianna Winders, Animal Law Program director at Vermont Law School. Will they decide to send them to sanctuaries where they’ll be with other elephants? “Or are they going to assert that they're too old to move and just keep them alone?”The AZA, which oversees conservation breeding programs for African and Asian elephants, acknowledges that zoo populations can’t be sustained without an influx of new animals from wild populations—a contentious position itself as it often involves the breakup of elephant families.In the wild, much of elephants’ brain stimulation comes from other elephants, says Joyce Poole, an elephant behavior specialist and National Geographic Explorer. They’re always moving—listening, sniffing, playing—whereas solitary captive elephants are “not very animated”—they have no other elephants to interact with and nowhere to explore, she says. (Read about Poole’s African Elephant Ethogram, the most comprehensive audiovisual library ever made of African savanna elephant behavior.)Male elephants spend 10 to 14 years with their mothers before going off to form their own bonded “bachelor groups.” Females stay with their mothers all their lives, in multigenerational social groups as large as 50.“Growing up in a social context, or in a family, is critical to their development,” Poole says, and social interactions remain central to their well-being throughout their lives.That may be related to certain features of elephants’ brains. Their cells, or neurons, have particularly long, branching dendrites, which may suggest that elephants process information more deeply and contemplatively than other mammals. They have as many neurons in their cerebral cortex as humans, and they have relatively larger pyramidal neurons, a type of cortical neuron central to cognitive processes, according to Lucy Bates, an elephant cognition scientist. (To learn more about how elephants communicate, check out our elephant call guide.)While it’s not known for sure, these features may also help explain why elephants have strong memories, particularly in a social context. Some evidence suggests that after up to 27 years of separation, captive elephants can still recognize the smell of their mother’s urine. In the wild, elephants can distinguish between the calls of family members and strangers; they can recognize the voices of at least a hundred other elephants; and they can record the locations of as many as 17 different family members. By contrast, humans are thought to be able to hold about seven items in their short-term memory at once.The fact that elephant “brains are so adapted to this kind of social processing [of] information just demonstrates how important family and social interaction … is to them,” Bates says.At Natural Bridge Zoo, Asha spends hours circling her yard, grazing quietly.Veterinarian Philip Ensley, who worked with elephants at San Diego Zoo for nearly 30 years, visited the zoo in September to observe her and assess her health for the nonprofit Free All Captive Elephants, one of many animal advocacy groups that has criticized Asha’s conditions. In a private report shared with National Geographic, he noted that Asha swayed back and forth, shifted her weight off certain limbs (potentially indicating arthritis or joint disease, which are common in captive elephants), and appeared “unstimulated” and “detached.”“It is inappropriate in the field of care and management of captive elephants to keep a female alone,” he concluded in the report. The lack of a companion “is causing Asha to suffer.”The stresses of captivity can change the brain, Jacobs says. In captive wild animals, one effect can be stereotypies—repetitive, seemingly pointless behaviors, such as a monkey pulling its hair out. They’re most often displayed by bored, social animals in captivity and are rarely seen in the wild. For a solitary captive elephant, the loss of control over its environment and the lack of stimulation caused by long-term isolation can trigger pacing, head bobbing, rocking, or swaying, among other repetitive behaviors.In a 2017 report on solitary captive elephants in 14 nationally accredited zoos in Japan, it was noted that nearly all displayed stereotypic behaviors.“If there’s a behavioral issue or a psychological issue, there’s a neural issue underlying it,” Jacobs says. Repetitive behaviors, according to studies in humans and other animals, have been associated with disruption in the basal ganglia, a part of the brain that helps control voluntary movements.In swaying or pacing elephants, their basal ganglia likely are so disrupted that they can’t stop these repetitive actions, Jacobs says. (This is also true for humans who have conditions involving basal ganglia damage, such as Huntington’s disease and Parkinson’s disease, he says, which can cause involuntary movements and debilitating tremors.)For wild animals in captivity, that kind of brain damage is believed to be associated with a lack of stimulation. “The brain thrives on stimulation,” Jacobs says. Without it, dendrites shrink from lack of use, and capillaries decrease in diameter, reducing blood flow to the brain. A 2018 study on the effects of prolonged isolation on the brains of mice found a 20-percent reduction in their neurons. “‘Use it or lose it’—it applies to muscles, but it also applies to the brain,” he says.Stress, whether it’s caused by isolation or something else, also activates the body’s fight-or-flight stress response, which releases cortisol into the bloodstream, giving the body a boost of energy to respond to the perceived threat. When the fight-or-flight response is stimulated continuously, it eventually damages nerve cells in the hippocampus, which is central to learning and memory. In humans, a compromised hippocampus is often associated with depression, bipolar disorder, and other stress-related illnesses.An elephant alone in captivity has “nothing to do, nowhere to go, no one to see, no one to communicate with,” Poole says.“Why is this even still allowed for these animals that we know so much about? Why aren't our laws doing something about it?” says Vermont Law School’s Delcianna Winders.When pushed to surrender solitary elephants to sanctuaries, zoos may argue that the animal is better off staying put. She’s too old, too sick, or doesn’t like the company of other elephants, they say. That’s the argument Bronx Zoo makes for Happy, a 51-year-old Asian elephant who’s at the center of a case brought by the Nonhuman Rights Project (NhRP) arguing that she’s entitled to legal rights, including freedom from imprisonment.Bronx Zoo has a second elephant, named Patty, who also is kept alone. Happy and Patty don’t get along, according to zoo officials, though they can see each other through the fence separating their enclosures and occasionally touch each other. Director James Breheny says Happy “is more comfortable with her keepers and with safe barriers between her and other elephants” and that those who criticize her situation “know nothing of our individual animal, her personality, preferences, or tendencies.”The NhRP contends that Happy would enjoy the company of other elephants, having lived with a companion named Grumpy for 25 years until that elephant’s death in 2002. New York’s highest court has agreed to hear Happy’s case, but a date hasn’t been set.When an elephant is too sick or old to be moved, or has a disease that can be passed to other animals, it may have to be held alone, says Joshua Plotnik, president and executive director of Think Elephants International, a conservation group that studies elephant behavior. In these cases, consideration should be given to the individuality of the animal to ensure a life that’s as full as possible.“Just like if you if you have pets, each dog or cat has a different personality—it is the same for elephants,” Plotnik says. For elephants that show they need a challenge, keepers might invent more complex foraging activities; for eager-to-please animals, they might focus more on positive reinforcement.Transferring elephants can be risky, and a number have died during or shortly after being moved, though the causes of their deaths have been hotly debated.But when elephants settle in at sanctuaries, many formerly solitary, submissive, or shy animals open up—increasing their interactions with others and reducing their stereotypies. Within six months of her transfer to the Elephant Sanctuary in Tennessee, an elephant named Sissy—who had killed one of her handlers at Frank Buck Zoo, in Gainesville, Texas, and was characterized as “antisocial”—formed close friendships with other elephants; more than 20 years later, she’s thriving peaceably.After 10 years alone in Alaska Zoo, an African elephant named Maggie became one of the most social members of the herd at the Performing Animal Welfare Society (PAWS) sanctuary, in California, according to Catherine Doyle, the director of science, research, and advocacy. Zoo officials had predicted that because she was sometimes aggressive toward her former companion, who died in 1997, she might not get along with other elephants. (PAWS now has one elephant in isolation because her Asian elephant companions died. As a sanctuary, PAWS does not breed or buy elephants.)In some cases, the Endangered Species Act has been used to push zoos into providing companions for solitary animals. The law prohibits harming endangered species, which includes “significantly impairing essential behavior patterns.” For elephants, socializing with other elephants is part of their nature, Winders says, so housing an elephant alone may violate the law.There’s precedent with other social animals. In 2019, for example, a Maryland court ruled that Tri-State Zoological Park violated the Endangered Species Act by keeping lions and lemurs on their own. While a case involving a solitary elephant has yet to be tried, a lawsuit in 2015 came close: The Animal Legal Defense Fund sued San Antonio Zoo under the Endangered Species Act for keeping its Asian elephant, Lucky, alone for more than two years after her companion died. But after the lawsuit was filed, the zoo introduced two additional elephants as companions, and the fund moved to dismiss its lawsuit.In 2020, the Virginia General Assembly nearly put an end to Natural Bridge Zoo’s elephant rides when it banned “direct contact with dangerous captive animals.” The bill originally referred to elephants, as well as tigers, lions, bears, and others, but after campaigning by zoo owner Mogensen, supported by Delegates Daniel Helmer and Tony Wilt, elephants were removed from the bill before the Assembly passed it.The future is uncertain for captive elephants in the U.S., especially as the debate intensifies over whether certain highly intelligent, social species should be in kept captivity at all. “The more evidence you look at … the more you have to come to the conclusion that it is not ethically justifiable to keep these animals in captivity,” says neuroscientist Bob Jacobs, reflecting on his latest research. Even large zoos are “way too small” for such large animals, he says, but solitary elephants held in small enclosures—“that’s probably about as bad as it could get.”Wildlife Watch is an investigative reporting project between National Geographic Society and National Geographic Partners focusing on wildlife crime and exploitation. Read more Wildlife Watch stories here, and learn more about National Geographic Society’s nonprofit mission at natgeo.com/impact. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to NGP.WildlifeWatch@natgeo.com.",
"Elephants have long been thought of as either African or Asian. But there are actually two species of African elephant: The savanna elephant is larger, has curving tusks, and roams the open plains of sub-Saharan Africa. The smaller, darker forest elephant, with straight tusks, lives in the equatorial forests of Central and West Africa.Now, for the first time, scientists have separately evaluated how the two are faring—and the findings are grim.Savanna elephants are endangered and forest elephants are critically endangered, according to an official assessment released today by the International Union for Conservation of Nature (IUCN) for its Red List of Threatened Species, the world’s most comprehensive inventory of extinction risk.Elephants are highly social and form tight family groups. Here, a family enjoys time together at Kenya’s Samburu National Reserve.“For both species, poaching is still the biggest driver of decline,” says Kathleen Gobush, leader of the new assessments and a member of the IUCN’s Elephant Specialist Group, a group of technical experts focusing on conservation and management of elephants.“These assessments hopefully will garner renewed attention for the world to double down on stopping the killing, trafficking, and demand for ivory.”Evidence has been building since the early 2000s that forest and savanna elephants should be split taxonomically into two species. In 2008, when the IUCN issued its last assessment of African elephants, it still considered them a single species, then described as vulnerable to extinction. In the years since, scientists came to recognize that forest and savanna elephants are distinct from each other.Since the 2008 assessment, an elephant poaching crisis has also gripped Africa. In 2016, researchers reported in the journal PeerJ that between 2007 and 2014, savanna elephants declined by 30 percent in 18 African countries. A 2013 report in PLOS ONE found that forest elephant populations had plummeted by 62 percent in less than a decade.Poaching peaked in 2011 and since has eased in some places, notably in parts of East Africa. But it persists and is worsening in other regions, especially in Central and West Africa. Meanwhile, elephant habitat continues to be degraded by or lost to human activity.“The potential positive conservation impact of splitting forest and savanna elephants into separate species cannot be overstated,” says Bas Huijbregts, the African species director at the World Wildlife Fund, who was not involved with the new assessment. “Challenges to both species are very different, as are the pathways to their recovery.”In particular, the new report should attract more attention to forest elephants. Less visible and easily monitored than savanna elephants, they tend to be overlooked by governments and donors, and their needs are overshadowed by those of their larger cousins, Gobush says. (See National Geographic’s stunning elephant pictures.)Bureaucratically, the two species have mostly continued to be grouped together, which can hinder conservation efforts for both, says Sue Lieberman, vice president of international policy at the Wildlife Conservation Society, based in New York City. “From a legal or regulatory perspective, governments need to catch up.”To arrive at the new findings, Gobush and her colleagues assessed all available data for both species across hundreds of field sites, dating back to the 1960s for savanna elephants and the 1970s for forest elephants.Using those data, they built a statistical model to estimate population reductions over time. What came to light was that savanna elephants have declined by more than 50 percent over three generations (75 years), tipping them into the endangered category. Longer-lived forest elephant numbers have fallen by more than 80 percent over three generations (93 years), making them critically endangered.The IUCN relies on a variety of factors to determine an animal’s conservation status, such as how much its numbers and range have dwindled.“At this point, there can be no doubt that poaching and habitat loss have devastated populations of elephants all across Africa,” says Scott Schlossberg, a data analyst at Elephants Without Borders, a Botswana-based nonprofit, who was not involved with the new assessment. “A few elephant populations are doing well, but the long-term trends for the continent as a whole are poor.” (Read how poaching is on the rise in Botswana.)If anything, the IUCN findings likely are underestimates because of the scarcity of quantitative data about past elephant populations across the continent, says Iain Douglas-Hamilton, founder of Save the Elephants, a nonprofit based in Kenya, who also was not involved with the new evaluation. “The current assessment isn’t absolute and doesn’t pretend to be,” adds Douglas-Hamilton, a National Geographic Explorer. “It’s a best guess of trends.”Douglas-Hamilton says elephants can bounce back if given the chance. “They can go from high slaughter and almost destruction to strict protection and recovery,” he says.Kenya’s Tsavo National Park provides an example. Poaching reduced its savanna elephants from an estimated 40,000 in the 1970s to about 6,500 in 1988. Today, elephant numbers in the park have rebounded to about 17,000, a response to anti-poaching measures.Rebuilding elephant populations requires protecting their habitat as well as continuing to clamp down on poaching and ivory trafficking, Schlossberg says. The U.S., China, U.K. and many other countries have closed their legal domestic ivory markets.“Allowing new ivory sales could jeopardize the progress that has been made recently in fighting ivory trafficking,” Schlossberg says. (Learn how human suffering is linked to poaching.)Among countries that have not closed their legal ivory markets, Japan now has the world’s largest, and Japanese carvers prefer ivory from forest elephants.That forest elephants are now recognized as critically endangered only emphasizes the heavy toll poaching for ivory continues to extract, Lieberman says.“All countries that still allow domestic ivory markets, including Japan, need to close their markets once and for all.”",
"The African elephant is actually two different species, according to a new DNA study that may settle a long-simmering debate."The big surprise of this paper," though, is just how genetically different the African savanna elephant and the African forest elephant are, co-author David Reich said.(See African forest elephant pictures from National Geographic magazine.)According to the new research, the two major types of African elephants are about as genetically distinct from each other as the Asian elephant is from the extinct woolly mammoth.And that difference has deep roots in the elephant family tree, the DNA evidence suggests.The two apparent African elephant species appear to have evolved from a common ancestor between two and a half million and five million years ago—nearly as long ago as the human and chimpanzee lineages diverged, according to some genetic studies.For Species Designation, Size Doesn't MatterTraditionally, the forest and savanna elephants have been classified as subspecies of the same species. But numerous distinctions have been noted. For example, forest elephants live in family groups of just a few animals, whereas savanna elephant family groups number about ten and often congregate in groups of 70 or so.And—perhaps unsurprisingly, given its wide-open habitat—the African savanna elephant (Loxodonta africana) has evolved to be about twice as big as the forest elephant (Loxodonta cyclotis).The savanna elephant tips the scales at up to seven tons and stands a full meter (3.3 feet) taller at the shoulder than the African forest elephant, which lives in equatorial forests of central and western Africa.But even plainly visible morphological, or physical, differences don't necessarily indicate that animals are of separate species."Animals have an amazing capacity to change in morphology over short periods of time," said Reich, a population geneticist at Harvard Medical School.Without pressures from predators and competitors, for example, species isolated on islands can shrink in just tens of thousands of years—a blink of the eye in evolutionary time.Elephants have experienced such transitions before, producing animals like the "pygmy" Asian elephant of Borneo, which isn't considered a separate species, despite its relatively short, round shape.(See pictures of Borneo pygmy elephants at risk due to deforestation.)Interspecies Elephant Sex?Debate over the species status of African elephants has been simmering for at least a decade.A 2001 study in the journal Science included the first DNA evidence that the savanna and forest elephants are separate species.But then other studies showed that at least a small number of savanna elephants shared mitochondrial DNA—genetic information passed down from only mothers—with forest elephants.This "proved there was some interbreeding within at least the past 500,000 years," Reich explained.But that limited interbreeding isn't evidence that the two elephant types are from the same species, he said. It's just an example of interspecies hybridization, relatively common in the animal world, ha added.(See "Interspecies Sex: Evolution's Hidden Secret?")Mammoth DNA Called Into PlayThe key to the new discovery was some "cold case" genetics work on ancient, extinct elephant relatives: the woolly mammoth and the mastodon. The mastodon's nuclear genome, in particular, was sequenced for the first time for the study.(Related: "Mammoths to Return? DNA Advances Spur Resurrection Debate.")The genomes of five distinct animals—the Asian elephant, African savanna elephant, African forest elephant, woolly mammoth, and American mastodon—were then compared and contrasted.The results showed that "in fact these [African elephant] populations diverged long ago and are at least as different as Asian elephants and mammoths—and those two are not only different species but entirely different genera," Reich said.The apparent new species discovery is more than just cocktail party fodder for geneticists—it may have important conservation and management implications.If Africa's elephants are from two distinct species, then each has a smaller population than previously believed. In this case, forest elephants may be of particular concern, because far less is known about their population status. Their numbers may prove small enough to garner additional protections.New elephant-species study published in the journal PLoS Biology.",
"Elephants are highly social and form tight family groups. Here, a family enjoys time together at Kenya’s Samburu National Reserve.Since 2012, August 12 has been celebrated as World Elephant Day, a time to honor the big, intelligent animals and reflect on their plight."The elephant is loved, revered, and respected by people and cultures around the world, yet we balance on the brink of seeing the last of this magnificent creature," says the official website for the day, which was created by Canadian conservationist Patricia Sims and the Elephant Reintroduction Foundation of Thailand.More than a hundred organizations around the world celebrate World Elephant Day with events and media campaigns, which have involved millions of people.Elephants and their ancestors once roamed much of the Earth, but wild populations are now confined to decreasing swaths of land in Africa and Asia. Hunted mercilessly for their prized ivory tusks, they are under threat in most of their range from poaching, habitat loss, and human encroachment and are listed as threatened by the IUCN. (Read: Who Buys Ivory? You'd Be Surprised.)"We admire elephants in part because they demonstrate what we consider the finest human traits: empathy, self-awareness, and social intelligence," Vanity Fair editor Graydon Carter has said. "But the way we treat them puts on display the very worst of human behavior.”",
"Male African elephants usually travel alone and are significantly larger than females.",
"African elephant numbers have plummeted by 30 percent from 2007 to 2014, in large part because of poaching for the ivory trade.China’s ivory trade has now been illegal for nine months, and it appears that fewer people are interested in buying ivory. A new survey of more than 2,000 people in China conducted by GlobeScan, a public opinion research firm, and funded by the World Wildlife Fund (WWF), found that 72 percent of respondents would not buy ivory, compared to 50 percent when the poll was conducted last year, before the domestic trade ban went into effect.China is believed to be the world’s largest illegal ivory market, and until December 31, 2017, it was also the world’s biggest legal ivory market. But as pressure grew as a result of the poaching crisis, with some 30,000 African elephants slaughtered for their ivory each year, President Xi Jinping and then-U.S. President Barack Obama agreed in 2015 that both their countries would implement plans to end legal ivory sales.“We’ve been saying for years that the China ban would be a game changer. It appears that it is. We’re seeing positive effects,” says WWF’s Jan Vertefeuille, who leads the organization’s ivory work.Shoppers admire an ivory ornament at a state-owned ivory business in Guangzhou, China, in 2012. This couple bought 15 ivory pieces at a cost of more than $16,000.In addition to more people in China outright rejecting ivory, fewer Chinese have bought ivory since January 2018. In a survey conducted before the ban, more than a quarter of respondents said they’d bought ivory in the last six months. In the new survey, only 12 percent said they had.It’s not all good news, though. Since the ban, one group of people has actually become more willing to buy ivory—people who regularly travel overseas. “That's something we’re planning to do additional research into,” Vertefeuille says, but right now it’s unclear why travelers specifically have higher intent to purchase.For Chinese travelers, Thailand is one of the most popular overseas destinations where people buy ivory. To combat that, WWF is launching a pilot program next week. October 1 to October 8 is Golden Week in China, a period of holidays that includes the Chinese New Year, and it’s one of the busiest travel times of the year. Using geolocation and social media such as WeChat and Weibo, WWF will send targeted messages to Chinese tourists arriving in Thailand to remind them about the ban and to “travel ivory free.”The big question for conservationists and those fighting the illegal wildlife trade is how much of this attitudinal change can be attributed to the ban. The survey suggests that only about 8 percent of Chinese people know about the ban. While that’s double last year’s number before the ban went into effect—it’s still too low, Vertefeuille says.“We can’t say [the results are] definitively because of the ban because awareness of the ban is fairly low,” Vertefeuille says. “Some of this is increased awareness from consumers. But they’re getting the message somehow, and that’s encouraging.”Vanda Felbab-Brown, an expert in the illegal wildlife trade and organized crime at the Brookings Institution, says an important next step is to dig into that group of people who went from possible ivory buyers in 2017 to definitive ivory rejectors in 2018. “You want to see who are the people who switched their opinions and ask: Was it the ban? Was it the [awareness] ad? Was it ‘my grandmother told me to save the innocent baby elephant?’” she says.Felbab-Brown has also studied drug trafficking and has examined the effects of bans on certain activities. “Bans do have an effect,” she says. “The question of how strong the effect is depends on individuals, societies, cultures. Are the people who are inclined to buy ivory susceptible to the moral-legal element of obeying laws?”For a ban to really work, she says, enforcement is critical: “What I would think is a big deterrent is Chinese law enforcement making big busts. Not just once, but a series of raids on traders” as well as punishments for buyers.China’s aboveboard Ivory shops seem to have gotten the message. The wildlife trade monitoring organization TRAFFIC, an offshoot of WWF, made site visits in 2018 to 71 shops that had been licensed to sell ivory before the ban went into effect. They found that 17 have closed, and they confirmed that the other 54, which sold ivory as well as other items, no longer have ivory on the shelves.Before the ivory ban, China had many state-licensed ivory carving factories and retailers. This factory in Beijing carved more than 1,600 pounds of ivory a year and employed more than 20 artisans in 2011.“It’s very encouraging that the legally licensed shops don’t have ivory,” Vertefeuille says, but it’s important to keep an eye on under-the-table sales. TRAFFIC’s market survey did find plenty of ivory for sale illegally in other shops, although that too has decreased somewhat.New fieldwork shows that new ivory trading centers are popping up in China and that there are potentially new groups of buyers, Felbab-Brown notes. So while people who previously showed interest in buying ivory may have changed their minds, there are probably new people moving to cities and into the middle class who haven’t seen any of the awareness campaigns or don’t know about the ban, she points out.The Chinese government continues to hold a stockpile of ivory that it had been releasing in set amounts to ivory carving factories and retailers before the ban. And so far, there has been no buy-back campaign to get remaining ivory out of the storerooms of previously licensed ivory shops.And as far as decreasing poaching is concerned, Felbab-Brown says it’s probably too early to tell if the ban has helped save elephants in Africa. In her studies of drug policy, she’s learned that there’s usually a time lag of about two years between a demand-reduction effort and any significant change on the street.For now, raising awareness of the ban and enforcing its provisions are priorities. Vertefeuille is encouraged that more young adults are joining the “ivory rejectors” category. To make headway, she says, advocates need to encourage young people to spread the message among their peers. Also the Chinese government needs to work more closely with NGOs’ awareness campaigns, and the private sector, especially the travel industry, needs to get involved to help fight the overseas trade among Chinese travelers.",
"Tokyo, JapanLike thousands of other Tokyo visitors on a recent summer day, we beelined for Asakusa, a popular tourist district. My companion and I were drawn not by the neighborhood’s famous Buddhist temple or its renowned geisha shows but by ivory. Banned in much of the world, here in Japan ivory is still sold openly and legally.The hunt didn’t take long. Weaving through selfie-snapping crowds, past the thunderous booms of a live drum band and the tantalizing smells of freshly baked takoyaki, we stopped at random at a shop to ask for directions. We’d heard that a particular jewelry store nearby sold Chinese-style ivory jewelry. The shopkeeper shook his head: He didn’t think that place was around anymore.“But if it’s ivory you’re looking for,” he said, “I can help you.”Ivory gained popularity among Japanese in the 17th to mid-19th centuries, when it began to be used to make netsuke, small toggles that fasten a purse or container to a wearer’s obi belt. Netsuke eventually fell out of fashion, but a small group of artists and collectors keep the tradition alive today.Though his shop specialized in coral, he reached into a back drawer and pulled out a necklace. The intricate, matchbox-size carving dangling from its cord depicted Kannon, the Buddhist goddess of mercy, her swirling skirts surrounded by a dragon’s tight coils and a spray of phoenix feathers.“Zoge,” the shopkeeper said, pointing to the creamy white material. Ivory. He was asking just $450—a steal.It was very beautiful, I admitted, putting it around my friend’s neck and snapping a photo. I told the shopkeeper that I’d heard it was against the law to take ivory out of Japan. Wouldn’t we run into trouble getting it back to New York City?“If you show this to Customs, no, not OK,” the shopkeeper said after a pause. “But many people from New York take ivory back to the United States.”To demonstrate how this was done, he pointed at my purse and motioned inside, as though concealing something within. “Or just put it in your shirt for taking back to New York,” he said, patting his collar. “Perhaps it’s OK.”After we demurred, the shopkeeper nevertheless handed me his business card. “Nine a.m. tomorrow, we’re open!”International ivory trade has been banned since 1990, but exchanges like this are why countries and territories around the world—including the U.S., U.K., France, and Taiwan—have been issuing near-total domestic ivory bans. Michael Gove, British secretary of state for the environment, food and rural affairs, says the U.K.’s ban, expected to take effect in 2019, “is one of the most effective ways we can contribute to ensuring the horrific decline in African elephant numbers is reversed.”No matter how supposedly tight the controls, legal trade in ivory seems inevitably to serve as a smoke screen for illegal dealings. China—the world’s preeminent source of demand for ivory and the predominant driver behind much of Africa’s elephant poaching—was widely praised for closing its market in January.China’s decision meant that Japan suddenly inherited the dubious distinction of being the world’s largest legal ivory market. Though long overlooked as a source of illegal trade, evidence is emerging that “the last ivory ban haven,” as conservationists have dubbed Japan, is just as vulnerable to abuse.“To many people in the world, it seems that Japanese people are generally keen to comply with the law, but in reality that’s not the case,” says Masayuki Sakamoto, an environmental lawyer and the executive director of the Japan Tiger and Elephant Fund (JTEF), a nonprofit organization based in Tokyo.In 2011 authorities in Kenya burned five tons of ivory—including many blank hankos, or name seals, the main ivory product in Japan—recovered from a seizure in Singapore.Investigations conducted by JTEF and other groups have revealed regulations riddled with loopholes that ivory traders readily exploit, including by fraudulently registering tusks, sending ivory abroad or—as I saw—offering ivory to customers who they believe intend to take it across borders illegally. From 2011 to 2016, Traffic, the wildlife trade monitoring group, tallied 2.4 tons of seized ivory leaking out of Japan, almost all bound for China.In light of such findings, pressure is building for Japan to join the rest of the world in closing its domestic ivory market. “We’ve been slaughtering elephants since Roman times, but we can end ivory trade now,” says Peter Knights, CEO of WildAid, a nonprofit organization based in San Francisco. “That would be a tremendous achievement for the human race—and Japan could be leading it.”But Japanese officials are sticking to a decades-long stance that their ivory market complies with sustainable trade and is controlled tightly enough to be exempt from calls for bans. As Masaru Horikami, director of the Ministry of the Environment’s Wildlife Division, says, “Japan is not being blamed for poaching, so at this point the Japanese government is not thinking about closing the ivory market.” He and his colleagues most recently dismissed a recommendation by the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES), the treaty organization that regulates the global wildlife trade, that all countries whose domestic ivory markets spur poaching or illegal trade close them.Predicting if or how Japan’s ongoing ivory trade will affect the survival of elephants is very difficult, says Vanda Felbab-Brown, a senior fellow at the Brookings Institution, a nonprofit public policy organization based in Washington, D.C., and author of The Extinction Market. “Does ivory leaking from Japan to China satisfy existing demand, or does it boost demand so there’s more poaching of elephants in Africa? These are enormously complex questions,” she says. “What we do know, though, is that regulations in Japan are not adequate to prevent illegal export of ivory.”As poaching rages on in Africa, some experts fear that those inadequate regulations will allow Japan to become the next leading destination for laundering ivory from recently killed elephants.These giants in Kenya's Tsavo East National Park represent some of Africa's last great tuskers—elephants whose massive tusks weigh in at about a hundred pounds or more.Ivory trade has made elephants walking targets since time immemorial, but the past century has seen their populations in Africa plunge from about 10 million a century ago to an estimated 400,000 to 500,000 today. Savanna elephants suffered a 30 percent loss from 2007 to 2014, and thousands continue to be poached for their tusks each year.China’s appetite for ivory has been the primary cause of today’s crisis, but Japan helped set the stage. Japan has consumed ivory from at least 262,500 elephants since 1970, the vast majority from large, mature adults, according to Allan Thornton, president of the Environmental Investigation Agency (EIA), a nonprofit organization based in Washington, D.C. Japan’s ivory appetite fueled catastrophic poaching during the 1970s and 1980s, when African elephant populations were slashed by 50 percent.Since the 1990 ban, Japanese officials have pushed to reopen the international trade, and in 1999 and 2008 they partly succeeded by instigating one-off ivory sales to replenish Japan’s domestic market. (China’s inclusion in the second sale best explains the most recent upsurge in elephant poaching and ivory trafficking, according to a working paper published by researchers from the University of California, Berkeley and Princeton University.)“Japan bears the strongest moral responsibility for having re-triggered the mass slaughter of elephants by leading efforts to dismantle the ban,” Thornton says. “Dismantling that ban through the two CITES-approved ivory sales was a catastrophic error that allowed industrial-level poaching to reignite.”Japan’s ivory industry today, Thornton adds, is “greater than any other nation on Earth.” While China had some 170 ivory outlets nationwide prior to its ban, Japan has 8,200 retailers, 300 manufacturers, and 500 wholesalers.On their website, Japanese ivory traders refer to their craft as “an indispensable traditional industry.” But in actuality, ivory was introduced to Japan relatively recently, and its use has shifted with the whims of the day.“We don’t have sophisticated traditional carving like China,” says Tetsuji Ida, an author and journalist at Kyodo News who has reported on ivory since 1992. “The ivory-as-cultural-heritage argument is false.”A collection of modern netsuke at the Kyoto Seishu Netsuke Art Museum. The museum sponsors an annual competition for the best new netsuke and hosts networking events to try to reinvigorate interest in this fading traditional art.Ivory found its way to Japan in the 1500s as an adornment for high-end furniture for feudal lords and aristocrats, as well as for musical instrument parts and tea ceremony utensils. But its popularity took off during the Edo period, from the 1600s to the mid-1800s, when Japan’s new merchant class began using it to make hair ornaments, tobacco containers, and tiny accessories called netsuke.Kimonos have no pockets, so netsuke—which always contain a string hole—were indispensable for fastening small purses to the wearer’s obi belt. As kimono culture grew more sophisticated, fashionistas would coordinate their netsuke—the most favored of which were made of ivory—to match a particular season or event.“By the late Edo period, even commoners probably had at least one piece of ivory crafts,” says Kinue Asayama, general manager of the Kiyomizu Sannenzaka Museum, in Kyoto. “People cherished it as a luxury.”When Japan opened its doors to the West in 1853 and transitioned into the Meiji period, demand for ivory escalated, thanks to foreign visitors who loved Japanese arts and crafts. A new ivory carving industry sprang up to mass produce sculptures of elegant women, humble countryfolk, and smiling children. “As demand got bigger, the ivory pieces got bigger,” Asayama says. “Western merchants came to buy ivory sculptures, and Japanese art dealers established branches outside of the country.”For the Japanese, however, ivory was losing its luster. As westernization came into vogue, netsuke, Buddhist sculptures, antiques, and other ivory trinkets were sold to foreigners, and most new products were manufactured specifically for export. This came to an end when World War II broke out, but the ivory market, rather than fade into oblivion, evolved soon after the fighting ended. Tobacco was its new entry point.Kyoichiro Tsuge, a pipemaker, had just returned from the front line after WWII when he seized on a business opportunity. Almost everyone in Japan smoked, but the paper cigarettes the Americans supplied lacked filters, making them difficult to enjoy until the very end. Ivory cigarette holders, Tsuge realized, were the answer. Ivory didn’t burn, and because a tusk is nothing more than an elephant’s tooth, it produced a pleasant teeth-on-teeth feel when held in the smoker’s mouth. The fad spread quickly.Tsuge expanded during the 1950s, putting his 120 carvers to work making souvenir ivory pipes for the thousands of Americans stationed in Tokyo. Decorated with Japanese motifs such as Mount Fuji, maiko (geisha in training), and dragons, the pipes—which cost $30 to $50, about a month’s salary for an average Japanese at the time—proved best sellers. Tsuge often sent his son, Kyozaburo, to make weekly deliveries to the U.S. entertainment palace in Ginza, a place normally prohibited for Japanese.Demand for ivory pipes dried up after the Americans left, and paper filters replaced cigarette holders. But once again the industry conceived of a new use for ivory—one that has since served as the driving force behind Japan’s consumption.<!--
 /* Font Definitions */
@font-face
	{font-family:Arial;
	panose-1:2 11 6 4 2 2 2 2 2 4;
	mso-font-charset:0;
	mso-generic-font-family:swiss;
	mso-font-pitch:variable;
	mso-font-signature:-536859905 -1073711037 9 0 511 0;}
@font-face
	{font-family:"Cambria Math";
	panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4;
	mso-font-charset:0;
	mso-generic-font-family:roman;
	mso-font-pitch:variable;
	mso-font-signature:-536870145 1107305727 0 0 415 0;}
@font-face
	{font-family:Calibri;
	panose-1:2 15 5 2 2 2 4 3 2 4;
	mso-font-charset:0;
	mso-generic-font-family:swiss;
	mso-font-pitch:variable;
	mso-font-signature:-536870145 1073786111 1 0 415 0;}
 /* Style Definitions */
p.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal
	{mso-style-unhide:no;
	mso-style-qformat:yes;
	mso-style-parent:"";
	margin:0in;
	margin-bottom:.0001pt;
	mso-pagination:widow-orphan;
	font-size:12.0pt;
	font-family:"Calibri",sans-serif;
	mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-bidi-font-family:"Times New Roman";
	mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;}
.MsoChpDefault
	{mso-style-type:export-only;
	mso-default-props:yes;
	font-family:"Calibri",sans-serif;
	mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri;
	mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin;
	mso-bidi-font-family:"Times New Roman";
	mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;}
@page WordSection1
	{size:8.5in 11.0in;
	margin:1.0in 1.0in 1.0in 1.0in;
	mso-header-margin:.5in;
	mso-footer-margin:.5in;
	mso-paper-source:0;}
div.WordSection1
	{page:WordSection1;}
-->Shuseki Fukazama, a
third-generation hanko carver at the Museum of Ivory Carving in Yamanashi
Prefecture, laments that his skill is no longer as valued as it once was. “I’m
sad that young consumers are OK with the mass-produced stuff,” he says. Soke
Nihon Insou Kyokai, the company behind the museum, was established by entrepreneur
Hikaru Sakamoto, who popularized ivory hankos. The company remains the largest producer
of hand-carved hankos in Japan.Hikaru Sakamoto, a traveling salesman from Yamanashi Prefecture, was selling jewelry to wealthy households when he noticed that his customers made expensive purchases using low-quality wooden hankos, or signature name stamps. Given that everyone in Japan needs a hanko, luxury hankos, Sakamoto realized, could be an even bigger profitmaker than jewelry.In 1967 Sakamoto founded Soke Nihon Insou Kyokai, a hanko company specializing in ivory. Although he wasn’t the first to produce ivory hankos, he did pioneer an ingenious marketing scheme. Some Japanese believe that certain high-quality hankos can positively influence their fate, and Sakamoto capitalized on this superstition by taking out ads claiming that because elephants live long lives in tightly knit family groups, people who own ivory hankos will enjoy similar longevity, fortune, and harmony. What the “Diamond Is Forever” campaign did later for engagement rings in the West, Sakamoto’s ivory message did for hankos in Japan.“Very much like eating whale meat, using ivory hankos was something made by industries and PR agencies,” Tetsuji Ida says. “Definitely this is not our culture, not our tradition, and has no relation with a principle of sustainable use.” (By “sustainable use” he means trade in animals and their parts that doesn’t harm their populations.)Indeed, the booming hanko trade came at the expense of African elephants, which by this time were being slaughtered en masse for their tusks. In 1982 Japan overtook Hong Kong as the world’s largest ivory consumer, importing more than 2,700 tons of ivory—the equivalent of 120,000 elephants—in a single decade. An estimated 70 percent of Japan’s ivory at that time was illegal, from poached elephants, and at least half of it was being used to churn out more than two million hankos annually.“In the 1980s Japan was so notorious, not only in terms of the volume of ivory it consumed but also for illegal trade,” says Isao Sakaguchi, a professor of international relations and global environmental governance at Gakushuin University, in Tokyo. “Japan was responsible for the near extinction of African elephants in most of their range states.”News of the poaching crisis didn’t connect with many ivory hanko producers and users, however. Africa and its problems seemed a world away, and, according to Sakaguchi, by the time poached tusks reached Japan, they’d been laundered into legality, often through fraudulent permits issued by exporters in Africa or Hong Kong.Takashi Mochizuki, the representative of his family’s company, Mochizuki Mitsugu Shoten, a major hanko distributor, still shudders when recalling the day 30 years ago that a French television crew showed up at his business in Rokugo, a town famous throughout Japan for its hanko production. “When they started broadcasting, they first showed hanko stores in this neighborhood, but soon after that, they showed images of dead elephants!” Mochizuki says. “That was something I couldn’t accept.”Rangers in Kenya removed the tusks of this bull elephant killed by a spear to prevent the ivory from entering the illegal trade.More reporters began turning up after that, all “with an intention to show Japan as the place where ivory from elephants killed by poachers ends up,” he says. But, he adds, for him and his neighbors, elephants are “a precious, holy thing. Our tradition is not killing animals but just taking ivory from ones that died naturally somewhere. We’re not part of that elephant-killing business.” To this day Mochizuki and others in the ivory industry stand by that assertion.With press coverage of the poaching crisis reaching a fever pitch in the late 1980s, the Japanese government finally relented. In June 1989, four months before the international ivory ban went into effect, Japan temporarily halted ivory imports. Industry representatives pressured officials to oppose heightened protections for African elephants at a 1989 CITES meeting, but the best they could do, government officials said, was abstain from voting.“The tragedy for African elephants started in 1989, when the Conference of the Parties at CITES supported the blanket ban of ivory,” says Yoshio Kaneko, a member of the CITES Secretariat from 1985 to 1990 and an adviser to the Japanese government on ivory and other wildlife-related issues. “Southern African countries that had succeeded in conserving elephants through sustainable use of ivory lost income and were unjustly penalized.”Rather than implementing a blanket ban, Kaneko says, countries with healthy elephant populations should have been allowed to continue to trade ivory and use the proceeds from those sales for conservation. “They lost income that otherwise they were able to receive on a regular basis and invest in long-term management programs,” he says. “I don’t want to see countries with conservation success stories penalized by others.”According to the Ministry of Environment’s Masaru Horikami, trade in ivory is “about following the spirit of CITES” concerning sustainable trade of wildlife. Legal ivory sales can play an important role in motivating communities in southern Africa to conserve elephants, agrees Nobuo Ishii, an ecologist and conservationist at Tokyo Woman’s Christian University and a member of the Japanese CITES delegation since 1989. “If we close our market, we cannot help African countries anymore.”JTEF’s Masayuki Sakamoto has heard these claims for 30 years. He rejects the idea that a legal ivory trade can help save elephants. “Ishii and other ivory trade advocates just repeat abstract principles, like ‘Range states should be supported,’ and ‘If animals lose their value, incentive for conservation is decreased,’” he says. “On a theoretical level, yes, I agree that there are many options for sustainable use of wildlife, but for ivory these opinions do not stand up to reality. History tells us that it’s impossible to control trade at a level that doesn’t drive elephants toward extinction.”Tetsuji Ida agrees. “No one can claim there is no illegal ivory market in Japan,” he says. But sustainable use of ivory and other wildlife products continues to be “a principle of the Japanese government.”For Sakamoto, the celebration over the 1990 ivory ban was short-lived. Known by some as the godfather of ivory issues in Japan, he has watched ivory dealers there lobby the government to reopen international trade ever since.One of the loudest voices belongs to the Japan Federation of Ivory Arts and Crafts Associations, a group of ivory-manufacturing businesses, many of them family run. Some have roots dating to the late 1800s, when the group arose to help facilitate the logistically tricky task of sourcing ivory from Africa and India. Today the association’s 50 or so members control much of the legal trade and manufacturing of ivory in Japan and, according to Sakamoto, enjoy a close relationship with the government.Masayuki Sakamoto, executive director of the Japan Tiger and Elephant Fund, has been investigating the ivory trade in Japan since the early 1990s. He’s one of the loudest voices calling for the country to close its ivory market.Sakamoto conducted his own research on Japan’s lax trade controls—but his findings were no match for international politics. In 1997 at a CITES conference in Harare, Zimbabwe’s president, Robert Mugabe—goaded by Japanese officials and industry representatives—pressured other governmental attendees to support an ivory sale to Japan. When the proposal passed, Sakamoto watched in defeat as the Zimbabweans burst out with their national anthem and the Japanese leaped from their chairs with fists clenched in triumph.“I was sorry that my effort was not enough,” Sakamoto says. “We had failed to stop Japan from undermining the international ivory ban.”After the meeting, he visited Chobe National Park in Botswana, where he saw African elephants in the wild for the first time—an experience that still conjures strong emotions in him. During a safari in an open vehicle, the matriarch of a family of elephants—threatened when the car cut between the elephants—charged.“The earth actually shook,” Sakamoto recalls. “I felt that I would be killed and that if I was, it was fate because I couldn’t work hard enough for the elephants.” The driver reversed just in time, and Sakamoto, shaken, made a silent vow: “In my heart I told the elephants that I will continue to fight for them.”That fight has been a formidable challenge. Almost immediately after CITES approved the first ivory sale, of 50 tons, to Japan in 1997, Japanese officials began lobbying for a repeat event. This time, though, Japan wasn’t alone. Now China—which previously had resigned itself to allowing its ivory industry to fade—began to seek the right to resume trade.“Japan and China have always had a very frictional, competitive relationship,” says Grace Ge Gabriel, the Asia regional director at the International Fund for Animal Welfare, a Massachusetts-based nonprofit animal welfare and conservation group. “If you keep giving ivory to Japan and ignoring China—well, as a Chinese, I also felt it was not fair to favor Japan over China.”But Gabriel also knew that allowing the second sale would be “a disaster for elephants.” Her research showed that China’s market was grossly underprepared—and that Japan’s ivory regulations were even worse. Once again, such concerns were dismissed, and despite protests from 20 African elephant range states, the second sale was held in 2008, with 62 tons of ivory going to China and 39 to Japan. The poaching crisis immediately ignited, and China has dominated ivory headlines ever since.Yet Gabriel, Sakamoto, and others fear that Japan is a slumbering giant in terms of its potential for illegal trade—one that may reawaken now that China has closed its market. “Illegal ivory dealers will definitely try to find a new legalized market to be used as cover,” Sakamoto says. “Japan should prepare for that.”Unlike in the West, where ivory became a stigmatized symbol of death and greed after the 1990 global trade ban, in Japan ivory’s image was tarnished but not destroyed. “Most consumers here don’t recognize the domestic ivory issue,” Sakaguchi says, referring to regulatory loopholes and illegal trade. “The level of awareness is still very low for Japanese people.”In China, ivory symbolizes wealth and prestige. In Japan, it’s “not about showing off status but about everyday use,” says Airi Yamawaki, co-founder of Tears of the African Elephant, a nonprofit organization based in Tokyo and Nairobi.The continued interest Japanese have in ivory is further obscured by the fact that much of the trade now happens online. According to a JTEF analysis, the number of closing bids for ivory on Yahoo! Japan auctions rose steadily from fewer than 4,000 in 2005 to more than 28,000 in 2015, dipping to a still significant 16,000 in 2017. (The drop was likely a result of negative media attention surrounding ivory and increased policing by Yahoo! Japan, which is not controlled by Yahoo Inc.) A 2015 JTEF and EIA single-day survey of Yahoo! Japan and Rakuten, a popular e-commerce site, likewise revealed some 12,200 ads for ivory.Ivory tea ceremony utensils, musical instrument parts, Buddhist prayer beads, and jewelry are still produced in Japan, but much of the enduring interest traces back to the original hanko PR blitz. With its stock of around 700,000 ivory name seals, the hanko industry is responsible for an estimated 80 percent of current ivory consumption. Hanko use has declined in daily life since the 1980s, but when it comes to big life events—purchasing a house, getting married, or inheriting property—name seals are still a necessity. For many, ivory remains the “premier grand guru” and “king” of hanko materials—as the industry aggressively advertises.According to Japanese authorities, hankos and other ivory products sold in Japan are either antiques or legally made from tusks imported before the 1990 ban or from the two sales. That Japan’s market is suddenly under attack by conservationists is unfair, they say, because ivory regulations here are on a par with, if not better than, those elsewhere.Masayuki Sakamoto browses ads for illegal ivory on Yahoo! Japan’s retail site, which is not controlled by Yahoo Inc. Japanese law requires that whole tusks be registered with the government and that registration documents be displayed—which this ad doesn’t do. A number of prominent Japanese e-commerce sites and businesses have banned ivory, but Yahoo! Japan says it has no intention of following suit.“The Japanese trade policy is the same as other countries,” says Junya Nakano, director of the Office of Trade Licensing for Wild Animals and Plants at the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry. “We prohibit international trade of ivory and allow only some very small exceptional cases of domestic trade in pre-convention [trade ban] and one-off sale ivory.”Japan’s problem, according to Hirochika Namekawa, principal deputy director of the Global Environment Division at the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, is one not of ivory controls but of communication. “Maybe it’s a matter of Japan not being as good at public relations as other countries,” he says. “But in terms of regulations, Japan is very strict, just like the U.K. and U.S.”Other countries, however, have enacted or are in the process of enacting near-total ivory trade bans. “The extent of ivory sales in Japan is an order of magnitude greater than the U.S. and U.K,” says author and researcher Felbab-Brown. For Japanese officials to compare their ivory trade controls with the U.S. or U.K., EIA’s Allan Thornton adds, is “a preposterous and unsubstantiated claim.”For one thing, Japan requires that only whole tusks intended for commercial trade be registered with the government. Ivory hankos, carvings, and trinkets are not regulated. Nor are cut pieces. This is why, Thornton says, many past shipments of illegal ivory seized en route to Japan have contained tusks cut into two or three pieces; once those pieces make it into the country, no controls exist to prevent them from being sold.Japan’s international postal system also works in traffickers’ favor because it exempts imported items with a declared value under $2,000 from normal regulations. Ivory detected in one of those shipments is not seized. Instead, if left unclaimed, it’s returned to the sender. During the past few years, Japanese customs have mailed back hundreds of pieces of ivory, including sculptures from China, cut pieces from Nigeria and Zimbabwe, and tusks from France, according to Japan Customs.An anti-ivory poster at an Earth Day event in Tokyo. The Japanese public responds best to softer messages, preferring not to be confronted with images of butchered elephants or statistics about African rangers killed protecting wildlife, according to Airi Yamawaki, co-founder of Tears of the African Elephant. “There’s a phrase here: ‘Put a lid on something that smells,’” she says. “That’s exactly what we do for ivory.”Because of these “huge loopholes,” Tetsuji Ida says, Japan “cannot say with 100 percent confidence that we don’t use any illegal ivory coming from African countries.”As for whole tusks, should one be smuggled into Japan, all an unscrupulous trader needs do to exempt it from domestic laws, and thus make it legal, is cut it in half. But there’s no real need for that, Sakamoto says, because legalizing a tusk in Japan for commercial sale, regardless of its origin, is easy. Owners don’t have to prove their tusk’s age with a receipt or carbon dating analysis, nor are they required to bring it in for a physical inspection. Instead they fill out an application form, take a few photos, and get a friend or even a family member to provide a written statement vouching for the fact that they saw the tusk in the registrant’s home before 1990. The system, Sakamoto says, is the equivalent of “official laundering.”Concerned that the number of whole tusks registered in Japan has been steadily rising—from just 408 in 2006 to 1,687 in 2016—Sakamoto and his investigative partner, Kumi Togawa, wanted to see just how easy it is to get away with laundering an illegal one. In 2015 they teamed up with EIA and hired an investigator, who called the Japan Wildlife Research Center, the nongovernmental body tasked with overseeing tusk registration, to say that she wished to register a tusk inherited from her father. She believed he acquired it around the year 2000, however, making it illegal. Rather than deter her, the agent told the investigator to say, for example, that she had seen the tusk in her father’s house in 1985, and he coached her about what to write to ensure “there would be no doubt, no problem.” He even offered to proofread her application.Sticking to the same story about the inherited tusk, the investigator next called ivory dealers who make a business of purchasing registered whole tusks from citizens and reselling them to manufacturers. Thirty of 37 dealers suggested illegal activities, including a desire to buy the unregistered ivory directly or to help the investigator fraudulently register the tusk using fake, third-party testimonials. As a buyer from one of the largest ivory companies in Japan reassured her, “I’ve done over 500 to 600 of these cases, and no one has ever been questioned about the third party’s statement, not even once.”Thornton was genuinely surprised by the high number of businesses willing to break the law—“When we started, I thought we’d find three or four bad apples,” he says—but ivory trade advocates were dismissive. “I don’t understand why people insist ivory regulations must be 100 percent perfect,” says Kaneko, the government adviser.The government never responded directly to JTEF or EIA about their findings. But in early 2017 a tusk registration official at the Japan Wildlife Research Center raised alarms after discovering a number of suspiciously similar applications. Though the applicants supposedly had no connection, the carpet in the photos looked the same, the testimonials were all written in matching fonts, and the stories about the tusks’ acquisitions were nearly indistinguishable.An investigation led the Tokyo police to two ivory wholesale companies, Raftel and Flawless, and they seized 27 unregistered tusks the companies had tried to fraudulently register on behalf of sellers. Company officials insisted, however, that they were innocent because they’d received permission from the Japan Wildlife Research Center to collect ivory prior to registration so they could ensure its authenticity. The prosecutor accepted the explanation, dismissing the cases and returning the seized tusks, according to JTEF's Sakamoto, the Japanese media, and the Tokyo police.To the ire of some officials, the cases were widely covered by the Japanese press. “It’s really disappointing and upsetting that these kinds of illegal transactions are picked up by the media and publicized as if the Japanese legal ivory market had all these murky areas,” says Reiji Kamezawa, director of the Nature Conservation Bureau at the Ministry of the Environment. “I really don’t think we deserve that kind of criticism.”Ivory industry executives similarly insist that they’re victims of an environmentalist and media witch hunt. At a 2017 hanko trade fair in Tokyo, Takaichi Ivory Company, Japan’s largest hanko manufacturer, posted a notice complaining about the “relentless harassment and pressure” from conservation groups. It was a brazen assertion, considering that Kageo Takaichi, the company’s chairman and the former director of the Japan Federation of Ivory Arts and Crafts Associations, along with his son, were prosecuted in 2011 for illegally trading 58 tusks. The business was fined around $9,000, and Takaichi and his son were given suspended sentences of three and two years, respectively.Takaichi didn’t respond to an interview request, but statements he made at his trial are indicative of the pressure Japan’s ivory dealers are under. “The thought of ivory no longer coming here is nerve-racking,” he said, and it was this “sense of impending crisis” that drove him to break the law.It’s difficult to further judge the mood of ivory traders because they’re tight-lipped. “We don’t trust any journalists,” Shunji Koizumi, a representative from the Tokyo Ivory Arts and Crafts Association, a subsidiary of the Japan Federation of Ivory Arts and Crafts Associations, told my translator by phone. About a dozen other members likewise declined interview requests, and one manufacturer even indicated that he and his colleagues had been warned by the association and by someone at Japan’s Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry not to speak with journalists. Keiko Aikawa, a deputy director at the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry, denied knowledge of any such warning.One member of the Japan Federation of Ivory Arts and Crafts Associations did agree to talk. Pipe tycoon Kyozaburo Tsuge no longer deals in ivory, but he was made an honorary member for the influence he wields and for his family’s prominent history in the industry. Tsuge’s personal ivory collection numbers more than a hundred sculptures in addition to countless netsuke, pipes, canes, tobacco holders, full tusks, and more. “With ivory, for me it’s not just about money,” he says. “What I’m really concerned about is the artistic, historical, and almost spiritual value of the work.”Ivory manufacturers are “very worried and very nervous” about the direction the trade is going in Japan, Tsuge says. “People who are sticking to the legal side of the trade are feeling threatened because of the way they’re being treated.” As far as he and his friends are concerned, Japanese ivory traders aren’t the problem. “Everything is registered, everything is legal, everything is trackable in Japanese businesses,” Tsuge says. “But because there are so many other countries that don’t follow the rules, Japan is under suspicion and is suffering from the same restrictions and tightening of regulations.”By “other countries,” Tsuge really means one country.“It’s definitely just the Chinese,” he says, adding that for Japanese traders, “there’s a danger of being pulled into smuggling business with Chinese people or getting caught along with them.”This is more than speculation. When EIA hired two investigators to pose as Chinese buyers intent on taking ivory out of Japan, all four wholesalers they approached were ready to do business. All, in fact, reassured their potential buyers that they’d made deals with Chinese in the past. “We sold so many ivory tusks [to the Chinese] that ivory has been vanishing from Japan,” one dealer bragged. Working with Chinese had caused the price for ivory to “surge,” another added.According to an unpublished analysis of China’s reported ivory seizure data undertaken by the Elephant Trade Information System, a tool CITES uses to track trends in the illegal ivory trade, from 2011 to 2016 Japan ranked fourth—behind Nigeria, Tanzania, and Vietnam—in terms of top source countries for ivory coming into China. During that period, Traffic Japan tallied more than a hundred seizures of illegal ivory totaling 2.15 tons. “This could be the tip of the iceberg in terms of the volume of ivory coming from Japan to China,” says Tomomi Kitade, who heads the office.A teacher of English in Nagano Prefecture, who asked not to be identified because a friend later told her it would be "bad" to show the world that she owns ivory, bought ivory hankos for her children after a traveling salesman told her they’d bring good luck. She spent $4,500 on the hankos and a couple of other good luck charms but says it was money well spent. “I believe a hanko can decide a person’s fate, so I wanted the best for my daughter and son."While shipping ivory overseas is illegal, selling it in Japan to foreign buyers is not. Last November, the Tokyo police arrested a Chinese sailor trying to board a China-bound vessel with 605 ivory hankos. The investigation led the police to another Chinese national and to Masao Tsuchiya, director of the All Japan Ivory Center in Tokyo, both of whom were arrested earlier this year. Tsuchiya argued that he had no idea his Chinese customers intended to take the ivory he sold them out of the country. The prosecutor dismissed the case.Despite the newly imposed ivory ban in China, demand there remains strong. Traffic’s China office has found that illegal sales continue online and that tourists are still buying ivory abroad to smuggle home.“If neighboring countries with weak law enforcement—including Japan—don’t close their legal and illegal ivory markets, we will not be able to curb the illegal trade flowing into China,” says Zhou Fei, the head of Traffic’s China office. Of Japan’s record 24 million visitors in 2016, the majority came from East Asia, and Chinese interest in visiting Japan increased 130 percent from 2015 to 2016, according to a Trip Advisor analysis.For now, Japan has not answered that call. In an EIA report scheduled to be published on October 8, investigators found that nearly 60 percent of more than 300 hanko vendors they approached had no qualms about customers taking ivory out of Japan. Several even offered to mail the ivory abroad themselves, which is illegal.It’s impossible to ascertain how much ivory remains in Japan, but officials insist that the industry will naturally close once those reserves run out. On the contrary, conservationists warn that as the stash is depleted, the temptation to smuggle in tusks from newly poached elephants could become irresistible.This may already be happening. In 2015 Huang Qun, former director of the Judiciary Identification Center of the National Forest Police Bureau, in Beijing, examined a seizure of more than 1,300 pounds of tusks from Japan that appeared to have come from recently killed elephants. The enamel was moist, and the tusks were free from cracks and mildew, while their outer surface had deep deposits of grime. The tusks could have originated from the 2008 legal sale, but generally, Huang says, “these characteristics pertain to recent tusks, not more than five years old.”Despite signs of cracks in Japan’s ivory controls, the official position remains the same: Japan is not considering closing its ivory market. “There’s no way we should be denying the rights of people who legally own ivory to engage in legal transactions of that ivory,” says the Ministry of the Environment’s Reiji Kamezawa.“Keeping the ivory trade alive,” Tsuge adds, “is something that the government and the ivory association agree on.”In June—in an effort to dispel mounting criticism, and citing a desire to strengthen controls—Japan tweaked its regulatory laws for ivory trade. Rather than regulate ivory products directly, though, officials have chosen to increase their supervisory power over traders. The country’s 300 manufacturers and 8,200 retailers must now register their businesses every five years, making it possible, for the first time, for the government to reject an application to trade in ivory. Traders also must register all the whole tusks in their possession, and as in the past, they must self-report all their sales on a paper ledger. Maximum fines have been increased from $9,000 for an individual or business to $905,000 for a business or $45,000 for an individual. Meanwhile the Ministry of Environment hired four new field officers tasked with controlling trade in endangered species.JTEF’s Masayuki Sakamoto calls these measure window dressing. “I know the practices of this administration, so I don’t believe they will conduct a serious supervision over the dealers,” he says. “The purpose of this ‘supervision’ is to protect the industry.”EIA’s Allan Thornton says that “there’s absolutely nothing in the new law that makes a molecule of difference.”Japanese officials disagree. As Horimaki at the Ministry of the Environment says, “We believe the amended law will do the job.”Some Japanese ivory users have come to see a domestic trade ban as inevitable—even welcome. “We aren’t ivory artists; we’re netsuke artists,” says Akira Kuroiwa, chairman of the International Netsuke Carvers’ Association. “We don’t have to use ivory.”Very few Japanese today create large-scale ivory sculptures of the sort produced in the Meiji period, but netsuke craftsmanship has made something of a comeback among a small group of artists and collecting enthusiasts, including Princess Hisako of Takamado. Most artists now use a variety of materials, including wood, deer antler, metal, water buffalo horn, plastic, and stone—but for many, ivory still reigns supreme, according to Atsushi Date, chief curator of the Kyoto Seishu Netsuke Art Museum.“The material itself is beautiful, the color is warm, and it has enduring hardness,” says Kukan Oikawa, an award-winning netsuke artist in Tokyo. Yet Oikawa has no interest in using ivory if there’s a chance it contributes to illegal trade. “That would betray my customers and my art,” he says.Like Kuroiwa and others, Oikawa suspects that ivory’s time is running out, and he’s preparing accordingly. In his studio, he hands me a small wooden box. Nestled inside is a tiny, strikingly lifelike white rabbit with shining red eyes. It looks indistinguishable from ivory, but it’s elforyn—a type of plastic—and one of several materials Oikawa is exploring as a substitute for ivory. “I want to find a material that looks like ivory but isn’t ivory, to keep this technique of carving alive,” he says.Some hanko manufacturers agree with this thinking. A few have already opted out of selling ivory hankos, while others, including Soke Nihon Insou Kyokai, the company that first kicked off the ivory hanko craze, are considering alternatives. “Since we can’t really deny that Japan is part of the illegal market, I think we have to follow the way the world is going,” says Takumi Isono, head of the sales promotion department.Yahoo! Japan, the world’s largest online platform for ivory, hasn’t budged on the issue (a company spokesperson cited the need to “stay respectful of Japanese culture”), but other major retailers are leading the way. Rakuten, the e-commerce company that Sakamoto previously investigated, banned ivory in 2017, and Aeon, a prominent retail group, has already phased ivory out of its shops and given its mall tenants until 2020 to do the same.“We’re just following our own standards for biodiversity conservation and sustainability,” says Haruko Kanamaru, head of Aeon’s corporate citizenship department. “We’re going along with the international community in moving forward with this.”Some officials agree with this sentiment, though they generally keep such thoughts to themselves. “If everyone in the larger international community is moving forward, what’s the use of us staying back here, calling for an ivory market?” says Hideka Morimoto, a vice minister at the Ministry of the Environment. “I’m upset that this tiny group of people who are profiting from illegal ivory trade are overshadowing all the things Japan is actually doing to protect wildlife, and ruining our reputation.”Sakamoto believes external pressure is the best hope for changing Japan’s policies. Before stepping down as the U.K.’s foreign secretary in July, Boris Johnson urged Taro Kono, Japan’s foreign minister, to enact an ivory ban, and U.S. officials have also been engaged.“We’ve encouraged Japan, as we have with other countries, to reduce illegal ivory trade by closing its ivory market,” says Judy Garber, principal deputy assistant secretary at the Bureau of Oceans and International Environmental and Scientific Affairs at the U.S. Department of State. “Maintaining a domestic ivory market can contribute to masking illegal trade and complicate all our joint efforts to wipe out wildlife trafficking.”Whether Japan heeds this message or remains one of the world’s last ivory trade havens remains to be seen. But in the meantime, thousands of elephants continue to be poached for their tusks each year. As Masayuki Sakamoto says, “It’s crucial for the international community not to let Japan slip now, because elephants won’t be given another chance.”Rachel Nuwer is a freelance journalist. Her book, Poached: Inside the Dark World of Wildlife Trafficking, is available now.Brent Stirton is a senior staff photographer for Reportage by Getty Images. He is a regular contributor to National Geographic.",
"Tokyo, Japanこの夏、東京を訪れた多くの観光客と同様、私たちも浅草を目指した。だが私たちが見たかったのは、浅草寺でもなければあの有名な芸者の踊りでもない。世界のほぼ全ての国で禁止されているというのに、日本では合法的に堂々と売られている象牙を探すことだ。そこにたどり着くのに、それほど時間はかからなかった。自撮り写真を撮る人々、腹の底に響く太鼓の音、焼き立てのたこ焼きのにおいに後ろ髪をひかれつつ、ある一軒の店に入って道を尋ねた。この辺りに、中国風の象牙アクセサリーを売る店があると聞いたんだが。店の主人は首を振って言った。おそらく、その店はもうないんじゃないか。「でも、象牙を探してるんだったら、いいのがあるよ」その店はサンゴの専門店だったが、主人はカウンターの後ろの引き出しを開け、中からネックレスを取り出した。マッチ箱大の見事な細工の観音菩薩が、チェーンにぶら下がっていた。美しく波打つ衣装をまとい、とぐろを巻いた竜と不死鳥の羽がそれを取り巻いている。日本で象牙の人気が高まったのは17世紀～19世紀半ば。根付の材料に象牙を使い始めたことがきっかけだ。根付とは、袋や小物をひもで帯からつるして持ち歩くための留め具。あまり使われなくなったが、現在も少数のアーティストとコレクターが伝統を守り続けている。「象牙」。クリーム色の彫刻を指さして、店の主人は言った。たったの5万円だという。破格値だ。それは、この上もなく美しかった。私はネックレスを一緒にいた友人の首にかけ、写真を撮った。それから店の主人に、象牙を日本国外へ持ち出すことは違法じゃないのかと尋ねた。ニューヨークへ持ち帰ったら、厄介なことにならないだろうか。しばらくの間を置いて、主人は答えた。「そりゃあ、税関に見せちゃいかんよ。でも、ニューヨークから来て象牙をアメリカへ持ち帰ったお客はたくさんいるよ」そして私のバッグを指さし、中に何かを隠すしぐさをして見せた。「それとも、シャツの中に入れて持って行ったらいいさ」。自分の服の襟をたたいて、そう言った。「たぶん大丈夫」難色を示す私たちの手に、主人は構わず名刺を握らせた。「明日の朝は9時から開いてるよ！」国際的な象牙取引は1990年から違法とされているが、冒頭のようなやり取りは依然としてなくならないことから、米国、英国、フランス、台湾など世界中の国と地域で、国内の象牙取引もほぼ全面的に禁止する方向に流れは進んでいる。英国のマイケル・ゴーブ環境食糧農村地域大臣は、2019年に同国で施行される禁止法が「アフリカで壊滅的なまでに減少したゾウの個体数回復に貢献できる最も効果的な措置のひとつとなる」と発言した。どんなに規制を厳しくしても、象牙の合法的な取引がなくならない限り、それは違法取引の隠れみのとされてしまう危険をはらむ。世界有数の象牙需要がある中国は、アフリカでのゾウ密猟をあおる最大の要因となってきたが、2018年1月に国内市場を閉鎖し、高く評価された。ところが、その結果今度は日本が突如世界最大の合法象牙市場という不名誉な地位を受け継いでしまった。保護活動家は、そんな日本を「象牙禁止からの最後の避難所」と呼ぶ。これまでは違法取引とは縁がないものとして長年見過ごされてきたが、だからと言って悪用されないとは限らない。それを示す証拠も出てきている。「世界では、日本人は一般的に法を守る人たちという印象があるようですが、実際はそうでもありません」。東京に拠点を置く認定NPO法人トラ・ゾウ保護基金（JTEF）事務局長理事で環境弁護士の坂元雅行氏は言う。JTEFが他の数団体と協力して実施した調査では、日本の規制が抜け穴だらけで、悪用しようと思えば簡単にできる実態が明らかになった。象牙の不正登録、国外発送、そして私自身が経験したように、海外へ持ち出すとわかっている客へ販売するなど。野生生物取引を監視する団体「トラフィック」によると、2011年から2016年にかけて、日本から国外へ持ち出そうとして没収された象牙の量は2.4トン、そのほぼ全てが中国向けだった。ケニア当局は2011年、シンガポールで押収され返還された5トンの象牙を焼却処分した。日本での主な象牙製品である名前の入っていないはんこも多数含まれていた。この結果を受けて、日本も他国と同様に国内の象牙市場を閉鎖すべきというプレッシャーが強まっている。サンフランシスコの非営利団体「ワイルドエイド」代表ピーター・ナイト氏は言う。「人間はローマ帝国時代からゾウを殺してきましたが、象牙取引を今すぐやめることは可能です。それができれば、人類は素晴らしい偉業を達成できるでしょう。そして、日本はその先鋒になることだってできるのです」ところが日本政府は、日本の象牙市場が持続可能な取引を遵守し、厳しく規制しているため、全面禁止の必要はないという数十年来の立ち場を変えていない。環境省野生生物課長の堀上勝氏は、「日本は密猟の責任を問われているわけではありません。ですから、現時点で政府としては象牙市場の閉鎖を検討しておりません」と話す。「絶滅のおそれのある野生動植物の種の国際取引に関する条約（CITES、通称ワシントン条約）」が、密猟や違法取引を助長する国内象牙市場のある国は全てそれを閉鎖すべきであると提案しているが、日本政府は受け入れていない。日本で現在合法とされている象牙取引が、ゾウの将来にどう影響するかを予測するのは極めて困難であると、ワシントンDCにあるブルッキングス研究所の上席研究員バンダ・フェルバブ・ブラウン氏は言う。「日本から中国へ持ち出された象牙で、既存の需要を満たせるのか、それともそれがもっと需要をあおり立てて、アフリカでゾウの密猟を増加させるのかは、非常に複雑な問題です。分かっていることは、日本の規制は象牙の違法輸出を防ぐには十分ではないということです」アフリカにおける密猟はとどまるところを知らず、一部の専門家は、日本での規制が不十分なために、次の象牙ロンダリングの最終目的地になるのではないかと危惧している。はるか昔から、ゾウは象牙を目的とした狩猟の対象となってきた。過去100年間で、アフリカのゾウは1000万頭から40万～50万頭にまで減少したと推定されている。サバンナでは2007～2014年の間に30％もゾウの数が減り、密猟のために毎年数千頭が殺されている。ケニアのツァボ・イースト国立公園に暮らすアフリカゾウ。アフリカゾウは重さ45キロにもなる巨大な牙を持つが、乱獲によって個体数が減少している。現在の危機をもたらした原因は、主に中国での高い需要にあるが、日本もこれに一役買っている。ワシントンDCにある環境調査エージェンシー（EIA）代表のアラン・ソーントン氏によると、日本は1970年以降少なくとも26万2500頭分の象牙を消費してきた。そのほとんどが、大型の成体のものだ。日本の象牙熱は、1970年代と1980年代に壊滅的な密猟をあおり、アフリカゾウの個体数はこの期間に50％も減少した。1990年に象牙の国際取引が禁止されて以来、日本は国際市場再開に向けて働きかけてきた。1999年と2008年には、国内の在庫を補充するため、一時的に象牙を輸入する権利を獲得した（カリフォルニア大学バークレー校とプリンストン大学の研究者らの報告書によると、2度目には中国も参加し、それが最近のゾウの密猟と象牙密輸の急増につながったと考えるのが最も妥当であるいう）。「1989年の禁止措置撤廃運動をリードし、ゾウの大量殺戮を再び招いたという点で、日本には重大な倫理的責任があります。CITESの承認を得て2度にわたり象牙輸入を行い、禁止措置を撤回したことは最大の過ちであり、大々的な密猟が再燃するきっかけを作ってしまいました」現在、日本の象牙産業は「地球上で最大」であると、ソーントン氏は指摘する。中国国内には、取引禁止前に170カ所の象牙販売店があったが、日本には8200店舗、300の製造業者、500の卸業者が存在する。東京象牙美術工芸協同組合のウェブサイトには、「日本の文化にとって不可欠の伝統産業」と書かれているが、実際には象牙が日本へ入ってきたのは比較的最近のことで、利用法も時代が変わるにつれて変化してきた。「日本には、中国ほど洗練された伝統的象牙彫刻はありません」と語るのは、共同通信社のジャーナリストで作家の井田徹治氏だ。1992年から象牙の取材をしてきた井田氏は言う。「象牙は文化遺産であるという主張は間違いです」象牙が日本へ入ってきたのは、西暦1500年代のことだ。当時は、大名や貴族階級が使う高級家具の装飾や、三味線のばち、茶道具などに使われた。江戸時代に入って象牙の人気は急速に拡大し、1600年代から1800年代半ばまで、新たに台頭した商人階級が、象牙の髪飾りやたばこ入れ、根付（ねつけ）を求めるようになった。京都清宗根付館が所蔵する現代根付のコレクション。衰退していく伝統工芸への関心を取り戻すため、年に1度の根付コンテストや定期的な交流会を開催している。根付とは、ポケットのない着物を着る際に、小さな袋などをひもで結んで帯から下げて持ち歩くための留め具で、穴にひもを通し、その先に袋を結び付ける。着物文化が洗練されるにつれて、おしゃれに気を遣う人は季節や行事に合わせて根付を選ぶようになった。そして根付の素材で最も人気があったのが、象牙である。「江戸時代後期になると、庶民でも1人1個は象牙細工を所有するようになっていたと思います。人々は贅沢品として、象牙を大切にしていました」。京都にある清水三年坂美術館の朝山衣恵氏は言う。1853年の黒船来航から明治維新にかけて、日本の工芸品を愛する外国からの訪問者のおかげで、象牙の需要は急増した。新たに象牙細工産業が生まれ、エレガントな女性、素朴な農夫、笑顔の子どもたちの姿を彫った象牙細工が大量に生産された。「需要が大きくなると、作品も大きくなりました。西洋の商人たちは象牙の彫刻品を買うために日本を訪れ、日本の美術商は国外にも支店を持つようになります」と、朝山氏。一方、日本人の間では西洋のファッションがもてはやされるようになり、象牙は新鮮味を失っていった。逆に、外国人が根付や仏像、骨董品などの象牙製品を好んで買い求め、新しい製品は輸出用に限定して製造されるようになった。第二次世界大戦でその輸出も止まったが、戦後間もなく象牙は新たな活路を見いだす。次なるターゲットは、たばこだった。パイプ職人の柘恭一郎氏は、戦争から戻ってくると新たなビジネスチャンスをものにした。当時、日本ではかなり多くの人が喫煙していたが、米国の供給する紙巻たばこにはフィルターがなく、最後まで吸うことが困難だった。そこで柘氏は、象牙で作ったシガレットホルダーに目を付けた。火をつけても燃えないし、象牙とはすなわちゾウの歯なので、口にくわえたときの歯あたりがいい。柘氏のシガレットホルダーはすぐに人気を呼んだ。1950年代には事業を拡大して、120人の職人を雇い、東京に駐留する数千人の米国人を対象に土産用の象牙パイプを作り始めた。富士山や舞妓、竜といった日本らしいモチーフを彫り込んだパイプが特に人気で、3000～5000円程度で売られた。当時の日本人の給料1カ月分に相当する。息子の恭三郎氏は、日本人の立ち入りが禁じられていた銀座の米国人向け娯楽施設へ、毎週のように商品を届けた。進駐軍の撤退に伴ってパイプの需要は干上がり、シガレットホルダーの代わりに紙フィルターが主流になった。だが、この時もまた象牙は姿を変えて盛り返しを図る。それが、今に至るまで日本の象牙消費をけん引し続けている。山梨県出身の行商人だった坂本光氏は、裕福な家庭に宝石を売り歩いていた。あるとき、客が高価な商品を購入する際に安物の木製印鑑を使っていることに気づいた。日本人であれば、誰でも印鑑は必要だ。これは宝石よりも儲かるのではないかと、坂本氏は考えた。印鑑彫刻師の3代目深澤鰍石氏。山梨県の象牙彫刻美術館で撮影。深澤氏は、自身の技能が以前ほど重宝されなくなったと嘆く。「悲しいことですが、若い消費者は量産品で満足しています」。美術館を運営する宗家日本印相協会は、象牙のはんこを広めた坂本光氏によって設立されたはんこメーカー。手彫りはんこ大手として君臨している。はんこは日常生活であまり使われなくなっているが、住宅の購入や結婚など、重要なイベントには不可欠だ。象牙ははんこの最高級素材として広く認められており、持ち主に幸運と長寿をもたらすと信じる人もいる。1967年、坂本氏は象牙印鑑を専門とする宗家日本印相協会を創立した。象牙で印鑑を作ったのは坂本氏が初めてではないが、その斬新なマーケティング戦略で成功を収める。高級印鑑を所有していると幸運を招くという迷信に目を付けたのである。ゾウは家族の絆が強く、長寿であるため、象牙の印鑑を所有すれば、長寿、幸運、調和に恵まれると宣伝した。西洋で、「ダイヤモンドは永遠の輝き」というキャッチフレーズで婚約指輪が飛ぶように売れたのと同様、坂本氏の象牙広告も日本で絶大な効果を上げた。井田氏は指摘する。「クジラの肉を食すのと同じで、象牙印鑑の迷信も業界と広告会社が作り上げたものです。日本の文化でもなければ伝統でもありません。持続的利用の原則とも全く関係ありません」（井田氏の言う「持続的利用」とは、動物の個体数を損なわない限りにおいて動物やその体の部分を取引すること）事実、印鑑産業の急成長はアフリカゾウの犠牲の上に成り立っていた。この頃までに、象牙目的で大量のゾウが殺されていた。1982年、日本は香港を抜いて世界一の象牙消費国となり、わずか10年で12万頭のゾウに相当する2700トン以上の象牙を輸入した。当時の日本の象牙は70％が密猟されたゾウから取られた違法象牙であると推定され、そのうち少なくとも半分から、年間200万本以上の印鑑が製造された。「1980年代、日本は象牙の消費量という点だけでなく、違法取引という点でも重大な役割を果たしていました」と語るのは、学習院大学の国際政治および地球環境ガバナンス教授の阪口功氏だ。「アフリカゾウが生息するほぼ全ての国において、ゾウを絶滅寸前に追いやった責任が日本にはあります」密猟危機といっても、多くの象牙印鑑の製造者や所有者にはピンとこない。アフリカとそれが抱える問題は、日本から遠く離れた世界の果てにある。阪口氏によれば、密猟された象牙はアフリカや香港の輸出業者が作成した不正許可証を貼られ、あらゆるルートを通って、日本へ到着する頃には合法象牙に姿を変えているのだ。望月貢商店は、はんこの里として有名な山梨県六郷にある印鑑の大手卸業者だ。その代表を務める望月孝氏は、フランスのテレビ局が取材に来た30年前の日のことを思い出すと、今でも身震いすると話す。「放送が始まると、最初は近所のはんこ店が紹介されていたのですが、突然ゾウの死体が画面に映し出されたんです。とても受け入れられるようなものじゃなかったです」それ以来、取材陣が次々に押し掛けてきた。どの取材も、「日本は密猟者に殺されたゾウの象牙が最後に行き着く場所として描くのが狙い」だったという。だが、望月氏や六郷の人々にとって、ゾウは「貴い、聖なる存在です。私たちは以前から、殺すのではなく、どこかで自然死したゾウの象牙だけを使ってきました。ゾウ殺しのビジネスには一切関わっていません」。望月氏とその同業者たちは、今もその立場を貫いている。やりで命を奪われたケニアの雄ゾウ。象牙の違法取引を阻止するため、レンジャーたちが象牙を切り落とした。密猟危機の報道が最高潮に達した1980年代後半、日本政府はついに重い腰を上げた。象牙の国際取引が禁止される4カ月前の1989年6月、日本も一時的に象牙の輸入を停止したのだ。業界関係者は、その年のCITES会議で、アフリカゾウの保護拡大に反対するよう日本政府に求めたが、投票を棄権することだけが政府にできる精一杯のことだったという。1985年から1990年までCITES事務局を務め、象牙やその他の野生生物問題で日本政府にアドバイスする金子与止男氏は言う。「あの年のCITES会議で象牙取引の全面禁止が支持されたのを機に、アフリカゾウの悲劇が始まってしまいました。それまで象牙を持続的に利用することでゾウの保護に成功してきたアフリカ南部の国々は、取引禁止によって収入源を失い、不当な扱いを受けてしまったんです」金子氏は、全面禁止ではなく、健全なゾウの個体数を保っている国には取引継続を認め、そこから得られた利益をゾウの保護に使えるようにすべきだったと主張する。「長期的なゾウの管理政策に投資できるはずの定収入を、彼らは失ってしまいました。せっかく保護に成功した国々が他国のとばっちりを受けるのは残念です」環境省の堀上勝氏によると、野生生物の持続可能な取引に関する「CITESの精神に従うからこそ」象牙の取引を支持するのだという。東京女子大学の保全生態学者である石井信夫氏も、合法的に象牙を販売できれば、アフリカ南部の地域社会は積極的にゾウを保護しようという気になると指摘する。石井氏は、1989年からCITESの日本代表を務めている。「日本が市場を閉鎖してしまったら、アフリカの国を支援することもできなくなってしまいます」JTEFの坂元雅行氏は、30年間同じような話を何度も聞いてきたが、象牙の合法取引がゾウを救うという考えには賛同できない。「石井氏や他の取引支持者は、『ゾウの生息する国には支援が必要だ』とか『動物がその価値を失えば、保護の意欲もなくなる』といった抽象的な原則を繰り返すだけです。理論上は確かに、野生生物の持続可能な利用法には色々なやり方があるでしょう。けれども象牙に関していえば、現実にはそぐわないのです。過去の歴史を見れば、ゾウを絶滅に追いやることのない程度に取引を管理しようとしても無理なのは明らかです」井田氏も同意して言う。「日本には違法な象牙市場などないと断言できる人はいません」。それでも、象牙を含む野生生物由来の製品を持続可能な限りにおいて利用するという「日本政府の基本的立場」は変わらない。1990年に象牙の国際取引禁止が決まり、坂元氏が喜んだのは束の間だった。日本における象牙問題の中心的存在である彼は、このとき以降、国際取引の再開を目指して政府に陳情を行う象牙業者たちを注視してきた。そうした最大勢力の一つが、日本象牙美術工芸組合連合会だ。象牙製品メーカーの団体で、家族経営の会社が多く、1800年代後半までルーツをたどれる社もある。このころ、アフリカとインドから象牙を調達するという、ややこしい物流を円滑に進められるよう、連合会が活動を始めた。現在、連合会の50人ほどのメンバーが日本での合法取引と商品製造の大部分を支配しており、坂元氏いわく、政府と密接な関係を築いている。日本の貿易管理の甘さについて坂元氏は独自の調査を行ったものの、国際的な政治力にはかなわなかった。1997年にジンバブエのハラレで開催されたCITES会議の際、日本の当局者と産業界の代表者たちが強く接近していた同国のロバート・ムガベ大統領は、他の政府出席者に対し、日本への象牙輸出を支持するようプレッシャーをかけた。提案が通過するのを、坂元氏は敗北感と共に見つめた。ジンバブエの出席者たちが国歌を威勢よく歌い始め、日本人は拳を握って椅子から跳び上がっていた。トラ・ゾウ保護基金（JTEF）の事務局長理事を務める坂元雅行氏。1990年代前半から日本での象牙取引を調査している。象牙市場の閉鎖を日本政府に求め続ける一人だ。「私の努力が足りなかったことを申し訳なく思いました」と坂元氏は語る。「日本が象牙の国際取引禁止を弱体化させるのを、私たちは止められなかったのです」会議の後、坂元氏はボツワナのチョベ国立公園を訪れ、野生のアフリカゾウを初めて見た。この体験は、今も彼の中で強い感情を呼び起こす。オープンカーで公園内を走っている時、ゾウの一家を率いるメスが突進してきた。車がゾウの群れを横切ったのを脅威と感じたのだ。「本当に地面が揺れました」と坂元氏は振り返る。「殺されると思いました。もしそうだとしたら、運命だとも。ゾウのために十分な働きができなかったのですから」。運転手はぎりぎりで逆方向に転換した。氏は震えながらも、静かに誓いを立てた。「心の中でゾウたちに言いました。彼らのために闘い続けると」闘いは大変な挑戦となった。1997年にCITESがまず象牙50トンを日本に輸出することを認めると、その直後から、日本の当局者たちは再び同じ輸出措置を求めてロビー活動を開始した。しかもこの時、日本は孤立無援ではなかった。以前は自国の象牙産業の衰退を諦観していた中国が、取引再開の権利を求め始めた。「日本と中国は常に摩擦が多く、競争関係にありました」と語るのは、国際動物福祉基金（IFAW）のアジア地域局長、グレース・ゲ・ガブリエル氏だ。米マサチューセッツ州に拠点を置く非営利団体のIFAWは、動物福祉と保護に取り組んでいる。「象牙を日本に与え続け、中国を無視し続けるなら……いち中国人として、日本を中国より優遇するのは不公平だとも感じました」一方ガブリエル氏は、2度目の輸入を認めれば「ゾウにとっての災い」になるであろうことも分かっていた。彼女の研究で分かっていたのは、中国市場は著しく準備不足であり、日本の象牙規制はそれよりもさらに悪いということだ。だが、そうした懸念はまたも退けられた。アフリカゾウの生息地を抱える20カ国からの抗議にもかかわらず、2度目の象牙取引が2008年に行われ、中国に62トン、日本に39トンの象牙が渡った。密猟の危機がたちまち起こり、以来、中国は象牙に関わるニュースの見出しを独占してきた。しかし、ガブリエル氏や坂元氏らは、違法取引の可能性という点で日本が眠れる巨人であることを危惧している。中国が市場を閉ざした今、巨人が再び目覚めるかもしれない。「違法な象牙業者は間違いなく、新しい合法市場を隠れみのにしようと試みるでしょう」と坂元氏は言う。「日本はそれに備えなければなりません」1990年の国際取引禁止の後、西洋で象牙が死と強欲さのシンボルとして非難の対象になったのと違い、日本での象牙のイメージは傷つきはしても壊れることはなかった。阪口氏は規制の抜け穴や違法取引に触れ、「日本の消費者の大半は、国内の象牙問題を意識していません」と話す。「日本人の認識のレベルはまだ非常に低いです」中国では、象牙は富と名声を象徴する。東京とケニアのナイロビに拠点を置く非営利団体「アフリカゾウの涙」の共同創立者、山脇愛理氏によれば、日本では「ステータスの誇示ではなく、日常的に使うことが目的」だという。日本人の象牙への関心は今も続いているが、現在、取引の多くがインターネットでなされていることから、実態は今まで以上に見えにくくなっている。JTEFの分析によると、Yahoo! JAPANのオークションで象牙製品が落札された件数は、2005 年の4000件未満から2015年の2万8000件超へと、着実に伸びている。2017年は1万6000件に減少したが、依然として多い（この減少は、メディアが象牙問題に厳しい目を向けたことと、Yahoo! JAPANが監視を増やした結果とみられる。Yahoo! JAPANは、米ヤフー社の統制は受けていない）。2015年、Yahoo! JAPANに加え、人気のEコマースサイトである楽天をJTEFとEIAが1日に限って調査したところ、象牙の広告が合計約1万2200件も見つかった。日本では今も象牙の茶道具、楽器の部品、仏教で祈りに使う数珠、宝飾品などが生産されているが、根強い関心を支えているのは、はんこの広告キャンペーンだ。象牙印鑑を約70万本保有しているはんこ産業は、現在の象牙消費量の推定80％を占める。1980年代以降、日常生活で印鑑を使うことは減っているが、家を買う、結婚する、遺産を相続するといった人生の大きな出来事には今も印鑑が必要だ。象牙は多くの人にとって、業界が盛んに宣伝している通り、印材の「最高の権威」そして「王様」であり続けている。日本の当局は、日本で販売されている象牙製品は骨董品か、1990年の国際取引禁止以前、もしくはその後に2度輸入された象牙から合法的に作られたものであり、日本の市場が唐突に非難にさらされるのは不公平であると考えている。そして、日本の象牙規制は他国の規制より優れてはいないにしても、同等であると考えているのだ。「日本の貿易政策は他の国々と同じです」と、経済産業省野生動植物貿易審査室長の中野潤也氏は話す。「我々は象牙の国際取引を禁止し、国内取引もごく少数の例外的なケースしか認めていません。（国際取引禁止が決まった）CITES会議より前と、その後2回だけの輸入されたときの象牙です」「Yahoo! JAPAN」のショッピングサイトで象牙の違法販売をチェックする坂元雅行氏。Yahoo! JAPANと米国の「Yahoo!」は無関係だ。日本の法律では、象牙の登録と登録証の提示が義務づけられているが、写真の商品は登録証を添付していない。日本の有名ショッピングサイトやeコマース企業は軒並み、象牙の販売を禁止しているが、同様の措置を講じる予定はないとYahoo! JAPANは述べている。外務省地球環境課の滑川博愛氏によれば、日本の問題は象牙の規制ではなくコミュニケーションだという。「日本が他国ほど広報活動に長けていないのは問題かもしれません」と滑川氏は話した。「しかし規制の点では、日本はとても厳格なのです。米国や英国とほとんど同じです」だが他の国々は、ほぼすべての象牙取引を禁止しているか、禁止を決める途上にある。研究者で著述家のフェルバブ＝ブラウン氏は、「日本の象牙販売の規模は、米国や英国と比べると桁が違います」と指摘する。加えてEIAのアラン・ソーントン氏は、日本の当局者が象牙取引規制を米英と同等としていることを「不合理で根拠のない主張」と話す。一例を挙げると、日本国内で象牙を取引するには登録が必要だが、実際に登録しなければならないのは全形の象牙だけだ。象牙のはんこ、彫刻、小物は規制されていない。切り分けた象牙（カットピース）も同様だ。過去に日本へ向かう途中で押収された違法象牙の貨物に、2つから3つに分割された象牙が多かったのはこのためだと、ソーントン氏は言う。そのようなカットピースがいったん日本に入れば、販売を防ぐ規制は一切ない。日本の国際郵便制度も密輸業者に有利に働いている。申告価格が2000ドル未満の輸入品は通常の規制から免除されるためだ。こうした貨物から見つかった象牙は押収されず、引き取り手が現れなければ送り主に返される。日本の税関によると、ここ数年で象牙数百点（中国からの彫刻、ナイジェリアとジンバブエからのカットピース、フランスからの牙など）を返送している。こうした「巨大な抜け穴」のために、と井田徹治氏は言う。「アフリカ諸国からの違法象牙は一切使用していないと、日本は100％自信を持って言うことはできません」象牙製品を買わないでと呼びかけるポスター。東京で開催されたアースデイのイベントで撮影。NPO「アフリカゾウの涙」の共同創立者である山脇愛理氏によれば、殺されたゾウの写真、野生動物を守ろうとして命を奪われたレンジャーの統計データを見せるより、もっと気楽にメッセージを伝えた方が日本人には効果的だという。「『臭い物に蓋をする』ということわざがありますが、象牙に対する日本の反応をよく表しています」全形の象牙の場合、密輸でなければ日本に入れない。不正な取引業者が国内の法規制から逃れ、象牙を合法にするには、象牙を半分に切りさえすればいい。しかし坂元氏によれば、実際にはその必要性すらない。日本で商業販売のために象牙を合法扱いにすることは、原産地にかかわらず容易だからだ。所有者は領収書や炭素年代分析で牙の年代を証明する必要はなく、実物を検査のために持ち込む必要もない。申請書に記入し、写真を何枚か撮り、友人（または家族でもいい）に「1990年より前に登録者の家でこの象牙を見た」という事実を証明する文書を書いてもらう。このシステムは「公式のロンダリング」と変わらないと坂元氏は言う。日本で登録された全形の象牙の数は、2006年のわずか408本から2016年の1687本まで着々と増えている。これを危惧した坂元氏と戸川久美氏は、違法な象牙のロンダリングをやってのけることがいかに簡単かを明らかにしようとした。2015年、2人がEIAと協力して雇った調査員が、象牙登録を監督する非政府機関である自然環境研究センターに電話し、「父から相続した象牙を登録したい」と相談した。だが彼女は、父が象牙を取得したのは2000年ごろだと話した。つまり違法だ。仲介業者は彼女を止めるどころか、例えば1985年に父の家でこの象牙を見たことがあると言うように指示し、「何の疑いも、問題も生じない」ようにと、書類に書く内容もアドバイスした。業者は、彼女の申請書を提出前に見てあげようとさえ申し出た。相続した象牙についての話は変えないまま、調査員は次に象牙の取引業者に電話した。彼らは登録済みの全形象牙を一般の人から買い、象牙製品の製造会社に売ることで利益を上げている。37の業者のうち30業者は、無登録の象牙を直接買い取るか、あるいは第三者の証言に関して書類に嘘を書き、象牙を不正に登録するのを手助けするなどの違法行為を提案してきた。日本有数の象牙会社のバイヤーが、こう言って彼女を安心させた。「私はこういうケースを500～600件扱ってきましたが、第三者の証言について疑われたことは全くありません。1件もです」ソーントン氏は、法律を破ることをいとわない企業の多さに本当に驚かされた。「着手したときは、腐ったリンゴが3、4個見つかるくらいに思っていました」と氏は言う。しかし、象牙取引の推進派はこうした実態を意に介さない。「なぜ象牙規制が100％完璧でなければならないと主張するのか、理解できません」と、政府アドバイザーの金子氏は言う。JTEFやEIAの調査について、政府が直接回答したことは1度もない。だが2017年初め、自然環境研究センターの象牙登録担当官が警告を発した。疑わしいほどよく似た申請を多く発見したのだ。申請者たちの間につながりはなさそうなのに、写真に写ったカーペットは同じに見え、証言が書かれたフォントが一致していて、象牙の取得に関する説明は、ほとんど見分けが付かないほど似通っていた。警視庁の捜査で、2つの象牙取引業者「ラフテル」と「フローレス」が書類送検され、無登録の象牙27本を押収した。売り主に代わって2社が不正に登録しようとしていた物だった。だが2社の幹部は潔白を主張した。自分たちは自然環境研究センターから許可を得て、象牙の真正性を保証できるよう、登録前に象牙を預かっているという理由だった。JTEFの坂元氏、日本のメディア、警視庁によると、検察は説明を受け入れて不起訴とし、押収した牙を返還した。この事件が日本のメディアで広く報じられたことは、一部当局者の怒りを買った。「この種の違法取引がメディアによって取り上げられ、日本の合法な象牙市場にこのような不透明な部分があるかのように報道されたことは、実に残念であり、憤りを覚える」と、前環境省自然環境局長の亀沢玲治氏は言う。「その手の批判が当てはまるとは、私は思いません」象牙業界の幹部も同様に、自分たちは環境保護論者とメディアによる魔女狩りの被害者だと主張している。2017年に東京で開かれたはんこの見本市で、象牙はんこ大手のタカイチは、保護団体からの「執拗な嫌がらせと圧力」を訴える掲示を出した。2011年、当時の同社会長で日本象牙美術工芸組合連合会の前会長でもあった高市景夫氏と息子が、象牙58本の違法取引で共に起訴されたことを考えると、この掲示は厚かましい主張だった。同社は100万円の罰金を科され、高市氏と息子はそれぞれ懲役1年、懲役10カ月（いずれも執行猶予付き）の判決を受けている。高市氏はインタビューの申し込みに返答しなかったが、彼の裁判での陳述は、日本の象牙業者にかかっているプレッシャーの大きさを示す。「象牙がもう日本に入ってこないというのは、悩ましいことです」と高市氏は述べた。そして、氏を違法行為に駆り立てたのは「差し迫った危機感」だったという。象牙をめぐるムードについて業者たちは口を閉ざしているため、それ以上判断するのは難しい。東京象牙美術工芸協同組合の担当者は、「ジャーナリストは一切信用しません」と、私の通訳に電話で告げた。10人ほどの他の組合員も同様に取材の申し込みを拒否した。あるメーカーは、自分や同業者が、協同組合や経済産業省のある人物から、ジャーナリストと話をしないように警告されているとほのめかしさえした。経済産業省の相川敬子氏は、このような警告についての情報を一切否定した。そんな中、日本象牙美術工芸組合連合会のあるメンバーが取材に応じた。パイプ業界の大物である柘恭三郎氏だ。同氏はもう象牙は扱ってはいないが、業界における歴史と影響力から名誉会員に名を連ねている。柘氏個人の象牙コレクションには、100以上の彫刻のほか、無数の根付、パイプ、杖、たばこ入れ、全形の牙などがある。「象牙とは、私にとって単に金銭的な価値ではありません」と彼は言う。「私にとって本当に大切なのは、作品の芸術的、歴史的、そして精神的と言ってもいい価値です」日本での象牙取引の行方について、象牙製品のメーカーは「非常に心配し、神経質になっています」と柘氏は言う。「法律を忠実に守って取引している人たちは、自分たちの扱われ方に脅威を感じているのです」。柘氏とその友人たちに関する限り、日本の業者は問題となる象牙取引を行っていない。 「日本の取引ではすべて登録され、すべてが合法であり、すべてが追跡可能です」と柘氏は話す。「しかし、ルールに従わない国が非常に多いため、日本が疑われ、同じ規制やその厳格化に悩まされているのです」柘氏が言う「他国」は、実は1カ国しかない。「間違いなく中国人です」と柘氏は言い、日本の業者にとっては「中国人との密輸ビジネスに引きずり込まれるか、彼らともども逮捕される危険があります」と付け加えた。これは推測にとどまらない。EIAが2人の調査員を雇い、象牙を日本国外に持ち出そうとする中国人バイヤーを装わせたところ、接触した4つの卸売業者はいずれも売買の用意ができていた。それどころか、買ってくれそうなバイヤーに対し、どの業者も「これまでに中国人と取引をしてきた」と告げて安心させた。「我々があまりに多くの象牙を（中国人に）売ったので、日本から象牙が消えそうなくらいです」。ある業者はこう豪語した。また別の業者は、中国人との取引で象牙の価格が「急騰」しているとも話した。違法な象牙取引の動向を追跡するのにCITESが使っているツール「エレファント・トレード・インフォメーション・システム」が、中国で報告されている象牙押収データを分析している。未発表の分析結果によれば、2011年から2016年まで、中国に入ってくる象牙の出所となっている国のランキングで、日本はナイジェリア、タンザニア、ベトナムに次いで4位だった。この間、トラフィック・ジャパンが記録した違法象牙の押収は100件以上、合計2.15トン。「日本から中国に渡る象牙の量という点で、これは氷山の一角かもしれません」と、トラフィック・ジャパン代表の北出智美氏は語る。象牙を海外に送るのは違法だが、日本国内で外国人のバイヤーに売ることは違法ではない。警視庁は昨年11月、象牙のはんこ605本を中国行きの船に積み込もうとした中国人船員を逮捕した。その後の捜査で、別の中国籍の人物と、全日本象牙卸売センター（東京）取締役の土屋雅右氏が疑われ、2人とも今年初めに逮捕された。土屋氏は、自分が象牙を売った中国人客が、それを国外に持ち出そうとしていたとは思いもしなかったと主張し、検察はこの件を不起訴とした。長野のある英語教師は訪問販売で2人の子供に象牙のはんこを買った。幸運をもたらすと販売員に言われたためだ。はんこに50万円（4500ドル）を支払い、別のお守りも購入したが、それだけの価値はあったと考えている。「はんこは人の運命を左右すると信じています。だから、息子と娘には最高のはんこを与えたいと思いました」。この英語教師は匿名を希望している。はんこの購入後、ある友人から、象牙を持っていると世界に宣言するのは「よくない」と言われたためだ。中国では象牙取引の禁止が新たに定められたにもかかわらず、需要は依然として大きい。トラフィックの中国事務所は、違法販売がインターネット上で続いていること、今でも観光客が象牙を買い、自国に密輸していることを明らかにしている。「日本を含む法執行力の弱い近隣諸国が、合法および違法の象牙市場を閉鎖しなければ、中国に流入する違法取引を抑えることはできません」。トラフィック中国事務所トップのチョウ・フェイ氏はこう語る。旅行サイト「トリップアドバイザー」の分析によると、2016年に日本を訪れた旅行者は2400万人という記録的な数だった。その大半は東アジアからであり、中国人の訪日への関心は2015年から2016年にかけて130％増加したという。今のところ、日本は要請に応えていない。10月8日に公開予定のEIAの報告書によると、調査員が接触した300を超すはんこの売り手のうち60％近くが、客が象牙を日本国外に持ち出すのを心配していないことが分かったという。中には、象牙を海外に郵送するという違法行為を申し出る業者さえあった。どのくらいの象牙が日本に残っているのかを確認することは不可能だが、当局は、残った象牙がなくなれば、この産業は自然になくなると主張する。一方で自然保護論者たちは、取っておいた分が枯渇すれば、新たに密猟されたゾウ由来の牙を密輸する誘惑は抗いがたいものになるだろうと警告している。すでにそうなっている可能性がある。2015年、北京にある全国森林警察局司法鑑定センターの元所長だったホアン・チィン氏は、最近殺されたゾウに由来すると思われる日本からの押収象牙約590キロ以上を調べた。外側の表面は垢やほこりでかなり汚れている一方、エナメルは湿り、牙にはひび割れやかびがない。2008年の合法的な輸出品という可能性もあるが、ホアン氏は「全体的に、こうした特徴は最近採った牙に見られるもので、採取から5年は超えないと思われます」と指摘している。日本の象牙規制にひびが入っている兆候がありながら、公式見解は変わらない。日本は象牙市場の閉鎖を考えていないというものだ。環境省の亀沢玲治氏は、「象牙の合法的な所有者がその象牙の正当な取引を行う権利を、否定するべきではありません」と述べている。「象牙取引の維持は」と、柘氏が付け加えた。「政府と業界団体が合意していることです」6月、高まる批判を払拭するため、また規制強化を求める声も踏まえ、日本は象牙取引の規制法を改正した。しかし、当局が選んだのは象牙製品の直接規制ではなく、事業者に対する監督権の強化だった。現在、国内に300ある象牙製品メーカーと8200の小売業者は5年ごとに登録を更新しなければならず、政府が象牙取引の申請を却下することが初めて可能になった。また事業者は、所有する全形の象牙をすべて登録しなければならず、かつ今までと同様、すべての売上を紙の台帳で自ら報告しなければならない。罰金の最高額は、個人または企業の場合は100万円だったが、企業は1億円、個人は500万円に引き上げられた。一方、環境省は地方の事務所に職員を4人新たに増員し、絶滅危惧種の取引の監視に当たらせることにした。JTEFの坂元雅行氏は、こうした方策はうわべを飾っただけだと言う。「この官庁の慣行は分かっているので、業者を真剣に監督するとは思いません」と坂元氏。「この『監督』の目的は、業界を保護することなのです」EIAのアラン・ソーントン氏も、「わずかでも状況を変えるような点は、新しい法律には全くありません」と評する。日本の当局者は同意しない。環境省の堀上氏が言うように、「法改正は効果があると信じて」いる。日本で象牙を使う人の一部は、国内取引の禁止は不可避であり、むしろ歓迎すべきとさえ見なすようになった。「私たちは象牙の芸術家ではなく、根付の芸術家です」と話すのは、国際根付彫刻会会長の黒岩明氏は言う。「象牙を使う必要はありません」明治時代に作られたような大型の象牙彫刻を制作する日本人は、今はほとんどいない。一方、根付の職人技は、少数の作家や熱心な収集家の間でちょっとしたカムバックを見せている。高円宮妃久子さまも愛好家の1人だ。多くの作家は現在、木、シカの角、金属、水牛の角、プラスチック、石などさまざまな素材を使っている。だが、京都清宗根付館の主任学芸員、伊達淳士氏によれば、多くの人にとって象牙は今も最高の地位にあるという。受賞歴のある東京の根付作家、及川空観氏は「素材そのものが美しく、色は温かく、耐久性があります」と話す。しかし及川氏は、違法取引に加担する可能性があるなら象牙を使うつもりはない。もし使えば、「私の顧客も芸術も裏切ることになるでしょう」と及川氏。黒岩氏らと同様、及川氏は象牙の時代は終わりつつあると考え、それに応じた用意をしている。氏の工房で、筆者は小さな木箱を手渡された。中に納められていたのは小さな白ウサギだった。赤い目が輝き、まるで生きているかのようだった。一見、象牙と見分けがつかないが、エルフォリンというプラスチックの一種だという。及川氏が象牙の代用として探求している素材の1つだ。「象牙のように見えながら象牙ではない素材を見つけて、この彫刻技術を存続させたいと考えています」と及川氏は言う。一部のはんこメーカーもこの考え方に同意している。すでに象牙はんこの販売から手を引いた業者がいくつかあるほか、象牙はんこの流行に最初に火をつけた宗家日本印相協会を含む数社が代用品を検討している。同社セールスプロモーション部門の磯野拓巳氏は、「日本が違法市場の一部であることを完全に否定はできない以上、世界が進む方向に従う必要があると思います」と言う。世界最大の象牙のオンラインプラットフォームであるYahoo! JAPANは、この問題について方針を変えていない（同社の広報担当者は「日本文化を尊重する」必要性を挙げている）。一方、他の大手小売業者は積極的に対策を取っている。坂元氏が以前に調査したEコマース企業の楽天は、2017年に象牙製品の販売を禁止。有名な小売グループのイオンもすでに象牙を店舗から段階的に撤去し、モールのテナントにも2020年までに同様の対応を求めている。「生物多様性の保全と持続可能性のための、会社独自の基準に従っているだけです」と、イオンのグループ環境・社会貢献部長、金丸治子氏は言う。「この件を進めるにあたり、国際社会と協力していきます」一部の当局者はこのような心情に同意しつつ、通常そのような考えは自分たちの内にとどめている。「もっと広い国際社会の誰もが前進しているのなら、後ろに下がったまま象牙市場を求めている我々に何の意味があるのでしょうか」と、環境事務次官の森本英香氏は話す。「違法な象牙取引で利益を得ている少数の集団には憤りを覚えます。日本が野生動物保護のために現に行っている施策を、彼らは全て曇らせ、我々の評判を台無しにしているのです」坂元氏は、日本の政策を変える最大の希望は外圧だと考えている。英国のボリス・ジョンソン前外相は今年7月、辞任の前に日本の河野太郎外相に対し、象牙取引を法律で禁止するよう促した。米国の当局者もこの動きに加わっている。「私たちは、象牙市場を閉鎖することで違法な象牙取引を減らすよう、他の国々と同様に日本にも働きかけてきました」と米国務省海洋・国際環境・科学局のジュディ・ガーバー副次官補主任は述べている。「国内の象牙市場を維持すれば、違法取引の隠蔽に加担し、野生生物の密輸一掃に向けて共同で行ってきたあらゆる取り組みを複雑化させる可能性があります」日本がこのメッセージに耳を傾けるのか、それとも世界最後の象牙取引の避難所の1つであり続けるのかはまだ分からない。しかしその間にも、毎年何千頭ものゾウが牙のために密猟され続けている。坂元雅行氏はこう話す。「国際社会にとって、いま日本を脱落させないことは極めて重要です。ゾウに次のチャンスが与えられることはもうないでしょうから」訳＝ルーバー荒井ハンナ、高野夏美、米井香織レイチェル・ニューワー: フリーランスのジャーナリストで書籍「密猟：野生動物取引の闇（未邦訳、原題はPoached: Inside the Dark World of Wildlife Trafficking）」の著者。米国ニューヨーク、ブルックリン在住。ブレント - スタートン：ドキュメンタリーフォトグラファー、ナショナルジオグラフィックへの貢献者",
"In 1975, 19-year-old Joyce Poole was offered the chance of a lifetime: To study elephants in Kenya’s Amboseli National Park.Elephant researcher Cynthia Moss, who had just started a study of female African elephants, asked the American college student if she would do the same for the males, whom Moss jokingly called “boring,” according to Poole.Poole quickly proved the animals were anything but, discovering that male African elephants experience reproductive cycles, called musth—something elephant biologists had long argued against. This major finding launched her career, and in the 46 years since, Poole, a National Geographic Explorer, has become one of the world’s experts in how African elephants behave and communicate.In 2002, Poole and her Norwegian husband, Petter Granli, founded the California-based nonprofit ElephantVoices, to educate the public on both how elephants communicate and the importance of conserving them.Now, drawing on data and videos accumulated during decades of study in Amboseli, Kenya’s Masai Mara National Reserve, and Mozambique’s Gorongosa National Park, Poole and Granli have created the African Elephant Ethogram—the most comprehensive audiovisual library ever made of African savanna elephant behavior.On May 25, the database will go public, allowing anyone from a high schooler to a university professor to search for a particular behavior—say, an elephant calf butting its head—and find several videos that explain why the animal is making that particular action. (Explore a user guide of what elephant calls mean.)The ethogram has taken on added urgency with the recent International Union for Conservation of Nature listing of African savanna and forest elephants as separate and endangered species. With a mere 415,000 elephants remaining—down from five million in 1950—Poole hopes the ethogram inspires people “to explore and contemplate the hearts and minds of elephants.”Virginia Morell: Clearly, the ethogram was a major undertaking to put together. What inspired you?Joyce Poole: It really started a long time ago—in 1982. In my [Ph.D.] thesis, I included pen and ink illustrations of all the behaviors I described, such as the musth walk, ear waving, head [held] high, and others. When I completed my thesis, [my adviser] Robert Hinde said, “You must make an ethogram—a descriptive inventory of the full repertoire of African elephants’ behaviors.” I remember thinking, how am I going to do that? But his words stuck with me. [Bioacoustics expert] Katy Payne and I began making other discoveries, for instance, that elephants are capable of producing sound below the level of human hearing. I began to notice particular postures and gestures associated with each vocalization. Then Petter suggested we build online databases to share what we were learning. In 2017, 35 years after Hinde suggested the idea, we finally started working on the African Elephant Ethogram.VM: Where did your initial desire to study these animals come from?JP: That goes way back to my childhood. I moved to Africa [from Connecticut] when I was six years old. My brother was three and my sister was just six weeks—my poor mother. My father had been appointed director of the Peace Corps program in Malawi. We took safaris to East Africa, driving to Tanzania and Kenya. I actually met my first elephant in Amboseli National Park. It was a big male who charged our car; I dove under the Land Rover’s seat. I still remember that rush of adrenaline. So early on I developed a love of Africa and its wildlife and a curiosity about elephants. (Watch an elephant invite a rhino to play.)VM: How did you begin studying elephants?JP: After high school, I enrolled at Smith College to study biology. I finished my first year, but then my family announced they were moving to Kenya; my father had taken a position as director of what was then the African Wildlife Leadership Foundation. I was determined to take a year off from my studies and go with them, but my father said I could only do so if I had a “worthwhile project” to work on while there. I started reading about various wildlife projects, but then I got an incredibly lucky break. My dad had met Cynthia Moss, and he came home one day and said, “Well, do you want to work with Cynthia Moss in Amboseli?” Can you imagine?I so clearly remember one of my first days out in the field. I was suddenly surrounded by these big guys. I was in my family’s VW bus, and the elephants were towering over me and breathing heavily. I hid on the floor. Finally they went away. Back at camp, I told Cynthia about this terrible ordeal, and she just laughed and said, “They were being friendly.”That’s the thing about elephants: Once you’re able to read their body language and understand their vocalization, a whole new world opens to you. People can experience this through the ethogram.VM: How did you go about organizing the ethogram?JP: It includes knowledge that was gathered over 46 years—primarily from Amboseli, but also from Masai Mara and Gorongosa. The idea was to make an exhaustive ethogram, as opposed to one that was more narrow, such as focusing only on mother-offspring behavior. We planned ours to describe everything, all the behaviors we’ve witnessed, and any accompanying vocalizations. We extracted and edited some 2,400 clips of elephant behavior from footage shot in the Mara and Gorongosa, selecting examples of specific behaviors, and added written descriptions.VM: How should people use the ethogram?JP: You might want to look at the short introduction and user guide, or, if you’re a scientist, go directly to the science section. If you’re like me and don’t like reading instructions, you can just dive in. Go directly to the Ethogram Table, scroll down to get an idea of behaviors, and choose one that interests you; then click on a video. Or you can use the search portal by typing in the name of a behavior or use the alphabet search to move to a topic. For me, the most fun is the drop-down search. For example, you might want to know what behaviors musth males engage in that involve their ears. Under "age/sex," click on ears, and then just click search—and watch the videos that come up.VM: Is there one thing in the ethogram people should not miss?JP: If you like a rush of adrenaline, go to the Attacking and Mobbing tab on the Ethogram Table and click on Head-Butt. There’s only one video, which we filmed in Gorongosa. We apologize for the Norwegian swear word Petter uttered when he noticed what happened to our car.VM: As you worked on the ethogram, what struck you as most important about elephants?JP: It confirmed how intelligent, empathetic, and creative elephants are. I was also struck by how much time elephants spend contemplating. To most people, a contemplating elephant looks like it’s doing nothing. It’s why most people miss elephant mating in the wild. Most of the elephants, even the lucky pair, are standing around; they’re stationary because they’re waiting for the female [in estrus] to move. So they’re considering what the others are doing. (Read how empathetic elephants can be.)VM: What more do you want to discover about elephants?JP: I want to know what elephants are saying to each other. I know they say really complicated things, and I think they “talk” a lot about us—about humans—and how they should respond to us. They’re afraid of people in some places because of what has been done to them. For instance, in Gorongosa, because of the long civil war [from 1972 to 1992] the elephants are very frightened of and aggressive toward people.In Gorongosa, at times elephants gave a call I’d never heard before. It was very low in frequency, flat and throbbing. I don’t have enough examples of it to say more, but I felt that it was a comment to family members about us being dangerous. And everywhere, elephants are under a lot of stress from having to listen for and monitor us all the time. (Learn how African elephants understand human gestures.)VM: Will the recent decision to split African elephants into two species—the African forest elephant (Loxodonta cyclotis) and the African savanna elephant (Loxodonta africana)—and upgrade them to critically endangered help protect these species from extinction?JP: The IUCN upgrade doesn’t in and of itself protect elephants. If we’re going to save elephants, we have to take action now, and not just give lip service. We will lose elephants if we’re not [smarter] about how we use space. I understand that people need space, too. But we need to zone areas strictly and set land aside so that we have connections for elephants and other wildlife between protected areas.Elephants matter because they are part of the spectacle of biodiversity on our planet. Elephants also matter because they are self-aware and empathetic, and capable of caring not only about their own lives but the lives of their family and friends.I hope the ethogram inspires people to contemplate the moral dilemma they pose. Do elephants have the right to live on Earth just as we do? If yes, how do we carve out space for them? These are big questions, and there aren’t simple answers, but we must try to find ways that we can all live more sustainably.The National Geographic Society, committed to illuminating and protecting the wonder of our world, funded Explorer Joyce Poole’s work. Learn more about the Society’s support of Explorers highlighting and protecting critical species.This Q&A has been edited for length and clarity.",
"From powerful roars to low-frequency rumbles, elephants use a variety of vocalizations to communicate. Their sounds also include snorts, barks, grunts, trumpets, cries, and even imitated sounds. These calls are essential cues for the survival of an elephant family. Elephant biologist and National Geographic Explorer Joyce Poole, along with ElephantVoices co-director Petter Granli, have recorded thousands of elephant calls. They have divided these into different categories, or “call types” (e.g., rumbles versus trumpets), in an elephant acoustic database and based on behavioral context, call tone, and measurement, they have interpreted the meanings of the many intricate differences within each type in their call context database.“What’s really impressive about elephants is that they are such extraordinary team players,” Poole said. “For an elephant family to survive, especially against intelligent predators like humans, it’s important that they stick together and help each other. They have evolved complex communication as part of this teamwork.”",
"Elephants have long been thought of as either African or Asian. But there are actually two species of African elephant: The savanna elephant is larger, has curving tusks, and roams the open plains of sub-Saharan Africa. The smaller, darker forest elephant, with straight tusks, lives in the equatorial forests of Central and West Africa.Now, for the first time, scientists have separately evaluated how the two are faring—and the findings are grim.Savanna elephants are endangered and forest elephants are critically endangered, according to an official assessment released today by the International Union for Conservation of Nature (IUCN) for its Red List of Threatened Species, the world’s most comprehensive inventory of extinction risk.Elephants are highly social and form tight family groups. Here, a family enjoys time together at Kenya’s Samburu National Reserve.“For both species, poaching is still the biggest driver of decline,” says Kathleen Gobush, leader of the new assessments and a member of the IUCN’s Elephant Specialist Group, a group of technical experts focusing on conservation and management of elephants.“These assessments hopefully will garner renewed attention for the world to double down on stopping the killing, trafficking, and demand for ivory.”Evidence has been building since the early 2000s that forest and savanna elephants should be split taxonomically into two species. In 2008, when the IUCN issued its last assessment of African elephants, it still considered them a single species, then described as vulnerable to extinction. In the years since, scientists came to recognize that forest and savanna elephants are distinct from each other.Since the 2008 assessment, an elephant poaching crisis has also gripped Africa. In 2016, researchers reported in the journal PeerJ that between 2007 and 2014, savanna elephants declined by 30 percent in 18 African countries. A 2013 report in PLOS ONE found that forest elephant populations had plummeted by 62 percent in less than a decade.Poaching peaked in 2011 and since has eased in some places, notably in parts of East Africa. But it persists and is worsening in other regions, especially in Central and West Africa. Meanwhile, elephant habitat continues to be degraded by or lost to human activity.“The potential positive conservation impact of splitting forest and savanna elephants into separate species cannot be overstated,” says Bas Huijbregts, the African species director at the World Wildlife Fund, who was not involved with the new assessment. “Challenges to both species are very different, as are the pathways to their recovery.”In particular, the new report should attract more attention to forest elephants. Less visible and easily monitored than savanna elephants, they tend to be overlooked by governments and donors, and their needs are overshadowed by those of their larger cousins, Gobush says. (See National Geographic’s stunning elephant pictures.)Bureaucratically, the two species have mostly continued to be grouped together, which can hinder conservation efforts for both, says Sue Lieberman, vice president of international policy at the Wildlife Conservation Society, based in New York City. “From a legal or regulatory perspective, governments need to catch up.”To arrive at the new findings, Gobush and her colleagues assessed all available data for both species across hundreds of field sites, dating back to the 1960s for savanna elephants and the 1970s for forest elephants.Using those data, they built a statistical model to estimate population reductions over time. What came to light was that savanna elephants have declined by more than 50 percent over three generations (75 years), tipping them into the endangered category. Longer-lived forest elephant numbers have fallen by more than 80 percent over three generations (93 years), making them critically endangered.The IUCN relies on a variety of factors to determine an animal’s conservation status, such as how much its numbers and range have dwindled.“At this point, there can be no doubt that poaching and habitat loss have devastated populations of elephants all across Africa,” says Scott Schlossberg, a data analyst at Elephants Without Borders, a Botswana-based nonprofit, who was not involved with the new assessment. “A few elephant populations are doing well, but the long-term trends for the continent as a whole are poor.” (Read how poaching is on the rise in Botswana.)If anything, the IUCN findings likely are underestimates because of the scarcity of quantitative data about past elephant populations across the continent, says Iain Douglas-Hamilton, founder of Save the Elephants, a nonprofit based in Kenya, who also was not involved with the new evaluation. “The current assessment isn’t absolute and doesn’t pretend to be,” adds Douglas-Hamilton, a National Geographic Explorer. “It’s a best guess of trends.”Douglas-Hamilton says elephants can bounce back if given the chance. “They can go from high slaughter and almost destruction to strict protection and recovery,” he says.Kenya’s Tsavo National Park provides an example. Poaching reduced its savanna elephants from an estimated 40,000 in the 1970s to about 6,500 in 1988. Today, elephant numbers in the park have rebounded to about 17,000, a response to anti-poaching measures.Rebuilding elephant populations requires protecting their habitat as well as continuing to clamp down on poaching and ivory trafficking, Schlossberg says. The U.S., China, U.K. and many other countries have closed their legal domestic ivory markets.“Allowing new ivory sales could jeopardize the progress that has been made recently in fighting ivory trafficking,” Schlossberg says. (Learn how human suffering is linked to poaching.)Among countries that have not closed their legal ivory markets, Japan now has the world’s largest, and Japanese carvers prefer ivory from forest elephants.That forest elephants are now recognized as critically endangered only emphasizes the heavy toll poaching for ivory continues to extract, Lieberman says.“All countries that still allow domestic ivory markets, including Japan, need to close their markets once and for all.”",
"African elephants engage in more than 200 different known postures, helping them convey an array of emotions, from aggression to ambivalence. Complex and unfamiliar, elephant behavior can be difficult for human beings to distinguish—which is why recent footage of an African elephant approaching a rhino was initially deemed to be aggressive by many viewers.The real motivation behind the elephant's actions?"It was an invitation to play," says Joyce Poole, an expert on elephant behavior, National Geographic explorer, and co-founder of Elephant Voices.The footage was shot at Kruger National Park in South Africa by visiting tourists. While the approach began innocuously, the rhino's sudden charge startled the elephant, who then responded with a threat to charge.Poole explains that the two elephants seen in the video are dominant males, likely around 18 years old. At this age, it is common for adult male elephants to form what are known as "bachelor" groups, or groups of males who have yet to form their family structures, or to become solitary."It wasn't aggressive," explains Poole. "Elephants sometimes want to push their weight around."The male in the video's foreground can be seen exhibiting three distinct behaviors.First, he exhibits "distant frontal attitude." By curling his trunk into an "S" shape, he signals an interest in dueling or sparing with the rhino. Approaching with this posture indicates he is waiting for the rhino's next move.The elephant then solicits play further by bending his head down and resting his trunk on his tusk and pressing his ears against his head. It's at this moment the rhino becomes threatened.As it charges slightly toward the elephant, the elephant responds by picking up the stick, formerly a plaything, and throwing it at the rhino. Even at distances, elephants are capable of accurately throwing objects at a target. Uprooting objects and throwing them at predators are common shows of self defense exhibited before attempting to charge.Whether or not an elephant is aggressive, Poole explains, is entirely dependent on the elephant. Like people, their likeliness of showing signs of aggression depend on past experiences, populations, and individual characteristics.Elephants are known for their impressive memories, but their intelligence is one of the most advanced in the animal kingdom. Similar to how the elephant in the video picks up a stick as a play object and source of defense, elephants commonly use tools to their benefit. Earlier this week, video footage captured an Indian elephant navigating through a railroad stop, delicately lifting the pathway's barrier, and expertly moving through the crossing.In addition to being able to practically use and navigate around objects, elephants also use objects as an expression of emotion. They are one of nature's most empathetic animals. Scientists have observed them pulling tranquilizer darts from their peers' sides, spraying dust on wounds, and even mourning their dead by placing plants and soil over carcasses.Kruger National Park is one of the largest wildlife reserves in Africa, covering more than 7,000 square miles. As of 2009, it was estimated to be home to more than 11,000 elephants.White rhinos like the one seen engaged in the standoff have been less fortunate in the wild. Poole says she had never seen elephants engage in playful behavior with rhinoceroses, not because it's out of character for them, but simply because rhinos have been poached to dangerously low levels.The commercial value of their horns, combined with their relatively unaggressive nature, has left them susceptible to poaching. Once in danger of extinction, white rhinoceroses are considered a conservation success story, but recent surges in the demand for their horn have resulted in a similarly increased loss of life. The conservation group Save the Rhino estimates that nearly 6,000 rhinos have been poached since 2008.",
"An African elephant spends time with a young one at Maasai Mara National Reserve in Kenya.Elephants, we all know, are in peril. We humans are waging what amounts to a war against them because they have something we want and cannot make on our own: ivory.The West African country of Gabon holds most of Africa's remaining forest elephants. Their main stronghold, Minkebe National Park and its surrounding buffer zone, was home to an estimated 28,500 elephants in 2004. By 2012 the number had plummeted to about 7,000—a loss of 20,000 or more elephants.People are shooting, poisoning, and spearing the animals at such a rate across the continent that some scientists already consider them "ecologically extinct." There are now fewer than 500,000 wild African elephants—maybe no more than half that number—and barely 32,000 Asian elephants.They cannot fight against us; they cannot win this battle.And the horror of what is happening to them is surely compounded in their minds by the empathy they feel for one another—an emotion that scientists have at last been able to demonstrate experimentally in elephants.Elephant Empathy: One Example After AnotherBut why did it take an experiment? Research on elephants is full of examples of the animals apparently behaving empathetically—recognizing and responding to another elephant's pain or problem. Often, they even make heroic efforts to assist one another.In Kenya, researchers have watched mother elephants and other adult females help baby elephants climb up muddy banks and out of holes, find a safe path into a swamp, or break through electrified fences.Scientists have spotted elephants assisting others that are injured, plucking out tranquilizing darts from their fellows, and spraying dust on others' wounds.A two-year-old African elephant baby climbs on the back of his mother in the Nyiregyhaza Animal Park in Budapest, Hungary, one day after the mother died. The baby stayed near the lifeless body of his mother for 14 hours after her death, and wept after the body was removed.And on at least one occasion, researchers have watched an elephant struggle to help a dying friend, lifting her with her tusks and trunk, while calling out in distress.Aren't such accounts sufficient for scientists to say unequivocally that elephants, like us, are empathetic beings?Sadly, no. For various reasons—some scientific, some philosophical, some religious, some economic—we have set the bar exceedingly high for recognizing emotions (other than anger and fear) in other animals.Saying absolutely that elephants (or other animals) are empathetic requires an experiment, something that is difficult to do in the wild. Experiments mean that these are not chance observations—the results are repeatable.To show that elephants experience the same emotions another is feeling, scientists watched captive Asian elephants in a park in Thailand. They noted when one elephant was upset by something, such as by a snake in the grass, and they recorded her behaviors to see if there was a pattern.There was. In response to a stressful event, an elephant flares out her ears, erects her tail, and sometimes makes a low rumble. Scientists watching elephants in the wild have reported the same behaviors. (See "Surprise: Elephants Comfort Upset Friends.")Emotional ContagionBoth in the wild and in this captive study, researchers have watched other, nearby elephants react to the other elephant's distress by acting in exactly the same way. Scientists call this emotional contagion.The elephants also ran to stand beside their friend, touched her with their trunks to soothe her, and made soft chirping sounds. Sometimes one would even put her trunk inside the other's mouth, a behavior elephants find particularly comforting, the researchers say.We do something very similar when watching a scary movie with a friend. When the main character is threatened, we feel his fear. Our hearts race, we may tremble, and for reassurance, we reach for our friend's hand.The researchers also recorded what the elephants did when they were in the same locations with their same friends nearby, but nothing stressful occurred. In those moments, none of the elephants acted in an empathetic way.By comparing the two types of events—stressful versus nonstressful—the scientists were able to say that "emotional contagion" occurs only when an elephant sees another in distress.Some scientists may still argue that this is not sufficient evidence for true empathy, that the experiment doesn't reveal what's going on in an elephant's mind when she rushes to aid a friend or worries over a dying companion.But the fact that elephants make any effort at all on another elephant's behalf suggests that they are at the very least highly aware and emotional beings, concerned in some manner for each other.Do They Know We're Destroying Them?We cannot know for certain if African elephants know that they're under attack, that we're wiping them out across the continent. There are few, if any, survivors from most poaching events, and those that do make it can't tell us of their trauma. We'll never know what elephants may have witnessed or heard in the forest while their friends and relatives in other families were being slaughtered.We have some idea, though, because in South Africa in the late 20th century, wildlife officials authorized the killing of entire elephant families in some fenced parks, such as Kruger. The officials worried that if a fenced elephant population grew too large, the animals would consume all the vegetation—so they culled the elephants.Somehow, other elephant families in the park knew this was happening. Perhaps it was the cries of terror as the animals were shot. Or perhaps those being killed were able to emit low rumbles that carried the news for miles.Immediately after a culling operation—and even after rangers cleaned up the area, removing all the bodies—other elephant families would come to the scene. They inspected the ground and smelled the earth, and then the visiting elephants left, never to return.Observers say that even when the area where a culling took place was good habitat for elephants, the animals chose not to live there.What happens now where poachers kill elephant families and herds? Do the animals, filled with empathy for what the others suffered, come to investigate the killing fields? Do they abandon those awful precincts forever?Those studies have yet to be made. But in the meantime, can we put our empathy to use in finding a way to help the elephants? Can we put an end at last to the poaching?Virginia Morell is a correspondent for Science and the author of four acclaimed books. Her newest, Animal Wise: The Thoughts and Emotions of Our Fellow Creatures, has received several honors, including a Notable Book for 2014 award from the American Library Association and a Best Book of the Year designation from Kirkus Reviews. She lives in Oregon with her husband and their working farm collie, Buckaroo.Correction: An earlier version of this piece incorrectly stated that Gabon has lost more than half its elephants—11,000—in the last ten years. It is known with a high degree of confidence that in a recent eight-year period, the loss in just one Gabon park approximated 20,000 elephants.",
"It turns out African elephants really do get the point. New research suggests these gray pachyderms can follow human gestures—like pointing—just as dogs are able to follow when we point to food or toys. An elephant's ability to understand such gestures could help explain how humans have been able to use them as work animals for thousands of years.Humans point and respond to pointing gestures from infancy. It's one of the earliest ways we learn to communicate. Many domesticated animals such as dogs, cats, goats, and horses are also able to interpret human gestures. But among wild animals, even some of our closest relatives—such as chimpanzees—struggle to respond to our gestures. (Related: "Can Dogs Feel Our Emotions? Yawn Study Suggests Yes.")Now, a new study has shown that African elephants are able to correctly interpret human pointing gestures, even without being specifically trained to do so."Elephants appear to be unique in that they're so useful when trained, and yet have never been selectively bred in captivity," said study co-author Richard Byrne, a researcher at the University of St. Andrews in Scotland, who studies the evolution of cognitive and social behavior.Following the PointByrne and co-author Anna Smet, a doctoral student at the University of St. Andrews, studied 11 captive African elephants, whose usual job was to give tourists elephant-back rides at a site near Victoria Falls in southern Africa.In their initial experiment, Smet stood midway between two containers, one of which contained food. Smet used her arm to point toward the container with food, while looking back and forth between an elephant and the bucket.The elephants were significantly more likely to choose the container that Smet was pointing toward, the researchers report in a study published October 10 in the journal Current Biology.The animals continued to prefer the container Smet pointed to even when she varied her position—moving closer to either one container or the other—suggesting that they weren't just picking a bucket based on her body position.When the researchers tried out different pointing gestures, they found that the elephants responded successfully to the direction of Smet's forearm, hand, and index finger, but not to the direction of her gaze alone.While human infants are able to interpret gaze direction, an elephant's eyesight probably isn't good enough to do this, Byrne explained.When researchers compared their results from all the trials, they found that there was no difference between how successfully elephants interpreted gestures in the first half of the trials versus the second half. "So [the elephants] certainly weren't learning during the experiment," Byrne said.Byrne also tried to figure out whether the elephants could have learned to interpret pointing gestures before the trial, either from their handlers or from other humans around them.The animals were all trained, but were taught to respond to their handlers' vocal commands rather than their gestures. When Smet spent three months carefully observing the handlers, she did not see them using pointing gestures with the elephants."If they learned this ability from humans, it's a mystery to us when they did it," Byrne said.Pointing in the Wild?It's not that surprising that elephants are able to react to human gestures, said Phyllis Lee, a psychology professor at the University of Stirling in Scotland, who has carried out field research on wild elephants."It's not unexpected, given that there's good evidence that they can react to the physical cues of other animals and their social companions," said Lee, who was not involved in the study.Elephants need to understand signals from their social companions, and they might respond to the pointing gestures in the experiment because "this thing that looks kind of like a big trunk, waving at a food bucket, might be the sort of thing that elephants attend to," Lee said.Elephants have been known to use their trunks for social communication, but it's unclear if they interpret trunk gestures as pointing."When they detect something alarming, they characteristically face towards it and raise their trunk above their head with the tip of the trunk pointed to [the danger]," Byrne said. "We've always thought they were sniffing the breeze, but maybe they're also pointing; our results suggest that's more than possible." (Related: "How to Scare Elephants—For Their Own Good.")A previous study of Asian elephants found that they didn't respond to human pointing cues. But that study's contradictory results may have been due to differences in experimental methods and in the level of prior training the elephants received, according to both Byrne and Lee."I would be surprised if the reason for the different result is that Asian elephants can't understand pointing," Byrne said.While the current study of trained and captive African elephants could explain why elephants have been so useful for humans, "it doesn't tell us that much about what wild elephants are cognitively capable of doing," Lee said. "Understanding how wild elephants communicate would be extremely interesting, but we need to do those studies in the wild." (Related: "Name That Elephant: How to Identify Elephants in the Wild.")That's something Byrne hopes to look at in the future: to see if wild elephants use pointing gestures. "Evolution doesn't select for abilities that are [of] no use naturally, so it implies that the elephants must be able to understand their own behavior as pointing. It would be nice to go on and find exactly how elephants point for each other," he said.",
"NEW YORK CITYThe monorail glides past outdoor exhibits displaying a red panda named Linus, a Malayan tiger named Suhana, and Penny the rhino (wearing sunscreen for her sensitive skin, our tour guide points out). Then we come to Happy, a 50-year-old Asian elephant.As we watch her on this sunny spring day at the Bronx Zoo, in New York City, the chirpy guide cracks jokes and rattles off facts: Happy drinks up to 60 gallons of water every day, she enjoys digging in the sand, she gets frequent pedicures from zoo staff. The elephant lumbers over to the fence, swings her trunk, and lifts her massive right foot. “She came over to say hello!” a fellow zoogoer says to his daughter.Happy doesn’t know it, but she’s at the center of a nationwide debate that turns on one question: Is Happy happy?According to the Nonhuman Rights Project (NhRP), a Florida-based animal civil rights organization, the answer is no. On May 4, the New York Court of Appeals, the state’s highest court, agreed to hear the NhRP’s case for declaring Happy a legal person. A date hasn’t been set, but the NhRP expects it will be heard this fall.We’re “arguing that Happy has the right to bodily liberty,” or freedom from imprisonment, says Steven Wise, the organization’s founder and president. He wants Happy to be moved to an accredited elephant sanctuary where she’ll be with others of her kind in a larger, more natural setting than her present acre-size enclosure where she lives alone.This is the fourth court the NhRP has argued before on Happy’s behalf. It’s the first time the New York Court of Appeals, which accepts only about 5 percent of cases submitted, has agreed to hear one relating to animal rights. “We think our arguments are very powerful,” Wise says. “But who knows?”Personhood is “a matter of public policy and moral principle,” he says. It’s a legal designation indicating that an entity has the capacity for rights or responsibilities (such as, for example, to pay taxes and obey laws). It’s “not a biological question,” and it doesn’t mean that Happy would be thought of as equivalent to a human. Corporations, bodies of water, animals, and even deities around the world have been recognized as persons. But in the United States, where no legal designation exists for nonhuman animals, Happy is merely a thing.The Bronx Zoo, which is accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums (AZA), disputes the idea that Happy has a bad life at the zoo, her home for more than 40 years. In statements, court filings, and publicly released emails, the zoo repeatedly has said that Happy is content.The zoo has one other elephant, named Patty, but she’s housed separately. Happy had one female companion, Grumpy, for 25 years, who was euthanized in 2002 after being fatally injured by Patty and another elephant, Maxine. (Maxine developed cancer and was euthanized in 2018.) In 2006, Happy’s second companion, Sammie, was euthanized after her kidneys failed. That year, the zoo announced that when Happy, Patty, and Maxine died, they wouldn’t be replaced. That’s because if one died, the other two elephants might not get along, and it would be unethical to keep a solo elephant in the exhibit, the zoo told the New York Times.According to the AZA’s accreditation standards, zoos with female elephants must “have a minimum of three females (or the space to have three females).” Ideally, the elephants would be grouped, says Dan Ashe, president and CEO of the AZA. “Sometimes animals don’t want to be in a group,” he says. “Happy doesn’t enjoy sharing space—she gets quite anxious.” The AZA puts priority on the well-being of individual animals, he says. “The Bronx Zoo is in full compliance with AZA’s accreditation standards.”A deepening pool of scientific research gives clear evidence that elephants and other animals are smarter, more aware, and more emotional than previously thought. In light of this, a number of countries—including Germany, France, New Zealand, and the U.K.—have recognized in law their sentience. The U.S. remains conspicuously absent from the growing list.Happy isn’t the first animal in the country for whom advocates have sought personhood status, but none has succeeded yet.In 2004, an independent attorney sued the U.S. government on the grounds that its use of sonar to detect submarines was injurious to cetaceans. In 2011, the animal rights group People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals (PETA) sued the marine park SeaWorld under the 13th Amendment for the “enslavement” of five orcas being “forced to perform.” Four years later, PETA sued for copyright infringement after a photographer claimed ownership of a picture a monkey took of himself with the photographer’s camera. And in 2013, the NhRP argued in the New York State Supreme Court for personhood for four chimpanzees—two privately owned animals used in entertainment, two research lab animals—and four years later pressed a personhood case in Connecticut Superior Court on behalf of three elephants in a traveling roadside zoo. (Read more about the fate of these three elephants.)“I find what’s happening [with Happy] to be the most exciting way that people are legally rethinking and approaching these issues,” says Janet Davis, a historian and professor at the University of Texas at Austin who is not associated with NhRP. “This is the way ultimately to open the floodgates for all creatures.”That’s what Bronx Zoo director James Breheny wrote in an email to NhRP supporters in 2019. She’s “evaluated frequently by the people that know her best, including the veterinarians that have cared for her for years as well as the keepers who interact with Happy for hours every day.”Happy “is more comfortable with her keepers and with safe barriers between her and other elephants,” Breheny wrote, and those who criticize her situation at the zoo “know nothing of our individual animal, her personality, preferences, or tendencies.”Though advocates say Happy should be transferred to an elephant sanctuary, Breheny noted that Happy’s exhibit has many of the same features found in them: “water to swim in, mud to wallow in, vegetation to browse, and objects to interact with.”Besides, because Happy can’t speak for herself, who’s to say what’s best for her? asks AZA president Ashe. “If it were my personal health and medical well-being, I’d want to be represented by a doctor, or I’d want to be represented by my family members,” he says. “Happy’s family is Bronx Zoo.”The zoo recently tried to reintroduce Happy and Patty, but “neither animal was comfortable in the company of the other, and both elephants experienced different, yet obvious, levels of stress,” Breheny told NhRP supporters in 2019.Today, Happy isn’t completely alone and “has contact with” Patty, according to a statement by the zoo last year. Even though they’re in separate enclosures, they can see and occasionally even touch each other across a cable fence. Earlier this year, Breheny told a reporter that Happy and Patty are “like sisters who don’t want to share the same room.” One of Happy’s former keepers, Jerry Stark, has said she’s “doing phenomenal” on her own and that “she can’t be with other elephants—she just doesn’t get along with them.”That Happy may dislike Patty “would not surprise any of us,” Wise says. There’s no doubt, he says, that Happy remains aware that Patty had attacked her original longtime companion, Grumpy, with whom she lived for more than two decades. “Happy did have a friend, and Patty killed her,” he says.The Court of Appeals’ decision to hear Happy’s case “has not changed anything,” Max Pulsinell, the zoo’s executive director of communications, wrote in an email. “We will continue to be the advocates for Happy and her well-being as we have for the past four decades.”Breheny and other zoo representatives declined National Geographic’s requests for interviews about Happy.Wise, unlike most lawyers, has never met his client, but he’s seen Happy on visits to the zoo. “I’m looking at a depressed elephant,” he says. “She doesn’t look up at us, she just stands there with her head down … I never saw an elephant do that.”Research shows that elephants suffer in captivity. Zoo elephants die younger than wild elephants, and wild-captured elephants have an even shorter lifespan than their captive-born counterparts. They suffer from foot and joint issues, including arthritis, from standing on hard, unnatural surfaces. A 2012 Seattle Times investigation found that of the 390 elephants that had died in accredited U.S. zoos in a 50-year period, the majority succumbed to captivity-related injuries or disease.Given all this, in recent years more than 30 other zoos in North America have phased out their elephant exhibits or, like the Bronx Zoo, have announced plans to do so, including the Central Florida Zoo north of Orlando, Philadelphia Zoo, and Chicago’s Lincoln Park Zoo.Elephants are intelligent and empathetic. They use tools, have close family ties, comfort their friends, and even appear to mourn their dead. Their brains, which weigh about 11 pounds, are among the largest relative to body size of any land species and show similarities to those of cetaceans, great apes—and humans. We know only “a tiny fraction of what elephant brains are likely capable of,” elephant behavior expert and National Geographic Explorer Joyce Poole wrote in an affidavit for the NhRP’s case. (What are elephants really saying? Joyce Poole has catalogued nearly 50 years of data on elephant behavior.)The experts supporting the case with affidavits or briefs include, in addition to Poole, elephant scientist Cynthia Moss, 50 animal law professors, 12 philosophers, five Catholic theologians, and two habeas corpus scholars.The NhRP knows of a handful of other solitary elephants in the U.S., but Wise says they chose Happy partly because in 2005 she became the first elephant to pass the mirror test for animal intelligence. Researchers painted a white “X” on Happy’s head, and when she stood in front of the mirror, she repeatedly touched the mark with her trunk, indicating that she recognized the figure in the reflection as herself. The fact that Happy recognizes herself suggests she may also be self-aware—or have knowledge of her own mental states, such as thoughts and emotions.The NhRP modeled the lawsuit on a 1772 London case in which an escaped enslaved man argued successfully that he’d been wrongfully imprisoned. Similarly, the NhRP asserts, Happy is being held against her will in “solitary confinement.”Elephants have a complex social life, and they need the companionship of other animals, Wise says. “It’s terrible for an elephant to be by herself” in a confined space. “Elephants are evolved to move—Happy just stands there.”More than 8,000 miles away from Happy’s enclosure, dust clouds rose around giant feet on November 30, 2020, as Kaavan, another Asian elephant, made history when he stepped out of his transport crate and into his new home at the Cambodia Wildlife Sanctuary, in the northern part of the country.Kavaan, dubbed “the world’s loneliest elephant” in global headlines and by Cambodia’s deputy environment minister, had spent more than 30 years at Marghazar Zoo, in Islamabad, Pakistan. After his mate, Saheli, died in 2012, he spent the next eight years alone, obsessively swaying and bobbing his head, according to court records—until lawyer Owais Awan filed a petition with the Islamabad High Court.Awan argued that Kaavan was protected by national anti-cruelty laws, the principles of Islam, Pakistan’s state religion, and the right to life article in the country’s constitution, which states that humans have a right to a healthy environment.Soon, animal advocates—including the singer Cher—were campaigning for Kaavan’s freedom. On May 21, 2020, the court ruled “without any hesitation” that animals are entitled to rights. “An animal undoubtedly is a sentient being,” the judge wrote, ordering Kaavan to be released to a sanctuary. (The ruling also referenced Happy, describing her as an “inmate” of the Bronx Zoo.)“In all honesty, when I had filed the petition,” Awan says, “I had never imagined that all of this would have actually happened … I think the stars were in our favor.”Other animals too have won legal personhood. In 2014, a case in India challenged the traditional practice of jallikattu, or bull taming, which uses methods such as twisting the animal’s tail, tugging on its nose rope, and beating it. The Supreme Court’s landmark decision banning jallikattu acknowledged that all nonhuman animals have the right to life, which it defined as “more than mere survival or existence or instrumental value for human-beings, but to lead a life with some intrinsic worth, honour, and dignity.”In 2016, an Argentine court determined that a zoo chimpanzee named Cecilia was a legal person with inherent, fundamental rights. The ruling, which quoted philosopher Immanuel Kant (“We can judge the heart of a man by his treatment of animals”), ordered Cecilia to be moved to a sanctuary, and since 2017, she’s had a home in the Sanctuary of Sorocaba, in São Paulo, Brazil.Meanwhile in the U.S., little progress has been made. As Wise sees it, persistent anthropocentrism—the cultural tendency to see the world solely through the lens of human values and experiences—is a major reason why the U.S. lags behind. “Even those cases that nonhuman animals lost outside the United States, the judges spent more time thinking about it than they do in our case,” he says. “The most poorly written cases have all been in the United States.”Humans have a history of holding animals responsible for their actions—and punishing them accordingly. Pigs, elephants, bulls, dogs, cows, and other animals have been tried, found guilty, and executed for murder. In the early 1500s, a French bishop accused rats of eating the local barley crop, initiated a trial, and assigned the defendants a lawyer. The case was dropped after the rats failed to appear in court.In Germany in 1559, a parson banned sparrows from the church for their “unceasing and extremely vexatious chatterings and scandalous unchastity” during the sermon, and he enlisted hunters to kill any bird that violated the ban.These examples from another time show some, albeit perverse, understanding of nonhuman animal sentience and autonomy.In colonial America, laws granted some protection for animals—for example, requiring that livestock owners allow cattle to “rest or refresh”—Janet Davis says. But “there was nothing about the animal being a sentient creature … There was always an assumption of animals as being property.”This began to change in 1866, when the New York state legislature enacted an anti-cruelty law that became a model for other state and local laws in the U.S. It gave the recently formed American Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals the authority to bring “the cruelest to justice,” Davis says, deputizing the organization to “essentially act as police.”For the first time, “there was a recognition in the law that people were responsible to prevent suffering and that animals were sentient beings,” Davis says.But even today, with science pointing a new way, courts only rarely have accorded rights to nonhuman animals—and never in the U.S. The notion of nonhuman animals as property devoid of rights has “bedeviled animal advocates for generations,” she says.Happy’s case, as the first of many incremental changes in nonhuman animals’ legal status, could be a path toward unraveling this thinking, Davis says. “This is where we have to start.”In a November 2020 hearing for Happy before the Appellate Division of the New York Supreme Court, First Department, held virtually, an associate judge named Ellen Gesmer asked Wise whether Happy, if she was granted legal rights, “would have all the rights of personhood in our country, including, for example, the right to vote?”Asking whether Happy would have the right to vote shows a fundamental misunderstanding about the meaning of personhood, Wise says. Just as children are legal persons but can’t vote, drink alcohol, or own property, nonhuman animals can be persons without acquiring all the rights granted to adult humans.The concept of personhood for nonhuman entities isn’t new in the U.S. In 2019 after a toxic algae bloom in Lake Erie, voters in Toledo, Ohio, recognized the lake’s “right to a healthy environment” by voting in favor of the Lake Erie Bill of Rights charter amendment. This meant that attorneys could sue polluters on the lake’s behalf. But last year, a federal court judge overturned the law as unconstitutional after a lawsuit challenged its legality. (In 2019, Uganda also formally recognized the rights of nature.)Corporations have been afforded rights—and therefore considered legal persons—since the 1800s. In 2010, the U.S. Supreme Court ruled that limiting political spending by the nonprofit Citizens United violated its First Amendment right to free speech. Four years later in another famous corporate personhood case, the Supreme Court ruled that Hobby Lobby Stores, Inc., can claim exemption from providing employees with contraceptive coverage on religious grounds if the practice violates the company’s beliefs.If corporations have rights, it follows that both animals and natural resources should have rights too, says Kelsey Leonard, a scientist and member of the Shinnecock Indian Nation. Leonard advocates for the integration of Indigenous traditions in water conservation and management. “This isn’t some revolutionary idea that’s going to upend our system,” she says. (In 2017, New Zealand recognized the legal personhood of the Whanganui River, which the Maori regard as a living being.) Native Americans have recognized the rights of natural resources for millennia. From an Indigenous perspective, when people harvest something from nature—whether it’s food, resources, or even just enjoyment—they also have a responsibility to give back, Leonard says. The same is true of Happy. “We’ve consumed Happy as a society … But what have we given back to Happy?”If New York’s Court of Appeals rules for the NhRP, it wouldn’t mean that all elephants are automatically considered legal persons. After that, Wise says, “we’d probably work our way through the rest of the elephants in New York.” A win for Happy would help, he says. In approaching other facilities that have elephants, “we’d say, do you really want us to sue you, when the Court of Appeals has already said Happy has [rights]?”The Bronx Zoo warns that what it calls the NhRP’s “radical argument” of animal personhood would set a dangerous precedent. A February 2021 brief by Breheny and the Wildlife Conservation Society (WCS), which runs the Bronx Zoo and is headquartered there, noted that various laws governing human-animal relationships—from the regulation of dog shelters and the transportation of horses to the criminalization of animal abuse—rely on the “bedrock distinction between humans and animals.” Declaring an animal a legal person would “disrupt and interfere with” that balance, they wrote.Recognizing personhood based on the NhRP’s definition of autonomy as a “non-observable, internal cognitive process” also would make courts the arbiter of whether a being is autonomous enough to deserve certain rights, which Breheny and WCS said would further burden an already overloaded New York State court system. Requiring courts to determine a creature’s autonomy would leave them with an “impossible task.”Regardless of how the legal precedent might affect other animals, if Happy wins personhood, Wise says the NhRP will ask the court to order her transfer to a sanctuary, where she’d be with other elephants.In their February brief, Breheny and WCS said that such a move would amount to changing “the conditions of Happy’s ‘confinement’ from one enclosed setting to another.”Whatever the result, the case before New York’s Court of Appeals may be Happy’s last chance for personhood. It “could be the end of our litigation,” Wise says, “either because we’ve won, or we’ve lost.”Wildlife Watch is an investigative reporting project between National Geographic Society and National Geographic Partners focusing on wildlife crime and exploitation. Read more Wildlife Watch stories here, and learn more about National Geographic Society’s nonprofit mission at natgeo.com/impact. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to NGP.WildlifeWatch@natgeo.com.",
"Kanzi, a 39-year-old bonobo, became well-known for his language skills. He can communicate using hundreds of symbols that correlate to words.Ravens can plan for the future. Octopuses create armor out of coconut shells. Orangutans can “talk” about the past.Scientific research constantly gives glimpses into new dimensions of animal cognition. But intelligence—which is so complex and encompasses such a wide range of adaptive abilities—remains confoundingly tricky to measure.“One of the biggest challenges is our inability to comprehend how other species process information,” says Kristina Horback, an assistant professor in the Department of Animal Science at the University of California, Davis, who studies the cognitive abilities of livestock animals.Some animals have senses we can’t even understand, such as sharks, which have an acute sensitivity to electrical currents, or insects, some of which can see ultraviolet light.Our own senses skew how we perceive intelligence in animals. The “mirror test”—an animal’s ability to recognize itself in the mirror—is commonly used to assess capacity for self-awareness. Bottlenose dolphins, magpies, and manta rays are among the few species that have passed that test.Because vision is key to humans, “it makes sense that visual recognition of the self would be our default,” Horback says. “But what about species that rely on smell for identification, like swine? Visual information is not important to these species.” Because the mirror test favors species that rely on vision over scent, it doesn’t offer an objective measure of self-awareness.We can’t meaningfully compare intelligence among animals. One species might excel in one area but perform poorly in another and vice versa. And so much of an animal’s ability to pass a cognition test depends on its sensory abilities. Using human abilities as a comparative benchmark reveals the drawbacks of our attempts to measure intelligence across species.“Our vision is good, but not as good as hawks. Our hearing is good, but not as good as rats,” says Edward Wasserman, a psychology professor at the University of Iowa who compares cognitive abilities among species. Our sense of smell, he says, is on the poor side, “and dramatically outclassed by dogs.”As Wasserman puts it, “How we contrive tests of intelligence may tell us more about the sensory abilities of animals than their intellectual abilities.”Add to that our tendency to value cognitive abilities that are human-like as evidence of higher intelligence. “Many people say, ‘I hear that pigs are smart, and sheep are dumb,’” Horback says. “This is completely false.” Pigs, like humans, are opportunistic omnivores—they eat whatever they can find. They’ve evolved the ability, she says, to remember food locations and to use deception to keep other pigs away from their stashes. Sheep, on the other hand, are grazers. They have different skills, such as the ability to detect subtle flock movements. “They do not need to solve complex food mazes or trick others away from food source,” Horback says. “It just does not make sense for sheep to have that particular cognitive skill.”Every species is adapted to its own environment. Animals generally have the cognitive abilities necessary to thrive. “There are species which simply do not need to retain the capacity for complex problem solving [or] tool use,” Horback says, pointing out that having more cognitive abilities than necessary “would be wasteful for the animal's survival.”“Barnacles do not move. Food comes to them,” Wasserman says. “Why should they engage in great feats of learning or reasoning?”Although scientists reject the notions of measures of absolute or comparative intelligence in animals, advances in technology are providing new insights.Touchscreens in particular are “proving to be a real game changer,” Wasserman says. “So long as animals can activate the screen by touching, nosing, or pecking, we can craft clever tests of their intelligence.”Here are 14 species from the animal kingdom that have demonstrated notable cognitive feats.",
"New research shows ravens are as skilled as humans as planning and bartering.We've long known ravens aren’t your typical bird brain: Myths featuring the wily black bird extend from Aesop’s fables to Native American folklore.In more recent times, experiments testing the problem-solving capabilities of ravens and their corvid kin, the jays and magpies, have shown these birds have cognition on par with people and some other great apes. (Read how ravens hold grudges against cheaters.)For instance, a trademark of being human is the flexibility to plan for future events, such as saving for retirement or figuring out a meal for the next morning. Scientists previously believed these behaviors were unique to hominids—humans and great apes—because no other animals, including monkeys, were thought to have such abstract thinking skills.Now, a new study may challenge that long-held notion: Ravens are just as good as us at pre-planning tasks, according to animal cognition researchers Can Kabadayi and Mathias Osvath at Sweden's Lund University."I’m a little bit surprised they were that good," remarks Osvath, who has studied raven cognition for nearly a decade.Kabadayi and Osvath designed a series of experiments with five captive birds to see if ravens can plan for an unseen future.The basic experiment is as follows: The researchers taught the ravens that if the birds place a special tool in a tube sticking out of a box, it will release their favorite piece of food—one whole piece of dog kibble.Then, the scientists took the box and the tool away.An hour later, the team offered the ravens a choice of objects—one being that special tool. Fifteen minutes later, the ravens got the box back. ("Watch: A Clever Raven Outsmarts a Trash Can.")About 80 percent of the time, the ravens selected the correct tool and performed the task to get their treat.The team repeated the same experiment with a 17-hour delay in returning the box to the ravens. In this case, the birds were successful nearly 90 percent of the time, according to the study, published this week in the journal Science.“Monkeys have not been able to solve tasks like this,” Osvath says, noting the birds are actually more skilled than human children.In almost identical experiments on four-year-olds, the ravens were technically more successful in planning ahead to open the reward box than toddlers. (Related: "Are Crows Smarter Than Children?")The researchers also set up an experiment to test the birds' bartering skills.They instructed the ravens how to exchange tokens to get their favorite foods at a later time. Again, the birds passed these tests with flying colors over 90 percent of the time.“It is really surprising to see ravens were better at solving two planning tasks than great apes and children presented with similar problems,” says Alex Taylor, an animal cognition expert University of Auckland in New Zealand who was not involved in the new study.“This is particularly exciting given that the two behaviors, tool-use and bartering, are not behaviors that ravens display in the wild,” Taylor explains."This suggests that, like humans and great apes, ravens may have a general planning ability that can be used with novel behaviors." (Watch a video of a New Caledonian crow solving problems.)In the final experiments, the ravens could choose between an inferior immediate food reward (a smaller, less-tasty piece of kibble) and a token for their favorite kibble they could trade later—a concept called delayed gratification.“Humans devalue things that take place in the future,” says Osvath, emphasizing people typically go for instant rewards.Ravens seem to be a little more patient, selecting the tool or token that would get them the better food in the near future over 70 percent of the time.However, Taylor notes that the results are open to interpretation. Perhaps, he says, they're outsmarting the experiment: “The ravens may not be thinking about the future at all, they may instead just be choosing the object the has been associated the most with food.” (Read “Minds of Their Own” in National Geographic magazine.)Future experiments should be able to discern exactly how clever ravens are, but at the most basic level, these findings show that humans might not be as special as we thought.Follow Shaena Montanari on Twitter.",
"When hunting for tasty morsels like crabs and scallops, octopuses must watch out for predators at all times. That's why some of these brainy, eight-legged creatures bring along ready-made body armor—sometimes in the form of coconuts.In a YouTube video (above) that recently went viral, an octopus trudges along the ocean floor carrying two halves of a coconut. Suddenly it stops, pulls them together and climbs inside.Scientists have known about this behavior for a while, but it was first filmed in 2009 in North Sulawesi, Indonesia, by a team of biologists from Museum Victoria in Melbourne, Australia. (Related: "'Bizarre' Octopuses Carry Coconuts as Instant Shelters.")"I knew I was seeing something really special, so letting go of the camera just wasn't an option," says Julian Finn, the museum's senior curator for invertebrates, who filmed the 2009 event."I just had to do my best to suppress my laughter, keeping my teeth clenched around my regulator and hope that the seawater wouldn't be sucked back into my lungs. While, of course, keeping the camera steady."For a long time, scientists thought only people used tools, but ongoing research reveals that other animals do it too.Examples include chimpanzees sliding twigs into a termite mound to access juicy treats, bottlenose dolphins using sponges to dredge prey from the ocean floor, and bearded capuchin monkeys cracking nuts with rocks.Though there's no single definition for what constitutes tool use, Finn says the coconut-carrying is an example. That's because the octopuses are gathering and assembling coconut shells with the foresight that they may need them in the future.But others, such as marine biologist James Wood, are a bit more skeptical."My house isn't a tool for me—it's my house," says Wood, who runs The Cephalopod Page, a website focusing on the group of invertebrates that include octopuses, squid, and cuttlefish."But if I need a hammer or a screwdriver to put up drywall, that is a tool."Wood believes a tool is an object used by an animal to interact with and change their environment. (Watch a video of an octopus chasing another octopus.)"if you're going to say [the coconut-carrying octopus is] tool use, then anything that carries or uses another object for protection would then be using tools," he says. "You have to draw the line somewhere."But Jennifer Mather, a professor of psychology and neuroscience at the University of Lethbridge in Alberta, Canada, argues octopuses use tools. She's studied how octopuses shoot water jets to clear dens of sand and grit and stack rocks in front of the openings. (See "Journey of Octopus Discovery Reveals Them to Be Playful, Curious, Smart.")"It's clear that there is no single way of using tools," she says. "It's a fascinating behavior, but it's not a unitary behavior."Regardless of where a scientist stands on the tool question, it's indisputable that octopuses are "masters at manipulating and mimicking their environment," says Finn, the biologist who filmed the original coconut-carrying octopus. ("Watch: Stealthy Octopus Leaps From Water and Attacks Crab.")Unlike mollusks such as clams, octopuses don't have a hard shell to protect them from predators—so they need to be creative to survive. Some change colors to blend into their surroundings with remarkable accuracy, and many more shoot ink when threatened.As for the coconut-carrying behavior, it could be a way for an octopus to feel safe while it's out in the open, Wood adds.The octopus in the new video is seen walking exposed on the seafloor—not an ideal locale. Octopuses spend much of their life in lairs, which they dig under coral reefs or fashion in rocky outcroppings."They don't starve to death and they don't tend to die of diseases," says Wood the marine biologist. "They get eaten."Follow Matt McCall on Twitter.",
"It’s almost automatic—if you notice a smudge when you look in the mirror, you wipe it off. Seems simple, but only a few particularly clever species such as orangutans and dolphins share this ability with humans.But now, incredibly, new research suggests that the cleaner wrasse—a tiny, tropical reef fish—can recognize itself too, making it the first fish to do so.Scientists have long used a mirror test to evaluate whether an animal is capable of visual self-recognition—and potentially self-awareness. Self-awareness involves having a working knowledge of your own mental states, like thoughts and emotions, along with an understanding of how you physically appear; self-recognition, in contrast, is limited to knowing the latter. It’s unclear how much self-recognition implies self-awareness.By placing a dot or mark on a subject, and then placing the animal in front of a mirror, researchers can observe if the creature investigates the mark. Passing the test suggests an animal understands that the marred reflection is a representation of its own marked body, and not just another member of its species.Only those regarded as the brainiest non-human species on Earth have passed the mirror test: great apes, dolphins, elephants, and magpies. But the new research, first released online in BioRxiv and now published in PLOS Biology, raises the possibility that an advanced sense of self and self-awareness is far more widespread in the animal kingdom than scientists had thought.The research team, led by Masanori Kohda, a biologist at Osaka City University in Japan, had originally tried the mirror test on a different species of fish, a cichlid, one thought to be particularly smart.“Some social cichlids are so intelligent that they discriminate familiar members individually like primates—true individual recognition,” says Kohda.But the fish failed to recognize itself in the mirror.The team then turned to another candidate: the bluestreak cleaner wrasse (Labroides dimidiatus). These small fish, only about the length of a human finger, are found throughout the warm, shallow reefs of the Indo-Pacific. They get their name from their unique role: nibbling dead skin, mucus, and parasites off other fish.Cleaner wrasse already have a reputation as sophisticated thinkers among their finned brethren, manipulating their “clients” in various ways to maximize their nutrient intake, while also keeping other fish happy. The wrasses appear to keep track of hundreds of different animals and their relationships with each. These little creatures even indirectly boost the brainpower of other fish through their cleaning services by removing harmful, distracting parasites.A diver swims above a garden of stony corals on the Great Barrier Reef, which is more than 1,250 miles long. Climate change poses a multitude of threats to this international treasure.How would these intelligent fish fare on the mirror test?To find out, Kohda and his team put 10 wild-caught wrasses in individual tanks outfitted with a mirror. Many of the fish reacted aggressively towards their reflections at first (engaging in “mouth-fighting”), apparently seeing the reflection as another cleaner wrasse in their space.But eventually, this behavior gave way to something far more interesting. The fish began behaving strangely, approaching their reflections upside-down, or dashing towards the mirror quickly, only to stop right before touching it. At this phase, the researchers say, the cleaner wrasse were “contingency-testing”—directly interacting with their reflections, and perhaps just starting to understand that they were looking at themselves and not another wrasse.Once the fish were acquainted with the mirrors, the researchers injected a benign, brown gel under the skin of eight of them. Importantly, some of these injections were in places the wrasse couldn’t see without the aid of a mirror, such as on their throats. When the fish saw their reflections—and the spots on their skin—they appeared to attempt to scrape it off on surrounding surfaces, probably identifying the mark as a parasite.  The wrasses scraped their throats only in the presence of a mirror, and only when the mark they sported was colored. Fish injected with a clear mark didn’t scrape, and neither did those with a colored mark when no mirror was present. Only when the fish could see their mark in a mirror did they try to scrape it off, suggesting that they recognized their reflections as their own bodies.When Kohda saw this behavior, he was floored. Literally.“When I observed the scraping behavior of [the] marked throat in the video the first time, I was so surprised that I fell down from my chair,” he says.The wrasses also displayed their throat markings to the mirror before and after scraping, as if they were angling their bodies for a closer look and checking to see if they managed to remove the “parasite.”Redouan Bshary, a biologist at University of Neuchâtel in Switzerland who studies cleaner wrasse behavior and cognition, is impressed by the findings, and maintains that the movements the wrasses were making in front of the mirrors are wholly unique.“I never saw a cleaner [wrasse] swimming on its back, and I never saw a cleaner [wrasse] scratching its throat,” says Bshary, who wasn’t involved in the study. “These are new behaviors that are apparently tightly linked to the mirror.”Bshary also lauds the researchers for tracking the wrasses for such a long period of time, noting that he’s seen cleaner wrasses “mouth-fighting” with mirrors upon initial exposure, and that ending observations at that stage cuts the story short.But Gordon Gallup—an evolutionary psychologist at the State University of New York at Albany, and inventor of the mirror test—isn’t convinced. Gallup argues that the wrasse’s inherent preoccupation with ectoparasites on the bodies of other fish—a consequence of its cleaning lifestyle—may explain some of the behavior.“It should come as no surprise that they show longer viewing times to color marks that resemble ectoparasites on what appears to be another fish that can only be seen in a mirror,” says Gallup.Gallup adds that the strange posturing in front of the mirror may be how they’ve learned to manipulate what they think is another fish in the mirror so they can see the mark better.“Scraping the throat where the mark is may simply represent an attempt to call the attention of the other fish in the mirror to the presence of an apparent ectoparasite on its throat,” says Gallup.Kohda counters this alternative explanation of the behavior by noting that it doesn’t explain why the wrasse would check itself in the mirror after scraping its throat.“Only the hypothesis that cleaner fish recognize the mirror reflection as [their] own body will explain all of our results,” says Kohda.If cleaner wrasse have indeed passed the mirror test, does that make them self-aware? Well, possibly. However, it may also mean that the test itself doesn’t show us what we think it does.This is something Kohda and his colleagues readily admit as a possibility, and call for reinterpreting the mark test in the newest version of their work, in PLOS Biology. Cleaner wrasses may have passed the mark test as it's been defined in years past, but is the test as informative about self-awareness as we think it is, across a wide range of species?In the new publication, primate psychologist Francis de Waal similarly argues in a corresponding piece the the findings argue for a more nuanced view of mirror self-recognition where animals exist somewhere on a continuum of understanding their own reflections, rather than a binary, pass-fail system.For Michael Platt—a cognitive neuroscientist at the University of Pennsylvania not involved with this study—the research is “fascinating and well-executed.”Platt says that the study demonstrates that either many more animals have a sense of “self” than we’ve realized, or the mirror test has little to do with recognizing “self.” Instead, learning to use mirrors may just be a way of helping an animal define the boundaries of its own body.“It's impossible to know which of these two conclusions is correct, since nonhuman animals cannot provide self-report or otherwise discuss their experiences with us,” says Platt.And if the test really does reveal this abstract sense of self-awareness? It means that fish—and potentially many other animals with rarely considered internal lives—may have minds that are surprisingly similar to our own.",
"Karen and Beulah, two elephants with the Commerford Zoo, a Connecticut-based traveling animal facility, suffered for several years before their deaths in 2019, according to newly obtained records from the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA), the agency responsible for enforcing the Animal Welfare Act. The enforcement records show both elephants were forced to keep traveling and giving rides to children even when they were ill. Animals advocates say the reports reveal fundamental problems with how such businesses are regulated in the U.S.Founded in the 1970s by Bob Commerford, the Connecticut-based zoo travels throughout the Northeast with the elephants and other exotic animals, including camels, ringtail lemurs, a kangaroo, and a zebra.About 70 elephants are held in some of the 3,000 so-called roadside zoos around the U.S., according to Ben Williamson, the programs director at the nonprofit World Animal Protection U.S. These facilities have USDA licenses to exhibit animals, but none are accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums, which mandates higher welfare standards and humane care for 241 institutions across the country. “Poor treatment of [captive] elephants in general is fairly common,” Williamson says.Animals that travel for shows, such as the Commerford elephants, get some protection from the Animal Welfare Act. The act requires “adequate veterinary care” and humane transport but doesn’t specify that sick animals can’t be transported or used in events.Karen, a 38-year-old African elephant sold to the zoo in 1984, died of kidney disease in March 2019, USDA records show. She was documented to have suffered kidney trouble since 2017. Beulah, a more than 50-year-old Asian elephant who had been giving rides, providing photo opportunities, and performing with the zoo since 1973, collapsed and died from blood poisoning caused by a uterine infection at a fair in Massachusetts in September 2019. She had uterine infections and suspected tumors for 10 years before her death, according to the records.An anonymous complaint filed with the USDA asserts that the day she died, Beulah collapsed three times and each time was made to stand up. The zoo said she collapsed twice and no one forced her to get back up, according to the records. Shortly before she died, an attendee at the fair photographed Beulah lying down in a grassy section of the parking lot. The zoo said this was not unusual behavior for Beulah.The Commerford Zoo declined to comment. In a 2017 interview, zoo co-owner Tim Commerford told a local journalist, “I grew up with [the elephants] all my life. They’re family. The animal activists can say what they want about it, but they’re part of our family.” He said the elephants were in “perfect health” and were regularly checked by veterinarians.It’s “shocking” that Karen and Beulah were forced to work when they were sick, even though both the USDA and the Commerford Zoo were aware of their illnesses, says Courtney Fern, director of government relations and campaigns for the Nonhuman Rights Project (NhRP), a Florida-based animal rights organization that obtained the USDA records in June. Starting in 2017, the NhRP advocated in court, unsuccessfully, for the zoo to release Beulah, Karen, and its third elephant, 49-year-old Minnie, who’s still alive, to a sanctuary.At one of Karen’s last performances, Fern says, the elephant was bobbing her head and swaying—signs of distress—while children rode on her back. “Nothing was done to prevent [the elephants] from being taken to fairs and forced to engage in activities that are known to cause suffering,” she says.Oversight of roadside zoos is insufficient, says Christopher Berry, managing attorney at the Animal Legal Defense Fund, an animal advocacy group. The USDA is “asleep at the wheel in terms of regulating these facilities,” he asserts.The USDA not only has the authority to issue citations but also to suspend or revoke a zoo’s license to exhibit animals. The agency has cited the Commerford Zoo more than 50 times for Animal Welfare Act violations relating to its animals, including failing to have an attendant present during public contact with elephants, inadequate veterinary care, accumulated soiled hay, poor drainage in the elephant enclosure, and feces behind the elephant barn, according to the NhRP and animal rights group PETA. It has held 25 unannounced inspections since 2014, according to USDA spokesperson Andre Bell. “Inspectors tracked the health status of Beulah and Karen to ensure they were receiving adequate veterinary care,” he wrote in an email.In 2019, U.S. Senator Richard Blumenthal, a Democrat from Connecticut, wrote a letter to Sonny Perdue, then secretary of the USDA, demanding an explanation for why Beulah and Karen had died, if their deaths could have been prevented, and why the Commerford Zoo continued passing USDA inspections after “the premature deaths” of the elephants.“Licensees are required to be in compliance with the [Animal Welfare Act] in providing appropriate veterinary care for their animals,” Perdue responded in January 2020. “The Commerford Zoo provided documentation that Karen and Beulah were under veterinary care at the time of their deaths and that the care provided was appropriate.”Berry, of the Animal Legal Defense Fund, says that state and county government agencies sometimes do better at protecting elephants than the Animal Welfare Act because state anti-cruelty laws are often stronger. In 2017, for example, animal control inspectors in Lawrence County, Alabama, found an elephant named Nosey chained, standing in her own feces without adequate food and water during a show. The Orlando-based Great American Family Circus had been licensed by the USDA for several years, despite the fact that Nosey was performing while suffering from a skin condition, which made her prone to painful infections, and had a history of exposure to tuberculosis. After local officials intervened, the USDA eventually revoked the circus owner’s license, and Nosey later was transferred to an elephant sanctuary in Tennessee.Though the Animal Welfare Act requires adequate veterinary care, the guidelines are vaguely worded, and USDA inspectors often defer to the facility owners and veterinarians, Berry says. When a facility does violate the law, “there’s very little financial consequence,” he says. After multiple documented violations, the USDA may issue a warning or impose a small fine, usually ranging from between $2,000 and $15,000.“Typically [the USDA] only imposes very minor fines after years of egregious Animal Welfare Act violations,” he says. A zoo may make the calculation that it makes financial sense to wait until a fine is imposed and pay it, “rather than actually paying for the veterinary care, or paying for upgraded facilities, and so forth to adequately care for the animal.”“Laws are only as good as their enforcement,” Williamson says. A zoo with multiple USDA citations should expect to have its license revoked, but the agency rarely takes that step, he says.“It shouldn’t take a Netflix docuseries to get bad animal actors’ licenses revoked,” he says, referring to the cases of Tiger King stars Jeff Lowe and Tim Stark, both of whom lost their licenses only after the show highlighted animal welfare concerns and advocates pushed for action.Willamson supports the Animal Welfare Enforcement Improvement Act, recently introduced into Congress, which would require unannounced inspections before licenses are renewed and prevent licenses from being renewed if a facility has more than one documented instance of noncompliance.The circumstances under which the USDA considers revoking an exhibitor’s license are “part of the deliberative process” and are therefore confidential, agency spokesman Bell wrote. “In general, [the agency] looks at the gravity of any violations that have taken place, a facility’s compliance history, the size of the business, and the facility’s good faith efforts to comply.” Bell declined to comment on whether the agency has considered revoking the Commerford Zoo’s license.Minnie, the Commerford Zoo’s last surviving elephant, has been “languishing” alone since 2019, and her last public appearance was in July of that year, NhRP’s Fern says. Based on NhRP drone footage of the two elephant barns and the outdoor enclosure at the zoo’s Connecticut headquarters, Fern says, she believes Minnie spends most of her time indoors in a concrete stall. In previous statements, the zoo has described a “six-acre yard” where Minnie can spend her retirement.It’s unclear why she isn’t appearing at shows, but Fern says that it could be because of public backlash against the use of performing elephants, especially after the deaths of Beulah and Karen. Minnie also has a history of injuring her handlers; she’s attacked zoo employees on at least four different occasions, according to press accounts collected by the animal rights group PETA.The state of Minnie’s health is also unclear. Last summer, the family of Minnie’s former owners, Earl and Elizabeth Hammond, launched a GoFundMe for $2.4 million on behalf of the Commerford Zoo to raise funds for her food and general care. “COVID-19 has impoverished the farm that supports her,” the page reads, and Minnie “has been directly affected.” So far, the campaign has raised just $2,348.The USDA doesn’t have the authority to seize Minnie simply because the zoo is suffering financially, Bell said. “The confiscation authority under the [Animal Welfare Act] is limited to animals that are in an unrelieved state of suffering. At this time, Minnie is not in a state of suffering,” he wrote.That’s not how Fern sees it. “The more we learn about her situation, the more apparent the urgency for getting her to sanctuary is,” she says. The NhRP has offered to arrange and pay for Minnie’s move to a sanctuary, but, Fern says, their offers have been ignored.“Minnie deserves freedom … Her entire life, they’ve exploited her for profit,” she says. “If they truly care about her like they claim they do, they should send her to a sanctuary where she can live as freely as possible with other elephants for however long she has left to live.”Wildlife Watch is an investigative reporting project between National Geographic Society and National Geographic Partners focusing on wildlife crime and exploitation. Read more Wildlife Watch stories here, and learn more about National Geographic Society’s nonprofit mission at natgeo.com/impact. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to NGP.WildlifeWatch@natgeo.com.",
"Three out of four new or emerging infectious diseases in people come from animals, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. Some say this makes stopping the spread of tuberculosis among captive elephants more urgent then ever.Shortly after an emaciated captive elephant named Hattie performed with Circus Vargas, in Southern California, she died in a trailer going to an exotic animal farm in Illinois. Her cause of death, on August 6, 1996, was tuberculosis. Testing revealed that another elephant in Hattie’s circus group also was infected.In the mid-1990s, after the deaths of several high-profile captive elephants in the United States, veterinarians became aware that the animals had the human strain of tuberculosis (TB). Since then, more than 60 captive elephants—some of which have since died—have been confirmed with the disease, says Susan Mikota, co-founder of Elephant Care International, a U.S.-based nonprofit that provides elephant health-care support. Last year, one elephant was diagnosed with TB at Point Defiance Zoo, in Washington State, and another at Oregon Zoo, in Portland. Today, an estimated 5 to 6 percent of the nearly 400 elephants in U.S. zoos, sanctuaries, and circuses are infected with TB.In 1996, days after her last circus performance, Hattie died of tuberculosis. After the deaths of several high-profile captive elephants in the United States in the mid-1990s, veterinarians became aware that the animals could transmit the human strain of TB.The United States Department of Agriculture (USDA), which enforces the Animal Welfare Act, does not mandate TB testing.Three out of four new or emerging infectious diseases in humans come from animals, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC). This makes it important to stop the spread of tuberculosis among captive elephants, says Fleur Dawes, communications director for In Defense of Animals, an animal welfare organization that has campaigned to end the keeping of elephants in captivity.There are multiple strains of TB—a bacterial infection that spreads through the air and can be transmitted by humans through coughs or sneezes. Infected elephants are thought to spread TB when they spray liquid or air out of their trunks, although no study has confirmed this. Elephants can contract both the human and bovine strains. For both humans and elephants, treatment is a months-long drug regimen.Because elephants can get the disease from humans, they can transmit it back to us. In fact, 11 of 22 elephant handlers at the Illinois exotic animal farm where Hattie was being transported had positive reactions to a TB skin test in 1996—the first known cases of elephant-to-human TB transmission in the U.S.Adam Langer, branch chief of surveillance, epidemiology, and outbreak investigations for the CDC, says TB bacteria can stay in the air for several hours, depending on the environment. Exposure risk depends on factors such as the concentration of bacteria in the air, how long the person was exposed, the size of the room, and the ventilation system. While prolonged contact is more likely to cause infection, “it is possible to become infected after a short exposure,” Langer says.Because elephants are so massive and “have particularly large lungs…they can expel a relatively large number of bacteria into the surrounding air,” Langer says. “Therefore, sharing air space with an elephant with TB can pose a higher risk of becoming infected than the same exposure to a person.” People most at risk are those who spend “considerable amounts of time in an indoor environment with an elephant with infectious TB.” Experts say the danger of transmission to zoo- and circus-goers is low.Although COVID-19 preoccupies us today, 1.5 million people died of tuberculosis globally in 2018, according to the World Health Organization. That makes it the leading infectious cause of death. (As of September 3, there have been nearly 860,000 reported deaths worldwide due to COVID-19.)The risk of tuberculosis transmission has been “ignored for far too long,” Dawes says. “Unfortunately, I think it takes something like this pandemic to really put the potential risks into focus.”Packy, at Oregon Zoo, in Portland, gets his morning bath. He was euthanized in February 2017 after he developed a drug-resistant strain of TB.More than two decades after those first cases of elephants infecting people with TB, transmission is still occurring. Last year at Point Defiance Zoo, in Washington State, eight staffers tested positive for a latent, or inactive, form of tuberculosis. They likely contracted the disease from the zoo’s two elephants, Hanako and Suki, who tested positive two months later. In February, Hanako (who also had cancer in her left front foot and advanced joint disease) was euthanized. Suki, elderly at 55, is still alive, but the zoo announced last November that she wouldn’t be treated because the medication could weaken her immune system.Just as testing humans for COVID-19 has been fraught with difficulties, testing animals as large as elephants for TB is also challenging. Opinions differ over the best methods to use.Ascertaining whether humans have TB involves taking blood tests and chest x-rays, but it’s impossible to image the lungs of an elephant that may weigh more than 10,000 pounds. “We don’t have x-rays that are strong enough to take pictures of their lungs,” says Michele Miller, the research chair in animal tuberculosis at Stellenbosch University, in South Africa.Because TB can lie undetected in elephants (and people), it’s possible that apparently healthy animals are infected without anyone knowing, Miller says.To test elephants, veterinarians have two options: A blood test reveals tuberculosis antibodies but doesn’t necessarily confirm the presence of active disease—instead, it can signal that an elephant had the infection in the past or has latent TB. The other method is a trunk-wash test, which isolates the organism that causes the disease and requires squirting saline solution into the elephant’s trunk, then collecting and analyzing the exhaled liquid for the TB bacterium.Neither test is perfect, and each can produce false positive or negative results.The stakes are high when an elephant is infected. Veterinarians take the Hippocratic oath and are sworn to protect human health as well as animal health, so euthanasia may be recommended as a last resort because of the risk an infected elephant may pose to its human caretakers, says Kay Backues, director of animal health at Tulsa Zoo, in Oklahoma.Treating an elephant for TB is not only costly—up to $60,000—but also may cause serious side effects, such as liver damage and loss of appetite. Moreover, if the test is a false positive, Miller says, “you put that animal through treatment that it didn’t need to have.”In 2013 at Oregon Zoo, in Portland, a routine trunk-wash sample collected from a 29-year-old bull Asian elephant named Rama tested positive for tuberculosis, even though the elephant hadn’t shown any signs of illness.Captive elephants regularly have blood drawn, and when a preserved sample of Rama’s blood from May 2012 was analyzed, TB antibodies were found—about a year before his positive trunk-wash test. Two other elephants at the zoo—Rama’s father, Packy, and his brother, Tusko—also had antibodies in their blood. Tusko, it turned out, may have had antibodies as early as 2005.Packy was later euthanized because he’d developed a drug-resistant strain of TB (as were Rama and Tusko, but for reasons unrelated to TB). In May 2017, four years after Rama’s initial diagnosis, a trunk-wash sample from a female elephant named Shine was positive for TB. The zoo announced that she would receive treatment. Then, in September 2019, they reported that they would begin treating another infected elephant, Chendra, right after she suffered a miscarriage. (The zoo noted that the TB and miscarriage were unrelated.) None of the elephants had appeared sick.Seven Oregon Zoo staffers and a volunteer also tested positive for a latent tuberculosis infection. The staffers, who were offered treatment, had been in the elephants’ barn or within 15 feet of the animals weekly at least during the previous year; the volunteer, however, had spent only one hour in the elephants’ barn throughout the year. (The volunteer had received treatment by the time news of the outbreak was released.)Had the zoo relied more heavily on testing the elephants’ blood, Mikota wonders, “would those have maybe been diagnosed earlier?”Oregon Zoo veterinarian Kelly Flaminio says that may have been the case “if the screening tests that were available in 2012 and 2013 were as effective as the ones we have now.” Early detection of TB in elephants is improving, she says, but “it is still incredibly difficult to definitively diagnose.”What happened at Oregon Zoo shows why it makes sense to use both available tests, says Michele Miller, who co-authored a study on the 2013 Oregon Zoo case. “When you go to the doctor, and you’re not feeling well, they’re going to run a battery of tests,” she says. “The information you get back from a panel of different tests is going to give you a more complete picture of the health of the animal or the person than just one test.”But testing captive elephants in the U.S. for tuberculosis hasn’t been required since 2015. That’s when the USDA withdrew its policy mandating TB testing as part of standard veterinary care for elephants.Since then, it’s been left to individual facilities and veterinarians to decide what testing should be done. State health officials regulate the movements of elephants across state lines, and they vary in their strictness and requirements when it comes to TB testing.Adam Langer, of the CDC, declined to comment on the USDA’s 2015 decision, adding that state and federal regulations “require facilities that house animals (including elephants) to take appropriate measures to protect workers and the public from any potential health or safety hazard posed by the animals in their care.” This requirement covers TB, he says.According to USDA spokesperson Andre Bell, the agency ended its testing requirement after the United States Animal Health Association, a national nonprofit animal health forum, of which the USDA is a member, “could not agree on an updated version” of the TB testing guidelines the USDA was using. Though many facilities still use the old guidelines, “they are just not required to do so or report the results,” he says. If an elephant is found to have the disease, the USDA has recommended that it not “travel or have public contact” until treatment has been completed.No one can explain how that Oregon Zoo volunteer got infected, says Tulsa Zoo’s Kay Backues, since tuberculosis “is transmitted by close, prolonged, aerosol contact.” Based on what’s known about tuberculosis in humans, watching an elephant from 20 feet away is extremely low-risk, Backues says—and so is walking alongside, or even riding, an elephant. “You get up on its back, you go around the little circle, and you go back—and in a big arena, or a great big expo center, I do not consider that an elephant TB exposure.” It’s not as if you’re standing in front of an elephant “having it blow air into your face.” (Most U.S. facilities have stopped offering elephant rides, but some circuses and unaccredited zoos continue to feature them.)To date, no documented case exists of TB transmission from a circus, zoo, or sanctuary elephant to patrons.But an incident at Taronga Zoo, in Sydney, Australia, serves as a cautionary tale about how easily and mysteriously TB can spread, Mikota says. In 2011, a chimpanzee in the zoo was diagnosed with tuberculosis, less than a year after a trunk-wash test showed that a zoo elephant was shedding TB. The chimps’ holding area was about 350 feet from the elephants’ enclosure. That’s “a lot farther than some elephants are from the public,” Mikota says.“Visiting the zoo or visiting the circus is not a TB risk,” Backues insists.Mikota acknowledges that there haven’t yet been any known transmissions of TB from captive elephants to members of the public. But because transmission is not well-understood or studied, she believes the possibility is a serious concern. She says only one small study on the Oregon Zoo transmission has been conducted—“hardly enough evidence to say that transmission of TB from elephants to humans is only an occupational health concern versus a public health concern.”“Absence of evidence is not evidence of absence … [Elephants] can blow out their trunk—wind can take it.”",
"Two tigers are pictured at Greater Wynnewood Exotic Animal Park in September 2018. In August 2020, U.S. Department of Agriculture inspectors documented poor care of tigers, wolves, bears, and other animals at the facility and suspended owner Jeff Lowe’s license to exhibit animals to the public.Editor's Note: On May 20, 2021, the U.S. Department of Justice announced that it has seized all 68 big cats and one jaguar from Jeff and Lauren Lowe’s Tiger King Park. The big cats include protected tigers, lions, tiger-lion hybrids.Jeff Lowe, owner of Greater Wynnewood Exotic Animal Park, in Oklahoma, posted a photo of lion cub Nala to Instagram in August 2019. “How many likes can our little cutie Nala get?” the caption said.She got 199.Ten months after Lowe introduced Nala on social media, U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) inspector Bonnie Boone found her lying in mud, “lethargic, depressed and thin.” Boone and colleague Debbie Cunningham were conducting a routine inspection of the zoo, which exploded in popularity after it was featured in Netflix’s Tiger King. The young lion was barely moving and had discharge coming from her eyes and nose, Boone wrote in the inspection report. Her breathing was shallow and rapid. Boone demanded that Nala see a veterinarian immediately.Boone and Cunningham also documented two arthritic wolves caged on a concrete floor, a grizzly bear with her bones clearly visible beneath her skin, a fisher cat with a lame leg, and the bodies of two tigers buried under a pile of burned rubble. The corpses were attracting biting flies that inflicted bloody wounds on the ears of nearby tigers, bears, and wolves.On August 17, the USDA suspended Lowe’s license to exhibit animals to the public, as part of an official enforcement action against him and his wife, Lauren Lowe, for allegedly violating the Animal Welfare Act.Animal welfare advocates praised the action. “In terms of tiger exploitation, Lowe is one of the top players,” says Delcianna Winders, director of the Animal Law Litigation Clinic, at Lewis & Clark Law School, in Portland, Oregon. “He’s one of the leading reasons we’re continuing to have tigers bred” for roadside zoos around the U.S. (Read more: Captive tigers in the U.S. outnumber those in the wild—here’s why it’s a problem.)Lowe, right, points to Nala, a one-year-old lion, as she’s taken to see a veterinarian during a U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) inspection of the Greater Wynnewood zoo on June 22. Inspectors wrote in their report that Nala was “lethargic, depressed, and thin” and “would not get up out of the mud...even after prompting.”Nala was found with flystrike on her ear, a condition caused when fly eggs laid on an animal’s body hatch into flesh-eating maggots. Inspectors documented finding flystrike on several animals at the zoo on June 22, and linked the flies to a decaying tiger corpse on the property.Jeff Lowe declined to comment on the USDA’s suspension of his license, saying by email, “We’re suing the USDA so we can’t share anything at this time.” He has told his 189,000 Facebook followers that the findings are false and that the welfare concerns are drama stirred up, in his words, by “loony” animal rights people.The USDA “has folded to the pressures from PETA and continue to make false accusations against me,” he wrote in an August 18 Facebook post. Lowe describes the USDA’s accusations as “a litany of falsehoods.”In response to the suspension, which was set to last for 21 days, Lowe announced in the post that he was forfeiting his license. Typically, this would mean the end of his business—there’s little point in keeping animals that don’t return a profit on their upkeep costs. But Lowe says he has a new plan. It’s one that legal experts and even the USDA say might be in violation of the law: He’ll continue to make money off his animals by showing them to the public—but the business will be online and on television instead of in person at his zoo.After closing Greater Wynnewood Exotic Animal Park to the public, on October 5, Lowe moved all the animals to a new facility, Tiger King Park, in Thackerville, Oklahoma. (The Greater Wynnewood property had already been set to be relinquished to Big Cat Rescue, a sanctuary organization based in Florida, as the result of a separate court case in June tied to its former owner, Joseph Maldonado-Passage.) Lowe said he intends to use Tiger King Park as a private film set for “Tiger King-related content.” He’s promised two upcoming reality shows and continues to feature animals in paid “shout-out” videos on the social platform Cameo.With this move, Winders says, Lowe challenges the USDA to follow him down an uncharted path. Exhibiting wild animals for money without a license is illegal under the Animal Welfare Act, whether it’s done at a brick-and-mortar zoo, on television, or on the internet. But when it comes to the internet, there’s little legal precedent for enforcing the law.As content featuring captive exotic animals on social platforms such as TikTok, Cameo, and YouTube becomes more popular than ever, the USDA now must decide whether to exert its authority over profit-driven online animal exhibitions or risk setting a troubling precedent, Winders says.“If the USDA allows commercialization to go unchecked online, it could incentivize the creation of a whole new industry of people monetizing animals [on social media] without any oversight,” she says. It would be “terrifyingly easy” for any social media star to get wild animals “without any expertise whatsoever” and start sharing them with an audience, she says. “Given that conditions are often so bad at facilities when there already is a layer of oversight, I’m very worried about what that could mean for animals.”Tiger King debuted on Netflix in March right as the U.S. shut down—a pop-culture escape from mounting COVID-19 anxiety. More entertainment than documentary, critics charged, the show glossed over the animal suffering rampant in roadside zoos. The show sparked endless memes; its stars—Lowe, Joseph Maldonado Passage (“Joe Exotic”), and others—rocketed to fame. Even as the pandemic spread among humans and it became clear that big cats could catch it, fans flocked to Greater Wynnewood Exotic Animal Park to pet tiger cubs.Lowe, Maldonado-Passage’s former business partner and owner of the zoo and its animals, took advantage of his newfound fame, launching a merchandise shop and hyping his soon-to-launch Tiger King Park. He began charging more than $100 per video on Cameo, a platform where fans can pay celebrities to film short, personalized videos.The USDA’s June inspection came as Tiger King was still featuring heavily in the zeitgeist. Inspectors Boone and Cunningham found that the attending veterinarian—by whom monthly checks of the animals are required under the Animal Welfare Act—had visited the property only twice since early 2019 and that neither visit entailed veterinary checks of all the animals. The inspectors documented sick and injured animals, including Nala, the arthritic wolves, an underweight bear, and several unsafe enclosures, including one lemur cage that had rusted metal.After the inspectors told Lowe to remedy the problems, they returned in July and saw that little had improved and that the veterinarian still hadn’t been brought in. There was also something new: They reported smelling “the odor of decaying flesh,” which they traced to a not-operational refrigerated truck that was full of spoiling meat. No refrigeration was available on the property for food for the carnivores.Furthermore, 34 out of approximately 200 animals were missing, “with no disposition papers to document where they have gone,” the report says. Andre Bell, a USDA spokesperson, confirms that the inspectors asked where the animals had gone, but he declined to provide further details.When the USDA suspended Lowe’s license, on August 17, they issued an enforcement action alleging that he and Lauren Lowe had willfully and repeatedly violated the Animal Welfare Act since 2015. It cited a litany of violations, including failure to provide proper care for animals, failure to safely exhibit animals to the public, falsifying veterinary records, harassing a Nevada animal care official on social media, and more. On Facebook, Lowe denied these claims.A tiger cub is pictured at G.W. Zoo in September 2018. Cub petting, which was a popular activity at the zoo, relies on a constant supply of cubs young enough to handle safely. To have cubs available for visitors, roadside zoos often speed-breed tigers, lions, and tiger-lion hybrids, which, critics says, are separated too early from their mothers.He still owns more than 150 animals, including dozens of big cats, kangaroos, porcupines, and ring-tailed lemurs. Oklahoma is one of four states in the U.S. that allows residents to keep big cats without a permit.The USDA did not confiscate any animals during the June or July inspections. Bell says that the animals “did not meet the criteria in the regulations for confiscation.” Those criteria, however, state that inspectors may confiscate animals that are suffering as a result of an exhibitor’s failure to comply with the Animal Welfare Act. Winders argues that that threshold was certainly met here. “We’ve seen this over and over where it’s an egregious situation, and [the USDA] doesn’t exercise their confiscation authority and animals languish.” Bell did not respond to a request for comment about this by publication time.If Lowe follows through on using the new Tiger King Park as a film set, he would likely be in violation of the Animal Welfare Act.“Film or television work is considered regulated activity and requires an exhibitor license,” Bell says. “Mr. Lowe may keep his animals, but he cannot conduct regulated activity…[including] filming the animals for display to the public for compensation.”Lowe has said on Facebook that he’s in negotiations for season two of Tiger King. (Netflix did not respond to National Geographic’s multiple requests for comment.) He told People in June that he’s also signed with the Content Group, a California production company, for a separate reality show that will feature his animals, life at the new zoo, and “ongoing battles with animal rights groups.” The Content Group did not respond to multiple requests for comment.Lowe’s social media activities also could get him into trouble. He and other exotic animal owners with online followings regularly share videos of themselves swimming with, play-wrestling with, and bottle-feeding big cats. While it’s legal to post such content online, creators who set out to make a profit through sponsorships and advertising would cross the line.Lowe has produced at least two paid Cameo videos for customers featuring a white tiger named Thor since he lost his license on August 18.There’s a long history of people thinking the law doesn’t apply on the internet, says Nathalie Maréchal, a senior policy analyst at Ranking Digital Rights, a nonprofit that advocates for free expression and privacy on the internet.The 1996 Declaration of the Independence of Cyberspace is a widely distributed early document on the applicability of government on the growing internet. Written by John Perry Barlow, founder of the Electronic Frontier Foundation, a nonprofit digital rights group, it says, “Governments of the Industrial World, you weary giants of flesh and steel, I come from Cyberspace, the new home of Mind. You are not welcome among us. You have no sovereignty where we gather.”“That was the genesis of the idea that law doesn’t touch you in cyberspace. But it was never actually true,” Maréchal says. Still, “it did take some time for governments and societies to translate and update the laws of the physical world to apply to the internet world.”That catch-up period has had consequences for animals. In the 1990s, when pet breeders started selling animals on the internet, the USDA chose not to regulate the activity. That led to a boom in unchecked online sales—pets were sold and shipped to customers across the country sight unseen, with no licensing or inspections required for facilities.A 2013 USDA inspector general report called this a “loophole,” estimating that there were between 8,000 and 15,000 online dog breeders. Later that year, the USDA updated its regulations to say that online dealers without physical storefronts were also subject to the Animal Welfare Act.One of the concerns about Lowe relinquishing his license is that it makes it much harder to know how the animals are, says Brittany Peet, deputy general counsel of captive animal law enforcement at the PETA Foundation. “At least when he was open to the public, there was some level of oversight,” she says. Not only was the public able to see the animals routinely and document any concerns, but the USDA was able to do unannounced inspections. Now the USDA would need a warrant to inspect his property and animals.“A warrant can’t be obtained without evidence that animals are in distress,” Winders says. And without public access to the animals, it would be very difficult to obtain evidence in the first place.The USDA’s open enforcement action against Jeff and Lauren Lowe seeks, among other things, to ban Lauren from getting an exhibitor license. A judge will determine whether they should face penalties, which could include banning Lowe from obtaining a license in the future and fines of up to $11,883 per violation per animal.Despite any plans Lowe has to continue making money from online animal videos and proposed television shows, which would be illegal, the fact remains that since August, he hasn’t been permitted to sell cub-petting experiences to zoo visitors.“That was the big moneymaker,” Winders says. “Cub petting is the reason we have as many tigers as we do in captivity in the U.S.” The activity relies on a constant supply of cubs young enough to handle safely. “That’s why we have this breeding mill situation. Once you cut off that incentive to continuously have babies, you’re putting a significant cap on the breeding and influx of animals.”But for Nala, the young lion the USDA inspectors found unresponsive in the mud, there is hope. On September 21, she and two other lion cubs, Amelia and Leo, were moved to the Wild Animal Sanctuary, in Keenesburg, Colorado, as the result of a separate court case centered on the previous illegal transfer of these animals.Peet, the PETA Foundation lawyer, was with the cubs on their journey to the Wild Animal Sanctuary in September. “Nala is so lame she can barely walk,” Peet said after the transfer. “And Leo has an obsessive suckling behavior, which very sadly sometimes happens in cats who have been prematurely separated from their mothers. He latches onto and suckles on his sister’s ears as if they were his mother’s nipples.”Lions Nala and Leo rest in a holding area on September 21 after arriving at The Wild Animal Sanctuary in Colorado from Lowe’s Greater Wynnewood Exotic Animal Park. A veterinarian examined Nala after she arrived and found that she had multiple fractures, vitamin deficiencies, and bone malformations. The young lions are receiving medical treatment and will soon have acres to roam in their new home.A subsequent veterinary examination at Colorado State University found that Nala had multiple fractures, bone malformations, vitamin deficiencies, and “historical poor husbandry.” Pat Craig, the founder and executive director of the Wild Animal Sanctuary, says that although her prognosis is poor, she’s doing well, and her walking is already improving.On October 4, when Lowe missed the court-mandated deadline to have the animals removed from the Greater Wynnewood zoo, he also relinquished 11 wolves, two bears (found underweight by the USDA inspectors in June), and three more tigers to the Wild Animal Sanctuary. The bears will live in a 240-acre habitat, the tigers in a 45- to 75- acre habitat, and the wolves in 35 acres among several groups. Craig recently flew a drone over Tiger King Park and noted that the “entire facility would fit inside one habitat that we’d give to two or three animals.”Lowe’s legal troubles are set to continue. In addition to the open USDA case, the PETA Foundation has filed a notice of intent to sue him for violating the Endangered Species Act. The case is similar to a successful action the foundation brought against Tim Stark, another roadside zoo owner featured in Tiger King, that ended with him losing all 182 of his animals and being banned from owning big cats again. The complaint against Lowe alleges that, among other violations, he prematurely separated big cats from their mothers.Meanwhile, bipartisan lawmakers, various animal welfare organizations, the American Association of Zoos and Aquariums, and others have called for a federal law to regulate big cat ownership. The Big Cat Public Safety Act, under consideration in the U.S. House of Representatives, aims to prohibit commercial breeding, public handling, and ownership of big cats as pets.",
"A federal judge has ordered that Greater Wynnewood Zoo (G.W. Zoo)—a notorious roadside attraction in Oklahoma made famous by the Netflix series Tiger King—be relinquished to Carole Baskin’s Big Cat Rescue.A federal judge has ordered that Joe Exotic’s former Greater Wynnewood Zoo (G.W. Zoo)—a notorious roadside attraction in Oklahoma made famous by the Netflix series Tiger King—be relinquished to Carole Baskin’s Big Cat Rescue to settle a legal dispute between the animal parks.Jeff Lowe, the current owner of G.W. Zoo, must vacate the 54-acre property within 120 days, under the order by Judge Scott L. Palk, United States District Judge for the Western District of Oklahoma. But the judgment doesn’t apply to the roughly 200 animals in the facility, more than half of them tigers and other big cats. Under state and federal law, the animals are considered Lowe’s property and don’t convey.G.W. Zoo is not a member of the Association of Zoos and Aquariums, which accredits highly regarded zoos, aquariums, and animal parks in North America.Lowe has almost 200,000 followers across Instagram and TikTok. Since the airing of Tiger King, he has become one of the most recognized faces in the U.S. big cat tourism business. He claims to be building a new facility for G.W. Zoo’s animals in Thackerville, Oklahoma, about 65 miles south of the Wynnewood property and near the Texas-Oklahoma border.The judge’s decision comes seven years after Joe Exotic—whose legal name is Joseph Maldonado-Passage—was ordered to pay Florida-based Big Cat Rescue more than $1 million dollars for intellectual property theft. Big Cat Rescue is accredited by the Global Federation of Animal Sanctuaries. As part of a long-running dispute with Baskin—who had been critical of how animals were treated at G.W. Zoo—he had changed his company’s name to Big Cat Rescue Entertainment and used branding that closely resembled that of Baskin’s organization.In 2011, Big Cat Rescue sued Maldonado-Passage and two years later won the court judgment. To avoid payment, yesterday’s ruling states, Maldonado fraudulently transferred his property to his mother, who subsequently transferred it to shell corporations “with the design and intent of removing [G.W. Zoo] property from the reach of Big Cat Rescue, so that it could not be used to satisfy Big Cat Rescue’s judgments.” The court assessed the annual leasehold value of the zoo property at $50,000. The transfer of the property is the first significant move toward satisfying the judgment.The refusal to pay Big Cat Rescue in the seven years since the court order and the fraudulent measures Maldonado-Passage and associates undertook to avoid it don’t surprise Delcianna Winders, director of the Animal Law Litigation Clinic at Lewis & Clark Law School, in Portland, Oregon. The clinic is the nation’s only institution focused exclusively on animal law litigation.“If I didn’t already know these guys and the ways they defy court orders and other legal orders, I would be stunned, but this is business as usual,” Winders says. The disregard for the law on the part of roadside big cat zoo owners is long-standing, she says, pointing out that Maldonado-Passage has been cited more than 200 times for violating the Animal Welfare Act, which regulates the treatment of exhibited animals. Inspectors repeatedly documented sick, injured, mistreated animals and unclean, unsafe enclosures contaminated by vermin. Maldonado-Passage was required to pay a single $25,000 fine, in 2006. Lowe has been cited by the USDA three times since 2017, with no consequences, Winders says.Breaking the law repeatedly without repercussions has made these zoo owners “more brazen,” she says. Now, increasingly, we’re seeing harsh judgments “with these bad actors in the big cat world who are engaged in shenanigans and totally disregard court orders.” Maldonado-Passage is serving 22 years in prison for plotting to have Baskin murdered, killing five tigers, and selling tigers illegally across state lines.On February 27, 2020, a federal court order ruled that Dade City Wild Things, a roadside zoo in Florida, had illegally transferred at least 19 tigers to G.W. Zoo to avoid court-mandated inspection of the animals. The ruling prohibited the owners from ever owning tigers again. Dade City Wild Things has since shut down.Lowe declined to comment to National Geographic today. But his attorney, Walter Mosley, signaled that the animals at G.W. Zoo will be transferred to a new facility. "We anticipated Carole Baskin getting the title to the former park that once belonged to Joe Exotic, and we did not challenge her attempts to do so,” he told CNN. “All of Jeff's focus is on opening the new Tiger King Park in Thackerville, which should be opening in the next 120 days."Lowe has promoted the construction of a new animal park for years, and he recently began calling the project Tiger King Park, presumably to take advantage of the noteriety surrounding the Netflix series, Winders says. But first, the USDA must license Tiger King Park and approve the transfer of cats there. “I would hope that they would be very careful in conducting inspection of that site,” Winders says. She notes that to be licensed, a facility should in theory provide evidence that it has a veterinarian on site and be able to show that its animal cages are suitable.Since the beginning of May, when G.W. Zoo reopened to the public after about a month when it was closed because of the coronavirus, it has experienced a surge of visitors, in no small part because of the Tiger King series. The zoo offers cub petting to dozens of visitors a day, without requiring any protective measures, despite the fact that big cats in the U.S. have tested positive for the virus.The zoo has long come under criticism from animal welfare advocates and zoo professionals who say it exploits tigers from birth to death and fails to provide adequate food, enclosures, and veterinary care. National Geographic revealed in December that many such private roadside zoos speed-breed their tigers. As soon as a litter is born, the cubs are removed from the mother, inducing her to go into heat sooner than normal, which ensures a constant supply of cubs. Cubs are available for petting between the ages of eight weeks and 12 weeks; after that, they’re too dangerous to interact with visitors and may then be kept for breeding or exhibition. There’s evidence that some are killed.In a statement provided to National Geographic, Big Cat Rescue says that “if the need arises to make other plans to place the animals in new homes, Big Cat Rescue and the animal welfare organizations that have previously successfully placed big cats from large facilities in new homes stand ready to assist.”Bobbi Brink, owner of Lions, Tigers, and Bears—an accredited big cat sanctuary in San Diego, California—says, “I wish the animals could have been part of the judgment, but unfortunately the laws don’t work like that. They work in the favor of the owner, because [the animals] are property.” She says that if Lowe were to give up the animals, Lions, Tigers, and Bears could transfer each of the 200 animals to accredited sanctuaries.If Tiger King Park isn’t up and running in 120 days, Brink fears that Lowe could send the animals to other unaccredited roadside zoos, “to get them to where he wants them to be rather than to proper homes.”Winders says that despite the uncertain future for the animals, the court’s ruling is positive. “It’s one more instance of a court saying to these bad actors you can’t just disregard the law, and it gets us one step closer to this major player being put out of business.”",
"Oklahoma's Greater Wynnewood Exotic Animal Park, formerly owned by Joe Exotic, has reopened to visitors and resumed its "cub-petting" activities. The move comes after five tigers tested positive for COVID-19 in New York, raising concerns among experts that repeated handling by visitors puts cubs at heightened risk of contracting the virus.After a month’s hiatus, tiger cub petting at Joe Exotic’s former zoo is back—exposing cubs to not only the stress of hours of handling by humans, but also to the risk of contracting the coronavirus.Oklahoma’s Greater Wynnewood Exotic Animal Park, which was closed for about a month because of the state’s pandemic restrictions, was featured in the hit Netflix series Tiger King. The facility has come under fire from animal welfare advocates and zoo professionals who say it exploits tigers from birth to death and failing to provide adequate food, enclosures, and veterinary care. Nonetheless, crowds turned out on the weekend of May 2nd to play with tiger cubs and visit the zoo’s menagerie of other wild animals.“It was packed. Super busy,” says Daniela Toledo Vargas, who visited with her husband on Saturday afternoon—the day the park resumed cub petting. She’d watched Tiger King and decided to book one of the tiger-petting experiences, which were in high demand. For $60 per person, visitors can buy six minutes of private time with two baby tigers. “I got there at 2, and we had to wait until 6:20.” There were two baby tigers in a room, she says. One refused to engage with them, and the other got a bit fussy at one point. “[The keeper] told me they’d been doing it since 9 a.m.,” she says. “She told me it was the same tigers...the whole time.”Cub petting is already rife with significant welfare problems, pandemic or no. National Geographic revealed in December that many of these private facilities speed-breed their tigers so there’s a constant supply of cubs. As soon as a litter is born, the cubs are removed from the mother, making her go into heat sooner so she can breed again. Cubs are economically useful only for a short time—between the ages of eight weeks and 12 weeks—because they quickly get too dangerous to interact with visitors. They may become breeders themselves, or go on exhibit—and there’s evidence that some are killed.(The zoo’s former owner, Joe Maldonado-Passage, known as Joe Exotic, is serving 22 years in prison for plotting to have a critic murdered, killing five tigers, and illegally selling tigers across state lines. The zoo is now owned by Jeff Lowe, a former partner of Maldonado-Passage’s.)But now The Oklahoma zoo’s resumption of cub petting amid a pandemic raises new alarm bells for the big cats: Tigers are susceptible to COVID-19. In April, five tigers and four lions at the Bronx Zoo in New York tested positive for the coronavirus. They are believed to have contracted it from an asymptomatic zoo worker. Now, at Greater Wynnewood, hundreds of people are petting cubs and feeding tigers every day, putting the animals at risk of exposure to the virus.Tiger and "liger" cubs sit on grass at Myrtle Beach Safari in April 2019. The facility, also featured in Tiger King alongside Greater Wynnewood Exotic Animal Park, recently reopened to visitors as well. Visitors are often unaware of the breeding practices necessary to maintain a constant supply of cubs—or what happens to many captive tigers when they become too big to interact with the public and can’t be used for breeding or display as adults.“In the best of circumstances, [cub petting] is a questionable, unsupportable practice,” says Dan Ashe, president of the Association of Zoos & Aquariums (AZA), an accrediting body that does not count Greater Wynnewood among its members. “Given what we know about the risk of COVID-19 transmission between humans and felines, I think it’s reckless.”It’s unclear how many people came in contact with the baby tigers on Saturday. Park representatives did not respond to emails and messages for comment before publication; however, Lowe, the zoo’s owner, responded to National Geographic by email after the story published to say, “We aren’t doing cub encounters at this time.” He declined to provide further details.Toledo Vargas says she saw several groups entering the enclosure during her visit, including a family with six kids that went in after she did. She says she also watched a larger, semi-private experience in which a keeper brought a cub around to a group of 25 people, who each petted it. The risk isn’t just to the tigers— public health experts warn that having multiple people in close proximity poses a risk for human to human virus transmission, and infection rates continue to climb in the U.S..Toledo Vargas and several other visitors that had cub-petting experiences on Saturday, Sunday, and Monday, told National Geographic that no special coronavirus-related protective measures were taken before they entered the cub enclosure. The staff she saw didn’t wear masks, nor did they ask visitors to wear gloves or masks.“They didn’t take any precautions,” says Toledo Vargas. “They didn’t tell us anything about coronavirus.”Unaccredited, roadside cub-petting facilities rarely have veterinarians on staff, Ashe says. Unlike at the AZA-accredited Bronx Zoo, where veterinarians took immediate action to test the big cats and keep them under close observation, Ashe says that if a cat were to contract the virus at a less reputable facility, “it would be unlikely that they would diagnose it, and I would question...even if they did notice it, what would they do about it.”On April 29, in response to the reopening of another cub-petting facility featured in Tiger King, Myrtle Beach Safari in South Carolina, the PETA Foundation filed an emergency petition with the U.S. Department of Agriculture, the agency in charge of enforcing the Animal Welfare Act, calling for a temporary ban on cub petting and direct contact with big cats during the pandemic.Ashe says the AZA supports the petition. “You don’t normally see us aligned” with PETA, he says, “but extreme times make for strange bedfellows.”The USDA has not responded to the petition, PETA spokesperson David Perle says.The crowds at Greater Wynnewood over the weekend suggest that Tiger King’s viral popularity translated into actual visits, confirming animal experts’ concerns that the series would fuel demand for cub-petting experiences. Critics say the series glossed over the significant welfare issues in the roadside zoo cub-petting industry. “The salaciousness of the show and the lack of real attention to the abysmal care of animals…was a real disservice,” Ashe says. (Read more about key points that Tiger King overlooked.)“I did watch Tiger King, and that’s why I went,” Toledo Vargas says. “But I did feel really, really bad for the tigers.” In addition to the cubs having to deal with constant visitors, she says the enclosures were much smaller than she expected after watching the show. Visitors could also pay $5 to feed bigger tigers, “and the food they would provide were animal crackers. And all you saw in the cages were animal crackers just…there. Like they didn’t want them anymore. So that also made me feel bad,” she says.She says she was surprised at just how many animals were there, many housed four or five in a cage. “I was just kind of like, why do you need that many animals, you know?”",
"These lions roam Colorado's Wild Animal Sanctuary, which is home mostly to large carnivores rescued from illegal or inhumane captivity.The high plains of eastern Colorado would seem an unlikely place to hear the roar of African lions, the growls of Kodiak bears, or the snarling of Bengal tigers. But a refuge in the small town of Keenesburg has brought together one of the largest and most unusual collections of wild predators anywhere in the country, possibly the world.Stretching across 720 acres 30 miles northeast of Denver, the privately run Wild Animal Sanctuary hosts a staggering menagerie of wildlife—nearly 400 animals, most of them large carnivores rescued from illegal or inhumane captivity. There are black bears and grizzlies, African lions and American bobcats, Siberian lynxes and South American jaguars.They’ve been freed from shopping malls, taxidermy shops, and amusement parks. They’ve been confiscated from filthy backyard pens and fly-by-night circuses, even seized from the homes of convicted drug dealers. They’ve been drugged, beaten, left to lie in their own excrement in tiny cages.Bears are among the nearly 400 animals in the sanctuary, which was founded in 1980.By virtue of their size, voracious appetites, and predatory instincts, many had simply outgrown their owners’ ability to care for them. Several had reached the point of despair and self-mutilation. Some faced imminent euthanasia.Whatever their species and individual histories, all of these unfortunate creatures point to a growing and largely hidden crisis: the plight of tens of thousands of wild animals held in captivity, often in appalling conditions, around the United States and the world.The animals lucky enough to reach the sanctuary have been granted a new lease on life. They’re rehabilitated and, when possible, integrated into social groups. They’re free to roam the grasslands in large-acreage enclosures and to shelter from extremes of heat and cold in pre-excavated dens that extend 40 feet underground. It’s not exactly living in the wild, but almost.“Nothing is better than the wild for these animals,” says Theresa Kempf, who looks after the sanctuary’s 26 wolves and 10 foxes. “Hopefully this is a close second.”The animals, such as this panther, have plenty of space in large, open-air enclosures and shelter from extremes of heat and cold in pre-excavated dens.Cooped up in cages all their lives, most of these creatures had never trodden on actual earth before arriving here. One of the great perks for Kempf is to see the animals’ transformation as they acclimate to their new surroundings. “To see them get excited about life, getting excited about food, and excited to run around and play,” she said, “is a pretty neat thing to watch.”The 150,00 to 200,00 visitors who come here each year get to watch the animals from a mile-long elevated walkway that winds through the sanctuary. Another half mile of boardwalk is under construction. The walkway not only provides guests with an excellent vantage point but also reduces the stress that territorial-minded animals experience in many zoos, where legions of strangers stare at them at eye level on what they perceive to be the very edge of their turf.It’s an innovation that sanctuary founder and executive director Pat Craig credits to trial and error. “I noticed that when I was working up on my roof, the animals didn’t notice me, even when I was operating loud power tools,” says Craig, who sees himself as a pioneer in animal psychology and the care of captive wildlife. “The animals will disconnect once you’re higher than 10 feet.”Perhaps the biggest innovation has been Craig’s uncanny eye for assimilating animals into cohabiting groups. He’s integrated lions into prides, wolves into packs. The process can take months, but even lone predators like tigers are successfully placed in family groups at the sanctuary.“Solitary animals in the wild are solitary because they compete for food,” he says. “Here they can live freely in big open spaces, be happy, and live together.” It’s an idea that flew in the face of common wisdom. “Circus and Hollywood trainers thought I was nuts,” Craig says. “They told me, ‘You’re going to get yourself killed.’”Animals are rehabilitated and, when possible, integrated into social groups.Learning how to deal with large predators came at a price. Craig ended up in the hospital with bite and claw wounds more than 30 times in his first 15 years of working with the predators. “They were afraid,” he explains. “They were definitely hurting me, but they weren’t trying to kill me.”Craig founded the refuge in 1980 on his family’s 15-acre farm after visiting a friend who was working in a small zoo in North Carolina. He noticed a number of “surplus animals”—tigers, bears, and lions that were going to be euthanized because the zoo had no place to keep them. He thought that maybe he could do something about it. “The big predators were getting the short end of the stick,” Craig says. “No one wanted them. They were dangerous and expensive to feed.”Back in Colorado, Craig got his small refuge certified by federal and state officials. He outfitted the back of his pickup truck and set out to save animals from around the country. “I had no idea what I was doing,” he says, smiling ruefully at the memory of those early days of trial and error. “There was no information available on how to transport these animals.”Craig soon realized the scope of the problem was far bigger than he’d imagined. He was getting calls from zoo staff in just about every state in the union who were anxious to find a decent home for their overflow of wild animals. “Pretty soon it became an all-engulfing mission. Round the clock.”The 150,000 to 200,000 people who visit the sanctuary each year watch the animals from a mile-long elevated walkway.As his menagerie grew, he saw the need for more land to achieve his dream of giving the animals something that approximated a natural life in the wild. In 1994, he and his wife purchased 160 acres on the plains northeast of Denver and have been buying up adjacent farmland ever since.It wasn’t until 2002 that the sanctuary began admitting visitors, for strictly educational purposes. The top priority remains the well-being of the animals, not the amusement of humans. “You’re not here for entertainment,” says Craig, “but to learn about this crisis, to get upset and do something about it.”Thirty states allow some form of private ownership of exotic pets, and nine require no licensing whatsoever for private citizens to own wild predators. Part of Craig's mission is to change the laws to make it much harder to own and breed wild animals.What began as Craig’s one-man undertaking has since grown into a major operation—with 45 staff members, 160 volunteers, and an annual operating budget of nearly $13 million. Half comes from cash contributions, the rest from in-kind donations, mostly food and building materials, like fencing, concrete, and lumber.The retail giant Walmart provides two to three million dollars’ worth of food a year that would otherwise go to waste. A local trucking company pitches in to haul the fare from 37 superstores along Colorado’s Front Range to the sanctuary’s Carnivore Nutrition Center. Inside the refrigerated warehouse, volunteers sort produce, meat, and fish into nutritious bundles for the animals. It’s no small task when you’re serving dinner for a household of 110 black bears, 43 grizzlies, 73 lions, 55 tigers, and 26 wolves, among others.Walmart donates food that would otherwise go to waste.Every one of the animals has a name. Staffers and volunteers know them all—and know their individual stories. “That’s Yuma,” said outreach director Kent Drotar, pointing toward a thickly maned lion just as it let out a thunderous roar. “He’s saying, ‘I’m here; this is my territory.’ He came here from a circus in Mexico in 2008.” Another male responded with a roar of his own from a separate enclosure a hundred yards away. “And that’s Ike. The male’s main job is to protect his pride, to keep other lions away.”More and more, the animals are arriving from abroad: brown bears from Spain, a white tiger from Mexico, cougars from Argentina. Twenty-five circus lions arrived from Bolivia in 2011 aboard a DC-10 cargo plane. The animals were eventually divided into four prides. The enormous canopy-type structure hastily erected to accommodate them is now used as an intake center for animals in the initial stages of rehabilitation.“These animals have won the lottery,” says Drotar. He accelerates his ATV up a dirt path beside an enclosure of grizzlies. One of the bears, named Natasha, is particularly fond of chasing the vehicle. She outraces us from her side of the double fence (the fences are also electrified, since bears are good climbers.) Her speed is astonishing.“But this isn’t the wild,” Drotar says, the smile disappearing from his face. “They’re not hunting for their food, looking for a mate, or raising their young.”He peers through the fencing at Natasha as she rears up on her hind legs. She’s a towering hulk.“That’s the great crime of captive-born wildlife,” he says. “They can never be the wild animals they were supposed to be.”Read more stories about wildlife crime and exploitation on Wildlife Watch. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to ngwildlife@natgeo.com.",
"Elephants always count as star attractions in any zoo or wildlife park lucky enough to have them. But while many visitors may thrill to see such majestic creatures in the flesh, some scientists have raised concerns about how well animals so sociable and intelligent would fare in even the best of zoo environments.Now, a new study suggests that some of these concerns might be warranted. Ros Clubb from the RSPCA, together with colleagues from various universities and the Zoological Society of London, studied the health of zoo elephants with a census of mammoth proportions.Concentrating on females, she surveyed 786  captive elephants, representing about half the total zoo population. She compared them to about 3,000 individuals who either live wild in protected Amboseli National Park in Kenya or who are employed by the Burmese logging industry.The survey revealed incredible differences in the life spans between the captive and wild creatures. On average, African elephants in Amboseli live for about 56 years, while those born in zoos lasted a mere 17 years. Even wild elephants that were killed by humans managed a good 36 years of life. These grim statistics were due to adult females dying much earlier – the death rates among Infant and juvenile individuals were the same in both wild and captive populations.For Asian elephants, the picture was similar. Those that worked in natural environments for the Burmese logging industry lived longer, averaging a lifespan of 42 years, compared to a figure of just 19 of their zoo-born peers. In their case, infant deaths accounted for much of the difference made a massive difference and the death rate was twice as high among newborns at the zoo than in those in Burma.Clubb thinks that the low infant survival among zoo-born Asian elephants is due to very early events in their lives, possibly even before they leave their mothers’ wombs. Indeed, even elephants that are captured from the wild (usually at the age of 3-4 years) have higher life expectancies than those born to captivity.Things have certainly improved. Clubb found that in recent years, the lifespan of zoo elephants had increased, but their odds of dying early were still about 3 times higher than those of their wild cousins. And the poor infant death rates for Asian elephants hadn’t improved. Asian elephants are also sensitive to being shuttled around between zoos, particularly if calves are separated from mothers, and such transfers can affect their health up to four years later.Clubb points the finger at stress and obesity as the main factors behind the earlier demise of zoo elephants. The problems highlighted in this survey back up a large amount of anecdotal evidence. In 2002, the RSPCA conducted a review of European zoo elephants, which found worrying rates of herpes, tuberculosis, lameness and infertility and of adults killing calves. And zookeepers are well aware that, unlike many other animals, elephants cannot be kept in captivity with enough success to create self-sustaining populations – new individuals need to be brought in from elsewhere.If this new study is to be believed (and it will undoubtedly provoke strong responses from zoos), the biggest remaining question is whether the benefits to keeping elephants in zoos, in terms of both education and conservation, are large enough to justify the costs that such homes could exert on their health? It would also be interesting to see a deeper study looking at the extent to which the quality of a zoo affect an elephant’s lifespan. Put simply, there are zoos and then there are zoos.Reference: Science 10.1126/science.1164298Subscribe to the feed",
"It’s almost automatic—if you notice a smudge when you look in the mirror, you wipe it off. Seems simple, but only a few particularly clever species such as orangutans and dolphins share this ability with humans.But now, incredibly, new research suggests that the cleaner wrasse—a tiny, tropical reef fish—can recognize itself too, making it the first fish to do so.Scientists have long used a mirror test to evaluate whether an animal is capable of visual self-recognition—and potentially self-awareness. Self-awareness involves having a working knowledge of your own mental states, like thoughts and emotions, along with an understanding of how you physically appear; self-recognition, in contrast, is limited to knowing the latter. It’s unclear how much self-recognition implies self-awareness.By placing a dot or mark on a subject, and then placing the animal in front of a mirror, researchers can observe if the creature investigates the mark. Passing the test suggests an animal understands that the marred reflection is a representation of its own marked body, and not just another member of its species.Only those regarded as the brainiest non-human species on Earth have passed the mirror test: great apes, dolphins, elephants, and magpies. But the new research, first released online in BioRxiv and now published in PLOS Biology, raises the possibility that an advanced sense of self and self-awareness is far more widespread in the animal kingdom than scientists had thought.The research team, led by Masanori Kohda, a biologist at Osaka City University in Japan, had originally tried the mirror test on a different species of fish, a cichlid, one thought to be particularly smart.“Some social cichlids are so intelligent that they discriminate familiar members individually like primates—true individual recognition,” says Kohda.But the fish failed to recognize itself in the mirror.The team then turned to another candidate: the bluestreak cleaner wrasse (Labroides dimidiatus). These small fish, only about the length of a human finger, are found throughout the warm, shallow reefs of the Indo-Pacific. They get their name from their unique role: nibbling dead skin, mucus, and parasites off other fish.Cleaner wrasse already have a reputation as sophisticated thinkers among their finned brethren, manipulating their “clients” in various ways to maximize their nutrient intake, while also keeping other fish happy. The wrasses appear to keep track of hundreds of different animals and their relationships with each. These little creatures even indirectly boost the brainpower of other fish through their cleaning services by removing harmful, distracting parasites.A diver swims above a garden of stony corals on the Great Barrier Reef, which is more than 1,250 miles long. Climate change poses a multitude of threats to this international treasure.How would these intelligent fish fare on the mirror test?To find out, Kohda and his team put 10 wild-caught wrasses in individual tanks outfitted with a mirror. Many of the fish reacted aggressively towards their reflections at first (engaging in “mouth-fighting”), apparently seeing the reflection as another cleaner wrasse in their space.But eventually, this behavior gave way to something far more interesting. The fish began behaving strangely, approaching their reflections upside-down, or dashing towards the mirror quickly, only to stop right before touching it. At this phase, the researchers say, the cleaner wrasse were “contingency-testing”—directly interacting with their reflections, and perhaps just starting to understand that they were looking at themselves and not another wrasse.Once the fish were acquainted with the mirrors, the researchers injected a benign, brown gel under the skin of eight of them. Importantly, some of these injections were in places the wrasse couldn’t see without the aid of a mirror, such as on their throats. When the fish saw their reflections—and the spots on their skin—they appeared to attempt to scrape it off on surrounding surfaces, probably identifying the mark as a parasite.  The wrasses scraped their throats only in the presence of a mirror, and only when the mark they sported was colored. Fish injected with a clear mark didn’t scrape, and neither did those with a colored mark when no mirror was present. Only when the fish could see their mark in a mirror did they try to scrape it off, suggesting that they recognized their reflections as their own bodies.When Kohda saw this behavior, he was floored. Literally.“When I observed the scraping behavior of [the] marked throat in the video the first time, I was so surprised that I fell down from my chair,” he says.The wrasses also displayed their throat markings to the mirror before and after scraping, as if they were angling their bodies for a closer look and checking to see if they managed to remove the “parasite.”Redouan Bshary, a biologist at University of Neuchâtel in Switzerland who studies cleaner wrasse behavior and cognition, is impressed by the findings, and maintains that the movements the wrasses were making in front of the mirrors are wholly unique.“I never saw a cleaner [wrasse] swimming on its back, and I never saw a cleaner [wrasse] scratching its throat,” says Bshary, who wasn’t involved in the study. “These are new behaviors that are apparently tightly linked to the mirror.”Bshary also lauds the researchers for tracking the wrasses for such a long period of time, noting that he’s seen cleaner wrasses “mouth-fighting” with mirrors upon initial exposure, and that ending observations at that stage cuts the story short.But Gordon Gallup—an evolutionary psychologist at the State University of New York at Albany, and inventor of the mirror test—isn’t convinced. Gallup argues that the wrasse’s inherent preoccupation with ectoparasites on the bodies of other fish—a consequence of its cleaning lifestyle—may explain some of the behavior.“It should come as no surprise that they show longer viewing times to color marks that resemble ectoparasites on what appears to be another fish that can only be seen in a mirror,” says Gallup.Gallup adds that the strange posturing in front of the mirror may be how they’ve learned to manipulate what they think is another fish in the mirror so they can see the mark better.“Scraping the throat where the mark is may simply represent an attempt to call the attention of the other fish in the mirror to the presence of an apparent ectoparasite on its throat,” says Gallup.Kohda counters this alternative explanation of the behavior by noting that it doesn’t explain why the wrasse would check itself in the mirror after scraping its throat.“Only the hypothesis that cleaner fish recognize the mirror reflection as [their] own body will explain all of our results,” says Kohda.If cleaner wrasse have indeed passed the mirror test, does that make them self-aware? Well, possibly. However, it may also mean that the test itself doesn’t show us what we think it does.This is something Kohda and his colleagues readily admit as a possibility, and call for reinterpreting the mark test in the newest version of their work, in PLOS Biology. Cleaner wrasses may have passed the mark test as it's been defined in years past, but is the test as informative about self-awareness as we think it is, across a wide range of species?In the new publication, primate psychologist Francis de Waal similarly argues in a corresponding piece the the findings argue for a more nuanced view of mirror self-recognition where animals exist somewhere on a continuum of understanding their own reflections, rather than a binary, pass-fail system.For Michael Platt—a cognitive neuroscientist at the University of Pennsylvania not involved with this study—the research is “fascinating and well-executed.”Platt says that the study demonstrates that either many more animals have a sense of “self” than we’ve realized, or the mirror test has little to do with recognizing “self.” Instead, learning to use mirrors may just be a way of helping an animal define the boundaries of its own body.“It's impossible to know which of these two conclusions is correct, since nonhuman animals cannot provide self-report or otherwise discuss their experiences with us,” says Platt.And if the test really does reveal this abstract sense of self-awareness? It means that fish—and potentially many other animals with rarely considered internal lives—may have minds that are surprisingly similar to our own.",
"Carving through equatorial East Africa, the Albertine Rift supports some of the greatest biodiversity on the planet. This colossal network of mountains, valleys, wetlands, and savannah comprises just over one percent of the African continent’s landmass, yet claims more than half of its birds, 40 percent of its mammals, and some 500 species of plant and animal found nowhere else.In the northern sector of this geologic wonder, a craggy escarpment rolls down to a grassy plain, flanked by Lake Albert on the border between Uganda and the Democratic Republic of the Congo, and Murchison Falls National Park, one of Africa’s natural treasures. There, on that sweeping expanse, and partly inside the park, two oil giants are making final preparations to tap into the vast reserves of crude that lie below the rift.The discovery in 2006 of the largest onshore deposit in sub-Saharan Africa transformed this impoverished country into one of the most sought-after and contentious oil frontiers. The Ugandan government has lent its support in hopes that the Tilenga and Kingfisher projects, as the neighboring oilfields are known, will also transform the fortunes of its populace. More than half of Ugandans live in poverty and almost a third are unemployed. The project holds the possibility of 6,000 new jobs, mostly for Ugandans.In 2019, as the scale of the oil development project took shape, the government made a paradoxical move: It adopted a groundbreaking environmental law that could protect the fragile habitat in which the oil project is centered. The law formally recognizes the rights of nature in the same ways that human rights are recognized and allows nature to be named as an injured party in litigation over “any infringement” of those rights.By treating forests, lakes, and other ecosystems as living beings and enshrining nature’s right “to exist, persist, maintain, and regenerate,” Uganda joined a growing global movement to recognize the value of the natural world as an equal party rather than a resource to be exploited—and became the first African nation to do so.At least 14 countries have passed measures protecting rights of nature since 2008, when Ecuador added rights-based protections to its constitution. The natural places have “rights” to sue; guardianship bodies are appointed in these nations to serve as the ecosystem’s human face during consultations and court hearings.“This is a dramatic new framework that gives nature a voice,” says Grant Wilson, executive director of the Earth Law Center, a Colorado-based environmental group. “It is a new DNA for the legal system.”Some countries have granted personhood to unique and venerated places, including Colombia’s Atrato River and New Zealand’s Whanganui River, worshipped by the Indigenous Maori people. In Australia this spring, the local council in Blue Mountains, a town close to Sydney, became that country’s first to embed the rights-of-nature concept into its operations. And in May, a rights-of-nature lawsuit was filed in Orange County, Florida, on behalf of several waterways under the county’s “rights of nature” law that voters approved last November. The suit argues that multiple streams and wetlands are at risk for destruction by a proposed 1,900-acre housing development.Philippe Sands, a barrister and law professor at University College London who specializes in human rights and environmental issues, sees the movement as a “broader change of consciousness.” Rights-of-nature laws, he says, “are expressions of a recognition that we cannot always place ourselves at the center of everything.”The oil fields are being developed on the ancestral lands of the Bagungu people, a farming and fishing community in western Uganda’s rural Buliisa district on the shores of Lake Albert. Multiple sacred natural sites are scattered across the region and the community has watched the building of the oil project with growing unease.In April, Ugandan and Tanzanian government officials signed final agreements with the French oil multinational TotalEnergies and a Beijing-based giant called the China National Offshore Oil Corporation (CNOOC) to extract about 1.7 billion barrels from a 425-square-mile drilling zone that extends partially inside the national park and below a UNESCO wetland. The oil will then be pumped 900 miles through the world’s longest heated pipeline to the Indian Ocean port city of Tanga, in Tanzania. The pipeline crosses critical wildlife habitats; the port is surrounded by mangroves and coral reefs. International observers estimate the project will displace thousands of farmers. The first oil export is planned for 2025.From the top of the rift overlooking Lake Albert, large trucks can be seen below churning up dust clouds along a new, Chinese-built highway that cuts across pristine grassland. Steamrollers flatten its surface as baboons emerge from the bush to observe the heavy-duty hubbub unfolding along the lake’s eastern shore toward the national park’s oilfields. Access roads and oil wells are already being installed in the extraction zone around the one-story, mud-brick home of Alon Kiiza, an 88-year-old Bagungu elder in the sleepy town of Buliisa.“Drilling for oil will disturb the ecosystem,” he says. “The spirit of the land does not connect well with these machines.”Buliisa’s oil boom has also triggered an influx of migrant workers, intensifying pressures on the landscape as demand for timber, fuelwood, and water soars.Local political leaders, drawn in early by the promise of jobs, are alarmed. “We need development. People are poor,” says Kubalirwa Nkuba, the district council chairman. “But we don’t want a situation where there will be oil and the environment destroyed. When the oil is over, what then?”While rights of nature laws appear cutting edge, they are rooted in ancient, Indigenous thought. The world’s 370 million Indigenous peoples account for 5 percent of the global population, yet live on lands that shelter 80 percent of the planet’s biodiversity. For millennia, they have preserved habitats by understanding how, when and where to hunt, farm, and fish without depleting ecosystems, even as their intricate practices were dismissed as “pagan” or “primitive” by a colonized and rapidly industrializing world.Activists say they can draw a direct line from the disappearance of traditional belief systems and the loss of habitat and biodiversity—and to protect the environment successfully, those marginalized Indigenous voices must be restored. In other words, human rights and nature’s rights go hand in hand; one cannot be realized without the other, says Margret Kagole, a Uganda elder from the minority Bagungu group. “Our laws can preserve these lands.”In Africa, the effort to rehabilitate Indigenous practices has been under way for more than 40 years, when heads of state in 1981 adopted the African Charter, an international pact intended to decolonize the continent’s institutions and promote human rights.Since then, commissions created by the charter have focused on restoring the status of Indigenous peoples, emphasizing the role that their pre-colonial governance systems played in protecting biodiversity.“It is possible for people to revive traditions and reconnect with nature, which is vital in the context of climate change,” says Liz Hosken, director of the Gaia Foundation, which supported the campaign to encourage Uganda’s government to enact the rights-of-nature law. “But they’ve been so demonized it’s taking time for them to believe in their history again.”Dennis Tabaro, a Ugandan environmentalist collaborating with Hosken in Buliisa, the main settlement by the Tilenga oil project, has been working to coax a “lost generation” of Indigenous elders out of the shadows to play a more influential role in shaping environmental protections. In an example of that, the district council last December passed an ordinance recognizing the Bagungu's traditional laws and their right to protect sites of natural and spiritual significance. The ruling also creates a watchdog run by officials and Indigenous elders to oversee the area’s conservation.Christina Voigt, an expert in international environmental law at the University of Oslo, says that rights-of-nature laws show “promising indications that they may raise the level of protection.” But she cautions, they are “one tool in a whole toolbox of legal approaches. One does not exclude the other.”And rights-of-nature legal action does not always win the day. In 2017, after an Indian court granted the legal status of personhood to the revered Ganges River and its main tributary, the Yamuna River, India’s Supreme Court reversed the order, saying it was legally unsustainable. In a similar case in 2020, after voters in Toledo, Ohio, approved a first-in-its-kind ballot measure to grant personhood to Lake Erie, a federal court struck it down as too vague.The Uganda rights-of-nature law contains a clause stating that the government may choose which natural places are to be protected by the law and which are not, creating a worrisome loophole. The government is writing regulations that will guide decision-making on protections; as development of the oil fields continues apace, activists worry that the regulations may come too late.A TotalEnergies spokesman, who the company did not wish to name, said the French oil firm had identified and mitigated the social and environmental risks in line with international standards, “to strictly limit the impact on local communities and, where possible, help to improve their quality of life,” including offering compensation to people who are displaced.“Total is fully aware of the potential impacts on local communities,” the spokesman said, adding that “stakeholders are informed and consulted at every step of the project implementation.” Activists dispute the degree of transparency.Uganda officials acknowledge the seeming inconsistencies in efforts to balance competing demands. “The rights-of-nature law reflects the seriousness with which the government regards nature and the lengths it will go to protect it,” says Naomi Karekaho, a spokeswoman for Uganda’s National Environment Management Authority. “This does not mean that there are no challenges. Nature definitely has its own rights. But so do people and so does development.”Reducing poverty, Karekaho adds, “is a bigger priority for us than mitigating climate change.”Ugandan lawyers believe their best chances lie in moderating, not halting, the project—and that citing the rights-of-nature law could help. “I’m a legal realist,” says Frank Tumusiime, whose environmental nonprofit, Advocates for Natural Resources & Development, helped create that law. “The Tilenga project is a fait accompli. We should focus on the mitigation plan.”In time, however, the real value of rights-of-nature laws may be less about the strength of their teeth in protecting the environment, and more about signaling a paradigm shift at this critical juncture for the planet.“The law is never the means alone to a greater end. It is reflective of change, and that’s what the Ugandan law is,” says Sands, the barrister. “The real change will only come when the next generation of adjudicators have grown up in a consciousness that really integrates a more ecocentric approach. And that will take time.”",
"I’ve come back to check on a baby. Just after dusk I’m in a car lumbering down a muddy road in the rain, past rows of shackled elephants, their trunks swaying. I was here five hours before, when the sun was high and hot and tourists were on elephants’ backs.Walking now, I can barely see the path in the glow of my phone’s flashlight. When the wooden fence post of the stall stops me short, I point my light down and follow a current of rainwater across the concrete floor until it washes up against three large, gray feet. A fourth foot hovers above the surface, tethered tightly by a short chain and choked by a ring of metal spikes. When the elephant tires and puts her foot down, the spikes press deeper into her ankle.Meena is four years and two months old, still a toddler as elephants go. Khammon Kongkhaw, her mahout, or caretaker, told me earlier that Meena wears the spiked chain because she tends to kick. Kongkhaw has been responsible for Meena here at Maetaman Elephant Adventure, near Chiang Mai, in northern Thailand, since she was 11 months old. He said he keeps her on the spiked shackle only during the day and takes it off at night. But it’s night now.I ask Jin Laoshen, the Maetaman staffer accompanying me on this nighttime visit, why her chain is still on. He says he doesn’t know.Photos of tourists with captive wild animals abound on social media platforms such as Instagram. With the tap of a finger, travelers post their images of exotic animals for the world to see. But often travelers and fans alike are unaware of what the animals’ lives are really like.Maetaman is one of many animal attractions in and around tourist-swarmed Chiang Mai. People spill out of tour buses and clamber onto the trunks of elephants that, at the prodding of their mahouts’ bullhooks (long poles with a sharp metal hook), hoist them in the air while cameras snap. Visitors thrust bananas toward elephants’ trunks. They watch as mahouts goad their elephants—some of the most intelligent animals on the planet—to throw darts or kick oversize soccer balls while music blares.Meena is one of Maetaman’s 10 show elephants. To be precise, she’s a painter. Twice a day, in front of throngs of chattering tourists, Kongkhaw puts a paintbrush in the tip of her trunk and presses a steel nail to her face to direct her brushstrokes as she drags primary colors across paper. Often he guides her to paint a wild elephant in the savanna. Her paintings are then sold to tourists.Meena’s life is set to follow the same trajectory as many of the roughly 3,800 captive elephants in Thailand and thousands more throughout Southeast Asia. She’ll perform in shows until she’s about 10. After that, she’ll become a riding elephant. Tourists will sit on a bench strapped to her back, and she’ll give several rides a day. When Meena is too old or sick to give rides—maybe at 55, maybe at 75—she’ll die. If she’s lucky, she’ll get a few years of retirement. She’ll spend most of her life on a chain in a stall.Wildlife attractions such as Maetaman lure people from around the world to be with animals like Meena, and they make up a lucrative segment of the booming global travel industry. Twice as many trips are being taken abroad as 15 years ago, a jump driven partly by Chinese tourists, who spend far more on international travel than any other nationality.Wildlife tourism isn’t new, but social media is setting the industry ablaze, turning encounters with exotic animals into photo-driven bucket-list toppers. Activities once publicized mostly in guidebooks now are shared instantly with multitudes of people by selfie-taking backpackers, tour-bus travelers, and social media “influencers” through a tap on their phone screens. Nearly all millennials (23- to 38-year-olds) use social media while traveling. Their selfies—of swims with dolphins, encounters with tigers, rides on elephants, and more—are viral advertising for attractions that tout up-close experiences with animals.For all the visibility social media provides, it doesn’t show what happens beyond the view of the camera lens. People who feel joy and exhilaration from getting close to wild animals usually are unaware that many of the animals at such attractions live a lot like Meena, or worse.Photographer Kirsten Luce and I set out to look behind the curtain of the thriving wildlife tourism industry, to see how animals at various attractions—including some that emphasize their humane care of animals—are treated once the selfie-taking crowds have gone.After leaving Maetaman, we take a five-minute car ride up a winding hill to a property announced by a wooden plaque as “Elephant EcoValley: where elephants are in good hands.” There are no elephant rides here. No paint shows or other performances. Visitors can stroll through an open-air museum and learn about Thailand’s national animal. They can make herbal treats for the elephants and paper from elephant dung. They can watch elephants in a grassy, tree-ringed field.EcoValley’s guest book is filled with praise from Australians, Danes, Americans—tourists who often shun elephant camps such as Maetaman because the rides and shows make them uneasy. Here, they can see unchained elephants and leave feeling good about supporting what they believe is an ethical establishment. What many don’t know is that EcoValley’s seemingly carefree elephants are brought here for the day from nearby Maetaman—and that the two attractions are actually a single business.Meena was brought here once, but she tried to run into the forest. Another young elephant, Mei, comes sometimes, but today she’s at Maetaman, playing the harmonica in the shows. When she’s not doing that, or spending the day at EcoValley, she’s chained near Meena in one of Maetaman’s elephant stalls.Meena Kalamapijit owns Maetaman as well as EcoValley, which she opened in November 2017 to cater to Westerners. She says her 56 elephants are well cared for and that giving rides and performing allow them to have necessary exercise. And, she says, Meena the elephant’s behavior has gotten better since her mahout started using the spiked chain.We sit with Kalamapijit on a balcony outside her office, and she explains that when Westerners, especially Americans, stopped coming to Maetaman, she eliminated one of the daily shows to allot time for visitors to watch elephants bathe in the river that runs through the camp.“Westerners enjoy bathing because it looks happy and natural,” she says. “But a Chinese tour agency called me and said, ‘Why are you cutting the show? Our customers love to see it, and they don’t care about bathing at all.’ ” Providing separate options is good for business, Kalamapijit says.Around the world Kirsten and I watched tourists watching captive animals. In Thailand we also saw American men bear-hug tigers in Chiang Mai and Chinese brides in wedding gowns ride young elephants in the aqua surf on the island of Phuket. We watched polar bears in wire muzzles ballroom dancing across the ice under a big top in Russia and teenage boys on the Amazon River snapping selfies with baby sloths.Most tourists who enjoy these encounters don’t know that the adult tigers may be declawed, drugged, or both. Or that there are always cubs for tourists to snuggle with because the cats are speed bred and the cubs are taken from their mothers just days after birth. Or that the elephants give rides and perform tricks without harming people only because they’ve been “broken” as babies and taught to fear the bullhook. Or that the Amazonian sloths taken illegally from the jungle often die within weeks of being put in captivity.A young elephant performs for an audience at Sriracha Tiger Zoo, in Chon Buri, Thailand. Elephants, highly intelligent mammals, are trained through fear with metal bullhooks to catch hoops, hold balloons, and balance on stools.As we traveled to performance pits and holding pens on three continents and in the Hawaiian Islands, asking questions about how animals are treated and getting answers that didn’t always add up, it became clear how methodically and systematically animal suffering is concealed.The wildlife tourism industry caters to people’s love of animals but often seeks to maximize profits by exploiting animals from birth to death. The industry’s economy depends largely on people believing that the animals they’re paying to watch or ride or feed are having fun too.It succeeds partly because tourists—in unfamiliar settings and eager to have a positive experience—typically don’t consider the possibility that they’re helping to hurt animals. Social media adds to the confusion: Oblivious endorsements from friends and trendsetters legitimize attractions before a traveler ever gets near an animal.There has been some recognition of social media’s role in the problem. In December 2017, after a National Geographic investigative report on harmful wildlife tourism in Amazonian Brazil and Peru, Instagram introduced a feature: Users who click or search one of dozens of hashtags, such as #slothselfie and #tigercubselfie, now get a pop-up warning that the content they’re viewing may be harmful to animals.Everyone finds Olga Barantseva on Instagram. “Photographer from Russia. Photographing dreams,” her bio reads. She meets clients for woodland photo shoots with captive wild animals just outside Moscow.For her 18th birthday, Sasha Belova treated herself to a session with Barantseva—and a pack of wolves. “It was my dream,” she says as she fidgets with her hair, which had been styled that morning. “Wolves are wild and dangerous.” The wolves are kept in small cages at a petting zoo when not participating in photo shoots.The Kravtsov family hired Barantseva to take their first professional family photos—all five family members, shivering and smiling in the birch forest, joined by a bear named Stepan.Barantseva has been photographing people and wild animals together for six years. She “woke up as a star,” she says, in 2015, when a couple of international media outlets found her online. Her audience has exploded to more than 80,000 followers worldwide. “I want to show harmony between people and animals,” she says.On a raw fall day, under a crown of golden birch leaves on a hill that overlooks a frigid lake, two-and-a-half-year-old Alexander Levin, dressed in a hooded bumblebee sweater, timidly holds Stepan’s paw.The bear’s owners, Yury and Svetlana Panteleenko, ply their star with food—tuna fish mixed with oatmeal—to get him to approach the boy. Snap: It looks like a tender friendship. The owners toss grapes to Stepan to get him to open his mouth wide. Snap: The bear looks as if he’s smiling.The Panteleenkos constantly move Stepan, adjusting his paws, feeding him, and positioning Alexander as Barantseva, pink-haired, bundled in jeans and a parka, captures each moment. Snap: A photo goes to her Instagram feed. A boy and a bear in golden Russian woods—a picture straight out of a fairy tale. It’s a contemporary twist on a long-standing Russian tradition of exploiting bears for entertainment.Another day in the same forest, Kirsten and I join 12 young women who have nearly identical Instagram accounts replete with dreamy photos of models caressing owls and wolves and foxes. Armed with fancy cameras but as yet modest numbers of followers, they all want the audience Barantseva has. Each has paid the Panteleenkos $760 to take identical shots of models with the ultimate prize: a bear in the woods.Stepan is 26 years old, elderly for a brown bear, and can hardly walk. The Panteleenkos say they bought him from a small zoo when he was three months old. They say the bear’s work—a constant stream of photo shoots and movies—provides money to keep him fed.A video on Svetlana Panteleenko’s Instagram account proclaims: “Love along with some great food can make anyone a teddy :-)”And just like that, social media takes a single instance of local animal tourism and broadcasts it to the world.When the documentary film Blackfish was released in 2013, it drew a swift and decisive reaction from the American public. Through the story of Tilikum, a distressed killer whale at SeaWorld in Orlando, Florida, the film detailed the miserable life orcas can face in captivity. Hundreds of thousands of outraged viewers signed petitions. Companies with partnership deals, such as Southwest Airlines, severed ties with SeaWorld. Attendance at SeaWorld’s water parks slipped; its stock nose-dived.James Regan says what he saw in Blackfish upset him. Regan, honeymooning in Hawaii with his wife, Katie, is from England, where the country’s last marine mammal park closed permanently in 1993. I meet him at Dolphin Quest Oahu, an upscale swim-with-dolphins business on the grounds of the beachfront Kahala Hotel & Resort, just east of Honolulu. The Regans paid $225 each to swim for 30 minutes in a small group with a bottlenose dolphin. One of two Dolphin Quest locations in Hawaii, the facility houses six dolphins.Bottlenose dolphins are the backbone of an industry that spans the globe. Swim-with-dolphins operations rely on captive-bred and wild-caught dolphins that live—and interact with tourists—in pools. The popularity of these photo-friendly attractions reflects the disconnect around dolphin experiences: People in the West increasingly shun shows that feature animals performing tricks, but many see swimming with captive dolphins as a vacation rite of passage.Katie Regan has wanted to swim with dolphins since she was a child. Her husband laughs and says of Dolphin Quest, “They paint a lovely picture. When you’re in America, everyone is smiling.” But he appreciates that the facility is at their hotel, so they can watch the dolphins being fed and cared for. He brings up Blackfish again.Katie protests: “Stop making my dream a horrible thing!”Rae Stone, president of Dolphin Quest and a marine mammal veterinarian, says the company donates money to conservation projects and educates visitors about perils that marine mammals face in the wild. By paying for this entertainment, she says, visitors are helping captive dolphins’ wild cousins.Stone notes that Dolphin Quest is certified “humane” by American Humane, an animal welfare nonprofit. (The Walt Disney Company, National Geographic’s majority owner, offers dolphin encounters on some vacation excursions and at an attraction in Epcot, one of its Orlando parks. Disney says it follows the animal welfare standards of the Association of Zoos & Aquariums, a nonprofit that accredits more than 230 facilities worldwide.)It’s a vigorous debate: whether even places with high standards, veterinarians on staff, and features such as pools filled with filtered ocean water can be truly humane for marine mammals.Dolphin Quest’s Stone says yes.Critics, including the Humane Society of the United States, which does not endorse keeping dolphins in captivity, say no. They argue that these animals have evolved to swim great distances and live in complex social groups—conditions that can’t be replicated in the confines of a pool. This helps explain why the National Aquarium, in Baltimore, announced in 2016 that its dolphins will be retired to a seaside sanctuary by 2020.Some U.S. attractions breed their own dolphins because the nation has restricted dolphin catching in the wild since 1972. But elsewhere, dolphins are still being taken from the wild and turned into performers.In China, which has no national laws on captive-animal welfare, dolphinariums with wild-caught animals are a booming business: There are now 78 marine mammal parks, and 26 more are under construction.To have the once-in-a-lifetime chance to see rare Black Sea dolphins, people in the landlocked town of Kaluga, a hundred miles from Moscow, don’t have to leave their city. In the parking lot of the Torgoviy Kvartal shopping mall, next to a hardware store, is a white inflatable pop-up aquarium: the Moscow Traveling Dolphinarium. It looks like a children’s bouncy castle that’s been drained of its color.Inside the puffy dome, parents buy their kids dolphin-shaped trinkets: fuzzy dolls and Mylar balloons, paper dolphin hats, and drinks in plastic dolphin tumblers. Families take their seats around a small pool. The venue is so intimate that even the cheapest seats, at nine dollars apiece, are within splashing distance.“My kids are jumping for joy,” says a woman named Anya, motioning toward her two giddy boys, bouncing in their seats.In the middle of the jubilant atmosphere, in water that seems much too shallow and much too murky, two dolphins swim listlessly in circles.Russia is one of only a few countries (Indonesia is another) where traveling oceanariums exist. Dolphins and beluga whales, which need to be immersed in water to stay alive, are put in tubs on trucks and carted from city to city in a loop that usually ends when they die. These traveling shows are aboveboard: Russia has no laws that regulate how marine mammals should be treated in captivity.The shows are the domestic arm of a brisk Russian global trade in dolphins and small whales. Black Sea bottlenose dolphins can’t be caught legally without a permit, but Russian fishermen can catch belugas and orcas under legal quotas in the name of science and education. Some belugas are sold legally to aquariums around the country. Russia now allows only a dozen or so orcas to be caught each year for scientific and educational purposes, and since April 2018, the government has cracked down on exporting them. But government investigators believe that Russian orcas—which can sell for millions—are being caught illegally for export to China.Captive orcas, which can grow to 20 feet long and more than 10,000 pounds, are too big for the traveling shows that typically feature dolphins and belugas. When I contacted the owners of the Moscow Traveling Dolphinarium and another operation, the White Whale Show, in separate telephone calls to ask where their dolphins and belugas come from, both men, Sergey Kuznetsov and Oleg Belesikov, hung up on me.Russia’s dozen or so traveling oceanariums are touted as a way to bring native wild animals to people who might never see the ocean.“Who else if not us?” says Mikhail Olyoshin, a staffer at one traveling oceanarium. And on this day in Kaluga, as the dolphins perform tricks to American pop songs and lie on platforms for several minutes for photo ops, parents and children express the same sentiment: Imagine, dolphins, up close, in my hometown. The ocean on delivery.Owners and operators of wildlife tourism attractions, from high-end facilities such as Dolphin Quest in Hawaii to low-end monkey shows in Thailand, say their animals live longer in captivity than wild counterparts because they’re safe from predators and environmental hazards. Show operators proudly emphasize that the animals under their care are with them for life. They’re family.Alla Azovtseva, a longtime dolphin trainer in Russia, shakes her head.“I don’t see any sense in this work. My conscience bites me. I look at my animals and want to cry,” says Azovtseva, who drives a red van with dolphins airbrushed on the side. At the moment, she’s training pilot whales to perform tricks at Moscow’s Moskvarium, one of Europe’s largest aquariums (not connected to the traveling dolphin shows). On her day off, we meet at a café near Red Square.She says she fell in love with dolphins in the late 1980s when she read a book by John Lilly, the American neuroscientist who broke open our understanding of the animals’ intelligence. She has spent 30 years training marine mammals to do tricks. But along the way she’s grown heartsick from forcing highly intelligent, social creatures to live isolated, barren lives in small tanks.“I would compare the dolphin situation with making a physicist sweep the street,” she says. “When they’re not engaged in performance or training, they just hang in the water facing down. It’s the deepest depression.”What people don’t know about many aquarium shows in Russia, Azovtseva says, is that the animals often die soon after being put in captivity, especially those in traveling shows. And Azovtseva—making clear she’s referring to the industry at large in Russia and not the Moskvarium—says she knows many aquariums quietly and illegally replace their animals with new ones.It’s been illegal to catch Black Sea dolphins in the wild for entertainment purposes since 2003, but according to Azovtseva, aquarium owners who want to increase their dolphin numbers quickly and cheaply buy dolphins poached there. Because these dolphins are acquired illegally, they’re missing the microchips that captive cetaceans in Russia are usually tagged with as a form of required identification.Some aquariums get around that, she says, by cutting out dead dolphins’ microchips and implanting them into replacement dolphins.“People are people,” Azovtseva says. “Once they see an opportunity, they exploit.” She says she can’t go on doing her work in the industry and that she’s decided to speak out because she wants people to know the truth about the origins and treatment of many of the marine mammals they love watching. We exchange a look—we both know what her words likely mean for her livelihood.“I don’t care if I’m fired,” she says defiantly. “When a person has nothing to lose, she becomes really brave.”I'm sitting on the edge of an infinity pool on the hilly Thai side of Thailand’s border with Myanmar, at a resort where rooms average more than a thousand dollars a night.Out past the pool, elephants roam in a lush valley. Sitting next to me is 20-year-old Stephanie, who asked not to use her last name. She’s Dutch and French, Tokyo born and raised, and a student at the University of Michigan. Her cosmopolitan background and pretty face make for a perfect cocktail of aspiration—she’s exactly the kind of Instagrammer who makes it as an influencer. That is, someone who has a large enough following to attract sponsors to underwrite posts and, in turn, travel, wardrobes, and bank accounts. In 2018, brands—fashion, travel, tech, and more—spent an estimated $1.6 billion on social media advertising by influencers.Stephanie has been here, at the Anantara Golden Triangle Elephant Camp & Resort, before. This time, in a fairly standard influencer-brand arrangement, she’ll have a picnic with elephants and post about it to her growing legion of more than 25,000 Instagram followers. In exchange, she gets hundreds of dollars off the nightly rate.At Anantara the fields are green, and during the day at least, many of the resort’s 22 elephants are tethered on ropes more than a hundred feet long so they can move around and socialize. Nevertheless, they’re expected to let guests touch them and do yoga beside them.After Stephanie's elephant picnic, I watch her edit the day’s hundreds of photos. She selects an image with her favorite elephant, Bo. She likes it, she says, because she felt a connection with Bo and thinks that will come across. She posts it at 9:30 p.m.—the time she estimates the largest number of her followers will be online. She includes a long caption, summing it up as “my love story with this incredible creature,” and the hashtag #stopelephantriding. Immediately, likes from followers stream in—more than a thousand, as well as comments with heart-eyed emoji.Anantara is out of reach for anyone but the wealthy—or prominent influencers. Anyone else seeking a similar experience might do a Google search for, say, “Thailand elephant sanctuary.”As tourist demand for ethical experiences with animals has grown, affordable establishments, often calling themselves “sanctuaries,” have cropped up purporting to offer humane, up-close elephant encounters. Bathing with elephants—tourists give them a mud bath, splash them in a river, or both—has become very popular. Many facilities portray baths as a benign alternative to elephant riding and performances. But elephants getting baths, like those that give rides and do tricks, will have been broken to some extent to make them obedient. And as long as bathing remains popular, places that offer it will need obedient elephants to keep their businesses going.In Ban Ta Klang, a tiny town in eastern Thailand, modest homes dot the crimson earth. In front of each is a wide, bamboo platform for sitting, sleeping, and watching television.But the first thing I notice is the elephants. Some homes have one, others as many as five. Elephants stand under tarps or sheet metal roofs or trees. Some are together, mothers and babies, but most are alone. Nearly all the elephants wear ankle chains or hobbles—cuffs binding their front legs together. Dogs and chickens weave among the elephants’ legs, sending up puffs of red dust.Ban Ta Klang—known as Elephant Village—is ground zero in Thailand for training and trading captive elephants.“House elephants,” Sri Somboon says, gesturing as he turns down his TV. Next to his outdoor platform, a two-month-old baby elephant runs around his mother. Somboon points across the road to the third elephant in his charge, a three-year-old male tethered to a tree. He’s wrenching his head back and forth and thrashing his trunk around. It looks as if he’s going out of his mind.He’s in the middle of his training, Somboon says, and is getting good at painting. He’s already been sold, and when his training is finished, he’ll start working at a tourist camp down south.Ban Ta Klang and the surrounding area, part of Surin Province, claim to be the source of more than half of Thailand’s 3,800 captive elephants. Long before the flood of tourists, it was the center of the elephant trade; the animals were caught in the wild and tamed for use transporting logs. Now, every November, hundreds of elephants from here are displayed, bought, and sold in the province’s main town, Surin.One evening I sit with Jakkrawan Homhual and Wanchai Sala-ngam. Both 33, they’ve been best friends since childhood. About half the people in Ban Ta Klang who care for elephants, including Homhual, don’t own them. They’re paid a modest salary by a rich owner to breed and train baby elephants for entertainment. As night falls, thousands of termites swarm us, attracted to the single bulb hanging above the bamboo platform. Our conversation turns to elephant training.Phajaan is the traditional—and brutal—days- or weeks-long process of breaking a young elephant’s spirit. It has long been used in Thailand and throughout Southeast Asia to tame wild elephants, which still account for many of the country’s captives. Under phajaan, elephants are bound with ropes, confined in tight wooden structures, starved, and beaten repeatedly with bullhooks, nails, and hammers until their will is crushed. The extent to which phajaan persists in its harshest form is unclear. Since 2012, the government has been cracking down on the illegal import of elephants taken from the forests of neighboring Myanmar, Thailand’s main source of wild-caught animals.I ask the men how baby elephants born in captivity are broken and trained.When a baby is about two years old, they say, mahouts tie its mother to a tree and slowly drag the baby away. Once separated, the baby is confined. Using a bullhook on its ear, they teach the baby to move: left, right, turn, stop. To teach an elephant to sit, Sala-ngam says, “we tie up the front legs. One mahout will use a bullhook at the back. The other will pull a rope on the front legs.” He adds: “To train the elephant, you need to use the bullhook so the elephant will know.”Humans identify suffering in other humans by universal signs: People sob, wince, cry out, put voice to their hurt. Animals have no universal language for pain. Many animals don’t have tear ducts. More creatures still—prey animals, for example—instinctively mask symptoms of pain, lest they appear weak to predators. Recognizing that a nonhuman animal is in pain is difficult, often impossible.But we know that animals feel pain. All mammals have a similar neuroanatomy. Birds, reptiles, and amphibians all have pain receptors. As recently as a decade ago, scientists had collected more evidence that fish feel pain than they had for neonatal infants. A four-year-old human child with spikes pressing into his flesh would express pain by screaming. A four-year-old elephant just stands there in the rain, her leg jerking in the air.Of all the silently suffering animals I saw in pools and pens around the world, two in particular haunt me: an elephant and a tiger.They lived in the same facility, Samut Prakan Crocodile Farm and Zoo, about 15 miles south of Bangkok. The elephant, Gluay Hom, four years old, was kept under a stadium. The aging tiger, Khai Khem, 22, spent his days on a short chain in a photo studio. Both had irrefutable signs of suffering: The emaciated elephant had a bent, swollen leg hanging in the air and a large, bleeding sore at his temple. His eyes were rolled back in his head. The tiger had a dental abscess so severe that the infection was eating through the bottom of his jaw.When I contacted the owner of the facility, Uthen Youngprapakorn, to ask about these animals, he said the fact that they hadn’t died proved that the facility was caring for them properly. He then threatened a lawsuit.Six months after Kirsten and I returned from Thailand, we asked Ryn Jirenuwat, our Bangkok-based Thai interpreter, to check on Gluay Hom and Khai Khem. She went to Samut Prakan and watched them for hours, sending photos and video. Gluay Hom was still alive, still standing in the same stall, leg still bent at an unnatural angle. The elephants next to him were skin and bones. Khai Khem was still chained by his neck to a hook in the floor. He just stays in his dark corner, Jirenuwat texted, and when he hears people coming, he twists on his chain and turns his back to them.“Like he just wants to be swallowed by the wall.”",
"Around this time four years ago, the mood among wildlife officials in Thailand was somber. The case against Bach “Boonchai” Mai, the alleged leader of a major international wildlife trafficking ring, on trial for his suspected role in smuggling 14 rhino horns, had fallen apart after a key witness recanted his testimony in court. Conservationists bemoaned the judge’s decision to dismiss Bach’s case as emblematic of an overall lack of justice for high-level wildlife criminals.But prosecutors in Thailand’s Attorney General’s office continued to appeal the decision. In September 2022, their efforts finally paid off when the Thai Supreme Court sentenced Bach to five years in prison. “There was always this tinge of embarrassment that he went free,” says Steven Galster, the founder of Freeland, a Bangkok-based anti-trafficking group that launched the investigation into Bach. “This was a hit-back from the Supreme Court saying, ‘No more.’”“The court sent a strong message to wildlife traffickers with this decision,” adds Sylvia Shweder, the Southeast Asia legal advisor for Counter Wildlife Trafficking at the U.S. Department of Justice, based in Vientiane, Laos.Bach didn’t show up for his sentencing and is now considered to be a fugitive, with a warrant out for his arrest. Several Thai agencies are investigating his whereabouts, but if Bach has left the country, their ability to pursue him is limited, says Jeremy Douglas, the Southeast Asia regional representative for the UN Office on Drugs and Crime. "He remains well connected and networked, including with other targets in the Mekong region and Laos," Douglas says. "We are hopeful pressure will build to go after Boonchai and act on the warrant."Thailand’s Court of Justice and Office of the Attorney General did not respond to requests for interviews.Although Bach was convicted on the original charges of trying to smuggle 14 rhino horns into Thailand, according to Galster, the network he runs (named Hydra by Freeland and other conservationists) has played a major role for years in trafficking ivory, rhino horns, pangolin scales, tiger and lion parts, rosewood, and more in at least seven African countries and throughout Southeast Asia. On some weeks, Hydra moved products estimated to be worth $2 million, Galster says.Galster and his colleagues became aware of Bach while looking into another alleged major wildlife trafficker, Vixay Keosavang, a Lao national. Keosavang made headlines in 2014 when the U.S. State Department issued a $1 million reward for information leading to the dismantling of his syndicate, the Xaysavang Network.Keosavang has never been arrested, but after the State Department announcement, other members of his gang took over leadership, according to Galster. In 2014, Galster’s team came across five people who seemed to be trafficking wildlife contraband across the border from northeastern Thailand into Laos. Soon, Galster says, they realized that the names of the five were aliases for one individual: Bach.In 2016, Thai authorities came close to arresting Bach, but at the last minute, he and other key members of Hydra disappeared, according to Galster. “There was a leak.” The next big break didn’t come until December 2017, when customs agents and police at Bangkok’s Suvarnabhumi Airport found 14 rhino horns in a Chinese citizen’s luggage, and Freeland helped them link the horns to Bach by extracting data from the suspect’s phone. Police and customs then used a method called “controlled delivery,” in which they allowed the suspect to continue on his way with the contraband and followed him, leading them to Bach.After the rhino horn case was dismissed in early 2019, the public prosecutors appealed the decision, to no avail. So they brought the case to the Thai Supreme Court, whose judges saw it differently: The behavior of the key witness who recanted his testimony, they said, made it clear that he “knows the defendant well.” Moreover, the witness’s decision to recant testimony indicated that he “clearly intended to help exculpate the defendant, thus making it unreliable.”When the Supreme Court handed down its verdict, on September 22, Thailand was ending its fiscal year, and the news of Bach’s sentencing somehow escaped notice of both the media and of Freeland. Galster didn’t learn about it until more than four months later, on January 30. He says he could hardly believe it. “My first thought was, ‘There is a god!’”Prosecutors in the Office of the Attorney General are now litigating an additional civil case against Bach, for money laundering. Working with Freeland, authorities in the Thai Anti-Money Laundering Office have seized Bach’s vehicles and some $11 million in assets and have frozen his bank account.“It’s important that high-level wildlife traffickers are punished and their assets seized, so they are prevented from committing further crimes,” Sylvia Shweder says. “This is how we can dismantle wildlife trafficking criminal organizations.”There are signs that Bach’s case isn’t a one-off, Galster says. In June, U.S. and Thai authorities in Bangkok arrested Teo Boon Ching, a Malaysian who allegedly was one of Hydra’s major suppliers, in connection to a seizure of nearly 300 pounds of ivory. Moazu Kromah, a Liberian national and alleged Hydra supplier, was extradited to the U.S. from Uganda in 2019 on charges of conspiracy to sell rhino horn and ivory and of money laundering. In August, a federal court in Manhattan sentenced Kromah to five years in prison.More Hydra arrests may follow. In August, Freeland, with the support of the Department of Justice, organized a meeting with police, prosecutors, and government financial crime analysts from Thailand, Vietnam and Malaysia to examine data from Bach’s seized assets and assess whether a larger, multicountry case can be made.In the meantime, if Bach remains a fugitive, Galster says Thai authorities will alert Vietnamese, Lao, and Malaysian officials to be on the lookout for him, and a multicountry manhunt will begin. There’s also a small chance that Bach will turn himself in. Bach answers to bosses who “might throw him to the wolves and say, ‘Do your time so we don’t have to lose our assets like you did yours,’” Galster says. “He might just show up.”",
"Alleged wildlife trafficking kingpin Bach “Boonchai” Mai was accused of dealing in rhino horn as well as ivory, tigers, pangolins, and more.Major victories are scarce in the fight against international wildlife crime, but January 2018 marked one such triumph when Thai police arrested Bach “Boonchai” Mai, a notorious Vietnamese trafficker known to deal in ivory, rhino horn, tigers, pangolins, and more, according to a Guardian exposé and evidence gathered by the anti-trafficking group Freeland.Conservationists celebrated when Bach was arrested in January 2018 in Bangkok, but a Thai court dismissed the case last week.The widely praised news made international headlines—but celebrations were premature. Last week, Bach walked free after a key witness recanted his testimony in court. It’s an all too familiar outcome for those accused of leading illegal wildlife trade operations. They are rarely convicted, and even more rarely punished.“There’s so many cases with so-called kingpins or senior, important figures that either drag on for years in the courts and then collapse or simply wind up not being prosecuted,” says Julian Rademeyer, a project leader with TRAFFIC, the international wildlife trade monitoring network. “It’s enormously frustrating because it happens far too often.”Bach was charged for his suspected role in the smuggling of 14 rhino horns to Thailand, in violation of an international treaty on wildlife trade and of Thailand’s Wildlife Preservation and Protection Act. If he’d been convicted, he could have faced up to four years in prison and a $1,300 fine.Conservationists originally hoped that Bach’s arrest would kick off a multicountry investigation to unravel Hydra, the many-headed criminal syndicate Bach allegedly runs with his brother, Bach Van Lim. Hydra operates throughout Southeast Asia and has known ties to Africa and China, says Steven Galster, founder of Freeland, which is based in Bangkok.“If you’re going from a scale of one to 10 for extremely important players in illegal wildlife trade, Boonchai is around an 8.5,” says Galster, who has been tracking the Hydra syndicate since 2003. “There’s probably only one or two others on his level in Southeast Asia.”Bach had long managed to evade arrest, Galster says, but in December 2017, Thai authorities linked him to 14 rhino horns they discovered in a Chinese citizen’s luggage at Bangkok’s airport. Rather than confront and arrest the man outright, Thai customs and police chose to use a method called “controlled delivery.” They followed the man as he continued on his way with the horns, leading them to a government wildlife quarantine officer, who took the horns off the Chinese man and then met with a relative of Bach’s. Ultimately, this led to Bach himself as the alleged financier and importer of the horns.“We shouldn’t forget that this case has shown some real progress in the way Thai authorities investigated wildlife trafficking,” says Giovanni Broussard, Southeast Asia regional coordinator of the United Nations Global Program for Combatting Wildlife and Forest Crime.As media headlines faded, however, interest in the case waned, Galster says. The Thai government and Freeland have assembled years of evidence pointing to Bach’s guilt, but authorities chose to hand the case off to a junior prosecutor, who built his case around a single witness testimony rather than those collective resources. Thai authorities did not respond to a request for comment.Last week, in a nearly empty courtroom just south of Bangkok, Bach’s lawyer argued that his client had fallen victim to a case of mistaken identity. When asked to identify Bach—who had altered his appearance by wearing a hairpiece and glasses, Galster says—the witness said he could not. “There was enough doubt cast that the judge felt she had nothing else to go on,” Galster says. “Boonchai Bach’s altered appearance was meant to ensure the witness had a reason to change his mind.”Wildlife trafficking is believed to be a multibillion-dollar black market of low risk and high rewards. Anti-wildlife trafficking advocates say successful prosecutions rare.Galster and others believe that the witness was likely threatened or paid off before the trial—a common occurrence, according to Vanda Felbab-Brown, a senior fellow at the Brookings Institution, a think tank in Washington, D.C, that works to solve societal problems, including wildlife trafficking.The outcome, she continues, “is emblematic of the weakness of prosecution in places like Thailand in general” but nevertheless was a disappointment. “The dismissal of this case is just awful,” she says. “The message it sends is that you can get away with wildlife crime.”Bach joins the ranks of a number of high-profile alleged traffickers who have managed to evade consequences, including Feisal Mohamed Ali, a convicted Kenyan ivory boss who successfully appealed his guilty sentence last year; Dawie Groenewald, a South African safari operator who faces more than 1,800 wildlife-related counts but whose case has been dragging on since 2010; and Vixay Keosavang, a Bach associate who has been wanted by the U.S. State Department since 2013 for smuggling major shipments of ivory, rhino horn, pangolin scales, and more from Africa to Asia. Such individuals often have ample money to spend on their defense and operate in countries with high levels of corruption, limited resources for prosecution, and weak laws relating to wildlife crime.Yet counter examples do exist. Three weeks after Bach’s dismissal, a Tanzanian court sentenced Yang Feng Glan, a Chinese citizen known as the “ivory queen,” to 15 years in prison for leading an organized criminal cartel that trafficked hundreds of pieces of ivory worth $2.51 million.“This is an incredibly significant victory, not only for Tanzania but elsewhere in Africa,” says Krissie Clark, executive director and co-founder of the PAMS Foundation, a nonprofit conservation organization based in Tanzania. “It really just shows that nobody is above the law and that big people can go down.”Yang’s successful arrest and conviction hinged on an intelligence-led approach, Clark says. Unlike Bach’s case in Thailand, multiple Tanzanian agencies came together to build a strong prosecution. The case also reflected President John Magufuli’s pledge to crack down on poaching and corruption, Clark says.From 2009 to 2014, Tanzania lost 60 percent of its elephants, primarily because of poaching. Following that devastation, “it is extremely encouraging to see the government taking such a hard stance on wildlife traffickers,” says Iain Douglas-Hamilton, founder of Save the Elephants, a nonprofit group based in Kenya. The Yang case, he adds, is one of several recent high-level trafficking cases to have been taken seriously by the Tanzanian courts.“Tanzania has been building toward this, slowly charging bigger and bigger fish,” Clark says. “Previously, and elsewhere, there’s been a lot of corruption, and it’s been very difficult to get these things done, but this conviction shows that we can get our act together and that Tanzania is leading the way.”The Thai government, Galster points out, can still appeal the Bach verdict. Freeland is also looking into avenues for opening up a public-interest lawsuit against him. But until exuberant headlines translate into multicountry investigations and serious legal action, lack of prosecutions will likely remain the norm. As Galster says, “We need to treat these cases as what they really are: transnational organized crime.”",
"A shortfin mako shark swims off the west coast of New Zealand's North Island.GenevaA proposal to strengthen protections for both shortfin and longfin mako sharks, hunted for their meat and fins, was adopted today after a 102-40 secret ballot vote at the global wildlife trade summit. The vote still needs to be finalized at the plenary session at the end, when all appendix change proposals passed in committee are officially adopted.The proposal, debated at this year’s CITES Conference of the Parties, lists mako sharks under Appendix II, meaning that they can’t be traded unless it can be shown that fishing wouldn’t threaten their chances for survival. Mako sharks were not previously protected under CITES, the treaty that governs the international wildlife trade. Conservationists say this was the world’s last chance to prevent mako shark populations from collapsing."Listing mako sharks on CITES Appendix II is great news for shark conservation," said Elizabeth Murdock, director of the Pacific Ocean Initiative at the Natural Resources Defense Council. "Protecting these sharks under CITES gives these vulnerable predators a fighting chance."More than 50 of the 183 CITES members signed on as proponents of the proposal brought forth by Mexico—a record-breaking number of backers at any of the triennial meetings of CITES since it was enacted in 1973. (The proposal to list wedgefish on Appendix II also broke records this year, with more than 60 countries supporting it.) During the debate, the representative from Mexico said mako shark populations are "on the verge of collapsing, and that is no exaggeration."Nonetheless, conservationists feared that opposition from a few countries with substantial mako fishing industries—primarily the United States, Canada, and Japan—would tip the scale. Japan opposed the measure during the debates, and the United States announced afterward it had voted no."The population is not overfished," said the representative from Japan during the debate, who added a listing under Appendix II signifies "negligence" of CITES listing criteria.In the past, the U.S. and others have supported listing other shark species under CITES, but not so in this case, with commercial interests at stake, says Matt Collis, director of international policy at the International Fund for Animal Welfare (IFAW). “For a lot of these countries, they were happy to list shark species when it was ones they weren’t so heavily involved in fishing,” he says. “Suddenly, when you’re being asked to be responsible, rather than asking other people to be responsible, they’re less keen to take it on board.”The International Union for the Conservation of Nature, which determines the conservation status of species, recently declared both species of mako sharks to be endangered globally and shortfin mako to be critically endangered in the Mediterranean, citing an estimated 50 to 79 percent population decline over three generations, or about 75 years.Mako sharks—sometimes called cheetahs of the ocean for their speed—mainly live in the high seas, “outside the jurisdiction of any one nation,” says Luke Warwick, assistant director of the sharks and rays program for the nonprofit Wildlife Conservation Society. Because of this, he says “it’s been one giant free-for-all around the world, catch as many as you can.”They’re often targeted for their fins, used in shark fin soup—a status dish in Asian countries, notably China, that’s often served at weddings as a sign of respect for guests. Their meat is more edible compared to that of other sharks, which is often acidic and is usually sold as a byproduct of the fin trade for “pennies on the dollar,” says Shawn Heinrichs, founder of the ocean conservation organization Blue Sphere Foundation.Mako sharks are both at risk and commercially valuable. So the question at the center of this debate over whether to increase their protections gets to the heart of CITES itself: Namely, does the treaty exist to protect wildlife or the wildlife trade?“There is a constant tension between—is [it a] trade or conservation treaty?” says Collis, of IFAW. “Our response is always it’s a conservation treaty. While its function is regulating trade, its objective is to ensure that international trade isn’t detrimental to the survival of these species.…Not everyone agrees with us [that it’s a conservation treaty].”Given both the overfishing of juvenile makos, which reduces future reproductive rates, and the high losses from the natural die-off of mature females during the past three decades, even if fishing were to stop immediately, their stock in the North Atlantic would continue to decline until at least 2035, according to the shark species group with the International Commission for the Conservation of Atlantic Tunas.One criticism of the proposal was the lack of population data on mako sharks, but, Heinrichs says, this is a common problem for animals that live in open waters.“How do you count all the fish in the ocean?”Going forward, this new listing will "put teeth" into efforts to protect mako sharks, says Warwick of WCS."Sharks are vulnerable wildlife too, and again CITES member governments have stepped up and recognized that via inclusion in CITES Appendix II," he says. "Momentum is clearly building to ensure that these species—which have been around for 400 million years—continue to be around for future generations."",
"Zane Grey made his name writing adventure novels about the American West, but his real love wasn’t gunslinging or cowpoking; it was deep-sea fishing. He held 14 world records for catching saltwater fish, including the first billfish over 1,000 pounds landed with a rod and reel, a marlin he caught in Tahiti in 1930. But nothing compared to the shortfin makos he encountered off the coast of New Zealand in 1926.The first mako Grey got on the line was a 258-pounder, and when he reeled it to the side of the boat, “quickly I learned something about mako!” he wrote in his book Tales of the Angler’s Eldorado, New Zealand. “He put up a terrific battle, broke one gaff, soaked us through with water, and gave no end of trouble.” Once the shark was landed, Grey marveled at its build—streamlined, muscular, with a head like a bullet. “I had never seen its like,” he wrote. “Every line of this mako showed speed and power.”But it was the 1,200-pounder that the captain of his boat battled that led to almost mythical superlatives. After a long fight in which the mako “leapt prodigiously and made incredible runs,” the shark bit through the leader and escaped. “I was terrified,” the captain told Grey. “It seemed that mako filled the whole sky. He was the most savage and powerful brute I ever saw, let alone had on a line!”Almost a century later, shortfin makos still have a herculean reputation among fishermen, who love them for their fight and their meat in equal measure. But a century of fishing appears to have taken a toll. Shortfin makos—which are distinguished from their much rarer cousins, longfin makos, by, among other things, their shorter pectoral fins (in this article, “makos” will refer to shortfin makos)—are eagerly targeted by recreational fishermen and frequently caught as bycatch by commercial long-liners. Their meat rivals swordfish in quality, and their fins are prized in Asia for shark fin soup, a combination that has put makos under significant pressure. But how much pressure, and to what ultimate effect, is uncertain. Scientists have no clear idea how many makos there are in the Earth’s oceans, and most of the data on catch and mortality rates come from commercial fishing operations, which famously tend to underreport catches. So biologists studying makos are trying to fill in some huge knowledge gaps.In the summer of 2015 I was invited to join a mako-tagging operation off the Maryland coast with scientists trying to bridge some of those gaps. I thought it would go like this: We catch big makos; they put on the kind of show that Zane Grey saw; and I get great color for this story. Instead, I learned firsthand that Mark Twain was right about seasickness (“At first you are so sick you are afraid you will die, and then you are so sick you are afraid you won’t”) and was woozily indifferent when the fishermen on board reeled in two small makos, neither of which put up much of a fight. So I decided to try again—this time with a seasickness patch—in Rhode Island later in the summer. And that’s when I saw what I really needed to see.On each trip I accompanied scientists affiliated with the Guy Harvey Research Institute, which has been tagging and tracking makos in the Atlantic Ocean and Gulf of Mexico since 2008, with the primary objective of studying the sharks’ movement patterns. Makos in the western North Atlantic are highly migratory, traveling northward during the warmer months and then south as winter approaches. The excursions off Maryland’s coast in May were a resounding success: Over two weeks, 12 makos were fitted with satellite transmitters. By contrast, the Rhode Island excursions in August were a resounding failure: one week, zero makos. But that contrast offered a clue as to what might be happening with makos in the Atlantic.To pick up on the clue, you have to know one of the first things you learn when you’re fishing for makos: They share territory with blue sharks. The two species are kind of like lions and hyenas, coexisting in the same areas as they pursue different feeding strategies. Shortfin makos are the fastest sharks in the ocean, capable of reaching 35 miles an hour as they chase down speedy prey such as bluefish and tuna, and sport fishermen love their power. Blue sharks, on the other hand, are relatively laconic and focus on slower prey, like squid. Catching them is like, in one fisherman’s words, “reeling in a barn door,” and their meat is not nearly as good to eat as a mako’s. So you can guess which one is the lion in the analogy and which is the hyena. Everyone wants to bag the lion.On our second day out of Narragansett, Rhode Island, as we hauled yet another blue shark to the side of the boat, I finally took note of the obvious.“It seems like all the blue sharks have hooks in their mouths,” I said. Brad Wetherbee, the marine ecologist from the University of Rhode Island who was there to tag any makos we caught, said, “Yup. Every one we’ve brought back to the boat so far has had a hook in it.”Removing a hook from a shark’s mouth can be dangerous, so fishermen just cut the leaders and leave the hooks to rust away. And because the fishermen are after makos, they’re much more likely to release blue sharks. “I’ve never seen a mako with a hook,” the ship’s mate, Lucas Berg, told me our first day out. “People don’t ever let them go. But we’ve caught blue sharks with four hooks in their mouth.”The fishing pressures on makos are intense, Wetherbee explained. The ones we were trying to catch swim northward up the Atlantic coast in the summer, and between everyday recreational fishing and the dozens of shark-fishing tournaments held between Maryland and Rhode Island, it’s a perilous journey for the sharks. “A lot of them have been weeded out by the time they get up here,” Wetherbee said.“Is the catch rate sustainable?” I asked him. Makos, like many sharks, are especially vulnerable to overfishing because of their small litters and high age of sexual maturity. (One study suggests that female makos don’t reach maturity until around 15 years old or later, but these figures are not definitive. Biologists agree more research is needed.)“We don’t know,” he said. “These are far-ranging, international sharks—some of our [tagged] makos have gone into the waters of at least 17 different countries—and there’s not enough data for management agencies to come up with a good estimate of whether the population is going up or down or staying the same. There’s probably some number of mako sharks that would be fine to catch and kill. But we don’t know if it’s 100, or 1,000, or 100,000.”According to the National Marine Fisheries Service, which regulates fishing in U.S. waters, makos are being fished at a sustainable level. This assessment is based largely on catch figures supplied by commercial long-liners to the international organization that regulates fishing for tuna and other pelagic fish in the Atlantic, and those figures show a relatively consistent harvest over recent years, suggesting that mako populations are stable. But the figures are an imprecise measure. The catch is recorded in metric tons, and basic information like the number of sharks caught, and the size and sex of those sharks, can be missing. On top of that, many catches go unreported, leading scientists to question the reliability of both the data and the stock assessments.What Wetherbee and his team do know is that the sharks they’re tagging are not faring well. The tags they use—about the size of a Zippo lighter, mounted on the dorsal fin—send signals to satellites every time the sharks surface, allowing researchers to create detailed maps of their movements. When the signals start coming from land, they know the sharks have been caught. “We’ve tagged 49 makos, and 11 have been killed,” Wetherbee told me. (Within a month, that number had increased to 12.) I said that seemed like a lot, and he agreed: The sample size is small, but the catch rate is troubling.Back on land, I called Mahmood Shivji, the Nova Southeastern University scientist who leads the tagging project. “What amazes me,” he said, “is that it’s a vast ocean out there and these animals move a lot, and yet these tagged animals are running into fishing hooks to the tune of 25 percent. No shark fishery can sustain a 25 percent removal every year.”After my seasick cruise, I returned to the Maryland shore for Mako Mania, an annual shark-fishing tournament held at the Bahia Marina in Ocean City. This Mako Mania should not be confused with the Mako Mania tournament in Point Pleasant, New Jersey—or, for that matter, with the Mako Fever tournament in New Jersey or the Mako Rodeo tournament, also in New Jersey, or with any of the other 65 or so U.S. tournaments that include prizes for pelagic sharks like makos, threshers, and tiger sharks. After Jaws hit theaters in 1975, tournaments popped up along the eastern seaboard, and ever since, summer has not been a good time to be a shark in the North Atlantic.I arrived at the marina just as the first sharks were being brought to the docks. It was a festive scene—hundreds of people eating and drinking and cheering for the anglers and their kills. Next to me a woman and a young boy watched as a 282-pound mako—the winner in the mako category, it turned out—was hoisted to be weighed. The anglers pulled up the snout for photographs, and the woman turned to the boy and said, “This is really cool, right?” The boy nodded silently, transfixed by the shark’s bloody grimace.As the sharks continued rolling in—147-pound mako, 466-pound thresher, 500-pound thresher, 174-pound mako—I talked with the tournament’s organizer, Shawn Harman. “What’s more fun than seeing sharks?” he asked, surveying the cheering crowd. When we got to some of the knottier questions about the controversy over “kill tournaments,” as critics call them (versus “no kill” or “catch and release” tournaments, which are rare but do exist), he explained that his tournament was not like those of old—back in the 1970s and ’80s, when the sharks would pile up on the docks and go wholesale into the Dumpster afterward. Here, the only sharks brought to the dock were threshers and makos, the best tasting sharks in the ocean, with minimum sizes and a catch limit of one fish per boat per day. (Over the course of three days, 16 sharks were brought to the dock to be weighed.) “Nobody’s wantonly killing fish here. Everyone here eats what they kill.”I asked him where I might find mako on the menu, to see what it tastes like, and he fetched a fillet from one of the sharks just brought in, had it blackened, and served it to me on a bun with wasabi mayo. It was delicious—as good as any billfish I’d ever had.But the tasty sandwich and the festivity of the scene could not entirely conceal the problematic nature of the event. Later in the day, one of the fishermen told me that a 500-pound thresher shark brought in earlier had been pregnant, and when it was gutted, the tournament staff tried to hide the pups from the crowd. Threshers, like makos, are considered “vulnerable” by the International Union for Conservation of Nature, and though killing the pregnant females of vulnerable species may be legal, it makes for bad publicity.A young mako lies gutted on the dock of Star Island Marina in Montauk, New York, site of an annual shark-fishing tournament. More than 60 tournaments, targeting shortfin makos, threshers, and tiger sharks, are held along the eastern seaboard each summer.I asked Harman about the pregnant shark. He denied the story, so I asked one of the guys cleaning the fish, and he said yes, there had been three or four pups, each two to three feet long. I went back to Harman to ask him why he denied it. He got a little flustered and told me he was afraid of being the “bad guy” in the story. “We’re following the law, according to what the law says is sustainable,” he said. “If they make it illegal, we’ll stop.”The captains of the boats I went out in for those tagging operations in Maryland and Rhode Island are both longtime shark fishermen. They are not reflexively against the capture and killing of fish, and they are not squeamish about what deep-sea fishing entails. But both men have qualms about how sharks are being fished.Mark Sampson, the Maryland captain, started a prominent shark-fishing tournament in Ocean City in 1981 and ran it for more than three decades. But he became increasingly concerned about the conservation of shark populations, so he made his size limits more restrictive to reduce the number of sharks caught. He also insisted that anglers use “circle hooks,” which, in contrast to conventional “J-hooks,” don’t lodge in a shark’s stomach when swallowed and result in fewer unnecessary killings. Some fishermen balked, participation declined, and because of the higher size limits, he said, “we had days in our tournament where not a single shark was brought back to the dock.“That’s not the recipe for a successful tournament, because people want to see those fish being brought in and weighed,” Sampson said. He shuttered his tournament in 2014, and he doesn’t accept charters for anglers who want to use his boat to participate in other shark tournaments.Charlie Donilon, the Rhode Island captain, has run shark-fishing charters since 1976. Where Sampson is quiet and circumspect, Donilon is talkative and emotional, and on one of those days in August when we were on the boat waiting for the fish to bite, he told me about the time a client reeled in a mako that refused to go gently.“I threw a harpoon in it, then I hit it with a flying gaff, and then tied it down to a side cleat, and the thing is scratching and blasting blood everywhere, and it’s all being recorded by the client. The guy sent me the video, and I watched it with my wife, and she asked, ‘Does that bother you?’”It did, he said, and he started trying to persuade his customers to release the sharks they caught. “I’d tell people, a 100-pound mako is just a tot, just a kid, because they have the potential to grow to 1,000 pounds or more. So I’d really like to let it go, because it’s an immature fish.” But since almost all the makos they catch out there are juveniles, it stopped making sense to even ask the anglers. So in 2015 Donilon instituted a catch-and-release policy, no exceptions. His business has taken a hit. “I’m way off what I used to be,” he said.Donilon accepts the loss of business because it doesn’t seem to him that the fishing is sustainable, no matter what the government says. “The sharks we tag, there’s like a gantlet they have to go through coming up the coast. They’ve got to go through Maryland, New Jersey, Long Island, Massachusetts—and everyone in the world is out there fishing,” he said. “They’ve got to be at least 15 years old in order to reproduce, the females. Now what are the odds of that shark making it up here 15 times without being caught? Pretty slim.”I thought of all the blue sharks we’d seen with hooks in their mouths, and it seemed to me he was right: pretty slim. Although most of the tagging study’s casualties had been killed by commercial fishermen in international waters—not by recreational fishermen—the Fisheries Service’s statistics attribute the majority of the mako kills in the U.S. to recreational fishermen. So who is fishing too much, and where? Empirically, it’s still too soon to say. But Donilon, at least, doesn’t need to wait for more data to render his verdict.“I did my share of killing,” he said one afternoon on the boat. “You know how there might be a guy in Africa who used to be a poacher, and he used to kill all the lions …” And as he said this, his eyes teared up and his voice started quivering, and finally he choked out a half whisper: “You’ve got to give back. We just take, take all the time …”Great white sharks ply the waters near Australia’s South Neptune Islands.",
"The future of African elephants, and how to manage them, is in the spotlight at the wildlife trade summit in Geneva, Switzerland.GenevaImpassioned arguments from several southern African nations at the wildlife trade summit here yesterday failed to generate enough support to allow four nations to reopen their ivory trade.The controversial proposal—brought forward at the CITES meeting by South Africa, Botswana, Namibia, and Zimbabwe—was voted down by 101 of the 183 treaty members. The United States and the European Union were among those opposing the change. Twenty-three countries voted to support the proposal, and 18 abstained.CITES is the treaty that governs the international trade in wildlife and wildlife products. The elephant and ivory debates are among the most hotly contested at this CITES conference of parties meeting, which runs from August 17 through August 28. There are more than half a dozen proposals related to elephants, including reopening the international ivory trade, permanently banning the international ivory trade, closing domestic ivory markets, and ending the export of live elephants to non-range states.“There’s a real sense of déjà vu,” says John Scanlon, who served as CITES’s secretary general from 2010 to 2018. That repetition, he says, suggests that the time is right to look beyond CITES for other ways to help with the financial burdens local communities face—and to recognize that this is a development issue, not a conservation issue to be dealt with under CITES.Had the southern African countries' proposal passed, it would have allowed those nations to sell their existing stockpiles of ivory. Such sales, they contend, are essential to financing conservation of elephants in the wild, because proceeds would benefit villagers whose crops are sometimes damaged and family members injured (or killed) by elephants. The funds, the proposal’s backers maintain, would provide incentives for people in these communities not to kill the animals. The international commercial trade in ivory has been banned since 1990.Those who voted no argue that any resumption of ivory sales could fuel a boost in the illegal ivory market and hasten the extinction of African elephants.The Great Elephant Census, which surveyed sites in 18 countries throughout Africa in 2014 and 2015, concluded that the population of savanna elephants declined by 30 percent from just seven years earlier, in 2007. As many as 35,000 elephants are killed each year primarily for their tusks, according to the African Wildlife Foundation, an international conservation nonprofit.Another proposal to tighten protections for elephants by permanently eliminating all commercial international trade of the animals throughout Africa also failed to pass. Nor did a separate effort by Zambia to loosen restrictions on sales of its elephants for hunting trophies, raw ivory, and other elephant products. And earlier this week, a proposal calling for the closure of all domestic ivory markets also didn’t pass.The black market for elephant ivory and other elephant products leads to the killing of some 30,000 elephants each year.The bids to reopen the ivory trade and, alternatively, eliminate any international sales of elephants and their parts for commercial use were reprisals of similar proposals three years ago at the last major CITES conference.Each vote on the proposals must be confirmed by the plenary at the end of the conference and will be final unless one-third of the members present call for reopening the vote. (See more updates from the meeting here.)Ginette Hemley, who co-led the World Wildlife Fund delegation to CITES echoed Scanlon’s concerns about the familiar fault lines of the elephant discussion. “The CITES votes are a positive outcome for African elephants,” she told National Geographic. “Maintaining current listings and ivory trade restrictions is critical. But the divisive nature of the debate underscores the differing challenges and approaches to elephant conservation across Africa.”How to manage national ivory stockpiles is a challenging issue. Some countries, such as Kenya, have chosen to burn their stockpiles to help keep ivory off the market. Others, including Namibia, bank them in hope of eventually selling them off.“We have hundreds of tons of ivory in our banks,” said Pohamba Shifeta, Namibia’s minister of environment and tourism, in the aftermath of the votes. “This is a natural resource from when nature takes it course, and then we have this ivory resource. It is our right to sell this and the right of the local communities to offset their costs of living side by side with elephants.”Namibia does not want any assistance from development agencies, he added, but instead wants to benefit from its own natural resources and continue its history of strong elephant conservation. Recent population estimates for elephants in Namibia are hard to come by because the country didn’t participate in the Great Elephant Census.The elephant votes come on the heels of recent statements from Zimbabwe’s leadership about its controversial practice of selling some of its young wild elephants to other countries—such as China—ostensibly to help deal with what it claims is an elephant overpopulation problem and to boost the economy. Zimbabwe has some 82,000 elephants, according to a recent report from the International Union for Conservation of Nature.Zimbabwe’s sales of young elephants will not make a significant difference if conservation is the goal, says Iain Douglas-Hamilton, a zoologist and founder of the nonprofit Save The Elephants. He notes that only small numbers of young elephants are being sold. There are also animal welfare issues with separating elephant families, he says.Earlier this week parties to CITES took steps to block Zimbabwe and other countries from selling their elephants by passing a provision that would limit trade in live, wild-caught African elephants exclusively to elephant range countries. This is expected to be brought up again at the plenary because the EU, which counts as a 28-country bloc, didn’t vote on the matter.",
"Johannesburg, South AfricaEfforts to reopen the ivory trade failed Monday at a global wildlife conference in Johannesburg, South Africa. Zimbabwe and Namibia had put forward proposals at the meeting of the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES), a 183-government treaty that regulates the international wildlife trade, but both failed to generate enough votes.The committee also failed to pass a proposal that would have given all elephants the highest level of international protection, which would effectively permanently ban the ivory trade.African elephants are facing a poaching crisis. Some 30,000 are killed each year to supply the ivory trade, and the population of savanna elephants has dropped by 30 percent in just seven years, according to the recently released Great Elephant Census. Poaching has become increasingly organized and militarized, with criminal syndicates moving huge shipments of illegal ivory across the ocean to Asia and elsewhere.International trade in ivory was banned back in 1989, but the way elephant protections were set up gave Namibia, Zimbabwe, Botswana, and South Africa—countries with robust elephant populations—the opportunity to request and hold ivory sales because their elephants have been assigned a lower level of protection than the rest of Africa’s.At the international wildlife conference in South Africa, a proposal to give these desert elephants in Namibia—and all African elephants—the greatest protections was rejected.The showdown over the ivory trade was one of the most highly anticipated debates of the two-week conference.Some argued that a legal ivory trade would hurt elephants by erasing the stigma around ivory and encouraging more people to buy it. They say that the illegal trade would increase as a result and that legal sales would provide cover for illegal ivory.“Legal international trade in ivory would unleash powerful economic forces that need to be taken into consideration,” said Alejandro Nadal, an economist from Mexico who has studied the possible effects of a legalized ivory trade. It’s not as simple as a basic supply-and-demand model, he says.Others argued that a legal trade would help elephants by giving them economic value, which would encourage conservation and habitat protection. Rural communities often see elephants as a nuisance and a threat because the animals trample crops and sometimes kill people. If villagers instead benefited from elephants by way of ivory sales, they’d have more incentive to protect the animals, the argument goes.“The most effective strategy is to integrate elephants into rural communities as assets and to demonstrate that elephants contribute to welfare and development,” the Namibian representative said.A recent study found that a one-time, legal ivory sale in 2008 actually increased the poaching of elephants, and another study released two weeks ago found that reopening trade would speed up elephants’ march to extinction.A handful of African countries spoke in favor of the proposals allowing Namibia and Zimbabwe to sell ivory, but in a surprise move, Botswana threw its support behind the African Elephant Coalition, a group of 29 countries that opposes the ivory trade, arguing that a total, permanent ban on the ivory trade is necessary.Up until today, Botswana had been pro-trade, a big deal because Botswana has more elephants than any other African country. But Botswana’s statement wasn’t enough to persuade nations to pass the proposal to permanently ban the ivory trade by listing all of Africa’s elephants on CITES’s Appendix I, which prohibits commercial trade.Some blame the European Union, which voted as bloc of 28 countries, for the proposal’s failure. The EU argued that certain elephant populations are too strong to justify their inclusion on that list.The EU’s opposition was expected, but the U.S. also voted against the proposal—a big surprise. The U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service long suggested it supported the African Elephant Coalition, but when it came time to vote, the country decided not to back additional protections for elephants.Those who favor a permanent ban on ivory trading argue that a legal trade will only spur demand for ivory and lead to even greater slaughter of elephants.“We applaud the leadership and dedication of ... the proposing and supporting range states,” a statement from the Fish and Wildlife Service says. “However, the United States voted no on this proposal because it opened up the potential that member nations would take a reservation and use a victory on Appendix I uplisting as a back door to resume trade.”Namibia and Zimbabwe had threatened to resume ivory trade outside the CITES legal regime if all elephants were given these additional protections. They argued that they only agreed to a moratorium on ivory sales in 2007 in their countries as a compromise that discussions about establishing a mechanism to set up legal trade would continue. Last week, CITES voted to end those discussions, and now the two southern African nations are saying the compromise is null and void.“It’s a form of blackmail is what it is,” said Beverly Joubert, a conservationist and National Geographic explorer-in-residence. “We can understand why the U.S Fish and Wildlife voted the way they did, to be able to have some control, but I think it’s a sad day that we have got to this, where it’s all about trade and not the protection of the animals.”The other surprise was China. Last year China announced its intention to close down its huge domestic ivory market. And just a few days ago, it backed a resolution at the conference urging all countries to shut down their domestic ivory markets. Nonetheless, today the Chinese delegate spoke in favor of allowing a limited, legal international trade in ivory.CITES also voted earlier in the week for a resolution urging all countries to phase out their domestic ivory markets.The votes were finalized at the plenary session Tuesday.(Read more stories out of the CITES meeting in Johannesburg here.)",
"Documentary filmmaker David Hamlin recalls the adrenalin rush when he was flying over the Democratic Republic of the Congo’s Garamba National Park in late June and spotted three giraffes standing in a small clearing. “Seeing these giraffes from the air was really exciting,” says Hamlin, who was on assignment for National Geographic. “Seeing them anywhere is really exciting.”That’s because Garamba is huge, sprawling over nearly 2,000 square miles (5,180 square kilometers) of mostly forested land, and it's a rare, lucky event to come across any of its 40 remaining giraffes.But Hamlin’s exhilaration at seeing and photographing the giraffes didn’t last long. Twelve hours later rangers reported hearing gunshots, and they later discovered three bullet-riddled giraffe carcasses rotting in the sun. “It was horrible for me and the team,” Hamlin says—”the crushing realization that most likely it was these guys, the ones we’d seen.”Hamlin decided to document the aftermath of the tragedy (watch the video above) to raise awareness about poaching in the park, which is managed by the nonprofit organization African Parks in association with the Congolese Institute for the Conservation of Nature, a government agency.Garamba is Africa’s second oldest national park and has been hit hard by poaching in recent years as civil unrest has escalated in the region. Its rhinos have been wiped out, and elephants have suffered huge losses. The same goes for its Kordofan giraffes, one of Africa’s nine giraffe subspecies.A group of rare giraffes roam the Democratic Republic of the Congo’s Garamba National Park.Fewer than 2,000 now roam central Africa, according to Julian Fennessy, co-director of the Giraffe Conservation Foundation, a Namibia-based organization. Garamba’s Kordofans represent the last population in the Democratic Republic of the Congo. “If the number slips in half, then we’re in a real dire situation,” Fennessy says. “Every single giraffe is valuable.”Congolese usually kill the giraffes for one body part: their tails, considered a status symbol in some communities. Meanwhile men from neighboring South Sudan target the giraffes for their meat to feed impoverished villagers. But the massive bodies (giraffes can grow to 18 feet and weigh up to 3,000 pounds) of the three giraffes were intact—only the ends of their tails were missing.According to Leon Lamprecht, joint operations director for African Parks, men “use the tail as a dowry to the bride’s father if they want to ask for the hand of a bride.” The long black hairs are often turned into fly whisks.One of the dead giraffes had a satellite collar and was being monitored by Garamba’s rangers. “What an absolute waste,” Lamprecht says.This story was produced by National Geographic’s Special Investigations Unit, which focuses on wildlife crime and is made possible by grants from the BAND Foundation and the Woodtiger Fund. Read more stories from the SIU on Wildlife Watch. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to ngwildlife@natgeo.com.",
"A herd of Rothschild's giraffes browse in Uganda's Murchison Falls National Park. Scientists have found that there may be four species of giraffe, not just one as previously thought.HONOLULU, HawaiiSchoolchildren worldwide may now have more African animals to memorize: Four species of giraffe could roam the continent, a new study says.Until now the consensus has been that there’s just one giraffe species, with nine subspecies. But the authors of the study claim they’ve uncovered clear genetic differences among four populations of the long-necked herbivore: the northern giraffe, southern giraffe, reticulated giraffe, and Masai giraffe.“It was surprising to see these different subspecies were genetically so distinct—there was no intermixing,” says Axel Janke, co-author of the study, published September 8 in the journal Current Biology.How could such large creatures be hiding in plain sight? Part of the reason is that scientifically “the giraffe is a neglected species. Only 400 scientific papers have been written about giraffes, versus 20,000 papers on white rhinos,” says Janke, an evolutionary biologist at the Senckenberg Biodiversity and Climate Research Center, in Germany.A global focus on endangered or heavily poached species, such as the elephant, compounded with our fascination with carnivores such as lions, have also contributed to the giraffe’s obscurity, he says. “Despite its size, the giraffe has been completely overlooked.”As the world has turned its attention elsewhere, during the past 15 years numbers of the world's tallest animal have plummeted from an estimated 140,000 to around 90,000 today—what some scientists call a “silent extinction.” (See “Inside the Fight to Stop Giraffes’ ‘Silent Extinction.’”)Giraffe expert John Doherty, who was not involved in the study, says in an email that he welcomes the study “as a valuable contribution to the continuing giraffe taxonomy debate.” But he notes that the authors “are by no means the first to suggest more than one species of giraffe.”In addition, says Doherty, of the Nairobi-based Reticulated Giraffe Project and Queen’s University Belfast, the study’s proposed classification relies solely on genetic data and not important body characteristics or other factors. Considering that, “it would be more than premature to present their findings as definitive.”Doherty also says he supports the authors’ highlighting the “urgent need to address giraffe conservation across the African continent.”The Namibia-based Giraffe Conservation Foundation first approached Janke several years ago about developing genetic markers to distinguish subspecies of giraffes, which live throughout sub-Saharan Africa and look similar.The foundation, which has permits to shoot small darts at the animals to collect useful scientific information, provided Janke and colleagues with about 200 biopsy samples from giraffes throughout the continent.Janke first examined the samples’ mitochondrial DNA—the DNA that’s passed down by mothers—and found that the differences between the giraffe populations “were as large as between that of polar and brown bear,” he says. (Doherty notes that "since brown bears are widely regarded as a species complex that includes polar bears, this is not a valid analogy.”)When Janke analyzed the samples’ nuclear genes—located in the cell nucleus—“one marker after another told us the same story,” he says. “We saw distinct groups.” (See 14 incredible pictures of giraffes.)For instance, all nuclear genes have mutations, and he found that mutations common to one group of giraffes were completely different from those of another group.Janke says he was reluctant initially to name the giraffes as separate species, but the data show it’s “absolutely justified.”“It’s a wonderful thing—something new and cool and big that doesn’t happen that much in science,” says David O'Connor, a conservation ecologist with San Diego Zoo Global, who collaborates with the Giraffe Conservation Foundation.The discovery is also great news for efforts to help giraffes, whose conservation has long been complicated by a lack of scientific knowledge.Knowing what giraffe species exist “help us working in the field to better prioritize what we’re doing,” O’Connor said on Monday at the International Union for Conservation of Nature (IUCN)’s World Conservation Congress. (Related: "Giraffes, Zebras Face Surprising Top Threat: Hunting")Simply naming the species may put pressure on governments to reallocate resources to help giraffes, he says.But Doherty cautions that “an approach based solely on genetic analyses can sometimes undermine rather than reinforce conservation efforts.”For instance, the study suggests that a giraffe called Thornicroft’s be included with the Masai species, though the two populations are separated by large distances and play a vital role in their own habitats. According to Doherty, protecting the two groups independently maintains their evolutionary potential. Lumping them together may “reduce rather than enhance the conservation importance accorded to them.”The two species in the direst straits are the northern and reticulated giraffe species.The northern giraffe—which has three subspecies, the Kordofan, Nubian, and West African—has a combined population of fewer than 5,000 animals. Many live in unstable areas in central Africa, and in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, the Kordofan is being hunted for its tail, which is considered a status symbol.The reticulated giraffe has one of the most rapid declines, O’Connor says, with an 80 percent drop in recent decades because of habitat loss and poaching.Study co-author Janke points out that the IUCN lists the giraffe as a species of least concern, but now that the population of roughly 90,000 is divided into four subsets—including two with fewer than 10,000 animals each—a new conservation status may be warranted.“Hopefully [the new study] will really shine the spotlight on these unique and important animals,” O’Connor adds. “They are really an icon of Africa—they exist nowhere else.”Read more stories about wildlife crime and exploitation on Wildlife Watch. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to ngwildlife@natgeo.com.",
"There are 35,000 Masai giraffes left in the wild today. Their population has fallen by nearly 50 percent in the last 30 years.Scientists have declared a subspecies of giraffe endangered.The International Union for Conservation of Nature (IUCN), the global authority on the conservation status of wild animals and plants, announced Thursday that Masai giraffes, a subspecies spread throughout Kenya and Tanzania, are now endangered, primarily because of poaching and changes in land use.There are an estimated 35,000 Masai giraffes remaining, but their population has fallen by nearly 50 percent in the last three decades. Africa’s overall giraffe population has decreased by up to 40 percent in that same timeframe.Masai giraffes are iconic, says Tanya Sanerib, international legal director for the Center for Biological Diversity. Given that they’re one of the largest subspecies of giraffes, they’re the “quintessential” animal you likely think of when you think giraffes. For this subspecies to be declared endangered is a wake-up call, Sanerib says.“This was devastating news...It really sounds the alarm bell,” she says. “It really indicates that we need to be doing more for giraffes internationally and with whatever tools are available.”This is the first time the Masai subspecies (Giraffa camelopardalis ssp. tippelskirchi) was assessed on its own—previously, it was included as part of the IUCN Red List’s general giraffe listing (Giraffa camelopardalis), which considers giraffes “vulnerable,” a step further away from extinction than “endangered.” Of the nine subspecies of giraffes, Masai and reticulated giraffes are endangered, and Nubian and Kordofan giraffes are critically endangered.Hunting giraffes is illegal in both Kenya and Tanzania, but they are poached for their hide, meat, bones, and tails. An estimated 2 to 10 percent of the population is hunted illegally every year in Serengeti National Park in Tanzania, according to the IUCN. Poaching has increased because of civil unrest and emerging markets for giraffe parts, including tail-hair jewelry and bone carvings. There’s even a belief among some that giraffe bone marrow and brains can cure HIV and AIDS, Tanzanian media have reported. (Learn more about how giraffes in central Africa are being poached for their tails.)Giraffe deaths have also increased because human populations have grown and expanded into what used to be wildlands, leading to increased incidents of crop damage and vehicle strikes. Hunting for bushmeat is also a threat.Giraffes historically have been understudied compared to other threatened species. While thousands of scientific papers have been written on white rhinos, only about 400 cover giraffes, according to giraffe researcher Axel Janke. There are fewer giraffes than elephants left in Africa.“They’re the forgotten megafauna, so to speak,” says Julian Fennessy, co-director and co-founder of the nonprofit Giraffe Conservation Foundation. “They’ve sort of slipped away, sadly, while more attention has been given to elephant, rhino, lion, and other species.” (See more photos of how scientists are working to save giraffes.)We have so much to learn about giraffes, Sanerib says, it would be a shame to lose them. For example, they have complex circulatory systems that could have implications for understanding human’s high blood pressure. Researchers have also found that they hum at night, and they have no idea why.“We have this species that’s going extinct, and we have these phenomenal, really fascinating things about them that we don’t know the answers to,” she says enthusiastically.Although for years there’s been a consensus that there’s one species of giraffe with nine subspecies, evidence of genetic differences has emerged in recent years, suggesting that there are actually four species of giraffe and that the Masai is its own species. Though Masai giraffes aren’t widely recognized as a unique species, Fennessy says categorizing them as their own could reap more conservation benefits. For example, the United States’ Endangered Species Act grants protections to animals at the species level, which means giraffes are not considered endangered by U.S. standards, even though several subspecies clearly are.But overall, Fennessy says this new assessment shines a light on the plight of these animals.“By identifying that they are endangered, hopefully now collaboratively with governments and partners, we can turn the tide before it’s too late,” Fennessy says.",
"A tower of reticulated giraffes grazes in Namunyak Conservancy in northern Kenya. In the last thirty years, giraffe numbers overall have fallen 30 percent.Though every schoolchild knows the tallest animal in the world, giraffes are often forgotten when it comes to conservation.During the past 30 years, the African herbivore’s numbers have plummeted 30 percent. Habitat loss and fragmentation, coupled with poaching, have mostly driven the decline, but because there have been no long-term conservation efforts, it’s hard to know what’s really happening.Making matters worse, scientists know very little about giraffe behavior: how they live, the space they need to survive, where they move, and even why their necks are so long. (See 14 incredible pictures of giraffes.)According to the International Union for Conservation of Nature, all giraffe belong to a single species, which are divided into nine subspecies. But a study published in 2016 challenges his notion, suggesting there may be four distinct species, each of which live in a different part of Africa.If that’s the case, the northern and reticulated giraffe species may each have fewer than 10,000 individuals left on Earth.Known for their unmistakable patterned hides, reticulated giraffe live predominantly in northern Kenya, with some remnant populations possibly living in southern Ethiopia and Somalia. The reticulated giraffe has dropped in number by 80 percent in recent decades due to habitat destruction and poaching. (Related: "Giraffes, Zebras Face Surprising Top Threat: Hunting.")David O'Connor, a conservation ecologist with San Diego Zoo Global; Julian Fennessy, executive director of the Namibia-based Giraffe Conservation Foundation; and the Northern Rangelands Trust, a group of northern Kenyan community conservancies and The Nature Conservancy are all working to untangle the mystery behind their rapid decline. (See "Inside the Fight to Stop Giraffes' 'Silent Extinction.'")Kenya Wildlife Service rangers wait for the tranquilizer to take effect. After five to 10 minutes, the giraffe starts "high-stepping," indicating the drug is working. A team then wraps a rope around the giraffe's legs to bring it down safely.In the first week of June, scientists collared a total of 11 giraffe in Loisaba Wildlife Conservancy and the Leparua Community Conservancy, as well as attached tiny, solar-powered trackers to the bony horn-like structures on top of their heads.The process isn’t easy. During the recent fieldwork, Kenyan Wildlife Service veterinarian Mathew Mutinda darted the shoulder or hindquarters of a reticulated giraffe from both a car and a helicopter. As the drug took effect, the giraffe would start "high-stepping"—resembling the movements of a Lipizzaner stallion. Four men would then quickly and quietly run a rope around the giraffe's legs to bring it down safely. After about 10 minutes, the experts would attach the trackers and release the animal.These GPS trackers will gain critical insight into reticulated giraffes' preferred habitat, their home ranges, and more. Knowing which areas are vital to them at different times of year, as well as how they move across the landscape, is essential to ensuring their survival.If successful, collaring giraffe may assist communities and conservancies to protect these towering icons of Africa.An orphaned giraffe is fed by his Samburu keeper at the Namunyak Wildlife Consevancy in Kenya. The Samburu are traditionally nomadic pastoralists. The community here has been deeply involved in creating and managing the conservancy.",
"For years, Japan has killed about a hundred sei whales annually, claiming the hunts are for scientific research. Earlier this year, Japan announced that it had abandoned its sei whale hunts on the high seas.It was October of 2018, and if Japan didn’t stop slaughtering sei whales plying the waters of the North Pacific and come into compliance with the international treaty that regulates the global wildlife trade, it was going to get punished.The implicit threat, made at a meeting in Sochi, Russia, by the elected panel that handles wildlife trade enforcement matters for the 183 members of the Convention on the International Treaty for Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES), was drastic: Failure to comply, the panel said—couched in the formal language of treaty communications—could shut Japan out of the lucrative, legal wildlife trade. (Learn more: CITES, explained.)If that happened, the other 182 parties to the treaty would no longer recognize any of Japan’s export paperwork as valid, preventing it from participating in the market for the tens of thousands of species managed by CITES. This is the most drastic penalty in CITES’s arsenal.At present, 27 countries have CITES sanctions against them—either bans on trade in all listed species or bans on trade in specific animals or plants. Japan, if sanctioned, would be the 28th.Every three years, CITES hosts a major meeting of all its members. The 2019 meeting begins tomorrow in Geneva, Switzerland, and will wrap up on August 28 after members consider such pressing matters as how to protect amphibians and reptiles that are popular in the exotic pet trade, the future for ivory sales, and trade in African elephants. Discussion about Japan’s sei whale compliance is on the CITES agenda.Sei whales are one of the fastest of their kind, reaching speeds of more than 30 miles an hour. They can live up to 70 years. They’re also endangered, and as such, any international commercial sale of them is banned under CITES. Killing sei whales for scientific research, however, doesn’t contravene CITES.“CITES regulates trade—it does not regulate why, or even how many animals can be included in a lethal harvest,” says Erica Lyman, an international wildlife law professor at Lewis & Clark Law School in Portland, Oregon. “CITES only cares about the use of the specimens, not why they are killed.”Japan had long claimed that its killing of about a hundred sei whales a year was done in the name of science and that the leftover whale meat was sold to fund academic work. But the CITES Standing Committee, the panel tasked with overseeing compliance issues, among other things, reached a different conclusion. It said Japan was primarily selling its sei whale meat commercially and that it must stop.The threat worked. By early 2019, after years of complaints from animal welfare groups and CITES members, Japan says it has stopped its high seas sei whale hunts and will no longer issue CITES-required permits to bring the meat into Japan, so it can comply with the treaty.The machinations around Japan’s sei whale hunts reveal much about CITES. “The objective for sure is to resolve issues in a non-adversarial way and raise issues with a party first,” says John Scanlon, who served as CITES’s secretary general from 2010 to 2018. But, “then there are various steps you take in terms of trying to move a party towards compliance.” The most extreme measure is sanctions.“I think the system that is in place works,” says Ivonne Higuero, the current secretary-general. “I think for many, many years [CITES] has been known as a convention with carrots and sticks. First, we try with carrots to make changes to help parties build capacity if necessary. The last recourse is this discussion about possible threats.”When the CITES treaty was first enacted, in 1975, its drafters didn’t include any provision for punishment for noncompliance. After all, treaties are voluntary, and a country can walk away at any time—indeed, the United States announced in 2017 that it will withdraw from the Paris climate treaty.Twenty-seven countries are now subject to wildlife trade sanctions for non-compliance with CITES. Guinea, for example, has been blocked from commercial trade of the thousands of species listed under the treaty since 2013—largely because of its illegal trade in protected great apes such as the chimpanzee, seen here in Senegal.Late last year, Japan pulled out of the International Whaling Commission, the body charged with setting catch limits by species and locations with the goal of conserving the world’s whales. Japan is now openly taking minke whales in its coastal waters for commercial sales—which the commission would not have allowed—and then selling whale products domestically.­ (It can’t sell them internationally because those sales would be banned under CITES, but the treaty doesn’t apply to sales of species taken from local waters.)Regardless of its participation in the International Whaling Commission, Japan is forbidden from hunting sei whales where many are found—in the North Pacific, far from Japan’s shores. That’s because any commercial fishing of a protected species 200 miles or more from a country’s coast is regulated under CITES, even if a country plans to sell it domestically, explains Susan Lieberman, vice president of international policy for the New York-based Wildlife Conservation Society. Japan has set a sei whale hunt quota of 25 through July 2020, saying it will catch them all within its coastal waters.Japan is in compliance with CITES, Kazuya Fukaya, assistant director in the resources and environment research division of the Fisheries Agency of Japan, wrote in an email. (The agency handles Japan’s marine CITES issues.)During the past few decades, sanctions under CITES have been used “more than a hundred times,” even though that penalty wasn’t officially codified as part of the treaty until 2007, says Scanlon, who now serves as special envoy for African Parks, a conservation nonprofit that manages national parks and protected areas throughout Africa.Sanctions may involve prohibiting a country from trading a specific species. Or in the most extreme cases, such as Japan’s sei whale non-compliance, shipments of all CITES listed species could be banned—even ones intended for scientific research or museum use rather than just commercial sales. Typically, he says, countries faced with sanctions come into compliance within a year.But not always. In the mid-1980s, after reports had been trickling it that the United Arab Emirates (UAE) was flouting CITES and continuing to trade in illegal ivory, rhino horn, and snake skins, among other products, CITES imposed a total trade ban. The UAE then withdrew from the treaty, effective 1988.The UAE rejoined CITES in 1990, and the ban was lifted. CITES imposed another total trade suspension in 2001, when the UAE again was found not to be in compliance. (The sanctions were lifted a year later, after inspections established that the UAE was enforcing the treaty once again.)Because any CITES compliance decision doesn’t require consensus but instead either a two-thirds majority of the members or a majority vote from the Standing Committee, any decision may make some countries unhappy, Scanlon says. Within 90 days of a CITES vote, if any members are dissatisfied with the decision—say, countries selling and buying ivory want to continue that trade despite a ban—both can enter what are called formal “reservations” about the decision. That allows them to continue their specific trade and remain in good standing under the treaty.That exact situation was one that some conservationists worried about at the last triennial CITES meeting, in South Africa. A proposal had been submitted to include all African elephants under the strictest level of protection, effectively preventing any African elephant ivory trade whatsoever. (The proposal did not pass.)But as the CITES Secretariat explained, it if had passed, and countries had objected, “A party entering a reservation against the inclusion of all African elephant populations in Appendix I [which would bar commercial trade] could commercially trade in African elephant ivory to any other party that also entered such a reservation, and do so without violating the provisions of the Convention.”A similar African elephant proposal will be discussed at the Geneva meeting, with a deciding vote on August 28. (Wildlife Watch will report the outcome here.)Conservation groups often point to Thailand for a CITES trade suspension success story. In 2013, CITES members threatened sanctions against Thailand, saying that unless the country shut down its domestic trade in illegal elephant ivory, it would face sanctions across all CITES-listed species. This, Thailand knew, would be a huge blow since it would prevent the export of CITES-listed orchid species—a trade that brought in tens of millions of dollars a year for Thai vendors. Until then, Thai law had allowed ivory from elephants in the country to be sold legally, which, conservationists argued, allowed African ivory to be laundered through its shops.The sanctions threat worked: To remain in good standing with CITES and continue its valuable trade in orchids, Thailand came up with a national ivory plan, changed its laws to protect its elephants, and created strict penalties for any illegal domestic trade of ivory. The wildlife monitoring group Traffic reported a 96 percent drop in open ivory sales in Bangkok between 2014 and 2016."Trade sanctions give CITES its teeth. No process is perfect, but without the ability to recommend sanctions, CITES would be no more than a paper tiger,” says Rosalind Reeve, an environmental lawyer who advises on CITES for the Fondation Franz Weber—an animal welfare group based in Bern, Switzerland, that advocates for a global ban on the ivory trade, among other issues.Some of the 27 countries now sanctioned are penalized because they failed to write their own national legislation to implement and enforce the treaty. Others may be in trouble for a variety of longstanding problems. Guinea, for example, was sanctioned in 2013 for showing no evidence that it was attempting to control its illegal trade in great apes, along with having problems with permitting and making false claims about captive-bred animals. Six years later the embargo, which covers all commercial trade, still stands. Often, poorer countries may get penalized because they don’t have the resources to comply, or the political will, or are hobbled by problems such as government corruption, says the Wildlife Conservation Society’s Susan Lieberman.Afghanistan has had sanctions covering all commercial and non-commercial trade in place since 2013 for its failure to provide CITES with the required annual reports. Lieberman’s group is working with the government of Afghanistan to improve its regulations, implement CITES, and control illegal trade.Peter Sand, who served as the first secretary-general of CITES, from 1978 to 1981, says he generally considers the sei whale story an example of the system working well.“My reservation is that it took so long,” he says. Although the matter was brought to the attention of CITES members more than a decade ago, he notes that it took until 2018 for Japan to officially face the threat of an embargo. Still, he says, “the sei whale case is exceptional because it really targeted a country that was powerful.” That a country such as Japan “had submitted to the CITES procedure is what one can consider a success.”",
"Minke whales, like the one pictured here being brought onshore at a Japanese port, have been targeted as part of the country's "scientific whaling" program.Japan has decided to withdraw from the International Whaling Commission (IWC) and resume whaling in its coastal waters, a government spokesman confirmed. The commission, with 89 member governments, was established in 1946 to conserve whales and manage whaling around the world. It banned commercial whaling in 1986.Although Japan is the main market for whale meat, consumption there is limited—about an ounce per person per year, or about 4,000 to 5,000 tons, according to a report by the Animal Welfare Institute, a nonprofit that seeks to alleviate animal suffering, and the Environmental Investigation Agency, which tracks international wildlife crime.According to Astrid Fuchs, whaling program manager for the U.K.-based nonprofit Whale and Dolphin Conservation, who spoke to National Geographic before the news was confirmed, Japan’s withdrawal would primarily be a political move, sending the message that the country can use the oceans as they please. (Learn more about how the international community recently moved to stop Japan from hunting sei whales.)“For decades Japan has aggressively pursued a well-funded whaling campaign to upend the global ban on commercial whaling," says Kitty Block, president of Humane Society International. "It has consistently failed but instead of accepting that most nations no longer want to hunt whales, it has now simply walked out.”Because Japan is a leading voice among pro-whaling countries, Fuchs says, its withdrawal may inspire other countries, such as South Korea and Russia, to follow suit. (Read how whales are deliberately hunted 'by accident' in some countries.)Under the ban, whaling for scientific purposes—biologists studying reproductive status, stomach contents, and effects of environmental change, for example—is exempt. Japan has long been accused of using that exemption as a cover, with whalers supplying some body parts to researchers and selling the rest of the meat for human consumption.“They’ve been thumbing their nose at the moratorium and the will of international citizens for a long time,” Block says.In a vote this summer during the commission’s annual meeting, Japan’s proposal to allow commercial whaling was rejected.“They put a lot of money into it,” Fuchs says. “Part of the government really expected that they might be able to swing the mood with some countries at the meeting.”After the meeting, officials, including Masaaki Taniai, vice minister for fisheries, and Joji Morishita, Japan’s IWC commissioner, said they’d consider withdrawing from the commission—a threat Japan has made in the past.Fuchs predicted that this time was different. “It very much [sounded] like they’re actually doing it,” she said earlier.Block agreed. “When they don’t get their way at these international meetings, they say they’re going to leave, and they’ve been making that idle threat for many, many years now. This time [seemed] to be a little more vociferous.”By withdrawing from the commission, Japan can no longer take advantage of the IWC’s exemption for scientific whaling in international waters and would therefore have to halt whaling on the high seas. That’s because the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Seas requires its signatories, which include Japan, to work through “the appropriate international organizations” for marine mammal conservation. That’s widely interpreted by legal scholars to mean the IWC—even if a country is not party to the IWC. The one benefit Japan gets by withdrawing is it could likely resume whaling in its own backyard without oversight.A southern right whale encounters a diver on the sandy sea bottom off the Auckland Islands, New Zealand. Adults can reach lengths of 55 feet and weigh up to 60 tons.This would be beneficial for whales in Antarctica—where Japan killed upwards of 300 in 2016, including more than 200 pregnant females—but bad for species in Japanese waters.There’s particular concern about the status of minke whales called the J-stock, found off the coast of Japan and frequently hunted. Minke whales are targeted because they’re relatively abundant, not having been decimated during commercial whaling’s peak years during the 1970s.If Japan were to be more open about its intent to continue commercial whaling, it might simplify things in some ways, says Natalie Barefoot, a University of Miami law professor and expert in whale law.“We’re having this dialogue essentially pretending that they’re performing scientific research,” she says. “If they change their position and say, ‘Hey, we are, this is what we’re doing. We are commercial whaling’—in some ways, it’s a bit of a relief, because we can have an actual honest conversation on their activities in ocean waters.”By Japan withdrawing from the commission, it will face no formal consequences, but other countries could take matters into their own hands and impose sanctions—for example, by denying Japan access to fishing in their waters. It also means that Japan would no longer be a part of the international dialogue on whaling.“As we become an increasingly global community, it’s better to have everyone at the table, even if you disagree, and just to continue to work,” Barefoot says. “These are global issues we’re addressing, and we need to address them together.”According to commission spokesperson Kate Wilson, in order for Japan to bow out by the end of June 2019, it would need to send formal notification of withdrawal to the U.S. State Department, which would inform the commission secretariat, by January 1.A representative from the U.S. embassy in Japan was not immediately available for comment.The timing of this latest intimation by Japan of its withdrawal from the commission may not be coincidental, Fuchs says. With the holidays season, they may expect less opposition.",
"Gray whales historically were killed for blubber, oil, and meat, but decades of legal protection have helped them recover.Under poaching pressure, African elephants are evolving to lose their tusks. The jaguar trade is flourishing across South America, fishermen are shooting California sea lions off the coast of Washington state, and, even as bear bile farms are being shuttered across Vietnam, operators are allowing their captive bears to starve to death.But the past 12 months have seen some bright spots too:Major international auction houses are no longer selling rhino horn. In response to pressure from environmental groups, both Bonhams and Sotheby’s canceled rhino horn sales in Hong Kong this fall and pledged that they’ll no longer sell any artifacts made entirely or partly from rhino horns. China Guardian Hong Kong, another auction house, also said it will avoid offering rhino horn in future. Christie’s had previously introduced its own ban in 2012, according to a company spokesperson. Now, almost all the top international auction houses no longer support offering rhino horn for sale. (To date, Poly Auctions is the only major auction house in Hong Kong that hasn’t banned rhino horn sales completely. In an emailed statement, Poly Auction Hong Kong Limited said it has strictly complied with Hong Kong law in its sales and that it “objects to any artifacts from illegal plantations and wildlife and will make efforts to reject them in the auction market.”) Hong Kong has long been a popular market for rhino sales; domestic law allows horn auctions in limited circumstances, such as when the paperwork indicates the horns are antiques. Parties to the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES) prohibited the international trade in rhino horn in 1977.Japan can no longer kill sei whales and sell their meat in the name of scientific research. The international community acted in October to help protect the sei whale, one of the world’s fastest cetaceans. The CITES standing committee concluded that Japan’s ostensibly “scientific” catches of the endangered whale in the North Pacific were actually for commercial purposes and must stop. Japan kills about a hundred sei whales annually in the name of scientific inquiry, and then sells the meat, saying the sales fund further research. In response to the CITES decision, the country agreed not to authorize any more killings of sei whales before the next major CITES meeting, in May 2019.Conservation action has allowed certain whales to rebound. International bans on commercial whaling in the North Pacific and Southern Hemisphere are helping some whale populations recover. The global population of fin whales, long categorized by the International Union for the Conservation of Nature (IUCN) as “endangered,” has roughly doubled since the 1970s. Earlier this year, the IUCN downgraded the fin whale’s status to vulnerable. Another whale species historically targeted for blubber, oil, and meat—the gray whale—was also downlisted, from critically endangered to endangered.Hong Kong promised to phase out its elephant ivory trade. In early 2018, the city-state approved a plan to end sales of elephant ivory by the end of 2021. Hong Kong is a major hub for ivory sales, and environmental groups say shutting down this market—alongside Hong Kong’s decision to enforce harsher punishments against smugglers—could help combat the poaching of tens of thousands of African elephants every year.China’s ban on ivory trade went into effect on the final day of 2017. Hong Kong pledged to phase out its own sales by 2021.China’s ivory trade ban is now the law of the land. Much of the world’s ivory demand comes from mainland China, where a ban on ivory trade came into force on the last day of 2017, making 2018 the first full year with the prohibition. This action appears to be changing attitudes about buying ivory, according to consumer survey work conducted by Traffic, the World Wildlife Fund, and GlobeScan. That’s the good news. The bad news is that persistent buyers report that they’re continuing to buy ivory at similar rates—they’re just traveling outside of China to do so—underscoring the need for stronger global efforts to curb this trade.Another massive chunk of the Amazon rainforest is now protected land. Colombia’s Serranía de Chiribiquete, which was enlarged by more than three million acres earlier this year, now totals 10,546,692 acres. The world’s largest protected tropical rainforest national park, it was also declared a UNESCO World Heritage site. Located in the northwestern corner of the Amazon Basin, Serranía de Chiribiquete is home to famous cave paintings as well as threatened species including giant otters, giant anteaters, woolly monkeys, and lowland tapirs. Environmental groups hope that the park will remain a bastion against deforestation in the Amazon, even as other parts of the rainforest are losing trees. Between August 2017 and July 2018 more than 3,000 square miles of Brazil’s rainforest was destroyed, largely because of illegal logging, according to its government. Brazil’s newly elected president, Jair Bolsonaro, also campaigned on weakening environmental controls.Serranía de Chiribiquete—the world’s largest protected tropical rainforest national park—was expanded this year by millions of acres.China reinstated its ban on the medical use of tiger bone and rhino horn. In October, Beijing announced that it was lifting its ban on using these animal products for traditional medicine. No scientific evidence that tiger bone or rhino horn can improve human health exists, and no explanation for the decision was given. Environmental groups pointed to the country’s growing number of tiger farms—and the hefty cost of maintaining these animals—as key motivators for China’s action. But after an outcry from environmental groups around the world, the government reversed its decision. A senior official told state media that China would postpone lifting its ban on the legal use of rhino and tiger parts for traditional medicine and research, pending “further study.”",
"A brief story appeared early this year on a news website in Suriname under the headline, “Jaguar teeth found on departing travelers.” The article noted that three Chinese men were arrested in January in possession of the teeth—illegal in Suriname, where jaguars are a protected species. The men were given a “hefty fine” and “sent away.”Despite numerous inquiries to several ministries and the public prosecutor's office, many of the cases's details still weren't available; however, a representative for the Ministry of Physical Planning, Land, and Forest Management, which oversees wildlife issues, said in an email that the men actually were not fined and were allowed to continue on their journey. It's not clear who was responsible for that decision.In China, jaguar teeth are likely used as substitutes for tiger teeth, which are turned into necklaces worn as status symbols or in the belief that they protect the wearer from evil. These teeth were confiscated by law enforcement in Bolivia.Though few details are known, it’s apparent that this case is emblematic of a much larger, well-organized network of international jaguar trafficking, with the cats being “killed to order,” turned into jewelry and a medicinal product called “glue,” and smuggled out of Suriname in carry-on luggage on commercial airlines.The problem was first highlighted by the World Wildlife Fund’s Guianas office in 2010. Now a new investigation by the London-based nonprofit World Animal Protection has provided insights into who the traffickers are, how they work, and the damage they’re doing.China has been investing heavily in Suriname, as it has elsewhere in South America. A wave of Chinese immigration that began about 20 years ago has brought in thousands of people who work as loggers, miners, and shop owners. The Chinese run operations from major road and building projects to huge logging and mining concessions in the interior jungle.Access roads to the logging and mining operations have opened up previously inaccessible forested regions, and the back-and-forth travel of Chinese expatriates facilitates the movement of goods out of Suriname. It’s in this setting that the illegal trade in jaguar products has developed.A photo from social media obtained by an investigator shows a dead jaguar reportedly killed by a miner in Suriname’s interior.“It is certainly likely that the influx of Chinese citizens has expanded the domestic market for jaguar parts in Suriname,” says Pauline Verheij of the nonprofit International Fund for Animal Welfare. She investigated Suriname’s jaguar trade in early 2018, before joining IFAW, and has found evidence of Chinese people buying jaguar parts in Suriname as long ago as 2003. She adds that in addition to the recent wave of Chinese immigrants, Suriname has a sizeable community of Chinese-Surinamese born and raised in the country who also buy and use jaguar products. Some evidence exists that other groups do as well, though on a much smaller scale.“Filipinos are rumored to consume the meat—then you have anyone coming to buy jaguar teeth and fangs [for jewelry]. Sometimes the skins will be displayed by locals,” says Nicholas Bruschi, who led the World Animal Protection investigation. But “it’s the Chinese who seem to be dealing in the high amounts of product.”The main driver of the trade, according to the investigation, is jaguar paste. Alternatively known as jaguar glue, it’s a molasses-like substance made by boiling down the body of a jaguar for seven days. It’s rumored to help with various ailments, from excessive sleepiness to sleeplessness. “There’s absolutely no evidence that jaguar paste cures anything,” Bruschi says.While the origin of its use isn’t known, Bruschi believes that jaguar paste is an adaptation of tiger paste, a traditional Vietnamese “medicine” responsible in part for the massive illegal trade of tigers in Southeast Asia. Although tiger paste is primarily a Vietnamese product, it appears that jaguar paste is made by and sold to Chinese.In Chinese, the word for jaguar basically translates to “American tiger,” and across South America, jaguars are also often called “tigers.” It’s unclear whether Chinese consumers are actively interested in jaguar paste itself, or whether they don’t differentiate between it and tiger paste. It’s also possible that once jaguar paste reaches China, it may falsely be labeled as tiger, according to Bruschi.The process can start in one of two ways. Sometimes a hunter comes across a jaguar or a rancher finds a jaguar stalking his cattle. They could kill the cat and sell it to a middleman for good money. This kind of incidental hunting typically is driven either by fear or by loss of jaguar habitat to ranching, farming, mining, and logging. With less space to hunt for wild prey, the cats are more likely to be tempted by cattle, chicken, and dogs in areas occupied by people.In addition to these opportunistic forms of jaguar hunting, there’s “kill-to-order,” as Bruschi calls it. That’s when someone in Paramaribo decides he needs a jaguar and puts the word out through his contacts in rural areas that he’s looking to buy. Sometimes the bounty is advertised on social media and by phone, the investigation found, and it can be worth more than a rural person may make in a month.It can take multiple shots to kill a jaguar and sometimes hours of stalking the wounded animal before the hunter can fire the lethal bullet, the investigation found. If the jaguar has a cub, it may be left for dead or sold into the illegal pet trade.In Suriname, killing, transporting, buying, selling, even possessing a protected species such as a jaguar is against the law, punishable by up to $134,000 or up to six years in jail, according to Nancy del Prado, an environmental lawyer based in Paramaribo. So getting the jaguar’s body to the capital, where it will be processed, involves a gantlet of transfers, from car to car and safe house to safe house. “It’s constantly kept on the move to frustrate law enforcement,” Bruschi says.Mining in Suriname’s interior has reduced jaguar habitat, which has brought the cats into contact with humans more often. Miners may shoot a jaguar out of fear or to protect their dogs, or to fill a bounty offered by a jaguar trafficker.Once the jaguar gets to Paramaribo, it’s usually kept in a Chinese-owned shop. These businesses are less likely to be investigated by law enforcement because the Chinese community wields so much influence, says Els van Lavieren, with the Conservation International Suriname office, where she’s been investigating the trade for the past two years. “The Chinese community here runs all the shops. All the supermarkets are run by Chinese. They’re important in the economy of Suriname.”The jaguar will be cooked down into paste, which is put into small containers that smugglers pack into carry-on luggage, often alongside Tiger Balm, a strong-smelling ointment commonly used by athletes to soothe muscle pain. The Tiger Balm helps throw airport sniffer dogs off track, according to the World Animal Protection investigation.“A lot of Chinese people traveling back to China from here are involved in the smuggling,” van Lavieren says. “They’re going back anyway, so they’re taking some [jaguar products] to get some extra cash.”In China, Bruschi says, the jaguar paste is sold within friend and family networks, though he says he wants to do more work to better understand that side of the trade.Jaguar teeth—“by far” the most valuable body part, according to Verheij—are also an important part of the trade. They're sold mostly to Chinese, both in Suriname and China, as necklaces. The illegal trade in jaguar canines has also been identified in Bolivia and elsewhere in South America.The whole process, from beginning to end, is “very sophisticated,” says a Surinamese park ranger, who asked to remain anonymous to protect his ongoing investigation into the trade. “They know exactly what they’re doing.”Vanessa Kadosoe, of the National Zoological Collection of Suriname, who’s doing research on Suriname’s jaguar numbers, worries about what will happen to the forest if jaguars disappear. As an apex predator, jaguars control the populations of herbivores, such as deer and agouti, a type of rodent. Without jaguars preying on the plant eaters, their numbers could explode, which in turn could wipe out plant species and possibly lead to their gobbling up people’s crops. “If you take out the top predators, you’ll have the whole system come tumbling down,” she says.A remote camera captures a 10-month-old jaguar cub in Brazil’s Pantanal, one of the last bastions of the species. (Read National Geographic magazine's "The Shrinking Kingdom of the Jaguars.")A reliable estimate of the number of jaguars in Suriname doesn’t yet exist, but evidence suggests that poaching is taking a toll. The park ranger says he gets a call from informants about the shooting of a jaguar roughly every two weeks, and photos of dead jaguars show up on social media with some regularity. And Bruschi says that, anecdotally, certain areas are having fewer jaguar sightings.“My assessment, based on several sources, is that the number of jaguars killed for their parts in Suriname may amount to well over a hundred on an annual basis,” Verheij says. “It doesn't take a biologist to understand that these numbers are hugely unsustainable.”“Enforcement is one of the biggest improvements we can make because at the moment there’s so little enforcement going on that people aren’t even afraid to show pictures on Facebook with their guns and jaguars they’ve shot,” van Lavieren says.It’s unclear how many arrests have been made for charges relating to selling and smuggling jaguar parts. In an email to National Geographic, the representative from the Ministry of Physical Planning, Land, and Forest Management said that they do keep statistics on arrests and convictions that the records aren’t digitized and “it would take some time to extract specific information regarding jaguars.”In her review of media reports on jaguar-related arrests, Verheij found that most offenders have been let off with a fine—as was the case with the three Chinese men in January—rather than being prosecuted to the fullest extent the law allows. She also says customs controls at the borders should be beefed up and that the government needs to better fund its nature conservation division so it will have the staff, resources, and equipment necessary to do patrols and carry out investigations.Kadosoe agrees. She wants to see rangers posted on the roads again, doing vehicle checks as they used to in the 1980s. More such monitoring would make some people think twice before illegally transporting a jaguar.At present, according to the ranger, he and his colleagues are handicapped. He says there’s not even enough fuel for them to go out on patrol, given that they’re each usually allocated only 30 liters—not even a full tank—for each of their three cars for the entire month.“What can you do with 30 liters of fuel in the forest? You can drive to the airport and come back. You can’t go farther to check out the hunters, the poachers, the logging areas,” he says. “I’m doing this on my own.”The ministry acknowledges that resources are scarce, but it says patrols do take place. “Our wildlife rangers carry out regular patrols, but there is enormous ground to cover and a relatively limited budget to work with,” the written statement says. It also acknowledges that there’s no specific strategy for jaguar conservation at the moment, though it says some proposals are pending that would specifically address jaguar protections.The good news is that because most of Suriname is untamed jungle, jaguars still have naturally protected areas—for now. But for a long time Suriname has wanted to build a road straight through the jungle to connect Paramaribo in the north to the border with Brazil in the south, which would open up remote swaths of jaguar habitat.Already a Chinese company has paved a road part of the way there.",
"Fewer than 4,000 tigers remain in the wild, but more than 8,000 are held in captive facilities in Asia. Investigations have shown that many of these facilities breed and slaughter tigers for the illegal trade.In the living room of a house at the end of a narrow country road in central Vietnam, a little way off the main highway, the skeleton of a tiger was laid out on the floor—the only complete one they had for sale, the man told the pair of visitors.It was an attractive offer for someone looking to make tiger bone wine, a coveted brew made from bones soaked in rice wine, but what the visitors were interested in were the live tigers.After some discussion, they were taken to a nearby house. Whoever owned it clearly had some money. It was nicely painted, with a large cement front yard, plenty of trees, and several expensive SUVs out front. It was guarded by a high steel fence.The group passed through the living room and walked toward the back of the house. There, a woman removed a piece of the wall to reveal a hidden door. Behind it were three tigers, each in a cage, locked in darkness. A basket containing a few hundred chicken heads sat nearby. One of the tigers could be heard grunting, padding back and forth in his cage.There were more tigers in the backyard, the woman said, inviting the visitors to sit down to tea in the living room, where she made the offer. They could buy one of the tigers, whose price is determined per kilogram, plus an extra fee for processing the skin. Delivery to any of several cities in China was included in the base price, and for no extra, the buyers could also have the bones, teeth, genitals, and claws if they wished.They told the woman they’d think about it. Then they left.The visitors were undercover investigators with the Wildlife Justice Commission (WJC). This nonprofit based in the Hague works to expose the criminal networks behind the illegal wildlife trade, and since 2016, WJC’s Operation Ambush has been focusing on captive tiger facilities in Southeast Asia. They’ve shared with National Geographic several case briefings, photos, and video clips—a body of work that provides a rare inside look at one of the industries behind the multibillion-dollar black market in wild animals and their parts.The Wildlife Justice Commission’s undercover investigators visited a house in Vietnam that had eight tiger skins (two pictured) and a taxidermied tiger.From elephant ivory to orchids, the illegal wildlife trade touches tens of thousands of species around the world. It’s become increasingly sophisticated, with organized networks obtaining, transporting, selling, and bribing their way to big profits. The illegal trade in captive tigers and their parts is just one piece of it.Fewer than 4,000 tigers likely remain in the wild, but as many as 8,000 are held in captive facilities across China, Laos, Thailand, and Vietnam. Some of these are licensed by national governments and are open to the public, marketed as zoos, conservation centers, and tourist entertainment venues. One example is Thailand’s infamous Tiger Temple, which operated under the guise of tourism. Many facilities are akin to factory farms, speed-breeding tigers like livestock to satisfy mainly Chinese and Vietnamese demand for their parts. Others are small-scale basement or backyard businesses existing outside the law.Captive tiger facilities in Thailand that have been accused of illegally trading the cats or their body parts often operate under the guise of entertainment and tourism, such as the Tiger Temple, which was raided by authorities in 2016 and shut down. Its owners are now planning to open a zoo.The bones of captive tigers are often used for wine or medicinal paste; the skin is used for furniture upholstery and décor such as rugs or wall hangings, and the teeth may be set in gold and turned into jewelry. Being able to wear, display, or consume tiger products is a coveted status symbol among some Chinese and Vietnamese.Tiger breeding centers started in China in the mid-1980s as an effort to reduce poaching of wild tigers, but conservationists say they only exacerbate it. “The very existence of these facilities could potentially invite poaching from the wild to stock them,” says Kanitha Krishnasamy, acting director of the Southeast Asia office of TRAFFIC, the wildlife trade monitoring organization. Furthermore, their existence helps erase any stigma associated with using the parts of such a highly endangered animal, she says.The commercial international trade in tigers and their parts has been banned since 1987, after a vote by the countries party to the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES), an international treaty regulating the wildlife trade. In 2007 the CITES parties approved a measure stating that tigers shouldn’t be bred for trade.Yet captive tigers are showing up alongside wild tigers in the illegal trade. The London-based Environmental Investigation Agency (EIA), which tracks confiscations of tigers and tiger parts, estimates that nearly 38 percent of live, frozen, and taxidermied tigers seized by law enforcement between 2010 and mid-2018 were from captive sources, judging by the condition of the skins and the circumstances in which they were trafficked.Much of the illegal international tiger trade goes to China and Vietnam, but these tiger heads were seized by law enforcement in the U.S. and are now stored at the National Wildlife Property Repository, in Colorado.The house in Vietnam with the tigers in the hidden back room appeared to be a family operation. “This is one of many small households [in Vietnam] keeping a number of tigers,” says Doug Hendrie, who heads the wildlife crimes unit of Education for Nature - Vietnam (ENV), which has been investigating Vietnam’s captive tiger trade since 2007.Most of Vietnam’s captive tigers are in licensed public and private zoos, many of which are suspected of supplying the illegal trade, but the province of Nghe An, in north-central Vietnam, is known for having a number of illegal basement and backyard tiger operations. That’s where WJC went.Investigators with the nonprofit Education for Nature - Vietnam took this photograph of a tiger in a barren enclosure at a farm in the country in 2016.The older sister of the woman who made the offer to the undercover investigators had explained that as buyers they’d be invited to witness the killing to ensure that it was the agreed-on animal. They’d need to pay a 30 percent deposit to her Chinese bank account ahead of time and the remaining 70 percent after the tiger’s parts were delivered to China.“Both [sisters] were very relaxed,” says one of the WJC investigators, who posed as a Chinese buyer. “It’s just a way of doing business for them. It’s just a way of making money.”While much of the demand for tiger parts comes from China, Vietnam has its own long history with tiger consumption. Tiger bone paste, a traditional medicine, is a uniquely Vietnamese product, Krishnasamy says. The domestic trade of tiger parts within Vietnam is illegal, and tiger bone paste is one of the main drivers of the illegal trade within the country.Tiger bone paste is used in traditional Vietnamese medicine and is the main  driver of the illegal tiger trade in the country. It’s made by stewing tiger bones for seven days and drying the remaining substance into blocks.Usually the process begins with a broker assembling a group of people who agree to buy a tiger together, Hendrie says. The broker finds a tiger trader, handles the financial transaction, and sees to the delivery. The buyers then gather for the cooking.The broker is also in charge of hiring a tiger bone “chef,” a specialist who makes the paste. The person boils the tiger bones, likely along with the bones of several other animals, for seven days, Hendrie says. The resulting brown substance, the consistency of porridge, is poured out, dried, and cut into bricks. Each buyer then gets a certain number of bricks, which are kept, sold, or given as gifts. Bits of brick are usually shaved off and mixed into wine and drunk, according to Hendrie.When the WJC investigators first went to Vietnam, the younger sister told them, “My family has the most tiger skins.” During one meeting, she showed them a back room where four tiger skins were strung up on wooden pallets, two dried skins were rolled up nearby, and another two skins were soaking in some sort of disinfecting liquid. There was also a ninth tiger, whole and taxidermied.To keep up with demand, she said, they sometimes import tigers from Laos. Vietnam’s western neighbor is another hot spot for captive tiger breeding and the illegal trade, so WJC also sent investigators there.One place they went was Muang Thong, a notorious Laotian tiger farm, with links to international trade going back years. In 2009 a manager at Muang Thong told Target magazine, a Laotian publication, that “foreign business people came here to view tigers at the farm, but they did not decide to buy since [the] tigers were not big enough for export.” Commercial exports would have been illegal.The magazine also linked Muang Thong to Vinasakhone, a Laotian company that the Guardian revealed in 2016 as one of a small number of businesses the government authorized to move volumes of protected wildlife through certain border crossings, in contravention of both CITES and Laotian law. In 2016 the CITES secretariat reported a site visit to the “Vinasakhone tiger farm," and a representative confirmed to National Geographic that the facility is also known as Muang Thong.The Guardian also reported that it reviewed compelling evidence that Vinasakhone had been illegally killing and selling tigers to buyers in Vietnam, China, and the “Golden Triangle,” where Laos, Thailand, and Myanmar meet and where trafficking of humans, wildlife, and drugs is rampant.The Muang Thong manager who spoke to WJC investigators explained that tigers are killed to order. A potential buyer, usually Vietnamese, he said, arranges with the farm owner to visit the facility and choose a tiger. The tiger is killed, usually by lethal injection. Then a butcher—buyers usually bring their own—processes it.“It’s about overseeing the whole process,” says Sarah Stoner, head of WJC’s intelligence unit. “You buy the whole animal as a commodity, and you can do whatever you want with it from there.”One of the Vietnamese sisters also told investigators that they sometimes get tiger cubs from Africa. According to a recent report by two South African NGOs, the country has at least 56 captive tiger facilities. Vietnam has reported receiving more than 50 live tigers from South Africa since 2010, according to CITES trade data. South Africa also exports lion bones to Southeast Asia, which experts like Krishnasamy believe are passed off as tiger bones and enter the illegal trade. From 2008 through 2015, nearly 98 percent of lion skeletons exported from South Africa went to either Vietnam or Laos, according to the nonprofit welfare and conservation group Born Free Foundation. One of the importers in Laos—Vinasakhone.A camera trap recorded this tiger in a wildlife sanctuary in Thailand. In Vietnam and Laos, tigers are functionally extinct in the wild.In May Laotian Prime Minister Thongloun Sisoulith announced an order prohibiting the establishment of new wildlife farms and recommended existing ones be turned into zoos and safari parks. It followed a pledge at a CITES meeting in 2016 in which the government said it planned to start looking for ways to close down its tiger farming industry.“This [order] is of serious concern as it indicates that the owners of [the six known] farms, all of which have been implicated in illegal trade, will not face prosecution,” said Debbie Banks, who heads EIA’s tiger program, in an email. “Secondly, if this is the model we have seen in Thailand—where tourists are able to interact with tigers, breeding continues at rapid rates, and multiple facilities have been implicated in illegal trade out the back door—there is serious concern that similar illegal trade and breeding will continue in Laos.”The Laotian government did not respond to requests for comment.Muang Thong has already split in two, with one of its new enterprises becoming an entertainment-oriented tiger center.Vietnam, as part of its new penal code this year, made the possession of tigers a criminal offense and raised the maximum penalties for transporting, trading, and trafficking tigers and other endangered species. Nevertheless, Hendrie says, many zoos in Vietnam are still licensed to possess and breed tigers, assuring a ready source for years to come. The Vietnamese government and environmental police did not respond to requests for comment.Vietnam has laws robust enough to crack down on the illegal tiger trade, but enforcement is often lacking because of limited resources, lack of expertise in combating organized crime, and, at times, corruption, according to Stoner.There’s also another hurdle: “From our experience, Vietnamese tiger owners and traders tend to be more suspicious of Vietnamese buyers than Chinese buyers, which has made it difficult for Vietnam’s police to send in undercover agents,” says WJC’s chief of investigations, who stays anonymous for security reasons. It’s much less likely that a Chinese person would be an undercover police officer, he says. That’s why WJC always shares intelligence with law enforcement and offers to work with them, including “lending” undercover operatives.The organization is working with Vietnamese law enforcement on this case, and Operation Ambush is ongoing. Usually WJC doesn’t share much publicly before cases have concluded, but the commission believes it’s important to immediately shine light on the brutality of the Southeast Asia’s tiger trade and the urgent need to address it.“Everybody [in this village] knows what they’re doing,” says the investigator who visited the house in Vietnam and spoke to National Geographic. And yet the business continues to operate.",
"A downpour during the night had turned the greenish water of Río Quendeque angry and red with fresh mud, and the clouds looked ready to burst again any moment. Thankfully, we had the good boat, the one with the “roof”—an awning where giant Amazonian spiders and iridescent beetles were hanging out. I was on patrol with rangers from Madidi National Park in Bolivia, who were searching for clues about a growing problem in the rain forest.Madidi, a bit smaller than New Jersey, is a stunning natural trove, with more than 11 percent of the world’s bird species and 200 species of mammals. Even in the rainy season, when waist-deep mud can hobble you and insects seem hell-bent on eating you alive, it’s magical. Scarlet macaws swoop overhead, swarms of green-blue Urania moths blanket mud puddles, and the giant trees that loom over all are so lush they block out the sky.The park is also home to the jaguar, the mysterious spotted cat of the jungle that once roamed from the southwestern U.S. through Argentina. Jaguars have lost swaths of forest habitat to ranchland, farmland, and illegal logging, and they’re often shot by people who fear them (even though jaguars very rarely attack humans) or who worry that the cats will kill their cattle (which they sometimes do). And now jaguars are facing a new threat: poaching for the illegal trade in wildlife.Nowhere, perhaps, is this threat more evident than in Bolivia, where postal service employees have confiscated hundreds of jaguar teeth being smuggled to China. In separate court cases, two Chinese men are being tried on charges related to jaguar trafficking. And in towns across northern Bolivia, radio stations air advertisements by men with Chinese accents offering to buy jaguar parts from local people.Hunting jaguars, as well as buying, selling, and even possessing jaguar parts, is illegal in Bolivia and has been for years. So is trading in jaguar parts commercially across international borders. But in Bolivia it’s often easy to get away with. Law enforcement is weak, and the price of teeth is high—sometimes $100 to $200 a tooth.“People see it as a way of making money,” says Nuno Negrões Soares, a biologist with a Bolivian conservation organization. “They know they’re not going to get in trouble.”China’s appetite for jaguars seems to be growing, given that tiger parts—especially teeth, which are worn as jewelry to show off wealth or as protection against evil—are increasingly hard to come by as those endangered cats get scarcer. Meanwhile, Chinese investment and infrastructure deals with Bolivia have brought an influx of Chinese workers, spurring more illegal activities, including jaguar trafficking, according to Anaí Holzmann, a jaguar conservationist in Bolivia.“The workers know they can make extra money selling wildlife to China,” she says. “So they do that, sometimes with the help of Bolivians and other Chinese, like people who own restaurants and nightclubs.”On our river patrol we came across an indigenous man in a boat laden with bananas. He noticed the rangers’ uniforms as our boat pulled alongside his. After some small talk, Marcos Uzquiano, Madidi’s director, turned the conversation to jaguars.“A Chinese guy” came to his village last year, the man said. “He was looking for teeth and heads.”Uzquiano told me later that he suspects the Chinese man is the same person he’d heard was going from ranch to ranch in nearby villages, offering money to livestock owners for the skulls and teeth of any jaguar they killed. But Uzquiano’s jurisdiction is limited to the park.Local police, state police investigators, and the federal ministry of environment have the authority to crack down on illegal trade in towns and cities throughout the country. Bolivian officials say it’s important to stop the illegal jaguar trade, but efforts so far have been disjointed and ineffective, according to conservationists, scientists, and government employees.“I believe the government’s efforts are not sufficient,” says Angela Nuñez, a biologist who used to work for Bolivia’s biodiversity department, focusing on jaguar trafficking. “Political interests are put first. It seems the priority is to maintain good relations between Bolivia and China.”Two of a kind, a pair of red-and-green macaws glide near the riverside cliff where they have made their nest—an unusual home for the birds, which typically live in tree trunks.In the case of Yan Yixing, a Chinese national known locally as Javín, police found jaguar heads and teeth during a raid on his home in 2014. He remained free on bail for three years after his arrest, his trial having been delayed several times. In September the trial finally proceeded. He was convicted and is now filing an appeal.Biologists say it’s not too late to save jaguars in Bolivia, where they’re thought to number between 4,000 and 7,000. But that requires a sustained, coordinated effort by the government to curb illegal activities, work closely with Chinese companies, and see prosecutions through.For now, however, trafficking in the parts of one of South America’s most iconic animals remains a low-risk, high-reward business.",
"Maestro Juan Flores’s apprentices brought my passport to the spirit world of jaguars in a small plastic chalice. It contained “la medicina,” a syrupy brown decoction of chacruna leaves and ayahuasca vines boiled down for two days and then decanted into old water bottles. At the start of the ceremony, the maestro consecrated the brew with exhalations of mapacho smoke, the wild Amazonian tobacco. And then he began filling the chalice, pouring doses of several ounces for each of the congregants.We waited on mats with blankets and plastic vomit buckets under the thatched roof of a large open-air pavilion called a maloca.There were 28 of us—from the United States, Canada, Spain, France, Argentina, and Peru. We had all come in search of something to this remote outpost in the Peruvian Amazon built on the banks of a strange, lethally hot stream called the Boiling River. Some were hoping to find cures for serious afflictions; some were searching for direction; others simply wanted a glimpse into another world—the most esoteric corner of what Alan Rabinowitz broadly calls the “jaguar cultural corridor.” This domain encompasses the habitats and migration paths that his conservation organization, Panthera, is trying to protect to ensure the survival of the estimated 100,000 jaguars and the vitality of their gene pool.Small bats zigzagged in the rafters. Two dangling bulbs held back the darkness of the forest. The medicine was doled out silently over the drone of the river, where wraiths of steam swayed in eddies of cool night air. When the apprentices came to me, I got onto my knees, an old Roman Catholic habit maybe, or just what everyone else was doing. One apprentice handed me the chalice, another stood by with a glass of water. As you might before stepping off a cliff, I hesitated, thinking of what the well-known curandero Don José Campos had told me in the busy Peruvian port of Pucallpa a few days before.“You don’t take ayahuasca,” he said. “It takes you.”I tipped the cup and drank.I had to come see Maestro Juan at Mayantuyacu, the shamanic healing center he founded in the 1990s, hoping to learn more about jaguars, particularly those aspects of the animal that can’t be captured in camera traps. Panthera onca are the apex carnivores of North and South America. They are at once regal and ferocious, unrivaled in stealth, at home in rivers, on jungle ground, and in trees, their eyes glittering in the dark with the tapetum lucidum cells of their night-vision retinas. They have the most powerful bite, relative to their size, among the big cats. And, uniquely among the big cats, they bite the skulls rather than the throats of their prey, often piercing the brain and causing instant death. Their guttural, grating roar suggests nothing so much as the bass note of the life force itself.But for thousands of years jaguars have had a double life—a figurative existence that dominates the art and archaeology of pre-Columbian cultures across much of the species’ historical range, from the southwestern U.S. to Argentina. Jaguars were worshipped as gods by the Olmec, the Maya, the Aztec, and the Inca, who carved jaguar effigies into their temples, their thrones, their pot handles, the spoons they made from llama bones. Images of the jaguar were woven into shawls and funeral shrouds of the Chavín people, whose civilization emerged in Peru around 900 B.C. Some tribes in the Amazon drank jaguar blood, ate jaguar hearts, and wore jaguar skins. Many believed that people could transform into jaguars and that jaguars could become human. To the Desana of northwestern Colombia, the jaguar was the manifestation of the sun; to the Tucano, the cat’s roar heralded rain. The Mayan word balam denotes both jaguars and priests or sorcerers. Among the Mojo people of Bolivia, the prime candidates for the job of shaman were men who had survived a jaguar attack.Even today, when the species has been pushed out of more than half its original range, modern signs of this ancient intimacy are everywhere. Each August, for example, in a festival called Tigrada, residents of the southwestern Mexican city of Chilapa de Alvarez petition the jaguar god Tepeyollotl for rain and abundant crops by parading through the streets in jaguar masks and spotted costumes. The image of a snarling jaguar can be found on everything from cans of one of Peru’s most popular beers to beach towels, T-shirts, backpacks, rickshaws, fish shops, and gay bars.Certainly the most mysterious aspect of the jaguar’s double life lies in the domain of the shaman and those extraordinary states of consciousness that aboriginal people of the upper Amazon have for millennia explored by way of psychotropic plants. In this occult realm where native healers claim they can trace the origin of all diseases and find cures with the help of spirits, the jaguar reigns as an ally, a guardian, a vital presence that can help cast out illness, catalyze transformations, and ward off dark forces. Among the cornucopia of Amazonian spirits said to dwell in lakes and rivers, in animals, and in the estimated 80,000 plant species that compose one of the planet’s most prodigious ecosystems, the jaguar is first among equals.Mayantuyacu lies about 30 miles southwest of Pucallpa. “There wasn’t a road here four years ago,” said Andrés Ruzo as our truck turned off the clay and gravel highway onto a rough track over ground recently deforested by ranchers. At the bottom of a steep hill was a sanctuary of cabins and thatched-roof buildings set among trees echoing with the burble and peal of oropendola birds. Ruzo had gotten to know Mayantuyacu and Maestro Juan over the course of seven years studying the Boiling River as a Ph.D. candidate at Southern Methodist University, supported in part by grants from National Geographic. Water heated deep underground wells up through faults in the Earth to feed the stream, roughly four miles long. Parts of it (some over 200°F) are hot enough to kill any creature that falls in.For generations locals have recognized this geological anomaly as a spiritually significant place. Most steered clear of it—afraid of the spirits that inhabited its vapors and the physical jaguars lurking in the surrounding forest. But curanderos, as many prefer to call themselves, have long been coming here to partake of its powerful medicine. Students of a different kind of science, they learned their medical botany in a process called “dieting,” in which they consumed and studied the effects of various preparations made from leaves, roots, barks, and sap. Their curriculum also drew on knowledge gleaned under the influence of ayahuasca, the psychotropic mother medicine central to the spiritual life of more than 70 indigenous tribes and mestizo cultures in the Amazon.On our second evening at Mayantuyacu, Ruzo took photographer Steve Winter and me up to the cabin to meet Maestro Juan, one of the more famous curanderos in Peru. He was stretched out in a hammock, wearing only pants and smoking a mapacho. At 67, he seemed a man of few words, measured, stoic, watchful—fluent in Spanish but not the sort of person you could know too quickly or pepper with questions. He has 14 children, ages 13 to 30. Some are now working at Mayantuyacu. He grew up in the tiny village of Santa Rosa, 10 miles east of the Boiling River, the son of a curandero. On a day his father happened to go out without his tobacco pipe and the protection of the master tobacco spirit, he was killed by a falling tree.Juan was 10 then, but was able to continue his education when a curandero from the Ashaninka tribe accepted him as an apprentice. He went on to study with healers from many tribes and backgrounds. He founded Mayantuyacu after a brush with death when he stumbled into a hunter’s trap and a blast from a rigged shotgun injured his legs, shattering a tibia. By the time he was carried to a hospital, he’d lost so much blood the doctors thought he might not live. They were sure he’d never walk without crutches.A nurse suggested that a great curandero ought to be able to heal himself. So a week after the accident he took up his crutches and made the arduous pilgrimage up the Pachitea River and through the forest until he found a Came Renaco tree angled precariously over the Boiling River, its branches shrouded in steam. From the tree, he prepared bone-strengthening treatments. In a matter of months, he had the full use of his legs. Soon afterward, he married the nurse who had challenged him, and together they founded Mayantuyacu near the Came Renaco tree.But now, more than two decades later, the health of the whole region around him is in decline. Much of the surrounding forest has been logged or burned off for cattle. The horizon is frequently flagged with plumes of black smoke. Most of the animals have been hunted out. Even ayahuasca vines are harder to find—Mayantuyacu now imports them from other parts of Peru or Brazil. In 2013, the year the road was built, the Came Renaco tree Maestro Juan had found fell into the Boiling River and died.Winter pulled out his laptop to show our host the jaguar photographs he’d taken in the Pantanal in Brazil. The curandero smiled and softened his guard. It was as if he were looking at snapshots from a branch of his family that had moved away. He seemed boyishly delighted watching video of a jaguar dive into a river and come out dragging a 150-pound caiman up the bank in its jaws.When the show was over and Winter closed the computer, Maestro Juan lit a mapacho.“The last jaguar in this area was killed two years ago,” he said. Most of the people at Mayantuyacu, his apprentices, the workers who prepared the ayahuasca vines, had never seen jaguars except when they were summoned during ceremonies and arrived in visions. For them the cat existed only in the spirit world.Maestro Juan said he often called jaguar spirits to guard the entrance of the maloca during ceremonies. There were two: one associated with the spotted jaguar, known as the otorongo, and the other one tied to its much rarer variant, the black jaguar, which he referred to as the yanapuma. He said he would call them at the next ceremony.I had a question that seemed painful to ask because it was plain he understood the slow-motion apocalypse unfolding around him—the way of life that was going up in the smoke of burning fields and vanished game, and in the absence of the jaguar’s roar. How can one call jaguar spirits from the forest if the forest has no jaguars?“You can’t erase a spirit,” he said. “The body may have died, but the spirit is still here.”And yet he prayed that the jaguar would return, knowing a jungle with a jaguar is healthier than a jungle without the keen hunter that keeps other species in check. “They are good,” he said quietly. “I hope they will come back.”It had an earthy taste, the ayahuasca in the chalice, acrid-sweet, sort of like molasses. When the last of the portions had been distributed, the lights were doused and darkness rushed in from the forest, darkness that seemed as formidable as the face of the black jaguar whose defiant eyes we had seen close up, burning through the steel bars of a pen in Pucallpa.A half hour later, Maestro Juan, signaling that he could feel the effect of the medicine he drank along with everyone else, began to sing the first icaro, a monotone chant incorporating phrases from various languages plus gibberish vaguely reminiscent of Ella Fitzgerald scatting her way through “Mack the Knife.” He sat cross-legged wearing a long striped robe, a headdress of bright green parrot feathers, and necklaces of large brown snail shells and crimson huayruros seeds and jaguar canines. His song seemed to move the energy through the room.Congregants who were not feeling any effects went up for a second cup, lighting their way to the maestro with their iPhones. Maestro Juan sang a chant that summoned the spirits of certain birds. Sometime later I heard him calling the jaguars to the maloca. I opened my eyes and found he had walked around the circle of mats and was sitting right in front of me.He told me later the jaguars came and sat by the entrance of the maloca but did not stay long. “They were here only a while,” he said. “And then they headed back deeper into the jungle.”I didn’t see them. Ayahuasca didn’t show me jaguars or any other animals of the spirit world.What I did see over the next three hours made for one of the more revelatory experiences of my life. The moment that ayahuasca takes you is called the mareación, literally, “the dizziness,” a phrase that does no justice to the feeling of being ushered into another world, in my case, not the world of jaguar spirits but the secret kingdom of the plants. I felt I suddenly understood what it’s like to worm through the dark, claustrophobic realm of roots; to reach up through cathedral-like vaults of shadow and light like the tendrils of an understory vine. And what it’s like to know, as one intrinsically knows love or grief, that plants are as alive as any animal, simmering with intelligence, with sentience, with what truly seemed a kind of spirit.I felt myself swept up in what the poet Dylan Thomas famously described as “the force that through the green fuse drives the flower,” given to understand that there is a genius in the universe much larger than our own, ascending orders of genius braided into the DNA of every living thing. I heard other people singing out as if in celebration of the same epiphany; voices around the maloca breaking into song—hymns in Spanish sung by Peruvians who lived nearby and came to ceremonies two or three times a week; the chants of Maestro Juan and his apprentices; and some of the most exquisite wordless arias I have ever heard, icaros improvised in the moment, reverberating with joy, glistening like orchids made of sound.I stayed up almost till dawn scribbling in my journal, knowing that nothing I could write would convey the beauty and strangeness of the night, the cascades of insight, the avalanches of laughter that overtook me when I realized the absurdity of my blinkered materialism and the general insanity of city life in New York, where nature is mostly rats, roaches, and the put-upon trees of Central Park. Over breakfast, I sat next to one of Maestro Juan’s former apprentices, who had been stationed on a mat next to mine. He told me that during my laugh riot he had blown tobacco smoke my way, afraid I might be “going loco.” I tried to tell him I had never felt saner.Still, I had to wonder how real it all was. Scientists tend to dismiss ayahuasca as a hallucinogen and attribute many of the cures of curanderos to placebo effects, or the power of suggestion, the skillful shamanic use of set and setting. Spirits can’t be verified or quantified. It made me queasy to recall the young Canadian I’d met who had a cancerous tumor in his leg but had turned down recommended surgery and radiation and was counting on a prescription of plants and insights gleaned from ayahuasca to cure him.By the same token, Maestro Juan’s conviction that nature was teeming with spirits seemed a lot less daft the morning after the ceremony. Not daft at all, in fact. He lived in a world that had not been turned into a machine. Where I might hear the sound of the river as merely water flowing over rock, he heard a chorus of voices, sometimes including the voice of his sister who had drowned in a lake as a little girl only to reappear to him years later in the spirit world as a sirena.Who was to say she wasn’t real? With his medicine, the maestro had shown everyone in the maloca what he knew of another world. What we wished to believe about the reality of it was up to us.So many people from Europe and North America come to Mayantuyacu and other ayahuasca centers in Peru hoping to find some approximation of a “jaguar spirit” in themselves. (For some reason nobody covets an association with a Pucallpa squirrel.) The broader lesson of ayahuasca for me was that the jaguar’s roar is one voice in an ecological symphony, and that too often we focus myopically on charismatic species—the big cats especially—and forget that a crucial part of what they are is where they live and the thousands of other organisms that live alongside them, ourselves included.Some days later Ruzo told me of a vision that one of Maestro Juan’s apprentices had had during the ceremony. He’d seen a jaguar skeleton, lying on its side by the Boiling River, legs, rib cage, skull, perfectly complete. Maestro Juan and Ruzo had discussed the significance of it at length.Maestro Juan took the skeleton to mean that the jaguar—in any form—can no longer protect the forest around Mayantuyacu. He has no doubt now that it is up to him, to Ruzo, to conservationists everywhere who venerate the jaguar’s power and grace, to keep the forest intact.",
"Shadrack Nyongesa’s appointment with the knife was set for shortly after dawn.Since the previous morning, the uncircumcised 14-year-old from the Bukusu tribe in western Kenya had been jingling a pair of feathered cowbells against metal braces lashed to his wrists. As he pumped his arms and danced on a dirt yard under a mango tree outside his father’s house, older friends and relatives paraded around him brandishing sticks and guava branches and singing songs about courage, women, and alcohol.In the afternoon Shadrack and his entourage made a ritual visit to the home of a maternal uncle, who gave him a cow, but not before slapping him in the face and barking that he looked like a sissy, not someone ready to become a man. The boy, who had asked to undergo sikhebo, the Bukusu circumcision ceremony, could not hold back tears. But he looked more angry than afraid, and when he returned to his father’s house, he jingled the chinyimba bells with new vigor and danced with the brio of a bravura showman.Bare-knuckled and poised to punch, boys from the Venda tribe in Tshifudi, South Africa, engage in the boxing tradition known as musangwe. For boys as young as nine, it’s both an outlet for male energy and a check on aggression. Adults oversee the bouts to contain the violence.Drew Moore plunges a knife into a wild hog’s heart while his dad, Peaty, and their dog hold the animal. This is a primordial, intimate form of hunting and one that puts meat in the family’s freezer. Drew, who’s been “sticking hogs” since age six, says when he grows up, he wants to be a biologist.By sundown the party had swelled to more than 50 guests. Men sitting in lantern-lit huts dipped long, reedlike straws into a communal pot of busaa, the corn beer specially brewed for the occasion. At half past nine the crowd formed a circle around the pearly blue guts of a freshly slaughtered cow. One of Shadrack’s paternal uncles sliced open the bloated stomach with a knife. He carved two strips of tissue, then scooped out a handful of greenish, half-digested food. He approached his nephew with his arm cocked.“No one in our family has ever been afraid!” he shouted. “Stand firm!” Flashlights played on Shadrack’s face as he stared into space with the miserable stoicism of a plebe on his first day of military school. And then, in a moment that impressed even people who had seen it many times, the uncle flung the foul porridge at his nephew’s chest and zealously began to spread it on the boy’s face and head. He placed the collar of cow gut around Shadrack’s neck and slapped him hard on both cheeks.“If you fidget or cry out, don’t come back,” the uncle said. “Cross the river, and keep going. You are a soldier now. If someone pokes you in the eye, you do not blink!”For the omusinde—one who is not circumcised—there was now no turning back.For hours that night, Shadrack danced in the eye of the busaa-fueled revel called the khuminya. Elders counseled him on what it meant to be a man, offering moral precepts, explaining the importance of respecting elders and women, and issuing practical advice including an admonishment to steer clear of married girls. He had been given flour, chickens, and small sums of money. His worthiness had been taunted, his resolve questioned. Around midnight he was finally allowed to lay his leaden arms and dung-crusted head down for a rest. He rose at 2 a.m. An hour later he was again doggedly jingling the chinyimba bells and dancing in what seemed the throes of adrenaline. The relatives and friends—some of them pie-eyed from the homemade beer—sang out, “The sun is about to get up! Can you smell the knife? The dawn is almost here!”As I stood waiting for the sun to rise over the Great Rift Valley and the climax of Shadrack’s passage to manhood—a passage crucial to William, his father, whose standing in the community was at stake—I couldn’t help but think of my own father, who had died in June at the age of 91, and my 17-year-old son, Oliver, who at that moment was asleep 7,000 miles away, in New York City. Actually, probably not asleep. Probably lying awake in bed with his laptop on his chest, watching sports documentaries and Hollywood movies bootlegged off sketchy websites.It was impossible to imagine two roads more different for a pair of boys heading toward essentially the same destination. Both Shadrack and Oliver had been masculinized in the womb by a prenatal bath of testosterone. Both were in the midst of a momentous transition, morphing under a fresh influx of the powerful hormone into physically mature men: body hair, defined muscles, bigger shoulders, burgeoning sexuality, an appetite for risk, potentially elevated levels of aggression. Both were coming to grips with behavioral tendencies and patterns that had been programmed by millions of years of evolution.But Shadrack was entering manhood in a culture in which the roles of men and women are still slotted along traditional lines and boys are guided by a ritual that goes back at least 200 years (and immemorially in some neighboring tribal cultures). Oliver, on the other hand, is approaching manhood in an American culture that is lurching toward a gender-neutral society, one that has moved so far from anatomy-based definitions of men and women that the U.S. Departments of Justice, Education, and Defense in 2016 affirmed antidiscrimination policies that recognize a person’s self-assigned gender identity, regardless of the sex ticked on a birth certificate.Unlike Shadrack, Oliver cannot rely on the traditional roles of men and women for an idea of what it means to be a man. In the name of equality, gender stereotypes have been turned inside out or repudiated. There’s nothing startling or unorthodox to him about female cops or male nurses or about a father who stayed home microwaving stockpiles of breast milk while mom went to an office as the prime provider. Oliver’s mom still outearns me and, by the way, has amassed a vastly larger number of Instagram followers.Nor are there, in our milieu, rituals or overt rites of initiation that would clearly mark Oliver’s transition from boy to man. Manhood, in other words, is something he pretty much has to figure out for himself. Sometimes I see him casting about for what it means, looking askance at the example I set because, as he says, “you cross your legs like a girl.” And sometimes when he’s under duress, feeling pressure to perform—quizzes, papers, grades, competition on a basketball court, a time trial on a rowing machine—I can also see him cultivating a sort of stoicism, related in a milder way to what was slapped into Shadrack. Oliver is shy, careful not to show the depth of his feelings lest he appear unmanly. He gave up the flute because he was the only boy in the section. He crosses his legs ankle to knee. His icons of manhood are Michael Jordan and George Clooney. For his 15th birthday, he asked for a suit.Scientists and scholars can’t offer him, or any of us, much clarity. The questions surrounding manhood and its kindred concepts of manliness and masculinity have been embroiled for centuries in politically inflected debates about culture and biology. Anthropologists and sociologists generally come down on the side of culture, believing that manhood is something societies construct. “Men” are made, not born, argues Michael Kimmel, a professor of sociology at Stony Brook University: “Manhood is not a manifestation of an inner essence … [it] does not bubble up to consciousness from our biological constitution; it is created in our culture. In fact the search for a transcendent, timeless definition of manhood is itself a sociological phenomenon—we tend to search for the timeless and external … when the old definitions no longer work and the new ones are yet to be firmly established.”Some feminist scholars and scientists have argued that gender differences are fabrications and so-called male traits are no more intrinsic to boys than the blue Onesies snapped onto male newborns in the hospital. No doubt that’s the case for many gender stereotypes about differences in male and female intelligence, nurturing instincts, rationality, emotions. But like most parents who have raised a boy and a girl, I have to wonder if there isn’t something more than cultural socialization behind behaviors that seemingly appeared without any conscious priming from mom and dad, or anyone else. I’m thinking of Oliver’s very early zeal for throwing balls around—Nerf balls, tennis balls, ball-shaped agglomerations of masking tape. In the streets of Paris we once played catch with a chestnut. By the same token, might there have been something deeper than cultural socialization behind his sister, India’s, penchant for staging elaborate sotto voce conversations between her dolls? Long before she went off to preschool, she would hold a doll in either hand and pass hours whispering doll dialogue like an interpreter in the middle of a treaty negotiation.“Women and men do not have interchangeable minds,” notes Harvard psychology professor Steven Pinker in his book The Blank Slate. Consistent with the selection pressures of having to compete for resources and mates, studies going back decades suggest males do better on mental tasks that involve rotating an object. (Girls have advantages in other problem-solving skills.) Boys tend to be more physically aggressive—more likely to engage in what’s called “rough-and-tumble play.” As Joe Herbert, emeritus professor of neuroscience at the University of Cambridge, notes, boys will play with dolls, but chances are the dolls will be getting into a fight.Some aggressive behavior can be linked to testosterone levels, which, starting around age 10 and peaking in the late teens, are typically more than 10 times higher in boys than in girls. One revealing study published in 2013 in the Journal of Cognitive Neuroscience correlated risktaking behavior with testosterone levels in adolescent boys and girls. The kids in the study could win money by clicking a pump that inflated balloons. But if the balloons exploded, as they were programmed to do randomly, the players would forfeit their winnings. The researchers found that increased testosterone levels were associated with risktaking in both boys and girls. But the boys preferred the thrill of balloon explosions, even though it cost them cash, while the risktaking girls with relatively elevated testosterone levels were more interested in retaining their earnings.Perhaps one of the clearest examples of how biology underlies many elements of masculinity and thus is a factor in the cultural construction of manhood is a rare genetic condition called androgen insensitivity syndrome. Babies are born with a Y chromosome and therefore biologically male, but their bodies can’t process testosterone and so default to the female phenotype. They have features and traits of a woman, smooth hairless skin, minimal body odor, a rudimentary vagina. They feel themselves to be women. But with internal testes instead of ovaries and a uterus, they can’t give birth. The syndrome, Herbert notes in his book Testosterone, is “a glaring demonstration that testosterone is at the root of what we call ‘masculinity.’ ”And so at first light, on the impetus of both Bukusu cultural imperatives and what scientists say is upwards of 1,200 nanograms per deciliter of testosterone coursing through an adolescent male’s bloodstream, Shadrack headed north on foot for the nearby Chwele River. He was surrounded by more than 30 men and boys, and a few cheeky girls who hadn’t yet been shooed away. Songs flowed as the company jogged along red clay roads and fields of corn and sugarcane. At a quarter to seven, Shadrack’s bells and the metal wrist braces were removed. The boy stepped out of his tan shorts. He walked naked down a grassy bank to what was more a swamp than a river. His uncle followed. Hidden in the reeds, Shadrack washed off the cow slime. When he emerged, he was covered with dark gray mud. A sprig of special grass was plastered to his head like the crest of a northern lapwing.Now the company headed south back to Shadrack’s father’s house, moving almost at a gallop along a different route to thwart any possible witchcraft by persons of ill will. They sang the anthem of Bukusu-land, the famous sioyayo circumcision song that insults the rival Kenya tribe of the Luo, whose traditional entry to manhood entailed removing some of a boy’s teeth instead of his foreskin. “Those who fear circumcision should go to Luo-land.”A huge crowd—men, women, girls, boys—was waiting at the compound. Shadrack marched into the yard and stood over a piece of cardboard. He faced west, symbolically overseeing the sunset of his boyhood. Still the showman, Shadrack put his left hand on his hip and thrust his right hand above his head as if he’d been studying the victory celebrations of Usain Bolt. The circumciser crouched at his groin. The operation was over in seconds. Shadrack did not blink or flinch or let on that he felt any pain. In fact, when the circumciser blew a whistle signaling the surgery was done, and Shadrack’s aunt and mother and other women were ululating in joy, Shadrack began to prance about.Shadrack’s father, his uncle, and others rushed up to inspect the job, bending in for a close-up view as if they were double-checking the numbers of a winning lottery ticket. Shivering, perhaps in shock, Shadrack sat down as women wrapped him in colorful shawls.He would spend the next four days convalescing. Traditionally, new initiates in this community are sequestered for four months with a guardian who will teach them how to hunt, build a hut, tan a hide, and become warriors fierce enough to repulse attacks from cattle raiders and stage raids of their own. Though some young Bukusu males still learn these skills, Shadrack would be going back to school when classes resumed in September. “You can be fierce in school,” says Simiyu Wandibba, a Bukusu professor of anthropology at the University of Nairobi. “You can repackage traditional virtues to suit today’s life.”Already Shadrack was being treated with new respect; already he was entitled to a new set of patriarchal privileges. No longer would he be dispatched to fetch water from the river or collect firewood or sweep the family compound. Women preparing his meals now would consider his preferences. With a hut of his own in the family compound, he would no longer sleep in his mother’s house or sit at her feet listening to her stories. And come December, in accord with the old ways, there would be a khukhwalukha ceremony when the traditional period of transition from omusinde to omusani would be complete, and the 14-year-old would be formally presented to Bukusu-land as a full-fledged man.It's hard to watch a Bukusu circumcision ceremony without being whipsawed by a mix of admiration and dismay. Dismay because the kids are … well, kids. I saw five circumcisions in a week, and some of the omusinde were even younger and looked less ready for the ordeal than Shadrack. Is a boy of 10, tempted by the promise of new privileges and pressured to conform, really free to make the decision to undergo this painful and potentially dangerous surgery? And what was done to Shadrack and the others is hardly the extreme of what cultures do to make men of boys. Mardudjara aboriginal boys in Australia are expected to swallow their own foreskins after the cut. Sambia mountain boys in Papua New Guinea push sharp sticks into their nostrils to make their noses bleed and have to swallow semen after oral sex with young men. Satere Mawe boys in the Brazilian Amazon insert their hands into gloves filled with bullet ants (Paraponera clavata) whose neurotoxic sting is said to be among the most agonizing in nature.It’s worth asking: Why? The disquieting answer, of course, is to prepare for war. As anthropologist David Gilmore notes, where resources are scarce and the collective welfare uncertain, “gender ideology reflects the material conditions of life.” Boys are “tempered” and “toughened” so they may fulfill the classic duties to procreate, provide, and protect that men have performed for millennia. Whether it’s marshaled to ward off the aggression of other males or to capitalize on weakness, violence is the leitmotif of manhood in countless cultures. To judge from video games, action movies, hockey brawls, UFC fights, and homicide rates in America, violence enthralls men even where material conditions of life are not dire.What could break the cycle that equates manhood with toughness and stoicism? What might change in men who in their fear of violence—or fascination with it—end up fostering more of it?Dismay aside, I found it hard not to grudgingly admire a culture that gives boys such an unambiguous path to manhood. The steps are clearly marked. The knife and the cut undeniably make the whole business real. “The blood connects us to our ancestors,” one of Shadrack’s uncles told me. Shadrack’s male privileges may entitle him to the supper he prefers, but they also come with obligations and responsibilities, and by some lights the abuse in the ritual may actually help teach the boys not to respond in kind. “If you’ve literally had cow shit thrown at you, you know you can take whatever life throws at you,” says Daniel Wesangula, a Bukusu journalist.Add to that the support from bakoki, the brotherhood of boys who have been circumcised at the same time and belong to the same age-group. “Bakoki are lifelong friends,” Wesangula says. “They will carry your casket and dig your grave. If you are acting deviant, parents will send a bakoki to put some sense into you.”It might be for the lack of meaningful manhood rituals that Oliver’s school recently invited a youth theater group to perform a play called Now That We’re Men. Among the questions on the program: “Who is harmed when [sexual slurs] are thrown around constantly in middle and high school hallways? What is it like to participate in a culture where the most popular video games on the market today award points when players (mostly young males) rape and kill women?”If my son is uncertain about what it means to be a man, I suppose I’m partly to blame for passing along the tradition of unstructured self-discovery that I inherited from my father, who did not buttonhole me for mortifying talks about birds and bees, or show me how to knife a wild hog, or concoct the Connecticut atheist’s equivalent of a bar mitzvah. I don’t know what passed for rituals that ushered me from boyhood into whatever it is I embody now, with a roster of half-baked competencies and a list of things I still can’t do. Rewire a lamp. Shuck an oyster.In my father’s final months last spring, I asked him if he had tried to prepare me for manhood, and when he looked baffled, I asked him if he thought his father had done anything to set him up. More bafflement. I imagine his manhood came courtesy of the U.S. Navy. Toward the end, he couldn’t remember at noon what medical procedures had been performed on him at 11:45 a.m., but he could recall all the shipmates he served with during World War II. He was 19 when he crossed the Pacific on an oceangoing tug. He navigated by sextant, boxed with fellow sailors, and off Okinawa fired his sidearm at a kamikaze. He sailed into Hiroshima Bay two months after the atomic bomb and saw the starkest consequences of men at war, an experience that inspired him to compose a poem that was published in October 1945 in the New York Herald Tribune. It earned him $12, his first wages in a long career as a writer. Protect. Provide. I found a photocopy of the check in his files after he died.Absent rituals, I think manhood in my family must be a code of values, transmitted mostly by example. My father once explained to one of my college roommates, whose family had a ranch in Wyoming, why he didn’t need a gun to protect his family. In a line that now seems not just the high-water mark of a certain kind of liberal idealism but looms as central to my father’s idea of manhood itself, he said: “The day I reach for a gun instead of a lawyer, there will be nothing left to defend.” That seems almost quaint now in an age when man-boys are trotting to class at the University of Texas with pistols in their pants. And I wonder if there is a manhood ritual artful enough to convey the values my father saw in the two artists who shaped his sensibility—the humorist Robert Benchley and the great trumpeter Louis Armstrong—both of whom he revered for their “humor, decency, and joie de vivre.”I don’t know how useful it is for Oliver to know there are a million definitions of what it means to be a man or that he is free to choose his own, to figure out on his own what it takes for a boy to qualify. I hope he grasps the responsibilities manhood entails and rejects the inequities it perpetuates and understands what part is biology, what part culture, what’s estimable and worth conserving, what cries out for change. I hope he becomes a man however he manages to define it and expects no special dispensation for fulfilling that vision of himself. He too has a bloodline of ancestors, somewhere out there in the dust. He could do worse than to set his compass by the polestar of humor, decency, and joie de vivre.",
"Every morning keepers at Chicago’s Shedd Aquarium shake rattles and blow whistles to let Cruz—a 225-pound sea lion—know it’s time for breakfast. He’s blind, so his keepers rely on sound, touch, and scent to guide him around his enclosure.Cruz’s story began in 2013, when rescuers found him stranded on a crowded beach in Santa Cruz, California. The rescue team says he appeared exhausted, underweight, and altogether helpless. But it was his eyes that worried them most—the left one was foggy, and the right eye was missing.The wounded sea lion was rushed to the Marine Mammal Center, in Sausalito, where X-rays revealed several metal shards lodged in his skull. He’d sustained at least one shotgun blast to the head. He was nursed back to health, but because he was no longer able to fend for himself in the wild, the Shedd Aquarium took him in. Today, according to his keepers, Cruz is thriving. (Read about sea lion rescues.)“He was one of the lucky ones” says Madelynn Hettiger, the aquarium’s manager of marine mammals. “If he hadn’t made it to shore, we might never have known about this animal.”This year more than a dozen bullet-ridden marine mammals, including a pregnant bottlenose dolphin, have washed up on U.S beaches. According to NOAA Fisheries, the agency tasked with enforcing protections for marine mammals, as many as 700 California sea lions were found with gunshot and stab wounds between 1998 and 2017. Only a handful of the perpetrators have been charged, all of them fishermen.Sea lions, as fisherman Brand Little knows from experience, are highly intelligent animals, adept at pilfering salmon, sardines, and squid dangling from a hook or caught in a net. We spoke with Little on May 3, the second day of the commercial salmon season, after he’d steered his boat into Santa Cruz harbor to unload his catch—37 king salmon, worth roughly $4,500. It had been a successful outing, Little said. “I only lost one fish.”That fish hadn’t broken his line or wriggled off his hook—it was stolen by a California sea lion. Wherever fishermen go, Little says, sea lions are bound to follow. “You can’t run from them. We picked up and ran for six hours, and they’ll follow you. Six hours! Three of them on either side.”When we asked another Santa Cruz-based fisherman how he keeps sea lions from making a meal of his catch, he said bluntly: “Shotgun.” The fisherman, who agreed to speak on condition of anonymity because he feared legal repercussions, says losing fish to sea lions threatens his livelihood.“I’ll stay out there until my shoulder’s black and blue,” he said, alluding to the bruising from his shotgun’s kickback. “It’s my fishery. I have a right to go after my catch.”For various reasons, including climate change and habitat loss, salmon stocks along the West Coast have been declining for several decades. As a result, fishermen say they can no longer lose fish to what they call “the sea lion tax.”“It gets frustrating,” the fisherman continued. “Sometimes you’re going all day, going around for eight hours. And you’re $150 into fuel for the day, and finally you get a bite. You’re bringing it up, and then you watch a sea lion rip it off.”Sport fishermen also complain about sea lions. “They steal our bait constantly,” said Evan Wagley, owner of Guardian Charters, a San Diego-based sport fishing charter company. The sardines and squid he uses as bait attract sea lions, which have figured out the best way to steal those morsels. “They know that if they swallow the bait whole, they’ll get a hook in their mouth,” Wagley said. “So they just bite the body.”Fishermen have tried everything to ward off sea lions: paintball guns, firecracker “seal bombs,” which are low-yield explosives, even electric cattle prods. “I’ve tried a slingshot,” the Santa Cruz fisherman who asked not to be named said resignedly. “I’ve tried a few things—they don’t care.” In his experience, the only way to keep hungry sea lions at bay is a barrage of bullets. (Read about wacky sea lion deterrents.)Scientists from NOAA have evaluated the effectiveness of a myriad of deterrence methods—ranging from rubber bullets and bottle rockets to recordings of predatory killer whales to scare off sea lions—and concluded that “there is no single non-lethal deterrence method known to be universally effective in discouraging Pacific harbor seals and sea lions from engaging in problem behaviors.”Until the late 1950s fishermen along the West Coast of North America had no compunction about shooting sea lions. Oregon even paid fishermen a bounty of up to $10 per dead sea lion. But by the 1960s sea lion numbers had plunged to the brink of population collapse, and the International Union for Conservation of Nature, which sets the conservation status of species, listed them as very rare.That decline was in part the impetus in 1972 for passage of the Marine Mammal Protection Act (MMPA), which made it illegal to hunt, injure, or harass marine mammals. Sea lions subsequently rebounded, their numbers nearly tripling from just under 90,000 in 1975 to nearly 260,000 in 2014."Sea lion populations are healthy—a sign of the success of the MMPA and other statutes aiding the recovery of ecosystems,” said Penny Ruvelas, who leads the Long Beach branch of the NOAA Fisheries Protected Resources Division.Scientists estimate that sea lion habitat can support up to roughly 300,000 individuals along the West Coast before natural processes would start thinning the population.With sea lion numbers on the rise, the shootings, predictably, haven’t stopped. Filing cabinets in the Marine Mammal Center’s dimly lit basement contain bullets and pellets extracted from injured sea lions and other marine mammals over the years. Between 2003 and 2015 the center’s rehabilitation staff brought in 165 sea lions, two harbor seals, one northern fur seal, and one steller sea lion. Some arrived dead, others alive, but all had gunshot fragments in them. The bulk of the animals came from Monterey Bay during the summer, at the height of the salmon season.Most shootings occur at sea, out of sight of any witnesses. The only evidence may be the bullets in a sea lion’s body, which may wash ashore days or weeks later—or may sink and never be seen at all.Guns aren’t the only weapons used. In 2003 two men in Morro Bay, California, faced criminal charges for attempting to kill a five-month-old sea lion with a crossbow. And in 2007 a man in Newport Beach, California, used a steak knife to stab a six-foot female sea lion to death after the animal allegedly stole bait off his fishing pole.“We know that the records of human-related mortality we collect are a minimum estimate of what the impacts could be,” said Lynne Barre, who leads the Seattle branch of the NOAA Fisheries Protected Resources Division.Occasionally bullet-riddled sea lions are rescued, rehabilitated, and released back into the wild. But some, like Cruz and Silent Knight, a 700-pound male who sustained a shotgun blast to the face that blinded him, can’t survive on their own. Silent Knight is living out the rest of his years in the San Francisco Zoo.The penalties for getting caught killing a sea lion can be up to a year in prison and or a fine of up to $25,000. But unless investigators have video evidence, an eyewitness account, or a confession, it’s next to impossible to track down violators of the MMPA, according to Barre. Since 2003 only five people in California have been convicted for the crime of injuring or killing a sea lion, and in every case an eyewitness was present.Take the sentencing in March 2005 of John Gary Woodrum, the owner of 22nd Street Sportfishing in San Pedro. Two agents working for the NOAA Fisheries Office for Law Enforcement had posed as fishermen on his boat in an undercover sting operation, and they testified that they’d witnessed Woodrum firing his weapon at sea lions off Santa Catalina Island.Woodrum admitted to using his .22-caliber rifle to shoot multiple sea lions. According to court documents, he was fined $5,000, sentenced to two months in federal prison, and ordered to do 250 hours of community service at the Marine Mammal Care Center, in San Pedro. And he was put on probation for one year.Because it’s so difficult to catch people who kill sea lions, and even more so when the fishermen work at night, state agencies rely heavily on education and community outreach to cut down on violent reprisals against the animals.In recent years NOAA scientists have been putting considerable effort into developing non-lethal ways of keeping sea lions and other pinnipeds away from docks, dams, and other man-made structures. Less attention has been paid to coming up with deterrents for use at sea.NOAA posts information about non-lethal methods on its website, and marine mammal specialists like Barre speak to local fishing groups about how to make the best use of existing deterrents such as pyrotechnics, whistles, and airsoft guns.“We’ve been trying to get more information out to fishing communities—particularly where we’re seeing higher incidence of animals that have been shot—to let folks know there are non-lethal options to try,” Barre said.The agency’s education and outreach campaign has seen a number of small successes, such as an increase in the number of fishermen who inquire about non-lethal methods. But, Barre says, until scientists develop a truly effective sea lion deterrent, fishermen will likely continue to resort to illegal use of lethal force.",
"This moon bear and seven others were rescued in 2015 from a bile farm in northeastern Vietnam. Hundreds more remain in captivity.The lives of nearly 1,000 captive bears have been put in jeopardy by the decline of Vietnam’s bile farming industry. An study led by the Australian animal welfare group Free The Bears found that bear bile farms across Vietnam are starving and killing their bears because keeping them alive has become too costly. Profits from bear bile have dropped amid decreasing demand for bile from captive bears and an oversupply, according to the researchers.Bear bile, a digestive fluid secreted by the liver and stored in the gallbladder, is coveted by some in China and other Asian countries, where traditional medicine practioners advertise it as a cure for everything from hangovers to cancer. Studies have shown bear bile actually can be an effective treatment for some liver conditions, but its active ingredient is already manufactured synthetically.The study, published July 4 in the journal Oryx, found that Vietnamese bear bile producers have spent nearly 90 percent less on food for their bears since the price of farmed bile began falling in 2010. Anecdotal reports of bears starving to death in Vietnamese bile farms supported their findings. Free The Bears now fears that a mass die-off of Vietnam’s remaining captive bears is imminent.Government-sanctioned bear bile farming began in China during the mid-1980s as a way to reduce poaching of wild sun bears and Asiatic black bears, both of which are considered vulnerable to extinction. By 2016 more than 13,000 bears were held in bile farms there and elsewhere in Asia, including Vietnam, according to the wildlife trade monitoring network TRAFFIC. In Vietnam, efforts to breed captive bears have been unsuccessful, and as a result, farms are stocked with wild bears captured by poachers.Vietnam banned bear bile extraction in 2005, but dozens of bear bile farms are still operating. In 2006, Vietnam held an estimated 4,000 bears in bile farms. That’s because the ban contained a provision that allowed existing farms to keep the bears they already had, on condition that their owners sign a written promise not to extract bile from them. This legal loophole, combined with a lack of enforcement, has allowed the industry to persist, the study says.By 2015, however, the number of bears on farms in Vietnam had fallen to fewer than 1,300. To find out where the bears had gone and why, Brian Crudge—research program manager for the Free The Bears’ Vietnam division and lead author of the study—along with researchers from the nonprofit WildAct Vietnam and Vinh University spent most of 2016 interviewing bear bile producers across the country.More than two-thirds of the 66 current and former producers they questioned said that keeping bears for bile was no longer profitable. Just over half claimed they’d shut down operations during the past two decades. And of those former producers, half admitted to killing bears during their farm’s closure.“I'm not surprised that they no longer see the value in investing in bear food and that they're just killing them off,” Crudge says. “When the bile is no longer valuable, it becomes unprofitable to keep the bears, so they kill them and sell the parts.”A slaughtered bear can provide plenty of income for a struggling producer. Their paws, gallbladders, teeth, and claws all fetch high prices on the black market. Paws are used in bear paw soup, considered a delicacy by some, and bear paw wine; teeth and claws are turned into trinkets and jewelry; and gallbladders are used to make traditional medicines.Bile farms are notoriously inhumane—bears are typically brought in as cubs and kept in cages where they can barely move. Bile is extracted daily from the animals by means of a catheter, which can be extremely painful, according to Crudge.Vietnamese bile producers attribute the falling demand for farmed bear bile to government intervention, shifting consumer trends, and concerns over the potency of farmed bile. Bear bile extracted from wild bears is worth up to 12 times more than bile extracted from captive bears, according to producers’ reports. They attributed this disparity to the widespread belief that wild bears have higher quality bile than captive bears. Even so, they said the price of bear bile, both farmed and wild, has fallen by roughly 13 percent in recent years.“I think the long term trend is demand is falling, and people who are invested in this work may be left high and dry,” says Douglas MacMillan, professor of biodiversity economics at the Durrell Institute of Conservation and Ecology at the University of Kent, in England. MacMillan, who was not involved with the study, says young Asian consumers aren’t as fond of traditional medicine as their elders, which helps explain the declining market for farmed bear bile.  In 2017, Vietnam solidified its commitment to ending the practice by vowing to transfer all remaining captive bears to rescue centers. The bears are usually too traumatized to be returned to the wild, and with an estimated 900 bears still in captivity across Vietnam, finding space for them all will be a challenge. (Related: Bears Are Being Milked for Bile. Vietnam Pledges to Rescue Them.)“The best hope for these bears is that they’ll be rescued, but for that to happen, the government would have to crack down quickly,” Crudge says.Free The Bears, Animals Asia, and a handful of other organizations have rescue centers in and around Vietnam, most of which are at capacity. According to Crudge, Free The Bears is building an additional rescue center to accommodate Vietnam’s remaining captive bears.Annie Roth is a freelance writer based in Santa Cruz, California, who uses journalism to put a spotlight on marginalized conservation issues. Roth has written for National Geographic, Science, the San Jose Mercury News and other publications. Follow her on Twitter. @AnnieRoth_AtSea",
"Durable, fragrant rosewood, used to make furniture and musical instruments, is the world’s most trafficked wild product by value and volume.LIVINGSTON, GUATEMALAJose Baudillo leans over a thin rosewood log lying on a bed of dark red wood chips and wraps a tape measure around one end. “This one is young”—less than 16 inches, he says to his boss, Eddy Ottoniel Palencia.The log had been cut illegally in Izabal, one of Guatemala’s 22 departments. Prized for its durability, rich color, and fragrant scent, rosewood is a dense tropical hardwood used to make musical instruments, from guitars and marimbas to violins, as well as high-end, furniture, mainly in China.So coveted is rosewood that it’s now the world’s most trafficked wild product by value or volume—more than ivory, rhino horn, and pangolin scales combined. According to the Global Environment Facility, an international partnership among governments, civil society, and the private sector to support conservation, the illegal wild animal trade is worth between $5 billion and $20 billion a year; it’s often ranked as the world’s fourth most lucrative black market business after narcotics, human trafficking, and the weapons trade.According to Interpol, timber trafficking is valued at between $30 billion and $100 billion a year and accounts for 15 percent to 30 percent of the global timber trade. Sam Lawson, the director of Earthsight, a London-based nonprofit that investigates global environmental crime, estimates that the annual value of smuggled rosewood could exceed a billion dollars.Palencia and Baudillo work for the Foundation for Economic Development and Conservation (Fundaeco), a Guatemalan environmental nonprofit that administers 18 national protected areas in partnership with the government. The rosewood log they’re measuring was cut in a patch of forest on a private ranch near the protected Rio Sarstún Multiple Use Area, whose remaining rosewood trees have become a target for smugglers. Tipped off by the landowner, Fundaeco's men have been waging a months-long cat-and-mouse effort to catch the illegal loggers in action.“To cut a tree this small,” Palencia says, shaking his head, “suggests that there really aren’t any trees left.”Timber trafficking is valued at between $30 billion and $100 billion a year, according to Interpol. These leavings are from a rosewood tree felled illegally in Guatemala's Izabal department.The first time Guatemalan forest officials realized they had a rosewood problem was in 2011, according to documents submitted to the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Flora and Fauna (CITES), the body that regulates cross-border trade in wildlife, including rare timber. That’s when three shipping containers of the precious hardwood were discovered at Puerto Santo Tomas de Castilla, one of Guatemala’s two commercial shipping ports.The next year, more containers—labeled as resin, recycling materials, cardboard, and other wood products—were intercepted there and at Puerto Quetzal, says César Beltetón, forestry director of the National Council of Protected Areas (CONAP). CONAP is the government agency that administers Guatemala’s 338 protected areas, which cover almost a third of the country.The emergence of Guatemala's illegal rosewood trade has been driven largely by demand among China’s nouveau riche for traditional Ming and Qing dynasty-style rosewood furniture. Between 2009 and 2014, customs data analyzed by the Environmental Investigation Agency, a U.K.-based nonprofit, show a 14-fold increase in rosewood imports to China from around the world. This expansion coincided with (and contributed to) the decimation of preferred Southeast Asian rosewoods, which earlier had replaced depleted native rosewoods in southern China. Buyers searched for new sources, and Guatemala, which has at least four commercially desirable species, was one.It was “like a gold rush,” recalls Byron Renato Morales Gallen, one of two prosecutors with the Office of the Public Prosecutor’s Environmental Crimes Division who specialize in rosewood trafficking.Once known as the lungs of Central America, Guatemala, a nation about the size of Tennessee, lost 17 percent of its forest cover between 2001 and 2017, according to Global Forest Watch, a website developed by the World Resources Institute to track forest data. Today, the country has the world’s fourth highest deforestation rate, with the eastern departments of Petén, Alta Verapaz, and Izabal—where much of the country's illegally logged rosewood grows—suffering the greatest losses.At a logging camp in Madagascar, rosewood logs are bundled to be floated downstream. Because Guatemalan rosewoods grow less than half an inch a year and take up to a hundred years to reach full maturity, unregulated logging can devastate populations.Even before landowners cut down swaths of forest for cattle ranches and plantations of rubber, bananas, and increasingly African oil palms, Guatemala—unlike African countries such as Madagascar and Nigeria, which have also fallen victim to the frenzy— didn’t have an abundance of rosewoods. That’s because the country has limited areas of the low-lying swampland that the local species of the tree prefer. Guatemalan rosewoods grow less than half an inch a year, and take up to a century to reach full maturity, so any unregulated logging jeopardizes the overall population.Myrna Herrera Sosa, who heads the Laboratory for the Identification and Description of Wood at Guatemala’s San Carlos University, in Guatemala City, leads the effort to survey the country’s remaining rosewood stock. In a normal, healthy ecosystem, she says, there might be 150 to 200 rosewoods interspersed among thousands of trees. But these days when she and her teams go into forests, they find no more than a few widely scattered individual trees—perhaps no more than 10 at a single site. So few rosewoods, she says, that they “can’t even be called populations.”Alarmed by its rosewood’s increasing vulnerability, in 2016 Guatemala led global efforts to have all 300 species upgraded to Appendix II of CITES, which put in place stricter regulations on rosewood exports: Every shipment must have a permit certifying the timber’s legal, and sustainable, provenance.By the time the new CITES regulations went into effect, rosewood seizures in Guatemala had already begun declining, says CONAP’s Beltetón. Even as the trees were getting harder to find, however, the poachers were becoming more sophisticated at evading detection.Because rosewoods are naturally scarce in Guatemala, finding and logging them requires local knowledge and intensive labor. Impoverished villagers with little to lose head into the forests with their chain saws and, sometimes, donkeys to clear pathways; find and fell the trees; strip their bark and sapwood to expose the valuable heartwood; shape the logs; and drag the flitches—sawn planks—to roadsides for trucking to seaports.When the trucks come, the illicit booty is sometimes hidden under other products to avoid detection—but as police reports and records from the public prosecutor’s office show, if the intermediary buyer or the person responsible for shipping has paid off police to guarantee safe passage through checkpoints, the wood is trucked undisguised.The next stop is either of Guatemala’s two major seaports, where containers of rosewood are loaded into ships bound for Hong Kong and mainland China. According to Beltetón, some rosewood makes a longer truck journey overland to Mexico, El Salvador, and Honduras. In China, the wood is sold from warehouses in ports on the coast and on the Yangtze River to furniture makers farther inland who turn flitches into fancy furnishings.The rosewood log Palencia and Baudillo came across on the ranch in Izabal wasn’t the first case of illicit logging there. On a routine patrol a few months earlier, a forest ranger had discovered a pile of flitches waiting for pick-up in a clearing between the woods and the access road.Guatemala, once thought of as the lungs of Central America, lost 17 percent of its forest cover between 2001 and 2017. The country now has the world's fourth highest deforestation rate.These discoveries are indicative of increased rosewood poaching in Izabal during the past two years, says Oswaldo Calderón, the regional director of Fundaeco. Previously, he says, most rosewood came from Petén or from across the border in Belize. Indeed, according to data from the Office of the Public Prosecutor on Environmental Crime, 60 percent of the 19 active rosewood trafficking cases from 2017 through 2018 involved confiscations in Izabal.Rural departments in Guatemala with the highest incidents of rosewood trafficking—Izabal, Petén, and Alta Verapaz—also are among the country’s poorest. They’re riven by disputes between the national government and indigenous settlers over their right to be on the land, according to Geneva-based Internal Displacement Monitoring Center. The group, established by the nonprofit Norwegian Refuge Council, tracks internal displacement worldwide.Often, landless settlers have been displaced repeatedly—by Guatemala’s civil war, which ended in 1996, by the conversion of land from small-scale farms to use by agribusinesses and extractive industries, and by climate change. They’ve been pushed onto the only land still available, which often is in protected areas that have restrictions on use and ownership.In 2017, Guatemala’s per capita gross national income was roughly $4,060—a figure that’s significantly lower in these rural areas, where there’s a 79 percent poverty rate among indigenous populations and eight out of 10 children suffer from malnutrition, according to UNICEF.Moises Cardona, a community leader in El Carrizal, an unauthorized settlement inside a protected area on Guatemala's porous border with Belize, says this explains why getting involved in lucrative illegal logging is appealing to some people. Since the peak of the rosewood boom, El Carrizal and neighboring villages have gained a reputation for rosewood smuggling—and for their opposition to the Guatemalan state.In Cardona’s opinion, it’s unfair that the environmental impact of tree-cutting without the proper permits by poor, powerless Guatemalans is considered illegal—but not the "African palm and all those humongous ranches that destroy everything.” Cardona was referring in part to Guatemala’s Oil Palm Program, launched in 2009, to convert “unused" peasant lands—often within protected areas’ multiple use zones where some industry is allowed—into oil palm plantations. These businesses employ indigenous subsistence farmers as seasonal contract workers, and their environmental effects—water shortages, deforestation, and soil degradation—are well-documented.CONAP’s Beltetón says “it’s terrible that [rosewood] is distributed in the poorest areas of Guatemala, and that that's where the trafficker goes, taking advantage of the poverty and ignorance of people who don't have other options.” He adds, “of course, the government also bears some responsibility”—for not providing state services and active law enforcement in the most contested and conflict-ridden areas, such as the Chiquibul Mayan Mountains Protected Area, where El Carrizal is located.On the evening of July 1, 2018, acting on an anonymous tip about the illegal transport of rosewood, three environmental police agents made the two-and-a-half hour drive from their post in La Libertad, Petén, to El Barillal, an unincorporated village neighboring El Carrizal.As they approached their destination, instead of encountering the suspect, they found themselves surrounded by at least 45 men, some armed, according to the report the police filed the next day. The report says the men prevented their vehicle from passing, threatened them, questioned them about their presence, detained them for over an hour, and fired their weapons, although no one was injured. In the end, the three policemen broke the standoff by returning to La Libertad empty-handed.In the nine months since, the environmental police have not returned to El Barillal.Most countries, including China, have no laws against importing illegally sourced timber—and thus have no legal framework giving port officials authority to turn back shipments. But CITES uplisting of rosewood in 2016 changed that.Last year, Aura Marina López Cifuentes, Guatemala’s public prosecutor for environmental crimes, ordered the return from China of four shipping containers marked as rubber, recycling, and packing materials. She says her team had noticed certain “anomalies” with the paperwork, including that it had been signed by a known rosewood smuggler and that containers carrying the listed products were far heavier than they should have been."We prayed that it was rosewood, and when we opened it, it was,” López recalls.Resembling an abandoned lumberyard, an open-air government warehouse in Guatemala holds some 350,000 cubic feet of confiscated timber, about 70 percent of which is rosewood.That confiscated wood is now in CONAP’s custody in an open-air warehouse in Izabal, and cases against the traffickers are making their way through the courts. The storage facility, which resembles an abandoned lumberyard, holds about 350,000 cubic feet of confiscated timber, as well as tractor trailers, pickup trucks, and even a lone speedboat, balanced precariously on a pile of flitches. According to warehouse guards, 70 percent of the timber is rosewood.Fighting forest crime in Guatemala is divided among a number of state agencies and civil society organizations. The National Institute of Forestry is responsible for overall forest management, but CONAP takes the lead when it comes to safeguarding the country’s protected areas and species.In administering the protected areas, CONAP employs local staff, including rangers who conduct regular patrols, liaise with communities, and scout for illegal activity. The agency approves rosewood export permits, oversees local forest management plans in protected areas, and is responsible for identifying and inspecting forest products at ports and in law enforcement operations.But CONAP is under-resourced. It has fewer than 400 officers who must monitor more than 800 million acres—nearly a third of the country—and an annual budget, often subject to cuts, of only about $13 million.To make up some of the shortfall, CONAP relies on privately funded nonprofits such as Fundaeco, which employs its own rangers and technical staff, implements development programs, and is often the first to spot illicit activity.Seeing is one thing, but being authorized to act is another. When rangers—working for CONAP, Fundaeco, or other partner nonprofits—come across evidence of a crime, they have neither the authority nor the resources to act. As Beltetón says, “Can you imagine a ranger who barely even carries a machete used to clear trees and comes up against traffickers with Kalishnakovs in hand? No, our rangers don’t go to the front lines.”The rangers therefore pass information about criminal activity to Diprona, the environmental division of the national police, which is responsible for carrying out law enforcement operations.Diprona’s officers may be joined by a technical specialist from CONAP or the nonprofit partner to identify the wood and interview the rangers who made the initial report. If an investigation takes them into particularly dangerous territory, the Guatemalan army may provide additional protection.But Diprona too is under-resourced, with a budget for only 600 police officers covering the entire country. Because of the time it can take to mobilize thinly spread personnel, the remoteness of many illegal logging operations, and the need for officers to have a judicial order before they can step onto private land, criminals and their contraband may be long gone before enforcement actions begin.The involvement of so many entities may seem to suggest Guatemala’s dedication to resolving the rosewood problem, but in reality, such a fragmented system leaves room for responsibilities to fall between the cracks. “There are solutions, of course, but first the government has to be inclined to actually implement them," says Myrna Herrera, of the Wood Laboratory. Guatemala may have CONAP, the public prosecutor for the environment, and Diprona, she adds, but "to start, they need clearly defined, strong laws against illegal logging and trafficking.” One example of such a law? Laying out a minimum diameter by which rosewood can be cut legally, a standard that already exists for other precious woods, such as mahogany, Herrera says.When apprehensions are made and enough evidence gathered, the alleged crimes are investigated and handled by the Office of the Public Prosecutor’s Environmental Crimes Division. Cases typically go before the Court of Narco-Trafficking and Environmental Crimes, but other specialized courts, including those dedicated to organized crime and corruption, also play a role.What is known about rosewood criminal operations in Guatemala owes largely to the efforts of Public Prosecutor Aura López’s environmental crimes office. She says they’ve identified four distinct rosewood trafficking networks, or structures, as she and her colleagues call them. "We didn't want to call them criminal “groups” because that doesn't really reflect the level of involvement of government officials," she says.These criminal networks are highly sophisticated and resemble drug smuggling operations. As Fundaeco’s Palencia put it, “The main difference between drug trafficking and tree trafficking is that they can always produce more drugs.”After years of investigations, nearly all the leaders and members of one criminal network have been identified and prosecuted, López says. Only a single individual is still at large, who she suspects has fled the country. She says her team is now closing in on another of the four networks. Meanwhile, 68 additional cases, each involving a specific rosewood seizure, remain under active investigation or prosecution.Prosecutor Morales Gallen adds that 50 individuals already have been sentenced and that proceedings against five government officials—including a customs officer, a member of the police force, and a senior CONAP security official—began in April.But even as the environmental crimes office has been getting better at disrupting the traffickers, the criminals themselves have been evolving. “They’re a lot more careful with their identities,” Morales Gallen says. They “do everything with fake names and false information,” as well as prepaid SIM cards.Guatemala's Protected Areas Act lays out mandatory sentencing for crimes against natural and cultural patrimony (often used to charge illegal loggers) and trafficking of flora and fauna. Penalties range from five to 10 years prison time, commutable by a fine of between roughly $1,300 and $2,600. Judges have the discretion to adjust fines based on the guilty party’s perceived financial ability to pay.Such fines are “nothing for those that traffic,” Morales Gallen emphasizes. Of the 19 rosewood seizures prosecuted between 2017 and 2018, more than half were valued at more than $50,000, and the largest at $125,000.Judges also have the discretionary authority to order reparations for environmental damage—500 trees to be planted in a protected area, for example, or, in one case in December 2017, an air conditioner to be donated to the judicial branch of the local CONAP office. When asked about this, the sentencing judge explained that “it’s hot in Petén, and CONAP needs an air conditioner. How can they do their jobs without it?”Few convicted loggers go to prison. For crime fighters on the front lines, this seeming impunity is frustrating. “It costs us more to participate in operations than it does for them to [avoid] jail,” says Jorge Diaz, of Fundaeco’s Izabal branch.At the same time, conservationists and enforcers of the law alike understand the dire circumstances that drive villagers to steal rosewood from the forests. As Oswaldo Calderon, Fundaeco’s regional director, puts it: “The protected areas are never going to be protected and sustainable while people are dying of hunger within them.”Morales Gallen says the light punishments send a message that crimes such as rosewood poaching are considered inconsequential. "There’s a lack of conscience about environmental crimes. Guatemala’s a very violent country, with robberies, kidnappings, murders, so environmental crimes don’t seem as important. If you have a case about a kidnapping and a case about the environment, believe me, they’ll prioritize the kidnapping.”López says the aim isn’t to go soft on rosewood crime but to tap local poachers for information that can point authorities toward smuggling bosses. She says that when the leaders of trafficking rings are caught, they often end up being charged with other crimes as well—falsification of documents, bribery of a public official, corruption—that carry more serious punishments, including jail time.The fact that Guatemala is doing anything to combat rosewood trafficking is noteworthy, says Romain Taravella, a forestry specialist with the Environmental Investigation Agency. “Applying the law, in itself, in the world of rosewood is kind of more the exception than the rule,” he says.As Guatemala grapples internally with preserving its rosewoods, an external threat looms. At the meeting of CITES this month in Geneva, the treaty’s 183 signatories will consider an amendment that would exempt finished musical instruments and their component parts containing rosewood, as well as finished rosewood products weighing less than 500 grams, from trade restrictions.The musical instrument exemption was lobbied for by U.S. and European instrument companies, who argue that they were "collateral damage” in restrictions targeting "the furniture industry,” as the U.K.-based Music Industries Association put it, but the change could increase demand for the precious hardwood. It’s expected to pass, and if it does, says CONAP’s Beltetón, the burden would fall on instrument manufacturers outside Guatemala to ensure the sustainable origin of their rosewood.In the meantime, the theft of Guatemala’s rosewoods will continue until stronger national laws are passed and enforcement and penalties are stepped up. Or the trees run out.",
"Tokay geckos are the world’s second largest species of gecko, with males reaching lengths of up to 15 inches (38 centimeters).For many species threatened by the illegal wildlife trafficking, such as rhinos, elephants, tigers, and bears, debates persist as to whether a legal trade in their parts and products can reduce smuggling.But increasing evidence suggests that a legal trade instead acts as a conduit for the illegal trade. For instance, recent studies showed that Hong Kong’s domestic ivory sales provided cover for illegal stocks. Now, a new report by TRAFFIC, a wildlife monitoring NGO, on captive breeding of Tokay geckos in Indonesia suggests the same holds true for captive breeding.Tokay geckos are nocturnal lizards that live in Southeast Asia. While there is some demand for them as pets, the real demand is for their use as traditional Asian medicines—everything from an aphrodisiac and energy drink to treatments for diabetes, cancer, and HIV/AIDS. There’s no proof of their efficacy in any of these uses. The animals are captured, gutted, dried on sticks in kilns, and exported, mainly to China but also to Taiwan, Hong Kong, Vietnam, and elsewhere.While it’s often argued that captive breeding relieves pressure on endangered species by providing an alternative source for trade, the report, Adding Up the Numbers: An Investigation into Commercial Breeding of Tokay Geckos in Indonesia, demonstrates that the opposite is true. Rather, it finds that wild-caught Tokay geckos are regularly laundered through Indonesia’s captive-breeding facilities on a massive scale.Because Tokay geckos aren’t listed under the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES), their international trade isn’t subject to regulation.In Indonesia, the harvest and export of wild-caught Tokay geckos are subject to quotas. Commercial breeding is allowed, and the government has given permission for six companies to export three million live captive-bred Tokay geckos a year, specifically for the pet trade.But the TRAFFIC study found that the exporting companies don’t breed Tokay geckos in those commercial numbers—the logistical requirements would be too costly. Instead they export wild-caught Tokay geckos, dead, for the medicinal and meat trade in numbers far greater than permitted. While there’s no legal trade in dead Tokay geckos from Indonesia, according to TRAFFIC, Indonesia exports an estimated 1.2 million dried Tokay geckos annually.Tokay geckos are found throughout Southeast Asia. Little is known about the impact of their trade, which is largely unregulated. Some countries, such as Indonesia, have export quotas for live, wild-caught Tokays.The report concludes that trade in those high quantities can be sustained only through the routine laundering of wild-caught individuals and their export as dead specimens.From TRAFFIC’s Southeast Asia office, in Malaysia, Chris Shepherd, coauthor of the report, explains that it’s low-profile species like Tokay geckos that are often hardest hit by illegal, unsustainable trade.It’s becoming increasingly obvious that so-called captive-breeding facilities are being used to launder large numbers of wild-caught animals into the global market. Indonesia exports exceptionally high numbers of animals declared as captive-bred, with Tokay geckos being among the most numerous. So numerous, in fact, that it’s very hard to believe—and therefore this study was carried out.In most cases, enforcement authorities don’t scrutinize shipments declared as captive bred. The general thinking is that captive breeding is a good thing. Yet in many cases captive breeding operations pose a major threat to the conservation of a species because they’re not breeding animals but laundering huge volumes of wild-caught animals. In short, much of the international trade in captive-bred animals is a scam.In countries where enforcement levels are low, and capacity or policies to regulate captive-breeding facilities are weak, there’s a huge financial incentive and a very low risk for captive-breeding facilities to launder animals from the wild and export them as being captive bred.Breeding animals requires huge investments and ongoing costs—housing the animals, caring for them, feeding them, etc. Where laundering is rife, a legitimate breeder wouldn’t be able to compete with those laundering wild-caught animals.  Tokay geckos can breed in captivity, but to imagine this being done in such quantities boggles the mind and is just ridiculous. The costs would be enormous, and the profits small. Taking them from the wild—paying villagers a few cents to collect them—and then exporting them immediately makes far more economic sense, despite it being against the rules.Tokay geckos may be harvested from the wild in Indonesia under a quota system. However, if they are farmed, they don’t fall under that quota system. Any harvest of Tokay geckos from the wild outside the quota system is illegal. Note that the quota in Indonesia for wild-caught Tokay geckos stipulates that the animals are exported live, for pets, not kiln-dried.  Unfortunately, Tokay geckos aren’t listed in the appendices of CITES, and therefore international trade isn’t regulated. We strongly recommend the species be listed in Appendix II, which wouldn’t stop trade but would put in place a mechanism through which the trade could be monitored and regulated. To do so is in the interest of conservation and sustainable trade.Tokay geckos make for a spectacular display at a market in Indonesia. The lizards are sold as pets, and many are killed, dried in kilns, and exported to China and elsewhere for use in traditional medicines.Under the current circumstances, it’s just a matter of time before the massive levels of trade wipe the species out from many parts of its range. It’s important to note that Tokay geckos are not just being exported from Indonesia but also from many parts of their range in South and Southeast Asia.There are at least six companies claiming to breed Tokay geckos in large volumes in Indonesia alone. How many more such facilities there are in the region remains unknown. There are also many companies and wildlife traders operating outside of both the captive-breeding operations and the quota systems that are exporting huge volumes of Tokays from the wild, kiln-dried.There are good regulations around the breeding of wildlife in Indonesia, yet these regulations are often ignored. Ideally, the farms would be monitored on a regular basis, and studies would be ongoing to ensure that the volumes of animals coming from these facilities are in fact realistic. And tools would be available for authorities in both exporting and importing countries to use to determine the likelihood of the specimens involved actually being captive-bred. Currently, it’s extremely difficult for authorities to determine whether the animals are wild-caught or captive-bred—and the dealers know this!  Can captive breeding work?Captive breeding of wildlife for trade can be a sustainable industry, and can remove pressure from wild populations. Look at budgies—they’re traded around the world but are all from captive-breeding operations and not from the wilds of Australia.This works due to a number of factors: Enforcement in Australia is a real deterrent—you’re likely to be caught and punished for smuggling wild birds. Budgies breed well in captivity, and they breed cheaply.But this isn’t the case for all species. In many instances, regardless of the ability to breed animals, enforcement levels are not strong enough to be a deterrent. If the system is weak, unscrupulous dealers will, and do, take advantage of it to secure higher profits.The authorities in Indonesia have the tools at hand, in the form of strong legislation protecting native species and regulating trade. But they should do more to ensure that a few unscrupulous traders aren’t taking advantage of the system and aren’t driving Indonesia's wildlife towards extinction. These few traders are ruining the image of the country in many ways, and are undermining the Indonesian government’s conservation efforts, and any efforts to succeed in establishing legitimate and sustainable trade.We strongly urge Indonesia, and other Tokay gecko range countries, to immediately list the Tokay gecko in Appendix III of CITES and to propose a stronger listing, in Appendix II.While Tokay geckos are widespread in Asia, few if any species could stand this level of off-take. It’s only a matter of time before the Tokay gecko becomes yet another species on the long, and ever growing, list of species threatened with extinction.Read more stories about wildlife crime and exploitation on Wildlife Watch. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to ngwildlife@natgeo.com.",
"Green sea turtles mate in the protected waters of Buck Island’s lagoon in St. Croix—though the species is seeing big impacts from warming water.She started out studying tree-climbing marsupials, but only after she applied what she knew to marine reptiles did Camryn Allen actually get worried.Allen, a scientist with the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration in Hawaii, had spent her early career using hormones to track koala bear pregnancies. Then she started using similar techniques to help colleagues quickly answer a surprisingly hard question: whether a sea turtle is male or female.You can't always tell which is which just by looking. That often requires laparoscopy, viewing the turtle's internal organs by inserting a thin camera. Allen figured out how to do it using blood samples, which made it easier to check lots of turtles quickly.That mattered because the heat of sand where eggs are buried ultimately determines whether a sea turtle becomes male or female. And since climate change is driving up temperatures around the world, researchers weren't surprised that they'd been finding slightly more female offspring.But when Allen saw results from her research on Raine Island, Australia—the biggest and most important green sea turtle nesting ground in the Pacific Ocean—she realized how serious things might get. Sand temperatures there had increased so much, she and a team of scientists reported last year, that female baby turtles now outnumber males 116 to 1."I can't deny it: seeing those results scared the crap out of me," Allen says.Sea turtle life is hard enough on its own, and humans were already making it even harder.Seven species of sea turtle crisscross the tropical and temperate oceans. From the start, there's is a risky world.A leatherback sea turtle lays its eggs at Sandy Point National Wildlife Refuge on St. Croix.Sea turtles lay eggs on sandy beaches, but many of them never hatch. The incubating creatures may be killed by microbes, dug up by wild dogs, or exposed by other turtles scraping out new nests. Those breaking free from their delicate shells have to race past vultures and racoons to make it to the ocean. There, fish, crabs, and all manner of marine life wait, eager for a meal. Just a fraction of 1 percent of baby hatchlings ever make it to adulthood.Once they're mature, adults face few natural predators. An adult Kemp's ridley may weigh less than most teenagers, while a leatherback can outweigh a bison. Either way few wild creatures aside from tiger sharks, jaguars, and orcas ever really try to eat them.Humans, however, have lowered their survival odds considerably.We build condominiums on their nesting beaches. We poach eggs for sale on the black market, carve up adults for their meat, and use their skin to make boots and handbags. We transform the fiery gold and red carapace of hawskbills into bracelets, eyeglasses, hairbrushes, and jewelry boxes. (Read more about how much bigger this problem is than first thought.)Fishing boats accidentally snare turtles in their nets or with longlines. Container ships hit them and crack open their shells."The general trajectory is that sea turtles are depleted worldwide, across all species," says Bryan Wallace, who oversees a committee that evaluates sea turtle status for the International Union for the Conservation of Nature's endangered species redlist. "I'd have to think hard to find a population that is way better off than it was 100 years ago."Currently, six of the seven species are considered threatened or endangered. The seventh, Australia's flatback, is merely lacking information for scientists to say one way or the other.Still, when Allen and NOAA colleague Michael Jensen began examining sea turtle feminization, there wasn't much reason to fear a large or immediate impact on turtles. In one earlier study, Allen found a small population of green sea turtles outside San Diego had gone from 65 percent female to 78 percent female over time as nesting sands warmed. Loggerheads from West Africa to Florida also had shown similar trends.No one had ever examined a population as important or as large as Raine Island.More than 200,000 sea turtles nest on or near Raine, a tiny 80-acre curl of sand along the northern edge of the Great Barrier Reef, the portion hardest hit by warming waters. The other portion of that sea turtle population nests further from the equator, near Brisbane, where temperature increases have not been as dramatic.What Allen and Jensen discovered was significant. Older turtles that had emerged from their eggs 30 or 40 years earlier were also mostly female, but only by a 6 to 1 ratio. But younger turtles for at least the last 20 years had been more than 99 percent female. And as evidence that rising temperatures were responsible, female turtles from the cooler sands near Brisbane currently still only outnumber males 2 to 1.Six weeks after Allen and Jensen published their results, another study from Florida looking at loggerheads revealed that temperature is just one factor. If sands are moist and cool, they produce more males. If sands are hot and dry, hatchlings are more female.But new research in the last year also offered rays of hope.Sea turtles have been around in some form for more than 100 million years, weathering ice ages and even the extinction of the dinosaurs. They may have developed lots of coping mechanisms. One, it turns out, could be altering how they mate.A critically endangered hawksbill sea turtle hatchling paddles away from shore in Cuba.Using genetic tests to examine a small group of critically endangered hawksbills in El Salvador, Alexander Gaos, a turtle scientist who works with Allen, found male sea turtles mating with multiple females. That population was producing 85 percent female hatchlings."We found that, hey, wow, this strategy is being employed in small, endangered, highly reduced populations," Gaos says. "We think they were just responding to a lack of options for females."It's not clear whether this move is something that has increased over time, or whether it could help stave off a population-scale turtle crisis."Is there potential for this to help compensate for more females being born?" Gaos asked. "We don't know. Just the fact that the males can actually do that is fairly new. We might only be seeing the very beginning."Meanwhile, other researchers in the Dutch Caribbean figured out that providing nesting beaches with more shade from palm leaves actually cooled down the sand. That could help alter the male-to-female ratio of baby turtles considerably.Allen, for one, finds the new developments reassuring. Sea turtles may be more resilient than once thought."We may lose some smaller populations, but sea turtles are never going to go away completely," Allen says. "I think turtles, out of all the other species, might actually have a pretty good shot."They might just require a little more help from us.",
"SANTA ROSA NATIONAL PARK, COSTA RICA—It's just after 10:30 p.m. and the Milky Way decorates a moonless sky over Costa Rica’s Playa Nancite, a remote, half-mile-long beach. Surf-size waves crash on the coast as our National Geographic team waits for one of the world’s most mysterious migrations: a flotilla of olive ridley sea turtles coming ashore to build their nests.Our headlamps glow red so that we don’t distract the animals, but every once in a while we flash white rays over the sand to get a better look at the scene in front of us.Like zombies, thousands of the two-foot-long turtles march up to the beach over the next few hours. They’re making their way ashore to nest, but some will become dinner for another animal: the jaguar.The crew of National Geographic Wild’s Untamed with Filipe DeAndrade is hoping to capture the plight of the turtles as they make their annual journey to this nesting site, and to be among the few who have witnessed jaguars feasting on them."I hope to hook people with the power of the jaguar but to make them fall in love with sea turtles in a way that they respect their importance in the natural world,” DeAndrade says, sitting on a tree stump. "Even if people are aware of their importance, I think that's enough.”Restricted to researchers, Playa Nancite in Santa Rosa National Park is the backdrop for the second season of Untamed. The energetic 31-year-old Brazilian-American filmmaker Filipe DeAndrade hosted the wildlife series' first season, filmed in 2016 in New Mexico's Bosque del Apache National Wildlife Refuge. (Read a behind-the-scenes look at season one.)Whereas the first season focused on the rarely seen habits of North American wildlife, this new season zooms in on Costa Rican flora and fauna, with the first episode focusing on one animal relationship: jaguars’ predation on sea turtles. Nearly a decade ago, DeAndrade caught wind of this interaction when he was watching a nature documentary that briefly referenced it."When you see a big cat on the beach eating a reptile, it leaves you with more questions than answers," says DeAndrade. "So for me, it sparked an interest and it made me want to investigate why this was happening, how this was happening, and what it meant to the ecosystem that it was happening in.” (Watch: Over 100,000 Sea Turtles Nest at the Same Time. How?)Sea turtles are easy prey for jaguars because they’re simple to kill, says Luis Fonseca, a researcher and biologist featured in Untamed. And Playa Nancite is uniquely positioned for this relationship because it’s one of a dozen or so beaches where the turtles nest in mass events several times each year. Called arribadas, these mysterious migrations happen about once a month in the dark moonless nights leading up to a new moon."What defines an arribada is that really precise synchrony," says biologist and Untamed expert Vanessa Bezy. “The night before, we might not have any [turtles] nest at all and then, all of a sudden, all the turtles arrive to nest at the same time."Turtles are solitary creatures, so this group behavior seems unusual. In the past, researchers have theorized that winds, lunar patterns, or rainfall might help trigger arribadas, but the exact reason for these events remains unclear.In November 2017 when this season was being filmed, 53,932 sea turtles scooted ashore in Nancite, turning the beach into a minefield of slowly moving carapaces—a buffet for the area's jaguars.Fonseca says the number of jaguars predating on turtles could be increasing because jaguar populations are growing and getting closer to the beach, or it could be something else. Years ago, coyotes and coatis used to prey on sea turtle eggs, but as the environment changed, these predators faded out and jaguar numbers increased.“The arribada is basically a free-for-all for the jaguar,” Bezy says.The turtles may have been easy to spot, but the other half of this duo is much more elusive. The largest of South America’s big cats, jaguars once roamed freely through the continent but today are found only in remote pockets.Unlike other cats, jaguars thrive in water, hunting fish and caimans in addition to turtles. They’ve also been known to eat larger animals like peccaries, deer, capybaras, and tapirs. The big cat’s name comes from the Native American word yaguar, which translates to “he who kills with one leap.”"The jaguar is more like a spirit,” says DeAndrade, who has filmed other big cat species. “It's elusive. Trying to find a creature that is ancient in a way is one of the most challenging things I've ever done.”The mission to capture this big cat on camera has led the Nat Geo crew all through Santa Rosa. While most of the crew was at Nancite, another crew member saw a jaguar at Naranjo Beach, a stretch of sand about 12 miles away. So, the crew packed up hundreds of pounds of camera equipment and hiked to Naranjo.Then, when a jaguar was seen back in Nancite, the crew hurried back to that beach. The two-and-a-half-hour night hike sent us wading through a low-tide estuary while monitoring for crocodiles, then scrambling up and down jagged rocks to get to Playa Nancite. Despite our best efforts, we didn’t see a jaguar—that night, at least.“The animals are always doing their part, even if they're not cooperating with what I want,” DeAndrade says.",
"On the edge of a rusty-red cliff at Waimea Canyon, on the Hawaiian island of Kauai, grows a seemingly unremarkable shrub, Melanthera waimeaensis. But these narrow-leafed plants, numbering seven in all, are anything but ordinary: They’re the last of their kind growing in the wild.M. waimeaensis is just one of hundreds of plants disappearing as invasive flora crowd out Hawaii’s native species and introduced animals (such as wild boar) disrupt local vegetation. Today 134 plant varieties (or taxa) unique to the islands are thought to be extinct, and the rate of loss is accelerating: In the past six years, 12 species have vanished. “That’s big time,” says botanist Kenneth Wood of the Hawaii-based nonprofit National Tropical Botanical Garden.Working alongside Hawaii’s Plant Extinction Prevention Program staff, Wood has spent decades venturing to the archipelago’s remotest corners seeking spots where rare plant species linger. From tromping through dense forest to rappelling off cliffs, the team does what’s necessary to collect seeds and cuttings and to identify areas that need protection. The goal: to preserve biodiversity for future generations.“To me,” Wood says, “it’s self-evident that all life-forms should be treated equally” and be granted “a habitat to increase and to not be disturbed.”",
"When you conjure up “extinction” in your mind’s eye, you probably see an animal—a dodo, perhaps, or a Tasmanian tiger. But the biodiversity crisis isn’t just faunal, it’s floral too. Since the 1750s, at least 571 species of plants have gone extinct in the wild, according to a global survey recently published in Nature Ecology & Evolution.More than eight plant species have disappeared every three years, on average, since 1900. This pace of extinction is as much as 500 times plants’ natural or background extinction rate.“I find it shocking on a personal level, but bigger than that, I find it frightening for the future of our planet,” says study co-author Maria Vorontsova, a plant taxonomist at the U.K.’s Royal Botanic Gardens, Kew. “Plants are the infrastructure of ecosystems,” she says, and they’re “interdependent with other organisms—and with one another—in ways we don’t completely understand.”How have human activities pushed plants to the brink worldwide? Some species, such as the St. Helena olive (Nesiota elliptica), were confined to tiny ranges. Settlers on the South Atlantic island of St. Helena cleared much of the vegetation, eroding the tree’s habitat; the last wild individual died in 1994. Others were poorly known from would-be farmland or urban areas. In 1912 botany student Norma Pfeiffer was walking along Chicago’s Torrence Avenue when she discovered Thismia americana, a bizarre, leafless plant related to “fairy lanterns” in Australia and New Zealand. It hasn’t been seen since 1916, despite many searches.The study’s count of extinct plants is almost certainly an underestimate, but seedlings of hope persist. The authors also note that 431 plants once thought extinct, such as the Chilean crocus (Tecophilaea cyanocrocus), have been rediscovered. Keeping these plants with us will be no small feat: Some 89 percent of them are still at risk of extinction.",
"The thylacine, or Tasmanian tiger, is a marsupial predator that was last seen alive in the 1930s.A baby Tasmanian tiger collected 108 years ago has provided enough high-quality genetic material for researchers to sequence the animal’s entire genome, creating one of the best such genetic blueprints for an extinct animal.Announced this week in Nature Ecology & Evolution, the genome has revealed details about the marsupial’s evolution and its decline toward extinction—and is a crucial step in plans to clone the creature and potentially bring the species back from the dead.The Tasmanian tiger, or thylacine, was a wolf-size carnivorous marsupial once common across Australia. It became extinct on the mainland 3,000 years ago but survived on the southern island of Tasmania until human hunters, supposedly trying to protect their livestock, drove it to extinction in the early 20th century.The last known thylacine died in Hobart Zoo in 1936, but the species may have persisted in the wild into at least the 1940s. The species was declared extinct in 1982. (Learn more about de-extinction in National Geographic magazine.)Researchers wanted a better look at thylacine genes to help them understand why the predatory marsupials evolved to look and act so much like wolves. These two groups of animals last shared a common ancestor 160 million years ago, and yet they independently led very similar lifestyles in different parts of the world.“The thylacine and the dog [or wolf] is the closest example of convergent evolution that we’ve ever seen measured between any two species,” says lead author Andrew Pask at the University of Melbourne. Since scientists already have robust genomes for dogs and related species, sequencing the extinct animal’s genome would help them look for convergent similarities in their genes, helping them understand evolution at a molecular level.“If two animals adapt to look almost identical, do you see that also reflected in their genome – can you actually find parts of their DNA that evolve to look very similar?” he says.In 2008, Pask’s team was the first to take genetic material from an extinct species and make it function inside a living one, inserting thylacine DNA involved in bone and cartilage development into mouse embryos.At that time, the DNA sequences they had were highly degraded, making sequencing an entire genome almost impossible. About 750 thylacine specimens are held in museums, and most are pelts or bones with little viable DNA. But, 13 young were removed from their mother’s pouches and preserved in ethanol, and one of the babies sampled had surprisingly well-preserved genetic material.“This pouch young seems to be a magical specimen that happens to have really good intact DNA,” Pask says.Comparing the finished genome to one from dogs, the team found that the two animals did not, in fact, independently evolve similarities in their genes, despite their oddly similar looks and behaviors. Pask says there may be similarities in when genes are turned on and off during development, which will be explored in a future project.But the researchers did make a novel discovery: Genetic diversity in the thylacine population plummeted sometime between 70,000 and 120,000 years ago. That’s unexpected, because scientists had long thought that the animal’s diversity declined much more recently.“We always assumed that the thylacine, like the Tasmanian devil, had got really restricted genetic diversity once isolated on Tasmania, and that was only 10,000 to 15,000 years ago, when a land bridge to the mainland closed over,” Pask says.Instead, the species may have been affected by climate change, which led to a shift in vegetation at around that time. The discovery suggests that thylacines were already declining on the mainland long before Aboriginal people arrived in Australia sometime before 65,000 years ago.Human hunting ultimately wiped out the thylacine, though, which is why some experts hope the new genome may one day become a tool for resurrecting the extinct animal.“Among all the recent extinctions, this is one where the blame lies indisputably with us, so perhaps it should be a candidate up there with the passenger pigeon,” says Ross Barnett, an evolutionary biologist and expert on ancient DNA at Durham University in the U.K.Mike Archer, a paleontologist and expert on de-extinction at the University of New South Wales in Sydney, led a pioneering project that explored thylacine cloning in the early 2000s, and in 2013, his team succeeded in cloning embryos of another extinct species, the gastric brooding frog.“There’s a lot of work down the road to do this, but what I think Pask’s group has demonstrated is that what we would have thought 20 years ago was a ridiculous impossibility is increasingly possible,” Archer says.Pask admits that while he would love to be able to bring the thylacine back, “making a whole functional genome, as opposed to having a sequenced genome, are two very different things, so that’s a big hurdle to get across.” He is nevertheless hopeful that one day it might be possible to take a related marsupial, uncover all the differences between the genomes, and edit those differences to re-create a thylacine.“It would be at least a decade before we have the technologies to really start to pursue de-extinction,” he estimates. “But you never know how fast some of these technologies will develop.”",
"The bucardo (Capra pyrenaica pyrenaica), or Pyrenean ibex, lived high in the Pyrenees until its extinction in 2000. Three years later researchers attempted to clone celia, the last bucardo (above). The clone died minutes after birth.On July 30, 2003, a team of Spanish and French scientists reversed time. They brought an animal back from extinction, if only to watch it become extinct again. The animal they revived was a kind of wild goat known as a bucardo,or Pyrenean ibex. The bucardo (Capra pyrenaica pyrenaica) was a large, handsome creature, reaching up to 220 pounds and sporting long, gently curved horns. For thousands of years it lived high in the Pyrenees, the mountain range that divides France from Spain, where it clambered along cliffs, nibbling on leaves and stems and enduring harsh winters.Then came the guns. Hunters drove down the bucardo population over several centuries. In 1989 Spanish scientists did a survey and concluded that there were only a dozen or so individuals left. Ten years later a single bucardo remained: a female nicknamed Celia. A team from the Ordesa and Monte Perdido National Park, led by wildlife veterinarian Alberto Fernández-Arias, caught the animal in a trap, clipped a radio collar around her neck, and released her back into the wild. Nine months later the radio collar let out a long, steady beep: the signal that Celia had died. They found her crushed beneath a fallen tree. With her death, the bucardo became officially extinct.But Celia’s cells lived on, preserved in labs in Zaragoza and Madrid. Over the next few years a team of reproductive physiologists led by José Folch injected nuclei from those cells into goat eggs emptied of their own DNA, then implanted the eggs in surrogate mothers. After 57 implantations, only seven animals had become pregnant. And of those seven pregnancies, six ended in miscarriages. But one mother—a hybrid between a Spanish ibex and a goat—carried a clone of Celia to term. Folch and his colleagues performed a cesarean section and delivered the 4.5-pound clone. As Fernández-Arias held the newborn bucardo in his arms, he could see that she was struggling to take in air, her tongue jutting grotesquely out of her mouth. Despite the efforts to help her breathe, after a mere ten minutes Celia’s clone died. A necropsy later revealed that one of her lungs had grown a gigantic extra lobe as solid as a piece of liver. There was nothing anyone could have done.The dodo and the great auk, the thylacine and the Chinese river dolphin, the passenger pigeon and the imperial woodpecker—the bucardo is only one in the long list of animals humans have driven extinct, sometimes deliberately. And with many more species now endangered, the bucardo will have much more company in the years to come. Fernández-Arias belongs to a small but passionate group of researchers who believe that cloning can help reverse that trend.The notion of bringing vanished species back to life—some call it de-extinction—has hovered at the boundary between reality and science fiction for more than two decades, ever since novelist Michael Crichton unleashed the dinosaurs of Jurassic Park on the world. For most of that time the science of de-extinction has lagged far behind the fantasy. Celia’s clone is the closest that anyone has gotten to true de-extinction. Since witnessing those fleeting minutes of the clone’s life, Fernández-Arias, now the head of the government of Aragon’s Hunting, Fishing and Wetlands department, has been waiting for the moment when science would finally catch up, and humans might gain the ability to bring back an animal they had driven extinct.“We are at that moment,” he told me.Billions of the birds (Ectopistes migratorius) once filled the skies of eastern north america. Martha, the last one (above), died at the cincinnati Zoo in 1914. Geneticists now think they could resurrect the species.I met Fernández-Arias last autumn at a closed-session scientific meeting at the National Geographic Society’s headquarters in Washington, D.C. For the first time in history a group of geneticists, wildlife biologists, conservationists, and ethicists had gathered to discuss the possibility of de-extinction. Could it be done? Should it be done? One by one, they stood up to present remarkable advances in manipulating stem cells, in recovering ancient DNA, in reconstructing lost genomes. As the meeting unfolded, the scientists became increasingly excited. A consensus was emerging: De-extinction is now within reach.“It’s gone very much further, very much more rapidly than anyone ever would’ve imagined,” says Ross MacPhee, a curator of mammalogy at the American Museum of Natural History in New York. “What we really need to think about is why we would want to do this in the first place, to actually bring back a species.”In Jurassic Park dinosaurs are resurrected for their entertainment value. The disastrous consequences that follow have cast a shadow over the notion of de-extinction, at least in the popular imagination. But people tend to forget that Jurassic Park was pure fantasy. In reality the only species we can hope to revive now are those that died within the past few tens of thousands of years and left behind remains that harbor intact cells or, at the very least, enough ancient DNA to reconstruct the creature’s genome. Because of the natural rates of decay, we can never hope to retrieve the full genome of Tyrannosaurus rex, which vanished about 65 million years ago. The species theoretically capable of being revived all disappeared while humanity was rapidly climbing toward world domination. And especially in recent years we humans were the ones who wiped them out, by hunting them, destroying their habitats, or spreading diseases. This suggests another reason for bringing them back.“If we’re talking about species we drove extinct, then I think we have an obligation to try to do this,” says Michael Archer, a paleontologist at the University of New South Wales who has championed de-extinction for years. Some people protest that reviving a species that no longer exists amounts to playing God. Archer scoffs at the notion. “I think we played God when we exterminated these animals.”Other scientists who favor de-extinction argue that there will be concrete benefits. Biological diversity is a storehouse of natural invention. Most pharmaceutical drugs, for example, were not invented from scratch—they were derived from natural compounds found in wild plant species, which are also vulnerable to extinction. Some extinct animals also performed vital services in their ecosystems, which might benefit from their return. Siberia, for example, was home 12,000 years ago to mammoths and other big grazing mammals. Back then, the landscape was not moss-dominated tundra but grassy steppes. Sergey Zimov, a Russian ecologist and director of the Northeast Science Station in Cherskiy in the Republic of Sakha, has long argued that this was no coincidence: The mammoths and numerous herbivores maintained the grassland by breaking up the soil and fertilizing it with their manure. Once they were gone, moss took over and transformed the grassland into less productive tundra.Though it looked like a wolf and was called a Tasmanian tiger, the thylacine (Thylacinus cynocephalus) was actually a marsupial—a relative of kangaroos and koalas. By the 1930s it had been hunted to extinction in the wild.In recent years Zimov has tried to turn back time on the tundra by bringing horses, muskoxen, and other big mammals to a region of Siberia he calls Pleistocene Park. And he would be happy to have woolly mammoths roam free there. “But only my grandchildren will see them,” he says. “A mouse breeds very fast. Mammoths breed very slow. Be prepared to wait.”When Fernández-Arias first tried to bring back the bucardo ten years ago, the tools at his disposal were, in hindsight, woefully crude. It had been only seven years since the birth of Dolly the sheep, the first cloned mammal. In those early days scientists would clone an animal by taking one of its cells and inserting its DNA into an egg that had been emptied of its own genetic material. An electric shock was enough to get the egg to start dividing, after which the scientists would place the developing embryo in a surrogate mother. The vast majority of those pregnancies failed, and the few animals that were born were often beset with health problems.Over the past decade scientists have improved their success with cloning animals, shifting the technology from high-risk science to workaday business. Researchers have also developed the ability to induce adult animal cells to return to an embryo-like state. These can be coaxed to develop into any type of cell—including eggs or sperm. The eggs can then be further manipulated to develop into full-fledged embryos.Such technical sleights of hand make it far easier to conjure a vanished species back to life. Scientists and explorers have been talking for decades about bringing back the mammoth. Their first—and so far only—achievement was to find well-preserved mammoths in the Siberian tundra. Now, armed with the new cloning technologies, researchers at the Sooam Biotech Research Foundation in Seoul have teamed up with mammoth experts from North-Eastern Federal University in the Siberian city of Yakutsk. Last summer they traveled up the Yana River, drilling tunnels into the frozen cliffs along the river with giant hoses. In one of those tunnels they found chunks of mammoth tissue, including bone marrow, hair, skin, and fat. The tissue is now in Seoul, where the Sooam scientists are examining it.“If we dream about it, the ideal case would be finding a viable cell, a cell that’s alive,” says Sooam’s Insung Hwang, who organized the Yana River expedition. If the Sooam researchers do find such a cell, they could coax it to produce millions of cells. These could be reprogrammed to grow into embryos, which could then be implanted in surrogate elephants, the mammoth’s closest living relatives.Most scientists doubt that any living cell could have survived freezing on the open tundra. But Hwang and his colleagues have a Plan B: capture an intact nucleus of a mammoth cell, which is far more likely to have been preserved than the cell itself. Cloning a mammoth from nothing but an intact nucleus, however, will be a lot trickier. The Sooam researchers will need to transfer the nucleus into an elephant egg that has had its own nucleus removed. This will require harvesting eggs from an elephant—a feat no one has yet accomplished. If the DNA inside the nucleus is well preserved enough to take control of the egg, it just might start dividing into a mammoth embryo. If the scientists can get past that hurdle, they still have the formidable task of transplanting the embryo into an elephant’s womb. Then, as Zimov cautions, they will need patience. If all goes well, it will still be almost two years before they can see if the elephant will give birth to a healthy mammoth.Woolly Mammoths (Mammuthus primigenius) retreated to eastern Siberia by the end of the Ice age, about 10,000 years ago, then died out. A staple of museum dioramas, they’re candidates for rebirth—with elephants as surrogate mothers.“The thing that I always say is, if you don’t try, how would you know that it’s impossible?” says Hwang.In 1813, while traveling along the Ohio River from Hardensburgh to Louisville, John James Audubon witnessed one of the most miraculous natural phenomena of his time: a flock of passenger pigeons (Ectopistes migratorius) blanketing the sky. “The air was literally filled with Pigeons,” he later wrote. “The light of noon-day was obscured as by an eclipse, the dung fell in spots, not unlike melting flakes of snow; and the continued buzz of wings had a tendency to lull my senses to repose.”When Audubon reached Louisville before sunset, the pigeons were still passing overhead—and continued to do so for the next three days. “The people were all in arms,” wrote Audubon. “The banks of the Ohio were crowded with men and boys, incessantly shooting at the pilgrims... Multitudes were thus destroyed.”In 1813 it would have been hard to imagine a species less likely to become extinct. Yet by the end of the century the red-breasted passenger pigeon was in catastrophic decline, the forests it depended upon shrinking, and its numbers dwindling from relentless hunting. In 1900 the last confirmed wild bird was shot by a boy with a BB gun. Fourteen years later, just a century and a year after Audubon marveled at their abundance, the one remaining captive passenger pigeon, a female named Martha, died at the Cincinnati Zoo.The writer and environmentalist Stewart Brand, best known for founding the Whole Earth Catalog in the late 1960s, grew up in Illinois hiking in forests that just a few decades before had been aroar with the sound of the passenger pigeons’ wings. “Its habitat was my habitat,” he says. Two years ago Brand and his wife, Ryan Phelan, founder of the genetic-testing company DNA Direct, began to wonder if it might be possible to bring the species back to life. One night over dinner with Harvard biologist George Church, a master at manipulating DNA, they discovered that he was thinking along the same lines.Church knew that standard cloning methods wouldn’t work, since bird embryos develop inside shells and no museum specimen of the passenger pigeon (including Martha herself, now in the Smithsonian) would likely contain a fully intact, functional genome. But he could envision a different way of re-creating the bird. Preserved specimens contain fragments of DNA. By piecing together the fragments, scientists can now read the roughly one billion letters in the passenger pigeon genome. Church can’t yet synthesize an entire animal genome from scratch, but he has invented technology that allows him to make sizable chunks of DNA of any sequence he wants. He could theoretically manufacture genes for passenger pigeon traits—a gene for its long tail, for example—and splice them into the genome of a stem cell from a common rock pigeon.Rock pigeon stem cells containing this doctored genome could be transformed into germ cells, the precursors to eggs and sperm. These could then be injected into rock pigeon eggs, where they would migrate to the developing embryos’ sex organs. Squabs hatched from these eggs would look like normal rock pigeons—but they would be carrying eggs and sperm loaded with doctored DNA. When the squabs reached maturity and mated, their eggs would hatch squabs carrying unique passenger pigeon traits. These birds could then be further interbred, the scientists selecting for birds that were more and more like the vanished species.Saber-Toothed cats (Smilodon fatalis) went extinct after the ice age; paleontologists are not sure what caused their extinction. This cat was brought to life by a puppeteer: it’s a creation of Jim Henson’s creature shop.Church’s genome-retooling method could theoretically work on any species with a close living relative and a genome capable of being reconstructed. So even if the Sooam team fails to find an intact mammoth nucleus, someone might still bring the species back. Scientists already have the technology for reconstructing most of the genes it takes to make a mammoth, which could be inserted into an elephant stem cell. And there is no shortage of raw material for further experiments emerging from the Siberian permafrost. “With mammoths, it’s really a dime a dozen up there,” says Hendrik Poinar, an expert on mammoth DNA at McMaster University in Ontario. “It’s just a matter of finances now.”Though the revival of a mammoth or a passenger pigeon is no longer mere fantasy, the reality is still years away. For another extinct species, the time frame may be much shorter. Indeed, there’s at least a chance it may be back among the living before this story is published.The animal in question is the obsession of a group of Australian scientists led by Michael Archer, who call their endeavor the Lazarus Project. Archer previously directed a highly publicized attempt to clone the thylacine, an iconic marsupial carnivore that went extinct in the 1930s. That effort managed to capture only some fragments of the thylacine’s DNA. Wary of the feverish expectations that such high-profile experiments attract, Archer and his Lazarus Project collaborators kept quiet about their efforts until they had some preliminary results to offer.That time has come. Early in January, Archer and his colleagues revealed that they were trying to revive two closely related species of Australian frog. Until their disappearance in the mid-1980s, the species shared a unique—and utterly astonishing—method of reproduction. The female frogs released a cloud of eggs, which the males fertilized, whereupon the females swallowed the eggs whole. A hormone in the eggs triggered the female to stop making stomach acid; her stomach, in effect, became a womb. A few weeks later the female opened her mouth and regurgitated her fully formed babies. This miraculous reproductive feat gave the frogs their common names: the northern (Rheobatrachus vitellinus) and southern (Rheobatrachus silus) gastric brooding frogs.Unfortunately, not long after researchers began to study the species, they vanished. “The frogs were there one minute, and when scientists came back, they were gone,” says Andrew French, a cloning expert at the University of Melbourne and a member of the Lazarus Project.To bring the frogs back, the project scientists are using state-of-the-art cloning methods to introduce gastric brooding frog nuclei into eggs of living Australian marsh frogs and barred frogs that have had their own genetic material removed. It’s slow going, because frog eggs begin to lose their potency after just a few hours and cannot be frozen and revived. The scientists need fresh eggs, which the frogs produce only once a year, during their short breeding season.The great auk (Pinguinis impennis) was the penguin of the Northern Hemisphere, a flightless goose-size bird that dove into the North Atlantic to feed on fish and other prey. When it waddled onto the shores of rocky islands to breed, it was helpless against sailors who killed the great auk for food. The last pair ever recorded lived on the island of Eldey, near Iceland. On June 3, 1844, sailors clubbed them to death, and the great auk has never been seen alive since.Nevertheless, they’ve made progress. “Suffice it to say, we actually have embryos now of this extinct animal,” says Archer. “We’re pretty far down this track.” The Lazarus Project scientists are confident that they just need to get more high-quality eggs to keep moving forward. “At this point it’s just a numbers game,” says French.The matchless oddity of the gastric brooding frogs’ reproduction drives home what we lose when a species becomes extinct. But does that mean we should bring them back? Would the world be that much richer for having female frogs that grow little frogs in their stomachs? There are tangible benefits, French argues, such as the insights the frogs might be able to provide about reproduction—insights that might someday lead to treatments for pregnant women who have trouble carrying babies to term. But for many scientists, de-extinction is a distraction from the pressing work required to stave off mass extinctions.“There is clearly a terrible urgency to saving threatened species and habitats,” says John Wiens, an evolutionary biologist at Stony Brook University in New York. “As far as I can see, there is little urgency for bringing back extinct ones. Why invest millions of dollars in bringing a handful of species back from the dead, when there are millions still waiting to be discovered, described, and protected?”De-extinction advocates counter that the cloning and genomic engineering technologies being developed for de-extinction could also help preserve endangered species, especially ones that don’t breed easily in captivity. And though cutting-edge biotechnology can be expensive when it’s first developed, it has a way of becoming very cheap very fast. “Maybe some people thought polio vaccines were a distraction from iron lungs,” says George Church. “It’s hard in advance to say what’s distraction and what’s salvation.”But what would we be willing to call salvation? Even if Church and his colleagues manage to retrofit every passenger pigeon–specific trait into a rock pigeon, would the resulting creature truly be a passenger pigeon or just an engineered curiosity? If Archer and French do produce a single gastric brooding frog—if they haven’t already—does that mean they’ve revived the species? If that frog doesn’t have a mate, then it becomes an amphibian version of Celia, and its species is as good as extinct. Would it be enough to keep a population of the frogs in a lab or perhaps in a zoo, where people could gawk at it? Or would it need to be introduced back into the wild to be truly de-extinct?“The history of putting species back after they’ve gone extinct in the wild is fraught with difficulty,” says conservation biologist Stuart Pimm of Duke University. A huge effort went into restoring the Arabian oryx to the wild, for example. But after the animals were returned to a refuge in central Oman in 1982, almost all were wiped out by poachers. “We had the animals, and we put them back, and the world wasn’t ready,” says Pimm. “Having the species solves only a tiny, tiny part of the problem.”Hunting is not the only threat that would face recovered species. For many, there’s no place left to call home. The Chinese river dolphin became extinct due to pollution and other pressures from the human population on the Yangtze River. Things are just as bad there today. Around the world frogs are getting decimated by a human-spread pathogen called the chytrid fungus. If Australian biologists someday release gastric brooding frogs into their old mountain streams, they could promptly become extinct again.“Without an environment to put re-created species back into, the whole exercise is futile and a gross waste of money,” says Glenn Albrecht, director of the Institute for Social Sustainability at Murdoch University in Australia.What would we do with mammoths if we could clone them? Biologist Sergey Zimov’s suggestion: Set them loose in Pleistocene Park, a refuge he established in northeastern Siberia in 1996. Zimov argues that mammoths and other large Ice Age herbivores sustained the Siberian steppe that sustained them: They ate the grass, but they also fertilized it and tilled the soil with their hooves. Horses, bison, and other introduced herbivores are already transforming the park’s moss-dominated tundra back into grassland a mammoth could call home.Even if de-extinction proved a complete logistical success, the questions would not end. Passenger pigeons might find the rebounding forests of the eastern United States a welcoming home. But wouldn’t that be, in effect, the introduction of a genetically engineered organism into the environment? Could passenger pigeons become a reservoir for a virus that might wipe out another bird species? And how would the residents of Chicago, New York, or Washington, D.C., feel about a new pigeon species arriving in their cities, darkening their skies, and covering their streets with snowstorms of dung?De-extinction advocates are pondering these questions, and most believe they need to be resolved before any major project moves forward. Hank Greely, a leading bioethicist at Stanford University, has taken a keen interest in investigating the ethical and legal implications of de-extinction. And yet for Greely, as for many others, the very fact that science has advanced to the point that such a spectacular feat is possible is a compelling reason to embrace de-extinction, not to shun it.“What intrigues me is just that it’s really cool,” Greely says. “A saber-toothed cat? It would be neat to see one of those.”",
"I began my career covering conflicts. Starting at 26, I found myself in places such as Kosovo, Angola, Gaza, Afghanistan, and Kashmir. My reason for going, I told myself, was to document the brutality. I thought the most powerful stories were those driven by violence and destruction. While the importance of shining a light on human conflict shouldn’t be minimized, focusing only on that turned my world into a horror show.But slowly, as I covered conflict after conflict, it became clear to me that journalists also have an obligation to illuminate the things that unite us as human beings. If we choose to look for what divides us, we will find it. If we choose to look for what brings us together, we will find that too.Those years in war zones led me to an epiphany: Stories about people and the human condition are also about nature. If you dig deep enough behind virtually every human conflict, you will find an erosion of the bond between humans and the natural world around them.These truths became personal guideposts when I met Sudan, a northern white rhinoceros and, eventually, the last male of his kind.I saw Sudan for the first time in 2009 at the Dvůr Králové Zoo in Czechia (the Czech Republic). I can recall the exact moment. Surrounded by snow in his brick and iron enclosure, Sudan was being crate trained—learning to walk into the giant box that would carry him almost 4,000 miles south to Kenya. He moved slowly, cautiously. He took time to sniff the snow. He was gentle, hulking, otherworldly. I knew I was in the presence of an ancient being, millions of years in the making (fossil records suggest that the lineage is over 50 million years old), whose kind had roamed around much of our world.On that winter’s day, Sudan was one of only eight northern white rhinos left alive on the planet. A century ago there were hundreds of thousands of rhinos in Africa. By the early 1980s, hunting had reduced their numbers to around 19,000. Rhino horns, like our fingernails, are simply keratin, with no special curative powers, yet they’ve long been valued by people around the world as antidotes for ailments from fever to impotence.When I met Sudan, the remaining northern white rhinos were all in zoos, safe from poaching but with limited success at breeding. Conservationists had hatched a bold plan to airlift four of the rhinos to Kenya. The rhinos, it was hoped, would be stimulated by their ancestral habitat’s air, water, food, and room to roam. They would breed, and their offspring could be used to repopulate Africa.When I first heard of this plan, it sounded to me like something out of a children’s story. But I quickly realized that this was a desperate, last-ditch effort to save a species. Dvůr Králové Zoo, Ol Pejeta Conservancy, Kenya Wildlife Service, Fauna & Flora International, Back to Africa, and Lewa Wildlife Conservancy worked hard to make the move possible. On a frigid December night the four rhinos left the Dvůr Králové Zoo in Czechia for Ol Pejeta Conservancy in Kenya.How did we arrive at the point where such desperate measures were necessary? It’s astonishing that a demand for rhino horn based on little more than superstition has caused the wholesale slaughter of a species. But it’s encouraging that a disparate group of people came together in an attempt to save something unique and precious, something that once lost would be gone forever.Meeting Sudan in Czechia changed the trajectory of my life. Today my work doesn’t focus only on the human condition. Rather, I tell stories about nature, and in so doing, I tell stories about our home, our future, and the interdependence of all life.Nine years after the airlift, I received a call to hurry to Kenya. At 45, Sudan was elderly for his species. He had lived a long life, but now he was dying. In his last years he experienced again his native grasslands, although always in the company of armed guards to keep him safe from poachers. And he had found stardom—he’d been affectionately dubbed the “most eligible bachelor in the world.”Sudan’s death was not unexpected, yet it resonated with so many. When I arrived, he was surrounded by the people who had loved him and protected him. Joseph Wachira, the man pictured with Sudan on the previous page and one of his dedicated keepers, went to give him one more rub behind his ear. Sudan leaned his heavy head into Wachira’s. I took a photo of two old friends together for the last time.Those final moments were quiet—the rain falling, a single goaway bird scolding, and the muffled sorrow of Sudan’s caretakers. These keepers spend more time protecting the northern white rhinos than they do with their own children. Watching a creature die—one who is the last of its kind—is something I hope never to experience again. It felt like watching our own demise.The northern white rhinos may not survive human greed, yet there is a tiny sliver of hope. Today only two females are left in the world, but plans are in place to try in vitro fertilization to breed them.This is not just a story to me. We are witnessing extinction right now, on our watch. Poaching is not slowing down. If the current trajectory of killing continues, it’s entirely possible that all species of rhinos will be functionally extinct within our lifetimes. Removal of a keystone species has a huge effect on the ecosystem and on all of us. These giants are part of a complex world created over millions of years, and their survival is intertwined with our own. Without rhinos and elephants and other wildlife, we suffer a loss of imagination, a loss of wonder, a loss of beautiful possibilities. When we see ourselves as part of nature, we understand that saving nature is really about saving ourselves.Sudan taught me that.",
"Five years ago, I heard about a plan to airlift four of the last Northern White Rhinos from a zoo in the Czech Republic back to Africa. It sounded like a storyline for a Disney film but in reality, it was a desperate, last ditch effort to save an entire species. There are only seven of these rhinos left in existence. When I saw these huge, hulking gentle creatures surrounded by smokestacks and factories in the zoo outside of Prague, it seemed so unfair that we have reduced an entire species to this.Lewa Wildlife Conservancy in Kenya worked hard to make the move possible and the rhinos were flown on a cold, snowy night in December, 2009. They landed and were brought to roam “free” on the savannas of Kenya at the Ol Pejeta Conservancy. The hope was then, and now, to breed them. The air, water, and food, not to mention room to roam, might stimulate them to breed—and the offspring would then be used to repopulate Africa. Failing successful breeding, they will be cross-bred with Southern White Rhinos to preserve the genes.Recently, I went back to visit the four rhinos who had been airlifted to Kenya: Sudan, Suni, Najin and Fatu. It warmed my heart to see them nuzzling on the open plains, but I was reminded of a tragic truth by the team of armed guards who are there to protect them from poachers. Poaching is not slowing down, and it’s entirely possible, even likely, that if the current trajectory of killing continues, rhinos, along with elephants and a host of lesser known plains animals, will be functionally extinct in our lifetime. Organized by sophisticated heavily armed criminal networks and fueled by heavy demand from newly minted millionaires in emerging markets, poaching is devastating the amazing mega-fauna of the African plains.Much needed attention has been focused on the plight of wildlife and the conflict between heavily armed poachers and increasingly militarized wildlife rangers, but very little has been said about the indigenous communities on the frontlines of the poaching wars and the incredible work that is being done to strengthen them. These communities may hold the key to saving Africa’s great animals.The Nature Conservancy has been helping the Northern Rangelands Trust (NRT) form “community wildlife conservancies.” These conservancies benefit the indigenous communities, and help locals understand that high-end tourists are far more valuable to them over the long term than the short-term gain of poaching. The hope is that if their welfare, education and livelihoods are being jeopardized when a rhino or elephant is killed, local communities won’t let it happen.We can often forget that the best protectors of these landscapes are the local communities themselves. Their efforts to preserve community cohesion is ultimately the best immunization against forces that threaten both their wildlife and way of life.Ami Vitale is working to produce a documentary about the indigenous communities of Northern Kenya on the front lines of the poaching wars. She also hopes to deliver a series of visual storytelling trainings to these communities of the Northern Rangelands Trust so they can learn to tell their own stories. Visit her project funding site here.",
"Of all the large African mammals that wildlife veterinarian Pete Morkel has had to capture over his career—lions, forest elephants, white rhinos—giraffes are the most stressful. “With other animals, you’re trying to give just enough anesthetic to immobilize them, but with a giraffe, we use a total overdose to chemically knock them off their feet,” the sun-leathered 59-year-old tells me as I stalk him stalking a two-year-old female giraffe somewhere in the Nigerien bush, about 60 miles east of Niamey, Niger’s capital. He is wearing a camo hat and a pair of torn, purple-checkered boxers that he’s been wearing as shorts for the past several days.Morkel has loaded his dart gun with a dose of etorphine, an opioid about 6,000 times more powerful than morphine. Once it penetrates the giraffe’s skin, he and his team will have just minutes to chase down the animal, tackle her, and inject her neck with an antidote to keep her from dying. If she can be successfully captured and survive a 500-mile translocation across Niger, she’ll become one of eight founding “Adams” and “Eves” of a new population of one of the world’s rarest wild mammals.An orphaned giraffe nuzzles a caregiver at Sarara Camp in northern Kenya. Samburu cattle herders found the abandoned calf and alerted Sarara—known for raising orphaned mammals and returning them to their habitat. The young giraffe now lives with a wild herd.The giraffes we have chased for a week are the descendants of some 50 animals that made their way to the West African country of Niger in the late 1980s, when drought and war pushed them from their habitat in neighboring Mali. They walked south-southeast across the Sahel, along the Niger River, and skirted Niamey before settling in the Koure region, on a dry and dusty plateau.A Fulani herder named Amadou Hama, 76, recalled what it was like decades ago when he first encountered one of these giraffes one evening while tending his cattle. “We thought it was the devil, because of that neck and those horns. People had told me about dangerous animals like lions, but nobody had ever told me about the giraffe. We were frightened. Even the cows were frightened.”These newly arrived giants were the last survivors of a once vast population of “white giraffes” whose range at the turn of the last century spanned all of West Africa, from the coast of Senegal to Nigeria.In 2016 a team of scientists came to an epiphany (if still contentious) about giraffes. Until then, the conventional view held that all giraffes belonged to a single species, Giraffa camelopardalis. But genetic analysis now suggests that giraffes are in fact four distinct species, actually more different from each other than the brown bear is from the polar bear. And those four species can be further classified into five subspecies, including the rare West African Giraffa camelopardalis peralta, the pale, spotted refugees now found only in the Koure region of Niger. Based on this new taxonomy, all but two subspecies would be considered vulnerable, endangered, or critically endangered, and across Africa, populations have declined by almost 40 percent over the past three decades, leaving an estimated 110,000 giraffes in the world.Julian Fennessy, co-director of the Giraffe Conservation Foundation (GCF), calls this the “silent extinction,” because unlike the attention lavished on the disappearance of elephants and great apes, most people assume that giraffes are doing just fine in the wild, perhaps because of their abundance in zoos and as stuffed animals.And in fact, in some parts of Africa giraffes are doing fine. In South Africa and Namibia, where private game farms boost wildlife numbers and giraffes are hunted legally, populations have nearly doubled in recent decades. But in East Africa, the reticulated and Masai species of giraffe face a much grimmer outlook. “What’s killing giraffes in southern Kenya is fences. They’re an even bigger threat than poaching. Giraffes can’t jump over fences, which means their ranges are being fragmented,” says Arthur Muneza, the East Africa coordinator of the GCF. Population growth, livestock overgrazing, and climate change are pushing pastoralists and farmers into wildlands and giraffe habitat. Meanwhile the population of Nubian giraffes, found mostly in Uganda, has declined by as much as 97 percent over the past 30 years, making them one of the world’s most critically endangered large mammals.The giraffes of Niger are scarcer still, and yet, from a low point of just 49 individuals in 1996, the population of West African giraffes has bounced back to more than 600 in the past two and a half decades. Their return is one of the greatest conservation success stories on the continent. It is also one of the most unlikely.Niger ranks dead last out of 189 countries on the UN’s Human Development Index—a measure of life expectancy, schooling, and national income—and conserving wildlife had not traditionally been a priority of the country. In 1996, after a coup d’etat, the new president of Niger, Ibrahim Baré Maïnassara, sent the army into the bush to capture a group of animals to present as gifts to the presidents of nearby Nigeria and Burkina Faso. Not a single captured giraffe survived the operation, and the population of West African giraffes fell by nearly a third. Three years later, two more animals died when the next president tried to send a gift to the leader of Togo.The dire situation, and the recognition that the last West African giraffes were a precious and rare wildlife resource in a country that has few others, led Niger in 2011 to craft the first national conservation strategy in Africa for protecting giraffes. With poaching all but quashed by the government and without any natural predators, the population of giraffes in Koure has been able to grow. As the population exploded at a rate of more than 11 percent a year, conflict with farmers and herders seemed inevitable. It was clear that for Niger’s giraffe numbers to continue growing and to remain healthy, a second satellite population would need to be established in a new location.A day earlier I’d gone to the nearby village of Kanaré to speak with the local chief, Hamadou Yacouba. Sitting under the bushy canopy of a neem tree to shade us from the midday sun, he explained that “giraffes are considered like domesticated animals here. God placed the giraffes here, so we live with them. The other countries didn’t get giraffes. We got them.”Kanaré has benefited from a bit of giraffe tourism and a local development fund created by international conservationists. But with Boko Haram active in the country’s east and al Qaeda affiliates operating in the country’s north and west, tourism has slowed to a trickle. The giraffes were visited by just 1,700 tourists last year, mostly well-to-do Niamey residents on day-trips.There has been a remarkable rewilding of Africa during the past decade as conservationists have reintroduced long-departed species, such as Chad’s scimitar-horned oryx, to areas that once were part of their home ranges. In the past two years the GCF has orchestrated three other giraffe translocations, including two inside Uganda’s Murchison Falls National Park, which required ferrying animals across the Nile River.In Niger, an assessment of the country’s potential habitats determined the safest place to park a second population of West African giraffes was on 2.5 million uninhabited acres in Gadabedji, an area in the center of the country that has been designated as a biosphere reserve. It’s a hot spot for vultures and gazelles, and 50 years ago the area was host to ancestors of these giraffes as well.The translocation is not without critics. “If giraffes are in danger in their present location, why are their numbers augmenting? It simply doesn’t make sense,” says Isabelle Ciofolo, an ethologist who joined the local conservation efforts in Koure in the mid-1990s. “To the extent possible, it is best to leave the giraffes to their own natural tendencies in determining which habitat is suited to their needs.”She points out that the giraffes of Niger have shown they can roam up to 180 miles. “If there is a menace in one place, they are perfectly capable of finding a new habitat on their own.”"Good girl. What a sweetie pie," Morkel whispers to himself as he creeps closer to the unsuspecting giraffe. He estimates the animal at about 1,500 pounds, sets the pressure in his rifle to 12 bar for a 100-foot shot, and turns the safety off. It’s 1 p.m., and the temperature has just hit 100°F.“I’ve never had this sort of situation where you can walk right up to a giraffe. Normally, you’re in a pickup, shooting them from a distance,” Morkel tells me. But these are strange creatures, not least because they live on community land, far from any game reserve or national park, and spend their days crossing paths with farmers and herders. At night they bust their heads through the walls of the locals’ elevated beehive-shaped granaries and eat the cowpea leaves that villagers store for their livestock, as well as their mangoes and pumpkins. Fortunately for everyone, the one food they mysteriously have no taste for is millet, the nutritious local cereal staple.Wildlife personnel pull a dead giraffe from a poacher’s snare in Amboseli, Kenya. A single animal can yield 650 pounds of valuable meat. Sometimes giraffes are killed only for their tails—status symbols in some cultures.Morkel raises the gun to his shoulder and pulls the trigger, sending his etorphine-laden dart sailing into the animal’s left shoulder, a direct hit, but it will take several minutes for the drug to kick in.The sedation of wild giraffes is a relatively new practice that has been refined over the past 30 years and carries major risks. The animal can stop breathing from a lethal dose of opioid. It can fall headfirst and crack its skull, or break its long back or spindly legs. It can regurgitate partly digested food and inhale it into its lungs, leading to pneumonia. And it can overheat while lying on the scorching sand. During a 2017 translocation in Uganda, three animals died from stresses related to being captured, and another died while it was being moved.While we wait for the drug to kick in, Morkel and I walk back to a waiting pickup truck filled with a team of rangers and researchers. “This is a hard species to work with,” Morkel says. “There’s a long way to fall, and a lot of unique anatomy.”Everything about this creature’s anatomy indeed seems to be uniquely stretched to the extreme. There’s its famous neck, of course, but also its outrageously long eyelashes, its legs (the longest of any animal), its eyes (the widest of any land mammal), its elongated skull, and especially its purple-black prehensile tongue, which can extend over a foot and a half from its mouth and nimbly strip bare an acacia stem so thorny you wouldn’t want to grab it with your bare hand. Even its heart, which pumps blood over a greater vertical span than any other land mammal, can be more than two feet long, with ventricle walls more than three inches thick.The giraffe has the highest known blood pressure of any animal, and yet somehow it can manage to quickly drop its head 16 or 17 feet to the ground without passing out. Because it’s so difficult for them to get up and down, and because they’re so vulnerable when they’re on the ground, giraffes only seem to sleep for a few minutes at a time (a phenomenon difficult to observe in the wild). They can go for weeks without water by hydrating only with the moisture they suck from leaves. It took five years of observing giraffes in the deserts of Namibia before the GCF’s Fennessy, perhaps the world’s leading expert on giraffes, ever saw one splay its legs and dip its head awkwardly to drink from a ground puddle. Witnessing this gawky effort to obtain the most basic sustenance makes one wonder if the right question to ask isn’t why the giraffe has such a long neck, but rather, why is it so short relative to such long legs?In truth we still don’t know why the giraffe has such a long neck. According to Nikos Soulounias, an evolutionary biologist at the New York Institute of Technology, the giraffe evolved on the Indian subcontinent and migrated to Africa from Asia some eight million years ago. Its closest living relative, the okapi, which lives in the equatorial rainforests of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, noticeably lacks its cousin’s long neck.Giraffes are naturally topiarists, eating the acacias into hourglass profiles that fan up at the top, just above the “browse line” where the animals’ towering necks and outstretched tongues can no longer reach, and so it would make sense that the long neck evolved to open up a feeding niche unavailable to shorter species. But some researchers have suggested that the giraffe’s long neck is actually a function of sexual selection. Its principal benefit is not for foraging in the upper reaches of trees but rather for males to more effectively club each other with their pendulous heads, outfitted with extra-thick skulls, when competing for females in heat. Or perhaps the giraffe’s long neck is simply to give an otherwise fairly defenseless animal a high vantage point to watch the horizon for predators.Undoubtedly linked to the giraffe’s long neck is its eerie silence. Giraffes almost never make a sound and don’t communicate with each other using any kind of signaling audible to human ears. Their silence is especially bizarre given that they’re social creatures that live in a fission-fusion society, in which groups of individuals frequently get together for a period of time before dissolving. Other species with fission-fusion societies, such as elephants and chimpanzees, tend to be loquacious communicators. This has led some researchers to suggest that giraffes may emit low-frequency infrasound to communicate with each other over long distances (similar to the low-frequency rumblings of elephants), but so far the evidence has been mixed.After two minutes of standing still, the giraffe that Morkel has darted appears to realize how weird she’s starting to feel. Suddenly she gallops off from the group, her long legs seeming to fly in slow motion.Our truck sets off after her, weaving through the tiger brush at 20 miles an hour, as the driver tries to keep up with the sprinting animal. Finally we’re able to shoot out in front of the giraffe to cut her off. The tires screech to a halt so that four men in the bed can leap out and set up a rope line to slow the animal. As the giraffe barrels straight into the line, the head local researcher, Abdoul Razack Moussa Zaberiou, is sent flying through the air while the giraffe tumbles to the ground in a cloud of dust.Morkel jumps on top of the downed giraffe just below her head and plunges a syringe full of antidote into a jugular vein, while two rangers straddle the lower part of her neck to keep her pinned. They only have about two minutes until the animal comes to her senses, and so the team hustles to stuff her ears with a rag and put a blindfold over her eyes.While Morkel lets fly a string of expletives, the team of vets and rangers take blood samples and inject syringefuls of vitamin E, antibiotics, and an anti-inflammatory drug. They take the giraffe’s temperature and measurements and cut off an ear tip for later DNA testing.No sooner have they wrapped a rope around her torso than the animal awakens and kicks wildly, spraying peach-colored sand into the air. Morkel delivers a slap on her rear end and she shoots up, blind and deaf, to be guided by a rope into the back of a trailer, in which she’ll be driven to a large enclosure made of eucalyptus poles and thatching.Five more giraffes are standing by, intently observing from their perch high above us, not 30 yards away. Two of them chew their cud, rolling a bolus between their teeth. Farther in the distance a pair of young Zarma herders, with their flock of goats, lean against a tree, watching as well. The whole frenzied chase has the feeling of a mobster hit gone awry, or perhaps an alien abduction.In Chad’s Zakouma National Park, Kordofan giraffes rub necks—possibly a prelude to fighting or some other form of communication among the mostly silent animals. Zakouma is a relatively safe haven for Kordofans; more than half the world’s population is there.After three weeks getting accustomed to life in an enclosure, the giraffes that will recolonize Gadabedji are ready for transport. At about 11 a.m. on a Sunday, the first four giraffes are guided into a 20-foot shipping container that has been painted white and had its roof cut off. The floor is packed with wet sand for the animals to stand on and has poles fastened all along the edges to hang leaves as an in-transit snack. It’s crucial that the giraffes stay calm during the trip. Weeks earlier the team lost an overexcited animal that slipped and knocked its head against the trailer and later died.Led by a spotter vehicle that looks out for electrical wires that could decapitate the precious cargo, the truck sets off at a 10-mile-an-hour crawl for Gadabedji, some 500 miles away.Four curious giraffe heads poking above the trailer watch a parade of sights they’ve never encountered before: men getting haircuts by the side of the road, butchered goats hanging from poles, and small white mosques overflowing with prostrate men. We drive past a camel-driving Tuareg herder, a cattle market filled with mangy long-horned bulls, women in hijabs who smile and point, and quite a few people who don’t even look up to notice the strangest cargo ever to blow through their village.Forty-seven hours later, having stopped only for twice-a-day feeds beneath gao trees and a three-hour nap for the crew, we finally arrive at Gadabedji, where we’re greeted by the Tuareg mayor in a bright red robe and turban. It’s a sandy landscape, with little grass or brush. Children run out to meet our caravan, raising their arms and jumping for joy. They have heard for months that we are coming.“This is perfect country for a giraffe,” Morkel tells me, smiling. The heads peeking over the side of the shipping container look around at the clear expanse and pockets of edible acacias. Yes, this is indeed good giraffe country.As Tuareg guards stand by with AK-47s, the gates of the shipping container are opened. Under a blazing sun, a daytime moon, and a sky of wispy cirrus clouds, the giraffes have arrived at their new home. This is just the first cohort of the founding population. There are plans for more animals to join them next year. And the year after, possibly more.After two minutes the first giraffe pokes her head forward and cautiously trots out. She is soon followed by the others. They stop to watch the humans watching them. A breeze blows by, and the four turn and wander off slowly, marching toward a stand of acacias at the horizon. They move single file, looking back now and again as if unsure what they’re supposed to do next, until they are out of sight.",
"With their elongated necks and bright bodies, it’s hard to miss a white giraffe, especially when there are two.A white female and baby giraffe were first spotted on a reserve in Kenya in early August by rangers at the Hirola Conservation Program. Video they posted on YouTube recently skyrocketed in popularity as viewers marveled over the rarity of seeing the pale animal.While many have been quick to label the giraffe as albino, it likely suffers from a genetic condition called leucism, which inhibits skin cells from producing pigment but allows other organs, like eyes, to be dark colored. Albinism, a congenital condition, inhibits the body from producing pigment in all organs, and animals with this condition often have pink eyes.The condition, while rare, is not unheard of. It was last seen in a giraffe calf at Tanzania’s Tarangire National Park.Despite their inability to produce colorful pigment, giraffes and other animals with leucism don’t face genetic disadvantages to their survival, but their color can attract unwanted attention.More than half of all giraffes don’t make it past six months of age, according to the Giraffe Conservation Foundation. They’re targeted by predators such as lions and hyenas.In the comment section of the Hirola Conservation Program’s video, viewers also voiced concerns that widely circulating images of the animals and their location could make them more susceptible to poaching.Following the birth of a white giraffe in their refuge, the Tarangire National Park took care to ensure the giraffe was safe from poachers. Hirola has not announced any such security.Hirola noted in a blog post that this was the first time many of the community rangers had seen a white giraffe. They anecdotally wondered if the genetic condition is becoming more common, but no studies revealed whether this could be true.Giraffes aren’t the only animal to make headlines for unique, white fur. Earlier this month, a rare white moose was seen in Sweden walking through tall grass. White lions and white penguins have also been spotted with similar pigment conditions. (See more unusually pale animals here.)",
"In the U.S., 719 animal species are listed as federally endangered or threatened. Every state is home to endangered species—some well-known, some obscure. All are vital to their ecosystems.Editor’s note, May 20, 2021: Since this story published in 2019, two species have recovered and have been taken off the endangered species list: the least tern (shown here in Missouri) and the Kirtland’s warbler (shown here in Michigan).The Wyoming toad may be North America’s most endangered amphibian. Disease and habitat loss drove the lumpy, spotted toad into such rapid decline in the 20th century that by 1984, there were only about 16 wild toads left, all in a single county just west of Laramie, Wyoming. By 1991, they were declared extinct in the wild.Now, thanks to complex captive breeding and release efforts, the Wyoming toad seems to be making a comeback.You may have never heard of the Wyoming toad. In fact, many Laramie residents have never heard of it either.But stories like this play out all over the nation, from the masked bobwhite quail of Arizona’s Sonora Desert, once abundant and now almost extinct in the wild, to the Salt Creek tiger beetle, one of the rarest insects in America. Its beleaguered population lives in marshland in just one Nebraska county.Often when we think of endangered species, iconic symbols of conservation come to mind: the Bengal tiger, the orangutan, the blue whale. But endangered species are in our own backyards as well: 719 animals in the United States are listed as endangered or threatened under the federal Endangered Species Act. All are vital to their ecosystems. When one species disappears, that loss risks imperiling the food chain of its entire biosphere.“Every species that’s protected is potentially the greatest underdog story of all time,” says Christina Meister, a public affairs specialist at the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.The service maintains a publicly accessible database of every federally listed endangered animal species present in each U.S. state.California has 113 endangered animals—the most in the country. Vermont has four—the fewest. Vermont, of course, is a fraction the size of California, which plays a large role in the discrepancy of endangered species present, but there are other factors at play too that make certain states likely to have higher numbers of endangered species.California, says Valerie Fellows, spokesperson at Fish and Wildlife Service, is home to many diverse habitats. The species in these unique environments have evolved over millennia to live and thrive in very small ranges. Disruptions to these specific ecosystems, whether by drought or by wildfire or by hunting, are felt acutely, because the species simply aren’t spread out enough to resist.Hawaii is another state that has a high number of endangered animal species, with 79. Because many species in Hawaii are endemic, or native only to the state, they’re hit hard when there is a threat, Fellows says.Invasive species in particular are a problem on the Hawaiian islands. Non-native mongooses, which feed on bird eggs, have had “disastrous effects across the board” for forest-dwelling birds in the state, she says.Invasive species are also an issue in Florida, according to Fellows. Like Hawaii, Florida’s balmy, foliage-rich ecosystem is welcoming for foreign species that come to the state—and then never leave. There are so many invasive snakes in Florida, says Fellows, that they’ve reduced some mammal populations in the state by 95 percent. “Racoons squirrels, rabbits…the snakes have eaten everything,” she says.Saving species from extinction doesn’t just mean preserving wild public lands. According the Fish and Wildlife Service, more than half of the species listed as endangered in the U.S. make the majority of their homes on private property. For many species, like the California condor, the black-footed ferret, and, of course, the Wyoming toad, cooperation with private landowners has been vital.“There are species that have teetered on the brink of extinction, and it's only been through the help of people [that we’ve] been able to bring them back,” says Meister.This interactive map highlights a different—and often little known—endangered animal found in every U.S. state. Some, like the Devil’s Hole pupfish, are found only in a single geothermal pool in a limestone cavern. Others, like the northern long-eared bat, have ranges spanning 37 states. (Click here if you do not see the map on the page).Imperiled creatures come in all shapes and sizes. Maybe the one we’ve listed for your state is one you’ve never even heard of.",
"My cat, Bernstein, likes bird-watching almost as much as I do. Bernstein is an easygoing three-year-old short-haired tabby whose other passions include laser pointers, elastic hair bands, and dental floss. And me, I’m a 33-year-old short-haired blond who has always been, petwise, a cat person. Bernstein and I often hang out together in the living room, appreciating the natural order of hummingbirds and chickadees outside our window.Bernstein was a tiny kitten, unable to eat or open his eyes, when he was rescued after being abandoned in a barn. (His littermate, Woodward, remains with the journalist friend who rescued them.) He’s one lucky cat—and I’ve wondered if his genial personality might be due, at least in part, to everlasting gratitude for having dodged a lifetime of starvation, shelters, and other feral fates.But no nature or nurture can override the feline instinct, as I was sadly reminded last spring. On a warm afternoon, I let Bernstein onto the patio for some sun. After slinking off for a few minutes, he proudly returned, clutching a ball of feathers: a one-ounce, beautifully shade-dappled Swainson’s thrush that had just flown several thousand miles from Central America to Oregon to sing for a mate in my backyard. Dead as a doornail.I couldn’t blame Bernstein. He was just putting his instincts and ninja skills into practice. Still, as the little thrush went cold in my hands, my heart sank.Several years ago, a team of Smithsonian Institution and U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service researchers combined data from dozens of previous studies to estimate, as rigorously as possible, how many birds are killed by cats each year in the contiguous United States. Their results were startling. After carefully quantifying cat populations and predation rates (and the uncertainty of both), the scientists calculated that domestic cats pounce on one billion to four billion birds a year in the lower 48 states, as well as 6.3 billion to 22.3 billion small mammals and hundreds of millions of reptiles and amphibians.About two-thirds of the bird deaths were attributed to feral cats, living wild. As birds’ total U.S. population at any given moment has been estimated at around 10 billion to 20 billion, that feral cat toll would probably exceed all mortality from window strikes, roadkill, pesticides, pollution, windmills, and all other unnatural causes combined, except habitat loss and possibly climate change—a staggering thought.Whoa, did that study ruffle fur and feathers! This wasn’t surprising, considering its heady concoction of charismatic animals, life and death, and ungraspable numbers. Some people disbelieved the estimates or relentlessly attacked the scientists for being “anti-cat.” Others felt vindicated, if their views fit the new evidence. Media reports pitched cat people against bird people, animal rights advocates against ecologists, and pet owners against academics. One of the researchers cowrote a book, Cat Wars—which did not exactly smooth things over—and described receiving death threats.All this static did not negate the key finding: that when cats are introduced predators—that is, they’re brought into an ecosystem where they prey on native animals but nothing much preys on them—they are a serious source of mortality for birds and other native wildlife.Follow-up studies have confirmed the scale of the threat. For example, the most comprehensive inquiry in Canada, which has fewer total cats than the United States, estimated that 100 million to 350 million birds are taken by cats each year.The situation is acute yet oddly unfathomable. Everyone knows cats are predators, but until recently the impact of cats on wildlife was barely recognized. Even when presented with raw kill data, many people, including the overwhelming majority of cat owners, still doubt that cats adversely affect wild bird populations. Maybe this reflects our inherent difficulty in reckoning with broad, incremental effects (like, say, climate change).Or maybe we should all lighten up. No study has definitively linked cat predation to mainland bird population trends (though islands are another story). It’s difficult to isolate one factor for the widespread decline of many birds because numerous other variables are also at work.“The status of the world’s birds continues to deteriorate, and even once common birds are vanishing,” says a recent report from BirdLife International. It cites agriculture and logging as today’s top threats to imperiled species and ranks introduced predators a distant third. In terms of trashing the planet, humans are plainly the worst offenders. And blaming cats only deflects our responsibility onto an animal with no concept of saving the world.People generally agree that the feral cat population is too large. But there the agreement stops, partly because right now we have no good solutions. Birds aside, feral cats pose all kinds of intractable health, safety, and philosophical dilemmas that have overwhelmed our current systems. No matter how you believe cats should be treated, the world has just too many cats to manage.This is, in fact, the most succinct argument for leaving cats alone: We’ll never be able to get rid of them, no matter how hard we try. Long after humankind has faded from this planet, cats will surely be scratching around whatever’s left of it. But if we give up on seemingly unresolvable problems, the world will grow more miserable, not less so. I think we can do better.Some are already taking action. Cat advocates have widely embraced trap-neuter-return programs, which sterilize feral cats and then return them to the wild. Bird conservation groups mostly oppose this policy, and the animal rights group PETA stands morally against it, but these organizations offer few feasible alternatives beyond keeping cats indoors (an excellent idea). Meanwhile, U.S. animal shelters euthanize more than a million unwanted cats each year, an unpopular solution to the ultimate problem.Me, I don’t have the answer. But I do have a suggestion. Back when I took Bernstein to be neutered by the local vet, I wish he’d also been microchipped, not as a voluntary add-on but as standard practice. A chip the size of a grain of rice is easier to administer than a blood test, yet microchips are still mostly absent from the domestic cat world.We’d have fewer cats at large if all cats were chipped: Lost animals could easily be returned, and abandoned animals could be traced to those who dumped them. I would happily pay a fee for this effort, especially if part of that contribution went toward building up our shelter system or other programs designed to address the feral cat population with proper resources. Even a small, onetime fee for each pet cat in the United States—insignificant against the cost of a lifetime of cat food—could generate billions of dollars. I know it’s not a perfect or complete solution, and a tangle of details would have to be worked out. But regulating cats would be a good start toward mitigating our current feline free-for-all.No one who loves animals wants to leave this kind of legacy. We must do our best to care for our planet, because we’re the ones responsible. Bernstein is too busy watching birds—safely, through our living room window.",
"The cheetah’s spots look like the work of a skilled artist, who has delicately dabbed dots of ink upon the animal’s coat. By contrast, the king cheetah – a rare breed from southern Africa – looks like the same artist had a bad day and knocked the whole ink pot over. With thick stripes running down its back, and disorderly blotches over the rest of its body, the king cheetah looks so unusual that it was originally considered a separate species. Its true nature as a mutant breed was finally confirmed in 1981 when two captive spotted females each gave birth to a king.Two teams of scientists, led by Greg Barsh from the HudsonAlpha Institute for Biotechnology and Stanford University, and Stephen O’Brien from the Frederick National Laboratory for Cancer Research have discovered the gene behind the king cheetah’s ink-stains. And it’s the same gene that turns a mackerel-striped tabby cat into a blotched “classic” one.Back in 2010, Eduardo Eizirik, one of O’Brien’s team, found a small region of DNA that seemed to control the different markings in mackerel and blotched tabbies. But, we only have a rough draft of the cat genome, they couldn’t identify any specific genes within the area. The study caught the attention of Barsh, who had long been interested in understanding how cats get their patterns, from tiger stripes to leopard rosettes. The two teams started working together.Christopher Kaelin and Xing Xu focused on the region that Eizirik had identified, using DNA samples taken from Californian feral cats that had been captured for sterilisation. By comparing mackerel and blotched individuals, the team found one gene that was responsible for the different markings. They dubbed it Taqpep. All blotched tabbies have one of two critical mutations in both their copies of Taqpep, while all mackerel cats have one or two unblemished versions.Taqpep is also responsible for the king cheetah’s unmistakeable coat. Kaelin and Xu sequenced the gene in Kgosi, a captive king cheetah, and found another mutation in Taqpep, one that greatly enlarges the protein encoded by the gene.Kaelin got in touch with Ann van Dyk, the woman who first identified that king cheetahs were a mutant version of the regular ones. She runs a cheetah conservation centre in South Africa that’s Kgosi, and all other captive kings, came from. By analysing all of her cheetahs, van Dyk confirmed that Kgosi’s Taqpep mutation is found in all the kings, and none of the 217 wild spotted cheetahs do.Taqpep is activated in cat skin, and not in other organs. But in both cheetahs and domestic tabbies, it’s active at low levels in both dark and light patches. So what is Taqpep actually doing, and if it isn’t directly changing the colour of the felines’ fur, then what is?Another member of the team, Kelly McGowan, found an important clue. A tabby’s markings start appearing when the foetus is seven weeks old. At that point, the cradle-shaped organs known as follicles are fully developed, and they start to produce hairs. If a follicle produces lots of melanin – a dark pigment – it grows a dark hair. So why do some follicles churn out melanin, while others exercise more restraint?To find out, Lewis Hong looked for genes whose activity varied between the yellow and black zones of a cheetah’s skin. His search yielded 60 genes that were more active in the black spots, and one of them stood out – Edn3.Edn3 produces a hormone that fuels the growth and division of melanocytes – the cells that make melanin.  It’s active in the follicles, and more so in black regions than yellow ones – something that Hong confirmed in cheetahs, tabbies, and even one leopard. When he artificially increased the activity of Edn3 in the skins of laboratory mice, their coats blackened.Let’s put this all together. The team thinks that Taqpep somehow creates periodic zones in the skins of foetal cats. These zones determine how active Edn3 will later be, which in turn dictates the number of melanocytes in the follicles. More melanocytes means more melanin, which means dark hair. Note that the “zones” that Taqpep sets up are invisible. They only become apparent through their subsequent influence on Edn3. If Taqpep is disrupted by certain mutations, as in blotched tabbies and king cheetahs, it sets up wider and more erratic zones, leading to chaotic stains rather than even spots.How can Taqpep create these zones if it’s evenly active throughout a cat’s skin? There are a few possibilities, but here’s the most intriguing one: Taqpep creates a protein called Tabulin that usually sits in the membranes of skin cells, but can detach and drift between them. So Taqpep might be active everywhere, but Tabulin can diffuse through the skin and become concentrated in certain areas.This is really exciting, because diffusing molecules are central to a longstanding explanation for animal patterns. Back in 1952, Alan Turing, the legendary computer scientist and code-breaker, suggested that animal skins could produce beautiful complex patterns through a lively tango between two molecules – an activator and an inhibitor. Both diffuse throughout the skin, and react with each other. Over short distances, the activator reinforces itself, but over longer distances, the inhibitor blocks it. Depending on how quickly they spread and how strongly they interact, they can produce everything from spots to blotches (play around with this Java applet to see what I mean.)Scientists have tested Turing’s “reaction-diffusion” ideas in many different animals, but it has been next to impossible to find the actual activators or inhibitors. Barsh thinks that Taqpep (or rather, Tabulin) may be one of them, and the team is now looking into it further.Hopi Hoekstra, who studies the genetics of animal colour at Harvard University, is very impressed with the study. “It’s a tour de force,” she says. “We previously knew very little of about how patterns are formed and maintained in mammals. This is largely because the workhorse of pigment genetics—the laboratory mouse—doesn’t display stripes or spots.” Kaelin’s team got around that problem by studying the diversity of wild and domestic cats. Thanks to their work, we’re getting closer to the real story about how the leopard (or cheetah) got its spots, or the tiger its stripes. Turing drafted the outline, and Barsh and O’Brien and filling in the details.Reference: Kaelin, Xu, Hong, David, McGowan, Schmidt-Kuntzel, Roelke, Pino, Pontius, Cooper, Manuel, Swnson, Marker, Harper, van Dyk, Yue, Mullikin, Warren, Eizirik, Kos, O’Brien, Barsh & Menotti-Raymonds. 2012. Specifying and Sustaining Pigmentation Patterns in Domestic and Wild Cats. Science http://dx.doi.org/10.1126/science.1220893Image by Jurvetson",
"In pursuit of the world’s smallest bird, we’ve come to the backyard of a flamingo pink house in Palpite, Cuba. Ornithologist Christopher Clark has a car full of gear to unload: cameras, sound equipment, a sheer cube-shaped cage. Within minutes of arriving this May morning, Clark is spinning around in circles. He’s trying to follow the path of a bullet with wings as it whizzes from one clump of orange fire bush blossoms to the next. When the hummingbird pauses to draw sugary fuel from the flowers, his wings continue to beat a grayish blur too fast for the human eye to resolve.Even by the Lilliputian standards of hummingbirds, Cuba’s bee hummingbird (Mellisuga helenae) is a midget—literally the smallest bird in the world. Its iridescent green body weighs a bit more than the average almond. Locally it’s known as zunzuncito—the little buzz-buzz, after the sound it makes—and is even smaller than its cousin the zunzun, or emerald hummingbird.By tracking the trajectory and speed of this Anna’s hummingbird when it flies in front of different background patterns and colors projected in this tunnel, researchers at the University of British Columbia, Vancouver, hope to learn more about how hummingbirds process the world whizzing by. It’s thought that birds in general may monitor the height of objects looming in their visual field, such as these horizontal bars, to avoid midair collisions. (Sources: Roslyn Dakin and Doug Altshuler)What this bird lacks in size, he makes up for in enthusiasm when he spots a visitor in his territory. She’s a comely female, contained by the sheer cage that Clark brought and has placed on a corrugated metal roof. If the male notices this female’s enclosure, it doesn’t dampen his ardor. He helicopters up from his perch on a branch, hovers in the air, and lets out a trill in her direction.He climbs higher, until he’s a pinprick against the cloudy sky. Then, like a roller coaster that’s reached its apex, he pitches forward and whooshes toward the ground. In an instant the daredevil is doing it all over again: climb, dive, and swoop. These plunges last a mere second. Then he vanishes, and the only trace of his passage is the leaves trembling in his wake.Though I stared intently at the courtship show, I did not see it.Neither did Clark, but he did something better. He recorded the display with a high-speed camera that slices each second of it into 500 frames. After Clark downloads video of the dive—the first ever recorded of this species at that high camera speed—he shows the footage to me on his laptop, clicking through every hard-won frame. Only then do we see the breathtaking maneuvers that the hummingbird’s speed had concealed.For the past eight years, Clark has traveled from the Arizona desert to the Ecuadorian rain forest to rural Cuba, recording hummingbird courtship displays. Back in his lab at the University of California, Riverside, the professor examines the videos for what they reveal about hummingbird flight. His findings could contribute to our understanding of animal flight in general and hummingbird mating systems in particular.Most birds produce substantial upward force—aka lift force—only with the downward flap of their wings. The secret to the hummingbird’s hovering ability lies in the near symmetry of its wing motion, which allows it to produce lift during the upstroke as well as the downstroke. By filling the air with a fine mist using an ultrasonic fogger, researchers can observe the tornado-like vortices that this Anna’s hummingbird sheds at the end of each half-stroke—when its wings flip more than 90 degrees and reverse course. (Sources: Victor Ortega-Jimenez and Robert Dudley, UC Berkeley; Doug Altshuler, University of British Columbia, Vancouver)Letting hummingbirds loose in wind tunnels allows researchers to probe the mechanics of flight at airspeeds of up to 35 miles an hour. This black-chinned hummingbird at the University of California, Riverside is part of an experiment testing whether aerial mating displays are a good representation of a bird’s physical abilities. In other words: Do the male birds that perform the most acrobatic dives to impress females also possess the ability to fly the fastest? For this photograph a fog of water vapor was added to make the wind movement visible. (Sources: Sean Wilcox and Christopher Clark)With their rocketing movements and jewel-like plumage, hummingbirds seem like a hybrid of flesh, feather, and fireworks. The wings of some species flap up to a hundred times per second. Their heart rate can exceed a thousand beats per minute, and they gulp nectar with a near-invisible flick of the tongue. In gardens or at backyard feeders, they’re the definition of fleeting beauty. So who could resist the temptation to slow their motion, to dissect their movements—to inhabit, even briefly, the hummingbird’s world?Hummingbirds live exclusively in the Americas. From southern Alaska to Tierra del Fuego, there are about 340 recognized species. Of these, 27—including the seemingly ubiquitous ruby-throated hummingbird—have been sighted in the United States. The center of hummingbird diversity is in the northern Andes, where 290 species reside in lowland rain forests, mountaintop cloud forests, and every ecosystem in between. The smallest can weigh less than two grams. The largest, the giant hummingbird found in Peru and Chile, tips the scales at around 20 grams. You could send something that weight in the U.S. mail with a single first-class stamp.World’s smallest birds is just one of several distinctions that hummingbird species claim. They’re the only birds that can hover in still air for 30 seconds or more. They’re the only birds with a “reverse gear”—that is, they can truly fly backward. And they’re the record holders for the fastest metabolic rate of any vertebrate on the planet: A 2013 University of Toronto study concluded that if hummingbirds were the size of an average human, they’d need to drink more than one 12-ounce can of soda for every minute they’re hovering, because they burn sugar so fast. Small wonder that these birds will wage aerial dogfights to control a prime patch of nectar-laden flowers.The tongue that sips from those flowers is a specialized organ, nearly transparent, and made up of two tubes rolled up like sheets of cellophane. As the bird drinks, its tongue flicks about rapidly, and as English naturalist William Charles Linnaeus Martin noted in 1852, the liquid “disappears very fast, perhaps by capillary attraction.”When Alejandro Rico-Guevara, a postdoctoral researcher at the University of California, Berkeley, made high-speed films of hummingbirds drinking from feeders and flowers, he found that their forked tongues are more like a catcher’s mitt than like rigid drinking straws. Each tube of the tongue unfurls to snatch the nectar in a hundredth of a second. Then the birds pump the liquid into their gullets by squeezing their beaks. What a 19th-century scientist could only guess at, a 21st-century camera showed in minute detail.In dense vegetation, hummingbirds must dodge and weave around branches and vines. Marc Badger of UC Berkeley elicits such acrobatics in the lab by having birds fly through small apertures, a situation the photographer re-created here. To slip through an oval-shaped hole, this Anna’s hummingbird performs a sideways shimmy, altering its wing strokes to avoid contact with the divider. To capture the action in a single frame, a strobe light flashed three times during a 0.4-second exposure. (Source: Robert Dudley)The first attempt to analyze hummingbird flight is believed to have occurred in Nazi Germany in the late 1930s. With support from the Reich Office for Educational Film, two German ornithologists secured a camera capable of recording 1,500 frames a second from a military research institute. With it, they filmed two South American hummingbird species at Zoo Berlin. “The regime was developing the first helicopters,” says Karl Schuchmann, former curator of birds at the Alexander Koenig Zoological Research Museum in Bonn. “They wanted to know how birds could hover on the spot.”The images showed hummingbirds to be more like bees or flies than like other birds, in that they generate lift on both the downstroke and the upstroke of their wings. When the ornithologists published their paper in 1939, they compared hummingbirds to the German Focke-Wulf helicopter.In the United States, Crawford Greenewalt had served science on the opposite side of the war effort: He was an engineer with the Manhattan Project, the U.S.-led program that produced the first nuclear weapons. A dozen years after the German ornithologists published, Greenewalt picked up the thread of their investigation. His wife, Margaretta, had become interested in bird-watching at their home in Delaware, and from her Greenewalt caught what he called “hummingbird fever.” His hummingbird photographs were first published in the November 1960 issue of National Geographic.For a study of male Cuba’s bee hummingbirds’ mating displays, scientists captured the birds to get body weight and wing measurements (above). This one stayed still on the scale because hummingbirds are temporarily disoriented when flipped on their backs—but within moments of being restored to their feet, they’re again zipping around. No birds were harmed in making these images. (Source: Christopher Clark, UC Riverside)Dissatisfied with the high-speed motion picture cameras then available, Greenewalt built his own. He filmed the flight of hummingbirds inside a homemade wind tunnel, capturing them at speeds up to 27 miles an hour. As the birds accelerated from a hovering position, Greenewalt documented the plane of their wings tilting from horizontal to vertical, redirecting their thrust.The new images were groundbreaking, but they didn’t solve the mystery of how hummingbirds can flap their wings as quickly as they do. Typically, the faster a muscle contracts, the less force it generates. So how do hummingbirds produce enough force to stay aloft?In 2011 Tyson Hedrick and his colleagues jury-rigged a way to answer that question. A University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill researcher who specializes in animal biomechanics, Hedrick knew that hummingbird wings are different from those of their closest relatives, the swifts. Hummingbird arm bones are relatively smaller, and most of the wing is made up of the equivalent of hand bones. To get a penetrating view of the wing moving at top speed, Hedrick coupled a camera that shoots a thousand frames per second with an x-ray imaging system.When Hedrick viewed the frames in sequence, infinitesimal movements of the wing bones merged into patterns, then continuous motion, and the wing’s operation could be seen. Rather than flapping with an up-and-down motion of the shoulder, Hedrick discovered, hummingbirds flap with a twist. This modification gives them what amounts to a “high gear,” so that a millimeter-length muscle movement is enough to drive their wings across a wide arc.Hummingbirds often brave downpours to gather the nectar needed to avoid starvation. This Anna’s hummingbird shakes off rain as a wet dog does, with an oscillation of its head and body. According to researchers at UC Berkeley, each twist lasts four-hundredths of a second and subjects the bird’s head to 34 times the force of gravity. Even more remarkable: Hummingbirds can do this in flight as well as when perched. (Sources: Victor Ortega-Jimenez and Robert Dudley)Once, high-speed cameras were ungainly contraptions, difficult to operate and lug into the field. Now they can fit in a large pocket and are as essential to hummingbird biologists as binoculars are. The sheer magnitude of information captured by these cameras can be hard to fathom. To put Clark’s 500-frames-per-second videos in perspective, consider this: At the typical frames-per-second rate of a theatrical movie—let’s say, the 1939 classic Gone With the Wind—500 frames is roughly what it took for Scarlett O’Hara to run down the staircase, tearfully plead, “Rhett, Rhett! If you go, where shall I go? What shall I do?” and for Rhett Butler to answer, “Frankly, my dear, I don’t give a damn,” walk out the door, and disappear into the fog.The forked tongue of this Anna’s hummingbird can be seen through the glass vessel from which it’s drinking artificial nectar. To fuel their energetic flight, hummingbirds may consume more than the equivalent of their body weight in nectar each day, via a tongue that makes a sipping motion up to 15 times a second. To keep the birds healthy in captivity, the artificial nectar they’re fed contains protein powder and other nutrients, seen here as white specks. (Source: Alejandro Rico-Guevara, UC Berkeley)By slowing down time, scientists learn more about what happens when biology brushes up against the laws of physics. “There’s stuff that you absolutely do not see with the naked eye,” Clark says. “Put a high-speed camera on it, and you’re like, ‘Holy cow! That’s what the bird’s doing?’ ”When some species spread their tails during 60-mile-an-hour dives, he says, there’s a chirping sound—not from their vocal cords but from the fluttering of tail feathers as air rushes through. In courtship displays some hummingbird species almost double their wingbeat frequency; others flap with a single wing. And when the Anna’s hummingbird pulls up after a stunt, it is subjected to roughly nine times the force of gravity—enough that a human fighter pilot, even one wearing a specialized G suit, could pass out.“Hummingbirds can do extraordinary things using the same building blocks found in ordinary birds,” says Doug Altshuler, a comparative physiologist at the University of British Columbia in Vancouver. So studying their lives can tell us a great deal about general principles of biology.On a summer morning a red glow emerges from a doorway of a room that Altshuler has taken to calling Hell. His postdoctoral research colleague, Roslyn Dakin, greets us with a sheen of sweat on her forehead. The sauna-like atmosphere is generated by six LCD projectors beaming vertical stripes onto the walls of a tunnel that runs the length of the room. Inside that tunnel sits a male Anna’s hummingbird, watched from above by a panopticon of eight cameras.Dakin is trying to figure out how the birds control their flight. Previous researchers theorized that flying animals have a cruise control circuit in their brains to balance movement across their field of vision. Bees do this. We do it too. When you’re driving along a wide, open highway, it feels natural to be going 70 miles an hour, but if you’re on a country road lined with trees, you’ll probably tap on the brakes.Hummingbirds apparently operate under a different set of rules. In one of Dakin’s experiments, she has them flying through what’s essentially a visual treadmill. Surprisingly, they fly just as fast when vertical stripes are moving with their direction of motion as against it.At the moment we’re watching a green dot jiggle around on the screen, an indicator that the hummingbird is sitting in the dark, doing practically nothing. Periodically, he lurches halfway down the tunnel but then boomerangs back to his perch. “It’s really annoying when they don’t do exactly what you want them to do,” she says—“which is most of the time.”Dakin is convinced that hummingbirds have an instinctual wariness of larger shapes that helps them avoid collisions. Today she’s playing around with projecting more complicated patterns—including what looks, to my eyes, like Elvis Presley’s hair but is actually supposed to be a flower. To test this, she needs the bird to fly the length of the tunnel, which he is stubbornly refusing to do.Suddenly he lets out a chirp, and I watch the green dot flit down the tunnel, pause at the feeder, and return. Dakin perks up; the day might not be a bust after all. She types a code for this data entry into her computer’s command prompt and hits enter. On the screen thousands of coordinates coalesce into a rainbow-colored piece of tinsel—a three-dimensional summary of 15 long seconds in the fast life of a hummingbird.",
"Tabby coats didn't exist until the Middle Ages, according to a study of ancient cat genes.In true feline form, cats took their time deciding whether to jump into humans’ laps.In a new comprehensive study of the spread of domesticated cats, DNA analysis suggests that cats lived for thousands of years alongside humans before they were domesticated. During that time, their genes have changed little from those of wildcats, apart from picking up one recent tweak: the distinctive stripes and dots of the tabby cat.Researchers surveyed the DNA of more than 200 cats spanning the last 9,000 years, including ancient Romanian cat remains, Egyptian cat mummies, and modern African wildcat specimens. Two major cat lineages contributed to the domestic feline we know today, they report in a study published Monday in Nature Ecology & Evolution.An Egyptian cat mummy.The earlier ancestors of today’s domestic cats spread from southwest Asia and into Europe as early as 4400 B.C. The cats likely started hanging around farming communities in the Fertile Crescent about 8,000 years ago, where they settled into a mutually beneficial relationship as humans’ rodent patrol. (See little-known small cats in “Out of the Shadows, the Wildcats You’ve Never Seen.”)Mice and rats were attracted to crops and other agricultural byproducts being produced by human civilizations. Cats likely followed the rodent populations and, in turn, frequently approached the human settlements.“This is probably how the first encounter between humans and cats occurred,” says study coauthor Claudio Ottoni of the University of Leuven. “It’s not that humans took some cats and put them inside cages,” he says. Instead, people more or less allowed cats to domesticate themselves. (Also see “Surprising Things You Never Knew About Your Cat.”)A second lineage, consisting of African cats that dominated Egypt, spread into the Mediterranean and most of the Old World beginning around 1500 B.C. This Egyptian cat probably had behaviors that made it attractive to humans, such as sociability and tameness.The results suggest that prehistoric human populations probably began carrying their cats along ancient land and sea trade routes to control rodents.By comparing the DNA of cats throughout history, the study captures a glimpse of how the animals were changing even before humans started to cart them across the globe, Ottoni says.Surprisingly, wild and domestic cats showed no major differences in their genetic makeup, and one of the few traits available for telling them apart was the tabby coat marking.A woman holds what is described as a "Panther cat" in an Italian Renaissance painting.The study sheds light on the late emergence of the blotched or striped coat markings, which began to appear in domesticated tabby cats in the Middle Ages. The gene for a tabby coat dates back to the Ottoman Empire in Southwest Asia and later became common in Europe and Africa.It was only in the 18th century, however, that the markings became common enough to be associated with domestic cats, and in the 19th century, cat fanciers began selecting cats with particular traits to create fancy breeds.Overall, cats became a domesticated companion of humans without changing much, says evolutionary geneticist and article coauthor Eva-Maria Geigl. Domestic cats look similar to wildcats, but they aren’t solitary, tolerating both humans and other cats. (See "Our Most Stunning Pictures of Big Cats.")This is in contrast to dogs, the first animals to be domesticated, Geigl adds. Dogs were selected to perform specific tasks—which never was the case for cats—and this selection for particular traits is what led to dogs’ diversification to the many breeds we see today.“I think that there was no need to subject cats to such a selection process since it was not necessary to change them,” Geigl says. “They were perfect as they were.”Though everyone might not agree on cats’ perfection, felines are among the most popular pets in the world today, with as many as 74 million cats living in U.S. homes.“We’re discovering incredible things about where they’ve come from, how far they’ve gone, and what kind of impact they’ve had on humans,” Ottoni says.“I think studying more about this species is going to open up even more about the domestication process.”Follow Casey Smith on Twitter.",
"As the sun was setting over the Firth of Thames in New Zealand, dozens of bar-tailed godwits shuffled about lazily on the edge of the bay, the wind fluffing their feathers.The tide was coming in, submerging the mudflats where the birds had been feeding, sticking their long bills into the soft earth to dig up worms and crabs. As the water advanced, they stopped foraging and waded ashore, inelegantly carrying their plump, butterball bodies on stilt-like legs. A bit homely and ungainly, with drab plumage, godwits appear quite ordinary. As the sky turned orange, they settled down to roost. Resting for hours on end, they can seem rather sedentary.Nothing could be further from the truth. Six months earlier, these birds had made an epic journey to get here, flying all the way from Alaska. Astonishingly, they didn’t stop along the way. For eight or nine days straight, they flew, beating their wings the entire way: about 7,000 miles, more than a quarter of the way around the world.When the godwits arrived, they were bedraggled and emaciated. They had fattened up now for their migration back to Alaska, where they breed during the summer. They were going to fly about 6,000 miles, to the Yellow Sea. There they would spend about six weeks along a coastline split between China, North Korea, and South Korea, feeding and resting before flying 4,000 more miles.Bar-tailed godwits have made this migration for thousands of years, but a clear picture of their travels has emerged only in the past few decades. Although migrations by birds have been a source of wonder for centuries, new scientific findings are helping to demystify them while adding to our appreciation of these incredible feats. At the same time, scientists are discovering how human activity and climate change are disrupting and possibly imperiling these ancient journeys.The disappearance of godwits from New Zealand during the months when they breed led the Maori to view godwits—which they call kuaka—as birds of mystery. The sentiment is reflected in a Maori saying about the unobtainable: “Who has ever held the egg of the kuaka?” By the 1970s bird-watchers and biologists suspected the godwits in New Zealand were the same ones that nested in Alaska. But it was only in 2007 that scientists were able to determine the migration routes.Researchers Bob Gill and Lee Tibbitts, wildlife biologists with the U.S. Geological Survey, were part of a team that captured a small number of godwits and implanted satellite transmitters inside an air sac in their abdomens, leaving the antennas sticking out. Between March and May, they tracked a group on their northern migration. The batteries of the transmitters weren’t expected to last beyond the summer, and sure enough, one by one, they stopped working. Except one. On August 30, 2007, a godwit known as E7 departed from Alaska, still transmitting its position.With a rising sense of excitement, the researchers followed the bird’s progress as it flew past Hawaii, past Fiji, and then, on September 7, past the northwestern tip of New Zealand. “It was a nail-biter because the battery was failing,” recalls Tibbitts. That night E7 landed in the Firth of Thames. At eight days and eight nights, and 7,150 miles, it’s still the longest nonstop migratory flight ever recorded. “It is a head-scratching, jaw-dropping feat,” says Gill, now an emeritus scientist with USGS.The tracking of E7 served to deepen the curiosity that bird migrations have long inspired. Where do they go? How can they fly as far as they do? How are they able to find their way to the same winter and summer sites year after year? Advances in satellite tracking and other technologies are enabling researchers to explore those questions in unprecedented detail.Trekking through the splendidly green boreal forest in Alberta, Canada, Michael Hallworth, an ecologist with the Smithsonian Migratory Bird Center in Washington, D.C., listened for calls of the Connecticut warbler—a songbird with a yellow breast and striking white eye-rings. When Hallworth and his fellow researchers spotted a male they had tagged with an electronic device, they worked swiftly to drape a fine net between two trees. Hallworth placed a speaker behind the net, connecting it with a cable to his phone. Hiding behind a tree, he played a recording of a male warbler’s song. It was a ruse to lure the warbler to see whether a competitor had entered its territory. Sure enough, the tagged male flew into the net.Extricating the bird, Hallworth gently removed the tag on its back—a geolocating device weighing less than one gram that continuously records light levels. Because sunrise and sunset times change with location, scientists can analyze the data to trace the path a bird has taken. The study by Hallworth and his colleagues, still ongoing, will enable them to determine precisely where the songbird spends the winter months. “We know that the bird migrates to South America, but we have yet to find out where,” he says.Such efforts underscore how far we’ve come in our ability to track bird migrations. Until the early 19th century, theories to explain the disappearance of bird populations for part of the year were rather fanciful. Aristotle believed that some birds hibernated or transformed into other species. In medieval Europe the explanation for the appearance of barnacle geese in the winter was that they grew on trees. An English minister theorized in the 17th century that they flew to the moon. The most striking evidence that birds were migrating came in 1822, when a hunter in Germany shot down a white stork with a curious appendage—an arrow impaled through its neck. The arrow was from central Africa, leading naturalists to conclude that the stork had traveled thousands of miles. In 1906 bird-watchers started putting rings on the legs of white storks and began learning where they wintered in sub-Saharan Africa.In the two centuries since the shot that felled the impaled stork, scientists and bird-watchers have uncovered the migrations of thousands of avian species. Nearly half of known bird species are migratory, moving from one habitat to another with the change of seasons. Laysan albatrosses nest on tropical islands in the Pacific and spend almost half the year soaring thousands of miles, as far as the coasts of Japan and California, to look for food. Populations of bar-headed geese that breed in the highlands of Central Asia fly south over the Himalaya—honking their way through the rarefied, high-altitude air—to winter on lakes and estuaries on the Indian subcontinent. Having a large wingspan is not a prerequisite, as evidenced by the flight that tiny ruby-throated hummingbirds make. They travel solo from their breeding range in the United States and Canada to wintering grounds ranging from southern Mexico to Panama.In 1918 Congress passed the Migratory Bird Treaty Act to protect birds from wanton killing. To celebrate the centennial, National Geographic is partnering with the National Audubon Society, BirdLife International, and the Cornell Lab of Ornithology to declare 2018 the Year of the Bird. Watch for more stories, maps, books, events, and social media content throughout the year.Whether they’re going a few miles or a quarter of the way across the world, birds migrate to escape conditions that threaten their survival. When winter arrives in North America, the flowers that the ruby-throated hummingbird drinks nectar from and the insects it thrives on vanish. The bird has no choice but to travel to a place where food is plentiful. Upon the return of warmer weather in Canada and the United States, the northern home is attractive once again because its resources have been replenished.Although many species migrate between cooler and warmer latitudes, some migrations are driven by flooding. That’s the case with a subspecies of the black skimmer that nests on exposed sandbars in the Amazon Basin’s Manú River, skimming the waters with its long bill to scoop up fish while flying. When heavy rains begin lashing the region starting in September, causing the river to flood, the birds depart for the continent’s Pacific coast or migrate to higher ground, returning when the water level has subsided. Some bird populations migrate between high and low altitudes within the same area, nesting in mountains when streams are running but descending to valleys when the water is frozen.“Migratory birds are both escaping and then coming back to these areas that are really harsh during part of the year, as well as really great for breeding and raising their young during the other part of the year,” says Ben Winger, an ornithologist at the University of Michigan in Ann Arbor.These migration routes have emerged over thousands of years of adaptation. Driven by competition for resources and nesting areas, some species are likely to have ventured farther and farther from their original habitats. Some researchers speculate that migrations arose when birds in the tropics expanded their ranges into temperate habitats. Another view is that many species originated in temperate zones and evolved to spend the colder part of the year in the tropics. “The reality is probably that both happened to some extent,” Winger says.Clues to adaptations that led to today’s routes can be gleaned from certain unusual migrations. One example, according to Peter Berthold, former director of the Max Planck Institute for Ornithology in Radolfzell, Germany, is the sojourn of a population of marsh warblers that travels from northern Germany to East Africa and spends several weeks there before heading to South Africa. “In former times the birds could winter just south of the Sahara because the area remained green for a long time—it was a paradise,” Berthold says. “Then it deteriorated, until the birds were forced to go farther and farther south.”Are these migratory behaviors written into the genes, steering birds like automatons to their destinations? Or do young birds learn from adults where to migrate and how? Scientists don’t know yet, but as with most nature-versus-nurture questions, the answer is likely to be some combination of the two. “The field is in its infancy,” says Jesse Conklin, a research scientist at the University of Groningen in the Netherlands.The ordeal of flying nonstop from Alaska to New Zealand is hard for the human mind to comprehend, so when Gill talks to grade school kids about bar-tailed godwits, he uses a gimmick to get them to imagine the endurance needed to make that journey. “I say, ‘All right, please stand up and extend your arms and start moving them in circles, and see how long you can do that.’ ” Then, just as their arms begin to tire, Gill tells them, “Now try and do that for eight days straight.” The arm-flapping simulation may not be the perfect analogy—because flying is to birds what walking is to humans—but the kids get the point.Like other long-haul migrants, godwits prepare by building enormous reserves of fat in the weeks leading up to their departure. The equivalent of gasoline, fat is what fuels the birds. When the godwits leave, more than half their body weight is fat. They look like feathered croquet balls, with a layer of fat under the skin up to an inch thick and more fat encasing their abdominal organs. “I call them lard asses,” says Phil Battley, an ornithologist at Massey University in New Zealand.As they fatten up, their pectoral and leg muscles also grow larger. Other long-distance migrants, such as red knots, shrink the gizzard and other organs in preparation for flight—the equivalent of jettisoning excess cargo.Godwits, like other migratory species, don’t rely just on their own power; they also take advantage of winds. The birds tend to depart from Alaska on the tail end of storms that produce winds blowing south. Their departure from New Zealand also coincides with favorable conditions for traveling. “You get pretty benign winds when you leave New Zealand,” Gill says, “but then they are able to hook into others as they go north.” When they leave the Yellow Sea for Alaska, the winds once again have shifted to be with the birds.Researchers assume that godwits, which are not known to soar, flap their wings for most of their journey, even when riding winds, while other species, such as albatrosses, do soar.Some species possess an astonishing flexibility in regulating their sleep. Niels Rattenborg at the Max Planck Institute and his colleagues went to the Galápagos Islands to study the sleeping habits of great frigatebirds, which have seven-foot wingspans and fly hundreds of miles over the Pacific Ocean looking for food. The researchers, capturing frigatebirds in their nests, implanted sensors to track brain electrical activity and glued data-recording devices on their heads before releasing them. Besides keeping track of location and altitude, the devices helped the researchers determine sleep patterns.After spending up to 10 days over the Pacific, the frigatebirds returned to their nests and Rattenborg’s group retrieved the devices. The data showed that the birds slept in short bursts lasting an average of 12 seconds, usually while soaring, that added up to an average of 42 minutes a day. That was a mere fraction of the 12 hours a day the birds slept when they were in their nests. For a substantial part of the time that they napped in the air, the birds only put half of their brain to sleep, while keeping the other half awake.To learn whether godwits rely on similar sleep patterns in flight, researchers need considerably smaller batteries—a goal Rattenborg says is within reach. “It’s possible that they get some sleep on the wing, perhaps even while flapping,” he says.As a young boy growing up in Denmark, Henrik Mouritsen occasionally saw birds that didn’t belong there. He once photographed a desert wheatear, some populations of which divide their time between breeding grounds across Central Asia and wintering habitats from North Africa to India. “I wondered what the hell had gone wrong in their heads for them to fly that far in the wrong direction,” he says. That curiosity led Mouritsen, now a professor at the University of Oldenburg in Germany, to follow in the footsteps of generations of researchers who’ve sought to untangle the mystery of how birds orient themselves to return to the same breeding and wintering grounds. Scientists looking for the secret to this capability have found evidence of not one but several mechanisms birds appear to use.In 1951 a German scientist named Gustav Kramer discovered that European starlings relied on the sun as a compass. Then, in the 1960s, Stephen Emlen, an ecologist at Cornell University, put indigo buntings in a planetarium and showed that, like ancient mariners, birds also look to the stars to navigate. Around the same time, laboratory studies of European robins by a German zoologist couple, Wolfgang and Roswitha Wiltschko, discovered that birds possess an internal magnetic compass.Mouritsen, along with two colleagues—William Cochran and Martin Wikelski—conducted an experiment in 2003 to investigate navigation in thrushes migrating in the wild rather than hopping around in a lab. Initially, however, the researchers placed the birds in an outdoor cage at sunset, exposing them to a magnetic field that was turned between 70 and 90 degrees east relative to the Earth’s. The birds, fitted with tiny radio transmitters, were set free at night, after no sunlight remained in the sky. Traveling in cars equipped with antennas to track the birds, the researchers followed them for up to 700 miles. As it turned out, the birds flew west instead of north on the first night of their travel. But on later nights, the same birds flew north, as they were supposed to. From this behavior, the researchers inferred that the birds were orienting themselves using their magnetic compass, but calibrated it daily with twilight cues from the sun.That migratory species would rely on multiple compasses is not surprising: Many travel at night, when the sun compass doesn’t work. In cloudy conditions at night, the celestial compass can’t be counted on either. Nor is the magnetic compass a reliable fallback everywhere.The precise mechanics of the godwit’s navigation strategy is not yet known. But Mouritsen speculates that, like the thrushes in his outdoor experiment, godwits rely on their magnetic compass and reset it every time the sun is visible.A red knot looks a lot like a bar-tailed godwit, except that it’s smaller and has a shorter bill. Like the godwit, it breeds in the extreme north and flies thousands of miles south for winter. It forages along the shore by sticking its slender bill in the mud to find mollusks. That’s why Jan van Gils, a marine ecologist with the Royal Netherlands Institute for Sea Research who studies a subspecies that breeds in the Arctic and winters in Mauritania, was puzzled when he and his colleagues observed some of the birds eating sea grass. When had they become primarily vegetarian and why?The researchers found that these red knots were juveniles, with shorter bills and smaller bodies than usual. They also discovered that the body size of juveniles varied considerably by year. Those born when the Arctic experienced the warmest temperatures had the smallest bodies and the shortest bills. The most plausible explanation was that these birds didn’t have enough to eat as chicks because the snow had melted earlier than usual, which caused the insect population the birds feed on to peak too soon and robbed the newborns of nutrition.When they migrated to Mauritania, the birds with short bills couldn’t reach deep in the mud to find enough mollusks. “Sea grass is a poor source of nutrients,” van Gils says. “We never expected them to eat it, but now they’re eating it because they have no choice.” The researchers also found that red knots with short bills have shorter lives. “Food shortage in the Arctic eventually leads to dying from food shortage in the tropics,” he says.The red knot study is one of a few that offer concrete evidence of how climate change and environmental damage may be harming migratory species. Populations of many seabirds have shrunk drastically over the past half century, while shorebird populations in North America have crashed by 70 percent since 1973. Some of the sharpest declines have occurred in species that use the East Asian-Australasian Flyway—a group that includes knots, sandpipers, and godwits. A leading cause for this appears to be the ongoing destruction of stopover sites along the Yellow Sea, where the tidal mudflats that sustain the birds are being filled in at a frenetic pace to build ports, factories, and housing.Similarly, illegal hunting and changes in land use have imperiled migrants that journey between Europe and Africa, and between North and South America. Conservationists estimate that from 11 million to 36 million birds are captured or killed in the Mediterranean region alone every year, threatening birds like the chaffinch and the blackcap. The winter habitats of many long-distance migrants in sub-Saharan Africa have become less hospitable, with more land being cleared of vegetation to make room for agriculture. The industrialization of farming at stopover sites has left migrating birds struggling to find food. In southern Europe, for instance, the countryside had clusters of small farms with wild spaces in between, which served as an abundant food source. Now the landscape has been homogenized into vast acreages planted with a single crop like corn and harvested more efficiently.“Every single corn is used up, so there is nothing left over,” says Hans-Günther Bauer, a research scientist at the Max Planck Institute. “If you are lucky, as a bird, you find someplace else. If you are unlucky, you don’t, and that makes it very hard because you need to build up your reserves for the journey ahead.”Reversing these alarming trends would require a diversity of conservation efforts—from protecting forests and coastlines to enforcing laws to prohibit the capture and killing of migratory birds. The use of new tracking technologies, including ever smaller geolocating tags, could help target conservation efforts, says Pete Marra, head of the Smithsonian Migratory Bird Center. “Population size in a species like the wood thrush, a species that’s declining by over 60 percent in the past 50 years, is influenced by what’s happening in the breeding areas in the southeast United States, as well as habitat loss in the wintering grounds in Mexico and Colombia.” Researchers found that although forests in the wintering habitat were being decimated more quickly, the birds suffered more from the loss of forest in their breeding range.On a bright afternoon in Foxton Beach in New Zealand, Jesse Conklin, wearing rubber boots and a floppy sun hat, walked out toward the salt marsh in the Manawatu River estuary, splashing through puddles of ankle-deep water left behind by the receding tide. About 30 yards from a sand embankment, where a half dozen godwits were roosting, Conklin set up a telescope on a tripod.The Netherlands-based scientist has visited the estuary every year for the past decade. Conklin has tracked about 160 godwits—identifiable through colored bands on their legs—that return year after year. He’s found that individual godwits leave on almost the same day each year, as if guided by a precise clock, although they’re flexible enough to shift their departure date to avoid unfavorable wind conditions.Over an extended period, however, the birds have advanced their departure from the estuary. Conklin’s godwits now leave an average of five days earlier than they did from 2008 to 2010. Many are spending the extra days bulking up at degraded foraging sites on the Yellow Sea, arriving in Alaska at about the same time. It’s unclear if they set out early because they need extra time at the stopover sites or because they’re trying to get to Alaska earlier to keep up with the advancing summers. In either case the godwits appear to be learning from experience, Conklin says, not just following a genetically programmed schedule.For hours that afternoon, Conklin trained his telescope on the godwits. Some continued to roost; others foraged nearby, dipping their bills into the mud. When a few of them waded into the water to bathe and preen, Conklin felt a familiar heightening of anticipation. He knew that this behavior could be a precursor to a departure.The sun mellowed as the afternoon progressed, the shimmer of the water growing softer. Then, one of the godwits began making a loud, high-pitched call. Other godwits responded with similar calls. The conversation went on for hours. A couple of godwits flew over to join the group. “I don’t know if they are communicating real information—like, You like the wind now?—or if they keep this chatter going to collect all the birds that want to go,” Conklin said.Close to sunset the calling got louder, and then, all at once, the godwits took off. He adjusted his telescope to follow them—he counted 10 in all—as they made a rapid ascent over the estuary, flying out toward the ocean, first in a jumble and eventually sorting into a V-formation. Conklin watched them until they disappeared into the pale blue sky.",
"Feral cats roam the streets of Baltimore."Good for them, go cats!""Sorry cats but you've gotta go.""Do you get paid to write this?"Well, nobody ever said cat lovers were mellow. But I was taken by surprise to see the number (and intensity) of comments on National Geographic's Facebook page and Daily News website after I wrote a story about a new study on the hunting habits of the domestic cat.To recap: Cats stand accused of killing between 1.4 billion to 3.7 billion birds and 6.9 billion to 20.7 billion mammals in the continental United States each year.There were hundreds of comments. One reader is "sick to death of watching my neighbors cats killing migratory songbirds.""I don't think there should be an all encompassing feline genocide," said another, "but i feel something definitely needs to be done about feral populations."Others found the study results far from newsworthy: "Yes, all of my cats are killers. That is why I brought them home in the first place" and "I love you National Geographic, but seriously... of course my cat is gonna kill some birds."The study has sparked strong dialogue among bird and cat groups as well.In a press release the American Bird Conservancy called the study a "wake-up call" and said "the carnage that outdoor cats inflict is staggering and can no longer be ignored or dismissed."Alley Cat Allies and Best Friends Animal Society both questioned the study's estimates and suggested the researchers had ulterior motives. Alley Cat Allies, which calls itself "the only national advocacy organization dedicated to the protection and humane treatment of cats," said the study was a "veiled promotion by bird advocates to ramp up the mass killing of outdoor cats." The vice-chairman of Best Friends Animal Society, a group with projects throughout the U.S., claimed "the authors and the anti-free-roaming cat contingent want stray and feral cats to be rounded up and killed." He added that "scapegoating cats is a huge and, sadly, lucrative business."The Humane Society of the United States also weighed in, reiterating their support for the "thousands of organizations and individuals who manage cat colonies through trap-neuter-return (TNR) programs," while adding that there would be no support in those quarters for a campaign to euthanize cats.But maybe this was never about cat people and bird people after all. "Me thinks the dog lovers came up with those figures," suggested one National Geographic reader.",
"Imagine a slender, mouse-gray bird, no bigger than a starling, that spends most of its life on open ocean.In cold water and all weather, the ashy storm petrel—a warm-blooded animal that weighs less than an ounce and a half—forages among the waves for tiny fish and ocean invertebrates. Fluttering with dangled legs, its toes skimming the surface, it gives the impression of walking on water, like the biblical Peter.Although storm petrels as a group are among the world’s most abundant and widespread birds, ashies are rare and found only in California waters. They have a distinctive strong musky odor; you can smell them in the fog. They’re most at home on the water, but, like all birds, they need to be on land to lay eggs and raise their young. For this, they prefer undisturbed islands. To escape the attention of predators, they nest underground, in rock crevices or burrows, and come and go only at night.In the Farallon Islands National Wildlife Refuge, 30 miles west of San Francisco’s Golden Gate, a local artists’ collective has built a kind of sloppy igloo out of chunks of concrete from the ruins of old buildings on the main island. A small door in the sculpture allows access to a crawl space lined with Plexiglas. If you go in on a summer night and shine a red light (less disturbing to birds than white light), you might see an ashy storm petrel sitting patiently on an egg at the bottom of a crevice, looking even smaller and frailer than it would on the water. You might hear the nocturnal song of one of its hidden neighbors, a soft and tuneful purr that emerges from the rocks like a voice from another world: the world of seabirds, which encompasses two-thirds of our planet but is mostly invisible to us.Until recently, invisibility was an advantage for seabirds, a cloak of protection. But now, as invasive predators and commercial fishing threaten their existence, they need people to protect them; and it’s difficult to care about animals you can’t see.The Farallons today are a small portal to the past, when seabirds were abundant everywhere. More than half a million birds were nesting in the refuge when I visited the main island in June 2017. On steep slopes and sparsely vegetated level ground, surrounded by deep-blue water roiling with seals and sea lions, were puffins and guillemots and cormorants, tiny plump Cassin’s auklets, weirdly horned rhinoceros auklets, and, in my opinion, way too many western gulls. The gull chicks were hatching, and it was impossible to walk anywhere without enraging their parents, which screamed at ear-hurting volumes and jumped into the air to strafe intruders with evil-smelling excrement.National Geographic is partnering with the National Audubon Society, BirdLife International, and the Cornell Lab of Ornithology to celebrate the centennial of the Migratory Bird Treaty Act. Watch for more stories, books, and events throughout the year.A national park along South Africa’s southern coast protects key breeding grounds for more than a dozen seabird species. But dangers remain.On Bird Island in Algoa Bay, puddled water from heavy rains makes a messy landing for a Cape gannet. Climate change models predict more frequent and intense rainfall in the region, and flooding can cause large-scale loss of eggs. An altered climate can affect other birds by moving their fish prey farther from their breeding grounds.The gulls were a gantlet worth running to reach the island’s colonies of common murres. One morning, Pete Warzybok, a biologist with Point Blue, the conservation group that helps the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service monitor wildlife on the Farallons, led me up to a plywood blind overlooking a murre metropolis. Like a blanket of coarsely ground pepper, 20,000 black-and-white birds covered a sloping spit of rock that bottomed out in surf-splashed cliffs. The murres were standing shoulder to shoulder, pointy billed, penguin-like, and incubating an egg or guarding a tiny chick on territories as small as a few square inches. The colony had an air of quiet industry. There were occasional outbursts of gentle clucking, and the menacing gulls kept sailing over, scanning for breakfast opportunities, and sometimes a murre landing awkwardly or scrambling to take flight would scuffle with a neighbor. But the disputes ended as suddenly as they started, the birds resuming their grooming as if nothing had happened.“Murres do what murres do,” Warzybok remarked. “They aren’t the brightest birds.”What murres do is exercise devotion. Although divorce is not unheard of, they form strong pair bonds and may live for 30 years or longer, returning every year to the same tiny territory and raising one chick. Parents share incubation duties equally, one of them remaining in the colony while the other ranges over the ocean and dives underwater for anchovies, juvenile rockfish, or whatever else is available. When a bird returns from a long foraging trip, the parent that has stayed behind—increasingly hungry and streaked with guano—is still reluctant to leave the egg. In the local lore of murres, there’s an anecdote of a mother whose egg rolled downhill as soon as she laid it. A gull came by and swallowed it, stood for a moment with an enormous lump in its throat, and then regurgitated the egg, which rolled farther downslope and hit a standing murre, which promptly climbed onto it and began to incubate it.“If they don’t have an egg,” Warzybok said, “they’ll incubate a stone or a piece of vegetation. They’ll lay a fish on an unhatched egg, trying to feed it. And they won’t give up. They’ll sit on a dead egg for 75 or 80 days.”Murre chicks take to the water when they’re barely three weeks old, too young to fly or dive. Their fathers go with them and stay by their side for months, feeding them and teaching them to fish while their mothers, which have made a heavy caloric investment in producing eggs, go off by themselves to recover. Parental devotion and the equal division of labor pay dividends. The reproductive success rate of Farallon murres is very high, typically above 70 percent, and they’re one of the most abundant breeding seabirds in North America. Immense though it was, the colony that Warzybok and I were visiting held less than 5 percent of the islands’ murres.The murre population today represents a provisionally happy ending to a long, sad story. Two hundred years ago, as many as three million murres bred in the Farallons. In 1849, when the gold rush made San Francisco a boomtown, the islands became an inviting target for a city without a poultry industry. By 1851, the Farallone Egg Company was gathering half a million murre eggs a year for sale to bakeries and restaurants. Its eggers arrived by boat in the spring, crushed the eggs that had already been laid, and proceeded to collect every freshly laid one. Over the next half century, at least 14 million murre eggs were harvested on the Farallons. The birds’ fidelity to their nest sites kept them coming back, year after year, to be robbed of the objects of their devotion.By 1910, fewer than 20,000 murres remained on the main island. Even after egging stopped, they fell victim to the cats and dogs introduced by the keepers of the island’s lighthouse, and large numbers were killed at sea by oil flushed from the tanks of ships entering San Francisco Bay. The murre population didn’t seriously recover until after 1969, when the main island became a federal wildlife refuge. And then, in the early 1980s, the population plunged again.The problem was the indiscriminate fishing method known as gillnetting. Hauling a huge net to the surface of the ocean sweeps up not only the target fish but also porpoises, otters, turtles, and diving seabirds. Today at least 400,000 seabirds are killed worldwide every year in gill nets—murres and puffins and diving ducks in northern waters, penguins and diving petrels off the coast of South America. The annual toll on murres alone may equal the 146,000 killed in the 1989 Exxon Valdez oil spill in Alaska.Beginning in the mid-1980s, many American states, including California, took note of the ecological havoc and imposed severe restrictions or outright bans on gillnetting. The result, in the Farallons, was a surge in seabird numbers. In the past 15 years, safe from gillnetting, and free to do what they do, the murres have quadrupled their population. The only threat to their survival in the Farallons now is the disruption of their food source by climate change or overfishing.Pete Warzybok, perched in the blind, was writing down the species of fish that the murres in his study plot brought back to their nests. To a California fisherman asked to share the ocean’s bounty with seabirds—Farallon murres consume more than 50,000 tons of fish every summer—the argument for murre conservation isn’t just ethical or aesthetic. The birds that Warzybok studies function like airborne fishery-monitoring devices, a fleet of living research drones. They scour thousands of square miles of ocean and are expert at finding where the food is. Using only binoculars and a notebook, Warzybok can gather better data about current anchovy and rockfish populations, for much less money, than California’s fishery managers can gather from a boat.Farallon murres are the lucky ones. They’ve survived most of the major threats to seabirds, and a case can be made for their economic utility. Elsewhere, globally, in the past 60 years, the overall seabird population is estimated to have fallen by 70 percent. This figure is even worse than it sounds, because a disproportionate number of seabird species are at risk of extinction. Of the world’s 360 seabirds, a larger percentage is listed as endangered or threatened than of any comparable group of birds. Parrots, as a group, have troubles of their own, but they’re also widely admired. Game birds are valuable to hunters; eagles and other raptors are conspicuous and iconic. Seabirds breed on remote, forbidding islands and spend most of their lives in waters inhospitable to us. If they disappeared entirely, how many people would even notice?Imagine a young albatross in the South Atlantic Ocean. It’s following the circumpolar winds, gliding 500 miles a day on its 10-foot wingspan, using its nose to track the smell of fish or squid or crustaceans near the water’s surface. Often the best place to find food is in the wake of a deepwater fishing vessel. The albatross glides in circles around a trawler and eyes the chaos of smaller seabirds tussling over the fish scraps thrown overboard. When it plunges into the scrum, it brings a size advantage: a massive bill and a wingspan that announces, I am huge! The other birds scatter, but as the albatross hits the water, something goes terribly wrong. Its outstretched wings have wrapped around the cable of the trawler’s net, which drags the bird under and swiftly pulls it deeper. No one sees this happen. No one is out on the cold, choppy water except the trawler’s crew. Even if the crew had time to be looking, the bird has disappeared in the blink of an eye, and its dead body won’t float to the surface until the ship has moved on.Every year, thousands of albatrosses are killed invisibly by trawlers. Tens of thousands more die on the hooks of longline fishing vessels, along with even greater numbers of petrels and shearwaters. Accidental death in the world’s fisheries is one of the two most grievous threats that seabirds face, and it’s a tough one to address, because deepwater fishing boats typically operate under intense financial pressure and minimal oversight. Only a few countries seriously regulate their fleets’ seabird bycatch.In one of those countries, South Africa, I met a successful longline tuna-boat captain named Deon van Antwerpen. With me, at a small harbor in Cape Town, was Ross Wanless, a biologist who manages the seabird conservation program of BirdLife South Africa. Wanless had come to the harbor to hear about the problems that van Antwerpen was having with the government’s seabird regulations. Van Antwerpen, a beefy and voluble man, gestured unhappily toward a basket of pale green fishing-line weights at the back of his vessel. “We’ve lost 3,000 of these things,” he said.Longline fishing kills albatrosses differently than trawling does. A smaller seabird dives down and brings a baited hook to the surface and tries to pull the bait off, and then an albatross barges in and swallows the whole thing, hooking itself and drowning. One solution is to weight the line, so that the baited hook quickly sinks out of reach of the birds. But a bare metal sinker can become a bullet to a crew member’s forehead when a hundred-pound tuna is hauled in and the line recoils. BirdLife recommends sinkers with a loosely attached casing of luminescent plastic (light attracts fish), and van Antwerpen had been eager to try them on his vessel. “Every bird I catch,” he said to Wanless, “is potentially a fish I didn’t catch. But you need to get legislation that’s practical. If you don’t, then most guys will just ignore it.”There ensued an intricate discussion between an exceptionally conscientious boat owner and a conservationist whose goal is to bring bird-safe methods to the entire world’s deep-sea fishing fleet. Van Antwerpen’s chief complaint with the plastic sinkers was that BirdLife wanted them too close to the baited hook—“if a shark snaps the line, we lose the sinker.” Would it be OK if he increased the separation between sinker and hook to four meters? Wanless frowned and pointed out that this would make the hook sink too slowly to protect seabirds. But maybe increasing the weight of the sinker would compensate for a greater separation? Van Antwerpen said he’d be happy to do the experiment—he really didn’t want to catch albatrosses. He just wanted to catch tuna without losing all his sinkers.Fishing vessels can further reduce seabird bycatch by dragging a “bird scaring” line, which consists of a brightly tasseled rope with a plastic cone at the end of it. They’re inexpensive, easy to use, and highly effective at keeping birds out of a vessel’s wake. A trawler, by using only a bird-scaring line, can reduce the number of albatrosses it kills by as much as 99 percent. Because a longline vessel’s hooks remain close to the surface beyond the bird-scaring line, South Africa requires it to take one additional protective measure, either weighting its lines or setting them after dark, when the birds are less active and can’t see the bait.Wanless and his wife, Andrea Angel, who is the leader of BirdLife South Africa’s Albatross Task Force, have been working with South Africa’s government and fishing fleet for more than a decade. Any commercial vessel fishing in South African waters now has to practice seabird bycatch mitigation, and Wanless and Angel are attempting to forge relationships with every longline tuna skipper. “The way to achieve something,” Wanless told me, “is not to present a fancy technical solution but to engage with human beings.” As a result of his team’s efforts, the annual toll on seabirds in South Africa has fallen from an estimated 35,000 in 1996 to as few as 500 today.A thousand miles from any shore and rarely visited except by scientists, sub-Antarctic Marion Island is a singular paradise for seabirds.Coats fresh from molting, a column of macaroni penguins trudges up the ridge of an old volcano crater on Marion Island. Behind them is “the Amphitheatre,” a series of terraces in the crater worn down over eons by nesting and molting macaronis. “The sound of all the penguins reverberating from this multitiered half crater is really impressive,” says ecologist Otto Whitehead.But protecting seabirds takes more than regulations. It also requires independent monitoring of fishing vessels and, ideally, a financial incentive for the industry to reduce seabird bycatch. Although long-liners have one straightforward reason to catch fewer birds—“They’d rather catch $10,000 bills, which is what a bluefin tuna represents,” Wanless said—a potentially stronger incentive is the market for sustainably harvested fish. Pursuit of this premium market, particularly in Europe, has already led many South African fishing vessels to pay for independent observers, to ensure compliance with bycatch rules. Without an observer on board, even a captain like van Antwerpen may be tempted to break the rules.The best way for a government to ensure compliance is to mandate that every vessel be outfitted with a digital camera to monitor its catch and bycatch. When Australia did this with its tropical tuna-fishing fleet, in 2016, ship captains placed panicked calls to Australian regulators, asking where they could buy bird-scaring lines. “Once there’s a camera on board, the game’s over,” Wanless said. “You’re risking losing your license for failing to buy a hundred dollars’ worth of gear.”Another promising technological advance is the Hookpod, which consists of a hard plastic case that snaps around a baited hook, protecting the bait from birds and birds from the hook, and doesn’t spring open until it has sunk to a safe depth. It is theoretically possible, by making the Hookpod standard equipment on all longline vessels, and by requiring all trawlers to run bird-scaring lines, and by simply banning gill net fishing (as South Africa has done), to render the world’s oceans safe for seabirds. For now, though, the global situation remains atrocious. Wanless and Angel have expanded their outreach to the fisheries of South America, Korea, and Indonesia, with not altogether discouraging results, but the fleets of China and Taiwan, which together account for two-thirds of fishing vessels on the high seas, operate with little or no regard for seabird mortality, and they sell their catch in markets mostly indifferent to sustainability.Wanless estimates that 300,000 seabirds, including 100,000 albatrosses, continue to be killed annually by long-liners alone. This is hard enough on the abundant species, like sooty shearwaters. But many species of albatrosses, which are slow to reach maturity and typically breed only in alternate years, are threatened with extinction. And, as harmful as modern fishing practices are, there’s an even deadlier threat that seabirds face.Gough Island, a 25-square-mile mass of volcanic rock in the South Atlantic Ocean, is home to millions of breeding seabirds, including the entire world population of the Atlantic petrel and all but a few pairs of the critically endangered Tristan albatross. Ross Wanless first went to Gough in 2003, as a doctoral candidate, after other researchers had reported that alarmingly few petrels and albatrosses were fledging chicks. It was known that rats and cats, which humans have introduced on islands all over the world, prey heavily on seabirds. But there were no rats or cats on Gough, only mice. Using video cameras and infrared lights, Wanless recorded what the mice were doing to the petrel chicks. “The sun went down,” he said, “and a mouse came out in the petrel burrow. It hesitated and then started nibbling on the chick. Other mice came, and I witnessed this insane, disgusting attack. As the blood started to flow, the mice got more and more excited. At times, there were four or five of them competing for the wound, lapping up blood and going inside to eat the chick’s internal organs.”Having evolved without terrestrial predators, seabirds have no defense against mice. A petrel in its inky-dark burrow can’t even see what’s happening to its chick, and an albatross on its nest lacks the instinct to recognize mice as a threat. In 2004, Wanless noted 1,353 breeding failures among Gough’s Tristan albatrosses, most of them from predation, and only about 500 successes. In more recent years, failure has been as high as 90 percent. Among all seabird species on Gough, mice now kill two million chicks every year, and many of these species are also losing adults in the fisheries. Annual mortality among adult Tristan albatrosses at sea has risen to 10 percent—more than triple the rate of natural mortality. Ten percent adult mortality plus 90 percent breeding failure is a formula for extinction.The capes and offshore islands washed by the fertile Peru Current are home to millions of seabirds. Their guano once supplied fertilizer to the world.Scientists survey tightly packed nests of guano left behind by guanay cormorants at Punta San Juan, a peninsula in southern Peru transformed into a virtual island by a six-and-a-half-foot-high concrete wall built by the guano industry to protect the breeding site from predators. With three or four nests per square yard, guanays are among the densest nesting seabirds in the world.The calamitous decline in seabird populations has many causes. Overfishing of anchovies and other small prey fish directly deprives penguins and gannets and cormorants of the energy they need to reproduce. Overfishing of tuna, schools of which drive smaller fish to the ocean’s surface, can make it more difficult for shearwaters and petrels to forage. Climate change, which alters ocean currents, already appears to be causing breeding failure among Iceland’s puffins, and birds that nest on low-lying islands are vulnerable to rising sea levels. Plastic pollution, particularly in the Pacific Ocean, is clogging the guts of seabirds and leaving them hungry for real food. And the resurgence of marine mammal populations—in other respects, an environmental success story—has resulted in more seals to eat young penguins, more sea lions to crowd cormorants out of their breeding sites, and more whales to compete with diving birds for prey.The number one threat to seabirds, however, is introduced predators: rats, cats, and mice overrunning the islands where they breed. This is the bad news. The good news is that invasive species are a problem with achievable solutions. Organizations such as Island Conservation, a nonprofit based in California, have perfected the use of helicopters and GIS technology to target predators with poisoned mammal-specific bait. Animal lovers may grieve at the mass killing of small furry mammals, but human beings have an even greater responsibility to the species they’ve threatened with extinction, however inadvertently, by introducing predators.The most ambitious rodent-eradication effort to date was mounted by the South Georgia Heritage Trust. South Georgia island, 900 miles from the Antarctic Peninsula, is the breeding ground of perhaps 30 million seabirds; without rats and mice, the island could easily host three times that number. From 2011 to 2015, at a cost of more than $10 million, three helicopters traversed every ice-free area on South Georgia, dropping bait. No living rat or mouse has been detected on the island since 2015.Similar efforts are now planned for Gough Island, in 2019, and for South Africa’s Marion Island in 2020. Mice came to Marion with whalers and sealers in the 19th century. In the 1940s, the South African government introduced cats to control them, and the cats quickly went feral. Instead of killing mice, they proceeded to decimate the smaller seabird species nesting on the island. (“Mice know exactly what a cat is,” Ross Wanless explained. “Seabirds don’t.”) Marion’s seabirds were expected to recover after the last cats were removed, in 1991, but they didn’t. “The mice are the only explanation,” Wanless said.Seabirds are a poignant combination of extreme vulnerability and extreme toughness. A 20-pound Tristan albatross can’t stop a one-ounce mouse from eating its young, and yet it thrives in frigid salt water and brutal winds and can bully a large gull. Because of its longevity, it may survive 20 years of breeding failure and still produce chicks, once the danger to its nest is eliminated.“Seabirds respond well to restoration,” Nick Holmes, the science director at Island Conservation, told me. “Addressing the terrestrial threat bolsters their resistance to all the other threats.” When Island Conservation and its partners eliminated rats from California’s Anacapa Island, south of Santa Barbara, the hatching success rate of the Scripps’s murrelet (a small cousin of the common murre) immediately jumped from 30 percent to 85 percent. The murrelets are now secure on Anacapa, and ashy storm petrels have been recorded breeding there for the first time.To prevent the extinction of a species, you first have to know that it exists. You need ocular proof, and seabirds are especially adept at withholding it. Consider the story of the Magenta petrel. In 1867, an Italian research vessel, the Magenta, shot a single specimen of a large, gray-and-white petrel in the South Pacific. For more than a century, this remained the only scientific evidence of the species. But invisibility is enticing, and in 1969 an amateur ornithologist named David Crockett went to New Zealand’s Chatham Islands to search for the bird. Although much of the Chathams’ main island had been cleared for pasture by European and Maori farmers, its southwest corner was still forested, and there were piles of unidentified petrel bones in the middens of a Polynesian people, the Moriori, who had settled the islands centuries earlier. Crockett had read accounts of latter-day Moriori collecting and eating a large petrel, known locally as taiko, as late as 1908. He suspected that the taiko was the Magenta petrel, and that it might still be nesting in burrows in the forest.Some of the most endangered albatross and other seabird species breed in only one place: a rocky archipelago 500 miles east of New Zealand.New Zealand’s Chatham Islands include Te Tara Koi Koia (the Pyramid), the only breeding ground of the vulnerable Chatham albatross. Some 5,000 breeding pairs nest there each year. During April and July, most fly 6,000 miles to the southwest coast of South America, following the current north to Peru.The tract of forest where the Moriori had collected taiko was owned by a sheep farmer of Maori descent, Manuel Tuanui. Inspired by the prospect of discovering a lost native bird on their land, Tuanui and his teenage son, Bruce, helped Crockett conduct a series of arduous searches for the taiko, scouring the forest for burrows and setting up spotlights to attract seabirds flying in at night. To Bruce, Crockett was “this strange guy who was chasing a taipo [a Maori word for ‘ghost’].” When Bruce married a young woman from a neighboring island, Liz Gregory-Hunt, she was swept up in his family’s quest. “You get sucked into the vortex,” Liz told me, “and it becomes your life.”On the night of January 3, 1973, Crockett was rewarded with a spotlighted look at four birds that matched the description of Magenta petrel: ocular proof. But he also wanted to capture taiko and find where they nested, and this was even harder than seeing them. It was another five years before Bruce and Liz, driving into town from the farm, were stopped on the road by an uncle of Bruce’s who gave them the news: “They’ve just caught two taiko.” It was a further ten years before a team of scientists was able to locate two active taiko burrows in the forest, by radio-tracking captured birds.For the Tuanuis, this was still only the beginning. The taiko’s single known breeding site was on their land, and the bird needed to be protected from the threats that had already nearly driven it extinct. Lines of traps were set around the burrows for cats and opossums, and Manuel Tuanui, in a move considered “mental” by his neighbors, donated 2,900 acres of bush to the New Zealand government, which fenced most of the land against sheep and cattle. Within a few years, because of the family’s efforts, the number of pairs of taiko known to breed in the forest began to rise; today it stands at more than 20.On a hot day in January, I joined a British seabird specialist, Dave Boyle, and a British volunteer worker, Giselle Eagle, on a long trek to the burrow of a female taiko known to them as S64. She was incubating an egg fertilized by a male that had lived in the area for 18 seasons before attracting a mate. Boyle wanted to examine S64 before her egg hatched and she began to spend more time foraging at sea. “There’s no way of knowing how old she is,” he said. “She could have been breeding somewhere else with a different partner, or she could be very young.”The terrain was rugged, the forest dense and intermittently boggy. S64’s burrow was tucked into a steep hillside covered thickly with ferns and tree litter. Boyle knelt down and removed the lid of an underground wooden nest box previously installed at the back end of the burrow. Peering in, he shook his head sadly. “It looks like the chick got stuck hatching.”Chick death is not uncommon, especially if the mother is young and inexperienced, but every breeding failure is a setback for a species whose total population is still only about 200. Boyle reached into the box and lifted out S64. She was big for a petrel but seemed small in his hands, and she had no idea how rare and precious she was; she squirmed and tried to bite Boyle until he slipped her into a cloth bag. To discourage her from hanging around the burrow any longer, he removed the dead chick and the crumpled shell that had trapped its legs. Working with Eagle, he then fastened a band to S64’s leg, stuck her with a needle to draw a DNA sample, and shot a microchip under the skin on her back.“She’s not having a good day,” Eagle said.“Once she’s got a microchip in,” Boyle said, “we never have to handle her again.”The few taiko that survived after centuries of predation and habitat loss nested deep in the forest because it was relatively safe, not because it was an optimal site. To get airborne, even adult taiko need to climb a tree, and it can take a new fledgling several days to fight its way out of the forest, a struggle that may leave it too weak to survive on the ocean. When the Tuanui family created a formal organization, the Chatham Islands Taiko Trust, in 1998, one aim was to raise off-island money for a predator-proof enclosure closer to the water. The enclosure, called Sweetwater, was completed in 2006, and many of the chicks now born in the forest are transferred there before fledging, to “imprint” the location on their memory and encourage them to return there to breed. The first Sweetwater-imprinted taiko returned in 2010; many more have come back since then.The Taiko Trust has also transferred chicks of the Chatham petrel, a bird smaller and scarcely less endangered than the taiko, from a nearby island to Sweetwater, to create a secure alternate nesting site for the species. To bolster the population of the Chatham albatross, a species whose only colony is on Te Tara Koi Koia, a constricting offshore cone of rock also known as the Pyramid, the trust has ferried 300 chicks to a second predator-proof enclosure on the main island, above the majestic sea cliffs on the Tuanui farm. “For the trust to survive,” Liz Tuanui said, “we knew we had to diversify to other species.”Liz has now spent four decades in the vortex. She chairs the Taiko Trust, and she and Bruce have fenced 13 tracts of forest altogether, seven at their own expense. This has benefited both seabirds and native land species—the splendid Chatham pigeon, once near extinction on the main island, now numbers more than a thousand—but Bruce prefers to emphasize the synergy between conservation and farming. Fencing the forest, he told me, also protects his waterways, shelters his stock during storms, and makes it easier for him to muster his sheep. When I pressed him to account for why a sheep-farming family had shouldered the burden of saving three of the world’s rarest seabirds, at such a cost of labor and money, he demurred with a shrug. “If we didn’t do it,” he said, “no one else was going to do it. Finding the taiko was a huge effort. It was part of us but part of the Chathams, too.”“It’s awesome,” Liz said. “We have tenfold the number of people protecting their bush than 25 years ago.”“If we don’t do it,” Bruce said, “it’s going to be even harder for the next generation.”The crucial difference between the Chatham Islands and the world in which most of us live, it seemed to me, is that islanders don’t need to struggle to imagine seabirds. From the trust’s predator-proof cliffside enclosure, to which young Chatham albatrosses will soon be returning to court their mates, it’s only a two-hour boat trip out to Te Tara Koi Koia. There, on vertiginous slopes, above blue ocean swells heaving against kelp-covered rocks, stern-browed albatross parents tend to their downy gray chicks. Overhead, in such numbers that they confuse your sense of scale and seem no bigger than seagulls, the albatrosses circle and ride the wind on their immense wings. Very few people will ever see them.",
"SAN FRANCISCONearly 30 miles west of the Golden Gate Bridge, a growing population of feisty, fish-loving northern fur seals is waddling around the craggy Farallon Islands. After all but vanishing from these granite shores by the mid-1800s, the seals have been returning in ever-increasing numbers—just in time to take a hit from a strong, brewing El Niño.Scientists expect the challenging ocean conditions offshore will affect multiple species, and say the situation is a preview of what could come if warming trends continue.“Northern fur seals are dramatically affected by El Niños,” says Tony Orr, a wildlife biologist with NOAA’s Alaska Fisheries Science Center. Yet he’s optimistic that the population will rebound.“Their numbers do get smacked down, and it takes a while, but they gradually recover.”Since 2013, the fur seal population in the Farallon National Wildlife Refuge has doubled from 666 to more than 1,200, Ryan Berger of Point Blue Conservation Science reported last Tuesday at a conference of the Society for Marine Mammalogy.“It’s a huge increase,” Berger says.Berger and his colleagues have been studying the fur seals on the chain’s West End Island since 1996, when the first pup was born there in more than a century. Biologists working on the island count the number of adults and pups annually, aided by aerial surveys conducted with the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.In the early 1800s, the Farallons hosted more than 100,000 northern fur seals. But over a period of 40 years, hunters with their sights set on the seals’ dense, coveted coats robbed the islands of their flippered inhabitants, reducing the population to basically zero.In recent years, the seals have started to find their way back to these wind-whipped rocks from breeding grounds in southern California and Alaska, and it looks like some will stay put.The news isn’t all good, though. Only 665 pups were born this year, just nine more than the 2014 total of 656. That’s not entirely unexpected in El Niño years, when warm ocean waters make food scarce for mothers and just-weaned pups; in fact, surveys suggest young fur seals often don’t survive at all. Orr says he and his colleagues have never spotted any tagged pups born during the last extreme El Niño winter, in 1997–1998.“None of them have ever been seen. Ever. That’s crazy,” says Orr. “Their population just crashes during El Niños.”This year’s El Niño is amplifying a problem that has been slowly percolating off the West Coast and affecting more than just the fur seals. Other species have been starving, such as sea lions, whose pups began stranding on California’s beaches in record numbers in early 2013.Scientists eventually traced the source of the problem to disappearing sardine populations that may be shifting because of a warm water blob in the northern Pacific Ocean.This year, sea lion pups on the islands off southern California had the lowest weights ever recorded, and their terrible condition portends another year of mass strandings.“The reality is that we may have a very busy season, and we are anticipating large numbers of animals coming ashore,” says Justin Viezbicke, stranding coordinator at the National Marine Fisheries Service.Now, the effects of the warm water are finally reaching fur seals. This year, more than 150 have washed up along California beaches, most within the past six weeks and many weighing just a smidge more than 10 pounds.“They’re half of normal weight,” says Shawn Johnson of the Marine Mammal Center in Sausalito, where the pups are being nursed back to health. “That’s extremely small. You can hold them in your hands…and they will try to bite you.”It’s not clear why fur seal strandings have lagged behind the sea lions, though scientists suspect it could have to do with the sizes of the populations and where nursing mothers go to look for fish.Most of the stranded pups are probably coming from a growing colony on San Miguel Island. There, fall surveys revealed that the three-month-old pups weighed just a few pounds more than they did at birth—not nearly big enough to tackle life in the ocean. Now, as the tiny furballs make their way north in search of food, many are simply becoming shark bait or finding themselves on the beach.While the fur seal population is expected to recover from a tough winter, it’s unclear how far the reverberations from the one-two punch of the blob and El Niño will spread through the ecosystem.One thing is clear, though: these warm ocean waters can be considered a preview of things to come.“It’s almost a test bed for what we might be seeing in the future,” says NOAA’s Elliott Hazen. “The ecosystem here is used to experiencing changes, but if warming is happening … all those things are going to happen more frequently in future conditions than now.”Follow Nadia Drake on Twitter and National Geographic’s Phenomena network.",
"This here is Rooster Cogburn, and I think he really has the personality of his namesake.(This photo and caption were submitted to Your Shot.)",
"Gentoo penguins have plenty to be apprehensive about when  entering Antarctica's frigid waters. To reach the summer's bounty of  fish, squid and krill, they often must negotiate a phalanx of hungry sea  leopards.",
"Birds lay eggs of surprising variety, and scientists have long wondered why. Could it be that certain shapes protect eggs from shattering? Or perhaps allow them to fit snugly in a nest? Or was Aristotle correct when he asserted that long, pointy eggs contained females while rounder eggs held males? (He wasn’t.)To crack the mystery about egg shapes, Princeton University evolutionary biologist Mary Caswell Stoddard and her colleagues examined almost 50,000 eggs from more than 1,400 species. They classified the eggs based on their asymmetry and ellipticity, discovering that the more pointy or oval shaped an egg, the more likely it came from a strong flier. “We were shocked to see that one of the best explanations for egg-shape variation was flight ability,” says Stoddard.Common murres, for instance, have particularly pointy and elliptical eggs (see above)—and are expert divers. Perhaps a streamlined bird needs a streamlined egg; stout flightless birds like ostriches and emus hatch from eggs that are nearly round.Penguins, however, break the mold: Although the aquatic birds can’t take to the air, their eggs are asymmetrical. This discovery initially left the researchers puzzled, but they developed a working hypothesis, says Stoddard: “The same processes that may influence egg shape in good fliers may also be at work in good swimmers, like penguins.”In 1918 Congress passed the Migratory Bird Treaty Act to protect birds from wanton killing. To celebrate the centennial, National Geographic is partnering with the National Audubon Society, BirdLife International, and the Cornell Lab of Ornithology to declare 2018 the Year of the Bird. Sign the pledge to find out this month's action and share your actions using #BirdYourWorld to increase your impact.A pair of South Georgia king penguins, Aptenodytes patagonicus patagonicus, show off their brilliant plumage. King penguins have four layers of feathers and huddle together for warmth.",
"The egg of the Indonesian maleo is unusually long and oval.The unusually long, oval egg of the Indonesian maleo may look a lot like a potato, but this bird is no slouch.When the chicks of these anvil-headed animals hatch, they're almost immediately able to fly.For years, scientists have wondered why bird species have different egg shapes. Some theorized shapes may protect eggs from shattering or allow them to fit snugly in the nest. Aristotle had even (wrongly) asserted that long, pointy eggs were female while rounder eggs were male.But no comprehensive studies had ever been conducted to test these ideas, which left Mary Stoddard and colleagues skeptical.“It has not gone unnoticed that birds have evolved to shapes that are quite diverse in form—everything from a spherical owl egg to a pointy sandpiper egg,” said Stoddard, an ecologist at Princeton University. (Read more about the secrets of evolution in National Geographic magazine.)In a new study, the team revealed a surprise: Egg shapes evolved as birds themselves evolved for better flight.Various bird eggs are shown in a still-life portrait. Eggs vary greatly in size and shape.First, the scientists had to discover a way to classify eggs in terms of their shape. They focused on two factors: the asymmetry and ellipticity—or ovalness—of an egg.The team came up with mathematical formulas to describe almost 50,000 eggs from 1,400 species, plotting their shapes on a graph. (Take National Geographic's backyard bird quiz.)The most oval egg? The maleo. The least sandpiper claimed the title of the most asymmetric egg, thanks to its characteristic pointy tip, according to the study, published this week in the journal Science.The eggs of a modern ostrich and an extinct elephant bird (left) contrast with a tiny, jellybean-size hummingbird egg.The researchers then examined whether birds that lay eggs of a certain shape have common diets, nests, and anatomy.For instance, they analyzed the birds' hand-wing index, a formula that describes a bird’s flight style and efficiency, as well as its ability to migrate from its birth site.The results showed that birds with the higher hand-wing index—the most efficient and thus best fliers—were the ones with the most asymmetric or elliptical eggs. (Read about the big bang in bird evolution.)“We were shocked to see that one of the best explanations for egg shape variation was flight ability,” says Stoddard.“This is something that has not gotten a lot of airtime in the hypotheses that are out there for egg shape variation.”The eggs of the common murre, a type of North American seabird, are particularly pointy.This could mean that as a bird's body evolved for better flight, the shape of its egg might have adapted with it.Stoddard doesn't know why certain shapes correlate to better flying, but she suspects it has to do with properties of the egg membrane, which are more responsible for an egg’s shape than the shell.The maleo, for example, may have evolved to become a skillful flier, and its egg might have evolved its long, oval shape to accommodate a streamlined body built for instantaneous flight.Researchers have found that even two-legged predatory dinosaurs called theropods—from which birds evolved—had pointy eggs. (See "Birds Evolved From Dinosaurs Slowly—Then Took Off.")“It’s really useful information about nature that up until now has been patchy,” said Claire Spottiswoode, an evolutionary biologist at the University of Cambridge, who wrote a summary of the study.“It’s also exciting because it inspires a lot of new questions too.”The egg collection at the University of Nebraska State Museum reveals the wide range of differences between bird eggs.Based on the team’s theory, one might assume that all flightless birds would have perfectly round and symmetrical eggs. Ostriches have round eggs, for instance.However, penguins have pointy eggs associated with well-flying birds. Their working hypothesis is that penguins might have adapted for powerful underwater flight, Stoddard says. (Read why penguins may have stopped flying.)“Because they’re expert swimmers, the same processes that may influence egg shape in good fliers may also be at work in good swimmers, like penguins."Follow Hannah Lang on Twitter.",
"It’s been 26 years since the Exxon Valdez supertanker slammed into a reef, releasing nearly 11 million gallons of crude oil and destroying hundreds of thousands of animals, from sea otters to bald eagles, in and around Alaska’s Prince William Sound.You’d think nearly three decades would be long enough for the wildlife to recover, but some populations took a harder hit than others. Take killer whales, also known as orcas.They’re the subject of a new National Geographic investigative documentary produced by reporter J.J. Kelley exploring the effects of the Exxon Valdez spill on this highly intelligent animal. “News always goes in and covers the immediate,” Kelley says, “but what about the long-term fallout?”Two pods of orcas were caught up directly in the spill. One, the so-called resident orcas, lost 14 of its 36 members after the spill. These fish-eating orcas still haven’t recovered. Even worse off is the “transient” pod—orcas that feed on seals and other marine mammals living in the sound. The "Chugach transients," as they're called, are the stars of this three part documentary.Before the spill, they numbered 22. Nine immediately disappeared and were presumed dead, likely from ingesting or inhaling oil. Another six went missing. Now the transients are down to seven. Not one calf has been born since the spill, and the two remaining females are too old to reproduce. The pod will soon die off.The extinction of this pod would mean the loss of a population that not only has its own genes but its own language. Killer whales are the largest dolphin species and one of the smartest predators. Their brain-to-body-weight ratio, a rough measure of intelligence for scientists, is similar to that of chimpanzees.Scientists haven’t pinpointed why the transient clan hasn’t been able to reproduce, but they have some ideas. It could simply be social disruption from the disaster. Or it could be, as a 2010 government report suggests, because so many seals, the orcas’ main food source, died after the spill.Or, unrelated to the Exxon Valdez disaster, chemicals in the air from China and Southeast Asia could be causing reproductive problems. The pesticide DDT and PCBs, an industrial chemical, have been found in the orcas’ blubber.But it doesn’t help that oil from the spill hasn’t disappeared. By dipping a cloth that absorbs oil into the ground on one beach, Kelley and his team confirmed their hunch that the substance still exists. They found an oily stew of crustaceans trapped under a rock—close to hundreds of pink salmon they’d spotted swimming nearby.The Chugach transients don’t eat these sea creatures, but their resident counterparts do. “There’s systems out there that these animals are dependent on,” Craig Matkin, executive director of the North Gulf Oceanic Society, says in the film, “and if you want to have these animals around, you’ve got to protect these systems.”It’s not just killer whales that have Exxon Valdez problems. As of 2010, the government considered only about half of the wildlife populations in Prince William Sound as recovered. Other species, such as pacific herring and pigeon guillemots, also haven’t come close to returning to their pre-spill levels.Read more stories about wildlife crime and exploitation on Wildlife Watch. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to ngwildlife@natgeo.com.",
"Sometimes the sounds of a vocalist warming up drift through the lush aviaries of Umgeni River Bird Park. The prima donna in question? A parrot named Molly. The blue-fronted amazon learned to sing scales from a former owner. Many of the parrots at this zoo and breeding center in Durban, South Africa, are rescues, given up by people unprepared for the challenges of owning a large, needy bird. Not only are parrots loud and destructive; some are as smart as a three-year-old child, and some can live 80 years.Even so, the draw to keep parrots—what conservation ecologist Stuart Marsden calls the “humans of the bird world”—can be irresistible. Highly social and intelligent, the birds create meaningful, powerful bonds with their owners. Combine that with their ability to mimic human voices, and it’s no coincidence that parrots are arguably the most popular pet birds on Earth.National Geographic is partnering with the National Audubon Society, BirdLife International, and the Cornell Lab of Ornithology to celebrate the centennial of the Migratory Bird Treaty Act. Watch for more stories, books, and events throughout the year.In some cases, however, their popularity is hurting them. Despite robust breeding programs worldwide, many parrots are still plucked illegally from the wild. One reason: Organized-crime rackets that have made billions of dollars trafficking animals such as elephants and rhinos have added parrots to their repertoire. Australian palm cockatoos have been known to fetch up to $30,000 a bird on the black market. The illegal parrot trade is rampant in Latin America and the Caribbean, where laws against it can be lax or difficult to enforce.“In the United States, if you go buy a parrot, the odds of it being captive bred are 99 percent,” says Donald Brightsmith, a zoologist at Texas A&M University who studies macaws in Peru. But “if you’re in Peru, Costa Rica, or Mexico, the chances of it being wild caught are 99 percent.”The demand for pets, coupled with deforestation and habitat loss, is the primary driver of parrots’ imperiled status. All but four of the roughly 350 species qualify for protection under the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species, or CITES.By far the most coveted species is the African gray, the best talker of them all. Over the past four decades, at least 1.3 million grays have been exported legally from the 18 countries where they live, according to CITES. Hundreds of thousands more have likely died in transit or been snatched from the rain forests of West and Central Africa.The hub of the trade is South Africa, which exports more African grays than any other country. Historically most orders came from the United States and Europe, but fear of bird flu and laws restricting the bird trade dried up those markets. The Middle East now fills the void. South Africa exported thousands of grays to the region in 2016.That year, CITES made the controversial decision to add the gray parrot to Appendix I, a designation covering species threatened with extinction. To continue selling birds abroad, breeders must now prove to CITES inspectors that their African grays are raised in captivity, not caught in the wild. Most captive-born chicks have a permanent ID ring placed on their legs. Illegal traders may have figured out how to attach the rings to wild birds, so it’s not always easy to tell the difference between captive-bred and wild-caught birds. But there might be a way.Geneticists at South Africa’s University of KwaZulu-Natal hope to develop a gene-based method for determining whether a bird is wild caught or captive bred by sussing out distinct genetic profiles. Such DNA work could lead to a test that allows a breeder, pet buyer, or airport inspector to take a sample from a bird and discover its origins on the spot. A similar approach could use chemical isotopes in parrot feathers to reveal their diets, which point to their place of origin.There have been some encouraging developments for parrots in recent years: Saudi Arabia and the United Arab Emirates—countries that initially refused to implement the CITES restrictions—have since stated publicly that they will no longer import wild-caught grays.Then there are the conservation success stories. The critically endangered Puerto Rican parrot, for example, was down to 13 individuals in the 1970s, owing mainly to the loss of old trees with nest cavities. Then biologists launched a captive-breeding program and began installing nest boxes made of PVC pipe. Wild and captive birds now number in the hundreds—though two devastating hurricanes in 2017 dealt them a temporary setback.The long-term challenge, conservationists say, is convincing the public that parrots are more than amusing sidekicks on pirates’ shoulders, or pets singing songs and mimicking vulgarities from a cage. They’re hundreds of species that live wild and free on nearly every continent, an entire cast of noisy and colorful birds that, before long, could keep flying under the radar and into extinction.",
"Last January on Unalaska Island, Suzi Golodoff poured herself a hot cup of coffee, pulled on her boots, and stepped outside. She was immediately assaulted. “I’m pretty sure they were watching me leave the house, saw I had something in my mug, and waited,” she said. “I could have lost a finger.” But she didn’t. She was one of the lucky ones.Her assailants were bald eagles, Haliaeetus leucocephalus—or Dutch Harbor pigeons, as they’re known around this fishing port in the Aleutian chain on the edge of the Bering Sea.In 1918 Congress passed the Migratory Bird Treaty Act to protect birds from wanton killing. To celebrate the centennial, National Geographic is partnering with the National Audubon Society, BirdLife International, and the Cornell Lab of Ornithology to declare 2018 the Year of the Bird. Sign the pledge to find out this month's action and share your actions using #BirdYourWorld to increase your impact.Especially during fishing season, hundreds of eagles come to scavenge and nest in the area, which is home to about 4,400 human residents. The birds make their presence known from atop telephone poles and stoplights. They accost people who wander too close during nesting season, sending victims to the medical clinic for scalp stitches. And they swarm every boat that comes into port, festooning the rigging by the dozen like baleful Christmas ornaments.We’re used to seeing America’s national bird depicted as a majestic hero plucking wild salmon from pristine streams. But here you can see eagles for what they really are: scrappy, opportunistic feeders. If fresh fish isn’t available, the birds will eat seagulls, ducks, squirrels, mice, the occasional raven, bits of rotten meat dug out of the trash—or, in one case, a piece of pepperoni pizza snatched out of a teenager’s hand. Like us, eagles are adaptable. We should be proud.",
"For most of my life, I didn’t pay attention to birds. Only in my 40s did I become a person whose heart lifts whenever he hears a grosbeak singing or a towhee calling and who hurries out to see a golden plover that’s been reported in the neighborhood, just because it’s a beautiful bird, with truly golden plumage, and has flown all the way from Alaska. When someone asks me why birds are so important to me, all I can do is sigh and shake my head, as if I’ve been asked to explain why I love my brothers. And yet the question is a fair one, worth considering in the centennial year of America’s Migratory Bird Treaty Act: Why do birds matter?My answer might begin with the vast scale of the avian domain. If you could see every bird in the world, you’d see the whole world. Things with feathers can be found in every corner of every ocean and in land habitats so bleak that they’re habitats for nothing else. Gray gulls raise their chicks in Chile’s Atacama Desert, one of the driest places on Earth.Emperor penguins incubate their eggs in Antarctica in winter. Goshawks nest in the Berlin cemetery where Marlene Dietrich is buried, sparrows in Manhattan traffic lights, swifts in sea caves, vultures on Himalayan cliffs, chaffinches in Chernobyl. The only forms of life more widely distributed than birds are microscopic.To survive in so many different habitats, the world’s 10,000 or so bird species have evolved into a spectacular diversity of forms. They range in size from the ostrich, which can reach nine feet in height and is widespread in Africa, to the aptly named bee hummingbird, found only in Cuba. Their bills can be massive (pelicans, toucans), tiny (weebills), or as long as the rest of their body (sword-billed hummingbirds). Some birds—the painted bunting in Texas, Gould’s sunbird in South Asia, the rainbow lorikeet in Australia—are gaudier than any flower. Others come in one of the nearly infinite shades of brown that tax the vocabulary of avian taxonomists: rufous, fulvous, ferruginous, bran-colored, foxy.In 1918 Congress passed the Migratory Bird Treaty Act to protect birds from wanton killing. To celebrate the centennial, National Geographic is partnering with the National Audubon Society, BirdLife International, and the Cornell Lab of Ornithology to declare 2018 the Year of the Bird. Sign the pledge to find out this month's action and share your actions using #BirdYourWorld to increase your impact.Birds are no less diverse behaviorally. Some are highly social, others anti. African queleas and flamingos gather in flocks of millions, and parakeets build whole parakeet cities out of sticks. Dippers walk alone and underwater, on the beds of mountain streams, and a wandering albatross may glide on its 10-foot wingspan 500 miles away from any other albatrosses. I’ve met friendly birds, like the New Zealand fantail that once followed me down a trail, and I’ve met mean ones, like the caracara in Chile that swooped down and tried to knock my head off when I stared at it too long. Roadrunners kill rattlesnakes for food by teaming up on them, one bird distracting the snake while another sneaks up behind it. Bee-eaters eat bees. Leaftossers toss leaves. Thick-billed murres can dive underwater to a depth of 700 feet, peregrine falcons downward through the air at 240 miles an hour. A wren-like rushbird can spend its entire life beside one half-acre pond, while a cerulean warbler may migrate to Peru and then find its way back to the tree in New Jersey where it nested the year before.Feathers first appeared not on birds but on dinosaurs long before birds evolved; even some early tyrannosaurs sported primitive ones. Dinosaur feathers were likely used for insulation or display. More complex feathers specialized for flight took birds—the sole remaining dinosaur lineage—to new heights.Like its North American cousin, the vermilion cardinal (Cardinalis phoeniceus) of Colombia and Venezuela is an irresistible eye-catcher—only more so. The male’s feathers are even redder, and it holds its long, spiky crest aloft nearly all the time. The males sing and flaunt their finery from conspicuous perches in early morning.Birds aren’t furry and cuddly, but in many respects they’re more similar to us than other mammals are. They build intricate homes and raise families in them. They take long winter vacations in warm places. Cockatoos are shrewd thinkers, solving puzzles that would challenge a chimpanzee, and crows like to play. (On days so windy that more practical birds stay grounded, I’ve seen crows launching themselves off hillsides and doing aerial somersaults, just for the fun of it, and I keep returning to the YouTube video of a crow in Russia sledding down a snowy roof on a plastic lid, flying back up with the lid in its beak, and sledding down again.) And then there are the songs with which birds, like us, fill the world. Nightingales trill in the suburbs of Europe, thrushes in downtown Quito, hwameis in Chengdu. Chickadees have a complex language for communicating—not only to each other but to every bird in their neighborhood—about how safe or unsafe they feel from predators. Some lyrebirds in eastern Australia sing a tune their ancestors may have learned from a settler’s flute nearly a century ago. If you shoot too many pictures of a lyrebird, it will add the sound of your camera to its repertoire.But birds also do the thing we all wish we could do but can’t, except in dreams: They fly. Eagles effortlessly ride thermals; hummingbirds pause in midair; quail burst into flight heart-stoppingly. Taken all together, the flight paths of birds bind the planet together like 100 billion filaments, tree to tree and continent to continent. There was never a time when the world seemed large to them. After breeding, a European swift will stay aloft for nearly a year, flying to sub-Saharan Africa and back, eating and molting and sleeping on the wing, without landing once. Young albatrosses spend as many as 10 years roving the open ocean before they first return to land to breed. A bar-tailed godwit has been tracked flying nonstop from Alaska to New Zealand, 7,264 miles in nine days, while a ruby-throated hummingbird may burn up a third of its tiny body weight to cross the Gulf of Mexico. The red knot, a small shorebird species, makes annual round-trips between Tierra del Fuego and the Canadian Arctic; one long-lived individual, named B95 for the tag on its leg, has flown more miles than separate the Earth and the moon.The sociable western rosella (Platycercus icterotis) of southwestern Australia is often seen foraging in pairs or small groups. Damaging to fruit orchards, they used to be shot as vermin. The species is now protected, but its numbers are still declining because of loss of habitat.There is, however, one critical ability that human beings have and birds do not: mastery of their environment. Birds can’t protect wetlands, can’t manage a fishery, can’t air-condition their nests. They have only the instincts and the physical abilities that evolution has bequeathed to them. These have served them well for a very long time, 150 million years longer than human beings have been around. But now human beings are changing the planet—its surface, its climate, its oceans—too quickly for birds to adapt to by evolving. Crows and gulls may thrive at our garbage dumps, blackbirds and cowbirds at our feedlots, robins and bulbuls in our city parks. But the future of most bird species depends on our commitment to preserving them. Are they valuable enough for us to make the effort?Value, in the late Anthropocene, has come almost exclusively to mean economic value, utility to human beings. And certainly many wild birds are usefully edible. Some of them in turn eat noxious insects and rodents. Many others perform vital roles—pollinating plants, spreading seeds, serving as food for mammalian predators—in ecosystems whose continuing wildness has touristic or carbon-sequestering value. You may also hear it argued that bird populations function, like the proverbial coal-mine canary, as important indicators of ecological health. But do we really need the absence of birds to tell us when a marsh is severely polluted, a forest slashed and burned, or a fishery destroyed? The sad fact is that wild birds, in themselves, will never pull their weight in the human economy. They want to eat our blueberries.Wake up early enough almost anywhere, and you’ll likely be treated to some tunes from songbirds, which make up almost half the world’s avian species. Unlike instinctual calls, the extravagantly complex pitch, rhythm, and structure of true birdsongs must be learned early in life and can vary locally within a species.What bird populations do usefully indicate is the health of our ethical values. One reason that wild birds matter—ought to matter—is that they are our last, best connection to a natural world that is otherwise receding. They’re the most vivid and widespread representatives of the Earth as it was before people arrived on it. They share descent with the largest animals ever to walk on land: The house finch outside your window is a tiny and beautifully adapted living dinosaur. A duck on your local pond looks and sounds very much like a duck 20 million years ago, in the Miocene epoch, when birds ruled the planet. In an ever more artificial world, where featherless drones fill the air and Angry Birds can be simulated on our phones, we may see no reasonable need to cherish and support the former rulers of the natural realm. But is economic calculation our highest standard? After Shakespeare’s King Lear steps down from the throne, he pleads with his elder two daughters to grant him some vestige of his former majesty. When the daughters reply that they don’t see the need for it, the old king bursts out: “O, reason not the need!” To consign birds to oblivion is to forget what we’re the children of.“The shape of a beak tells a poignant story of each bird’s evolution and survival, and helps us to understand its place in the world,” writes Noah Strycker in Birds of the Photo Ark. A sparrow’s sturdy triangular beak packs the power to crack seeds, while a hawk’s sharp, hooked beak makes short work of prey.A person who says, “It’s too bad about the birds, but human beings come first” is making one of two implicit claims. The person may mean that human beings are no better than any other animal—that our fundamentally selfish selves, which are motivated by selfish genes, will always do whatever it takes to replicate our genes and maximize our pleasure, the nonhuman world be damned. This is the view of cynical realists, to whom a concern for other species is merely an annoying form of sentimentality. It’s a view that can’t be disproved, and it’s available to anyone who doesn’t mind admitting that he or she is hopelessly selfish. But “human beings come first” may also have the opposite meaning: that our species is uniquely worthy of monopolizing the world’s resources because we are not like other animals, because we have consciousness and free will, the capacity to remember our pasts and shape our futures. This opposing view can be found among both religious believers and secular humanists, and it too is neither provably true nor provably false. But it does raise the question: If we’re incomparably more worthy than other animals, shouldn’t our ability to discern right from wrong, and to knowingly sacrifice some small fraction of our convenience for a larger good, make us more susceptible to the claims of nature, rather than less? Doesn’t a unique ability carry with it a unique responsibility?Beyond the sheer joy they provide, birds play a vital role in the environment, pollinating plants, dispersing seeds, controlling insects, and removing rotting flesh. “The future of birds, and us, are intertwined more than we know,” writes photographer Joel Sartore in Birds of the Photo Ark. “We soar, or plummet, together.”A few years ago in a forest in northeast India, I heard and then began to feel, in my chest, a deep rhythmic whooshing. It sounded meteorological, but it was the wingbeats of a pair of great hornbills flying in to land in a fruiting tree. They had massive yellow bills and hefty white thighs; they looked like a cross between a toucan and a giant panda. As they clambered around in the tree, placidly eating fruit, I found myself crying out with the rarest of all emotions: pure joy. It had nothing to do with what I wanted or what I possessed. It was the sheer gorgeous fact of the great hornbill, which couldn’t have cared less about me.The radical otherness of birds is integral to their beauty and their value. They are always among us but never of us. They’re the other world-dominating animals that evolution has produced, and their indifference to us ought to serve as a chastening reminder that we’re not the measure of all things. The stories we tell about the past and imagine for the future are mental constructions that birds can do without. Birds live squarely in the present. And at present, although our cats and our windows and our pesticides kill billions of them every year, and although some species, particularly on oceanic islands, have been lost forever, their world is still very much alive. In every corner of the globe, in nests as small as walnuts or as large as haystacks, chicks are pecking through their shells and into the light.",
"As industrial-scale farms flourish in the European Union, its fields have grown quiet—robbed of the birds that once filled them with song. Since 1980 the number of birds that typically inhabit Europe’s farmlands has shrunk by 55 percent. And in the last 17 years alone, French farmland-bird counts dropped by a third—a “level approaching an ecological catastrophe,” according to a recent survey.Intensified agriculture is driving the losses. Habitats where birds once bred, nested, and wintered now bear crops, and pesticides have killed off birds’ prey. In the past 27 years Germany has lost 75 percent of its flying insects by mass. Even avian species that typically adapt to humans have dwindled on farms, suggesting that the land is less able to sustain all kinds of birds.To curb the losses of farmland birds, researchers contend that agriculture must be remade in nature’s image: less dependent on the addition of chemicals, more diverse in its flora, and more hospitable to local fauna.National Geographic is partnering with the National Audubon Society, BirdLife International, and the Cornell Lab of Ornithology to celebrate the centennial of the Migratory Bird Treaty Act. Watch for more stories, books, and events throughout the year.",
"Populations of birds that live in or near farms, such as the red-legged partridge (Alectoris rufa), have plummeted around the world. In France's Deux-Sèvres region, red-legged partridge counts have fallen 86 percent since 2009.Since time immemorial, farmlands have been as alive with bird songs as the sound of the wind. But now, these melodies are falling silent. For the last forty years, bird species that live in and among farmlands have plummeted worldwide, a downward spiral researchers say has flown under the public's radar.“There's either large, charismatic animals [that] everybody knows are disappearing, or unknown species that vanish without being noticed—but what of the fate of the common species that are also disappearing without warning?” asks Benoît Fontaine, a conservation biologist at France's National Museum of Natural History.In March, Fontaine and his colleagues announced the results of a survey of France's bird populations. The findings, which grabbed headlines around the world, were grim; since 1989, France's farmland bird populations have shrunk by a third.Zoom in to the local level, and the findings grow more alarming. Across France, birds well-adapted to human environments are on the upswing. But in the farmland of France's Deux-Sèvres region, these generalists are also in freefall, with some species down by 85 percent since 2009. Researchers take this decline as a sign of the ecosystem's poor health.“The Silent Spring that Rachel Carson warned of could become a reality unless we act very quickly,” said Center for Biological Studies ecologist Vincent Bretagnolle, who led the local study, in a statement.In fact, France's story has repeated itself across the industrialized world. In the U.K., farmland bird populations have collapsed by more than half since 1970, with much of the crash occurring by the 1980s. Since 1980, Europe's total farmland-bird population shrunk by 300 million birds. And in Canada and the United States, 74 percent of farmland bird species shrank in number from 1966 to 2013.“This is a very important story to communicate, although it is not a new story,” said Ian Burfield, the global science coordinator for BirdLife International, in an email to National Geographic.Long before the dawn of agriculture, some birds adapted to living in open environments such as grasslands. As these landscapes bent to humans' will, the birds followed suit, building their nests in hedgerows and eating croplands' insects and seeds.But since the 1960s, agriculture's “green revolution” has dramatically reshaped how we grow food. In the industrialized world, croplands have transformed into mechanically sculpted monocultures, nourished with fertilizers and protected with herbicides and insecticides.This shift staved off fears of global starvation, tripling agricultural output even as humans doubled in number. But for birds, this brave new world of intensification has meant death by a million pinpricks. Non-crop areas where birds once nested are now inhospitable fields of corn or wheat; mechanized mowing has injured birds or mangled their nests.Insecticides are also thought to slash farmland birds' food supplies. In 2014, Dutch researchers found that use of the insecticide imidacloprid correlated with declines of Dutch bug-eating birds. Three years later, researchers announced that from 1989 to 2016, Germany had lost three quarters of its flying insects by mass—a nosedive tentatively connected with modern agriculture.In 1918 Congress passed the Migratory Bird Treaty Act to protect birds from wanton killing. To celebrate the centennial, National Geographic is partnering with the National Audubon Society, BirdLife International, and the Cornell Lab of Ornithology to declare 2018 the Year of the Bird. Sign the pledge to find out this month's action and share your actions using #BirdYourWorld to increase your impact.“When I was a kid, we spent our holidays crossing France with a car, [and] after the trip, we had to clean the windshield, because it was full of pieces of insects that had crashed,” says Fontaine. “Now, that’s no longer the case. It’s clean after the whole trip.”Scientists consider this vanishing dire. On Thursday, 233 researchers from around the world published a joint letter in Science calling for restrictions on neonicotinoids, a class of insecticides widely used in agriculture.Among threatened birds living today, agriculture in its present form poses the single biggest extinction threat, according to BirdLife's 2018 State of the World's Birds report. So to spur the birds’ rebound, researchers say that farming practices must change radically to become more sustainable. There are no easy fixes.“People are looking for simple solutions: 'Oh, this pesticide is toxic, let’s swap it out for another one.' I see that as a dead end,” says Christy Morrissey, a University of Saskatchewan ecologist who studies pesticides' effects on North American birds and co-signed the neonicotinoids letter.“It’s not about one pesticide being a problem,” she adds. “It's that they’re a symptom of a bigger problem: the complete and utter dependence on chemical inputs.”At projects across the world, researchers and farmers are working together to craft a new “agroecological” future. Test farms in the U.S., Canada, and the U.K. are diversifying their plots and building natural refuges for local birds. Morrissey is assembling a network of Canadian researchers to develop new ways to monitor farms' soil health, water quality, and biodiversity.Some initiatives also address farmers' economic concerns. Fontaine points to one recent pilot project in Italy that provided insurance to farmers who were willing to forego pesticides. Not only did farmers' businesses stay steady, but yields didn't drop much either.“[Farmers] are not the bad guys. If they can do farming in a way that is better for biodiversity, of course they're willing to do that,” says Fontaine. “Plus, they're the ones who really know the field, and they're in the best place to make the changes.”That said, Fontaine admits that change hasn't come easy. In March, when Fontaine's team announced its survey's grim results, even sympathetic farmers lamented that their hard work had been for naught.“What they do is visible at the very small scale, [but] changes have to be done on a much larger scale,” says Fontaine.Daisy Chung contributed reporting.",
"A Cambodian forestry department ranger patrols Bokor National Park for illegal loggers. Violence associated with illegal logging is on the rise.After a productive day—they’d encountered a gang of illegal loggers and confiscated six chain saws—the four patrollers in Cambodia’s Preah Vihear Protected Forest strung up their hammocks and settled in for the night. Come morning, they’d return to the nearest Forestry Administration station, just 2.5 miles away.But at 1 a.m. on November 7, 2015, two intruders slipped into the campsite. They approached the hammock where Sieng Darong, 47, a leader of the Forestry Administration’s law enforcement team, lay sleeping, drew their weapons, and fired two shots—one into Darong’s head, another into his throat.Sab Yoh, 29, a provincial police officer, was next, receiving a shot in the stomach.The commotion woke Phet Sophoan, 30, a member of the border police, who leaped from his hammock just in time to feel a sudden, searing pain as a bullet grazed his buttock. Still, he managed to drag himself about 300 feet away, where he hid in the brush.After the killers’ shadowy silhouettes retreated, Sophoan located the fourth member of the group, Koem Chenda, a soldier with Intervention Brigade 9’s Battalion 391. Chenda had escaped unharmed. They could hear Yoh’s groans but decided not to attempt a rescue. “We were afraid that we would be shot dead if we went back,” Sophon would tell the Phnom Penh Post. “I felt sorry for [Yoh], but I couldn’t help him.”Hours later, when Chenda led patrolmen back to the campsite, Yoh was dead.It was the latest in an ongoing series of violent crimes associated with illegal logging, a global contraband industry that accounts for up to 10 percent of all timber trade.Impacts caused by those crimes have a global reach. Illegal logging is the leading cause of forest degradation worldwide and contributes to global warming. In 2013, for example, it resulted in an estimated 190 million tons of carbon dioxide released into the atmosphere. The practice also threatens critically endangered species, including orangutans and Siberian tigers, as well as local people, with impacts ranging from loss of livelihoods and land to endangerment to their lives.Global Witness, a nonprofit organization dedicated to exposing corruption and environmental abuse, with offices in London and Washington, D.C., has confirmed the killings of more than 950 forest defenders between 2002 and 2014—activists, rangers, and indigenous people. During the past five years the murder rate has risen to two a week.The tally is certainly an underestimate. “There are still huge gaps of information, because a lot of killings aren’t reported,” says Billy Kyte, a campaigner for Global Witness. Dependable data are lacking for many countries, such as Nigeria, Democratic Republic of Congo, Zimbabwe, Myanmar, China, as well as Central Asian nations.Illegal logging is irresistible because of the high prices luxury timbers like rosewood and mahogany fetch on the international market. A cubic meter of rosewood, for instance, can sell for $50,000 in China, and in Thailand a two-meter-long plank goes for $5,000.Cambodian forest rangers cross a river during a patrol. Last November, illegal loggers killed two patrollers in a protected forest.China is a major destination for illicit wood. Alison Clausen, Wildlife Conservation Society’s (WCS) Madagascar director, estimates that 90 percent of Madagascar’s illegal timber winds up in China. A World Wildlife Fund report found that between 2004 and 2011, China imported two to four times more oak timber from the Russian Far East than was legally permitted.Windfall illicit profits have spurred a logging frenzy in numerous countries, including Thailand, where Thai nationals and Cambodians sneak into national parks near the Thai-Cambodia border. They sometimes carry AK-47s, and they often get into altercations with Thai forest rangers.“We’d like to see the government step up and treat this as a national security issue—which it is,” said Anak Pattanavibool, country director for WCS's Thailand program. “Unknown armed groups of Cambodians are coming into our country and smuggling out illegally cut trees.” Between 2008 and 2015, according to Pattanavibool, 54 Thai park rangers were killed, and 61 wounded.Global Witness began keeping its grim statistics after Chut Wutty, an environmental investigator, activist, and reporter in Cambodia, was shot by a military police officer in 2012. Wutty, who was accompanied by two journalists, had been escorting the reporters to logging sites when he was killed.His death made international headlines, but, according to Global Witness, within days the government dropped its investigation into his murder. Since 2010, three other journalists in Cambodia have also been found killed; two were reporting on illegal logging, the other on illegal fisheries. In November 2015, Reporters Without Borders, a nonprofit organization based in Paris, named Cambodia the most dangerous country for an environmental reporter.In the days following Darong and Yoh’s murder, six illegal loggers with alleged military ties, and a soldier, were arrested. No charges have yet been made. According to Steve Mecinski, a law enforcement technical advisor for the World Wildlife Fund-Cambodia, “This matter becomes rather complex as media sources suggest high government officials and authorities’ involvement.”According to the Phnom Penh Post, “the military is well known in Preah Vihear to be responsible for logging and poaching in protected areas, according to multiple sources.”Cambodian rangers monitor Bokor National Park’s forests. Illegal logging accounts for up to 10 percent of global timber trade.A source in Cambodia who asked not to be named out of concern about safety says it’s widely accepted, but rarely discussed, that rogue Cambodian military units are heavily involved in illegal logging throughout the country. “Military-connected cartels linked to illegal logging crimes operate with impunity,” the source told National Geographic.The Cambodian Ministry of National Defense and the National Press Room did not respond to requests for comment about these allegations.Funds generated from those activities—estimated to be worth hundreds of millions of dollars a year—are said by the source to support the ruling party.“In deeply corrupt countries such as Russia, Laos, and Cambodia, illicit timber extraction has become an important part of the state management system,” says Denis Smirnov, a consultant with more than 20 years experience in forest conservation, including ten years as head of WWF-Russia’s Amur-Heilong Ecoregion forest program. He now specializes in illegal logging and deforestation in Cambodia. “When government agencies are involved, you’re not protected.”For example, in the Bajo Aguan land conflict in Honduras, in which environmental campaigners clashed with companies converting forests to palm oil plantations, between 90 and 120 protestors were killed from 2010 to 2013. According to Human Rights Watch, only seven of those deaths resulted in a trial, and none ended in convictions. Globally, “the vast majority of these crimes appear to go unpunished,” says Billy Kyte.Kyte uses the word “appear” because information is thin. “There’s no available data on impunity rates, as this is a research task that would require global networks of people getting information directly from prosecutors’ offices in every country,” he says. “It is a herculean task to do this globally.”Nevertheless, with pro bono help from in-country law firms, Kyte and colleagues are working to identify best practices for ensuring accountability for killings in Honduras as well as Colombia, Brazil, Peru, Costa Rica, and Uruguay.For now, criminals can be brazen. In December 2015, illegal loggers dragged mock-up coffins bearing the names of Peruvian forestry inspectors through the streets of Iquitos—a spectacle meant to send a warning following recent crackdowns involving shipments of Peruvian Amazon timber to the U.S.And earlier last year, Darong, one of the two Cambodians murdered in Preah Vihear Protected Forest last November, received a call from the soldier who was later arrested in connection with his shooting. The man had said he would shoot Darong if he continued to confiscate illegal logging equipment.“This is a very dangerous job,” Darong said at the time. “I’m worried that it will take the death of a patrol team member before the dangers of our work will be taken seriously.”Indigenous people who protest illegal logging or seizures of their land are frequent victims. Global Witness found that of the 116 people killed defending territory in 2014, 47 were from indigenous communities.The criminals often target community leaders—a strategy aimed at spreading fear and silencing people. In September 2015 in the Philippines, the paramilitary group Magahat-Bagani Forces allegedly set fire to a community building and told residents to leave or face a massacre. According to numerous media sources and human rights groups, Magahat-Bagani and other paramilitary groups work with the Philippines’ military to acquire indigenous lands for mining.The Observers, an eyewitness site run by France 24, an international news television channel based in Paris, reports that most villagers escaped unharmed, but according to residents, men from Magahat-Bagani singled out three villagers, including a teacher, a tribal leader, and an indigenous rights activist, all of whom were involved with protesting conversion of local lands for mining.The schoolteacher was later found dead in one of his classrooms, while Observers, Global Witness, and other news sources say that the other two men were gunned down in front of community members. Soldiers from the military’s 36th infantry battalion were allegedly in town that day but are said to have done nothing to stop the violence.These Cambodian rangers are on the lookout for timber thieves. Between 2002 and 2014, criminals killed more than 950 forest defenders around the world.Such crimes are not confined to the Philippines. In Latin America especially, says Jeremy Radachowsky, WCS’s director of Mesoamerica and the Western Caribbean, “park staff become afraid to push for enforcement, prosecutors become afraid of investigating, and even judges are threatened and intimidated. In many cases, threats are also combined with some kind of bribe, making it very difficult for someone to say no.”In Brazil’s eastern Amazon rain forest, one leader of the Ka’apor indigenous community recently told the nonprofit group Survival International, “There have been constant death threats against us [by illegal loggers] for a long time. Now they’re even killing to intimidate us. We don’t know what to do, because we have no protection. The state does nothing.”But Mônica Machado Carneiro, an expert from the press office of FUNAI, the Brazilian governmental body responsible for indigenous peoples’ affairs, said in an email that FUNAI and other government institutions are aware of the situation and are actively working to reduce illegal logging and prevent crimes against indigenous people.The U.S., Europe, and Australia have enacted legislation aimed at combating illegal timber imports, but other countries with large appetites for timber—including Japan and China—have weak provisions. In China, for instance, Global Witness reports that the government is not playing an active role in monitoring companies working in the forest sector and does not have legislation specifically prohibiting the import of illegal timber.“So far, I don’t think there’s enough pressure to get China to care about this,” Pattanavibool says. “It's causing serious problems in other countries, but they don’t see that link.”“Without international and market pressure, nothing will change,” Smirnov adds.For now, individual forest defenders often remain one of the only obstacles between illegal loggers and stolen trees. “They’re doing all of humanity a huge favor by putting their lives on the line,” Radachowsky says.In Cambodia, Phet Sophoan says that as soon as his wound heals, he plans to return to the forest. Likewise, Yuri Melini, an activist in Guatemala who has been shot seven times, continues his work ensuring the rights of indigenous communities.These courageous people know the risks. “I am afraid, I have fear, but my fear won’t make me be quiet,” José Cláudio Ribeiro da Silva, an activist in Brazil, said in a TedX talk in 2011, shortly before masked gunmen fatally shot him and his wife. “As long as I have the power to walk, I will be denouncing all of those who are harming the forest.”Read more stories about wildlife crime and exploitation on Wildlife Watch. Send tips, feedback, and story ideas to ngwildlife@natgeo.com.",
"Wallace’s giant bee (Megachile pluto) has a wingspan of 2.5 inches and large jaws, almost like those of a stag beetle, which it uses to scoop up tree resin to line its nests.The world’s largest bee may also be the planet’s most elusive. First discovered in 1859 by the prominent scientist Alfred Russel Wallace, researchers could not locate it again, and it was presumed extinct.But Wallace’s giant bee (Megachile pluto) was not gone. In 1981, an entomologist named Adam Messer searched and found it on three islands in Indonesia, on an archipelago called the North Moluccas. He collected a specimen and wrote about his discovery in 1984.Now, for the first time, it has been photographed and filmed alive in the wild, by a team including nature photographer Clay Bolt. Meanwhile, in the last year, two specimens of the insect have been sold on eBay for thousands of dollars, raising fears about its continued survival.The bee, which grows up to an inch and a half long with a wingspan of 2.5 inches, has large mandibles that almost look like those of a stag beetle. It uses them to scrape sticky resin off trees to build burrows within termite nests, where females raise their young. Like other bees, it feeds on nectar and pollen.Messer wrote in 1984 that it remains rare in its range, and as this solitary bee lives only in aerial termite mounds, it isn’t exactly easy to find. It was collected in 1991 by a French researcher, though not filmed or photographed at that time.Bolt and trip member Eli Wyman, a biologist at Princeton, were overjoyed to find the bee on an expedition in January. One of the most notable things about the bee, a female, was the sound of her wings: a “deep, slow thrum that you could almost feel as well as hear,” Bolt says.Wyman says he could feel the displacement of air as she flew by. “Such an incredible, tangible experience from an animal that had only lived in my imagination for years,” he adds.The original specimen of Wallace's giant bee, collected by Alfred Russel Wallace.Many have become intrigued by the insect, including Nicolas Vereecken, an entomologist and ecologist at the University of Brussels. He studies bee diversity and was naturally interested to see the world’s largest. Over a decade ago, he sought out a specimen collected by Wallace himself, housed at Oxford Natural History Museum.That only made him want to learn more. Early last year, at Naturalis Biodiversity Center in the Netherlands, he stumbled across a specimen collected in 1991 by a French researcher named Roch Desmier de Chenon. (The man was thought to be dead by many in France, but Vereecken found to his surprise and joy that de Chenon is alive, and living in Melbourne, Australia.)The very same day, Vereecken discovered that a collector was selling a specimen of Megachile pluto online, on eBay—it eventually sold for $9,100. Later in 2018, the same collector sold another for a couple thousand dollars. The bee, it seemed, was very much still around.Vereecken is alarmed that this insect has been sold online—and it’s possible that more commerce is taking place through less visible channels. He described these sales in a study published in December in the Journal of Insect Conservation.This male Andrena perplexa was caught in Maryland on May 16.It’s currently legal for this species to be sold across borders, as the animal is not protected by the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species, which governs international trade in threatened species. Wallace’s giant bee is currently only considered “vulnerable” by the International Union for Conservation of Nature, which sets the conservation statuses of animals around the world. Vereecken and others think it should be classified as endangered, at the very least, considering how rare it is and that its range is almost certainly smaller than originally thought. Vereecken is pushing to change its status, though doing so will require more study.Wallace's giant bee is also threatened by deforestation and habitat loss. The report of the discovery comes shortly after the publication of a worldwide study showing that insect species are in decline around the world.Bolt traveled to Indonesia with Wyman, Australian biologist Simon Robson, and writer Glen Chilton in January. After five days of fruitlessly searching termite mounds in trees during the rainy season, the team had begun to feel a bit discouraged. They were about to call it a day, Bolt says, when they searched one last nest—which had a resiny hole within.After several members of the party climbed up to take a took, it became clear there was a bee in the hole. They put a collection tube at the exit, and a full-sized female Wallace’s giant bee crawled out.“We yelled and screamed and hugged each other,” Robson says. After photographing and filming it, they let it go and it returned to the nest. Unlike some of its relatives, the bee seemed “very relaxed” and non-aggressive, Bolt adds.Roch Desmier de Chenon, who is now 80, was working for the Indonesian Oil Palm Research Institute in 1991 when he decided to search for Wallace's giant bee on the island of Halmahera. Locals, some of whom were familiar with the bee, guided him to a particular tree where the insects collect sap. He says over the course of his research he saw about 20 to 30 of the giants, though he only collected one."I was very happy to find it because I knew it was a big discovery," de Chenon says, but he didn't publish his work, in part because he feared that collectors would use the information for nefarious purposes. He now regrets not publishing his finding.Indeed, on the one hand, publicizing the discovery of the insect could seem like a risk, considering that it has been sold online, says Robin Moore, with Global Wildlife Conservation, which helped organize the trip. But in reality, unscrupulous collectors already know that it exists.Thus, promoting its discovery and specialness could help the local government and various stakeholders get behind its protection.“If we don’t do anything, it [may] just be collected and slip into obscurity,” Bolt says.",
"Monarch butterflies winter in the Chincua Mountains in Mexico, and like many other insects, they have declined due to land-use changes.Rocky Mountain locusts once gathered in such large numbers that they blotted out the sun over the Great Plains, rivaling the famous bison herds in size and appetite. In the summer of 1875, for example, a swarm of around 10 billion locusts took nearly a week to pass through Plattsmouth, Nebraska.But in the following decades, ranchers and homesteaders developed special areas of the prairie where they bred. Only 27 years later, the last living specimens were collected on the Canadian prairie. They went extinct shortly thereafter, dealing a blow to the ecosystem, as they provided food for countless insectivores.New research shows that large-scale declines in insects, while perhaps less dramatic, are by no means a thing of the past—and that insects may be more vulnerable than we thought. A study published recently in the journal Biological Conservation made headlines for suggesting that 40 percent of all insect species are in decline and could die out in the coming decades.“There is reason to worry,” says lead author Francisco Sánchez-Bayo, a researcher at the University of Sydney in Australia. “If we don't stop it, entire ecosystems will collapse due to starvation.”The paper, the first global survey of research on insect populations around the world, singles out a few groups of critters that are particularly threatened: moths and butterflies; pollinators like bees; and dung beetles, along with other insects that help decompose feces and detritus. (Related: Without bugs, we might all be dead.)The study follows several high-profile papers on insect declines that shocked even experts in the field. In October 2017 a group of European researchers found that insect abundance (as measured by biomass) had declined by more than 75 percent within 63 protected areas in Germany—over the course of just 27 years.Bees and similar creatures pollinate more than a third of our food crops, meaning significant declines in their numbers could affect agriculture.A year later, two researchers published a paper in the Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences suggesting that within a relatively pristine rainforest in Puerto Rico, the biomass of insects and other arthropods like spiders had fallen between 10- and 60-fold since the 1970s.Most of the relevant data comes from Europe, and to a lesser extent the United States, but the rest of the world remains woefully understudied, says David Wagner, an ecologist at the University of Connecticut who wasn’t involved in the paper.The study found that half of the moth and butterfly species studied are in decline, with one-third threatened with extinction, and the numbers for beetles are almost exactly the same. Meanwhile, nearly half of surveyed bees and ants are threatened. Caddisflies are among the worst off—63 percent of species are threatened, likely due in part to the fact that they lay their eggs in water, which makes them more vulnerable to pollution and development.There are a number of reasons why these animals are in trouble, and there’s no single smoking gun, Wagner says. “I’m afraid the answer is that it’s death by a thousand cuts.”Dung beetles, among the most imperiled insects, play an important role in recycling nutrients and processing animal waste.Factors behind the decline include, perhaps foremost among them, habitat changes wrought by humans, such as deforestation, and conversion of natural habitats for agriculture. In Europe and North America, the decline of small family farms, known for open pastures, hedgerows, and other areas where “weedy” plants like wildflowers can grow—areas that are perfect for insects—has certainly played a part, Wagner adds, as has the draining of wetlands and swamps.Along with agriculture comes the use of chemicals like herbicides, fungicides, and pesticides. Insecticides, unsurprisingly, hurt non-target species, and neonicotinoids have been implicated in the worldwide decline of bees. Pesticides may play a role in one-eighth of the species’ declines featured in the study. (Related: 9 ways you can help bees and other pollinators at home.)Climate change undoubtedly plays a big role as well, especially extremes of weather such as droughts, which are likely to increase in intensity, duration, and frequency in the future, Wagner says. Other factors include invasive species, parasites, and diseases.This tropical jewel moth, Acraga coa, is found mostly in Central America. Jewel moths undergo a spectacular transformation: from translucent larvae covered in protective goo to vibrant fuzzy fliers.Insects serve as the base of the food web, eaten by everything from birds to small mammals to fish. If they decline, everything else will as well, Sánchez-Bayo explains.They also provide invaluable “services” to humanity, including plant pollination, says John Losey, an entomologist at Cornell University. About three-fourths of all flowering plants are pollinated by insects, as well as the crops that produce more than one-third of the world’s food supply.“No insects equals no food, [which] equals no people,” says Dino Martins, an entomologist at Kenya’s Mpala Research Centre and a National Geographic Explorer.Butterflies like this European skipper are important for pollinating flowering crops and other plants.Another service: waste disposal and nutrient cycling. Without insects like dung beetles and decomposers breaking down and removing animal and plant waste, “the results would be unpleasant,” says Timothy Schowalter, an entomologist at Louisiana State University.So just how dire is the situation for insects? Ultimately, while it’s concerning, “we don’t really have the information yet to answer [that] question,” Wagner says. That’s mainly due to a lack of long-term studies, but insect abundance is also tough to study. Many of these animals have boom-or-bust life cycles, which can take advantage of prime conditions to explode. However, they're also highly sensitive to fluctuations in weather.One definite result of recent studies is increased interest and funding for long-term research, Wagner says. Such attention could help prevent extinctions like the loss of the Rocky Mountain locust.“Even insects that can seem very abundant can disappear over a short period of time,” Schowalter says. “But unless somebody is watching or concerned, nobody [will] prevent that.”",
"When North Atlantic right whales migrate along North America’s eastern seaboard, they run a gantlet of fishing lines in their path. Today 83 percent of the population shows signs of entanglement, a leading cause of death for this endangered species. Fishing for crab and lobster involves placing traps (also called pots) on the ocean floor and marking the spot with a surface buoy that’s connected to the traps with a sturdy line. But the lines routinely harm whales; they cut into flesh and impede the whales’ diving, surfacing for air, and feeding. To CT Harry of the International Fund for Animal Welfare, a remedy seems clear: “Fishing without vertical lines is what’s going to save this species.”",
"Other people’s cell phones were among the most annoying technologies in a National Geographic online survey.Picture yourself at a crowded airport departure gate. Your flight is 20 minutes late, although the illuminated sign still says On Time.The woman on your left is noisily eating something that smells awful. The overhead TV is tuned to a celebrity gossip show, a relentless stream of Bieber after Gwyneth after Miley, plus countless Kardashians. The man to your right is still braying into his cell phone, and the traveler next to him is preparing to kill time with … wait, is that a toenail clipper?Unless you are saintly or unconscious, a few things in that description—or many things, or all the things—are likely to really bug you. We know an annoyance when we experience it. But from a scientific perspective, just what makes something annoying? Are some things universally annoying, while others are specific to an individual? And does research offer any advice for preventing life’s annoyances from making our heads explode?The answers to those questions are: We don’t know, we don’t know, and no.Annoyance may well be the most widely experienced and least studied of all human emotions. On what do I base that assertion? About a decade ago, fellow journalist Flora Lichtman and I made that claim in a book called Annoying: The Science of What Bugs Us—and in the intervening years, no one has challenged us.After we noted the lack of studies on this topic, did scholars step up to the plate? Did even one university create a Department of Annoyance Science … endow a Distinguished Chair for Continuing Research Into Annoyance … or offer a major in annoying studies? No. Nothing. Nada. Zilch.It’s not as if the proliferation of things that drive us crazy has slowed in the past 10 years. Quite the opposite. Consider the explosive, ineluctable growth of Twitter: Once a seemingly benign social media platform, it now intrudes on every sphere of existence, tempting us to address matters we should rightly have no interest in. There’s the pandemic of social media influencers, the unwelcome bounty of robocalls, and the invasive assault of personalized and pop-up ads. There’s my personal favorite at the moment: electric scooters, threatening the well-being of pedestrians when the contraptions are moving and forming sidewalk stumbling hazards when they’re parked. And the list goes on and on: See responses to National Geographic’s online survey about what annoys us below.The most annoying technology Robocalls … Pop-up ads … Selfiesticks … Other people’s cell phones … Electric scooters … Captchas (typing symbols to prove you’re not a robot) … Virtual assistants like Alexa, Echo, Siri … “Everything after the wheel.”The most annoying noise Buzzing insects … Barking dogs … Leaf blowers … Open-mouthed chewing … Car alarms … People singing really badly … Construction … Entitled people screaming … Knuckles cracking … Loud neighbors … “Being told no.”The most annoying people Fakers … Telemarketers who don’t stop at the first NO … TSA agents ... Line cutters … Narcissists … Low talkers … Celebrities … Bigots.The most annoying popular expressions LOL … Cray cray … Lean in … Impactful … Man up … My bad … Fake news … Could care less … Woke … “It is what it is.”The most annoying foods Stinky cheese … Okra … Pizza with pineapple … Lite beer … Cilantro … Black licorice … “Pumpkin-spiced anything.”What makes something annoying? Our analysis came up with three qualities that seem essential.First: It must be noxious without being physically harmful. A housefly buzzing around your head is unpleasant, but it won’t kill you.Second: It must be unpredictable and intermittent. The loud ticking of an alarm clock or the odor of a cat litter box may at first be annoying, but with constant exposure over time, it ceases to be noticeable. Psychologists’ term for this gradual tolerance of a stimulus is habituation. Yet when an unpleasant noise or smell comes and goes, it becomes annoying each time it shows up.The intermittent nature of annoyances makes them hard (if not impossible) to anticipate and thus to prepare a defense against. If you know you’re going to be stuck in traffic, you might be able to take it in stride or bring along a distraction. But when the slowdown is unexpected, it gets to you before you can stop yourself.Third and finally: To be truly annoying, something has to persist for an uncertain period of time. A flight that’s delayed an hour is a bother, but tolerable, so long as it really is just an hour. A flight that’s delayed and delayed and delayed, with no explanation and no end in sight, is excruciatingly annoying.Now it could be that you read that last paragraph and said to yourself, Wait a minute—a delayed flight isn’t that annoying. If I have a good book to read, I don’t mind waiting in an airport. That speaks to another key feature of annoyance: It’s “highly context-​specific,” says Russell Shilling, the American Psychological Association’s chief scientific officer. “There is a lot of variability between individuals and cultures.” For example: The same kind of intermittent, unexplained delays that might exasperate airline passengers are just part of the job for a pilot.As for an example of annoyances varying by culture: If a U.S. family visits a beach with only one other family present, they’ll tend to throw down their towels a discreet distance away. In some Mediterranean countries, plopping down right next door is the norm, but that would cause many Americans to seethe.Shilling says individual variability is one reason it’s so hard to tease out the universal properties of annoyances. But that individuality may be useful in certain settings. A psychiatrist friend of mine notes that while her patients may be reluctant to talk about their private dark thoughts, they have no problem railing about the people and situations that annoy them. Encouraging people to share their annoyances could be an easier way to open a window into their psyches.An intriguing thing about annoyances is how they appear to change over time. A decade ago, our research led us to conclude that one of the most annoying things in the world was listening to someone else’s loud cell phone conversation. We hypothesized that the reason it was so annoying is that our brains are naturally predisposed to painting a complete picture of reality, but when you only hear half of a conversation, that’s not possible.Then, cell phone conversations seemed annoying only to the people not on the phone. Today it’s the call recipients that seem to be getting annoyed. I’m not talking about receiving a robocall. I’m talking about the 20-something who recently told me that an unexpected call, even from a close friend, is annoying. The thinking seems to be, Why call when a text will do? Or even, You should have texted to ask if you could call …If there are some things in life that are universally annoying, human physiology may provide clues to help us define them. We have a variety of reflexes that kick in to protect us from truly dangerous stimuli. Gagging could prevent us from ingesting something that’s potentially poisonous. The blink reflex protects our eyeball if an object is heading toward it. There’s even something called the middle-ear muscle reflex that protects our eardrums from damage from truly loud noises.The reason someone with a cloying cologne is annoying may derive from the gag reflex. Likewise our response to a vuvuzela, that deafening plastic horn, may be a vestige of our natural protections from any loud noise.Another place to look for clues to the fundamental nature of annoyance is to study people with conditions that make them particularly prone to annoyances. Just as studying people with hypercholesterolemia—dangerously high cholesterol—led to the first drugs for lowering cholesterol, so might studying people with the disorder misophonia lead to ways to help keep us from becoming annoyed.According to the National Institutes of Health’s Genetic and Rare Diseases Information Center, people with misophonia have an extreme emotional response to sounds that others find innocuous. Just hearing someone breathe or yawn or chew a potato chip can generate severe agitation in susceptible individuals. If researchers find more ways to calm those people, there may be some benefit for all of us.In the decade since the book came out, I’ve thought a lot about what makes people, things, and situations annoying, and what any of us might do to inoculate ourselves against becoming annoyed. The answer’s actually surprisingly simple: All you have to do is",
"All of us are descended from migrants. Our species, Homo sapiens, did not evolve in Lahore, where I am writing these words. Nor did we evolve in Shanghai or Topeka or Buenos Aires or Cairo or Oslo, where you, perhaps, are reading them.Even if you live today in the Rift Valley, in Africa, mother continent to us all, on the site of the earliest discovered remains of our species, your ancestors too moved—they left, changed, and intermingled before returning to the place you live now, just as I left Lahore, lived for decades in North America and Europe, and returned to reside in the house where my grandparents and parents once did, the house where I spent much of my childhood, seemingly indigenous but utterly altered and remade by my travels.None of us is a native of the place we call home. And none of us is a native to this moment in time. We are not native to the instant, already gone, when this sentence began to be written, nor to the instant, also gone, when it began to be read, nor even to this moment, now, which we enter for the first time and which slips away, has slipped away, is irrevocably lost, except from memory.Recent migration waves have inspired many art and photography projects. Tom Kiefer made images of water jugs (shown here) and other items that migrants left behind at the U.S.-Mexico border. To reflect migrants’ “hope for a better life,” Kiefer calls the photo project “El Sueño Americano”—The American Dream.To be human is to migrate forward through time, the seconds like islands, where we arrive, castaways, and from which we are swept off by the tide, arriving again and again, in a new instant, on a new island, one we have, as always, never experienced before. Over the course of a life these migrations through the seconds accrue, transform into hours, months, decades. We become refugees from our childhoods, the schools, the friends, the toys, the parents that made up our worlds all gone, replaced by new buildings, by phone calls, photo albums, and reminiscences. We step onto our streets looking up at the towering figures of adults, we step out again a little later and attract the gazes of others with our youth, and later still with our own children or those of our friends—and then once more, seemingly invisible, no longer of much interest, bowed by gravity.We all experience the constant drama of the new and the constant sorrow of the loss of what we’ve left behind. It is a universal sorrow and one so potent that we seek to deny it, rarely acknowledging it in ourselves, let alone in others. We’re encouraged by society to focus only on the new, on acquisition, rather than on the loss that is the other thread uniting and binding our species.We move through time, through the temporal world, because we are compelled to. We move through space, through the physical world, seemingly because we choose to, but in those choices there are compulsions as well. We move when it is intolerable to stay where we are: when we cannot linger a moment longer, alone in our stifling bedroom, and must go outside and play; when we cannot linger a moment longer, hungry on our parched farm, and must go elsewhere for food. We move because of environmental stresses and physical dangers and the small-mindedness of our neighbors—and to be who we wish to be, to seek what we wish to seek.Ours is a migratory species. Humans have always moved. Our ancestors did, and not linearly, like an army advancing out of Africa in a series of bold thrusts, but circuitously, sometimes in one direction, then in another, borne along by currents both without and within. Our contemporaries are moving—above all from the countryside to the cities of Asia and Africa. And our descendants will move too. They will move as the climate changes, as sea levels rise, as wars are fought, as one mode of economic activity dies out and gives way to another.The power of our technology, its impact on our planet, is growing. Consequently the pace of change is accelerating, giving rise to new stresses, and our nimble species will use movement as part of its response to these stresses, as our great-grandmothers and great-grandfathers did, as we are designed to do.And yet we are told that such movement is unprecedented, that it represents a crisis, a flood, a disaster. We are told that there are two kinds of humans, natives and migrants, and that these must struggle for supremacy.We are told not only that movement through geographies can be stopped but that movement through time can be too, that we can return to the past, to a better past, when our country, our race, our religion was truly great. All we must accept is division. The division of humanity into natives and migrants. A vision of a world of walls and barriers, and of the guards and weapons and surveillance required to enforce those barriers. A world where privacy dies, and dignity and equality alongside it, and where humans must pretend to be static, unmoving, moored to the land on which they currently stand and to a time like the time of their childhood—or of their ancestors’ childhoods—an imaginary time, in which standing still is only an imaginary possibility.Such are the dreams of a species defeated by nostalgia, at war with itself, with its migratory nature and the nature of its relationship to time, screaming in denial of the constant movement that is human life.Perhaps thinking of us all as migrants offers us a way out of this looming dystopia. If we are all migrants, then possibly there is a kinship between the suffering of the woman who has never lived in another town and yet has come to feel foreign on her own street and the suffering of the man who has left his town and will never see it again. Maybe transience is our mutual enemy, not in the sense that the passage of time can be defeated but rather in the sense that we all suffer from the losses time inflicts.A greater degree of compassion for ourselves might then become possible, and out of it, a greater degree of compassion for others. We might muster more courage as we swim through time, rather than giving in to fear. We might collectively be able to be brave enough to recognize that our individual endings are not the ending of everything and that beauty and hope remain possible even once we are gone.Accepting our reality as a migratory species will not be easy. New art, new stories, and new ways of being will be needed. But the potential is great. A better world is possible, a more just and inclusive world, better for us and for our grandchildren, with better food and better music and less violence too.The city nearest you was, two centuries ago, almost unimaginably different from that city today. Two centuries in the future it is likely to be at least as different again. Few citizens of almost any city now would prefer to live in their city of two centuries ago. We should have the confidence to imagine that the same will be true of the citizens of the world’s cities two centuries hence.A species of migrants at last comfortable being a species of migrants. That, for me, is a destination worth wandering to. It is the central challenge and opportunity every migrant offers us: to see in him, in her, the reality of ourselves.",
"Three waves of immigrants settled prehistoric Europe. The last, some 5,000 years ago, were the Yamnaya, horse-riding cattle herders from Russia who built imposing grave mounds like this one near Žabalj, Serbia.The idea that there were once “pure” populations of ancestral Europeans, there since the days of woolly mammoths, has inspired ideologues since well before the Nazis. It has long nourished white racism, and in recent years it has stoked fears about the impact of immigrants: fears that have threatened to rip apart the European Union and roiled politics in the United States.Now scientists are delivering new answers to the question of who Europeans really are and where they came from. Their findings suggest that the continent has been a melting pot since the Ice Age. Europeans living today, in whatever country, are a varying mix of ancient bloodlines hailing from Africa, the Middle East, and the Russian steppe.The evidence comes from archaeological artifacts, from the analysis of ancient teeth and bones, and from linguistics. But above all it comes from the new field of paleogenetics. During the past decade it has become possible to sequence the entire genome of humans who lived tens of millennia ago. Technical advances in just the past few years have made it cheap and efficient to do so; a well-preserved bit of skeleton can now be sequenced for around $500.The result has been an explosion of new information that is transforming archaeology. In 2018 alone, the genomes of more than a thousand prehistoric humans were determined, mostly from bones dug up years ago and preserved in museums and archaeological labs. In the process any notion of European genetic purity has been swept away on a tide of powdered bone.Analysis of ancient genomes provides the equivalent of the personal DNA testing kits available today, but for people who died long before humans invented writing, the wheel, or pottery. The genetic information is startlingly complete: Everything from hair and eye color to the inability to digest milk can be determined from a thousandth of an ounce of bone or tooth. And like personal DNA tests, the results reveal clues to the identities and origins of ancient humans’ ancestors—and thus to ancient migrations.Three major movements of people, it now seems clear, shaped the course of European prehistory. Immigrants brought art and music, farming and cities, domesticated horses and the wheel. They introduced the Indo-European languages spoken across much of the continent today. They may have even brought the plague. The last major contributors to western and central Europe’s genetic makeup—the last of the first Europeans, so to speak—arrived from the Russian steppe as Stonehenge was being built, nearly 5,000 years ago. They finished the job.In an era of debate over migration and borders, the science shows that Europe is a continent of immigrants and always has been. “The people who live in a place today are not the descendants of people who lived there long ago,” says Harvard University paleogeneticist David Reich. “There are no indigenous people—anyone who hearkens back to racial purity is confronted with the meaninglessness of the concept.”Yamnaya artifacts from their homeland in Russia and Ukraine include a four-foot-tall anthropomorphic stela from 3000 B.C. featuring axes and horses.Thirty-two years ago the study of the DNA of living humans helped establish that we all share a family tree and a primordial migration story: All people outside Africa are descended from ancestors who left that continent more than 60,000 years ago. About 45,000 years ago, those first modern humans ventured into Europe, having made their way up through the Middle East. Their own DNA suggests they had dark skin and perhaps light eyes.Europe then was a forbidding place. Mile-thick ice sheets covered parts of the continent. Where there was enough warmth, there was wildlife. There were also other humans, but not like us: Neanderthals, whose own ancestors had wandered out of Africa hundreds of thousands of years earlier, had already adapted to the cold and harsh conditions.The first modern Europeans lived as hunters and gatherers in small, nomadic bands. They followed the rivers, edging along the Danube from its mouth on the Black Sea deep into western and central Europe. For millennia, they made little impact. Their DNA indicates they mixed with the Neanderthals—who, within 5,000 years, were gone. Today about 2 percent of a typical European’s genome consists of Neanderthal DNA. A typical African has none.As Europe was gripped by the Ice Age, the modern humans hung on in the ice-free south, adapting to the cold climate. Around 27,000 years ago, there may have been as few as a thousand of them, according to some population estimates. They subsisted on large mammals such as mammoths, horses, reindeer, and aurochs—the ancestors of modern cattle. In the caves where they sheltered, they left behind spectacular paintings and engravings of their prey.DNA recovered from ancient teeth and bones lets researchers understand population shifts over time. As the cost of sequencing DNA has plummeted, scientists at labs like this one in Jena, Germany, have been able to unravel patterns of past human migration.About 14,500 years ago, as Europe began to warm, humans followed the retreating glaciers north. In the ensuing millennia, they developed more sophisticated stone tools and settled in small villages. Archaeologists call this period the Mesolithic, or Middle Stone Age.In the 1960s Serbian archaeologists uncovered a Mesolithic fishing village nestled in steep cliffs on a bend of the Danube, near one of the river’s narrowest points. Called Lepenski Vir, the site was an elaborate settlement that had housed as many as a hundred people, starting roughly 9,000 years ago. Some dwellings were furnished with carved sculptures that were half human, half fish.Bones found at Lepenski Vir indicated that the people there depended heavily on fish from the river. Today what remains of the village is preserved under a canopy overlooking the Danube; sculptures of goggle-eyed river gods still watch over ancient hearths. “Seventy percent of their diet was fish,” says Vladimir Nojkovic, the site’s director. “They lived here almost 2,000 years, until farmers pushed them out.”In Sweden, ancient rock carvings (enhanced with modern red paint) echo cultural shifts brought by migrants—starting with hunter-gatherers who came from Africa in the Ice Age and followed retreating glaciers north. Their DNA is still prevalent, especially in southern Baltic countries.The Konya Plain in central Anatolia is modern Turkey’s breadbasket, a fertile expanse where you can see rainstorms blotting out mountains on the horizon long before they begin spattering the dust around you. It has been home to farmers, says University of Liverpool archaeologist Douglas Baird, since the first days of farming. For more than a decade Baird has been excavating a prehistoric village here called Boncuklu. It’s a place where people began planting small plots of emmer and einkorn, two ancient forms of wheat, and probably herding small flocks of sheep and goats, some 10,300 years ago, near the dawn of the Neolithic period.Within a thousand years the Neolithic revolution, as it’s called, spread north through Anatolia and into southeastern Europe. By about 6,000 years ago, there were farmers and herders all across Europe.It has long been clear that Europe acquired the practice of farming from Turkey or the Levant, but did it acquire farmers from the same places? The answer isn’t obvious. For decades, many archaeologists thought a whole suite of innovations—farming, but also ceramic pottery, polished stone axes capable of clearing forests, and complicated settlements—was carried into Europe not by migrants but by trade and word of mouth, from one valley to the next, as hunter-​gatherers who already lived there adopted the new tools and way of life.But DNA evidence from Boncuklu has helped show that migration had a lot more to do with it. The farmers of Boncuklu kept their dead close, burying them in the fetal position under the floors of their houses. Beginning in 2014, Baird sent samples of DNA extracted from skull fragments and teeth from more than a dozen burials to DNA labs in Sweden, Turkey, the U.K., and Germany.Many of the samples were too badly degraded after spending millennia in the heat of the Konya Plain to yield much DNA. But then Johannes Krause and his team at Germany’s Max Planck Institute for the Science of Human History tested the samples from a handful of petrous bones. The petrous bone is a tiny part of the inner ear, not much bigger than a pinkie tip; it’s also about the densest bone in the body. Researchers have found that it preserves genetic information long after usable DNA has been baked out of the rest of a skeleton. That realization, along with better sequencing machines, has helped drive the explosion in ancient DNA studies.The Boncuklu petrous bones paid off: DNA extracted from them was a match for farmers who lived and died centuries later and hundreds of miles to the northwest. That meant early Anatolian farmers had migrated, spreading their genes as well as their lifestyle.They didn’t stop in southeastern Europe. Over the centuries their descendants pushed along the Danube past Lepenski Vir and deep into the heart of the continent. Others traveled along the Mediterranean by boat, colonizing islands such as Sardinia and Sicily and settling southern Europe as far as Portugal. From Boncuklu to Britain, the Anatolian genetic signature is found wherever farming first appears.Those Neolithic farmers mostly had light skin and dark eyes—the opposite of many of the hunter-gatherers with whom they now lived side by side. “They looked different, spoke different languages … had different diets,” says Hartwick College archaeologist David Anthony. “For the most part, they stayed separate.”Across Europe, this creeping first contact was standoffish, sometimes for centuries. There’s little evidence of one group taking up the tools or traditions of the other. Even where the two populations did mingle, intermarriage was rare. “There’s no question they were in contact with each other, but they weren’t exchanging wives or husbands,” Anthony says. “Defying every anthropology course, people were not having sex with each other.” Fear of the other has a long history.About 5,400 years ago, everything changed. All across Europe, thriving Neolithic settlements shrank or disappeared altogether. The dramatic decline has puzzled archaeologists for decades. “There’s less stuff, less material, less people, less sites,” Krause says. “Without some major event, it’s hard to explain.” But there’s no sign of mass conflict or war.After a 500-year gap, the population seemed to grow again, but something was very different. In southeastern Europe, the villages and egalitarian cemeteries of the Neolithic were replaced by imposing grave mounds covering lone adult men. Farther north, from Russia to the Rhine, a new culture sprang up, called Corded Ware after its pottery, which was decorated by pressing string into wet clay.The State Museum of Prehistory in Halle, Germany, has dozens of Corded Ware graves, including many that were hastily rescued by archaeologists before construction crews went to work. To save time and preserve delicate remains, the graves were removed from the ground in wooden crates, soil and all, and stored in a warehouse for later analysis. Stacked to the ceiling on steel shelves, they’re now a rich resource for geneticists.Bones and artifacts some 7,700 years old found at Aktopraklik, a Neolithic village in northwestern Turkey, offer clues to the early days of agriculture. DNA extracted from the skulls of people buried here has helped researchers trace the spread of early farmers into Europe.Corded Ware burials are so recognizable, archaeologists rarely need to bother with radiocarbon dating. Almost invariably, men were buried lying on their right side and women lying on their left, both with their legs curled up and their faces pointed south. In some of the Halle warehouse’s graves, women clutch purses and bags hung with canine teeth from dozens of dogs; men have stone battle-axes. In one grave, neatly contained in a wooden crate on the concrete floor of the warehouse, a woman and child are buried together.When researchers first analyzed the DNA from some of these graves, they expected the Corded Ware folk would be closely related to Neolithic farmers. Instead, their DNA contained distinctive genes that were new to Europe at the time—but are detectable now in just about every modern European population. Many Corded Ware people turned out to be more closely related to Native Americans than to Neolithic European farmers. That deepened the mystery of who they were.Masked figures at the annual carnival in Ottana, a village on the Italian island of Sardinia, act out human mastery over animals, a theme dating to the early days of domestication. DNA of Europe’s first farmers still dominates the genes of modern Sardinians.One bright October morning near the Serbian town of Žabalj, Polish archaeologist Piotr Włodarczak and his colleagues steer their pickup toward a mound erected 4,700 years ago. On the plains flanking the Danube, mounds like this one, a hundred feet across and 10 feet high, provide the only topography. It would have taken weeks or months for prehistoric humans to build each one. It took Włodarczak’s team weeks of digging with a backhoe and shovels to remove the top of the mound.Standing on it now, he peels back a tarp to reveal what’s underneath: a rectangular chamber containing the skeleton of a chieftain, lying on his back with his knees bent. Impressions from the reed mats and wood beams that formed the roof of his tomb are still clear in the dark, hard-packed earth.“It’s a change of burial customs around 2800 B.C.,” Włodarczak says, crouching over the skeleton. “People erected mounds on a massive scale, accenting the individuality of people, accenting the role of men, accenting weapons. That’s something new in Europe.”It was not new 800 miles to the east, however. On what are now the steppes of southern Russia and eastern Ukraine, a group of nomads called the Yamnaya, some of the first people in the world to ride horses, had mastered the wheel and were building wagons and following herds of cattle across the grasslands. They built few permanent settlements. But they buried their most prominent men with bronze and silver ornaments in mighty grave mounds that still dot the steppes.By 2800 B.C, archaeological excavations show, the Yamnaya had begun moving west, probably looking for greener pastures. Włodarczak’s mound near Žabalj is the westernmost Yamnaya grave found so far. But genetic evidence, Reich and others say, shows that many Corded Ware people were, to a large extent, their descendants. Like those Corded Ware skeletons, the Yamnaya shared distant kinship with Native Americans—whose ancestors hailed from farther east, in Siberia.Within a few centuries, other people with a significant amount of Yamnaya DNA had spread as far as the British Isles. In Britain and some other places, hardly any of the farmers who already lived in Europe survived the onslaught from the east. In what is now Germany, “there’s a 70 percent to possibly 100 percent replacement of the local population,” Reich says. “Something very dramatic happens 4,500 years ago.”Until then, farmers had been thriving in Europe for millennia. They had settled from Bulgaria all the way to Ireland, often in complex villages that housed hundreds or even thousands of people. Volker Heyd, an archaeologist at the University of Helsinki, Finland, estimates there were as many as seven million people in Europe in 3000 B.C. In Britain, Neolithic people were constructing Stonehenge.To many archaeologists, the idea that a bunch of nomads could replace such an established civilization within a few centuries has seemed implausible. “How the hell would these pastoral, decentralized groups overthrow grounded Neolithic society, even if they had horses and were good warriors?” asks Kristian Kristiansen, an archaeologist at the University of Gothenburg in Sweden.A clue comes from the teeth of 101 people living on the steppes and farther west in Europe around the time that the Yamnaya’s westward migration began. In seven of the samples, alongside the human DNA, geneticists found the DNA of an early form of Yersinia pestis—the plague microbe that killed roughly half of all Europeans in the 14th century.Unlike that flea-borne Black Death, this early variant had to be passed from person to person. The steppe nomads apparently had lived with the disease for centuries, perhaps building up immunity or resistance—much as the Europeans who colonized the Americas carried smallpox without succumbing to it wholesale. And just as smallpox and other diseases ravaged Native American populations, the plague, once introduced by the first Yamnaya, might have spread rapidly through crowded Neolithic villages. That could explain both their surprising collapse and the rapid spread of Yamnaya DNA from Russia to Britain.“Plague epidemics cleared the way for the Yamnaya expansion,” says Morten Allentoft, an evolutionary biologist at the Natural History Museum of Denmark, who helped identify the ancient plague DNA.But that theory has a major question: Evidence of plague has only just recently been documented in ancient Neolithic skeletons, and so far, no one has found anything like the plague pits full of diseased skeletons left behind after the Black Death. If a plague wiped out Europe’s Neolithic farmers, it left little trace.Whether or not they brought plague, the Yamnaya did bring domesticated horses and a mobile lifestyle based on wagons into Stone Age Europe. And in bringing innovative metal weapons and tools, they may have helped nudge Europe toward the Bronze Age.When construction of Stonehenge began about 3000 B.C., Britain was inhabited by Neolithic farmers. A millennium later, when it was finished, the Neolithic population had been replaced by descendants of the Yamnaya—perhaps because the latter carried plague.That might not have been the Yamnaya’s most significant contribution to Europe’s development. Their arrival on the continent matches the time linguists pinpoint as the initial spread of Indo-European languages, a family of hundreds that includes most languages spoken from Ireland to Russia to the northern half of India. All are thought to have evolved from a single proto-Indo-European tongue, and the question of where it was spoken and by whom has been debated since the 19th century. According to one theory, it was the Neolithic farmers from Anatolia who brought it into Europe along with farming.Another theory, proposed a century ago by a German scholar named Gustaf Kossinna, held that the proto-Indo-Europeans were an ancient race of north Germans—the people who made Corded Ware pots and axes. Kossinna thought that the ethnicity of people in the past—their biological identity, in effect—could be deduced from the stuff they left behind.“Sharply defined archaeological cultural areas,” he wrote, “correspond unquestionably with the areas of particular people or tribes.”The north German tribe of proto-Indo-Europeans, Kossinna argued, had moved outward and dominated an area that stretched most of the way to Moscow. Nazi propagandists later used that as an intellectual justification for the modern Aryan “master race” to invade eastern Europe.Partly as a result, for decades after World War II the whole idea that ancient cultural shifts might be explained by migrations fell into ill repute in some archaeological circles. Even today it makes some archaeologists uncomfortable when geneticists draw bold arrows across maps of Europe.“This kind of simplicity leads back to Kossinna,” says Heyd, who’s German. “It calls back old demons of blond, blue-eyed guys coming back somehow out of the hell where they were sent after World War II.”Yet ancient DNA, which provides direct information about the biology of ancient humans, has become a strong argument against Kossinna’s theory. First, in documenting the spread of the Yamnaya and their descendants deeper and deeper into Europe at just the right time, the DNA evidence supports the favored theory among linguists: that proto-Indo-Europeans migrated into Europe from the Russian steppe, not the other way around. Second, together with archaeology it amounts to a rejection of Kossinna’s claim that some kind of pure race exists in Europe, one that can be identified from its cultural artifacts.All Europeans today are a mix. The genetic recipe for a typical European would be roughly equal parts Yamnaya and Anatolian farmer, with a much smaller dollop of African hunter-gatherer. But the average conceals large regional variations: more “eastern cowboy” genes in Scandinavia, more farmer ones in Spain and Italy, and significant chunks of hunter-gatherer DNA in the Baltics and eastern Europe.“To me, the new results from DNA are undermining the nationalist paradigm that we have always lived here and not mixed with other people,” Gothenburg’s Kristiansen says. “There’s no such thing as a Dane or a Swede or a German.” Instead, “we’re all Russians, all Africans.”",
"The Romans had a serious trash problem, though by our standards it was good-looking trash. Their problem was amphorae. They needed millions of the curvy clay jars to ship wine, olive oil, and fish sauce around the empire, and often they didn’t recycle their empties. Sometimes they didn’t even bother to pop the cork—it was quicker to saber the neck or the pointy base, drain the thing, then chuck it. In Rome there’s a five-acre, 160-foot-high hill, Monte Testaccio, that consists entirely of shattered amphorae, mostly 18-gallon olive oil jars from Spain. They were tossed out the back of warehouses along the Tiber River. Spanish archaeologists who’ve been digging into the dump believe its rise probably began in the first century A.D., as the empire itself was rising toward its greatest heights.Around that time in Arles, on the Rhône River in what is now southern France, the stevedores did things a bit differently: They threw their empties into the river. Arles in the first century was the thriving gateway to Roman Gaul. Freight from all over the Mediterranean was transferred there to riverboats, then hauled up the Rhône by teams of men to supply the northern reaches of the empire, including the legions manning the German frontier. “It was a city at the intersection of all roads, which received products from everywhere,” says David Djaoui, an archaeologist at the local antiquities museum. Julius Caesar himself had conferred Roman citizenship on the people of Arles as a reward for their military support. In the city center today, on the left bank of the Rhône, you can still see the amphitheater that seated 20,000 spectators for gladiator fights. But of the port that financed all this, and that stretched half a mile or more along the right bank, not much remains—only a shadow in the riverbed, in the form of a thick stripe of Roman trash.Trash to them, not to us. In the summer of 2004 a diver surveying the dump for archaeological riches noticed a mass of wood swelling from the mud at a depth of 13 feet. It turned out to be the aft port side of a 102-foot-long barge. The barge was almost intact; most of it was still buried under the layers of mud and amphorae that had sheltered it for nearly 2,000 years. It had held on to its last cargo and even to a few personal effects left behind by its crew. And through a further series of small miracles, including another intervention by Julius Caesar, it has emerged from the trash to resume its last voyage—safe this time in a brand-new wing of the Musée Départemental Arles Antique.Last June, as restoration experts were rushing to ready the barge for its public debut, I spent a week in Arles in a small stone house overlooking the Rhône. The summer season was not yet in full swing, and away from the tourist hot spots the narrow streets of the town were lonesome. The mistral blew relentlessly. At night I awoke to rattling shutters and the hollow grind of a plastic bottle rolling down the stone quay.From the roof terrace I could look across the river to the quay on the right bank, where on an earlier visit photographer Rémi Bénali and I had picked up two large, rusty, hand-forged nails—small spikes might be a better description. Then as now the quay was empty save for a large shipping container. But for seven months in 2011 that container had served as a hive for the divers and archaeologists who buzzed in and out of the river every day, vacuuming away the mud that covered the Roman barge, hand-sawing it into ten sections, and hoisting them one by one out of the water with a crane. The nails had fallen from one of the dripping timbers, which meant they were roughly contemporary with, and probably similar to, the ones that had attached Jesus to the Cross.Gazing down at the Rhône, which was gray and ill-looking and stirred by shifting, rushing eddies—it’s the most powerful river in France—I tried to imagine wanting to dive into it. I could not. Neither could Luc Long, at first. Long is the archaeologist whose team discovered the barge. He’s been diving in the Rhône for decades, but the first time still haunts him.Boyish at 61, with a Beatle-ish shock of brown hair, Long works for the DRASSM, a French government department tasked with protecting the nation’s underwater patrimony. Long had worked on wrecks all over the Mediterranean when, in 1986, his friend, diver and wreck hunter Albert Illouze, guilt-tripped him into diving in his home river. The Arlésiens turned away from the Rhône centuries ago, Long explained, even before roads and the railway diminished its commercial import. They came to fear it as a source of floods and disease—and he was raised in that tradition. “I had no desire to dive in the Rhône,” he said.Long and Illouze entered the river on a Saturday morning in November, just across from where the antiquities museum is today. The water was around 48 degrees Fahrenheit, foamy and odoriferous—there were sewage outfalls nearby. Long could see no more than three feet in front of him, which for the Rhône was a clear day. Its strong current buffeted and scared him. Gooey streams of algae licked his face. At a depth of around 20 feet, he found himself clinging to a hubcap. It was attached to a truck. Slowly, apprehensively, Long felt his way around to the driver’s side of the cabin. He found a Roman amphora in the driver’s seat.After that, he and Illouze swam over a vast field of amphorae. Long had never seen so many intact ones, and his future opened before him: He’s been mapping the Roman dump ever since. But the Rhône never became pleasant to work in. Long and his divers had to get used to the gloom, the pollutants, and the pathogens. There were rare but unsettling encounters, among the shopping carts and wrecked cars, with giant catfish. As long as eight feet, the beasts would loom from the murk and grab a diver’s swim fin. “When you find yourself being pulled by a flipper,” Long said, “it’s a moment of great solitude. It’s a few seconds that you don’t forget.”For the first 20 years or so, no one paid much attention to what he was doing. In 2004, when his team discovered the barge he named Arles-Rhône 3—he had found evidence of two other boats previously—he had no notion of there ever being enough money available to raise it. He and a colleague sawed a section out of the exposed part, which the colleague analyzed down to matchsticks. In 2007 three younger archaeologists, Sabrina Marlier, David Djaoui, and Sandra Greck, took over the study of Arles-Rhône 3.As they began diving onto the wreck that year, just north of the highway bridge with its thundering current of long-haul trucks, Long proceeded with his survey of the rest of the dump, around 50 yards upstream. Opposite the center of Arles now, he started finding pieces of the town: monumental blocks of stone, including the capital of a Corinthian column, on which he could make out traces of weathering by the mistral. He also started finding statues—a Venus here, a captive Gaul there. Word began to leak out. The French customs police warned Long that antiquities thieves might be watching his operation. When his divers found a life-size statue of Neptune, god of the sea and sailors, they brought it up at night.Before that diving season was out, the same diver who had found Arles-Rhône 3, Pierre Giustiniani, discovered the statue that set the boat on its present course: a marble bust that looked like Julius Caesar. Portraits of Caesar are surprisingly rare. This one might be the only one extant that was sculpted while he was alive—perhaps right after he declared Arles a Roman colony, launching it into long centuries of prosperity.You have to understand, said Claude Sintes, the director of the antiquities museum: Arles is a small town, even a poor town. The locomotive workshop closed in 1984, the rice mill and the paper mill within the past decade. What’s left is mostly tourism. The tourists come in part for Van Gogh, who painted here for a time. But the town sits on minable deposits of the Roman past—you almost can’t sink a shovel into your garden without hitting a Roman stone or tile. The exhibition that Sintes built around the bust of Caesar, after news of it spread around the world, showed that some of that stuff was commercial grade. “The exhibition’s success was astonishing,” Sintes said. “When a modest town like ours got 400,000 visitors, the politicians understood that the economic return was strong.”By the fall of 2010, as the Caesar exhibition was nearing the end of its run, those officials were looking for more culture to invest in: The European Union had designated Marseille and the whole Provence region a 2013 European Capital of Culture. Arles wanted in on that promotional action. Suddenly nine million euros became available to build a new wing on Sintes’s museum and put a Roman barge into it. There was just one catch. The project would need to be completed by 2013.That sounds like enough time unless you know about ancient wood and about the Rhône. Mud had protected the wood of Arles-Rhône 3 from microbial decay, but water had dissolved the cellulose and filled the wood’s cells, leaving the whole boat soft and spongy. “The wood was held up only by water,” said Francis Bertrand, director of ARC-Nucléart, a restoration and conservation workshop in Grenoble. “If the water were to evaporate, the whole thing would collapse.” The solution was to bathe the wood for months in polyethylene glycol, then freeze-dry it—gradually infusing it with the polymer before removing the water. But the barge would have to be cut into sections small enough to fit into the freeze-dryers. And the process would take nearly two years.That left only one field season, 2011, to extract the boat from the Rhône. “The project was doomed to fail,” said Benoît Poinard, a professional diver and the site foreman. The gloomy premonition had come to him even before he got stuck briefly under the boat one day. Normally, Poinard explained, the Rhône is safe for diving only from late June to October; otherwise the current is too strong. Three or four months would not be enough to excavate Arles-Rhône 3.Then 2011 arrived. It hardly snowed in the Alps that winter; that spring it barely rained. The Rhône’s current was so gentle that Marlier’s team got in the water by early May. The visibility that month reached an almost unheard of five feet. Marlier, who managed her anxiety about diving in the Rhône by never straying from the barge, saw for the first time that she’d been working for four years right next to an abandoned car. Her team worked straight into November, losing only a single week to bad weather—and completed the job. “Two hours after we finished,” Poinard said, “the Rhône became undivable for the whole winter.”Late in the field season, as restorers from ARC-Nucléart were disassembling the bow of the boat on the quay, they found a silver denarius the size of a dime. The boat’s builder had sealed the coin between two planks; it was meant to bring good luck. And it did—2,000 years later.When Arles-Rhône 3 sank, it was carrying 33 tons of building stones. They were flat, irregular slabs of limestone, from three to six inches thick. They had come from a quarry at St. Gabriel, less than ten miles north of Arles, and were probably headed toward a construction site on the right bank or in the Camargue, the marshy farmland south of Arles. The boat was pointed upstream, though, rather than downstream, indicating it had been tied up at the quay when it sank. A flash flood had probably swamped it.As the flood subsided, the cloud of sediment it had kicked up settled out of the water again, draping the barge in a layer of fine clay no more than eight inches thick. In that clay, in contact with the boat, Marlier and her team found the crew’s personal effects. A sickle they’d used to chop fuel for their cooking fire, with a few wood splinters next to the blade. A dolium, or large clay jar, cut in half to serve as a hibachi, with charcoal in the bottom. A plate and a gray pitcher that belonged to the same man—both bore the initials AT. “That’s what’s exceptional about this boat,” said Marlier. “We’re missing the captain at the helm. But otherwise we have everything.” The mast, with its traces of wear from the towropes, is to her the most precious find.To that snapshot of the boat, the nearly 1,200 cubic yards of mud and Roman trash that eventually buried it add a kind of time-lapse image of the commerce that was Arles. In the museum’s dim basement, Djaoui and I walked down long aisles of amphorae, many with their necks sliced off. “All this will have to be studied,” he said, with a trace of ambivalence. The dump is almost too rich; the archaeologists had already placed 130 tons of ceramic sherds back in the riverbed, in the hole left by the boat. I asked Djaoui about the building stones that had started the whole story. They were too heavy for the restored boat, he said; replicas were being used. Djaoui took me out behind the museum. The stones were there, next to a large trash bin, awaiting their own return to the river.",
"Jason De León began his career as a traditional archaeologist. He excavated ancient sites in Mexico, uncovering artifacts that were centuries—if not millennia—old. But as he was finishing his dissertation on stone tools, he found himself increasingly drawn to the digs’ laborers, who told him harrowing tales of crossing the border into the United States, only to be deported.Although he grew up near the border in Texas and California, “I realized I didn’t know anything” about immigration, De León says now. But he thought archaeology could be used to understand the contentious issue.A border fence separates Nogales, Arizona, and Nogales, Mexico.More than five million people have attempted to cross the Sonoran Desert since 2000. De León’s research reveals how that migration has changed over time. For instance, in 2009 he began finding black plastic bottles. White jugs were too visible to Border Patrol agents; now migrants carried bottles decorated with pictures of the patron saints of migrants or maps of important landmarks—products of a new industry based on undocumented migration.De León describes his fieldwork as “eclectic.” Some days he walks the trails. On others he might interview migrants at a shelter, safe house, or courthouse—or launch a drone to search for dead bodies. Archaeology is about “trying to understand human behavior in the past through the study of what people leave behind,” he says. “Nobody ever said the past had to be a thousand years ago.”",
"“I am both the mother and the father,” says Rubén España. At 25, he’s a single father, and on the Mexican side of the Gateway to the Americas International Bridge, he holds his two-year-old son, Dylan Fabricio. The pair had spent two-and-a-half months walking and hitching rides from Honduras to Nuevo Laredo, Mexico. They’d been sleeping on a square of cardboard along the edge of the bridge with a hundred or so Hondurans, Cubans, and Venezuelans—waiting to cross into the U.S. to request asylum.Two children sleep on the Gateway to the Americas International Bridge, waiting to be heard on their asylum requests. Migrants often wait days on the bridge to speak with a U.S. officer about their case.Alfredo Hernández stands with his two-year-old son, Axel Alfredo, on the Gateway to the Americas International Bridge. He fled the violence in Honduras, hoping for a better life for himself and his son. “I want him to study. I want to work to give us a future," he says. "I studied through elementary school. I would like him to be a doctor. I want something better for my son.”Maverick County Sheriff Tom Schmerber stands at his desk in Eagle Pass, Texas. He voices concern about current Trump administration policies, including family separation and street stops for immigration status requests. He says, "I can see why people are running away from persecution. Maybe they are just looking for a better life."España heard news of President Trump’s separation policy while he was traveling. “I am scared, but I have to take that risk,” he explains. “Imagine if I am separated from my child, after all that I have fought for and suffered. But most of us take that risk, because we have no other option.” He says even if they separated him from his son, he preferred jail in the United States to deportation to Honduras and a likely death.He’s not alone in his gamble. España is one of tens of thousands of people who come to the U.S. border every month—approximately 50,000 during each of the most recent in 2018—searching for safety and success. Though these numbers were similar to those in 2016, asylum seekers have reported a slow response by officials, claiming only five or ten people are seen each day in some locations, including the Gateway to the Americas International Bridge. The delay means people like España are spending multiple nights sleeping along the side of the bridge, waiting for their turn.Manuel holds an inner tube he plans to use to cross the Rio Grande. The river is a natural border between the U.S. and Mexico, and migrants sometimes swim across the flowing barrier in hopes of building a new life in the U.S.The crawling process is now compounded by a fear of recent Trump administration policies, particularly the decision to separate children from their parents once families reach the border. In recent months, 2,342 children have been separated from 2,206 parents who crossed into the United States. The policy drew criticism from citizens and politicians along much of the political spectrum, and the growing crisis has been at the forefront of a global immigration conversation.Despite the separation policy, parents—including single fathers like España—are lining up to reach the U.S. border. Young men holding infants are scattered down the long line of hopeful immigrants on the bridge. Alfredo Hernández waits with his two-year-old son, Axel Alfredo. Erik, a 25-year-old from Honduras, cradles his one-year-old daughter, Melanie, saying, “We left five months ago. We came via bus, walking, whatever was cheapest.” Daniel Ríos, with his nine-month-old son, Denis, says tearfully, “We hope that they have mercy and that they won’t separate us from our kids. The only thing I have is him, and the only thing he has is me. If they separate me from him, what will happen? It will be worse. I am fleeing to be together with my family.”Four men relax in the living room at the Casa del Migrante Frontera Digna, a shelter created to help migrants before they cross the border into the U.S. Founder José Guadalupe Valdés Alvarado says, "We try to do what we can, nothing more, to help migrants feel safe here in Piedras Negras."Luis German Ruiz and his son, Luis Fernando Ruiz, sit on their bed at the Casa del Migrante Frontera Digna. They left Honduras to escape the violence that had already taken three family members and hope to find asylum in the U.S. Valdés Alvarado, the shelter's founder, worries about the pair being separated once they cross the border, saying, "It is heartbreaking. Imagine the trauma of a child who already believes that he will not see his parents again when he was with them the day before."On one side of the Gateway to the Americas International Bridge, immigrants wait in line to request asylum. On the other, U.S. officers guard the border and call people across for appointments.Farther down the bridge, Venezuelan college students Omar Garillo, his cousin, Yackey Delgado, and Delgado’s wife, Estefany Sánchez, sit and eat fried chicken. In Venezuela, the three students had been part of an anti-government movement at their university. Over the two years they spent protesting the government, they had seen classmates killed by tear-gas grenades, run over by cars, and beaten half to death. They had hidden in classrooms and bathrooms on campus, declaring it a “war zone.”The students talk about Venezuela’s lack of electricity, food, water, sanitary pads, and medicine. Garillo, pointing to his food, says, “This chicken here is worth more than four months of work.” He pulls out a wad of Venezuelan money, declares it worthless, and offers it as a gift. “In telling you this, we are putting ourselves at risk… If the United States doesn’t want to provide us protection, I will never return to Venezuela. I can never return, because if I return they will put me in jail.”Garillo’s fear of being denied entry is not unfounded. If the asylum seekers on the bridge aren’t successful, they may end up being deported—a fate met by the busloads of men who arrive back in Nuevo Laredo, Mexico, each day.Officer Cristal Gómez poses for a portrait while on patrol in Eagle Pass, Texas. She's been working on the force for nearly seven years and has become known for the pink handcuffs she keeps clipped to her belt. She believes the femininity she brings to the job is helpful and says, “I think what women bring is especially being able to deescalate a situation, especially by talking. That is something that we have that most men don’t have.”Francisco Rodríguez Granados stands at the bank of the Río Grande with his nephew Alfredo and niece Estrella Guadalupe. Daily temperatures in Nuevo Laredo can reach 110 degrees in June, and many families spend Sundays cooling off in the river. The region isn't without danger, however, and Granados' 10-year-old grandson drowned in the river in 2014. This visit marked just the second time he had returned since the accident.A man sits on the edge of the Rio Grande, which migrants sometimes swim across to enter the U.S.One of these young men points at the expansive cursive tattoo that wraps around his neck. “These are the names of my daughters, Blanca Daniela and Lucía Liliana,” says José Antonio González. A construction worker from Guanajuato, Mexico, González hoped to find work in the U.S. and send money home to his wife and kids. After swimming across the Rio Bravo, he had entered the mountains in the U.S., where he lasted three days without water before being caught and sent to a detention center.Tattoos mark almost every inch of skin on his arms: dark, tangled lines of eyes and a crown of flowers on one side, the shaded form of a grim reaper on the other, and “La Vida Loca” in cursive on his wrist. Driven from his home and land by poverty and violence, González’s tattoos are a bodily memory, a way of carrying the life he left behind.The International Bridge connects Eagle Pass, Texas, and Piedras Negras, Mexico.Estefany Sanchez sits with her husband, Yackney Delgado, and his cousin, Omar Garillo, on the Gateway to the Americas International Bridge waiting to seek asylum in the U.S. The trio were members of an anti-government movement in Venezuela that protested the country's lack of electricity, water, food, and medicine. Garillo explains the danger of their political actions: "Protesting is a lottery. You don't know if you will return alive."He arrives at Nuevo Laredo’s Tamaulipas Institute for Migrants, a center dedicated to helping those deported from the United States, with 25 other deported men, all glistening with sweat on a morning when temperatures had already reached over 100 degrees. The founder and director of the institute, José Martín Carmona Flores, welcomes the men and tells them, “You are here because you were more skilled, more intelligent, more astute, more resistant, wiser. All of those qualities are required for triumph and success at home and in the family, in society.” Carmona Flores tells them the lessons they learned from crossing the border, getting work, and trying to send money home to their families could be applied to a new and successful life in Mexico.After answering questions from the migrants, he goes back to his office. There, he explains, “They have to value themselves and not think they have arrived here defeated. Why? Because many have died, and the bodies are there to prove it. But they arrived alive and stronger and more resistant, and they should realize what they are capable of, and if they can do it here at home, they are our next leaders, our next bosses.”To see men like González cross the Rio Bravo and enter the U.S. illegally, one only has to go down to the edge of the river in Nuevo Laredo on a Sunday afternoon, when local families swim in the blue-green waters. At the height of the midday heat, when the border patrol changes guards, a group of eight young men cross the river, holding onto a pile of black plastic bags and kicking furiously. They slide onto the muddy U.S. bank in their underwear, pull clothes out of the black bags, get dressed, and disappear into the bushes.Light reflects off the Rio Grande, a natural border between Mexico and the United States, during sunrise. It's not uncommon for migrants to swim across the river into the U.S. to escape violence or economic disaster in their home countries.Crossing into the U.S. is only the beginning of the obstacles for the men and women who chose this route. Some face a heightened risk of exploitation or abuse due to their lack of documentation.Sister Rosemary Welsh—a tall, strong woman with short-cropped hair framing her face—works to protect people in these insecure situations at Casa de Misericordia, a domestic violence shelter, in Laredo, Texas. In its 20 years of existence, the shelter has never turned anyone away—and most of the people served today are undocumented. To answer their needs, the organization works in coordination with other city and state agencies.Welsh parses no words when discussing how she believes the Trump administration has treated immigrants inhumanely. She volunteers in detention centers and has seen firsthand the effects of the new family separation policy. She’d recently been consoling parents who had been separated from their children without any knowledge of where they were or when they would be reunited. Frustrated by the practice and referring to the president, she asks, “What is this he’s got against the immigrant population?” Still, she understands the importance of collaboration.“We have always worked very, very closely with ICE and Border Patrol,” she says. “You cannot be adversarial with these individuals.”Soledad Casas stayed at the shelter for two weeks in 2000 and has been a volunteer ever since. She stands in a storage room full of clothing for those who arrive with nothing and talks about her kids—now 18, 15, 13, and 10 years old. Casas was undocumented when she experienced domestic violence. She says she stayed in that relationship for too long for fear of being deported without her children. The goal of Casa de Misericordia is to give women in Casas’ circumstances a way out and a support system to build a safer, more stable life.About 125 miles to the north in Piedras Negras, Mexico, Father José Guadalupe Valdés Alvarado breaks bread with the migrant community he serves at the shelter he directs. In the early morning, he prays with a group of men over plates of eggs, beans, and tortillas. After the prayer, while the men are eating, he returns to the community kitchen to help the volunteer cooks clean. His main objective at the moment, he says, given the immigration policies of the Trump administration, is to help reunite children separated at the border with their parents.He describes a Guatemalan father he’d recently helped. Deported without his son, who remains detained in the U.S., the father was on his way back to the border to find his child. Most migrants arriving at the shelter had heard something of the separation policy, but they didn’t believe it would happen to them. They believed they would achieve the American dream, he says. “They always bring that illusion and that dream and that is their hope, right? And we are not going to take away hope.”That hope sometimes turns to fear once migrants cross into the U.S. Undocumented immigrants, many of whom have lived and worked along the border for decades, often fear being targeted by law enforcement. Although Texas is known for SB4, a law that allows local officers to enforce federal immigration regulations on behalf of a requesting federal agency and that the ACLU of Texas says “forces local governments and law enforcement agencies to do the work of federal immigration officers,” not all law enforcement members believe in such policies.Across the border from Piedras Negras, in the town of Eagle Pass, Texas, the sheriff’s department doesn’t believe asking immigrants on the street for their papers accomplishes their goal of greater security.Sheriff Tom Schmerber sits behind his desk in a wide-brimmed cowboy hat, the American and Texas flags flanking his workspace and a framed AR-15 on the wall. Before becoming sheriff, Schmerber was a teacher and then a border patrol agent for 26 years. “We are their eyes,” he says of border patrol, “but we are not interested in the immigration status of people walking on the street.”Walking around the jail connected to the police station, Sheriff Schmerber talks about recent national immigration approaches. He voices his disagreement with the Trump administration’s policy of separating parents from children at the border. “It is causing heartache, and the mothers and fathers are somewhere, their kids are somewhere, and it is going to be hard to find the kids,” he says. “How are they going to find those kids? How are they going to get them together?”As for the border wall, he says ranchers, landowners, and people who love swimming and fishing in the river were opposed to it, both because it would separate the border city from Piedras Negras, Mexico, where many people have family, and because it would be ineffective for improving safety. Eyes down and voice low, he sympathizes with immigrants, “They are desperate. People are desperate. We are here. We have got it made. We have a life. Sometimes we forget lives that are harsher.”The International Women's Media Foundation provided support for this project.",
"The border town of Nogales is a popular transit point for migrants to cross from Mexico into Arizona, despite fences like this one.More than five million people were arrested between 2000 and 2013 while trying to cross the border from Mexico into Arizona. A further 6.4 million were apprehended in Texas, California, and New Mexico. Thousands more perished in the furnace-like heat of the Sonoran Desert, their bodies rarely recovered. Yet despite the arduousness of the crossing and the high-tech surveillance systems arrayed against them, most of the survivors will attempt to cross again.Jason De León, an anthropologist and National Geographic Emerging Explorer, grew up in the Rio Grande Valley in Texas. His father is Mexican, his mother is from the Philippines, and he spent his childhood speaking Spanish. For his book, The Land of Open Graves: Living and Dying on the Migrant Trail, he travelled up and down the border, interviewing would-be migrants and the relatives of those who died making the crossing. Their often harrowing stories give a human face to these desperate journeys­—and overturn many of the negative stereotypes used to discredit them.Speaking from the University of Michigan, where he is an assistant professor, he talks about why U.S. border crossing deaths go largely unrecorded while European migrant deaths are headline news; why American economic and drugs policies helped create the crisis; and why he calls the Prevention Through Deterrence program, which funnels migrants towards the Sonora Desert, a “killing machine.”It was a very shocking moment for me, partly because it was the first experience I’d had in the field. It happened in the Mexican border town of Nogales, one of the centers for migrants. Earlier that morning, I had seen this guy, who had just come back from trying to cross the desert. By the middle of the day, he had died in somebody’s front yard. It seems a fairly normal event for the people present. This body is lying there. Somebody finally covers him up, he’s taken away, and then it’s as if it didn’t happen. He’s one of thousands, though the numbers vary according to where you’re counting. If a person dies from things they experienced on the Arizona side and then comes back into Mexico and dies, that’s typically not counted as a border crossing death. But just in Arizona, from 2000 to the beginning of this year, 2,700 sets of human remains have been recovered by law enforcement.The logic of this policy is to make it impossible to cross in urban centers like El Paso, where you used to be able to hop the fence and disappear into a crowd. They have put all of this time, money and energy into making it virtually impossible to do that by funnelling people into less populated, more extreme environments. The thinking has been that the desert can be a weapon of deterrence. If enough people die while crossing, they’ll simply stop coming.At night, “scope trucks” like this one deploy infrared cameras to monitor the U.S./Mexico border in Arizona’s Sonoran Desert.Initially, I thought migrant deaths were unintended consequences. But when I got deeper into the origins of the policy, I discovered that federal documents plainly stated that fatalities were going to increase because of this policy. One document I cite contains a table using migrant deaths as a metric for demonstrating the policy is working. Realizing that some government official was typing this up and recognizing these things, was when I thought: This is a machine that kills people. It isn’t collateral damage. These aren’t unintended consequences. These are direct consequences that, in the initial stages of design, people were thinking about.The Arizona desert has the most species of rattlesnake in North America. And you’ve got all kinds of other venomous animals - tarantulas, Gila monsters, killer bees—and hundreds of miles of empty landscape. There are bandits robbing and killing migrants and a whole series of unsolved murders and shootings of migrants by what looks to be white supremacists. The border patrol have also been implicated in the murder of undocumented migrants over the last 10 years. But most people die from dehydration or exposure or a pre-existing medical condition that becomes exacerbated by exposure to the hostile environment.Thirty miles from the Mexican border, in the Altar Valley in Arizona, “Minutemen” patrol a remote stretch of the Sonoran desert where migrants have abandoned their belongings.The many months and miles I’ve hiked out there, it doesn’t matter how expensive my boots are, how much water I’m carrying, or whether I have a GPS, it’s a place where it’s very difficult to survive. The migrants are wearing $10 sneakers, may be carrying a gallon of water, don’t have a compass or map or anything else to guide them, other than their wits.The Border Patrol spends billions of dollars on security every year, from surveillance cameras to motion sensors, helicopters, drones, and scope trucks with periscopes that can scan the landscape in 360 degrees. At night, they use infrared to pick up heat signatures of people coming through the desert. It’s military-grade technology we use elsewhere in battlefields.Then you have this group of people who don’t have much, except maybe they’re wearing all black to stay less visible during the day, Converse sneakers with carpet on the bottom to hide their footprints, and maybe a rosary and a Bible to bring them the luck they need. All of the technologies they’re using probably cost 20 bucks. But what gets people across is willpower. They are determined to come to the U.S. And if they are caught, they will try again. They look at this as, “Either I stay in my village and watch my children starve, or I keep pushing through until I make it.” Many say, “I have nothing to go back to.”“I have nothing to go back to,” is a common sentiment among migrants, who will often make as many as ten attempts to cross the border. This girl, playing in front of her makeshift home in a shanty town outside Oaxaca, Mexico, may one day join them.This terrain is so remote that if you were to try to put up a wall it would be logistically impossible and prohibitively expensive to try to maintain it. The joke in places like Nogales where they do have a wall is that the city is going to fall into the center of the Earth because there are so many tunnels underneath it. [Laughs] It’s easy for Americans to say, “We’re gonna put up more walls and keep people out.”  But, as you are seeing in the European Union, walls and fences don’t stop people, they just deflect them someplace else. These are folks who are desperate and are going to find a way to get through, no matter what.There are a lot of parallels. The Mediterranean is in many ways like the Arizona desert. People die there, and the bodies disappear because nobody wants to claim them. The big difference with the European crisis is that it is much more visible. If you’re lying on the beach in Lampedusa in your bikini and all of a sudden a bunch of bodies washes up, that’s shocking. Or that photograph of the infant in Turkey, Aylan Kurdi, who became the human face of the migrant tragedy.In Arizona, it happens in the middle of nowhere. There are no people with cameras or folks out there to be shocked. So it keeps going, unseen and mostly unreported. U.S mainstream media does a good job of presenting only things that don’t challenge American idealism. You’re not going to see photos of migrant corpses in the New York Times or L.A. Times. I think the American public is also desensitized to certain types of images. A colleague in Arizona did a study of local news reports about migrant deaths. What he found was that as the number of corpses went up, the news coverage went down. Migrant death became the “new normal.”Fences, like this one stretching through Tohono O’Odham Nation tribal lands in Arizona, have done little to stem the flow of migrants.We tend to generalize about border crossers. Say “undocumented migrant” or “Mexican migrant” and people tend to imagine a young Mexican male. But kids cross, transgender people cross, and many women do, too.Maricela was someone whose body I encountered in the Arizona desert in the summer of 2012. My previous encounters with deceased people in the desert had been mostly bones. But she had been dead for 3-4 days at the most. It was very shocking and disturbing.Maricela had accrued a lot of debt in Ecuador. Her family was living in a shantytown with a dirt floor and plywood walls. She left to provide for her three children, travelling with a people smuggler she was related to. She had kidney issues in Ecuador and that’s probably what killed her. She started suffering from extreme dehydration in the Arizona desert and was abandoned by the smuggler.She was eventually identified by the coroner’s office and I managed to make contact both with the people she was going to join in New York and with her family in Ecuador. I made several visits to both places to try to understand who she was, why was she in the desert, and how her death affected her family.In an online comment about our research in the Huffington Post, one person wrote, “Maybe we should just hang these desiccated corpses from trees so that when migrants see them, they’re gonna know they’re gonna die if they cross this desert.”Politicians use the same language. In the last election cycle, you had Herman Cain, saying, “We’re gonna put up signs saying you’ll be electrified. Don’t come here! This will kill you! ” Donald Trump and Ben Carson speak directly to people who think that if you don’t have U.S. citizenship, your life is of no value.It’s especially acute in Arizona because in the last 15 years five million migrants have come to their backyard. But people aren’t crossing through Arizona because they love the wilderness. They’re coming because of federal policy. We also need to explain how the U.S is invested in keeping Mexico underdeveloped so we can draw cheap labor and flood them with goods we don’t want anymore. We have created the economic problems in Mexico. Americans also consume the drugs coming across the border and supply the weapons for the drug war that has turned Mexico into a battle zone. If we could show how all this stuff is interconnected, it might diminish the stereotypes.I wanted to do something that honoured the migrants and their families who entrusted me with their stories, like Maricela. I felt really conflicted whether to publish a photograph of her corpse but eventually decided I should. This was not just an anonymous corpse I found in the desert and photographed. To show her corpse is to say, “Here is a dead body in the desert. This is her name. This is her family. This is her story.” So when you look at the picture, you can try to imagine that this is a person, not just some negative stereotype.Simon Worrall curates Book Talk. Follow him on Twitter or at simonworrallauthor.com.",
"It was when the body of a long-dead friend surfaced near her front door that Bulu Haldar knew her house was as good as gone.For weeks, the embankment shielding East Dhangmari, in the Khulna district of southwestern Bangladesh, had been threatening to sink into the Pusur River. First, a ferocious storm had ripped into the outer layer of concrete. Then, at the end of 2017, the river had begun eating into the porous earthen wall itself. Locals rushed in sandbags, but that bought only a few days’ respite. When the river finally surged into the cemetery across from Haldar’s garden, disinterring skeletons and contaminating the village’s drinking pools, it filled her one-room hut waist-deep in muddy brown water.“There was nothing else I could do to protect my house,” she said. “We were powerless, like children.”Haldar, a meticulously dressed widow of about 50, had at least had some inkling of what was to come. She’d watched as the nearby Sundarbans, a vast mangrove forest that flanks the village, had retreated, its trees looking increasingly weedy. She’d noted how the water appeared to draw strength from the forest’s weakness. The only surprise, Haldar insisted, is that the village’s earthworks held out for so long. “The trees defended us, but we treated them very badly,” she said. “So now we are all suffering the consequences.”In Bangladesh and the neighboring Indian state of West Bengal, there are thousands of villages like East Dhangmari—places that are losing their natural defenses against climate change just as it is intensifying. The land is paper-flat and crisscrossed by rivers bulging with meltwater from the Himalaya. Cyclones frequently roar in off the Bay of Bengal, sometimes killing thousands. Flooding is pervasive.Some farmers in Bangladesh—a country the size of Iowa with a population of 160 million—refer to their homeland as a divine prank: The soil is fantastically fertile, but you’re always in danger of getting washed away. In 1998 an especially monstrous flood inundated about 70 percent of the country.One thing the region’s coastal communities felt they could always bank on, though, is the Sundarbans, the world’s largest contiguous mangrove forest. Spanning nearly 4,000 square miles on both sides of the Indian-Bangladeshi border, this dense swamp of flood-tolerant trees stands as a green wall, absorbing storm surges and blunting even the worst cyclones. For villagers, the forest is also an abundant source of honey and its waters a source of fish. “The Sundarbans is our mother,” said Joydev Sardar, secretary of the fishermen’s association in Harinagar, Bangladesh. “She protects, feeds, and employs us.”But after years of abuse from man and nature, the mangroves seem to be nearing their limits. Illicit logging, mostly for building materials to house the region’s booming population, has thinned out the periphery of the forest. At the same time, increasing water salinity caused by the encroaching sea is killing off many higher value, storm-stopping tree species, such as the sundari that gives the forest its name. The salinity assault comes from both land and sea: Upstream dams on rivers in India have reduced freshwater flow into the Sundarbans, while sea-level rise caused by climate change is flushing more salt water into the mangroves.“The salinity front is just going up and up and up,” said Mashfiqus Salehin, a professor at Bangladesh University of Engineering and Technology’s Institute of Water and Flood Management. “New areas will salinize, and moderately salinized areas might become unlivable. It’s becoming a big problem.” In the worst-case scenario, in which sea levels rise by more than six feet this century, Bangladesh alone stands to lose some 800 square miles of mangroves in the Sundarbans. The best-case scenario is a loss of roughly 80 square miles. Salehin and other scientists fear even that much might prove disastrous for a country so poor the forest is besieged by human needs.The land itself is disappearing. Without the tangled roots of the mangroves to stabilize it, land erodes into the sea—and with upstream dams trapping river sediment, it’s not replenished as it once was.The islands in India’s Hugli River, in the Ganges estuary on the western edge of the Sundarbans region, illustrate advanced stages of the decay. At least three islands that a century ago were covered in mangroves—Lohachahara, Suparibhanga, and Bedford—have vanished. Others are eroding fast: Sagar Island has shrunk by about 20 square miles since the mid-20th century, even as its population has swollen with new arrivals from its disappearing neighbors. Crop-growing conditions on Sagar have deteriorated so much that residents now survive largely off seasonal labor elsewhere.In some parts of the Sundarbans, the sea is advancing about 200 yards a year. “The people around the Sundarbans will lose a lot,” said Tuhin Ghosh, an associate professor at Jadavpur University in Kolkata. “This is happening now.” But even cities like Kolkata and Dhaka that lie some distance from the vanishing mangroves, he added, will find themselves “extremely exposed to cyclones and storm surges.”In February 2018 part of the embankment that holds back the Chunar River west of East Dhangmari, Bangladesh, collapsed for the third time in a year. Sixteen houses were swept away in what for locals had become an almost routine tragedy. But as the catalog of misfortunes mounted over the following months, even the oldest, most judicious residents knew these were no ordinary crises. Rice yields during the 2018 dry-season harvest were way down—often well under a ton an acre, which pushed up food prices. In many fields, vegetables simply wouldn’t grow in the salty soils.“Because of the water damage, it sometimes seems like only the carpenters have work,” said farmer Bimol Sardar.In the spring of 2018, a disease that has proliferated across some of southern Bangladesh struck this quiet corner of the country. Cholera, thriving in the hotter temperatures and increasingly brackish waters of the Sundarbans, has come roaring back in the swamps in which it was supposedly born. When I visited, the local doctor was overwhelmed.“Almost every one of my patients is here because of water-related diseases that were nowhere near as much of a problem before,” said Shivapada Mondol. “The circumstances are verging on dangerous.” On a stretcher outside his office, a skeletally thin old man retched loudly; the man’s daughter tried to push more fluids into him.Finally, as if to illustrate the impossibility of living in the new Sundarbans, several dozen families pulled up stakes in April and moved to Dhaka, the capital of Bangladesh. No longer able to make much of a living off the land, they opted to join the million to 1.5 million other villagers from southern coastal communities who’ve already relocated to the overloaded city, according to Atiq Rahman, director of the Bangladesh Center for Advanced Studies. The World Bank suggests that by 2050, more than 13 million Bangladeshis—including most of those on the margins of the Sundarbans—might migrate because of climate-related crises. The forecast in West Bengal is similarly alarming.Despite the challenges, some people here remain guardedly optimistic about the future. The governments on both sides of the border have gotten a grip on the worst of the mangrove cutting, heavily punishing offenders, and they’ve learned from past natural disasters. By building more cyclone shelters and deploying up to 150,000 volunteers before major storms strike, Bangladeshi officials have drastically cut death tolls. In even the poorest parts of the Sundarbans, villagers have displayed an impressive capacity for adaptation. As salinity surges, they’ve abandoned rice farming in favor of shrimping.But in the battle to preserve the mangroves—and in the long run, perhaps Bangladesh itself—the difficulties are increasing. Dhaka has green-lit the construction of a large, Indian-backed, coal-fired power station at Rampal, on the edge of the Sundarbans, a move that could pave the way for other polluting industries. China is proposing more dams in the Brahmaputra basin, potentially jeopardizing the mangroves’ remaining freshwater supply. And the climate keeps on changing, bringing ever more erratic rains, storms, and temperature swings.As the troubles mount, some locals wonder: In the land that mangroves built, will climate change be king?“The Sundarbans built this country,” Bulu Haldar said. “Perhaps the Sundarbans”—or the loss of this forested region—“will destroy it.”",
"There are few places on Earth where flooding is not a concern. Any area where rain falls is vulnerable to floods, though rain is not the only cause.A flood occurs when water inundates land that's normally dry, which can happen in a multitude of ways.Excessive rain, a ruptured dam or levee, rapid melting of snow or ice, or even an unfortunately placed beaver dam can overwhelm a river, spreading over the adjacent land, called a floodplain. Coastal flooding occurs when a large storm or tsunami causes the sea to surge inland.Most floods take hours or even days to develop, giving residents time to prepare or evacuate. Others generate quickly and with little warning. So-called flash floods can be extremely dangerous, instantly turning a babbling brook or even a dry wash into rushing rapids that sweep everything in their path downstream.Climate change is increasing the risk of floods worldwide, particularly in coastal and low-lying areas, because of its role in extreme weather events and rising seas. The increase in temperatures that accompanies global warming can contribute to hurricanes that move more slowly and drop more rain, funneling moisture into atmospheric rivers like the ones that led to heavy rains and flooding in California in early 2019.Meanwhile, melting glaciers and other factors are contributing to a rise in sea levels that has created long-term, chronic flooding risks for places ranging from Venice, Italy to the Marshall Islands. More than 670 U.S. communities will face repeated flooding by the end of this century, according to a 2017 analysis; it's happening in more than 90 coastal communities already.People walk on a catwalk in a flooded St. Mark's Square during a period of seasonal high water in Venice, Italy, on October 29, 2018.Floods cause more than $40 billion in damage worldwide annually, according to the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development. In the U.S., losses average close to $8 billion a year. Death tolls have increased in recent decades to more than 100 people a year. In China's Yellow River Valley some of the world's worst floods have killed millions of people.When floodwaters recede, affected areas are often blanketed in silt and mud. The water and landscape can be contaminated with hazardous materials such as sharp debris, pesticides, fuel, and untreated sewage. Potentially dangerous mold blooms can quickly overwhelm water-soaked structures.Residents of flooded areas can be left without power and clean drinking water, leading to outbreaks of deadly waterborne diseases like typhoid, hepatitis A, and cholera. (Learn here about flood preparation and safety tips.)Flooding, particularly in river floodplains, is as natural as rain and has been occurring for millions of years. Famously fertile floodplains such as the Mississippi Valley, the Nile River Valley in Egypt, and the Tigris-Euphrates in the Middle East have supported agriculture for millennia because annual flooding has left tons of nutrient-rich silt deposits behind. Humans have increased the risk of death and damage by increasingly building homes, businesses, and infrastructure in vulnerable floodplains.To try to mitigate the risk, many governments mandate that residents of flood-prone areas purchase flood insurance and set construction requirements aimed at making buildings more flood resistant—with varying degrees of success.Massive efforts to mitigate and redirect inevitable floods have resulted in some of the most ambitious engineering efforts ever seen, including New Orleans's extensive levee system and massive dikes and dams in the Netherlands. Such efforts continue today as climate change continues to put pressure on vulnerable areas. Some flood-prone cities in the U.S. are even going beyond federal estimates and setting higher local standards for protection.",
"When the annual monsoon rains come and send the Hooghly River over its banks, rickshas are the best way to get around Kolkata (Calcutta), India. Here, a drenched ricksha puller pauses for a photo in ankle-deep water near a market.Flash flooding is the most hazardous weather disaster in the United States. Floods cause power outages, damage infrastructure, trigger landslides, and can be deadly.Heavy rainfall in a short period of time causes water to rise rapidly, elevating the risk of flooding. Flash floods occur with little warning, but flooding can also develop slowly after rain ceases.Though most people associate hurricanes with wind damage, flooding poses one of the biggest threats from the storms. Hurricane Harvey in 2017 dropped 60 inches of rain in some parts of Texas, creating massive flooding hazards. In 2005, flooding from Hurricane Katrina caused a majority of the damage when old levees failed during the storm.Here are some safety tips to help you prepare for rising water—and what to do once a flood has begun.One of the biggest ways to protect yourself and your property is to prepare ahead of time. This includes:A supercell thunderstorm strikes in South Dakota. Among the most severe storms, supercells can bring strong winds, hail, and even tornadoes. (See more extreme weather pictures.)Be prepared, and stay safe.",
"Rescue workers and civilians wait for an emergency crew in Houston, Texas, after Hurricane Harvey. Heavy rainfall from the tropical storm caused severe flooding and the displacement of thousands of residents.Recently the world has seen a barrage of natural disasters: hurricanes in the Caribbean and southern U.S., earthquakes in Mexico, and monsoons in southern Asia. These events brought devastation to communities and questions around the world about what we can do to help—and to prepare ourselves for similar events.The safest and best thing to do when facing an approaching natural disaster is to heed your area’s evacuation notices and take advantage of evacuation assistance when it’s offered. It’s possible, however, to be caught by an unexpected emergency or to be unable to leave a disaster-striken region. When faced with those situations, what should you do to stay safe? How can you be better prepared? What kinds of choices will you need to make to survive?We spoke with three experts—Tim MacWelch, resident survival expert for Outdoor Life Magazine, survival instructor, and author of multiple New York Times bestselling survival manuals; Warren Faidley, extreme weather photographer, survival expert, and tactical EMT; and Jeff Masters, co-founder and director of meteorology at Weather Underground—about how to survive a disaster when you can’t evacuate. Each one shared tips on preparation, remaining safe during the event, and withstanding its often-dangerous aftermath.Here are their tips and advice on surviving a natural disaster.MacWelch: It's easy to focus on gear and supplies when you start thinking about preparedness, though these aren’t the only things you’d need in an emergency. Every family should have an emergency plan that addresses the most likely disasters in their region. Practical survival skills should also be part of every family’s game plan. These skills need to be learned and practiced before things get tough, because you simply won’t have time to read a survival book or watch a how-to video in the midst of a crisis. Get some first aid training, find out how to cook without utilities, learn to source and disinfect water, figure out different ways to heat and cool at least one room in your home. Learn everything you can, since you never know what might be useful in a disaster.Masters: Develop an emergency plan. Figure out where will you meet up if separated, what phone numbers you should have, what supplies you should stockpile.Faidley: I’ve developed my own three rules over the years. First, know what possible dangers could arise in your area. Second, know what to do for each one of them. And third, don't delay taking action. Those three things will keep you alive.MacWelch: The government guidelines for preparedness supplies are a great foundation for someone to begin disaster prep. The basic list includes drinking water, no-cook food, non-flame light sources (flashlights instead of candles), first aid supplies, and a host of other handy supplies. Again, it’s a great place to start, though I’d encourage everyone to plan further than the recommended 72 hours. Even though many situations are significantly improved in the first 72 hours, some are not. If you’re willing to take your family’s safety seriously, why stop at three days? Stock up a week’s supply of food and water, and you’ll be far better prepared than 90 percent of the population.Masters: A source of non-grid power. I have solar panels on my roof with a battery-backup. Tesla’s Power Wall is getting to be a good-value source of electrical power, without have to have a diesel generator. Also have a way to purify water. A micro-pore filter sold by camping stores is a good solution.Faidley: That depends on what kind of money you have. A lot of people just can't afford to buy all the survival things you’d need, but there are some basic things you must have. The first thing is some type of lighting system or flashlight you can use for a week or longer, along with the batteries to run it. People do not realize how important that is until their power is off, and they're stumbling around to find a flashlight that’s 10 years old with corroded batteries inside. There are also solar-powered lanterns you can charge during the day or crank-power, which is even better, because you don't have to leave it out in the elements. Those are good ideas for a secondary source.They used to say to keep three days of food, but you should have at least a week—and if you can afford it, two weeks—of non-perishable food. Even if you don’t have a big budget, just save a few things every year or two and replace them when their expiration dates come. And water is a big thing. If you can't buy bottled water, fill up everything in your house. Fill up the bathtub. Fill up the sink. Save old water cartons to fill. That way, you won’t have to spend a lot of money on bottled water, and you won't have to worry about going out and finding it, because water disappears quickly.(Related: Hurricane Safety Tips and Earthquake Safety Tips)MacWelch: One of the recommended items on FEMA’s list of home disaster kit items is a battery-powered weather radio. This communication tool (and any other type of portable radio) can provide survivors with lifesaving information, such as emergency broadcasts, evacuation orders, shelter-in-place instructions and much more. While any radio is better than none, a weather radio is the best choice, as it can tune in your local weather radio bands—which are one of your most reliable sources of emergency information.Masters: Cell phones are great, but the towers can go down, so a land line is handy. Another critical thing to have in your survival kit is a battery-powered radio that can receive NOAA Weather Radio broadcasts. Get one that has the feature to alert you when a weather warning is issued for your county.Faidley: Old-fashioned AM/FM radios, the old ones that use batteries. Information is critical in today's world, and stations will give out information to people: where to get food, where to go for medical assistance, what hospitals are open.MacWelch: Staying calm is the most important thing a person can do during any emergency. Of course, this is easier said than done in a scary situation, but think of it like this. A little fear is a natural and healthy response to a frightening event. Fear is like an instinct that typically keeps us out of harm’s way. But when fear runs unchecked (this state is commonly known as panic), a person may make irrational, dangerous, or even deadly choices. Staying calm and preventing panic should be a priority for each person during a crisis.MacWelch: A lot of people forget to focus on their most basic needs, also known as survival priorities. Human beings don’t need that much to survive. Shelter, water, air, food, security, sleep, medical care, and some semblance of hygiene will keep a person alive for a very long time. But quite often, these basic needs are confused with wants. People want to save possessions and they want to have their normal comforts and entertainment. The “needs” are the only things you need during a crisis, the “wants” need to wait their turn.Masters: Don’t look after just yourself, see if others need help too.Faidley: The thing people probably forget most often is that a natural disaster can be a very long-term event. You have to remember, during a hurricane, there's not much you can do about it then. You need to hunker down and be safe, but you have to remember it can be a long time for recovery. You don't know how long it will be before you’ll have power and whatever else you need, so you have to plan in advance. Either evacuate or have enough survival supplies for a week or longer.MacWelch: I mentioned hygiene as one of the basic needs for a person, and it really is a need—not just a nicety. Poor sanitation can allow for the quick transmission of dangerous bacteria in “camp” or group-shelter settings. Something as simple as the lack of a handwashing station at the bathroom can allow hazardous pathogens to spread through a group in 24-48 hours.Masters: Electrocution from power lines.Faidley: Believe it or not, in most urban areas, the period after a hurricane is usually the most dangerous. You have fallen trees and some trees that have only partially fallen. You have power lines. You have sharp objects. You have gas leaks. You have broken glass and windows. You may have a boil-water order in your area. During Hurricane Harvey, it was the flooding.And one of the most dangerous things after a disaster are uncontrolled intersections. People go down the road, and they'll drive right into a major intersection without even stopping. People are upset and not paying attention, and that is really dangerous. It can also be dangerous for children to play in the water, since there could be open manhole covers sucking the water down.Faidley: If you're in the middle of a hurricane, you want to be in the most stable part of a building. You want to stay away from the windows and be in the most interior portion. You want to put as much room between you and any flying or falling debris.A animal rescue volunteer carries a small dog he found abandoned inside a flooded home after Hurricane Harvey. If a natural disaster forces an evacuation, it's best to evacuate with your pets or take them to a shelter.Faidley: I have a big problem when people tie their pets inside or outside their house. I’ve talked to people who love their pets and tied them up, and they say they thought it was the best way to keep the animal from being washed away or getting hurt. But if you can’t get your pets to shelter or leave them in a room where they’ll be safe, let them roam free. It’s the very last resort, but animals are amazing at surviving storms. They have a wonderful ability to swim and climb trees. The odds of a free animal sheltering themselves is much better than one that is chained. Even if there is no flooding, a chained pet can’t get out of the way of falling debris or could die from exposure.Faidley: Mainly you shouldn't be in that water. There are some search-and-rescue incidents that require it, but it’s pretty uncommon. It's something you can usually prevent. Stay out of the water as much as possible. Most of the time, animals are freaked out and don’t want to bother you.MacWelch: This situation is quite common. Once the power fails, the water fails soon after. And once all the bottled water is consumed, you’re on your own to procure more. For those who have never sourced their own water before, the task seems scary and mistakes are almost inevitable. But thankfully, there are many ways to gather water and multiple ways to disinfect it. One of the easiest plans is to find the clearest water you can and boil it for 10 minutes to kill any pathogens. Sourcing and disinfecting water is one of the top survival skills that everyone should know how to do, and once you’ve done it—you’ll never forget.Masters: Keep yourself from sweating by sheltering from the sun and reducing activity. Find groundwater sources near or underneath green vegetation, canyons, dry riverbeds or rocks. Cover as much skin as possible with loose, lightweight clothing. This will trap the sweat against your skin, slowing evaporation and therefore water loss. For this reason, it's probably best to go with a cotton undershirt rather than a wicking fabric. Cover it all with a light windbreaker. Wear a wide-brimmed hat, sunglasses, and gloves.Faidley: It will be pretty unusual to not have some type of water. Right after the storm, there's a lot of rainwater around, but you have to use common sense. You can't drink something that's contaminated, though you can buy water purification tablets, use chlorine, or boil water if you have power or gas. Plan ahead. It doesn’t take a lot of water to keep you going if you're not working.MacWelch: Well, let me answer your question with a question. Is it ever safe to die of dehydration? Floodwaters are notorious for being a bouillabaisse of muddy water, raw sewage, dead animals, and toxic chemicals. That being said, it may also be the only water you have. Ironically, stranded flood survivors have found themselves praying for more rain—which is a clean and useable source of water. If the rain doesn’t return, see if you can get to the water in your home's water heater. There's usually 40-80 gallons of clean water in there. If you're the MacGuyver type and you know how to improvise any of the different apparatus for distillation, then distill the raw floodwater. Or failing that—boil the water for 10 minutes and drink only enough to maintain a low level of hydration. This limits your exposure to chemical pollution in the floodwaters.MacWelch: Regardless of the type of calamity, look for canned food in the wake of a disaster. The label may have fallen away, in which case the can contents will be a surprise, but mystery food is better than no food. Canned goods are surprisingly tough, waterproof, impervious to insects and most animals, and edible whether served hot or cold.Volunteer rescue workers in Mexico City have their names, blood type, and telephone numbers written on their arms in case they're caught in an emergency situation and cannot provide the information verbally.Faidley: You should have everything you'd include in a basic first aid kit. It’s good to have saline solution to wash out wounds and bandages to cover them. Of course, if you have prescriptions, you want to make sure you have extra ones, because you might not be able to get to the pharmacy for a few days or more.Faidley: It can be hard to find medical attention. During a storm surge or flooding, you can have raw sewage, bacteria, or chemicals in the water, so you want to make sure you flush out any kind of cut. You can use clean water or alcohol, but it’s important to keep those wounds clean. Even the water falling from the sky is ok. You also want to make sure you aren’t stepping into water where you can’t see the bottom, because you could step on a nail or sharp object. Puncture wounds can be really serious, since you can get a bad infection or tetanus.MacWelch: Ever wonder how the pioneers, colonists, or Native Americans treated their wounds before the advent of the triple antibiotic ointment and Band-Aids? There are dozens of common weeds that can be used as an effective poultice on wounds. These crushed curative roots and mashed medicinal leaves can discourage infection and even speed healing, as beneficial plant compounds soak into the skin. Foraging for edible plants and utilizing medicinal plants are two more skills you should learn and practice before you actually need them.MacWelch: One handy survival hack for staying warm is to stuff your clothing with insulating material. This can be crumpled paper, bubble wrap, or even leaves. These lofty materials surround your body with an insulating barrier and prevent the elements from stripping away your body heat so quickly. Sharing body heat is another effective way to stay warm in cold or wet conditions, though it may not be enough. When I get cold, I reach for a hot water bottle or a stone that has been warmed near a fire. Hold it under your clothing or between layers of clothing. As the heat soaks into your body, you’ll feel the chill melting away. This is also a safe and gentle technique to revive hypothermia victims.Cars drive through Old San Juan, Puerto Rico, after Hurricane Maria destroyed the island's power grid.MacWelch: Life without power is unimaginable to most modern people, as few people still live who grew up without the warm glow of electricity. My father grew up in a rural area that didn’t join “the grid” until he was eight or nine years old. This may sound romantic to a few, but it would be a living hell to the average tech-addicted first-worlder. So what should you do without power? Learn to cook from scratch, gather firewood for fuel, disinfect your own water—and after a hard day's work—read paper books or play games for entertainment.Faidley: It depends on where you are and how much infrastructure is around you. If you can get out of your place and go somewhere with power, you’ll be much better off. If you can get away from an area that doesn't have power and go to one that does, you can charge your phone, charge your computer, cool off a little bit, and get some ice. If you’re in an area that’s totally devastated and there's no way you can survive there, you have to leave.Faidley: Airports are good, even if they aren’t running flights, because a lot of times they'll let you in. There will be supplies coming in, and people will see you there and give you supplies. You just have to find a place with some kind of civilization where you can get water and shelter. People gravitate toward shelters, airports, hospitals, or places where you'd expect people to be—anywhere you can go, get a bottle of water, and maybe find some shelter.Faidley: After Hurricane Katrina, taking a white sheet and putting it up on your roof has become the new universal signal for help. You can also tear it and make a cross, which air rescues will notice.Faidley: That depends on a lot of things, especially where you are. It also depends on if you need to move or not, and that's always difficult to tell people. If you think you're not going to be able to survive where you are, if you think there's no hope for water or help, you’re better off trying to gravitate toward where there are other people. Because people are going to help you, in most cases. You just have to know the situation and your physical condition to determine when it's going to be safe to move. There's no easy answer in those situations, because they're all different.Faidley: There's a lot of scammers after the storms—roofing scams, robbery scams. I advise people to look for a list of contractors that the state has approved to find a legitimate company.",
"People paddle and row through the flooded Barlow Market District of Sebastopol, California, after an atmospheric river dumped inches of rain on the region in February, 2019.Buckets of rain and snow are battering California. The culprit? Atmospheric rivers.The rains were born far away, deep in the tropical Pacific, where water evaporated from the warm ocean surface and fizzed into the atmosphere. The drenched air parcel flow then moved sinuously along, an “atmospheric river” winding its way toward land. When that wet air hit a coast—in this case the West Coast of the United States—it unleashed torrents of water.“You need two ingredients for an atmospheric river,” says Daniel Swain, a climate scientist at the University of California, Los Angeles. “A plume of really concentrated moisture in the atmosphere and strong, fast winds to move it around.”The concentrated moisture comes from the ocean. Warm oceans evaporate water into the atmosphere, and winds and storms concentrate that water vapor into long, narrow, speedy trains of extra-wet air. Then, big global winds in the lower few miles of the atmosphere accelerate those amped-up, stretched-out, water-rich versions of normal storms.The sky-borne rivers can stretch for thousands of miles. In 2017, an enormous atmospheric river 5,000 miles long slammed into the Pacific Northwest, dumping over two inches of rain on the region over a few days. Most aren't that massive, though—the average atmospheric river is about 500 miles wide and 1,200 miles long.They transport huge volumes of water around the world, carrying it along as vapor and cloud droplets. In an average atmospheric river, about 25 times as much water flows through the air high overhead as through the Mississippi River—and on any given day, about three or four are either developing or flowing through the sky in each hemisphere.“In a way, they're actually the biggest rivers on earth,” says Marty Ralph, a researcher at the Scripps Institution of Oceanography in La Jolla, California, who been studying the phenomena for years. “They're just in the air instead of on the ground.”All in all, more than 90 percent of the water that gets moved around Earth's midlatitudes—its midsection, where most of the world's population lives—gets transported via these sinuous sky streams. "They play this really key role in bringing moist tropical and subtropical air into the drier mid-latitudes," says Nina Oakley, an atmospheric scientist at the Desert Research Institute in Reno.Atmospheric rivers are everywhere: They've dumped record-breaking snow on East Antarctica, driven flooding in Europe, and caused rivers to spill their banks in Australia. Particularly strong ones can hold together and cross the entire North American continent, dumping snow and rain all the way from the West Coast to the East. Gulf of Mexico- and Atlantic-brewed atmospheric rivers often feed into heavy rain and snow of winter nor'easters across the eastern U.S.Some atmospheric river pathways are so well-known that they have their own affectionate names. The "Pineapple Express," for example, speeds tropical Pacific moisture from around Hawaii toward the West Coast of the U.S.The water vapor locked up in an atmospheric river will stay just that—vapor—until something comes along to squeeze it out of the air as rain or snow. Often, that trigger is the edge of a continent: along the west coast of North and South America, for instance, atmospheric rivers crash into mountains, which forces the sodden air masses higher into the atmosphere. As they get forced upward into colder air, the water vapor gets squeezed out—and falls out of the sky as rain or snow. Any cold air can trigger that squeeze-out, though.“These saturated plumes of air are like a damp sponge,” says Swain, “and a mountain range or a storm system is like a hand wringing that sponge out.”California gets somewhere between 25 to 50 percent of all its annual precipitation from atmospheric rivers. Often, that's good news—the events have ended droughts, refilled reservoirs, and greened rolling hills. When the precipitation falls as snow in the high mountains, it acts as a kind of long-term water storage system, melting in the spring and summer when the state is parched. But when it comes down as rain, the effects can be devastating, causing floods, mudslides, dam breaches, and more.The kinds of extreme, destructive rain events that have made news in California over the past few years are not alone: atmospheric rivers are at play in up to half of the most intense, extreme rain storms experienced across the planet.In February 2019, a group of researchers introduced a new system to classify the strength of these atmospheric rivers, sort of like the way hurricanes are categorized with the Safford-Simpson scale. The scale looks at how much water the air moves around over time—the “Integrated water vapor transport,” or IVT, measures how much water vapor flows past a point at any given time—and the scale also takes into account how long the river stalls out on top of a place. Then, it assigns the river a number from zero (not an atmospheric river) to five (a very, very wet one). The most recent deluge in Northern California, says Ralph, was somewhere between a three and a four on the scale where the worst of the flooding took place, near the Russian River.Air temperatures have ticked upward by about 1 degree Celsius, or about 2 degrees Fahrenheit, over the last century—and they're expected to rise by more than that by the end of the century. With warmer air comes wetter air: toastier temperatures evaporate more water from the ocean. On top of that, air can hold about seven percent more water vapor for each degree warmer it gets. So scientists expect that in a hotter future, atmospheric rivers will get correspondingly wetter and stronger.",
"People walk on a catwalk in a flooded St. Mark's Square during a period of seasonal high water in Venice, Italy, on October 29, 2018.An estimated three-quarters of the historic city of Venice, Italy, is submerged this week following high tides and powerful storms that have killed at least 11 people in the region.Venice's iconic St. Mark's Square was closed this week, tourists picked their way across raised walkways—some requiring rescue—and shopkeepers bailed out their stores. The flooding in the city is the worst it's been in a decade, reaching a high-water mark of 5.1 feet (1.5 meters), the fourth highest ever recorded.Long known as the City of Canals or City of Water, Venice faces serious long-term threats to its very survival. With climate change and sea levels rising globally, the low-lying city has often been the poster child for cultural heritage and people at risk. Experts have warned the Mediterranean Sea basin could rise as much as five feet by the end of this century, putting the city in jeopardy of being inundated twice a day. Already the city has been experiencing serious flooding about four times a year.The city's leaders have seen the rising water for some time and have been working on an ambitious defense plan. But corruption is widely alleged to have slowed the process. Called MOSE (MOdulo Sperimentale Elettromeccanico), the project is an acronym for a system of walls meant to protect the city and lagoon from the sea. The system is based on decades-old technology, and not all scientists and engineers are convinced it will save the city in the long run, even when it's completed. It may be a losing battle, they warn.(See what would happen if all the world's ice melted.)As National Geographic previously reported, “Italian magistrates discovered that while the initial cost has been predicted at something like two billion euros, more than 6.5 billion have now been spent, at least two billion of which was spent on corruption.” Investigations have led to arrest and imprisonment of city and regional officials.Although some long-term residents have been moving out of Venice, tired of rising waters and rents driven up by international tourists, others argue that the city is too precious to give up on.“For its own sake it’s important that Venice doesn’t die,” historian and author Salvatore Settis told National Geographic. “It’s too important to let it die. Venice should be preserved not just for Venetians but for all humanity.”",
"A woman in Bangladesh uses bales of straw to try to protect a riverbank that is eroding away from floodwaters. Much of the country is ground zero for a global climate crisis.Dhaka, BangladeshGolam Mostafa Sarder starts every day before dawn, rising from a thin reed mat in the shed that he shares with fifteen roommates. Each has just enough space to lie flat. He dresses in gym shorts and t-shirt by the light of a single dangling bulb.Outside the shed’s open doorway, in the outskirts of Dhaka, the sprawling megacity capital of Bangladesh, is the brick factory where Golam and his neighbors work for fifteen hours a day, seven days a week, at least six months a year. His home in Gabura, a remote village on the country’s southwestern coast, is more than a day’s journey from the city by bus, rickshaw, and ferry.Golam’s job is to push wheelbarrows of mud down the production line. Waist-high rows of drying bricks spiral off from a towering kiln that belches smoke over an area the size of a city block. By 6 p.m. his lanky frame is spattered in gray mud. The evening air swims with mosquitoes. He has just enough strength left to clean his bare feet and angular face, inhale a dinner of lentils and rice, and collapse back onto his mat.Golam has never heard of global warming. But he says he knows one thing for sure: “If the river didn’t take our land, I wouldn’t need to be here.”Bangladesh, a densely populated, riverine South Asian nation, has always survived its share of tropical storms, flooding, and other natural disasters. But today, climate change is accelerating old forces of destruction, creating new patterns of displacement, and fueling an explosion of rapid, chaotic urbanization. A report last week from the U.S. Government Accountability Office found that the State Department and other foreign aid agencies have not done enough to combat climate change-induced migration in developing countries, and highlighted Bangladesh as particularly vulnerable. And as climate change drives the migration of up to 200 million people worldwide by 2050, Dhaka offers a cautionary tale for refuge cities around the globe.Interviews with dozens of migrant families, scientists, urban planners, human rights advocates, and government officials across Bangladesh reveal that while the country is keenly aware of its vulnerability to climate change, not enough has been done to match the pace and scale of the resultant displacement and urbanization, toppling any prospect of a humane life for one of the world’s largest populations of climate migrants.“Right now the government’s vision is to have no vision,” says Tasneem Siddiqui, a political scientist who leads the Refugee and Migratory Movements Research Unit at the University of Dhaka. “It’s just that everything is in Dhaka, and people are all coming to Dhaka. And Dhaka is collapsing.”Bangladesh holds 165 million people in an area smaller than Illinois. One-third of them live along the southern coast, a lush honeycomb of island villages, farms, and fish ponds linked by protective embankments. Most of the country’s land area is no higher above sea level than New York City, and during the rainy season more than one-fifth of the country can be flooded at once.For tens of thousands of years, people living in the vast Ganges Delta accepted a volatile, dangerous landscape of floods and tropical storms as the cost of access to rich agricultural soil and lucrative maritime trade routes.Forida Khatun stands behind her house in Gabura, Bangladesh, in November. Two of her sons migrated to Dhaka after the family home was destroyed by storms multiple times and agricultural jobs were lost due to salinity intrusion. “Only Allah can save us," she says. "We don’t have any power to save our children.”“People have always coped with flooding, and they learned how to cope with death,” Siddiqui says. “But with climate change, many of the damages are permanent. So you have to adapt to a new way of life.” (Learn about Bangladesh’s floating hospital.)Climate change is disrupting traditional rain patterns—droughts in some areas, unexpected deluges in others—and boosting silt-heavy runoff from glaciers in the Himalaya Mountains upstream, leading to an increase in flooding and riverbank erosion. Every year, an area larger than Manhattan washes away. Meanwhile, sea-level rise is pushing saltwater into coastal agricultural areas and promising to permanently submerge large swaths.Over the last decade, nearly 700,000 Bangladeshis were displaced on average each year by natural disasters, according to the Internal Displacement Monitoring Centre. That number spikes in years with catastrophic cyclones, like 2009’s Aila, which displaced millions of people and killed more than 200. But even in relatively calm years, there is a rising drumbeat of displacement as sea-level rise, erosion, salinity intrusion, crop failures, and repeat inundation make life along the coast untenable.Overall, the number of Bangladeshis displaced by the varied impacts of climate change could reach 13.3 million by 2050, making it the country’s number-one driver of internal migration, according to a March 2018 World Bank report.“On the coast, we can predict with great certainty that many people living there now will simply not be able to continue there, because their livelihoods will be lost,” says Saleemul Huq, director of the Dhaka-based International Centre for Climate Change and Development and one of the country’s leading climate scientists.As people flee vulnerable coastal areas, most are arriving in urban slums—particularly in Dhaka, one of the world’s fastest-growing and most densely populated megacities. The city is perceived as the country’s bastion of economic opportunity, but it is also fraught with extreme poverty, public health hazards, human trafficking, and other risks, including its own vulnerability to floods. Already, up to 400,000 low-income migrants arrive in Dhaka every year.“Dhaka is filled with people who fled their village because it was swallowed by the sea or the rivers,” Huq says. “The coming millions will be impossible to absorb.”Today, city planners, policymakers, scientists, and farmers are reinforcing embankments, innovating home design, rebuilding communities, building shelters, and cultivating salt-tolerant rice seeds, among other actions. But they’re moving too slowly to help many people like Golam, who survived a series of catastrophic storms only to find that migration was the only viable path remaining.Golam was a child the first time his family’s house was destroyed. He was too young to remember the wind ripping out his father’s fruit trees, floodwaters carrying off tea and rice from the family’s small shop, the mud walls crumbling, him taking shelter with his mother in a neighbor’s house and then, when that too washed away, falling into an empty grave as they ran from the raging riverbank in the dark.A second storm several years later took their next house. And a third, after that: Cyclone Aila washed away not only the latest house and everything in it, but also the land on which it stood, the family’s last piece of property.After Aila, Golam’s family was homeless, landless, with almost no possessions, and awash in high-salinity water that would silently sabotage fishing and agriculture for the next decade. For a young man with a third-grade education, the brick factory and its promise of hard cash became the only way to feed his family.“In my childhood, no one used to come out here for work,” he says. “But now, from my village, nearly every family sends at least one person.”Golam’s family sent two: A couple years ago, his younger brother joined him. Each earns just shy of $1,500 in six months, his total income for the year.Their only time off is when it rains. On those days, they take a bus to the international airport and stand outside the perimeter fence to watch planes fly in and out, and imagine where they might be going.“I hope God will look at me kindly,” Golam says, “and change my luck.” (Learn about Bangladesh’s shipbreakers.)Young men relax on a flood gate in the booming port town of Mongla, Bangladesh. The city aims to recreate itself as a magnet for climate migrants, with investments in sea walls and other adaptive infrastructure, factories and other job opportunities, as well as public services like affordable housing, schools, and hospitals.For climate migrants who arrive in Dhaka, life is seldom easy. Men and boys work in brick factories, drive rickshaws, and build skyscrapers. Women and girls clean houses, stitch Western fashions, and raise families—often fending off sexual violence at multiple steps along the way. Education is a luxury; rent is preposterous. Eviction can come as suddenly as a collapsing riverbank. Home feels very far away.Sahela Begum, 34, lost her husband to a heart attack in February. She managed to support their four daughters off his life savings for a few months in a town called Naria, on the banks of the Padma River. Then she lost their house. On a sticky evening in August, the riverbank it was on crumbled, sending it downstream along with a dozen of her neighbors’ houses.“When my house was going in the water, I felt like I was having a stroke and might die,” she says. “When we lost the house, we ran out of options.”Within a week, she left with her daughters for Dhaka, several hours upstream. They managed to find a room in a slum called Kamrangirchar, near the city center, in a dead-end alleyway behind a cacophonous fabric market built over an old trash dump. She pays around $40 a month, seventy percent of the salary she earns doing domestic work every day, for a darkened, ten-by-ten-foot concrete room under a stairway. Her oldest daughter, 13, also does domestic work, while the 11-year-old stays home to care for the 6- and 9-year-olds. They share three toilets and one four-burner stove with twelve other families living in the alley.Forty percent of the city’s residents live in slums like this, hundreds of which are spread across the city. According to the International Organization for Migration, up to seventy percent of the slums’ residents moved there due to environmental challenges.Slums emerge unplanned and unsanctioned in the backyards of glassy skyscrapers, straddling railroad tracks, on stilts above water-logged floodplains, on the fringes of construction sites. Single beds are frequently shared by five or more family members. Sewage runs freely. Structure fires spread easily. Most electricity, when it’s working at all, is tapped illegally from the grid. Insect infestations are inescapable. Skin and gastrointestinal diseases transmitted by dirty water are routine, and the infant mortality rate is twice that of rural areas. Rent money flows into a real estate black market controlled by corrupt local officials and businessmen.“It’s very hard to get a living here,” Begum says. “But my life is my childrens’ life. If I can make a good future for them, that’s the best thing I can hope for.” (Read about Bangladesh's Rohingya refugee crisis, which also has roots in environmental degradation.)When Bangladesh gained independence in 1971, the population was 91 percent rural. But as the country began to pivot from an agricultural economy to one diversified into manufacturing and other urban industries, Dhaka exploded. Today, nearly one-third of the population lives in cities, and Dhaka’s population is nearly triple that of the country’s next three biggest cities combined. The city holds 47,500 people per square kilometer, nearly twice the population density of Manhattan.Throughout that process of growth, “low-income people were totally left out of the development framework of the city,” says A.Q.M. Mahbub, an urban studies researcher at the University of Dhaka. Affordable housing, and public transit connecting the city center to suburbs as is common in megacities in India and China, were never priorities.Local officials still tend to view slum dwellers as illegal squatters, rather than residents with a right to basic services. Tariq bin Yousuf, a senior official at the Dhaka City Corporation, a government agency that manages the city’s infrastructure, says that while the city has plans to build more affordable housing, it prefers to leave slum residents reliant on aid from local and international non-governmental organizations.“If we invest money directly in slum areas, or give them an electricity supply, they will start to think, ‘O.K., we have these facilities, so we have the ownership of this land,’” he says. “Once we give them improved services, they become permanent.”Many of the country’s leading public policy experts think that attitude—that climate migrants are a regrettable burden—is short-sighted.Mohammed Kabir Hossain, who drives a rickshaw, is one of many climate migrants who were attracted to Mongla as an alternative to Dhaka. “Because of salinity and flooding, there’s not much opportunity in my village. But here, I can make good money,” he says.“Climate change and migration you cannot stop,” the University of Dhaka’s Siddiqui says. “But you can turn them into an opportunity for development.”Mongla, a booming port town on the country’s south-central coast, is testing that theory by embarking on an urban overhaul that aims to turn it into a magnet for climate migrants. It’s one of several emerging “secondary cities,” models of climate-savvy urban planning where investments in sea walls and other adaptive infrastructure are being paired with factories and other blue-collar job opportunities, as well as public services like affordable housing, schools, and hospitals.“There’s no way to stop people coming to Dhaka unless we can attract them to other places,” Huq says. “The next ten million could go to these secondary towns. The girls and boys of today, the next generation of citizens.”Mongla has the right ingredients, planners hope. It has a well-established deepwater port, surrounded by a sprawling industrial area with cement factories, diesel fuel mass storage facilities, and two dozen factories with jobs for 4,300 workers producing everything from luggage and electronics to packaged snacks and mannequins. Located in the center of the country’s coastal belt, it’s big enough to offer opportunities but small enough that there’s room to grow.“We have a master plan for making the city more functional and beautiful,” says Mohammed Alauddin, Mongla’s deputy mayor. “People used to have to leave Mongla to find work. Now they’re coming to work in industry, and staying because of the good living conditions.”So far, local officials have invested in two flood-control gates; a freshwater treatment and distribution system that Alauddin says has increased the number of houses with running water from one-third of the city’s total to one-half; eleven kilometers of pedestrian-friendly riverside brick pathways; two dozen closed-circuit security cameras; a citywide loudspeaker system that can announce inclement weather and broadcast motivational pop music; and four thousand shade trees. Several new apartment towers are under construction, as well as a watchtower from which tourists can peer into the nearby Sundarban mangrove forest.The investments appear to be paying off. In the last five years, the population has jumped nearly sixty percent to 110,000, and the price of land has skyrocketed. The industrial area is across a river from the town center, and every evening at rush hour the river is jammed with ferries on which passengers stand shoulder to shoulder. And the town’s reputation is spreading.“Because of salinity and flooding, there’s not much opportunity in my village. But here, I can make good money,” says Mohammed Kabir Hossain, who drives a rickshaw from the industrial area to the ferry station. He came to Mongla a few years ago from Koyra on the southwestern coast. “A lot of people are coming here from across southern Bangladesh, especially those who are unwilling to go to Dhaka.”At Golam’s family home in Gabura, two low wooden buildings frame a courtyard that opens onto a constellation of rectangular shrimp ponds stretching to the horizon. Immediately behind it is a crumbling ten-foot embankment, no more than three feet across, paved with the same gray bricks that Golam and men from every family here labor far from home to produce. Behind the embankment, a river divides civilization from the uninhabitable Sundarbans, the world’s largest mangrove forest. The family lives in fear that their house—on a tiny wedge rented from the village—will again wash away.Forida Khatun, Golam’s mother, shares her son’s angular face. She crouches against the exterior wall of the house wrapped in a purple sari with yellow flowers, her arms shimmering in silvery bracelets, shooing away a nosy chicken. In a high, thin voice she recalls how Golam was an energetic, devious child, always in trouble. He loved boats, and once took a canoe out into the mangroves for so long that he was too exhausted to row himself home. That time, Khatun was able to dispatch a few older boys from the neighborhood to rescue him. Now, she worries that he’s slipped away from her for good.“If we had the land still, if the salinity was less, our sons could have managed to stay,” she says. “Only Allah can save us. We don’t have any power to save our children.”Here, land is wealth, and the family has none left. At the same time, salinity has poisoned the job market as much as it has the water and soil: Many wealthier farmers have converted their rice paddies—a reliable opportunity for paid labor—into salt-tolerant shrimp ponds, which essentially care for themselves.The corrosive effect of salinity on local agricultural economies could displace up to 200,000 people from coastal Bangladesh, a November study from the International Food Policy Research Institute found. That exodus is already well underway in Gabura.“Because of climate change, the job opportunities are reducing,” says Isharat Jahan Mintu, the chairman of the village government. “And the huge risk of natural disasters makes people want to go to safer areas.”Mintu estimates that the high tide is rising by one foot per year on average, and that one-third of the village’s farmable acres have been rendered useless by salinity. Farmers are reluctant to bring more than a fraction of their useable acres into cultivation, for fear of seeing their entire nest egg washed away at once and local banks, seeing the same risk, are stingy with loans. As a result, up to two-thirds of the village’s men, including Golam, have left to find work in Dhaka and other cities either temporarily or for good.As a generation of young people loses faith in what was once one of the most richly productive regions of South Asia, those who remain worry that the village’s social fabric will be irreparably damaged. Families are fragmented, children grow up without fathers, and lifelong neighbors turn against one another over land. Parts of the embankment resemble ghost towns, lined with boarded-up shops. No one wants to leave, but many see no way to stay.“Migration is very emotional,” Mintu says. “It makes an emptiness in the heart of the village.”",
"Backs to the wall, brick workers absorb the sting of a driving rain on the Turag River west of Dhaka.www.jonasbendiksen.com
www.theplaceswelive.comWe may be seven billion specks on the surface of Earth, but when you're in Bangladesh, it sometimes feels as if half the human race were crammed into a space the size of Louisiana. Dhaka, its capital, is so crowded that every park and footpath has been colonized by the homeless. To stroll here in the mists of early morning is to navigate an obstacle course of makeshift beds and sleeping children. Later the city's steamy roads and alleyways clog with the chaos of some 15 million people, most of them stuck in traffic. Amid this clatter and hubbub moves a small army of Bengali beggars, vegetable sellers, popcorn vendors, rickshaw drivers, and trinket salesmen, all surging through the city like particles in a flash flood. The countryside beyond is a vast watery floodplain with intermittent stretches of land that are lush, green, flat as a parking lot—and wall-to-wall with human beings. In places you might expect to find solitude, there is none. There are no lonesome highways in Bangladesh.We should not be surprised. Bangladesh is, after all, one of the most densely populated nations on Earth. It has more people than geographically massive Russia. It is a place where one person, in a nation of 164 million, is mathematically incapable of being truly alone. That takes some getting used to.So imagine Bangladesh in the year 2050, when its population will likely have zoomed to 220 million, and a good chunk of its current landmass could be permanently underwater. That scenario is based on two converging projections: population growth that, despite a sharp decline in fertility, will continue to produce millions more Bangladeshis in the coming decades, and a possible multifoot rise in sea level by 2100 as a result of climate change. Such a scenario could mean that 10 to 30 million people along the southern coast would be displaced, forcing Bangladeshis to crowd even closer together or else flee the country as climate refugees—a group predicted to swell to some 250 million worldwide by the middle of the century, many from poor, low-lying countries."Globally, we're talking about the largest mass migration in human history," says Maj. Gen. Muniruzzaman, a charismatic retired army officer who presides over the Bangladesh Institute of Peace and Security Studies in Dhaka. "By 2050 millions of displaced people will overwhelm not just our limited land and resources but our government, our institutions, and our borders." Muniruzzaman cites a recent war game run by the National Defense University in Washington, D.C., which forecast the geopolitical chaos that such a mass migration of Bangladeshis might cause in South Asia. In that exercise millions of refugees fled to neighboring India, leading to disease, religious conflict, chronic shortages of food and fresh water, and heightened tensions between the nuclear-armed adversaries India and Pakistan.Such a catastrophe, even imaginary, fits right in with Bangladesh's crisis-driven story line, which, since the country's independence in 1971, has included war, famine, disease, killer cyclones, massive floods, military coups, political assassinations, and pitiable rates of poverty and deprivation—a list of woes that inspired some to label it an international basket case. Yet if despair is in order, plenty of people in Bangladesh didn't read the script. In fact, many here are pitching another ending altogether, one in which the hardships of their past give rise to a powerful hope.For all its troubles, Bangladesh is a place where adapting to a changing climate actually seems possible, and where every low-tech adaptation imaginable is now being tried. Supported by governments of the industrialized countries—whose greenhouse emissions are largely responsible for the climate change that is causing seas to rise—and implemented by a long list of international nongovernmental organizations (NGOs), these innovations are gaining credence, thanks to the one commodity that Bangladesh has in profusion: human resilience. Before this century is over, the world, rather than pitying Bangladesh, may wind up learning from her example.More than a third of the world's people live within 62 miles of a shoreline. Over the coming decades, as sea levels rise, climate change experts predict that many of the world's largest cities, including Miami and New York, will be increasingly vulnerable to coastal flooding. A recent study of 136 port cities found that those with the largest threatened populations will be in developing countries, especially those in Asia. Worldwide, the two cities that will have the greatest proportional increase in people exposed to climate extremes by 2070 are both in Bangladesh: Dhaka and Chittagong, with Khulna close behind. Though some parts of the delta region may keep pace with rising sea levels, thanks to river sediment that builds up coastal land, other areas will likely be submerged.But Bangladeshis don't have to wait decades for a preview of a future transformed by rising seas. From their vantage point on the Bay of Bengal, they are already facing what it's like to live in an overpopulated and climate-changed world. They've watched sea levels rise, salinity infect their coastal aquifers, river flooding become more destructive, and cyclones batter their coast with increasing intensity—all changes associated with disruptions in the global climate.On May 25, 2009, the people of Munshiganj, a village of 35,000 on the southwest coast, got a glimpse of what to expect from a multifoot rise in sea level. That morning a cyclone, called Aila, was lurking offshore, and its 70-mile-an-hour winds sent a storm surge racing silently toward shore, where the villagers, unsuspecting, were busy tending their rice fields and repairing their nets.Shortly after ten o'clock Nasir Uddin, a 40-year-old fisherman, noticed that the tidal river next to the village was rising "much faster than normal" toward high tide. He looked back just in time to see a wall of brown water start pouring over one of the six-foot earthen dikes that protect the village—its last line of defense against the sea.Within seconds water was surging through his house, sucking away the mud walls and everything else. His three young daughters jumped onto the kitchen table, screaming as cold salt water swirled around their ankles, then up to their knees. "I was sure we were dead," he told me months later, standing in shin-deep mud next to a pond full of stagnant green water the color of antifreeze. "But Allah had other plans."As if by a miracle, an empty fishing boat swept past, and Uddin grabbed it and hoisted his daughters inside. A few minutes later the boat capsized, but the family managed to hang on as it was tossed by waves. The water finally subsided, leaving hundreds of people dead along the southwest coast and thousands homeless. Uddin and most of his neighbors in Munshiganj decided to hunker down and rebuild, but thousands of others set out to start a new life in inland cities such as Khulna and Dhaka.Thousands of people arrive in Dhaka each day, fleeing river flooding in the north and cyclones in the south. Many of them end up living in the densely populated slum of Korail. And with hundreds of thousands of such migrants already, Dhaka is in no shape to take in new residents. It's already struggling to provide the most basic services and infrastructure.Yet precisely because Bangladesh has so many problems, it's long served as a kind of laboratory for innovative solutions in the developing world. It has bounced back from crisis after crisis, proving itself far more resourceful than skeptics might have guessed. Dhaka is home to BRAC, the largest nonprofit in the developing world, held up as a model for how to provide basic health care and other services with an army of field-workers. Bangladesh also produced the global micro-finance movement started by Nobel Peace laureate Muhammad Yunus and his Grameen Bank.And believe it or not, it's a population success story as well. To whittle its high birthrate, Bangladesh developed a grassroots family-planning program in the 1970s that has lowered its fertility rate from 6.6 children per woman in 1977 to about 2.4 today—a historic record for a country with so much poverty and illiteracy. Fertility decline has generally been associated with economic improvement, which prompts parents to limit family size so they can provide education and other opportunities to their children. But Bangladesh has been able to reduce fertility despite its lack of economic development."It was very hard in the beginning," says Begum Rokeya, 42, a government health worker in the Satkhira District who's made thousands of home visits to persuade newlywed couples to use contraception and plan their family's size. "This is a very conservative country, and men put pressure on women to have lots of children. But they began to see that if they immunized their kids, they wouldn't need to have a bunch of babies just so a few would survive. They like the idea of fewer mouths to feed."Working in partnership with dozens of NGOs, Bangladesh has made huge strides in educating women and providing them with economic opportunities; female work-participation rates have doubled since 1995. Its economy is growing, helped by its garment-export industry. And Bangladesh has managed to meet an important UN Millennium Development Goal: Infant mortality dropped dramatically between 1990 and 2008, from 100 deaths per 1,000 births to 43—one of the highest improvement rates among low-income countries.In Dhaka such successes are dwarfed by the overwhelming poverty and the constant influx of villagers, prompting organizations, including BRAC, to get involved in helping village people figure out how to survive in a deteriorating environment. "Our goal is to prevent people from coming to Dhaka in the first place, by helping them adapt and find new ways of making a go of it in their villages," says Babar Kabir, head of BRAC's climate change and disaster management programs. "Big storms like Aila uproot them from the lives they know."Ibrahim Khalilullah has lost track of how many times he's moved. "Thirty? Forty?" he asks. "Does it matter?" Actually those figures might be a bit low, as he estimates he's moved about once a year his whole life, and he's now over 60. Somehow, between all that moving, he and his wife raised seven children who "never missed a meal," he says proudly. He's a warm, good-natured man, with gray hair cut short and a longish gray beard, and everything he says has a note of joy in it.Khalilullah is a char dweller, one of the hundreds of thousands of people who inhabit the constantly changing islands, or chars, on the floodplains of Bangladesh's three major rivers—the Padma, Jamuna, and Meghna. These islands, many covering less than a square mile, appear and vanish constantly, rising and falling with the tide, the season, the phase of the moon, the rainfall, and the flow of rivers upstream. Char dwellers will set out by boat to visit friends on another char, only to find that it's completely disappeared. Later they will hear through the grapevine that their friends moved to a new char that had popped up a few miles downstream, built their house in a day, and planted a garden by nightfall. Making a life on the chars—growing crops, building a home, raising a family—is like winning an Olympic medal in adaptation. Char dwellers may be the most resilient people on Earth.There are tricks to living on a char, Khalilullah says. He builds his house in sections that can be dismantled, moved, and reassembled in a matter of a few hours. He always builds on a raised platform of earth at least six feet high. He uses sheets of corrugated metal for the outside walls and panels of thatch for the roof. He keeps the family suitcases stacked neatly next to the bed in case they're needed on short notice. And he has documents, passed down from his father, that establish his right to settle on new islands when they emerge—part of an intricate system of laws and customs that would prevent a million migrants from the south, say, from ever squatting on the chars. His real secret, he says, is not to think too much. "We're all under pressure, but there's really no point to worry. This is our only option, to move from place to place to place. We farm this land for as long as we can, and then the river washes it away. No matter how much we worry, the ending is always the same."Even in the best of times, it's a precarious way of life. And these are not the best of times. In Bangladesh climate change threatens not just the coast but also inland communities like Khalilullah's. It could disrupt natural cycles of precipitation, including monsoon rains and the Tibetan Plateau snowfall, both of which feed the major rivers that eventually braid their way through the delta.But precisely because the country's geography is prone to floods and cyclones, Bangladeshis have gotten a head start on preparing for a climate-changed future. For decades they have been developing more salt-resistant strains of rice and building dikes to keep low-lying farms from being flooded with seawater. As a result, the country has actually doubled its production of rice since the early 1970s. Similarly its frequent cyclones have prompted it to build cyclone shelters and develop early-warning systems for natural disasters. More recently various NGOs have set up floating schools, hospitals, and libraries that keep right on functioning through monsoon season."Let me tell you about Bangladeshis," says Zakir Kibria, 37, a political scientist who serves as a policy analyst at Uttaran, an NGO devoted to environmental justice and poverty eradication. "We may be poor and appear disorganized, but we are not victims. And when things get tough, people here do what they've always done—they find a way to adapt and survive. We're masters of 'climate resilience.'"Muhammad Hayat Ali is a 40-year-old farmer, straight as bamboo, who lives east of Satkhira, about 30 miles upstream of the coast but still within range of tidal surges and the salinity of a slowly rising sea. "In previous times this land was juicy, all rice fields," Ali says, his arm sweeping the landscape. "But now the weather has changed—summer is longer and hotter than it used to be, and the rains aren't coming when they should. The rivers are saltier than before, and any water we get from the ground is too salty to grow rice. So now I'm raising shrimps in these ponds and growing my vegetables on the embankments around them." A decade ago such a pond would have been a novelty; now everyone, it seems, is raising shrimps or crabs and selling them to wholesalers for shipment to Dhaka or abroad.Sometimes, though, adaptations backfire. Throughout southern Bangladesh, villages and fields are shielded from rivers by a network of dikes built by the government with help from Dutch engineers in the 1960s. During floods the rivers sometimes overflow the dikes and fill the fields like soup bowls. When the flood recedes, the water is trapped. The fields become waterlogged, unusable for years at a time.Decades ago things got so bad in Satkhira—so many fields were waterlogged, so many farmers out of work—that members of the local community used picks and shovels to illegally cut a 20-yard gap in an embankment, draining a huge field that had been waterlogged for nearly three years. In doing so, they were emulating Bengali farmers of earlier times, who periodically broke their embankments and allowed river water to enter their fields, rising and falling with the tides, until the deposited sediment raised the level of the land. But this time the villagers were charged with breaking the law.Then a funny thing happened. The field, which had been left open, acquired tons of sediment from the river and grew higher by five or six feet. The river channel deepened, and fishermen began to catch fish again. Finally a government study group came to survey the situation and wound up recommending that other fields be managed the same way. The villagers were vindicated, even hailed as heroes. And today the field is covered with many acres of rice."Rivers are a lifeline for this region, and our ancestors knew that," Kibria says as he walks an embankment. "Opening the fields connects everything. It raises the land level to make up for the rise in sea level. It preserves livelihoods and diversifies the kinds of crops that we can grow. It also keeps thousands of farmers and fishermen from giving up and moving to Dhaka."But every adaptation, no matter how clever, is only temporary. Even at its sharply reduced rate of growth, Bangladesh's population will continue to expand—to perhaps more than 250 million by the turn of the next century—and some of its land will continue to dissolve. Where will all those people live, and what will they do for a living?Many millions of Bangladeshis are already working abroad, whether in Western countries, in places such as Saudi Arabia and the United Arab Emirates, or in India, where millions fled during Bangladesh's 1971 war of independence against Pakistan and never returned. Millions more have slipped across the frontier in the decades since, prompting social unrest and conflict. Today India seems determined to close and fortify its border, girding against some future mass migration of the type hypothesized in Washington. It's building a 2,500-mile security fence along the border, and security guards have routinely shot people crossing illegally into India. Interviews with families of victims suggest that at least some of the dead were desperate teenagers seeking to help their families financially. They had been shot smuggling cattle from India, where the animals are protected by Hinduism, to Muslim Bangladesh, where they can fetch up to $40 a head.But if ten million climate refugees were ever to storm across the border into India, Maj. Gen. Muniruzzaman says, "those trigger-happy Indian border guards would soon run out of bullets." He argues that developed countries—not just India—should be liberalizing immigration policies to head off such a chilling prospect. All around Bangladesh bright, ambitious, well-educated young people are plotting their exit strategies.And that's not such a bad idea, says Mohammed Mabud, a professor of public health at Dhaka's North South University and president of the Organization for Population and Poverty Alleviation. Mabud believes that investing in educating Bangladeshis would not only help train professionals to work within the country but also make them desirable as immigrants to other countries—sort of a planned brain drain. Emigration could relieve some of the pressure that's sure to slam down in the decades ahead. It's also a way to bolster the country's economy; remittances sent back by emigrants account for 11 percent of the country's GDP. "If people can go abroad for employment, trade, or education and stay there for several years, many of them will stay," he says. By the time climate change hits hardest, the population of Bangladesh could be reduced by 8 to 20 million people—if the government makes out-migration a more urgent priority.For now, the government seems more interested in making climate adaptation a key part of its national development strategy. That translates, roughly, into using the country's environmental woes as leverage in persuading the industrialized world to offer increased levels of aid. It's a strategy that's helped sustain Bangladesh throughout its short, traumatic history. Since independence, it has received tens of billions of dollars in international aid commitments. And as part of the accord produced at the United Nations Climate Change Conference in Copenhagen in 2009, nations of the developed world committed to a goal of $100 billion a year by 2020 to address the needs of poor countries on the front lines of climate change. Many in Bangladesh believe its share should be proportionate to its position as one of the countries most threatened."Climate change has become a kind of business, with lots of money flying around, lots of consultants," says Abu Mostafa Kamal Uddin, former program manager for the government's Climate Change Cell. "During the global financial meltdown, trillions of dollars were mobilized to save the world's banks," he says. "What's wrong with helping the poor people of Bangladesh adapt to a situation we had nothing to do with creating?"Two years after the cyclone, Munshiganj is still drying out. Nasir Uddin and his neighbors are struggling to wring the salt water out of their psyches, rebuild their lives, and avoid being eaten by the tigers that prowl the village at night, driven from the adjacent Sundarbans mangrove forest in search of easy prey. Attacks have risen as population and environmental pressures have increased. Dozens of residents around Munshiganj have perished or been wounded in recent years—two died the week I was there—and some of the attacks occurred in broad daylight."It's bad here, but where else can we go?" Uddin says, surveying the four-foot-high mud platform where he's planning to rebuild his house with an interest-free loan from an NGO. This time he's using wood, which floats, instead of mud. The rice fields around his house are full of water, much of it brackish, and most local farmers have begun raising shrimps or crabs in the brine. Deep wells in the village have gone salty too, he says, forcing people to collect rainwater and apply to NGOs for a water ration, which is delivered by truck to a tank in the village and carried home in aluminum jugs, usually balanced on the heads of young women. "You should take a picture of this place and show it to people driving big cars in your country," says Uddin's neighbor Samir Ranjan Gayen, a short, bearded man who runs a local NGO. "Tell them it's a preview of what South Florida will look like in 40 years."As the people of Munshiganj can attest, there's no arguing with the sea, which is coming for this land sooner or later. And yet it's hard to imagine millions of Bangladeshis packing up and fleeing en masse to India, no matter how bad things become. They'll likely adapt until the bitter end, and then, when things become impossible, adapt a little more. It's a matter of national mentality—a fierce instinct for survival combined with a willingness to put up with conditions the rest of us might not.Abdullah Abu Sayeed, a literacy advocate, explains it this way: "One day I was driving on one of the busiest streets in Dhaka—thousands of vehicles, all of them in a hurry—and I almost ran over a little boy, no more than five or six years old, who was fast asleep on the road divider in the middle of traffic. Cars were whizzing by, passing just inches from his head. But he was at peace, taking a nap in some of the craziest traffic in the world. That's Bangladesh. We are used to precarious circumstances, and our expectations are very, very low. It's why we can adapt to just about anything."",
"In northern India, there is a river with over a hundred names. It starts in the Garhwal Himalaya and drops over 14,000 feet from the terminus of the Gangotri Glacier before marching some 1,550 miles to the Bay of Bengal. For nearly a billion Hindus in India and beyond, it is more than a river. It is the extension of the divine—Lord Shiva. Not only does it transport the prayers of believers visiting its waters, but it also provides sustenance for hundreds of millions of people, vast industry, agriculture, and endangered wildlife like the Bengal tiger and the susu, a blind freshwater dolphin. For Indians it is most commonly known as Ma Ganga—Mother Ganga. For Westerners, it is the Ganges, one of the most sacred of the world’s rivers.The idea was simple. Follow the holy waters of this river source to sea. Climb to the top of the Ganges watershed and follow its flow through the Himalaya, across the Gangetic plain and through the delta to where it kisses the ocean. It would be the classic, age-old river trip down India’s lifeline—a window into the country’s culture, religion, industry, birth, ritual, and love, even death. The goal would be to document the river and the world around it and even measure water quality en route.Having visited the Ganges years before on another assignment for National Geographic, I knew just enough about this world through which the river flowed to realize an important thing: A source-to-sea mission, on paper, is simple. Doing it would be daunting. The mind-boggling logistics involved in any source-to-sea mission are troublesome. In India, they can be perplexing. Communication near remote headwaters is limited or nonexistent. The permit process can suffocate you in bureaucratic paperwork and take six months to a year. It took nine months to initiate the process of hiring a helicopter for a scouting/filming flight. The actual trip would last six weeks.As a visual storyteller, I knew that finding photographic gems and video jewels amid the swarm of beauty, rawness, and messy vitality that makes up India’s tapestry of life would inevitably create a quandary: where and when do you point the lens?Although the Ganges is far from my home and heritage, I grew up on the banks of another famed waterway—the mighty Colorado. Five years ago I followed that river source to sea—by boat, by plane, by foot—to document its beauty and challenges (it no longer reaches the sea). In the process, I learned something obvious to me now but surprising at the time: Few grasp the importance of watersheds and rivers or think of them beyond their own backyard. I, of course, was one of them. I had little awareness of the importance of a river, especially the Colorado, until I chased its waters. Perhaps our Ganges journey could ignite a spark of interest.Our first challenge beyond the logistical minefield of permits, communication, and transportation would be capturing the passion and reverence people exhibit for their beloved waterway, which drains the southern Himalaya. Everyone from pilgrims and politicians to socialites and sadhus flock to the river’s banks to pray, bathe, or merely admire its power. Many rivers worldwide often go unnoticed except for hydroelectric operators and a few recreationalists (boaters and fishermen). But in India, the public embraces the Ganges with open arms. And they do it by praying on the river’s banks daily throughout the entire watershed. In the holy cities of Rishikesh, Haridwar, and Varanasi, formal prayer services with music, fire, and speeches occur every day. They are called aarti—some call it the “Hindu happy hour.”This collective, spiritual hug by the hundreds of millions using the river, however, comes with costs. Pollution and a lack of environmental awareness are visibly notable across much of the watershed. And in many areas, the challenges are compounded by a simple mindset flowing through the same people that revere its sacred flow: The river is God, thus it is all powerful and immune to the threats of overuse, contamination, and environmental degradation. In short, people believe the curative powers of the Ganges will not only heal us, but also itself. It is an illogical environmental conundrum—the Ganges paradox, if you will.For me, this paradox sparks a question: If the physical river dies, what happens to the spiritual power?Many Indians I asked brush away the question suggesting the Ganges can’t die, but admit they are concerned about pollution. One woman who has lived on the Ganges’ shores for 18 years boldly stated, “If the Ganges dies, we all die. Society dies.” My friend and translator for the trip, Madhav, a Hindu monk who grew up traveling the river, says, “After years of cleaning our sins, now it is time to clean the sins placed upon Ma Ganga.” It appears many agree. India’s new prime minister, Narenda Modi, won the recent election on a platform that included cleaning the Ganges. Earlier in July his administration proposed a 340 million dollar budget to do just that, fueling hope across India.In exploring every possible mile of the Ganges, we hoped to better understand the Ganges paradox, maybe even find answers. Joined by professional climbers Jake Norton and Dave Morton we too embraced Ma Ganga, day and night. Madhav would join us downstream as a translator/ guide. Our intended starting point for the journey would be the unclimbed, 22,487-foot Chaukhamba IV summit towering above the Gangotri Glacier like a watchful sentinel.While questions of this river’s health raced through our minds, I fretted about the miles of hurdles ahead. Could we gain access to the big aarti service in Haridwar? Could we film in the tanneries of Kanpur? How do you capture Varanasi’s crumbling beauty? Would we even make the end at Sagar Island? Could we stay healthy?Arriving in August 2013 on the heels of a record monsoon that triggered a glacial outburst flood, our first river lesson presented itself: The Ganges gives and takes away. Over 6,000 people died, and thousands more were reported missing. Miles of roads were washed out and complete hillsides scoured naked. Entire villages were swept into oblivion. The communities we traveled through mourned with stoic resilience. And as we plodded north, I wondered if walking eight days beyond civilization to attempt an unclimbed peak was prudent. The river gods—Hindu and otherwise—appeared far from happy.Nonetheless, we pushed on. Our snow/water samples might add to the story of this challenged, sacred watershed. And documenting the many that live, survive, revere, and even revile this majestic body of water might help unveil some answers to a paradox that plagues it. If nothing else, we would add a chapter to the evolving story of a river called Ma—Mother.To see more videos, images, and posts about this 45-day journey tracking every mile down the sacred Ganges—by foot, boat, bike, aircraft, rickshaw, bus, train, and even elephant—follow National Geographic’s Proof all week. Next: High in the Himalaya, 36 Avalanches and a Silent Refuge.The Ganges River expedition was made possible with funding from Microsoft, Eddie Bauer, National Geographic Society’s Expeditions Council, Ambuja Cement India, and Hach Hyrdolab. The full expedition team includes photographer and videographer Pete McBride, videographers and professional climbers Jake Norton and Dave Morton, and second camera Ashley Mosher.",
"I had been warned that it would be difficult to get into Bangladesh’s shipbreaking yards. “It used to be a tourist attraction,” a local man told me. “People would come watch men tear apart ships with their bare hands. But they don’t let in outsiders anymore.” I walked a few miles along the road that parallels the Bay of Bengal, just north of the city of Chittagong, where 80 active shipbreaking yards line an eight-mile stretch of the coast. Each yard was secured behind high fences topped with razor wire. Guards were posted, and signs warned against photography. Outsiders had become especially unwelcome in recent years after an explosion killed several workers, prompting critics to say the owners put profits above safety. “But they can’t block the sea,” the local said.So late one afternoon I hired a fisherman to take me on a water tour of the yards. At high tide the sea engulfed the rows of beached oil tankers and containerships, and we slipped in and out of the deep shadows cast by their towering smokestacks and superstructures. Some vessels remained intact, as if they had just arrived. Others had been reduced to skeletons, the steel skin cut away to reveal their cavernous black holds.We drifted alongside barnacle-encrusted hulls and beneath the blades of massive propellers. I read off names and flags painted on the sterns: Front Breaker (Comoros), V Europe (Marshall Islands), Glory B (Panama). I wondered about cargoes they had carried, ports where they had called, and crews that had sailed them.The life span of such ships is roughly 25 to 30 years, so most of these likely had been launched during the 1980s. But the rising cost to insure and maintain aging vessels makes them unprofitable to operate. Now their value was contained mostly in their steel bodies.Nearly all the demolition crews had left work for the day, and the ships stood silent, except for the gurgling in their bowels and the occasional echo of metal clanking. The air hung heavy with the odor of brine and diesel fuel. Making our way around one hull, we heard laughter and came upon a group of naked boys who had swum out to a half-submerged piece of wreckage and were using it as a diving platform. Just beyond the line of ships, fishermen were casting their nets for schools of tiny ricefish, a local delicacy.Over the past decade India recycled more ships, but Bangladesh led in deadweight tonnage, meaning the biggest vessels generally ended up on its beaches. China and Turkey enforce more safety measures than the others and take steps to reduce the environmental impact.Suddenly a shower of sparks rained down from the stern several stories above us. A head appeared over the side, then arms waving vigorously. “Move away! We’re cutting this section,” a man yelled down at us. “Do you want to die?”Oceangoing vessels are not meant to be taken apart. They’re designed to withstand extreme forces in some of the planet’s most difficult environments, and they’re often constructed with toxic materials, such as asbestos and lead. When ships are scrapped in the developed world, the process is more strictly regulated and expensive, so the bulk of the world’s shipbreaking is done in Bangladesh, India, and Pakistan, where labor is cheap and oversight is minimal.Industry reforms have come in fits and starts. India now requires more protections for workers and the environment. But in Bangladesh, where 194 ships were dismantled in 2013, the industry remains extremely dirty and dangerous.It also remains highly lucrative. Activists in Chittagong told me that in three to four months the average ship in Bangladeshi yards returns roughly a one-million-dollar profit on an investment of five million, compared with less than $200,000 profit in Pakistan. I called Jafar Alam, former head of the Bangladesh Ship Breakers Association. He denied that profit margins were that high. “It varies by ship and depends on many factors, such as the current price of steel,” he said.Whatever the actual profits, they are realized by doggedly recycling more than 90 percent of each ship. The process begins after a ship-breaker acquires a vessel from an international broker who deals in outdated ships. A captain who specializes in beaching large craft is hired to deliver it to the breaker’s yard, generally a sliver of beach barely a hundred yards wide.Once the ship is mired in the mud, its liquids are siphoned out, including any remaining diesel fuel, engine oil, and firefighting chemicals, which are resold. Then the machinery and fittings are stripped. Everything is removed and sold to salvage dealers—from enormous engines, batteries, generators, and miles of copper wiring to the crew bunks, portholes, lifeboats, and electronic dials on the bridge.After the ship has been reduced to a steel hulk, swarms of laborers from the poorest parts of Bangladesh use acetylene torches to slice the carcass into pieces. These are hauled off the beach by teams of loaders, then melted down and rolled into rebar for use in construction.“It sounds like a good business until you consider the poison that is soaking into our land,” says Muhammed Ali Shahin, an activist with the NGO Shipbreaking Platform. “Until you’ve met the widows of young men who were crushed by falling pieces of steel or suffocated inside a ship.” At 37 Shahin has been working for more than 11 years to raise awareness about the plight of the men who toil in these yards. The industry, he says, is controlled by a few powerful Chittagong families who also hold stakes in the ancillary businesses, including the steel rerolling mills.Shahin insists he’s not blind to his country’s desperate need for the jobs shipbreaking creates. “I do not say shipbreaking must stop entirely,” he says. “But it must be done cleaner and safer with better treatment for the workers.”His criticism isn’t reserved just for Bangladeshi ship-breakers. “In the West you don’t let people pollute your countries by breaking up ships on your beaches. Why is it OK for poor workers to risk their lives to dispose of your unwanted ships here?”In the sprawling shantytowns that have grown up around the yards, I met dozens of the workers about whom Shahin is most concerned: the men who cut the steel and haul it off the beaches. Many had deep, jagged scars. “Chittagong tattoos,” one man called them. Some men were missing fingers. A few were blind in one eye.In one home I meet a family whose four sons worked in the yards. The oldest, Mahabub, 40, spent two weeks as a cutter’s helper before witnessing a man burn to death when his torch sparked a pocket of gas belowdecks. “I didn’t even collect my pay for fear they wouldn’t let me leave,” he says, explaining that bosses often intimidate workers to keep silent about accidents.He points to a photo in a small glass cabinet. “This is Jahangir, my second oldest brother,” Mahabub says. Jahangir went to work at 15, after their father died. “He was a cutter in the Ziri Subedar yard and was fatally injured there in 2008.” He and his fellow workers had been cutting a large section for three days, but it wouldn’t fall. During a rainstorm they took shelter beneath the piece, and it suddenly gave way.The third brother, Alamgir, 22, is not home. He had been assisting a cutter when he fell through a hatch on a tanker, plunging about 90 feet into the hold. Miraculously, enough water had seeped into the bottom to break his fall. One of his friends risked his own life to shinny down a rope and pull him out. Alamgir quit the next day. Now he serves tea to the managers in the yard’s office.The youngest brother, Amir, 18, still works as a cutter’s helper. He is a wiry boy with smooth, unscarred skin and a nervous smile. I ask if he’s scared by his brothers’ experiences. “Yes,” he says, smiling shyly as if unsure what to say next. As we talk, a thunderclap shakes the tin roof. Another boom follows. I look outside, expecting to see the onset of one of Bangladesh’s famously violent monsoons, but the sun is shining. “It’s a large piece falling from a ship,” says the boy. “We hear this every day.”",
"With a driving vision of building tomorrow, a collection of excavators are helping to protect the Sundarbans, a historic region between India and Bangladesh, from the threat of flooding. In Bengali, ‘Sundarbans’ means 'beautiful forest' – an appropriate name for the largest delta and mangrove forest on Earth.Situated along the Bay of Bengal, the treasured Sundarbans delta is a unique part of the world. Untold numbers of human, animal and marine life all draw life from these fertile lands, including the Bengal Tiger. It is such a diverse and harmonious ecosystem that it has been proclaimed a UNESCO World Heritage Site. But even this can’t protect inhabitants from growing natural threats.This archipelago of islands is affected by one of the most dramatic examples of rising sea levels in recent history; increasing by anywhere between three and eight mm per year. It’s up to twice the rise of the global average. Some islands have been losing 200 meters of their coastline a year, killing off 90 kilometers of mangrove forest from land erosion within the last few years. One of the primary contributors to this was the 2009 cyclone Aila, which swept away the mud embankments that naturally protected the area, exposing local fishing and farming communities to repeated flooding and tides so dramatic they swallow up almost one third of the land each day.Covering 3,500 kilometers of coastline, the previous embankments were created in the 18th century, when the British empire cropped the mangroves back to make space for agriculture. Unfortunately, the heavy rains and 140km/h winds Aila brought finally proved too much, tearing down the embankments and destroying hundreds of thousands of homes. When the water finally receded, over 400 kilometers of embankments were breached and the lands behind were saturated with salt water.Locals in the Sundarbans have started a project to rebuild these walls by hand, but what unfolded was an extremely labour and time-intensive operation. So to help the islanders, the Indian Government initiated the Sundarbans Embankment Reconstruction Project, which is using modern machinery to support and speed up the process.Since the reconstruction started, the project has utilised 20 Volvo excavators, 1,600km of concrete and the hard work of many skilled laborours to build up much hardier embankments, ensuring land and livestock are protected once and for all. So far, 5,000 meters of new embankments have been constructed.Modern technology aside though, the project is still not without challenges. Just getting people, equipment and supplies to the construction site is hard going. The nearest city, Kolkata, is 100 kilometers away, and the only way to travel to the delta area of the Sundarbans is by boat, meaning both humans and machines must be transported via the water ways to islands in the delta.Luckily, with the use of heavy construction equipment, the embankments are now fortified with broad concrete blocks to create a more resistant protection of the islands and their inhabitants. Not only do these concrete embankments protect the people, animals and fertile lands behind them – they also provide lengths of road along their tops, granting easier access to the area. A development that has made selling grain grown in Sundarbans a more viable venture, and may even allow the area to become one of the major grain siloes in the world.More and more areas are being affected by rising sea levels and extreme weather conditions, likely as a result of climate change. But by fortifying protective structures with modern engineering, the Sundarbans will be better suited for whatever challenges tomorrow brings.Discover more about the Sundarbans Embankment Reconstruction Project here.",
"The deportees from the United States file out of the buses with their heads down, stripped of belts and shoelaces like criminals.Rounded up from immigration detention centers around the country, they’d been boarded onto an unmarked jet near the Texas-Mexico border early in the morning and flown more than 1,100 miles to an airport outside El Salvador’s capital, San Salvador. In just four hours a perilous journey north that had taken many of the migrants years to prepare for and weeks to complete was undone.“Welcome,” a Salvadoran migration officer greets them in a new reception center built with help from the U.S. government. “You are family here.” A hundred and nineteen blank faces stare back. One by one, names are called out, and the men and women come forward to receive their belongings, undergo health screenings, and collect bus fare to get them home.A 24-year-old man with a strong build and easy smile sits in the back wearing a white T-shirt hand-scrawled with the words “Faith Hope Love.” Like many in El Salvador, he doesn’t want to reveal his name. As a teenager in rural Usulután, one of the country’s 14 departments, he’d been pressured to join Mara Salvatrucha, the largest gang in El Salvador, also known as MS-13. He signed up for the police academy instead, and when the gang found out, death threats followed.He fled south to Colombia, where he found work as a truck driver and fell in love. His girlfriend got a visa to the U.S. and took a plane to join relatives. He paid a coyote, or people smuggler, $8,000 and spent the next month running a seven-border gantlet up the Central American isthmus, finally slipping into Texas and heading east to Atlanta. There, a relative who’s a permanent U.S. resident gave him a job installing sprinklers that paid $3,000 a month, more than five times the average monthly household income in El Salvador. He sent $500 back to El Salvador each month to help his mother and grandmother.For five years in Georgia he kept a low profile. Work on weekdays, parks and malls on weekends, church on Sundays. No traffic tickets or run-ins with the law. Until an unlucky morning in September 2017, when he was stopped at a random police checkpoint and arrested for driving without a license. Georgia police handed him over to Immigration and Customs Enforcement authorities, who locked him up.The man’s name is called out. He picks up his wallet and Bible and laces up his boots. “I’m really scared,” he confides. News reports about El Salvador that he’s watched in the U.S. have given him the impression that gangs have “taken over the whole country.” Of one thing he is sure: “I will go back to the U.S.A. as soon as I can.”His next ordeal starts the moment he steps into the street in San Salvador. The reception center is located in an MS-13 stronghold, as graffiti on the opposite corner attests. The nearest cash machine is two blocks away on the turf of MS-13’s archenemy, the 18th Street gang.El Salvador’s government says that criminal gangs command an estimated 60,000 active members, and their battle for supremacy has fractured this tiny country of 6.4 million people along an expanding web of invisible fault lines that run red. In 2017 the homicide rate was 61 per 100,000 people, making El Salvador the second deadliest of any country not at war, after Venezuela.El Salvador is locked in the latest phase of a social conflict that exploded during the 1980-1992 civil war, in which leftist guerrillas rose up against a wealthy elite and the military state that had long dispossessed the rural underclass of land. With the stated aim of stopping communism in its backyard, the U.S. supported El Salvador’s right-wing dictatorships with billions of dollars of economic and military aid that prolonged the bloodshed. By the time the war ended, in a stalemate, 75,000 people were dead and more than a million were displaced, hundreds of thousands of whom fled to the U.S. From Los Angeles to Washington, D.C., Salvadoran refugees found employment and community, and they sent money home.The children who came with them, displaced youths craving identity in a foreign land, created MS-13 on the streets of Los Angeles and swelled the ranks of a rival, 18th Street—a Hispanic gang that formed around 18th Street in the Pico-Union neighborhood of Los Angeles and absorbed wayward refugees from Central America. As gang wars, and the war on gangs, intensified, laws were enacted that made it easier to deport immigrants with criminal records. In the late 1990s the U.S. began exporting thousands of convicts back to Central America each year. In the vacuum of weak governance and poverty in their home country, gang members reproduced their social structures and tactics and multiplied exponentially.“We knew how to use weapons, make bombs,” says Ricardo, a former barrio leader of 18th Street who was deported after a conviction for stealing cars. The returnees spawned “a social monster—and we’re still dealing with that monster,” he adds. In the teeming slums of San Salvador, a metro area of a million people, competition for turf and status bred a kill-or-be-killed strain of nihilism far more extreme than anything he’d known on the streets of Los Angeles.A hell of hyperviolence and economic despair has since engulfed the country and its neighbors, driving tens of thousands of Central Americans north to the U.S., where generations of migrants have carved out safe, dignified, and law-abiding lives for their families. As the exodus continues, the U.S. is threatening to deport legions of Salvadorans back to the horrors they fled.Today some 200,000 Salvadorans in the U.S. have temporary protected status (TPS), a designation that allows undocumented migrants deemed at risk because of armed conflict or environmental disasters in their home countries to stay in the U.S. People like Abel, in his 50s, a soft-spoken maintenance worker in the Washington, D.C., area who sends money back home every month. He says he came to the U.S. for “the dream”: honest work, security, a better life. The reality is bittersweet. He’s seen his children just once in 18 years, and his wife died in his absence. “Life is cold here,” he says matter-of-factly. “But there is opportunity, and so we must endure.”In January 2018, President Donald Trump’s administration ordered an end to TPS for Salvadorans. It was set to expire in September 2019, but a U.S. district court halted that plan, allowing Salvadorans to continue to live and work in the U.S. until a final decision is made. The about-face has been accompanied by a surge of federal immigration raids and the forced separation of newly arriving migrant families at the U.S.-Mexico border. Like every TPS holder I spoke with, Abel plans to stay in the U.S. illegally if TPS ends, rather than return to El Salvador voluntarily. “I’ve sacrificed too much to give up,” he says.Despite Trump’s “zero tolerance” policy that resulted in separation of families and increased detentions at the southwest border of the U.S., the seemingly endless cycle of revenge between rival gangs and between gangs and authorities—not only in El Salvador but also in Guatemala and Honduras—keeps pushing people north. Last fall a caravan of more than 5,000 Central American migrants began walking toward the U.S., drawing renewed global attention to the crisis.High in Morazán department, in northeastern El Salvador, the legacy of U.S. involvement still smolders. Driving past lush farms and volcanoes that thrust into the clouds, I reach the village of El Mozote. It was here in 1981 that Salvadoran soldiers armed and trained by the U.S. massacred more than 1,000 civilians, mostly children. According to a cable sent from the U.S. Embassy in San Salvador to the State Department, the U.S. government went to great lengths to bury the truth of the massacre.Morazán is one of the most economically depressed regions of El Salvador, having never recovered from the war’s devastation. It is also one of the least violent. Some ascribe this to the vigilance of the local people, many of whom are ex-rebel combatants. The simpler explanation is economic. Gangs, though present in nearly all the country’s municipalities, gravitate toward urban areas where commerce concentrates and extortion opportunities are greater.In a sunburned cornfield outside town, Bernaldino Vigil, a farmer who says his father was executed by government troops during the war, says droughts and fickle weather have wiped out successive crops. Debts have mounted, preventing him from leaving and forcing his two daughters still at home to drop out of school and work alongside him. “Sure, we have peace,” he says, “but it’s getting harder to survive.”José María Guevara, a convenience store owner in El Mozote, lost 30 relatives in the massacre but survived because he left during the war and returned later. He has sent two of his children to New York City. One cleans houses; the other works as a gardener. His youngest daughter, Rosa, is eager to follow in their footsteps because it’s too expensive to continue her university studies in the city two hours away. “I’ll take any job in America,” she says. Most of her friends have left for the U.S. or moved to cities such as San Miguel and San Salvador, but Trump’s election put Rosa’s travel plans on hold. Guevara says he would have had to take out a loan to pay a coyote’s $10,000 fee, a gamble that could have cost him his shop. “If she got caught and sent back, we’d all be screwed,” he says.Distrito Italia, a barrio north of San Salvador, was built with Italian-government funding through the World Bank after a magnitude 7.6 earthquake in 1986 left 300,000 homeless. The barrio boasts wide brick lanes and graffiti-free walls thanks to a cleanup effort led by my guide, Pastor Mario Hernández. But MS-13 has no need to advertise its presence here—the gang’s control is total.Gangs are known to help transport drugs and guns and even shake down transnational companies operating in El Salvador, but most of their money comes from what are called micro-extortions. Almost everyone with a business in Distrito Italia, from the bus driver to the pupusa vendor, pays something to MS-13—five dollars, $10, $50 a month. An estimate by the digital newspaper El Faro, based on the government operation investigating MS-13 finances, says it all adds up to annual revenue of more than $30 million for the gang nationwide. Overall, violence costs the national economy four billion dollars a year.Hernández introduces me to Aaron, a lean 20-year-old in a sports jersey and gold hoop earrings. He’s never been jumped into the gang—beaten by a group for the symbolic 13 seconds—but he is “associated,” which means he’s ordered to run the odd package, collect money here and there, keep watch. Aaron tells the pastor that overnight a gang member was gunned down by rivals, the 10th friend he’s lost, he says, counting out with his fingers.We walk deeper into the barrio, and Aaron nods to the “antennas” posted on every other corner. Lanky teens thumbing cell phones with seeming indifference, they’re poised at the push of a button to relay word of any intruder. Where the sidewalk peters into dirt, we find Julio, 30, a veteran gang member dressed in all blue with a Los Angeles Dodgers cap—classic MS-13 dress code. He scans over our shoulders, uneasy. A text message says police are patrolling the area. “They could be over there,” he says, pointing across a small field, “and just start shooting.”After a state-brokered truce between MS-13 and 18th Street began to fall apart in 2013, the national homicide rate reached 104 per 100,000 people in 2015. Authorities have responded with a campaign of “extraordinary measures.” They include the creation of elite police units, use of the army troops in security efforts, and near-free rein to conduct searches and seizures. In January 2015 the government gave officers a green light to shoot at criminals “without fearing consequences for their actions,” heralding a shift toward shoot-to-kill tactics borne out by mounting reports of extrajudicial killings and torture that hark back to 1980s-era brutality.Julio rocks back and forth. Another text comes through, and he takes off.On our way back to the pastor’s church, Aaron tells me he’s several months from graduating from high school and wants to pursue a degree in physical education to support his mother, who sells secondhand clothes from the U.S. Trouble is, he can’t leave the barrio. A couple of months back, he had to decline a spot with a soccer club because if he played on 18th Street turf, his neighborhood affiliation could get him killed.“I try to keep my distance from the homeboys and stay on the right path,” he says, “but it’s like prison.” Hernández says many young men like Aaron end up wasting away and getting girls pregnant, adding to the socioeconomic pressure that fuels la delincuencia, or criminal activity.The last time Aaron asked his older brother in Houston to send money so he could travel north, his brother urged him to stay put because life in the U.S. was getting harder. “What’s left?” Aaron sighs. “Join the gang? I don’t want to do that because I know my fate—I’ll end up dead.”At that moment a truck full of police officers in tactical fatigues and black ski masks whips around the corner, then slows down to size us up, assault rifles at the ready. Aaron throws them a wary glance; the truck moves on. A couple of blocks farther down the street, Julio pops out from a back alley, sweating and short of breath.On a hot Sunday morning in the Dina neighborhood, an 18th Street stronghold in south San Salvador, Pastor Nelson Moz stands before a packed house at the Eben-Ezer Baptist Missionary Church. He opens his sermon with a call for divine protection in a time of darkness. The front line with MS-13 is less than 50 yards up the street, and tit-for-tat killings have spiked recently. Out front, latecomers stride past a derelict car with a blown-out rear window.The pastor’s words resonate with Sara, a lifelong resident whose grandson Alex was gunned down three years ago around the corner from her family home. She says he was killed by police officers after he refused to talk to them and kept walking. “He was a good boy,” she affirms. Afraid to pursue justice for fear of reprisals from the police, the family raised money to hire a coyote to guide one of her daughters and a granddaughter to Indio, California, where two of Sara’s other children lived. They send money home every month, but all are undocumented and the rise in immigration raids has her on edge. “Their fate,” Sara says, “is in God’s hands.”The sermon segues into a parable about sin and redemption, a theme important to the dozen or so former gang members in the crowd who have found their way to Moz’s rehabilitation program. Some have covered their facial tattoos with makeup. Gang markings carry a heavy social stigma in El Salvador and make members an easier target for rivals and police. Eyes closed, palms raised to the sky, the men shed tears and offer up pleas for forgiveness.Moz’s charges live on the church premises, under strict conditions. To stay, they must renounce the gang and study the Bible. They sleep in cramped bunks, rise at dawn to bake bread, which they sell to support themselves, and pledge to get their ink removed.It’s life on a razor’s edge. “The state knows nothing but pressure and violence, which creates more violence,” Moz explains. “And the gang forgives nothing.” He shows me a picture on his phone of a 19-year-old who strayed from the program, lying facedown in a pool of blood, one of five young men he’s lost.A memorial service is held that afternoon for another of his flock: an 18th Street member who joined Moz’s church after seven years in prison, only to be gunned down in front of a corner store two blocks away. An evangelical rock band warms up next to the spot, and Ricardo, the former barrio gang leader, is rigging up the speakers.In 1983 Ricardo, then 18, fled Dina for the U.S. He arrived in Los Angeles as the gang culture there was metastasizing from street brawls into gun battles over the booming trade in crack cocaine. He gravitated toward 18th Street, which was becoming one of the city’s largest and most violent gangs. He rose to lead its notorious Shatto Park Locos clique before landing in prison in Southern California and signing his own deportation papers back to El Salvador. Ricardo has been shot five times. “I know I have to pay for the things I’ve done,” he says.In 2007, Ricardo says, he heard God’s call and told the gang he was walking away. As an example for his sons and grandsons, he lasered off the giant 18th Street tattoo that covered his chest and stomach. Now in his 50s, he drives a delivery truck to pay the rent, goes home early, and tries to keep his distance from the active members, who are always watching. “You walk with God or the devil,” he says, “but you can’t serve both.”Israel Ticas is an expert on the devil’s work. One of the few forensic criminologists working for El Salvador’s attorney general, he’s tasked with digging up the casualties of gang mayhem and calls himself “lawyer for the dead.” Prosecutors need bodies to convict the killers they catch, so gangs have gone to great lengths to dispose of victims—and anyone who would dare unearth them. Ticas, who has survived attempts on his life, says he carries a pistol wherever he goes and expects that one day he too will be killed.At the end of a long, tree-shaded dirt road that runs into a coffee plantation outside San Salvador, Ticas is searching for his 66th body of the year, accompanied by a squad of armed police and a slight young man in baggy jeans and balaclava: the informant, a defector from 18th Street. The victim he’s helping Ticas locate was a fellow 18th Street member whose arrest and swift release brought suspicion that he was a rat. According to Ticas, the gang lured him to the plantation on the pretext that they’d be killing an MS-13 rival, then strangled him with a wire, chopped up the corpse with a machete, and buried the remains at the base of a tree.Three years have passed since then, and the informant’s guidance yields nothing. “This dirt here is too dark and uniform,” Ticas explains. “If this were the right spot, the colors would be mixed”—a sign the ground had been disturbed. “Like this,” Ticas says. He starts a series of fresh holes and tells the informant to keep digging.The last time I followed Ticas to a crime scene, he smashed through the floor of an abandoned house to exhume a man who’d been hog-tied and stabbed. In a country where murder has become mundane, Ticas keeps exhaustive records and chilling mementos in his office “museum”: skulls, homemade weapons tainted with blood, snapshots of beheadings, flayed bodies, and other torture killings too obscene to describe.Most victims Ticas unearths are women and girls—used, abused, and targeted in revenge killings. In 2017, 468 women were killed, one every 19 hours. Countless others are missing. One survey found that only six out of every hundred women would even report a rape, reflecting an overwhelming fear of gangs and the systemic betrayal by authorities, says Silvia Juárez of Ormusa, a group that works to stop violence against women. The state is “failing” to address an epidemic of femicide and sexual violence, she says, “and this is what’s causing so many women to flee.”At a safe house in the capital, a transgender woman who says she was gang-raped and then threatened by police after reporting the crime says it’s too dangerous for her to try to leave. Her only option is to lie low and hope her asylum request is granted by a European country. In the past the destination of choice was reliably the United States, a haven for the oppressed. These days it’s looking more like a dead end.",
"The Kurdish soldiers stood on a berm, next to a gunner’s dugout, in a corner of their position. It was one of several forward positions on a front line that ran along the crest of a mountainside and faced west onto the Tigris River Valley. The sun had set on a late summer day—the driest season in Iraq, when land and sky seem to merge. Still, through the thickening dark the soldiers could make out, on the river’s near bank, the lights of the city of Mosul. Though this was a vista they could have described in their sleep—for months these soldiers, who were with the peshmerga, the army of Iraqi Kurdistan, had surveilled and mapped and discussed every inch—its fascination and menace never dimmed. Everything they looked at belonged to the Islamic State.It was late July 2016, and the battle for Mosul, long rumored, was finally at hand. A liberation force was assembling. The Iraqi military had beaten the Islamic State, also known as ISIS, out of Fallujah and was now fighting its way north toward Mosul. The peshmerga was pushing in from this mountain. U.S. and European forces were massing, as were soldiers and militiamen from Turkey, Iran, and elsewhere. It was the biggest show of international force against ISIS yet. ISIS had held Mosul, Iraq’s second largest city, for two years.Mosul’s fall would drive the jihadists from the country once and for all, the planners hoped.Inside Mosul there was panic. The United Nations had estimated that more than a million people would be displaced by the battle. (Before ISIS, Mosul had about 1.4 million residents.) Civilian casualties would be terrible: ISIS was busy mining streets and booby-trapping buildings. Residents were escaping the city by any means they could, and this Kurdish position was the terminus of a popular escape route. Almost every night people scrambled up the mountainside, arriving here with only the clothing on their backs.Tonight the soldiers were expecting a family of seven. The father, a nurse, had phoned a cousin who lived near the mountain. The cousin had notified the commander. Now cousin and commander stood on the berm together.The family’s journey would be treacherous. If they were caught by ISIS trying to escape Mosul, they might be jailed, beaten, beheaded, or all three. If they got out of the city, that was only the beginning: Next they would have to get to Fazilia, the village the position overlooked, at the foot of the mountain. ISIS controlled Fazilia and sent up the slope homemade artillery—including, lately, crude chemical missiles—snipers, and suicide bombers. (Recently a pair had gotten to within 50 feet of where the soldiers now stood before blowing themselves up.) If the nurse’s family made it out of Fazilia, they would have to negotiate the mountainside’s boulders without aid of trail or light. With so much dust in the sky, not even the moon would help.Ayham Ali's wife, Nawal, and children arrive exhausted but grateful to be safe at the peshmerga position above the village of Fazilia.A Kurdish soldier consoles a child, also from Mosul.Two days before, the nurse had sent his wife and children from Mosul with a people-smuggler. That afternoon he had reconvened with them near Fazilia. They crouched among the olive trees until sundown. The cousin, whose name was Tayeb, had been able to give the nurse only the vaguest of directions: “Go up the mountain.”Tayeb’s phone rang. It was the nurse, whose name was Ayham Ali. Tayeb handed the phone to a Kurdish interpreter who translated the directions from the soldiers to Ali. (Ali spoke Arabic, the soldiers Kurdish.) In the pressure of the moment and his eagerness to encourage Ali, the interpreter gave the nurse a promotion.“Where are you, doctor?”An anxious voice came from the other end.“Go 500 meters to the right. You’ll see a small valley. Go into the valley.”The crying of a child came through.“Don’t worry, doctor. You’re safe now.”A soldier switched on a flashlight and moved it from side to side.“Tell him to follow the light,” the soldier said.“Doctor, do you see the light?” the interpreter said.“Don’t move the light so much. ISIS might see,” said the commander.For the next few hours, Ali hiked and then called for more directions, hiked then called. The connection broke off. For some time, nothing. When Ali called back, near 11 p.m., he was lost and worried. He had sent his eldest daughter ahead to try to find the way and hadn’t seen her since. He thought ISIS had spotted them. The interpreter told Ali to describe what he saw around him.“I know where you are. Don’t go to the left. Go right. If you go left, you won’t make it. It’s too steep.”Announcing he was going down to look for them, Tayeb jumped from the berm, followed by two soldiers. They kept pace with him until the drop-off, then stooped each to a knee and lifted their rifles to their shoulders.Smoke rises from the Qayyarah oil fields, set alight by ISIS.Distended minutes passed. Near midnight Tayeb returned carrying a small girl, her eyes wide and wet with fear. He put her down, turned around, and disappeared again. A soldier picked her up; he bounced her gently and cooed. Soon a boy and two more girls, one the eldest daughter, arrived, and Tayeb came back with the youngest child in his arms. He had dropped her, and her forehead was swelling, but she was silent.The mother, Nawal, which means “gift,” appeared. She wore a black abaya and black hijab. She sank to her knees. In a reverie or delirium she chronicled their ordeal to no one in particular.“We were so hungry in Mosul. There was no money, no food,” she said. “It’s all right if we die here hungry. We’re safe. This is the best moment of my life.”Ali, the last of the party, emerged behind her, looking ill with relief. His clothing was ragged, his scraggly beard glistening with sweat.“Let’s move. There are snipers,” the commander said.The soldiers brought the family toward the camp.“We’re here. It’s fine if I die now,” the mother said.They gulped down water.“Don’t drink so much water. It’s not good,” the commander said.“Our water finished on the mountain,” Ali said. “I feel like I’m in paradise.” He prayed for the safety of all Muslims and then took up his own narration. “It’s not easy to leave your parents. But I was dying there. There were 20 of us. My brother sold ice cream. He made no money. We fought, he and I.”ISIS had seized Mosul two years earlier, in June 2014. A mix of Iraqis and foreigners, they rode into the city in convoys. They burned down the police stations and army checkpoints. They hoisted flags with the black-and-white ISIS logo, installed new imams in the mosques, new teachers in the schools. From the Great Mosque of al Nuri, Abu Bakr al Baghdadi, newly split from al Qaeda, proclaimed the creation of the Islamic State and himself its caliph. He commanded Muslims everywhere: “Obey me.”Some residents fled; others went into hiding. Many rejoiced. How Ali had felt, he didn’t say, but at first, he recalled, life wasn’t bad. He was able to continue working at the hospital. Soon enough, however, the misery began. There were, of course, the torture and executions in public. These became so common as to be unremarkable, though never did they cease to be horrifying. But with enough caution one could avoid them. Unavoidable was the tedious ignominy of daily life. Everything was regulated, everyone watched. The jihadists’ greatest concern was appearance, it seemed to him. The worse life got, the more ISIS flags went up. Ali was made to cut the length of his pants to adhere to the “Afghan” style ISIS leaders preferred. He was told to grow a beard, then grow it longer. To go in public, Nawal had to be accompanied by a man in her family and cover herself entirely in black.“If she wore even a sandal with a heel, she might be beaten,” Ali said. “They didn’t treat us like humans.”In 2015 Mosul was cut off by security forces. The markets went empty. The electricity was cut, then the water. ISIS got more brutal. When Ali bandaged the hand of a woman who wasn’t fully covered, he was accused of being sexually involved with her. He was jailed and received 50 lashings and counted himself lucky to still have his head. Air strikes flattened Mosul around him. He realized he must risk a quick death and leave—or stay and die slowly.In Al Alam, near Tikrit, 11 local men were publicly executed near the intersection where a memorial to them now stands. Monuments, billboards, posters, and artwork commemorating the victims of ISIS's atrocities are increasingly common around Iraq.In Ramadi, residents and refugees live in an apartment complex ruined by bombs and air strikes.In the stadium district of Ramadi, a onetime ISIS stronghold, the destruction is vast.Near Makhmur, a government-controlled city south of Mosul, is a large refugee camp. Like all refugee camps in Iraq, it’s overflowing; the war with ISIS has internally displaced more than three million Iraqis, according to the UN, and sent another quarter million to seek safety abroad. In this particular camp the men were cordoned off, not for religious reasons but because there might be ISIS members among the refugees. The camp had subsumed a primary school, where women and children gathered. In the classrooms the desks had been pushed to the walls and the floors heaped with clothing, bedrolls, teapots, buckets. In one classroom two middle-aged sisters-in-law recounted how Mosul was overrun.“People clapped and threw sweets at the ISIS trucks,” one sister said, and she understood why. For years the national government in Baghdad had neglected Mosul, as it had so much of Iraq. Services were inadequate. The economy was dormant. And for years—since the U.S.-led occupation began—men in the city, particularly Sunni Muslims, had been abused by security forces. They were routinely accused of being insurgents for no reason. Her brother and her cousins were jailed and beaten. Some men never returned. This was true of all the Sunni families she knew. “Many men were taken.”The decent soldiers and police they knew, meanwhile, felt no allegiance to the government. In the weeks before ISIS invaded, some of these men found letters tacked to their doors reading, “Quit the army or die.” Others received anonymous phone calls from someone who said, “Leave the police force, or you’ll be beheaded.” They quit, of course. Some fled, some hid, some joined ISIS, whose leaders said they were there to free the people from the government, from irreligion and dishonor. The people believed them.It wasn’t long before the Hisbah, ISIS’s religious police, turned a cemetery in the sisters’ neighborhood into an execution ground. Locals, including children, were made to watch the beheadings. Cameras were set up, and the footage was broadcast on jumbo screens mounted at intersections and in plazas.Streets in Fallujah, wrested from ISIS in June, are deserted.Among the people who had welcomed ISIS was a neighboring family. One of the sons, a student, joined up. He was pleased with himself. One day, a sister took him aside and said, “ISIS is laughing at you, you know. They just want to kill you.”He was enraged.“When you speak to me like this, it’s the same as insulting the Prophet,” he said.He was later killed in a battle.“Even his mother was praying for ISIS,” she said, her brow raised almost to the hem of her hijab in disbelief, a look in her eyes that might have suggested amusement if it wasn’t so full of noble distaste. “These people are waiting for their deaths.”At the Makhmur military base, a soldier from Mosul in his 30s named Salim was discussing the same subject with colleagues. Lighting a cigarette, he pointed out that ISIS’s takeover hadn’t been sudden. It was common knowledge that for years the dissident underworld in Mosul—a mixture of Islamists, nationalists, guns for hire, and young men with nothing better to do—had been talking about overthrowing Iraq’s then prime minister, Nouri al-Maliki, a Shiite. This underworld, out of which the stridently Sunni Islamic State would grow, was extreme, but it represented a discontent that many in Mosul—indeed, that many Iraqis—had felt since 2003.The militants carried out bombings and assassinations. They killed a brother of Salim’s. Even his own family was split between soldiers and insurgents.“My brother was killed by our cousin,” he admitted.The other soldiers groaned knowingly. Many families were so divided.It took the army in Mosul six days to collapse. Ten thousand soldiers were run off by an ISIS force of perhaps 1,500 men. No one is certain exactly why. Fear, indifference, conspiracy. After his unit disbanded, Salim paid a smuggler to take him to Baghdad. He had heard, as everyone had, that some commanders had been in league with ISIS. It is commonly believed that the prime minister ordered the city forsaken. “Leave it to the jihadists,” he is rumored to have said. The state was meaningless. National unity was a fiction. Salim’s eyes welled, and he pounded a closed fist to his chest.“This is what breaks my heart!”“Mosul was sold by Maliki,” a soldier said.Soldiers inspect a shallow grave at a teachers college in Fallujah that ISIS had turned into a court and execution chamber. Corpses were buried in mass graves under paving stones and floorboards.In the ruins of the city's main hospital, a soldier illuminates an ISIS logo and document.ISIS made the hospital its headquarters in Fallujah—and its last stand in the city.There is little ambiguity in how the Islamic State managed to take so much of Syria, where various insurgents have carved out niches. The same is true of Libya, the group’s toehold in North Africa. More complex, and more revealing, is the question of how it won over so much of Iraq, a country that in 2014 was more peaceful than it had been in years, a state on the mend. How did the group lay hold of Mosul, Iraq’s second largest city, in less than a week—and of Fallujah, Ramadi, Tikrit, vast swaths of countryside?One explanation, so obvious it is usually ignored, is that ISIS is very much a product of Iraq. True, its proxies and sympathizers have staged attacks in at least 29 countries, killing almost 3,000 people. True, citizens of as many as a hundred countries have gone off to join its ranks. But for all of ISIS’s claims to be a “universal caliphate,” all the group’s expansionism and polyglot enticements, it was created in Iraq and is led by Iraqis. It burst from the cauldron of Iraqi history. And it was among common Iraqis—exhausted by two generations of war, disgusted with their leadership, surfeited with disgrace—that ISIS won its most crucial popular support.Mosul provides some insight, but to really understand the rise of ISIS in Iraq, one must look to the so-called Sunni Triangle, and specifically to Anbar Governorate. Geographers consider Anbar, Iraq’s biggest province (for square mileage it surpasses Greece), part of the Arabian Peninsula. Its expanse of steppe and desert in Iraq’s western extremity shares more borderland with Saudi Arabia, Syria, and Jordan than with Iraq. Governed largely by tribal tradition and sheikhs, Anbar is the center of Sunni culture in Iraq, as well as the seat of opposition to the national government in Baghdad and, it might be said, to modern notions of government generally.The Islamic State began gestating, as a collective of Sunni Islamist groups, by 2006. Over the next half decade it gained shape and power, taking in former Baathist fighters left over from the time of Iraqi president Saddam Hussein, deposed in April 2003. In 2012 and 2013, ISIS metastasized throughout Syria. In the first days of January 2014, it took up arms in Ramadi, Anbar’s capital. A few hundred militants seized much of the city. As they would in Mosul, the government forces collapsed, though they managed to hold on to a portion of Ramadi. For most of the next two years, its residents lived in an intermittent war of attrition. The situation drew comparisons to partitioned Berlin.The Iraqi military reassembled and was joined by Shiite militias and a U.S.-led international coalition. At the end of 2015 Ramadi was “liberated,” as state television put it. But to anyone returning there this summer, when residents who had fled were being allowed back en masse, that seemed an optimistic word. Now the city actually looked like postwar Berlin. Firefights and bombings and air strikes—many of the last indiscriminate, the extent of the destruction suggested—had left Ramadi in rubble. Whole districts were not just uninhabitable but unrecognizable.On a corner in the Tamim neighborhood, a onetime ISIS stronghold, stood a large house that belonged to a prominent family who had fled. A son had returned and was taking in anyone who needed a place to stay. Among the guests sleeping on his floor were men who had fought against ISIS and men who had sided with it. One of the latter was Abu Hamsim, in his late 30s, muscular, partial to a pink polo shirt whose collar he kept popped. He was proudly devout but not sanctimonious. He didn’t smoke and sequestered himself to pray five times a day and didn’t mind his housemates smoking and blaspheming around him.Though Saddam Hussein was from Tikrit, Anbar was his real base of support. It was here that, after being chased from Kuwait in 1991, he came to proclaim his victory in “the mother of all battles.” It was also through Anbar, for centuries the gateway into Iraq for new ideas coming from other parts of the Muslim world, that the tracts of the Muslim Brotherhood arrived. The sermons of more extreme Salafist clerics followed.An intelligence officer steps through a hole connecting two homes, part of an ISIS tunnel system in Fallujah.In Fallujah, soldiers inspect a makeshift ISIS jail, once the mansion of a wealthy contractor.In Kirkuk a prisoner who admitted working as a bombmaker for al Qaeda and then ISIS is held at a local police base.“Life was good under Saddam,” Abu Hamsim said. Even after the first Gulf War, when Iraq was embrittled by international sanctions, there was enough to eat, free health care and schooling, cheap gas, little crime. “People respected—feared—the law.”Abu Hamsim was a soldier serving on a Scud crew when the next war with America began. His commander, knowing his men stood no chance, told them not to fight. Abu Hamsim considered this cowardice and treachery. “We should have defended our country.” The occupation shattered Iraqi society and unmanned people like Abu Hamsim. The two main points of pride and identification for the Sunni men who ran things under Saddam—the Baath Party and the military—were dissolved. Unwilling to rejoin the army and work for the Americans, he nonetheless relied on them, as so many Iraqis did. A contractor, he needed the income from U.S.-funded reconstruction projects. This only added to his humiliation.Abu Hamsim knew men in al Qaeda and other extremist groups, and he didn’t begrudge them their views. He felt the same anger. But he never joined them, he said, because “I knew the people who would suffer the most would be Iraqis, not Americans.” Soldiers he knew who did go back to work were killed by insurgents. He was arrested by U.S. troops on suspicion of building a school with terrorist funding. Released, he was threatened by insurgents who accused him of collaborating with the enemy.In Anbar and elsewhere, Iraqis retreated into tribe and Islam. In the army’s place sprang up a culture of militias: Sunni militias, Shiite militias, militias belonging to politicians, militias owned by sheikhs. It was in Anbar that Sunni insurgents—a mix of local Islamists, nationalists, and foreigners—consolidated. They fought coalition forces and pursued a sectarian war against Shiites that left tens of thousands of Iraqis, mostly civilians, dead. In 2006 a number of Islamist groups, led by al Qaeda in Iraq, created the Islamic State of Iraq. Abu Bakr al Baghdadi took direction of both groups.In 2012, after the last U.S. troops withdrew, residents in Ramadi and other cities began protesting Nouri al-Maliki, whom Washington had installed six years earlier and backed with increasing regret. The protesters were fed up with his neglect, his acceptance of corruption, and the abuses of the Shiite-led security forces, worse in Anbar than in Mosul. Since entering office, Maliki had brought the Shiites to dominance after decades of repression under Saddam. It was taken for fact that Maliki, with his ties to Iran, was doing that country’s bidding.To Abu Hamsim, the new Shiite elite was worse than the Americans. At checkpoints, when he tried to drive from Ramadi, he was stopped and insulted. Since he was from Anbar, he must be a terrorist, he was told. “They made obscene comments about my sister and my mother.”Spreading across Anbar, the protests went on for a year. Every Friday thousands took to the streets. Maliki had Sunni officials arrested, claiming they were part of a conspiracy against him. Demonstrators were jailed, and killed. The movement turned into a “tribal revolution,” backed by sheikhs. At the same time it was infiltrated by ISIS, which by then had split from al Qaeda, allied with Iraqi nationalist groups, and taken nearly a third of Syria.A refugee family lives amid the rubble of Ramadi, which has sustained more damage than any other Iraqi city.When the protests began, Abu Hamsim supported them. And when they turned into the tribal revolution, he supported that. And when ISIS swept into his neighborhood, near the stadium in central Ramadi, and pushed out the abusive troops and the grasping officials, he supported that too.“In the beginning we believed them,” he said. They gave people food and helped them rebuild their homes. They apologized to Abu Hamsim and his neighbors for the destruction they’d caused. “We’re here to support you Sunnis,” they assured him. They spoke of the insults Sunni women were forced to endure at the hands of Shiite men, of the ways in which Shiites defiled the name of the Prophet. “They were speaking mostly truths.” They recited Quranic verse beautifully and told stories about Muhammad that Abu Hamsim had never heard.“They seemed like magicians,” he said. “I thought many times about joining ISIS.”He attended two seminars given by the new imam at his mosque, who had been installed by the militants. The first, rudimentary, covered the basics of prayer and ablutions. In the second, after touching on more sophisticated topics of belief, the imam went into the obligation to wage violent jihad. It was his responsibility, Abu Hamsim was told, to kill not just infidels but apostates too, no matter if they were Iraqi, no matter if they’d done nothing to him. By “apostate” he knew the imam to mean Shiites. Abu Hamsim was repelled.ISIS killed many in Ramadi, only some of them Shiites. He wasn’t pressured to join, but this proved little consolation. By the time ISIS was forced from the city, he and his family were living on scraps he scavenged from abandoned houses. The militants, he noticed, always seemed to have plenty to eat. One of his daughters had leukemia, and she hadn’t had a transfusion in months. ISIS had forbidden him from taking her to a hospital outside their territory. His other children were psychologically damaged from the war.“I learned to hate ISIS,” he said.His family was taken by the army to a refugee camp, but Abu Hamsim was detained. For three days he was beaten, he says. He was never questioned—just whipped by soldiers with sticks and cables. He doesn’t believe they had any evidence on him or even cared whether he was a militant. They seemed to assume that any Sunni man from Anbar deserved to be punished.A family returns home to Ramadi.Al Aziziyah market in Ramadi comes back to life.At the makeshift checkpoints around a liberated Ramadi, soldiers, short of everything including traffic cones, demarcated the lanes with mortar shell casings, bouquets of pink plastic flowers wedged into their hollows. Barricades of car parts, paving, and rubbish still blocked many roads.Security forces had been clearing bombs, but the work wasn’t nearly done. Safe buildings bore spray-painted check marks, unsafe ones X’s. Everywhere one looked, it seemed, was the sinister bulge of a trip wire in the dust, or the rusted corner of a metal pressure plate, or a jerrican with calcified chemicals around its mouth. In some homes ISIS sniper nests were intact, their bulwarks of cooking-gas canisters and upturned credenzas and on-end mattresses still crammed between door jambs. The rooms were so chewed by gunfire they looked like caves. It was impossible to imagine people returning to these places.Yet they were. A taxi drove into a deserted, ruined road and parked. It was unclear why. There was no one hailing a taxi—there was no one anywhere. Then the driver, an old man in a faded gray dishdasha, got out and disappeared into the wreckage.Within it was his home. The second level had been sheared off in an air strike, as though by a giant scythe, but the first was standing, tentatively. Where his front gate had been, he had hung a blue plastic tarp. He’d returned four days earlier, he said, expecting to find nothing. He would settle for half a house over no house at all. The problem was, it couldn’t be reached. So he’d rented a bulldozer and cleared a path through the hill of splintered furniture and cinder block, from the pinnacle of which protruded the front wheel of a motorcycle.“We think there are bodies in there,” he said. “We can smell them.” He kneeled, put his nose to a small hole in the wall that was keeping the pile at bay, and inhaled. He bade his visitors do the same. “Smell that?”Nearby, a man was carting charred rubble from his home in a wheelbarrow. He had been the first to return to this street, he said, and had searched the houses next to his for bombs. He’d found one and painted on the exterior wall: “This house has bombs.” He had defused a bomb in his own house—its metal canister was on the curb now. He kicked at it.“Don’t kick that! It could explode,” another man said.“I already took off the cables.”“It doesn’t matter—don’t touch it!”Sunni families displaced by ISIS have been living in a refugee camp near Tikrit for two years.Families fleeing the war with ISIS take shelter in the village of Hajjaj, in a grain silo that was hastily converted into a refugee camp.A woman came to her door. She recalled that soon after ISIS stormed into Ramadi, she received a knock on the door, now battered but still on its hinges. She opened it to find two young jihadists. Politely they explained that they would soon be attacking an army encampment nearby and recommended she leave. The attack would take no more than two days, they promised. She thanked them and began packing.Two and a half years later she had come home. Like the walls of most of the houses in the neighborhood, hers now had holes big enough for people to climb through. They were part of an elaborate system of passageways and tunnels ISIS had dug throughout Ramadi, as in every city, so fighters could move without notice. The men who had stayed here had looted some furniture, but she felt comparatively lucky, she said, pointing across the street to a row of pancaked houses and, in front of them, a truck-size crater filled with crude oil, where a gas tanker had been detonated. To create a smoke screen to obstruct air strikes, ISIS had tried to set the neighborhood ablaze.The home of a furniture dealer, Abdula Zuhair, had been in the government-controlled section of the city, but only barely: The line of division had been a few hundred yards down the street. When ISIS came in, its men tied a laundry rope between homes on either side of the street—Zuhair recounted this by tracing a line in the air with his glowing cigarette—and then draped blankets over it.At first there was a fragile stalemate between the government and ISIS. Zuhair had clients on the insurgent side and was permitted to go back and forth. Some differences were overt. For instance, the court building over there bore a sign saying “Military Court of the Islamic State.” Homes and businesses were spray-painted with the words “Property of the Islamic State Endowment.” Shops had to close before each call to prayer, five times a day. The black-and-white ISIS logo was everywhere, of course, on hoisted flags, stenciled onto walls. Other differences were subtler. ISIS considered depictions of people sacrilegious, and particularly forbidden was any representation of women. Zuhair noticed that on shop awnings and billboards, the faces of models had been cut away or the man’s face remained while the woman’s was painted over.In 2015 Zuhair’s teenage son went missing. Zuhair suspected ISIS was involved—the group was known to kidnap for ransom. So he crossed the blanket line and went to a patrol station. He explained that his son, who was 16, was developmentally disabled. He couldn’t look after himself, much less be of use to ISIS. The men were helpful, ordering that announcements about the boy be made at mosques.Soon after, however, a militant came to Zuhair’s furniture shop. ISIS had his son, and Zuhair had three options: pay $50,000 for his release, allow his son to join ISIS, or see him beheaded. Zuhair didn’t have anything like that kind of money. He offered his truck and all the money he had.Soldiers burn an area of marsh where ISIS militants were believed to have hidden.Before he heard back, the Iraqi forces began their final assault on the city. ISIS men came to Zuhair’s street and demanded that his family flee with them into the desert. It was common knowledge that ISIS was press-ganging human shields, and he refused. He was jailed and whipped. After he was released, he and his family fled west to a government-held city where refugees were gathering. There, the boy’s captors, apparently taking pity on him, secretly brought him to see his father. The boy was in the Afghan-style dress, and wisps of hair grew from his chin.“You must try to escape,” Zuhair whispered as they hugged.“I can’t,” his son said. “They’re watching me everywhere. Maybe they will kill you or my mother.”Zuhair had not seen him since.One afternoon last summer, after Ramadi had been liberated, Zuhair drove into Ramadi’s city center. The main market street had come back to life. Shoppers stepped over piles of rubble and around a backhoe bringing down the remains of a building. A beloved kebab restaurant, reopened, was full with lunchtime diners.He reached his furniture shop. He climbed over the collapsed metal awning and through a window frame. The display area had been plundered. He climbed through a hole in the wall into the adjoining commercial space, which ISIS had used as a bombmaking factory. On the unfinished concrete floor were sacks of coarse gray powder, empty cigarette packets, and two neat piles of human excrement. Another hole led into Zuhair’s twilit rear showroom, its overstuffed living room sets and fussy armoires coated in dust.“My father opened this store in the 1960s,” he said. “It was the best furniture store in Ramadi.”Down the street he said hello to a pair of brothers, owners of a photography shop. Somehow, it was unscathed. Zuhair looked admiringly at the windowpanes. He studied twin black-and-white photographs on the wall that the brothers had taken. They showed a before-and-after effect in the same stretch of downtown Ramadi. The first, from 1998, was a lively scene of shoppers and cars.“It was during the sanctions, but things weren’t bad,” one brother said.In the adjoining photo, the buildings were destroyed, the street empty. This one had been taken in 2007, the worst period of the U.S. occupation and the sectarian war. Pointing to the left of the frame, he said, “Over there was the American base.” Answering the attacks on their convoys with overwhelming firepower, troops had leveled Ramadi. But this shop and Zuhair’s had survived. They had survived ISIS. They would survive whatever came next.“God willing,” Zuhair said.“God willing,” the brothers said.Mount Sinjar is home to the Yazidi people, brutally victimized by ISIS because of their blended religion. The mountain is a stark backdrop for a memorial to Kurdish fighters who died battling ISIS.A peshmerga soldier waits at a front line position on the outskirts of Mosul.The damage in Ramadi was the most extensive of any Iraqi city, but it was not rare. ISIS and the war against it had left large portions of northern and western Iraq in ruins. The violence had stretched from south of Baghdad to the borders with Turkey, Syria, and Saudi Arabia, engulfing dozens of cities—in addition to Ramadi, Fallujah had been overrun, as had Tikrit and Tal Afar—and hundreds of towns and villages. ISIS had decimated the Mesopotamian archaeological treasures of Nineveh and ancient Christian villages. It had attempted to wipe out the Yazidi people, whom it considered pagans. The fires it set at oil wells burned for months, causing untold environmental damage. By early 2017 the United Nations, its partners, and other organizations had erected 86 displaced-persons and refugee camps around Iraq. More than 3.25 million Iraqis had fled their homes.Not just in Anbar but around Iraq, it is common to meet people like Abu Hamsim, or the brothers in the photography shop, who think back on the Saddam era with a certain longing. They have few illusions about the man—they don’t speak about him with nostalgia. Rather, they make it clear that under Saddam they understood Iraq. Now they don’t. This is another way of saying they no longer understand themselves.The past 14 years have been an identity crisis for Iraqis. Just as they were reluctant to think of the sectarian violence of the 2000s as a civil war, not wanting to believe their society was capable of such cruelty toward itself, so many are unwilling to think of the fight against ISIS as a civil war. They don’t want to believe this monstrosity could have come from within. But ISIS is, whatever else it may be, an expression of that identity crisis. In this, its violent rise and fall is not just a religious war but a civil one.With its promise of a pure and proud state, ISIS appealed to many Iraqis—men and women, young and old, rich and poor. Only some were zealots, but all were fed up with one or another entrenched power. ISIS appealed to Sunnis sick of the neglect and abuses they had experienced under Nouri al-Maliki’s Shiite-led government. And it drew in Sunnis who looked to the selfish Gulf monarchies, the brutal, secularist military of Egypt, the Westernizing Turks, and saw a void of valid leadership.In July 2016 in Baghdad, a group of sheikhs was gathered at the capital mansion of a prominent sheikh from Ramadi, Rafaa al Fahdawi, discussing this subject. ISIS could not have taken so much territory without the help of sheikhs. Some fought ISIS, but many—no one is sure how many—backed it. And while some of the latter agreed with its ideology, others were acting pragmatically. ISIS seemed to promise a new, Sunni-centric regime and appeared competent—indeed unstoppable. In public few sheikhs will admit to any of this, but in private they’re more candid.“We all understand that the government created the environment for ISIS,” Fahdawi said. And of course it was true that many had abided ISIS in order to stay alive. But there was blame to be ascribed too. In his own tribe, he estimated, as many as 200 men joined ISIS enthusiastically. This wasn’t a large percentage—it was probably far fewer of his tribespeople than the militants had killed—but it was a problem. Families were torn apart. “In many places you would see a family where one brother is a police officer and another is with ISIS,” he said. “A father kills his own son, or a son his own father.”The sheikh’s son, who had been studying in London and had returned to “defend our land” against ISIS, he said, described how the jihadists skillfully tried to recruit him and other sons of sheikhs. Leaders called them directly on their mobile phones, appealing to their sense of Sunni unity and their vanity. A close friend succumbed. “I think they just washed his brain.”Everyone in the room believed that the group had to have the help of powers outside Iraq, but who those powers were depended on the speaker’s particular view of Iraqi society and what had gone wrong with it. The culprit could be Iran, or Saudi Arabia, or the United States, or Israel. Psychologically, ISIS is a place where all suspicions and resentments, local and global, converge.Various Iraqi militias have joined the war against ISIS. In Hajj Ali, a town south of Qayyarah, a Sunni militia formed by a local sheikh patrols the roads.The sheikh’s son thought ISIS wasn’t a Sunni organization. How could it be? It had killed so many Sunnis.“I know that ISIS is Iranian,” he said, voicing an improbable but common theory. “They came to destroy Sunni society.”One thing they agreed on was that Abu Bakr al Baghdadi had succeeded in ways Osama bin Laden never had. It wasn’t just that ISIS actually controlled territory or that it instilled more fear than al Qaeda. Baghdadi was more politically cunning. He and his associates had taken advantage of discontent in Iraq masterfully.“They’re black belts in terrorism,” a sheikh said.ISIS also appealed to the marginalized and dispossessed. It’s not a coincidence that Anbar is home to Iraq’s poorest and least educated citizens and that ISIS’s propaganda emphasizes the socialist undercurrent in political Islam. This class dimension of the war is often apparent, as are the other social rifts ISIS has heightened. As ISIS was being chased from Iraq, the alliance doing the chasing—Arab and Kurd, Sunni and Shiite, army and militia—was a delicate one. If not for a common cause, its partners would be at each other’s throats.During the summer of 2016, Iraqi forces pushed north along the Tigris River. By August they had reached a small riverside city, Qayyarah, the last strategic gain needed before moving on to Mosul. One day, in the midst of the battle for Qayyarah, an army convoy drove from the base in Makhmur to the front line. A beige pickup was followed by a Humvee and a cargo truck carrying 200 blue plastic garbage bags containing rice, tea, sugar, cooking oil, food for those displaced by the fighting.In the front seat of the pickup was a prominent general from Baghdad, one of the many planners of the campaign toward Mosul—or at least one of the many generals who believed he ought to be planning the campaign. The pickup reached a burned-out village, and the road divided into parallel sand paths. The already nervous driver was at a loss. There could be IEDs anywhere.Police question a shepherd during an anti-ISIS operation near the village of Qere Tepe, outside Kirkuk.Soldiers arrest a man as they conduct a raid on ISIS in Qere Tepe.“Follow the tire tracks—don’t go left or right,” the general, a squat, balding man, said, and kept talking at a group of adjutants jammed one upon another in the back seat. “In Baghdad we wouldn’t stand for these ideas,” he said, referring to ISIS’s popularity in rural Iraq. “But out here people are disconnected from the world. They can’t think for themselves.” Then he began singing a song from a YouTube video he’d been watching.The driver drifted to the left.“No, not that way. That road has bombs. Go straight. They’ll shoot rockets at us.”“All of ISIS are sons of bitches, I swear,” the general went on.“None of them are human,” an officer in the back agreed. He had his own theory as to the group’s motivations. “They’re all gay.”“That’s true,” another said, agreeing with the slur. “I knew a man who joined ISIS. He was already gay.”The driver drifted again.“Where are you going?” the general said. “Do you see any tire tracks? Don’t think like a Kurd. What’s wrong with your brain?”The convoy arrived at a bend in the Tigris, south of Qayyarah, where soldiers with the Golden Division, an elite forward-operating brigade, were camped. The bridges had been destroyed, so they had built a pontoon bridge across the river. ISIS had been sending barrel bombs downriver to try to destroy it, so the troops had also run a necklace of empty oil drums across the water a hundred yards upriver from the bridge. For good measure they stood on the riverbank firing their rifles at anything bobbing in the current. Shots rang out, followed by the occasional plonk. Other soldiers bathed, unconcerned that they were submerged in a shooting gallery, or lay in the shade of truck chassis and the front-plates of tanks.The convoy crossed the bridge and drove into a village, Jahala, where the food was to be handed out. Hundreds of people had already gathered in the central square. The men crouched in a line down the main road, shading their faces from the sun with ration cards that had been handed out, while the women stood in a less orderly queue in the shade. Every moment the lines grew longer. Knowing that a food distribution meant a tragic entertainment, crowds of young men and children had gathered on the porticos and terraces around the square to watch. Soldiers stood with rifles ready. There was an explosion in a village across the river—a missile strike, or very large mortar—sending a plume of dirt into the sky. No one flinched.A day laborer walks along a desert road toward the town of Khalidiyah, where tens of thousands of refugees have gathered.The cargo truck backed up to the square, and the driver opened the tailgate. A tribal elder approached.“This village has become like a refugee camp,” he told the general. “The population has gone from 700 to 25,000. They come here with nothing. We need more help.”The general was handed a stack of ration cards. He read off names and handed out bags.The air grew hotter, the lines longer, the women fretful.“Give me a place here,” said a woman, trying to wedge herself into the line.“No, this is our spot.”“It was bad under ISIS, but this is worse,” said another.“It’s better to be safe.”“ISIS are all dogs.”“Where is the general? I want to talk to him.”People left their lines to approach the general and appeal to him personally, accompanied by murmurs of indignation. A man came up to him, but before he could open his mouth, the general said, “Don't talk. Get back in line.”A small girl approached.“You are young. Just like my daughter. Get back in line.”It became clear there wouldn’t be enough food for everyone, not nearly. The women became unruly, refusing to sit down. The general bellowed at them.“I swear to God and on the Quran and on Mecca, if you don’t make your line like the men, you won’t get help!”The village elder implored the women.“Please sit down. The general’s angry now.”The last bag was handed out. The driver closed the tailgate and turned the truck’s engine over. Murmurs swelled into shouts, the lines into throngs. The general was surrounded. A soldier pointed his rifle to the sky and fired. A few villagers ducked; most took no notice.“Don’t shoot!” the general yelled. The soldier apologized.As the general tried to open the door of the pickup, a group of old women begged him for food, their hands outstretched.“There will be more food tomorrow, God willing,” he said. “For today we’re done, but tomorrow we’ll have a thousand bags of food! Here, I’ll sing it for you.” He went into song. “Today we're done, but tomorrow we’ll have a thousand.”The driver pulled forward. The elder rushed to the truck.“If you bring us more help, my wife and daughters will cook for your soldiers.”“It’s not in my hands,” the general said, rolling up the window. “This food doesn’t come from my father’s factory.”Young Sunni men fleeing the war with ISIS arrive at a checkpoint on the outskirts of Makhmur.To reach safety, people fleeing ISIS dodge sniper fire, swim across the Tigris River, and walk barefoot for hours.The Islamic State broke off from al Qaeda because its leader, Abu Bakr al Baghdadi, was too bloody-minded even for al Qaeda’s tastes. One conviction he and his jihadist alma mater do share is that, as historian of jihad David Cook has put it, “the entire world is united in a concerted effort to destroy Islam.” But where Osama bin Laden built his organization on the belief that Islam’s greatest foe was the “far enemy,” the imperial West, until recently Baghdadi focused on the “near enemy,” the impious governments of the Muslim world.Worse still, Baghdadi sermonizes, are Shiites, a colonizing cancer within Islam. In this he follows on decades of sectarian politics in Iraq. In the 1970s the Baath Party deported people believed to be of Iranian birth. When Saddam Hussein went to war with Iran in 1980, he called himself the defender of the true Islam, the man who would protect Sunni Arabs from the Shiite Persian hordes, a menace since the seventh century. (This despite the fact that many Iraqi Shiites fought loyally for him.) Baghdadi is a child of this animus, which returned with the sectarian war of the mid-2000s, as much as he is of the U.S. occupation, and it has left him with a view of Shiites that can only be described as genocidal.What then accounts for the irony that in Iraq his followers have almost certainly killed—and have certainly immiserated—more Sunnis than Shiites? Maybe this: ISIS marked a progression from al Qaeda not only in the professionalization of jihad, but also in its theorization, to a narrowed vision in which the Muslim who most deserves the name is a killing Muslim—a Muslim killing not just infidels, not just apostates, not just Shiites, but killing any Muslim who isn’t also killing. This vision was delineated most chillingly by the late Palestinian theorist of jihad Abdullah Azzam. “Honor and respect cannot be established except on a foundation of cripples and corpses,” he wrote. “Every Muslim on Earth bears the responsibility of abandoning jihad and the sin of abandoning the gun.”The only thing more apparent in Azzam’s words than hatred is self-hatred. This is a politics of profoundest shame. More than homicidal, it is suicidal. So, perhaps unsurprisingly, many of the corpses of ISIS fighters that turned up in the latter months of 2016 were the victims not of combat but their own comrades.That summer, as ISIS retreated toward Syria, the evidence of its sadism was on display nowhere so plainly as in Fallujah. Few places in the world have a name as synonymous with violence. Barely an hour’s drive from Baghdad, Fallujah is the nerve center of Anbari rebellion. After the British created Iraq, carving it out of the carcass of the Ottoman Empire in a deal with France and installing on the throne a foreigner from Hejaz, in what would become Saudi Arabia, Iraqis in Fallujah revolted. Known as the City of Mosques (“If Fallujah has 100,000 residents,” an Iraqi general joked, “90,000 of them claim to be clerics”), by the mid-2000s it was so laden with jihadists it had to be wrested from their control not once but twice. The battles for Fallujah, the fiercest of the U.S. occupation, are studied at West Point and in militant training camps alike. It was in Fallujah that Abu Bakr al Baghdadi was arrested.In January 2014, ISIS seized Fallujah. In late June 2016, after a month of fighting, Iraqi special-forces soldiers won it back. On the stretch of highway leading into the city, light poles bent over themselves, jackknifed, and the concrete slabs of what had once been the off-ramp levered over the charred remains of an exploded gas tanker. Entering the city required driving over an expertly made six-foot-deep trench, dug at a perpendicular angle to the roadway and stretching for miles around the city’s perimeter. Beyond it was a sand wall. ISIS had constructed five such rings of defense to prepare for the final battle.On the main thoroughfare palm trees stood palm-less and downed power lines lay like shorn hair on cratered pavement. In the bazaar the metal shutters had been rocked from clothing stalls, sending dishdashas and white knit prayer caps into mounds in the arcade. The city was empty of people except the exhausted soldiers, who stood around in the yards of houses they had commandeered, salvaging old generators, or by their Humvees, bouquets of pink plastic flowers wedged into the bullet holes in the windscreens. In Fallujah’s main plaza they had replaced the ISIS flag with an Iraqi one, but the flagpole was still painted in black and white stripes.A group of soldiers and police walked through the wreckage-strewn streets to the Fallujah Women’s Teachers Institute. This had been an ISIS court and execution chamber. The air was heavy with the scent of decaying flesh. In the entry corridor was a cluster of overturned cabinets. Files of the young women who had once studied here, their photographs stapled to the corners of blue folders, fanned across the floor.As the men came to a small courtyard, they put their hands to their noses in unison. A policeman pushed aside a chalkboard in the dirt, revealing a fibula. The bone jutted from a hole beneath a paving stone. They stepped closer. The hole was full of corpses in such a state of decay—no longer bodies, not quite skeletons—it was impossible to tell how many were there. In an adjoining hallway was another mass grave beneath the floor. It had been covered over with a carpet and sofa. A police commander explained that these were believed to be ISIS members, executed on suspicion of cowardice or betrayal or some other infraction.A woman and her child, having fled Qayyarah, arrive at a front line position.A young man holds his brother, injured in a mortar attack.When ISIS had taken the city, its fighters had made for the impressive central hospital and turned it into a headquarters. A strange choice, it seemed to some citizens, but the hospital had certain practical advantages. Aside from the fact that those doctors who hadn’t escaped could be forced to treat wounded militants, it was the most modern building in Fallujah, with computers, an industrial kitchen, and the best generators around, and it was next to the central mosque.Less obvious to residents, at least at first, was its symbolic advantage. The hospital extended ISIS’s psychological power beyond the battlefield and the prayer rug. “We control you in health and in sickness, in life and in death,” it was a way of saying. Of course the battlefield was never far from its new owners’ minds: Best of all, the hospital served as a good defensive position. The highest building in Fallujah, it looked out onto the city. When the Iraqi forces returned, as ISIS knew they inevitably would, troop movements could be monitored from the hospital’s roof, artillery directed, gunners set up in its windows.A group of men inspected the hospital. They walked through a courtyard. Morgue trays were on the ground, near a small, newly covered grave. A soldier put his hand down to his waist to indicate the height of the body buried in it. During the fighting it was too dangerous for locals to take their dead children from the hospital to the cemetery, so they buried them on the hospital grounds, in any space they could find.In the emergency ward, framing and ceiling tiles hung down like jungle understory. A policeman—he went by Abu Nebah—searched for keepsakes, placing them in a plastic shopping bag. Gurneys and wheelchairs stood idle, as if waiting for their occupants to return. In a stockroom in which ISIS fighters had bunked, amid blankets and shoes and a teapot, lay a chest rig for Kalashnikov magazines. A soldier shined the light of his mobile phone on it and saw written in faded blue felt-tip “The Uzbeki.”“Another foreigner,” he said.Taped to the walls were grainy photocopies of the ISIS logo and official memoranda on ISIS letterhead. Phrases hinted at desperate last days in power. “To all brothers and section chiefs, may God bless them,” read a memo. “All brothers should bring back their families immediately to the Fallujah sector within 20 days from the date of this notice. Whoever violates it will not be allowed any time off.”For the past week Abu Nebah and several other policemen had been watching over the hospital. They slept on the floor of the gatehouse and in the ambulance lane had set up a .50-caliber machine gun on a tripod, which they now stood around with a certain proprietary delight.As Abu Nebah looked through his booty—some Kalashnikov shell casings and a black nylon utility belt—he said he’d known the hospital well even before taking up this post. All four of his children had been born here. He’d fled in 2004 during the two battles of Fallujah. Later he became a policeman at the height of the insurgency.“But none of that was as bad as ISIS,” he said.When the jihadists came in, those police who had the money to flee, did. Those who couldn’t, hid. And those who couldn’t hide gave themselves up. They were forced by the Hisbah to stand up in mosques and public squares, in front of crowds, and declare their regret for having enforced the laws of the infidel government. Some of them were killed even after these rituals of public humiliation. Abu Nebah fled with a hundred other families, basically his entire neighborhood. He returned to find his city in ruins for the third time.“Why do you keep coming back?” he was asked.“This is our home,” he said. “Anyway, it’s not as bad as Ramadi.”He picked up a brown fuzzy object from the ground. It looked at first like a wig. He held it aloft, revealing a strap meant to go around the back of the head. It was a costume beard, worn by an ISIS fighter who was not hirsute—or old—enough to grow a proper jihadist’s beard. Though they’d seen the thing many times, the policemen laughed.Families rest at the makeshift refugee camp in Hajjaj, which has come to be known as Silo Camp.ISIS’s bloodlust is of course not new. What is new is the eagerness to package and broadcast it. Not just in the group’s snuff films and slick propaganda but in its fetish for “Afghan” martial dress, its insistence on putting its grim logo on every free surface, its painting of flagpoles, there is a childishly morbid aestheticism to the Islamic State.That aestheticism materializes in bizarre ways. After the soldiers and policemen uncovered the mass graves at the Teachers Institute, they went upstairs, to an arts-and-crafts classroom, where students’ pieces were still pinned to walls: a beach scene, a dancing woman with a dress of plastic spoons. Scraped into the plaster between them, as though in a petulant rebuke and yet demure imitation of the artwork, was a man’s name.“Abu Assam al Ansari,” a police commander said. “He was the warden here.”They found Ansari’s office. It seemed that when not executing people, he indulged aspirations as a decorator. On his desk was a Styrofoam cup on which he had drawn his name, the ISIS logo, and the phrase “No God but God,” as though he’d been designing some heraldic chalice. On a bureau was a wood carving of a map of Iraq, something a teenager might make in a shop class, with blackened grooves demarcating the territory ISIS had taken. And in pride of place, on the wall before his desk, hung a canvas of Arabic calligraphy, perhaps made to buoy his spirits as he waited for the battle for Fallujah. In an unsteady scrawl of green and red glitter paint was written “The Islamic State Remains and Expands.”With his rifle muzzle, a policeman knocked the canvas to the floor.For all its condemnation of the West’s immodesty, there is also an unmistakable pornography to the Islamic State’s violence. One needn’t watch many of its promotional videos to see that titillation, not religion, is the point, nor browse the Facebook profiles of its more public young male adherents for long to notice the sad vanity, the sexual frustration, the bashful homoeroticism.The irony of this, like the irony of ISIS’s treatment of fellow Sunnis, is not lost on its victims. A running joke in Iraq is that foreign fighters come to their country, romantically conservative though it is, because they’re too pitiful to meet women at home. ISIS’s name in Arabic lends itself to a word play: With a few changed characters it becomes “The Sex State.” The insult is spray-painted over ISIS’s own graffiti in newly freed cities.At the police station in Fallujah, after returning from the Teachers Institute, the men looked through ISIS court documents they had collected. It seemed that many women in Fallujah had taken the opportunity of ISIS’s rule to part from their husbands. In one divorce case the wife testified, “I demand to file a claim against my husband, Adnan, because he is sterile. He married me less than three months ago and had no sex with me except in the first week and then he said he was sick and could not take the pills he was taking before. He left a month ago and did not give me any money.” In response Adnan submitted that “the family of my wife prevented her from approaching me. I had sex with her the first day of our marriage and did not feel any sickness. The same on the second day. But now I am sick and am taking pills I got from Abu Omar and Abu Suhaib. It is religious medicine. My wife wants to come back to me.” Based on a Quranic citation, the ISIS judge ruled in the wife’s favor. The policemen giggled as they read.They found the affidavits amusing, just as they found Ansari’s artwork amusing, because of what these things said about life in the Islamic State. Namely, that it was boring. The predictable reality of a terroristic theocracy, like any totalitarian state—the reality ISIS never mentions in its recruitment materials—is boredom. Between bouts of violence and prayer, there’s little to do.Survivors of ISIS attest to this. As the battle for Qayyarah went on, Iraqis in their thousands fled from surrounding villages and farms. Most were trying to get to the camp near Makhmur. The road there led west through a palimpsest of onetime front lines to an army encampment, where four domed tents, their tarpaulin covers tattered and torn by the wind, had been erected for receiving refugees. A guard tower looked onto a vague expanse of horizon blackened by fires ISIS had set on the Qayyarah oil fields. Some refugees had managed to drive to safety. Around the position were their abandoned cars, now the same color as the desert, some with full suitcases on the seats and jutting from open trunks, all with rolled-up white-cloth flags on the rear dash or white rags tied to the roof racks—the banners of capitulation.At Silo Camp women wait for food and medical care, while men wait to be screened and questioned.In a refugee camp near Makhmur, men under investigation for possible links to ISIS are separated from the rest of the camp’s population.Two men arrived, their faces and limbs covered in black beads of oil mist from the fires. Still they were in high spirits, elated to be safe. A soldier, his brow folded in suspicion, began questioning them.“May we have some water first?” one asked.They had swum across the Tigris that morning. ISIS controlled the far bank, and snipers were shooting at anyone who went into the water. Muhammad, the older of the two, had got across first, then hid behind a dune. In the early afternoon he saw the younger man, Abdula, with whom he used to play soccer, emerge from the river. He whistled.“I hugged him and cried,” Muhammad said.The worst part about life in the Islamic State, they agreed, was not necessarily the fear—it was the tedium.“It was like a big prison,” Muhammad said.“We couldn’t play soccer for two years,” said Abdula.While Muhammad had a full beard, as ISIS required, Abdula, not yet 20, had only patches of hair on his cheeks. He wore a Chelsea soccer jersey. When ISIS came in, he left school, uninterested in studying the Quran, and in defiance of the new ban on smoking took up selling black market cigarettes. He was jailed twice, his back lashed with a rubber hose both times.Worse, he hadn’t been able to talk to girls on the phone in all that time. The jihadists were paranoid about phones. They seemed to imagine that a teenage cigarette salesman could call in an American air strike on a knockoff Samsung. Just a few days ago, he said, four men had been publicly beheaded in Qayyarah, allegedly after having been caught with phones. The ridiculous thing was that they were actually allowed to have phones—just not SIM cards, so no one could call or text. Abdula once asked an ISIS patrolman the point of this.“‘So you can play Islamic anthems on your phone,’ he told me,” Abdula said. Muhammad laughed.Abdula asked Muhammad if he worried what the army would do to their families. Soldiers were treating all Sunni men as though they were ISIS, he’d heard.“The Israelis can come,” Muhammad said. “Anything but ISIS. Their favorite thing is blood.”Abdula was right to worry. He would very likely be taken to a screening center to be interrogated, as many young men fleeing ISIS-controlled territories were. The longer they waited to flee, the more suspicion they raised. Some were kept for a few hours, some for months. One refugee camp near Tikrit is populated by Sunni families who have been there for more than two years.With every new village freed from ISIS, there are new reports of abuses of Sunnis by soldiers or by Shiite militiamen. The problem seems to be getting worse as the Shiite militias take a greater role in military operations and the line between the army and the militias blurs. Regular army units are becoming increasingly brazen about identifying themselves as Shiite. At checkpoints and encampments, it is commonplace to see flags adorned with heroic portraits of Caliph Ali and Imam Hussein, the seventh-century forefathers of the sect, or posters showing Ali al Sistani, the spiritual leader of Iraqi Shiites, or Muqtada al Sadr, the radical Shiite cleric. If ISIS is defeated in Mosul, the group will be all but finished in Iraq. But after that, Iraqis fear, it will only be a matter of time before another sectarian war erupts.The battle for Mosul began in October 2016. By February 2017 the Iraqi military had taken the eastern half of the city and had begun operations in the west. It had killed roughly 3,000 militant fighters, according to the generals. It had also lost many of its own men in the process. Just how many is publicly unknown, as the Iraqi government refuses to publish casualty statistics, worrying that the information helps ISIS propaganda.What didn’t help ISIS propaganda was that for the first time since the Saddam era, Mosul’s residents and Iraqi soldiers were getting along. Indeed they were depending on and helping each other. The battle for the city was taking so long largely because the soldiers were making every effort to protect residents. They were also giving them medicine and food, playing with their kids, buoying their spirits. The residents in turn were cooking for the soldiers, allowing them to use their houses to fight ISIS, giving them tips about the insurgents, and offering them thanks at every opportunity.The body of an ISIS fighter lies on the outskirts of the front line village of Hajj Ali.After the nurse Ayham Ali and his family made it to the Fazilia position on the mountain, a medic checked them for wounds. They were given juice and fruit and cookies. They were brought to the main encampment on the front line, where Ali was questioned briefly, and then driven down the mountain to a small compound. Out of the grip of ISIS for the first time in two years, they slept through the night.The next day Ali was brought into an office and told to sit. He was unrecognizable. Clean-shaven, he wore new pants and a collared shirt. Before him, at a desk, sat a general, while on couches on either side sat officials with the Asayish, the Kurdish intelligence agency.“We just have to ask you some questions,” the general said.One of the officials, a stout bald man, led the interrogation, scratching his stomach contemplatively through an unbuttoned gap in his shirt as he spoke. The Asayish had informants in Mosul. It was clear immediately that the interrogator already knew a great deal about Ali. He showed Ali an iPad with a Google Earth image of his street in Mosul and asked Ali to point to his house.“There’s an ISIS house just nearby,” the interrogator remarked.Ali was nervous. He knew the fact that he’d waited two years to flee Mosul didn’t count in his favor. Nor did it help that he and his family had moved to Mosul from an outlying village shortly after ISIS took control of the city. He saw there was no point in trying to hide this.“We left our village because we were worried it would be destroyed in the fighting,” he said.The interrogator was unfazed. He was more interested in why Ali hadn’t left Mosul after that.“When ISIS came to Mosul, the routes to Kurdistan were still open, weren’t they?”“We thought we couldn’t get to Kurdistan,” Ali said. The roads were said to be mined. People who tried to flee were killed.“Do you know of people from the village next to yours who joined ISIS?” the interrogator asked.“I know of two men. I know their father’s name. I don’t know their names.”“And what about from your village?”“I know all of them.”“List them.”Ali paused for a moment.“My cousin was ISIS,” he said.Again the interrogator was unsurprised.“Yes, we know about him.”Ali explained that he had treated his cousin’s shrapnel wounds. He hadn’t wanted to, but his cousin had insisted. He was ISIS—Ali wasn’t going to refuse.Ali was asked for phone numbers. He said he didn’t have any.“I only know these men. It doesn’t mean I worked with them.”“I know,” the interrogator said. “What about Facebook?”“I don’t have Facebook. I don’t even have a phone to use Facebook on.”The interrogator asked about the warden of the ISIS jail Ali was put in, about checkpoints, tunnels, artillery positions. The atmosphere in the room when the questioning was done was not one of relief. It was clear the interrogators didn’t entirely buy Ali’s story. The Asayish knew that many refugees from Mosul lied about their involvement with ISIS. The problem was finding proof. One of the interrogators said privately, “Arabs all lie. All of them have had some connection with ISIS.”As the interrogation ended, Ali said, “I don’t want to go to a refugee camp. My wife is so young. There may be young men there. They’ll see her.”“We all have wives,” the general said. “I haven’t seen my wife in six months.”Ali and his family were driven to a camp. It was newly built, in anticipation of the battle for Mosul. The white tarps of the tents were still intact, the toilets still clean. Ali knew this wouldn’t last. His cousin Tayeb would begin the process of officially vouching for them. Hopefully they would soon move into his house or that of another relative. What he would do after that, Ali had no idea. ISIS had redefined life in Iraq. There would be no return to the past.“I don’t care if they liberate Mosul,” he said. “I’m never going back.”",
"Cecilia Martínez was 15 in 1998 when she slipped into Arizona from Mexico. She came with no family and arrived to none, striking out on her own, scraping by on babysitting and bagging groceries. It was hard but preferable to her native El Salvador: “I came to work. Everyone said you could make a better life here.”Indeed she has. Three years after she arrived, Martínez received temporary protected status (TPS), an immigration classification given to people from countries where conditions—such as armed conflict or natural disaster—would make returning unsafe. El Salvador qualifies: In 2001 two catastrophic earthquakes struck, and since then escalating warfare among gangs, police, and the military has made the nation one of the world’s deadliest outside of war zones.Martínez is among the 200,000 Salvadorans who currently have TPS, meaning they can legally live and work in the United States. She has a business cleaning homes and construction sites on Long Island, New York. And she has two children, ages 17 and 12, who are U.S. citizens.Today her life feels as uncertain as when she first arrived. In early 2018 the Trump administration declared that Salvadorans would lose TPS and should leave the country by September 2019. A court temporarily blocked the order, but there’s no final decision on Salvadorans’ fate, and it’s uncertain when one will be made.To Martínez and many Salvadorans who have long made the United States their home, returning to El Salvador is unthinkable. She has become an activist, journeying to Washington, D.C., to tell lawmakers what will happen to families like hers if TPS is revoked. “When you have been living in the U.S.A. for so many years, they think you are rich, and the gangs come after you,” she says. “They ask for ‘rent’—that’s what they call it. They will go after my son, who is 17. They will hurt us if we don’t give them what they ask for.” In the coming year “our son planned to go to college,” Martínez says. “But now our life has stopped.”We asked writer Jason Motlagh and photographers Moises Saman and Adam Ferguson to document the lives of Salvadorans in their homeland and in the United States. What plagues El Salvador—poverty, violence, lack of opportunity—exists also in Guatemala and Honduras. It explains why so many people are making a treacherous and probably fruitless walk north: They are looking, as Martínez did, to build a life with safety, dignity, and a future.Thank you for reading National Geographic.",
"Jocotán, Chiquimula, GuatemalaEduardo Méndez López lifts his gaze to the sky, hoping to see clouds laden with rain.After months of subsisting almost exclusively on plain corn tortillas and salt, his eyes and cheeks appear sunken in, his skin stretched thin over bone. The majority of his neighbors look the same.It’s the height of rainy season in Guatemala, but in the village of Conacaste, Chiquimula, the rains came months too late, then stopped altogether. Méndez López’s crops shriveled and died before producing a single ear of corn. Now, with a dwindling supply of food, and no source of income, he’s wondering how he’ll be able to feed his six young children.“This is the worst drought we’ve ever had,” says Méndez López, toeing the parched earth with the tip of his boot. “We’ve lost absolutely everything. If things don’t improve, we’ll be forced to migrate somewhere else. We can’t go on like this.”Guatemala is consistently listed among the world’s 10 most vulnerable nations to the effects of climate change. Increasingly erratic climate patterns have produced year after year of failed harvests and dwindling work opportunities across the country, forcing more and more people like Méndez López to consider migration in a last-ditch effort to escape skyrocketing levels of food insecurity and poverty.During the past decade, an average of 24 million people each year were displaced by weather events around the world, and although it's unclear how many of those displacements can be attributed to human-caused climate change, experts expect this number to continue to rise.Increasingly, those displaced seek to relocate in other countries as “climate change refugees,” but there’s a problem: the 1951 Refugee Convention, which defines the rights of displaced people, provides a list of things people must be fleeing from in order to be granted asylum or refuge. Climate change isn’t on the list.Data from Customs and Border Patrol show a massive increase in the number of Guatemalan migrants, particularly families and unaccompanied minors, intercepted at the U.S. border starting in 2014. It’s not a coincidence that the leap coincides with the onset of severe El Niño-related drought conditions in Central America’s Dry Corridor, which stretches through Guatemala, Honduras, and El Salvador.Seeking to understand the upward trend in emigration from this region, a major inter-agency study led by the UN World Food Programme (WFP) interviewed families from key districts in the Dry Corridor about the pressures that are forcing them to leave. The main “push factor” identified was not violence, but drought and its consequences: no food, no money, and no work.Their findings suggest a clear relation between climate variability, food insecurity, and migration, and provide a frightening window into what’s to come as we begin to see the real-world effects of climate change around the world.To Diego Recalde, director of the UN Food and Agriculture Organization (FAO) in Guatemala, the current trend of mass migration in response to food insecurity and drought is a clear indication that the country has been barreling towards a climate change-induced crisis for some time.Adverse climate conditions in Guatemala affect food security by reducing agricultural production in both commercial as well as subsistence farming, limiting the agricultural work opportunities that make up a significant portion of the national economy as well. Rising poverty rates and plunging social indicators paint a bleak outlook for the country, which has the fourth-highest level of chronic malnutrition in the world, and the highest in Latin America. According to the World Food Programme, nearly 50 percent of children under five years old are considered chronically malnourished in Guatemala, a measure that peaks to 90 percent or higher in many rural areas.For subsistence farmers like Méndez López who rely on rainfall to produce the food they eat, it only takes a few months of erratic climate patterns to limit or completely impair their ability to put food on their families’ tables. With increases in the frequency and severity of droughts, Recalde worries that for the most vulnerable sectors of the population, the worst is yet to come.“This is a national disaster,” he says. “There should be red flags going off all over the place.”Scientists attribute the unusually severe droughts starting in 2014 that have sped up the exodus of families heading north to effects from El Niño, part of a natural climate cycle known as the El Niño-Southern Oscillation (ENSO), which causes swings between cooler and wetter, and hotter and drier periods around the globe.This type of natural climate variability has affected Guatemala and other Central American countries for hundreds, if not thousands, of years, even playing a role in the mega-droughts that accompanied the collapse of the ancient Mayan civilization."Climate has always had a very strong variability here,” explains Edwin Castellanos, director of the Center for the Study of the Environment and Biodiversity at the Universidad del Valle in Guatemala. “The problem now is that El Niño and La Niña have become both stronger, more intense, but also more erratic.”While it may seem as if climate change is driving these wide swings in weather, it’s important to make a distinction between periods of climate variability, and the long-term shifts of climate change. The latter quickly becomes a matter of politics, international negotiations, and claims for loss and damages under the Paris Agreement.While scientists know that El Niño contributes to increases in global temperatures, it is still unclear whether human-induced climate change is causing El Niño events to intensify and occur more frequently.“By definition, climate change should usually be modeled in 50-year terms. But what the models are showing should be happening in 2050 is already happening now,” says Castellanos, referring to alterations in rainfall patterns and aridity levels across Guatemala. “So the question is, is this variability higher than usual?”A lack of historical meteorological data makes demonstrating a clear connection between human-induced climate change and increased climate variability difficult. Nevertheless, Castellanos, who is among Guatemala’s leading experts on climate change, finds it hard to ignore the transformations he’s experienced first-hand throughout his life.“We still have some ways to go before we can conclude scientifically that what we’re seeing now is outside the normal. But if you go out to the field and ask anybody if this is normal, everybody says no.”Whether attributed to El Niño events or to global warming, what’s happening in Guatemala paints a vivid picture of the vulnerabilities that are exposed when societies don’t have the capacities to cope with and adapt to a changing climate.In previous years, families affected by a bad year’s harvest would seek work as day laborers on commercial farms, making enough to purchase staples like corn and beans. But this year, there’s no work to be found. Even well-established commercial agriculture ventures have been affected by this year’s drought, foreshadowing the bigger problems that will arise as the climate-sensitive crops that make up the bulk of Guatemala’s key agricultural exports (and domestic job market) suffer the effects of rising temperatures and increasingly frequent climate-related disasters.Today, towards the end of yet another “rainy season” that brought no rain, many rural communities seem trapped in a dizzying vortex of catastrophe. Years of erratic weather, failed harvests, and a chronic lack of employment opportunities have slowly chipped away at the strategies Guatemalan families have used successfully to cope with one or two years of successive droughts and crop failures. But now, entire villages seem to be collapsing from the inside out as more and more communities become stranded, hours away from the nearest town, with no food, no work, and no way to seek help.“There’s no transportation. People have run out of money to pay the fare, so cars don’t even come here anymore,” says José René Súchite Ramos of El Potrerito, Chiquimula. “We want to leave but we can’t.”Many describe the current situation as the most desperate they’ve ever faced. In the settlement of Plan de Jocote, Chiquimula, Gloria Díaz’s crops didn’t produce a single grain of corn.“Here, 95 percent of us have been affected by droughts that started in 2014, but this year, we lost absolutely everything, even the seeds,” Díaz says. “Now we’re stuck with no way out. We can’t plant the second harvest, and we’ve run out of the resources we had to be able to eat.”Like many others in her community, Díaz has taken to foraging the countryside for wild malanga roots in attempts to stave off starvation, but they’ve become scarce too. Without a reliable source of potable water, outbreaks of diarrhea and skin rashes have become increasingly common, especially among children.In the neighboring department of El Progreso, Sister Edna Morales spends many days riding a donkey through the parched mountains surrounding the small town of San Agustín Acasaguastlán, looking for malnourished children whose families are too poor and weak to seek help. These days, the nutritional feeding center she runs remains at full capacity.“These children have so many health problems that are compounded by severe, chronic malnutrition. Their hair is falling out, they’re unable to walk,” she says. “Living here, you hear about many cases of children dying from malnutrition. They don’t even get reported to the news.”It’s not just children who are suffering the consequences of severe food shortages and crushing poverty. In Chiquimula, Díaz displays a recent group photo of the community organization over which she presides, the Association of Progressive Women of Plan de Jocote. One by one, she points at women who have died, or are slowly dying, from preventable causes made untreatable by extreme poverty and malnutrition.When subsistence farmers lose their harvests, they’re forced to purchase the staples they typically grow—often at highly inflated prices—to feed their families. Without a source of income, this additional expense leaves many without the economic resources for other basic necessities such as medications or transportation to doctors.As hunger pushes desperate parents to resort to extreme measures in order to feed their families, robberies and violent assaults have skyrocketed.“People from our own community are starting to go out and rob people, because it’s their only option,” says Marco Antonio Vásquez, a community leader of the village of El Ingeniero in Chiquimula.Many consider migration to be their last option, one that comes with tremendous risks to their personal security and unthinkable consequences if they’re unable to complete the journey.“A lot of people are leaving, many more than ever before,” says Vásquez. “Towards the U.S. in search of a new future, taking their small children with them because they feel so pressured to risk it all.”Those with homes or small plots of land use them as collateral to pay human smugglers known as “coyotes” between $10,000 and $15,000 USD in exchange for three chances to cross the border into the U.S. But families from the poorest regions of the country are often forced to choose the option with the least guarantees and the highest risks—going alone, often with small children in tow.In Guatemala City, two to three planes touch down at the Guatemalan Air Force Base every day, each one carrying around 150 Guatemalan citizens who have been deported or intercepted as they attempted to cross into the United States. Many were fleeing hunger and extreme poverty in their home country.Ernesto, who asked his name to be changed, looked weary as he waited in line to claim the small bag containing belongings that had been taken from him when he was intercepted at the U.S. Border—his shoelaces, a battered cell phone, and a small bible. His family in Guatemala had put their home and livelihood on the line, hoping he could make it across to find work in the U.S., which would allow him to support his family back home. This was the second time he had been deported.“I have one chance left. If I don’t make it, we will really be in trouble.”",
"When life gets to be too much, best friends Moises (left) and Jaime climb up the hill in their neighborhood to daydream of a future far from the tension of the streets.At the edge of San Pedro Sula, a city in northern Honduras surrounded by swamps and sugar cane fields, lies the densely populated district of Planeta. Here, church steeples dot the corners of unpaved streets amid a patchwork of gang turfs—one block may be governed by one gang and the next three by their rivals. Masked police officers patrol the streets in dust-covered body armor, their fingers on the trigger of their weapon. There are no schools and few businesses so residents have no choice but to navigate these territories on their long commutes to more affluent parts of the city, risking being caught in the crossfire.It’s in places like this where generations of young people have realized that in Honduras the self-perpetuating cycles of violence, corruption, and poverty have robbed them of their right to grow old.Gang recruits are groomed from a young age, Ayuso says. They’re first asked to run errands then given small tasks until they reach the point of being inducted into the gang through a grueling rite of passage.I arrived here to continue a project I had begun in 2015 documenting the mass migration of Hondurans making the perilous journey towards the United States. Time and time again, fleeing Honduran families explained in harrowing detail the precise moment when life in the country was no longer an option: An imminent threat against their lives at the whim of a dominant gang, a workplace shuttered by impossible extortion quotas imposed by sicarios, or simply being run out by the persistent crossfire in the city peripheries.I wanted to better understand the factors at play, so I headed to the source of the exodus. Before arriving in Planeta, I assumed the district was going to be ruled with an iron fist by ruthless criminals. Instead I found locals living in a tenuous state of calm alongside gang enforcers who were their neighbors, sons, and cousins.Most of the gang members I met were under the age of 16 and their lives had already had been marked by violence. They told stories of facing off against rivals to defend their turf. A recent gang incursion had left six teens dead, their bodies found in a stream, cut into pieces.I met one gang member who had been orphaned as a child after masked men abducted his mother. I asked who took care of him growing up. No one, he said. His grandmother spared food whenever she could, but other than that, he scavenged on these streets on his own until the gang took him in. He was now only known by his gang name, Furia.Most of all, I was struck by Moises, who was barely 17. We connected instantly. Once we earned each other’s trust, we hiked up the barren hill in the middle of the neighborhood. Away from the noisy streets, he shared the crisis keeping him up at night. Moises was being persuaded to join the gang his childhood friends had been a part of since they were 10. He wouldn’t ever consider it, he said, if it weren’t for the years of being brutalized by police and barely surviving near misses with neighboring gangs. Joining, he thought, might just be a way to survive.His parents, former farmers who moved to the city in hopes of a better life for their children, were urging him to leave the country for a chance at a life— any life— abroad. But Moises was torn. His girlfriend, only 16, recently surprised him with news that he was going to be a father.Tomás Ayuso is a Honduran documentary photojournalist and writer. He was the winner of the portfolio review and National Geographic grant recipient at this year's Festival Errante, held in Montevideo, Uruguay.",
"Sandra dreams of attending college, but fears it’s impossible. The 17-year-old’s neighborhood, just north of San Salvador, is blocked on either end by gang territory. Getting to and from class would mean crossing gang turf early in the morning and late at night—a potentially deadly mission. So when Sandra heard that a migrant caravan was forming and a few of her friends were going, she thought she might join them. She could pursue her education beyond El Salvador, where the murder rate consistently qualifies it as the most dangerous place on Earth outside of a war zone.At an outdoor prayer service to bless those departing, Sandra stood, head bowed, clutching a candle. “Father we bless this immigrant caravan,” Lutheran pastor Rafael Salaverria murmured into a microphone, as highway traffic blared past the overgrown plaza. “They are fleeing on an exodus. Father they need you. We not only pray, we ask you to inspire us so we walk with them.”Dozens of the Salvadoran migrants who joined the caravan ride inside a container as the truck carrying it nears the El Salvador-Guatemala border.As churchgoers prayed, word spread on dozens of WhatsApp groups that some would gather late Tuesday to camp overnight in El Salvador del Mundo, a roundabout decorated with a statue of Jesus atop a globe, and some would arrive early Wednesday morning. They’d leave at 9 a.m. The plan had circulated for more than a week on social media, and with it a promise of egalitarianism: Remember, there are no leaders, there are no coyotes, there are no financiers, a message repeated in all the groups. We are supporting each other as the Salvadoran brothers that we are.When Sandra told her parents her plan, they forbade it. “I don’t have the courage to leave them,” she typed in a WhatsApp message the night before departure. “They are everything to me.” She would stay home—as a caravan of some 2,000 people set off on foot toward the U.S. border, at least 1,300 miles away.For weeks Salvadorans have followed the news as a group of more than 7,000 immigrants walked, swam, and hitchhiked from neighboring Honduras toward the United States. They’ve listened as President Trump threatened to send as many as 15,000 troops to shut down the U.S.-Mexico border and prevent the Honduran caravan from entering. Still, with few options for a better future in El Salvador, they chose the caravan.Migrants at El Salvador del Mundo park in central San Salvador look at a map of the areas they’ll pass through in the caravan bound for the U.S. border.When the sun set on the Tuesday before departure, groups of people from across the country had filtered into the plaza, to spread out blankets along the tiered lawn and rest against their backpacks. Maps and snacks were passed around, and people studied the route north. Some had decided just days ago to join, thinking that the chance to travel without paying thousands of dollars to a coyote smuggler may not come again. And so they packed a small bag—three changes of clothes, identity documents, money, and medicine, as recommended in the WhatsApp groups. Few brought photographs, mementos from home, or anything more than the necessities.With a journey of unknown length and hardship before them, many left their children behind, saying they could only justify risking their own lives. Eliezer Javier, just a toddler, won’t remember his mother Marilyn dropping him off at his grandparents’ house on Tuesday afternoon. Marilyn’s mother told her not to worry; Marilyn promised her little brother that she’d send money so he could finish school, as she hadn’t done. She and her boyfriend plan to go to Houston, where her boyfriend’s grandmother lives, but until Tuesday they hadn’t looked at it on a map. “If I make it, I’ll never come back,” Marilyn said, clutching a juice box and granola bar that someone was distributing.The origin story of El Salvador’s caravan is hazy. “It’s a ghost,” said one immigration official about the organizers. But one clue lies in a quaint town an hour east of San Salvador. In early October, as Carlos watched the Honduran caravan make its way north, he chatted with a group of Facebook friends about the future. It’d been a year and a half since a local gang showed up at his family’s bakery and forced him into a car. His ex-girlfriend, the mother of his child, had started dating the gang leader, sparking a potentially deadly rivalry. The threats and beatings hadn’t stopped since then.Salvadoran migrants line the roadside near the Izalco volcano in Sonsonate, El Salvador, hoping to catch a ride toward the Guatemala border.“I’m not going to stand still and wait for them to kill me,” Carlos told his mother. His friends started talking: What if they made their own caravan at the end of the month? From there, he said, word spread: new WhatsApp groups formed as old ones reached their member limit. Now, as many as 30 groups connect different regions of the country. Hundreds of messages an hour deliver a flurry of logistical coordination, news articles, prayers, and inspirational quotes.On Carlos’ last day in El Salvador, his two-and-a-half-year-old daughter Melanie played games on her father’s phone and made change for customers buying pastries from the case outside their home. The news from the Honduran caravan had turned ugly, with tear gas and rubber bullets used on the Mexico border, and his mother begged him to think about the birthdays and Christmases he’d miss with his daughter. But Carlos felt there was no other choice. “What good am I going to do when I’m dead? With this decision I have a way out and an opportunity to change my daughter’s life.” Before sunrise the next morning, Carlos didn’t wake her to say goodbye before slipping out to catch a bus to San Salvador. If he makes it to the United States, he won’t return to El Salvador.Just after 8 a.m. Wednesday in the El Salvador del Mundo plaza, someone stood up, yelled to the group, and the exodus began. Hundreds of people wearing backpacks and carrying little more than a bottle of water followed a road out of the traffic circle and headed west from the center of San Salvador. Passing cars threw baggies of water and school kids in black-and-white uniforms pressed their faces against window screens and shouted encouragement: Good luck! God bless you!It took a caravan of Honduran migrants from October 3 to October 29 to travel from San Pedro Sula, Honduras, to this Mexican Immigration checkpoint on the road outside San Pedro Tapanetepec, in Oaxaca State, Mexico.The group trundled along the edge of Monseñor Romero Highway, named for the outspoken priest who was killed in 1980 by a death squad and recently declared a saint. Semi-trailer trucks and pickups pulled up along the shoulder, and fresh cheers rang out as passengers hopped on. Before midday the group had splintered, but was on its way to Guatemala.Holding on to her 12-year-old son with one hand and 14-year-old daughter with the other, Beatrize climbed into the back of a Maersk box truck and sped off toward the Guatemalan border. Any breeze from the open door was lost as more and more people were pulled aboard along the way, and the air grew thick with heat. Beatrize said she and her kids locked everything inside their house and left before dawn to join the caravan. The situation in the country, she said, is so dangerous that no talk of family separation or soldiers on the border would prevent her from bringing her kids.Josué stood leaning against the truck wall, drenched in sweat and clutching a purple Jansport backpack. The 22-year-old factory worker had spent six months in detention centers in Texas and Georgia in 2016, including days freezing in the notoriously cold “ice box” holding facility. This time, he plans to stay in Mexico to work before trying again to cross the border. Early Tuesday morning he’d been posting encouraging messages in the WhatsApp group: “We Salvadorans don’t know what fear is,” he wrote, with a line of sunglass-wearing emojis. Before leaving he had tucked in two photos of his mother into his wallet.En route from Honduras and hoping to reach the U.S. border, migrants in a caravan of thousands rest by the side of the road near the village of Los Corazones, in Oaxaca in southern Mexico.At an exit near where the highway heads north into Guatemala, the truck stopped and passengers jumped down to look for their next ride. Perched on the back of another truck packed with migrants is Herbert Hernandez Arce, the director of El Salvador’s immigration control. He yells over the noise, listing dangers the passengers might face after they leave the country: robberies, kidnappings, human trafficking. “They’ve been fooled into the notion that this is a free trip,” he said after disembarking the truck. “In this country nothing is free.”By the early afternoon, a line of people snaked around the low-slung buildings on the Guatemala border waiting for their identity cards or passports to be checked. Truck drivers are the usual clientele at a crossing not far from the Pacific coast, but on Wednesday this border was prepared for 500 people. No visas were needed, only identification cards, but the test will come at the border of Mexico. Two weeks ago police clashed with the Honduran caravan, forcing them to wade across a river into the country. Since, Mexico has allowed new immigrants to pass.A half-mile beyond the border, with the first of three crossings complete, clusters of Salvadorans settle into a small park for the night. Kids played on the seesaw and adults rested against their backpacks, discussing the caravan’s singular goal: to congregate at the Mexican border, 200 miles away, by Friday. A young man in a striped polo shirt stepped onto a small concrete post to announce the schedule for the next day: a 3 a.m. departure on hired buses will take them to the next town, two hours north. “Through unity we have strength,” he said, sensing how fractured their plans could become with days of walking and hitching ahead. “Don’t separate. Don’t leave the group.”But as night fell, part of the group decided to push on. They picked up their backpacks and started walking, eyes on the road for a ride going north.Only first names have been used to protect the subjects’ identities.Central American migrants, part of a caravan of thousands, catch a ride October 27 in the back of a trailer truck as they pass near the village of Los Corazones, in Oaxaca, Mexico.",
"A Qaddafi supporter holds a portrait of the Libyan leader during a celebration staged for a group of visiting foreign journalists after regime forces re-took the city from rebels. Zawiyah, Libya. March, 2011.Moises Saman's new book, Discordia, is a visual account of the events of the Arab Spring, compiled over four years living in the Middle East. We recently spoke to him about how this project–and his work–have evolved.JEHAN JILLANI: When did you realize a self-published book was a project you wanted to pursue?MOISES SAMAN: I think the realization [came to me during my second year in Cairo, around the end of 2013]. All of these revolutions were blurring into one and I really needed to understand for myself what it is I wanted to say about the region.JEHAN: A lot of your earlier work reads as straight breaking news photography but your work now is much quieter. Tell me about that evolution.MOISES: I don’t think there's a moment when you suddenly become a different photographer. I think it has to do with growing up as a person.And at some point, you, as a photographer, have to come to terms with the fact that there's limitations to what you do, especially if you’re a Westerner shooting in another country. The moment you realize your limitations, your work also becomes honest.My images may not read as straight news photography anymore but I am really enjoying working on stories that require me to be flexible and read between the lines.JEHAN: You were in the Middle East–specifically Libya, Syria, Tunisia and Egypt–during a very critical moment in its history. What was that experience like?MOISES: [It] was transformative. I was initially shooting a lot for the New York Times, which was this amazing vehicle that allowed me to move around the region. However, I soon went from reacting to the story immediately to becoming more contemplative, even a little bit more cynical, about what was going on. I had to think about what my role was there. One usually doesn’t have the luxury, or even the inclination, to think like that while one is following the news that closely.JEHAN: Why the title Discordia?MOISES: During my time in the Middle East, I started seeing a lot of parallels [between the Arab Spring] and with this idea I had of Greek tragedy as a story that develops from a moment of hope to complete civil war. Discordia is the Greek goddess of chaos and strife and I found that so fitting as well.I also did not want to have a Middle Eastern title because it was important for me to draw parallels with Western history. What is happening in the Middle East happened in the Middle Ages in Europe too, and so I liked how the title spoke to the way a story could be repeated in history.JEHAN: Many of the images seen in Discordia are outtakes from assignments shot for various magazines and newspapers. Together, bound in book form, they end up serving as a very personal tribute to the Middle East. Could you speak a little bit about that?MOISES:  I was on assignment most of the time when I was living in the Middle East. However, when my designer Daria Birang and I started putting the book together, I found that the pictures that really spoke to me were shot moments before and after the photo that ended up in the magazine or in the newspaper. Many times, these were photos I had not even shown to my editors. These were pictures that actually asked questions and I found that they forced the viewer to engage a little bit more.I had also became a little tired of the action picture–it wasn't good enough for me. I went through thousands of pictures of clashes, of the protestors throwing rocks, but at the end, I just didn't find it was telling enough.Shobra district, Cairo, Egypt. November 2011.JEHAN: Could you describe the book's logic? Why is it meaningful?MOISES: The book form allows you to play with a narrative in a way that a slideshow or a magazine spread doesn’t. It is almost like writing a song–there are highs, lows and everything has to have a certain rhythm. In this case, I was interested in creating a visual narrative for a very factual story, one where you had the news and you knew the events. A lot of the editing and the sequencing was also the result of an extremely close collaboration with Daria.Working this way was an incredibly therapeutic exercise and it forced me to be honest about the work I was doing. I think any photographer who spends an extended amount of time working on a single story owes it to him or herself to understand what their work means that way.JEHAN: Tell me about the cover.MOISES: The cover is a figure of a protestor throwing a rock set against a static background of a TV in Libya. It was designed by Daria. She really was a key person in the making of this book and I really couldn't have done this without her. I would in fact encourage other photographers to find similar ways of collaborating--that's really when you're able to become a better editor, a better photographer and you are able to really understand your work better.JEHAN:  Does the book’s publication signal the end of your time working in the Middle East?MOISES: No, not at all. I am working in Kurdistan now and am looking at the phenomenon of the Islamic State and how Middle Eastern state institutions seem to be in decay. Specifically, I am looking at the Kurds as this non-state actor that is now coming to the forefront and having the kind of influence that a country would have. I sort of see it as a continuum. Probably, we can trace the Arab Spring to the Iraq War or even further and we are still seeing this long arm of history. In a way, I see everything as connected.This interview has been condensed for length and clarity.You can see more of Moises Saman's work here. His new book Discordia is out now.Jehan Jillani is an Associate Photo Editor at National Geographic. Follow her on Twitter and Instagram.",
"About 10:30 on a Saturday morning in the north London borough of Islington, two men on mopeds race down the shopping corridor of Upper Street. Sheathed in helmets, gloves, and jackets, they look more like manic video game figures than humans. They weave through traffic and around double-decker buses at kamikaze velocity. Motorists flinch at their approach. The bikers pop wheelies and execute speedy figure eights along the busy street. Still, something more purposeful than joyriding would seem to be on their minds.After three or four minutes, they abruptly turn off Upper and onto a quiet and leafy residential avenue. They hop the curb and cut their engines. Dismounting on the sidewalk, their helmets still on, they fall into a lengthy conversation. Their dialogue is known only to them. But there is something the men themselves likely don’t know: About a mile away, from a windowless room, two other men are watching them.“They’re moving,” Sal says to Eric.The two men sit 10 feet apart, behind a long console in Islington’s closed-circuit television (CCTV) control room, painted and carpeted in gray, with no adornments. Sal is middle-aged, while Eric is decades younger. Both wear casual office attire. No small talk passes between them. As the two bikers take off, Sal types away at his computer keyboard, prompting Camera 10 to appear on his screen. And there they are again, flying down Upper Street. As they disappear from Sal’s view, Eric quickly locates them on Camera 163. With a joystick, he zooms the camera onto the moped pulling up the rear until its license plate is legible.Sal radios the police station. “We have two suspicious mopeds doing wheelies on Upper Street.”Facing the men is an immense display with 16 screens. It conveys live images from Islington’s network of 180 CCTV cameras. By visible evidence, this Saturday morning is a comparatively placid one. Earlier in the week a young man had died after being stabbed in a flat, and from the overpass at Archway Road, darkly referred to as “suicide bridge,” another man had jumped to his death. Later today in Finsbury Park, the cameras would spend hours panning across 35,000 festivalgoers in search of pickpockets, drunken brawlers, and other assorted agents of petty mischief.For the moment, however, the bikers are the only action in Islington. And though Sal and Eric—who have been doing this work for 15 and four years, respectively—pursue their quarry from one camera to the next with humdrum efficiency, I can almost see their blood quicken. For what we have here, they believe, are two members of gangs that have been plaguing Islington for more than a year. They snatch smartphones from pedestrians, then sell the items on the black market. It happens about 50 times a week in the borough of nearly 233,000 residents.And yet to the uninitiated, the prospect of catching the bikers in an illegal act can feel almost irrelevant. Instead, I’m captivated by the basic spectacle of two people who appear to have no idea they’re being watched everywhere they go. Perhaps they’re criminals. Perhaps they’re sociopaths. Our surveillance is inconclusive on these matters. The only thing that’s certain is that we see them but they don’t see us. Like a deer framed in a hunting riflescope, the bikers display no signs of their vulnerability. In this way they are profoundly exposed.That evening a few miles away, I’m sitting in a mobile trailer in southwest London, just down the street from the Vauxhall Underground Station. Beside me is an affable young man who goes by the name of Haz. Several closed-circuit screens are arrayed in front of us, displaying images provided by 10 cameras aimed at two nearby nightclubs.Haz is here a couple of weekends a month. The nightclubs, Lightbox and Fire, wish to avoid legal troubles from drug deals by their patrons, so they’ve commissioned a mobile CCTV operator and former policeman, Gordon Tyerman, to have his man Haz keep an eye on the crowds. Occasionally a clubgoer happens to notice one of the cameras and responds by thrusting a middle finger or an exposed breast into Haz’s field of vision. Otherwise, the thousands of young men and women entering and exiting the clubs are his unwitting entertainment.“This is the best, most exciting job I’ve had so far,” Haz says. “It’s so unpredictable. Everything’s quiet, and then suddenly a fight breaks out.”Haz sits in the trailer for 10 hours straight, eyes trained on the patrons. If he sees the makings of a drug deal or a fight, he notifies the club’s in-house security by walkie-talkie. It amazes him how indiscreet drug dealers can be—with the bulges in their socks and their melodramatic handovers—despite the presence of security guards. “We ask them, ‘How stupid can you be?’ ” he laughs. “And they take it as a challenge.”Tonight there are no drug deals, no fights, only the random foolishness of the young and inebriated. They stagger with linked arms down the middle of the street. They paw at each other. They get sick on the sidewalk. In their sudden aloneness, they break out in sobs. Though Haz maintains that he’s gained “invaluable skills from this job,” chiefly the skills he’s honing are those of Vauxhall’s invisible, after-hours anthropologist.“There’s stuff you see on CCTV,” he marvels, “that makes you think, ‘That’s not adult behavior.’ They tend to forget who they are.”But do they really tend to forget who they are? Or do they simply tend to forget that someone might be watching?Shooter Detection Systems in Boston, Massachusetts, has invented a wall-mounted device (top left) designed to find an active shooter inside a building. The system uses acoustic software to identify the sound of gunshots and infrared muzzle-flash detectors to verify the shots and then automatically provides security officers with a map that shows their precise location.In 1949, amid the specter of European authoritarianism, the British novelist George Orwell published his dystopian masterpiece 1984, with its grim admonition: “Big Brother is watching you.” As unsettling as this notion may have been, “watching” was a quaintly circumscribed undertaking back then. That very year, 1949, an American company released the first commercially available CCTV system. Two years later, in 1951, Kodak introduced its Brownie portable movie camera to an awestruck public.Today more than 2.5 trillion images are shared or stored on the Internet annually—to say nothing of the billions more photographs and videos people keep to themselves. By 2020, one telecommunications company estimates, 6.1 billion people will have phones with picture-taking capabilities. Meanwhile, in a single year an estimated 106 million new surveillance cameras are sold. More than three million ATMs around the planet stare back at their customers. Tens of thousands of cameras known as automatic number plate recognition devices, or ANPRs, hover over roadways—to catch speeding motorists or parking violators but also, in the case of the United Kingdom, to track the comings and goings of suspected criminals. The untallied but growing number of people wearing body cameras now includes not just police but also hospital workers and others who aren’t law enforcement officers. Proliferating as well are personal monitoring devices—dash cams, cyclist helmet cameras to record collisions, doorbells equipped with lenses to catch package thieves—that are fast becoming a part of many a city dweller’s everyday arsenal. Even less quantifiable, but far more vexing, are the billions of images of unsuspecting citizens captured by facial-recognition technology and stored in law enforcement and private-sector databases over which our control is practically nonexistent.Those are merely the “watching” devices that we’re capable of seeing. Presently the skies are cluttered with drones—2.5 million of which were purchased in 2016 by American hobbyists and businesses. That figure doesn’t include the fleet of unmanned aerial vehicles used by the U.S. government not only to bomb terrorists in Yemen but also to help stop illegal immigrants entering from Mexico, monitor hurricane flooding in Texas, and catch cattle thieves in North Dakota. Nor does it include the many thousands of airborne spying devices employed by other countries—among them Russia, China, Iran, and North Korea.We’re being watched from the heavens as well. More than 1,700 satellites monitor our planet. From a distance of about 300 miles, some of them can discern a herd of buffalo or the stages of a forest fire. From outer space, a camera clicks and a detailed image of the block where we work can be acquired by a total stranger.In 2015 Peter Gold was shot while trying to rescue a woman who was being abducted at gunpoint. The incident was captured on a video camera; it shows a man shooting Gold in the stomach and then trying twice to shoot him in the head as he lay curled on the sidewalk. Both times, the gun jammed. Like the business owner who installed this camera, more cities and private citizens are turning to street-level surveillance to fight crime.Gold returns to the New Orleans street where he was shot in 2015. Then a 25-year-old medical student, he had intervened when he saw a man later identified as Euric Cain attempt to drag a woman into a vehicle.Simultaneously, on that very same block, we may well be photographed at unsettlingly close range perhaps dozens of times daily, from lenses we may never see, our image stored in databases for purposes we may never learn. Our smartphones, our Internet searches, and our social media accounts are giving away our secrets. Gus Hosein, the executive director of Privacy International, notes that “if the police wanted to know what was in your head in the 1800s, they would have to torture you. Now they can just find it out from your devices.”This is—to lift the title from another British futurist, Aldous Huxley—our brave new world. That we can see it coming is cold comfort since, as Carnegie Mellon University professor of information technology Alessandro Acquisti says, “in the cat-and-mouse game of privacy protection, the data subject is always the weaker side of the game.” Simply submitting to the game is a dispiriting proposition. But to actively seek to protect one’s privacy can be even more demoralizing. University of Texas American studies professor Randolph Lewis writes in his new book, Under Surveillance: Being Watched in Modern America, “Surveillance is often exhausting to those who really feel its undertow: it overwhelms with its constant badgering, its omnipresent mysteries, its endless tabulations of movements, purchases, potentialities.”The desire for privacy, Acquisti says, “is a universal trait among humans, across cultures and across time. You find evidence of it in ancient Rome, ancient Greece, in the Bible, in the Quran. What’s worrisome is that if all of us at an individual level suffer from the loss of privacy, society as a whole may realize its value only after we’ve lost it for good.”Is a looming state of Orwellian bleakness already a fait accompli? Or is there a more hopeful outlook, one in which a world under watch in many ways might be better off? Consider the 463 infrared camera traps the World Wildlife Fund uses in China to monitor the movements of the threatened giant panda. Or the thermal imaging devices that rangers deploy at night to detect poachers in Kenya’s Masai Mara National Reserve. Or the sound-activated underwater camera system developed by UC San Diego researchers that tracks the nearly extinct vaquita porpoise in the Sea of Cortez. Or the “forest watcher” cameras installed to help protect the shrinking timberlands of Sri Lanka.“If you want a picture of the future,” Orwell darkly warned in his classic, “imagine a boot stamping on a human face—forever.” This authoritarian vision discounts the possibility that governments might use such tools to make the streets safer. Recall, for example, the footage from security cameras that cracked the cases of the 2005 London subway and 2013 Boston Marathon bombings. Multitudes of more obscure episodes exist, such as that of Euric Cain, caught unambiguously on camera shooting a Tulane University medical student named Peter Gold in 2015 after Gold prevented him from abducting a woman on the streets of New Orleans. (Gold survived; Cain received a 54-year prison sentence for a crime rampage that included rapes, armed robbery, and attempted murder.)At the Port of Boston, the Department of Homeland Security has tested a cargo-visualizing method invented by two MIT physicists, Robert Ledoux and William Bertozzi. Using a technique known as nuclear resonance fluorescence—in which elements become identifiable by exciting their nuclei—the screening device can, without opening a freight container, discern the elemental fingerprint of its contents. Unlike a typical x-ray scan, which shows only shape and density, it can tell the difference between soda and diet soda, natural and manufactured diamonds, plastics and high-energy explosives, and nonnuclear and nuclear material.Does anyone doubt that a more closely inspected world over the past 150 years would have been a safer one? We might know the identity of Jack the Ripper, whether Lee Harvey Oswald acted alone, and if O. J. Simpson acted at all. Of course, public safety has been the pretext for surveillance before and since Orwell’s time. But today such technology can be seen as a lifesaver in more encompassing ways. Thanks to imagery provided by satellite cameras, relief organizations have located refugees near Mosul, encamped in the deserts of northern Iraq. And thanks to numerous space probes, scientists have proof that the world’s climate is dramatically changing.Could the great Orwell’s imagination have failed? Could Big Brother save humanity, rather than enslave it? Or might both scenarios be true at the same time?‘There is an appetite in the U.K. for surveillance that I haven’t seen anywhere else in the world,” said Tony Porter, the world’s only known surveillance camera commissioner, as we sat in the cafeteria of a London government office with CCTV cameras peering at us from the corners. A former police officer and counterterrorism specialist, Porter was recruited four years ago by Her Majesty’s Home Office, responsible for the security of the realm, to lend a semblance of oversight to the country’s ever growing surveillance state. With a paltry annual budget of $320,000, Porter and three staffers spend their workdays persistently urging, with some success, government and commercial users of surveillance cameras to comply with the relevant codes and guidelines. But beyond mentioning the names of the noncompliant in a report to Parliament, Porter’s office has no powers of enforcement.Nonetheless, his appraisal of the U.K. as the most receptive country in the world to surveillance technology is widely shared. London’s network of surveillance cameras was first conceived in the early nineties, in the wake of two bombings by the Irish Republican Army in the city’s financial district. What followed was a fevered spread of monitoring technology. As William Webster, a professor of public policy at the University of Stirling in Scotland and an expert on surveillance, recalls, “The rhetoric about public safety at the time was, ‘If you’ve got nothing to hide, you’ve got nothing to fear.’ In hindsight, you can trace that slogan back to Nazi Germany. But the phrase was commonly used, and it crushed any sentiment against CCTVs.”The city’s original security infrastructure, known as the “ring of steel,” was later expanded and augmented by ANPR technology on major thoroughfares. Now spread throughout the country are 9,000 such cameras, which photograph and store 30 million to 40 million images daily of every single passing license tag, not merely those of speeders or known criminals. As former Scotland police counterterrorism coordinator Allan Burnett observes, “It would be very difficult today to go through Scotland and not be seen by an ANPR camera.”“I’m pretty sure we now have more CCTVs per capita than any other city on the planet,” the former U.K. deputy prime minister, Nick Clegg, told me as he sat in his London office, watched by a camera across the street trained directly on his back. “And basically, it’s happened without any meaningful public or political debate whatsoever. Partly it’s because we don’t have the history of fascism and nondemocratic regimes, which in other countries have instilled profound suspicion of the state. Here it feels benign. And as we know from history, it’s benign until it isn’t.”China’s first aircraft carrier built from scratch is launched in Dalian, a port city on the Yellow Sea. These images, taken by Planet’s Dove satellites, show the ship in a berth (April 23, 2017), backing into the water (April 26, 2017), and docked (April 27, 2017). Planet can capture similar developments day by day, anywhere in the world.Elements of fear and romance help explain the profusion of surveillance in the U.K. This, after all, is a country saved by espionage: The museum commemorating the legendary World War II code breakers at Bletchley Park, 40 miles northwest of London, is today a much visited site. So, for that matter, is the London Film Museum’s permanent exhibit on the dashing spy James Bond, a creation of the writer and former British naval intelligence officer Ian Fleming. Agent 007 is bound up in the nation’s postwar self-appraisal, but so is the jolting reality that the U.K. was one of the first countries to face the constant fear of terrorist attacks. When it comes to protecting its people, the British government is viewed in a more appreciative light than perhaps those of other free societies. Even after the revelations by former U.S. National Security Agency contract employee Edward Snowden that American and British intelligence agencies had been collecting bulk data from their own citizens—a disclosure that triggered calls for reform by both political parties in the U.S.—Parliament essentially enshrined those powers in late 2016 by passing the Investigatory Powers Act with scant public outcry.As David Omand, the former director of the Government Communications Headquarters—one of the British intelligence agencies shown by Snowden to be collecting bulk data—put it to me: “On the whole we see our government as efficient and benign. It runs the National Health Service, public education, and social security. And thank God, we haven’t been through the experience of the man in the brown leather trench coat knocking on the door at four in the morning. So when we talk about government surveillance, the resonance is different here.”That’s not by any means to say that a country like the United States, with its more skeptical view of big government, is wholly immune to surveillance creep. Most of its police departments are now using or considering using body cameras—a development that, thus far at least, has been cheered by civil liberties groups as a means of curbing law enforcement abuses. ANPR cameras are in many major American cities as traffic and parking enforcement tools. In the wake of the September 11 attacks, New York City ramped up its CCTV network and today has roughly 20,000 officially run cameras in Manhattan alone. Meanwhile, Chicago has invested heavily in its network of 32,000 CCTV devices to help combat the murder epidemic in its inner city.But other U.S. cities with no history of terrorist attacks and relatively low violent crime rates also have embraced surveillance technology. I checked out the CCTV network that has quietly spread throughout downtown Houston, Texas. As recently as 2005, the city didn’t have a single such camera. But then Dennis Storemski, the director of the Mayor’s Office of Public Safety and Homeland Security, began touring other cities. “Basically, it was what I saw in London that got me interested in the technology,” he recalls. Today, thanks to federal grants, Houston has 900 CCTV cameras, with access to an additional 400. As in London, officials don’t monitor every camera every minute—and as such, Storemski says, “it’s not surveillance per se. We’ve wanted to take away the expectation that people are watching.” Perhaps for that reason, Houston’s CCTV reach will soon expand well beyond downtown, but—in a state hardly known as trusting of government—without the slightest drama.Similarly, the acquiescence among the British to the proliferation of cameras is as striking as any sound of silence could possibly be. CCTV and ANPR cameras—and the signs announcing them (though by no means all of them)—blend in as drab companions to the rest of the city’s infrastructure. During three weeks in London, I strolled through the quiet neighborhoods where Orwell and Huxley once resided. Orwell’s house, on Canonbury Square in Islington, is within view of several CCTV and ANPR cameras and is a mere four-minute walk from the borough’s control room. For its part, the former Huxley residence a few miles away is under constant watch in an impregnable steel-reinforced control room.Outside of the city in the county of South Yorkshire, I visited Barnsley Hospital, where some security personnel are equipped with body cameras to discourage unruly behavior by patients or visitors. Similar cameras, it was reported during my stay, were being tested for use by schoolteachers. Given that an estimated 150,000 British police officers are already equipped with such devices, perhaps it’s an effortless next step to contemplate them on other authority figures, such as educators and nurses. From there, however, who’s next? Flight attendants? Postal workers? Psychologists? Human resource directors?“Some local authorities are seeking to compel taxi drivers to use surveillance,” Porter, the surveillance camera commissioner, told me. “Considering that, and the use of body cameras in hospitals and schools, the question I’d put forward is: What kind of society do we want to live in? Is it acceptable for all of us to go around legitimately filming each other, just in case somebody commits a wrong against us?”I thought about this last question during my final days ambling along the well-scrubbed streets of London, my eyes now keenly attuned to the cyclops-like glares from corners and lampposts. As my path inevitably led me to the famed Westminster Bridge over the River Thames, I found myself engulfed by tourists of various nationalities holding up smartphones in an attempt to produce the ultimate London selfie. I ducked and turned and apologized before realizing it was futile. And these were just the cameras in front of my face. Were all of my movements being casually documented in this way? Did it really make any difference whether Big Brother was watching, given that everyone is already watching everyone else?I’d been discussing society’s growing pics-or-it-didn’t-happen fixation with two keen observers. The first, Chloe Combi, is a former schoolteacher whose first book, Generation Z: Their Voices, Their Lives, is the fruit of hundreds of hours of interviews she conducted with British teenagers. They demonstrated a remarkable nonchalance about being photographed and filmed in almost every conceivable setting. “You can watch a documentary of someone’s entire life on their phone,” Combi told me. “We live in a world where, increasingly, nothing remains secret. And one of the signs of true wealth and power may end up being that privacy will become a commodity only for those who have the serious money to buy it. For everybody else, all the world really will be a stage, with all the people on it self-consciously playing their role.”The futurist spectacle conjured up by Combi—one in which everyone is simultaneously voyeur and exhibitionist, 24/7—struck me as a somewhat egalitarian version of 1984 and Brave New World, yet no less dystopic. Are we already there, at the endpoint of what University of Kansas sociologist William Staples in 2000 called the “state of permanent visibility,” except by our own acquiescence rather than by governmental force? Our visual constellation is replete with adorable babies, kittens, and elephants—but also ISIS beheadings, celebrities in sexual congress, double-speaking politicians, police shootings of unarmed civilians. Meanwhile, we’re seen, up close and far too personally, by airport-security screeners, “smart” billboards that tailor ads to us based on our appearance, and everyone who knows everyone who caught us on camera on a day when we could swear we were alone.Whether this all adds up to a more enlightened society, an overstimulated one, or a little bit of both is hard to say. I solicited the thoughts of Susan Greenfield, a research neuroscientist and renowned critic of social media obsessives, who also happens to be a member of the British Parliament. Baroness Greenfield’s assessment was no less stark than Combi’s. “The notion of privacy, of privation, is shutting something out,” she said. “We need to cut ourselves off. Everyone seems to think that it’s great to be connected and exposed all the time. But what happens when everything is literal and visual? How do you explain a concept like honor when you can’t find it on Google Images? The universe of the abstract is inexplicable. The nuance in life disappears.”And so as I talked with Tony Porter in the cavernous and highly surveilled cafeteria of the Home Office, I found myself repeating something I’d expressed to him once before, months earlier: Didn’t this whole fear-of-Big-Brother impulse seem rather quaint now?“I now use that term in my speeches,” the surveillance camera commissioner informed me with a pleased grin. Then he turned serious. Porter had recently visited the United Arab Emirates, a federation of monarchies that suppresses dissent and has a great deal of interest in surveillance technology. That struck Porter as ominous. “I get where you’re coming from,” he said. “But surveillance by the state is invasive, it’s powerful, it’s capable of connectivity beyond people’s wildest imaginations. That’s completely different from, say, a selfie.“Look,” he went on, “the real threat is when we move towards integrated surveillance. Large retailers are spending millions of pounds looking at every conceivable element of this. I’m a middle-aged fat guy; I walk into a supermarket and immediately on the intercom they start advertising for croissants. What if it gets more sinister, and from my Facebook profile they can target my daughter and ask where she shops? Who’s going to regulate that? Or does it not need to be regulated? Is the horse already out of the barn? Is it already ‘quaint’?”Thermal imaging cameras, provided by the World Wildlife Fund to the Mara Conservancy, have allowed rangers in Kenya’s Masai Mara National Reserve to extend their work protecting wildlife into the night.The seemingly minute-by-minute advancements in surveillance technology can, to some civil libertarians, take on the appearance of a runaway bullet train. As Ross Anderson, professor of security engineering at the University of Cambridge, warns, “We need to be thinking ahead to the next 20 years. Because that’s when you’ll have augmented reality, an Oculus Rift 2.0, with at least 8,000 pixels per inch. So, sitting in the back of a lecture hall, you can read the text on a lecturer’s phone. At the same time, the one hundred CCTVs in that lecture hall will be able to see the password you’re punching into your phone.”Even Huxley, whose masterwork presents a forbidding view of a hyper-industrialized London in the year 2540, didn’t conceive of a world so acutely visualized that our most intimate secrets can’t always be concealed. Where would that leave us? On the one hand, it stretches credulity to imagine the willful suppression of such tools. Says David Anderson, a London barrister who spent six years as the government’s independent reviewer of counterterrorism legislation, “Either you think technology has presented us with strong powers that the government should use with equally strong safeguards, or you believe this technology is so scary we should pretend it’s not there. And I’m firmly in the first category—not because I say government is to be trusted, but instead because in a mature democracy such as this one, we’re capable of constructing safeguards that are good enough for the benefits to outweigh the disadvantages.”On the other hand, allowing such technological progress to find its way into a largely unregulated marketplace seems equally imprudent. Jameel Jaffer, the founding director of Columbia University’s Knight First Amendment Institute, says, “I do think that we live increasingly recorded and tracked lives. And I also think we’re only starting to grapple with the implications of that, so before we adopt new technologies or before we permit new surveillance forms to entrench themselves in our societies, we should think about what the long-term implications of those surveillance technologies will be.”How to craft such judgments? Endeavoring to do so is particularly nettlesome when a breakthrough occurs that explodes our notion of how we can view the world. In fact, a game changer of this sort has already emerged. The technology in question can monitor the Earth’s entire landmass every single day. It’s the brainchild of a San Francisco–based company called Planet, founded by three idealistic former NASA scientists named Will Marshall, Robbie Schingler, and Chris Boshuizen.Their headquarters resides in an unprepossessing warehouse in the gritty South of Market neighborhood. The tableau inside is textbook Silicon Valley: more than 200, mostly young techies in aggressively casual dress hunched silently over their keyboards in an open work space, aside from a few conference rooms named after some of the company’s heroes—among them, Galileo, Gandhi, and Al Gore. I sat in one of them overlooking the upscale employee cafeteria, where lunch would later be followed by a happy hour of Napa wines and California microbrews.Marshall and Schingler joined me. The former is a lanky Brit with wire-frame glasses; the latter, a broad-shouldered and easygoing Californian. Both are 39 and seemed fully recovered from their dinner the previous evening to celebrate the fifth anniversary of when they started working full time at Planet. At NASA they had been captivated by the idea of taking pictures from space, especially of Earth—and for reasons that were humanitarian rather than science based.They experimented by launching ordinary smartphones into orbit, confirming that a relatively inexpensive camera could function in outer space. “We thought, What could we do with those images?” Schingler said. “How can we use these things for the benefit of humanity? List the world’s problems: poverty, housing, malnutrition, deforestation. All of these problems are more easily addressed if you have more up-to-date information about our planet. Like you wake up in a few years and you find there’s a hole in the Amazon forest. What if we could have supplied information about this more rapidly to the Brazilian government?”In storybook fashion, Marshall and Schingler developed their first model in a garage in Silicon Valley. The idea was to design a relatively low-cost, shoe box–size satellite to minimize the military-scale budgets often required for designing such technology—and then, as Marshall told me, “to launch the largest constellation of satellites in human history.” By deploying many such devices, the company would be able to see daily changes on the Earth’s surface in totality.In 2013 they launched their first satellites and received their first photographs, which provided a far more dynamic look at life around the world than previous global mapping imagery. “The thing that surprised us most,” said Marshall, “is that almost every picture that came down showed how the Earth was changing. Fields were reshaped. Rivers moved. Trees were taken down. Buildings went up. Seeing all of this completely changes our concept of the planet as being static. And instead of just having a figure about how much a country has been deforested, people can now be motivated by pictures that show the deforestation taking place.”Today Planet has more than 200 satellites in orbit, with about 150 it calls Doves that can image every bit of land every day when conditions are right. Planet has ground stations as far away as Iceland and Antarctica. Its clients are just as varied. The company works with the Amazon Conservation Association to track deforestation in Peru. It has provided images to Amnesty International that document attacks on Rohingya villages by security forces in Myanmar. At the Middlebury Institute’s Center for Nonproliferation Studies, recurring global imaging helps the think tank watch for the sudden appearance of a missile test site in Iran or North Korea. And when USA Today and other publications wanted an aerial image of the Shayrat air base in Syria before and after it was bombed by the U.S. military last April in retaliation for a chemical attack on a rebel-held Syrian town, the news organizations knew whom to call.Those are pro bono clients. Its paying customers include Orbital Insight, a Silicon Valley–based geo-spatial analytics firm that interprets data from satellite imagery. With such visuals, Orbital Insight can track the development of road or building construction in South America, the expansion of illegal palm oil plantations in Africa, and crop yields in Asia. In the company’s conference room, James Crawford, the chief executive, opened his laptop and showed me aerial views of Chinese oil tanks, with their floating lids indicating they were about three-quarters full. “Hedge funds, banks, and oil companies themselves know what’s in their tanks,” he said with a sly grin, “but not in others’, so temporal resolution is extremely important.” Crawford’s firm also employs Planet’s optical might to charitable ends. For example, it conducts poverty surveys in Mexico for the World Bank, using building heights and car densities as proxies for economic well-being.In this photograph with a long exposure, a U.S. Forest Service airplane banks over a wildfire near Lake Isabella, California, in Sequoia National Forest, to take images with a thermal infrared scanner. The data are overlaid onto maps (below) to provide accurate fire perimeters so firefighters can plan their attacks, predict fire behavior, and identify threats.Meanwhile, Planet’s marketing team spends its days gazing at photographs, imagining an interested party somewhere out there. An insurance company wanting to track flood damage to homes in the Midwest. A researcher in Norway seeking evidence of glaciers eroding. But what about … a dictator wishing to hunt down a roving dissident army?Here is where Planet’s own ethical guidelines would come into play. Not only could it refuse to work with a client having malevolent motives, but it also doesn’t allow customers to stake a sole proprietary claim over the images they buy. The other significant constraint is technological. Planet’s surveillance of the world at a resolution of 10 feet is sufficient to discern the grainy outline of a single truck but not the contours of a human. Resolution-wise, the current state of the art of one foot is supplied by another satellite imaging company, DigitalGlobe. But for now, only Planet, with its formidable satellite deployment, is capable of providing daily imagery of Earth’s entire landmass. “We’ve run the proverbial four-minute mile,” Marshall said. “Simply knowing it’s possible doesn’t make it any easier.”Still, Planet has blazed a trail. Others someday will follow it. When they do, how will they harness the power to see so much of the globe, every single day? Will their aims be as benevolent as those of Planet? Will they try to perfect satellite photography that’s higher in resolution and thus in invasiveness? Marshall doesn’t see how this is possible. “To identify a person from 300 miles away, you’d need a camera the size of a bus,” he told me. And in any event, he added, an American firm seeking to accomplish that would encounter considerable federal regulatory hurdles.Of course, regulations can be changed. So can the boundaries of our technological limits. Just a year or two ago, the owner of the largest number of functioning satellites in orbit was the U.S. government, with roughly 170. Now Planet prevails over the heavens in greater numbers than the most powerful nation on Earth.Who is next in line to be the Biggest Brother?On a bracing autumn evening in San Francisco, I returned to Planet to see the world through its all-encompassing lens. More than a dozen clients would be there to show off how they’re using satellite imagery—what it meant, in essence, to see the world as it’s changing.I zigzagged among semicircles of techies gathered raptly around monitors. Everywhere I looked, the world came into view. I saw, in the Brazilian state of Pará, the dark green stretches of the Amazon jungle flash red, prompting automatic emails to the landowners: Warning, someone is deforesting your land! I saw the Port of Singapore teem with shipping activity. I saw the croplands of southern Alberta, Canada, in a state of flagging health. I saw an entire network of new roads in war-wracked Aleppo, Syria—and for that matter, a new obstruction in one of those roads, possibly a crater from a bomb attack. I saw oil well pads in Siberia—17 percent more than in the previous year, a surprising sign of stepped-up production that seemed likely to prompt frantic reassessments in the world’s oil and gas markets.Dubbed the “fifth largest intelligence agency,” more than 850,000 volunteers—retirees outfitted with official red vests or armbands—are the eyes and ears of their Beijing, China, neighborhoods. Out in force on holidays, they help direct traffic, give visitor information, and check in on the infirm. But they’re most known for monitoring the streets for suspicious behavior.A tall young man named John Goolgasian wanted to show me how his less than year-old Virginia-based outfit called GeoSpark Analytics was matching crime data with Planet images. After a few clicks, we were staring at neighborhoods in Nigeria that had been overtaken by the extremist group Boko Haram. More clicks and the crescent-shaped coastline that materialized was one I’d visited nine years before: Mogadishu, Somalia, bearing fresh scars from that week’s deadly bomb attacks by al Shabaab. A few more clicks and the image was even more familiar: my neighborhood in Washington, D.C.—specifically, a few blocks from my house, where a burglary report had just been called in.Planet’s hosts halted the show-and-tell to say a few words. Andy Wild, the chief revenue officer, spoke of the new frontier in a slightly quavering voice. It was one thing to achieve, as Wild put it, “a daily cadence of the entire landmass of the Earth.” Now the custodians of this technology had to “turn it into outcomes.” Tom Barton, the chief operating officer, said, “I hope one year from now, we’re here saying, ‘Holy shit, we really did change the world.’ ”I was pondering the implications of this when a young woman showed me what was on her laptop. Her name was Annie Neligh, an Air Force veteran who now leads “customer solutions engineering” at Planet. One of Neligh’s customers needing a solution was a Texas-based insurance company. The company suspected that it was renewing insurance policies for homeowners who weren’t disclosing that they’d installed swimming pools—a 40 percent loss on each policy for the company. So it had asked Planet to provide satellite imagery of homes in Plano, Texas.Neligh showed me what she’d found. Looking at a neighborhood of 1,500 properties, we could clearly see the shimmering shapes of 520 small bodies of water—a proportion far in excess of what the insurance company’s customers had claimed. Neligh shrugged and offered a thin smile. “People lie, you know,” she said.Now her client had the truth. What would it do with this information? Conduct a surprise raid on the somnolent hamlets of Plano? Jack up premiums? Order images that might show construction crews installing new Jacuzzis and Spanish tile roofs? The future is here, and in it, truth is more than a kindly educator. It is a weapon—against timber poachers and burglars and mad bombers and acts of God, but also against the lesser angels of our nature. People lie, you know. The age of transparency is upon us.As I walked back to my hotel, I thought about the two moped riders in Islington, as I often had in the months since I surveilled them. I wondered if they had been arrested. I wondered if they were guilty of anything at all, apart from the crime of being conspicuously interesting on an otherwise dull morning. I wondered if they would ever know that unseen strangers had been watching them, just as a stranger might now be watching me—someone somewhere squinting into a CCTV monitor at the spectacle of a lone figure walking fast on a dark and otherwise vacant street on a chilly night without a coat on, as if in flight from something.",
"DESIGNING FOR AFRICA is the objective of many new technology ventures. The continent is still a largely untapped market, particularly in remote, off-the-grid places. Mark Kamau, director of user-experience design for BRCK in Nairobi, Kenya’s capital, holds a prototype for a mobile weather station.One day in 2004, in the Kenyan farming village of Engineer—so named because an Englishman once ran a mechanical repair shop there—a slight and nearsighted boy was walking past the only printing shop when his eyes fell on something he had never seen: a computer.The boy watched as the owner stabbed at his keyboard. Edging closer, he saw pages spew out of a printer. Standing beside the humming machine, the boy stared mesmerized at the words and numbers that had somehow been transmitted from the computer. Almost a teenager, Peter Kariuki had discovered his destiny.His parents, subsistence farmers of cabbages and potatoes, began to worry that Peter was spending too much time at the printing shop. No one in Engineer had access to the Internet. Few even had electricity. Tech booms were a faraway notion, and talk of random scrawny, bespectacled kids inventing hardware or writing code and cashing out in their 30s had yet to reach Engineer. Regardless, Peter was hooked. When his superb grades in primary school qualified him to attend the prestigious Maseno School (whose alumni include Barack Obama’s father), a teacher gave Peter the keys to the computer science lab, where he could code all night long.In 2010 the 18-year-old computer wizard traveled to Kigali, Rwanda. Kariuki got a job designing an automated ticketing system for the capital city’s bus system. Although Kigali was among Africa’s tidiest and most crime-free cities, its transit system was woefully in keeping with the norm on the continent. Because the buses (really just vans) were unreliable, overcrowded, and glacial in velocity, most commuters relied on motorcycle-taxi drivers, who are notoriously reckless. Indeed, throughout sub-Saharan Africa, road accidents are catching up with AIDS and malaria as leading causes of death—and police statistics that Kariuki has seen indicate that in Kigali about 80 percent of road accidents involve motorcycles. These facts riveted Kariuki and his roommate, Barrett Nash, a fellow start-up aspirant from Canada with oversize red-frame glasses. After turning off their laptops for the evening, Kariuki and Nash would stroll through Kigali’s red-light district to an outdoor bar where, over Primus beers, they would wrestle with a basic question: How could they provide Kigali with an Uber-like motorcycle-taxi service that was efficient, affordable, and safe?Kariuki and Nash described their concept in a video posted on a website used to seek start-up money. An accelerator group founded by an American venture capitalist named Sean O’Sullivan reached them by email and offered them an expenses-paid, three-month mentorship in Cork, Ireland. After determining that it wasn’t a hoax, Kariuki and Nash quit their day jobs. When Kariuki informed his parents, they consoled themselves with the recognition that a 22-year-old had plenty of time to recover from an early failure.Kariuki and Nash returned to Kigali in spring 2015 with the finalized software for the concept they had dubbed SafeMotos. Rain clouds were gathering as they climbed on motorcycle taxis. Amid the downpour both vehicles raced heedlessly uphill, just as a truck driver ahead of them threw his gears in reverse. Kariuki flew off his motorcycle. He wound up with a broken kneecap, three missing teeth, and a disfigured lip. Later, when the surgeon who fixed his mouth inquired about his misfortune, Kariuki told him that his motorcycle driver had been in a traffic accident.ENTREPRENEURS COLLABORATE at a popular technology-innovation center in Nairobi called iHub, where they share ideas, take classes, and participate in hackathons, competing to solve challenging software problems. Young, tech-savvy Africans have flocked to Kenya’s nascent version of Silicon Valley, nicknamed Silicon Savannah, seeking the money and expertise to create groundbreaking technology solutions.“I see this all the time,” sighed the doctor as he proceeded to stitch up Kariuki, who managed a smile. His marketing analysis for SafeMotos was now complete.Today the Rwandan start-up initially funded with $126,000 is the first and largest motorcycle ride–sharing company in Africa. It partners with more than 400 licensed and painstakingly monitored motorcycle-taxi drivers in Kigali, who are likely to make 800,000 trips this year. Gross revenue for 2017 is projected to be $1.1 million. “My dream,” Kariuki told me recently on the rooftop balcony of one of Kigali’s many sparkling new hotels, “is to establish Kigali as our stronghold that no one can touch—and from there move into 10 other cities.”The pride of Engineer belongs to a wave of digital entrepreneurs who aim to transform sub-Saharan Africa. Their emergence coincides with the ubiquity of mobile phones throughout the continent, as well as the arrival of high-speed Internet—which, as recently as a decade ago, was rare in most of Africa. During the past few years, tens of millions of dollars in venture capital has flowed from the West into such countries as Kenya, Rwanda, Nigeria, and South Africa. The result is a generation of innovators whose homegrown ideas could, in the manner of SafeMotos, improve the lives of their fellow Africans.AN UBER-LIKE COMPANY aims to help riders find safe motorcycle drivers. Peter Kariuki, who taught himself to code as a child, hopes his SafeMotos will transform transportation in Africa, starting in Rwanda.This development should not be surprising, despite the many political and socioeconomic travails bedeviling Africa’s overall progress. “On this planet only one continent is growing faster than all the others in population, and it’s likely to keep growing even faster,” says Steve Mutabazi, a chief strategist with the Rwanda Development Board. “I’ve watched Asian countries enviously, and one thing is clear: When you have a developing region with enough members developing an ecosystem, it generates incredible momentum for investment in that region.” Africa, Mutabazi adds, “is at that point now.”Africa’s late arrival to the digital economy comes with certain competitive advantages. It benefits from advances and mistakes already made by Silicon Valley. Its population is younger than that of any other continent. Its marketplace amounts to a new frontier. Its largely untapped labor force presents an appealing prospect for tech-assembly plants. “Look at how China and India are competing in the electronics market,” says Bitange Ndemo, Kenya’s former permanent secretary at the Ministry of Information and Communications and now a professor of entrepreneurship at the University of Nairobi’s School of Business. “India is well on its way to becoming a global production center for electronic products. And how? By having so many young people with little to do that they can make things for next to nothing. What other continent can do that? Africa.”It happens that Ndemo was one of the first Kenyans to promote his country’s tech potential with the nickname Silicon Savannah. Today he says the hype is warranted. Thanks to the mobile money-transferring innovation launched in 2007 by Kenya’s M-Pesa, Africans with a cell phone can deposit and withdraw cash at many shops without having to visit a bank or ATM. Mobile money transfers also are being used to pay for power from solar panels that off-grid-energy companies install on homes lacking electricity. Uber is a fact of life in urban East Africa, as are homegrown car-sharing competitors.BUILDING TECH CAPACITY, Rwanda partnered with Zipline, a California company, to deliver blood and plasma inside drones, creating technical jobs for people like flight operator Olivier Mugiraneza.New technology spreading throughout the region allows residents to buy groceries, clothing, and other goods online. An app called iCow helps herders manage their cattle populations. Another, named Kytabu, makes it possible for students and teachers in underprivileged schools to lease textbooks on mobile devices. However unwelcome economic disadvantage may be, in Africa it has sparked ingenuity. As Michel Bézy, the associate director of Carnegie Mellon University’s Kigali campus, observes, “When you and I need something, we go on Amazon. In the village they have to invent it. I see it with my students. They’re much more creative over here.”Nevertheless Bézy—who has also worked on campuses in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, Belgium, and North Carolina—is among those who fear that Africa cannot possibly meet the expectations raised by Silicon Savannah boosters. “Having an idea is fine,” he says, but “an idea has no value unless it’s executed.” Skeptics point out that some 60 percent of sub-Saharan Africans do not have access to electricity. Even for those who can find a way to power up a computer, there are limited opportunities for learning how to excel with it. Bézy notes that only eight of the thousand highest rated universities are in Africa (one in Egypt and seven in South Africa), according to Webometrics, which ranks colleges by analyzing data available on the Internet. The effects of such deprivations are apparent throughout African society.“The awareness of what information technology can do is very, very low in Africa,” Bézy says. “The first time young Africans get computers in their hands is high school. In the U.S. it’s at age four. Company executives here have no idea what IT can do for their companies.”A TECH-ENABLED LOAN made it possible for Eunice Njoroge (right), who lives in Kenya, to spend $200 to buy a pig and some feed. Using FarmDrive, a mobile phone app that keeps farm records, she was able to demonstrate to a bank that she is creditworthy. Peris Bosire, one of the founders of FarmDrive, shows Njoroge how to get the most from the app. Njoroge has since made all the payments on the loan.Knowing how to use their data has been the least of Peter Kariuki and Barrett Nash’s liabilities. Every week the SafeMotos founders email a newsletter to their investors with updated statistics that range from the percentage increase in the number of repeat customers to the safety scores of their drivers. When I visited the SafeMotos office on an unpaved and hilly road west of downtown Kigali, a large computer monitor tracked every trip from start to finish, logging each one for future analysis.Rather, the challenges facing SafeMotos illustrate the gulf between Africa and Silicon Valley in skilled technicians. “It’s been really hard to find programming talent here,” Kariuki says. “So I have to do everything.”After interviewing dozens of applicants and concluding that none possessed the requisite skills to assist in continually modifying the SafeMotos app, Kariuki and Nash resorted to hiring a team of three developers based in Poland. Similarly, in the marketing of their invention—to Kigali commuters, to investors, to potential advertisers on the app, to markets outside of Kigali—they are on their own. Their inability to find like-minded visionaries to join the SafeMotos team speaks to long-standing deficiencies in education systems such as Rwanda’s. As Bruce Krogh, the director of Carnegie Mellon’s Kigali campus, says, “The whole experience of children in the U.S., almost from the day they’re born, is: What do you want to do? Education there cultivates critical-thinking skills. Here it’s rote to an extreme. In this culture children are told to stay in their place and not make decisions at all.”BRINGING ROBOTS TO CLASSROOMS is the objective of Fundi Bots, a company in Kampala, Uganda, that creates kits to encourage students to learn more about such subjects as mechanics and electronics.But—as evidenced by the successful effort to lure Carnegie Mellon to Kigali six years ago—Rwanda is rapidly becoming an education success story. When Paul Kagame became president in 2000, he proclaimed that his country would have a knowledge-based economy in two decades. “Most people laughed,” recalls the development board’s Mutabazi. “As recently as 2008 no place outside Kigali had fiber-optic cables. By 2010 the entire country was covered by a network of fiber optics. Twenty years ago the country’s entire higher educated population was 4,000. Now it’s 86,000.”That progress may not come soon enough to accommodate Kariuki’s timetable. Still, Kigali—the largest city in a country that, 23 years ago, was reeling from a genocide that killed 800,000 of its citizens—has become a hospitable incubator for innovations like SafeMotos. It is small, relatively free of corruption, and in a country with a highly proactive national government—different in nearly every way from Kariuki’s native country of Kenya, where, he says, “people succeed by hustling, knowing that the bureaucrats won’t help them.”In another Kenyan farming village about 200 miles by road from Peter Kariuki’s birthplace, a child named Peris Bosire would sit in a field while her mother harvested maize and would strain to imagine any other sort of life. Everyone she met in Kebuse was a farmer, or a teacher who educated future farmers. Few made any money. The rough roads made it laborious for them to get their crops to market. They simply consumed what they grew and remained trapped in the village’s primitive sameness.But Bosire’s fate took a turn at age 10, when her parents sent her to a modest boarding school so that she would not have to make the three-mile round-trip walk to class anymore. Someone had donated seven used Dell desktop computers. The girl’s eyes were uncomprehending when she first beheld them. She’d never so much as seen a cell phone. She had no idea how to type. But she was uncommonly intelligent, and before long she understood what those computers represented: Peris Bosire’s ticket out of the village.As with Kariuki, Bosire’s grades qualified her for a superior high school, with a bona fide computer lab. She won a national science competition and a scholarship to the University of Nairobi. Her dorm roommate, Rita Kimani, was also from a poor farming community and had a similar way with computers. Bosire and Kimani became inseparable and a nearly unbeatable team on the tech-contest circuit. In mulling over their future, Bosire recalls, “we started looking back at how we grew up and how our parents did farming. And we realized that none of them had ever received a loan to improve their farming activities.”In spring 2014 the two friends began spending their free time interviewing farmers and bankers. While two-thirds of Kenya’s workforce is in the agricultural sector, less than one percent of commercial loans in Africa go to farmers. If Bosire and Kimani could convince risk-averse bankers that farmers are capable of using mobile phones to keep financial records and make loan payments, then the two women felt confident they could devise a digital bridge between the financial sector and a vast, untapped, and needy customer base.Bosire and Kimani launched FarmDrive in May 2015. The digital recordkeeping platform serves as a basis for bankers to establish credit ratings and determine which farmers are best suited for small loans. FarmDrive’s pilot program consisted of 50 farmers. Today hundreds of thousands are in FarmDrive’s database; about 830 have received financing. In turn the banks pay FarmDrive for essentially functioning as their credit bureau for Kenya’s vast farming community. The two entrepreneurs have no intention of stopping there. “There are more than five million small farmers in Kenya,” Bosire says. “Throughout Africa it’s about 50 million. But when we started FarmDrive, we always had global ambitions. We’re building solutions for farmers in Asia too.”In many ways the impulses driving Peris Bosire and Rita Kimani exemplify the best of Kenya’s digital scene: They’re motivated by a desire to better their communities. Even as they now tour the world speaking at business summits and scoping out other market opportunities, they remain rooted in Kenya. Although they come from impoverished villages, they’ve benefited in a broad sense from a heightened innovative streak that, for a host of historical and cultural reasons, seems endemic to Kenya. One distinction is that after Great Britain’s colonial rule ended, Kenya avoided missteps committed by other African nations. As Ndemo points out, “Since independence Kenya has been a free market economy, where a lot of other countries leaned towards the Soviet Union and experimented with socialism. Uganda had a bad experience with Idi Amin. Rwanda obviously had a very bad experience. In the meantime Kenyans have had more than 50 years of freedom.”But if it’s true that Kenya’s relative stability has contributed to Bosire and Kimani’s success, it’s also true—and typical of the Kenyan entrepreneurial experience—that FarmDrive has succeeded with little encouragement from the national government. In sub-Saharan Africa, Kenya and Nigeria have achieved tech preeminence more from venture capital flowing into those large countries than from government action.“Right now there is no link in Kenya between policymaking, academic research, and the private sector—and only the government can forge that link,” says Ndemo, who was among the first champions of a 5,000-acre technology hub under construction in Konza, about 40 miles from Nairobi, the capital. It was billed as Africa’s first “smart city” at its groundbreaking in 2013, but its construction has been hamstrung by political squabbling and profiteering. As Ndemo understatedly puts it, “The speed is not there.”For now Kenya’s version of Silicon Valley is Nairobi’s Kilimani neighborhood, in particular a heavily trafficked, ramshackle thoroughfare known as Ngong Road. One catalyst was the influential technology-innovation center iHub, from which a number of homegrown software start-ups have been hatched—among them Totohealth, which helps parents track the health of their babies from pregnancy through early childhood. The University of Nairobi’s Kenya Science Campus is situated on Ngong. Across the street is 88mph, a prominent firm that invests in tech start-ups. And not far from iHub’s location is FarmDrive’s office, quietly positioned in the epicenter of the city’s programming community.YOUNG WOMEN LEARN TO CODE at an event in Uganda that used curriculum from Rails Girls, a nonprofit started in Finland that aims to teach girls and young women how to build their own web apps from scratch.Another factor binds Bosire and Kimani to entrepreneurs throughout the city and indeed the continent: In succeeding, they inevitably encounter cultural obligations that can inhibit further success. The mythic start-up stories of Steve Jobs building the first Apples in his parents’ garage and of Bill Gates dropping out of Harvard to start Microsoft might be celebrated in the West, but the stakes for brazen risktakers are different in developing countries. “This is the reality of entrepreneurship in Africa,” Bézy says. “You’re the only educated person in a community of 200 relatives. You’re expected to feed that entire family. And in that way your great idea is constrained.”Bézy’s observation was on my mind as I accompanied Bosire one afternoon on a drive south from Nairobi so that she could learn how a few farming communities were making use of the loans supplied to them via FarmDrive. Their reports were varied. One farmer had used a $200 loan to expand her well-tended acreage of cabbages and was now ready to apply for a second loan. Another woman who raised pigs had constructed a sturdy water tank for her animals. Some farmers had fared less well. One had encountered family hardships and was struggling to pay back his loan. Another had misused the bank’s money on a quick-fix irrigation ditch that had collapsed with the first hard rain. For FarmDrive’s purposes the failures were as useful as the successes. Together they would present a more complete database that would help banks determine lines of credit. Ultimately every farming community in Kenya could benefit from Bosire’s research—including Kebuse, the village where she was raised. But that wasn’t yet obvious back home, as Bosire acknowledged to me when I asked her about the communal pressures on African entrepreneurs. Sighing, the 25-year-old woman said, “My mom and I are having a big fight right now. She doesn’t get it. ‘Why aren’t you sending more money back home? Why don’t you have jobs to give to your cousins?’ ”Perhaps Bosire’s mother will see things in a more appreciative light once FarmDrive comes to her village. “We Africans sometimes resist change,” admits Patrick Wakaba Kariuki, the father of the SafeMotos co-inventor. He had been fretful when his son decided not to attend college in Nairobi to become an entrepreneur. But last year he flew to Rwanda to visit his son. The farmer marveled at Kigali’s clean streets. It was evident to him that a young man could do business there. And when he climbed onto the back of one of the motorcycles in his son’s fleet, strapped on a helmet, and took off, he found himself gliding through more than time and space. He was departing the simple, predictable ways of the village for an uncharted savanna.“I was able to understand,” recalls the farmer, who returned to Engineer—where one day, thanks to dreamers aglow at night by computer screens, the future would also come.",
"For the bulk of human history, it’s been impossible to put Earth in cosmic perspective.Bound by gravity and biology, we can’t easily step outside it, above it, or away from it. For most of us, Earth is inescapably larger than life. Even now, after nearly six decades of human spaceflight, precious few people have rocketed into orbit and seen the sun peeking out from behind that curved horizon. Since 1961, a mere 556 people have had this rarefied experience. Fewer, just 24, have watched Earth shrink in the distance, growing smaller and smaller until it was no larger than the face of a wristwatch. And only six have been completely alone behind the far side of the moon, cut off from a view of our planet as they sailed in an endlessly deep, star-studded sea.New York CityIn 2009 the NASA astronaut visited the Hubble Space Telescope, some 350 miles above the planet, on a mission to fix the beloved eye in the sky for the last time. Hubble’s gaze is perpetually turned toward outer space, but tethered next to the massive observatory, Massimino was entranced by Earth. With verdant South American rain forests, rugged African deserts, and sparkling city lights spread out below him, the planet looked like a paradise.“I thought at one point, if you could be up in heaven, this is how you would see the planet. And then I dwelled on that and said, no, it’s more beautiful than that. This is what heaven must look like. I think of our planet as a paradise. We are very lucky to be here.”It’s an inherently unnatural thing, spaceflight. After all, our physiology evolved specifically to succeed on this planet, not above it. Perhaps that’s why it can be difficult for astronauts to describe the experience of seeing Earth from space.Italian space traveler Luca Parmitano says that we haven’t yet developed the words to truly convey the realities of spaceflight. The building blocks of modern human communication, words are necessarily constrained by meaning and connotation, no matter which language you choose (Parmitano speaks five). And until the mid-20th century, there was no need to express what it means to see our planet in the fiercely primeval essence of space. “We just don’t think in terms of spaceflight,” he says.Caddo Lake, TexasIn September 2013, during her second visit to the International Space Station, Nyberg made a stuffed dinosaur for her three-year-old son. It was, perhaps, the first toy sewn in space, constructed from spare material the mechanical engineer found aboard the orbiting outpost. Making the stuffed animal helped her feel more in touch with her loved ones far below. But the creative project was also a manifestation of the deep connection Nyberg felt to ecosystems past and present while she was in orbit.“In the future, I would like to be more of an advocate for animal conservation. Every single part of the Earth reacts with every other part. It’s one thing. Every little animal is important in that ecosystem. [Seeing the planet from above] makes you realize that, and makes you want to be a little more proactive in keeping it that way. If I could get every Earthling to do one circle of the Earth, I think things would run a little differently."Seeing Earth from space can change a person’s worldview. U.S. astronaut Nicole Stott flew twice on the space shuttle Discovery and returned with a new drive for creating artwork depicting the view. Canadian spacefarer Chris Hadfield says that while orbiting Earth, he felt more connected to the people on the planet than ever before.Kathy Sullivan, who in 1984 became the first American woman to perform a space walk, returned with an abiding awe for the intricate systems that come together to make Earth an improbable oasis. “The thing that grew in me over these flights was a real motivation and desire … to not just enjoy these sights and take these pictures,” she says, “but to make it matter.”Losiny Ostrov National Park, RussiaThe Russian cosmonaut holds the record for time spent in space, with 878 cumulative days logged from 1998 to 2015. For him, the experience was a lesson in the virtues of teamwork, which become amplified in the lethal environment of spaceflight. There’s no doubt in his mind that the planet will endure, even if it is significantly altered by humanity. But he wonders if we as a species will survive our more selfish actions.Meteor Crater, ArizonaA veteran of three NASA spaceflights from 1997 to 2003, Lu looked back at the planet and was struck by the massive craters pressed into its crust by past bombardments. In 2002 he co-founded the B612 Foundation, a nonprofit that works on what he calls “engineering on the largest scale imaginable.” The group’s goal: to prevent any devastating asteroid impacts on Earth.“The overriding impression I got of life on Earth is how robust it is. Life has managed to essentially completely cover this planet in all sorts of different places—it finds a way.”After retiring from NASA, Sullivan led the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration for three years, using the robotic eyes of orbiting satellites to pursue her passion. She says Earth from above is so captivatingly beautiful, she never grew bored looking at it. “I’m not sure I’d want to be in the same room with someone who could get tired of that.”Even when words fail us, a single picture of home from above can change the perspectives of millions of people. In 1968 the Apollo 8 crew became the first people to rocket far away from Earth and loop around the moon. On Christmas Eve, astronaut William Anders snapped what would become an unforgettable image: a lush world rising above the sterile, cratered lunar horizon. Now called “Earthrise,” the photograph boosted awareness of our planet’s beauty and fragility.“Twenty eighteen is the 50-year anniversary of that iconic picture that helped define the environmental movement. What are the course corrections we need to do now that will help us get to the hundredth anniversary?” asks U.S. astronaut Leland Melvin. He’s working with a coalition of fellow space travelers to rethink how we balance ecological health and human needs. The project will use astronauts’ experiences to help others adopt more sustainable lifestyles.Long Island, the BahamasDrafted into the National Football League in 1986, Melvin played briefly with the Detroit Lions. But when an injury cut short his athletic career, his life took a dramatic turn— into orbit. During his two flights as a NASA astronaut, in 2008 and 2009, Melvin was gobsmacked by the sight of Earth’s oceans from above. The colors were so varied, he found himself searching for new ways to describe all the shades of blue. His thirst for knowledge continues to distinguish his efforts to inspire people, especially kids, to preserve the planet and chase their dreams.Clearly, a desire to protect the planet is common among those who have left it. Russian cosmonaut Gennady Padalka has logged more cumulative days in space than anyone else. The allure of spaceflight kept him on the job for 28 years, but something even more powerful than gravity kept bringing him home.“We are genetically connected to this planet,” he says. And to the best of our knowledge, Earth is unique in its ability to support life as we know it. The past decade of astronomy has shown us that we are one among billions of worlds in the Milky Way galaxy, but our tangled web of geology, ecology, and biology makes this strange rock the only one in reach that’s just right for humans.There really is no place like home.",
"For most of the six million years of human evolution, all humans and protohumans lived like somewhat glorified chimpanzees, at low population densities, scattered over the landscape as families or small bands. Only within the past 6,000 years, a small fraction of human history, did some of our ancestors come together in cities. But today more than half the world’s people live in these new settings, some of which have tens of millions of inhabitants.Urban life involves trade-offs. We may gain big benefits in return for suffering big disadvantages. Let’s consider two of them: the trade-off between individual freedom and community interests, and the trade-off between social ties and anonymity.To understand the issue of freedom, take first the city of Singapore, in effect one of the world’s most densely populated micro-countries. Singapore’s nearly six million people are packed into about 250 square miles—230 times the average U.S. population density. It’s an Asian financial center, a major port on one of the world’s busiest shipping straits, and a tiny piece of prime real estate wedged between two giant, powerful neighbors, Indonesia and Malaysia. Singapore was part of Malaysia until 1965, when economic and racial tensions spurred its separation. But Singapore depends on Malaysia for most of its water and much of its food, and can’t afford to make mistakes or provoke its neighbors.So Singapore’s government monitors its citizens closely, to make sure that individuals don’t harm the community. Inspectors check for water standing in each household’s pots, lest they furnish breeding sites for disease-transmitting mosquitoes. Smart-technology sensors measure (or will measure) the traffic on every street, the movements of every car, and the temperatures of and shadows cast by buildings. They also will track the water and electricity consumption of every household and will note the time whenever a household toilet is flushed. Americans may view such measures with horror, as George Orwell’s novel 1984 come true. But for Singapore’s citizens, it’s the bargain that they have made with their government: less individual freedom in return for First World living standards, health, and security.Next consider Germany’s cities, also densely populated. Local governments have rules about the shapes and colors of tiles that Germans may use on their houses’ roofs, and about the sizes and ages of trees that they can or can’t cut down on their property. To obtain a fishing license, Germans must attend many hours of fishing classes, then pass a 60-question exam. Most Americans would bristle at such restrictions. But benefits to German communities include beautiful regional architecture, green cities, government support for the arts, and healthy fish populations.At the opposite extreme comes my own city of Los Angeles, where rights of the individual property owner are prized as sacred. The result is a free-for-all, in which many individuals and communities suffer disadvantages. Almost any style of house is permissible; local architectural character is nonexistent. Tree cover is vanishing, temperatures are rising, and landowners’ excavated dirt and sprayed pesticides end up on neighbors’ property. To fish in the local bay waters, anyone can buy a fishing license—no questions asked—so of course fish populations decline.The outcomes of trade-offs differ for Singapore, Germany, and L.A. because different geographies and histories have led to different customs. Population density is highest in Singapore, intermediate in Germany, lowest in the United States (including California). China—whence the ancestors of most of Singapore’s population arrived—has had cities for five millennia, Germany for two millennia, the United States for just a few centuries. Chinese traditional farming is communal; Germans have close-packed individual farms; and U.S. frontier settlements had self-sufficient, widely scattered families. The cultural legacies of those differences live on today.Another issue of urban life is the trade-off between social ties and anonymity. Traditional living arrangements still practiced today in rural areas of New Guinea, where I’ve been working since the 1960s, resemble those formerly practiced in pre-urban Western societies. New Guinea villagers live out their lives where they were born, constantly surrounded by lifelong friends and social support.A first reaction of many lonely, urban Americans is: How heartwarmingly wonderful! When New Guinea villagers move to cities, they find themselves surrounded by strangers, their friends few or recent or scattered across the city. The frequent results are unhappy isolation, decline of social support, and proliferation of urban crime.Still, we American city dwellers shouldn’t romanticize traditional village living arrangements. My New Guinea friends tell me that those arrangements are also socially suffocating, and limit individuals’ abilities to realize their potential. In New Guinea villages, everybody knows, constantly watches, and incessantly discusses what everybody else is doing.As a result, a New Guinea friend who spent years living in a U.S. city loved it—because (as she told me) she could sit alone and read a newspaper in peaceful anonymity in a sidewalk café, without being importuned by fellow clan members asking her for money and bewailing their troubles. New Guineans have learned to appreciate the modern urban inventions of opaque bags and trouser pockets—because those inventions permit them to conceal things from neighbors and thereby to acquire small luxuries without becoming targets of village comment. Thus, New Guineans recognize drawbacks as well as heartwarming benefits of village life. They also understand the benefits, not just the pains, of urban anonymity.It all comes down to compromises. As the world becomes increasingly urban, will all of us be forced to adopt more of Singapore’s solutions? If a government meter that records every flushing of your toilet is part of the price you’d have to pay for living in safety, health, affluence, and beautiful surroundings, what would you choose?",
"A model of the spine of Australopithecus afarensis (Lucy) is shown next to the shadows of a modern human and a modern chimpanzee.The origins of humankind have long fascinated scientists and the public alike—but the topic can get confusing. Here are answers to a few common questions.For a number of reasons. We share nearly 99 percent of our genetic sequence with chimpanzees and bonobos, which strongly suggests we share a common ancestor. And there are thousands of fossils documenting progressively more human-like species in the evolution of our lineage after it split from the other great apes and later from chimps and bonobos.Biologists have actually observed evolution happening in other species, both in the field and in the lab—the recent emergence of antibiotic-resistant microbes is a form of evolution. And animal breeders make evolution happen all the time—think of the tremendous variety of dog breeds that have been created from wolves.Yes, if you think the Bible has to be interpreted literally. Evolution contradicts the Genesis story that God created all organisms in their present form. But you can believe in God without believing that the Bible is literally true.The DNA that makes up our genes, and those of every organism on Earth except some viruses, is subject to random mutation. Every now and then one of those mutations affects an important trait, such as an animal’s coat color or a particular behavior. Animal breeders selectively breed animals that have the traits they want; that’s artificial selection. In nature, the selection is done by the animal’s environment—and by the opposite sex.If an animal is born with a coat color that offers more protection from predators, for instance, it could survive longer and produce more offspring. If a longer courtship display is more appealing to mates, that too could lead to greater reproductive success. Over time, such favorable mutations spread through a population and change how it looks. Over enough time, the process can even produce new species.The human lineage diverged from that of apes at least seven million years ago and maybe as long as 13 million years ago. The earliest undisputed members of our lineage to regularly walk upright were the australopithecines, of which the most famous is Lucy’s species, Australopithecus afarensis. (Lucy herself is dated to 3.2 million years ago.) The oldest known fossil attributed to our genus, Homo, dates to about 2.8 million years ago and was reported just this year. The ability to make stone tools was once thought to be the hallmark of our genus. But the oldest stone tools are now thought to be 3.3 million years old. Either they were made by australopithecines like Lucy—or scientists simply haven’t yet found the early form of Homo that made them. Like australopithecines, early Homo species, such as H. erectus and H. habilis, walked on two legs.There's considerable debate over when our ancestors first harnessed fire—it may have been anywhere from 1.8 million to around 800,000 years ago. According to one theory, the invention of cooking allowed us to gain more energy from meat, which fueled the dramatic evolution of the human brain. Bigger brains and more dextrous hands in turn were the prerequisite for the developments that set humans apart, including complex language, art, and agriculture, all of which emerged in the past 100,000 years.Both genetic and fossil evidence show that until relatively recently, human evolution happened in Africa. Whether the genus Homo first emerged in southern or in eastern Africa remains unclear. Knowing where our species evolved matters because the environment it adapted to helped shape the genetic makeup we still carry with us today. Where we came from is the first chapter in the long story of how we got to where we are now.Around 60,000 years ago—again according to both genetic and fossil evidence—modern humans migrated out of Africa and began colonizing the world. Genetic evidence suggests that soon after leaving Africa, they interbred to some extent with the Neanderthals and a mysterious population in Asia called the Denisovans. Homo sapiens is now the only species of human on Earth. But that’s been true for less than 30,000 years.Because there isn’t one. Chimpanzees (or other apes) didn’t evolve into humans. Both lineages descended from a common ancestor and went their separate ways. The real question here is, who was that last common ancestor, the missing progenitor of both chimps and humans? We don’t know yet.Certainly not. Humans are continuing to evolve, but now the evolution is driven as much by our culture and the technology we’ve invented as by our biology. And other animals, including the apes, are also continuing to evolve—especially now, in response to the huge changes in their environment that humans have made.",
"Symbol of Singapore and its efforts to promote green space, these “Supertrees” belong to a display at the 250-acre Gardens by the Bay. The high-tech structures range from 80 to 160 feet and collect solar energy to power a nightly light show. They have a softer side too: their trunks are vertical gardens, laced with more than 150,000 living plants.Singapore calls itself the Garden City, and it’s making good on that promise.Singapore's meteoric economic rise launched a landscape of towering architecture in the compact city-state, but as the metropolis continues to grow, urban planners are weaving nature throughout—and even into its heights. New developments must include plant life, in the form of green roofs, cascading vertical gardens, and verdant walls.The push to go green extends to construction as well—green building has been mandatory since 2008.Much of that vision to keep Singapore both sustainable and livable stems from Cheong Koon Hean, the first woman to lead Singapore’s urban development agency. The veteran architect and urban planner is credited with reshaping the skyline through landmark projects such as the waterfront residential and entertainment quarter Marina Bay—whose gardens are one of the city’s top draws—and the Jurong Lake District, slated to be a second business district and home to a new high-speed rail link to neighboring Malaysia.Cheong is now CEO of the Housing and Development Board, which builds and manages public housing for most of Singapore’s 5.6 million people. Singapore’s sleek version of public housing emphasizes community-centric towns (there are 23) and amenities.National Geographic spoke to her about Singapore’s unique brand of building—and how one day it may even take the city underground.Singapore is a both a country and a city—an island about half the size of metropolitan London. But compactness has its advantages: One can take a morning dip in the ocean and then hop on a train to work.Singapore is truly cosmopolitan, and we’ve managed to preserve our cultural—Chinese, Indian, and Malay—and architectural legacy through a heritage conservation program. It is a merger of old and new, a mix of the East and West. These are the beautiful contradictions that make Singapore a richly diverse city.When Singapore became independent in 1965, we were a city filled with slums, choked with congestion, where rivers became open sewers, and we were struggling to find decent jobs for our people. We had limited land and no natural resources. In the short span of 50 years, we have built a clean, modern metropolis with a diversified economy and reliable infrastructure. Our public housing program has transformed us from a nation of squatters to a nation of homeowners: More than 90 percent of our people own their homes, one of the highest home-ownership rates in the world.Through an incentive program, we replace greenery lost on the ground from development with greenery in the sky through high-rise terraces and gardens. This adds another layer of space for recreation and gathering. In Marina Bay, all developments comply with a 100 percent greenery replacement policy. The Pinnacle@Duxton, the tallest public housing development in the world, has seven 50-story buildings connected by gardens on the 26th and 50th floors. You can even jog around a track on these levels, which are also equipped with exercise stations.Veteran architect and urban planner Cheong Koon Hean oversees Singapore’s public housing, where most of its 5.6 million people live. The sustainable, community-oriented residential developments typically include three-generation playgrounds, as they’re called, and access to gardens.Given our land constraints, Singapore has no choice but to adopt high-density development. At its essence, livable density is about creating quality of life despite that density.It’s about opportunity, variety, and convenience: More jobs result from the synergy of having so many talented people come together. We offer proximity to shops, schools, entertainment, healthcare, and the outdoors. Affordable public rail networks reduce traffic congestion. Livable density also means that we prioritize parks and recreation facilities.Innovative design can reduce that feeling of density by creating the illusion of space using “green” and “blue” elements. We intersperse parks, rivers, and ponds amid our high-rises. These bodies of water also double as flood-control mechanisms. And we plant lushly—some three million trees cover Singapore, including a stand of virgin rainforest, rich in biodiversity, right in the heart of the island.For a city extension called Marina Bay, we created one of the largest freshwater city reservoirs in the world and set aside 250 acres of prime real estate for the Gardens by the Bay, a “green lung” in the city.We are also connecting our many parks into a network. Some hill parks are linked by iconic bridges, another example of how we create the illusion of space. As this park connector expands, Singaporeans will have access to a few hundred kilometers of cycling and walking trails throughout the island—they’ve already spawned a new cycling culture.Within our public housing estates, Singaporeans build homes, start families, and form strong bonds with their neighbors. We consciously build community spaces and town plazas to create those gathering places, including “three-generation playgrounds” and fitness areas to encourage interaction between residents of different ages.Our founding prime minister had a vision to build a nation of homeowners—to give Singaporeans a tangible stake in our country, financial security, and a critical sense of belonging.Through the Housing and Development Board (HDB), the government builds flats [apartments] that are sold to citizens with a 99-year lease. Today HDB manages close to one million flats, housing more than 80 percent of the population. Some 95 percent of the units are owned.Urban planning is more than just good physical design. It’s also thoughtful policy design. The flats are priced to be affordable, at about 20 to 25 percent of income. We provide choices for diverse needs and budgets, ranging from one bedroom to multigenerational flats, with four bedrooms. As it appreciates over time, the flat may be a key source of financing retirement needs. Elderly flat owners can sublet; sell off a larger flat for a smaller one; or sell part of their lease back to HDB so that the proceeds can be used to buy an annuity that provides income while they remain in their own home.For vulnerable families who cannot afford a flat of their own, HDB helps them through its public rental program.Buildings will be green—a major target is to have 80 percent achieve an environmental performance rating called Green Mark by 2030, in order to reduce energy use and carbon emissions.New solutions will support the urban lifestyle: More people will be based in Smart Work Centres—shared work space for employees from different companies—near their homes, reducing the need to travel, improving productivity, and enhancing work-life balance.People will be empowered in new ways with technology—the elderly can be better looked after in their homes with “tele-medicine.”Technology will also allow us to tap underground and cavern spaces to supplement our limited land. Our urban planners are endeavoring to develop a 3-D masterplan of underground Singapore.Many cities, especially those in Asia, are densely populated. Our experience shows that those cities can be livable. Our focus on equitable access to amenities and a commitment to affordable housing have provided a strong foundation for a stable society. Building up capable public institutions and harnessing public-private partnerships and technology have also been critical.This interview has been edited for length and clarity.Urban Innovator explores the contributions by an individual to creating sustainable cities; the article is part of the Urban Expeditions series, which is supported by a grant from United Technologies to the National Geographic Society.",
"One of the original 12 UNESCO sites worldwide, the relic-heavy Aachen Cathedral was the coronation site for centuries of German emperors. Tour the octagonal basilica to see Charlemagne’s marble sarcophagus.The birthplace of printed books, Christmas trees, lightbulbs, and motorcycles, Germany has also blessed the register of UNESCO World Heritage with 41 cultural sites, 3 natural sites, and 17 Memory of the World listings, including the Gutenberg Bible, island-born Ottonian illuminated manuscripts, Beethoven’s Ninth Symphony, and the oldest known illustration of the sky. Altogether, the historic 44-site ensemble of castles, medieval towns, cathedrals, and gardens paints a 2,000-year history of European culture and a 57-million-year history of Earth’s living environment.From timber-framed Bavaria to off-the-radar Thuringia, the 37 sites featured above commemorate a glitzy and gritty cross section of towering trees, snaky fossils, and ancient relics from every corner of Deutschland. With one third of the country canopied by forest and no speed limits to speak of, one zippy road trip can lead from artsy Bauhaus costume parties to adventurous Ice Age treasure hunts.",
"Throughout history, people have devised elaborate ways to memorialize the dead: the pyramids of Egypt, Europe’s Gothic mausoleums, the Taj Mahal in India. What some mourners consider meaningful, others would call macabre. In 19th-century Europe and America, “death photography” produced portraits of the departed in lifelike poses; in the Tibetan Buddhist rite known as sky burial or bya gtor (alms for the birds), earthly remains are set out to feed vultures.Notions about honoring the dead are shaped by many factors—culture, tradition, geography, religion. But the notion is one thing, and the execution is another. In every era, it’s the available technology that determines our range of memorial options.The intersections of death and technology have long been busy crossroads. In these early years of the 21st century, they’re getting really interesting. Because I write about science and technology for a living, I’ve lingered at these intersections, observing the innovations: digital memorials on social media, eco-friendly green burial options, even interactive tombstones.Among the tech-savvy options for modern decedents, one stands out because it’s so genuinely weird. Thanks to startling advances in industrial engineering, we can now synthetically re-create colossal geological forces to shape our ultimate destiny on this planet. It’s gratuitous and extreme and wonderful: We can turn our mortal remains into diamonds. Real diamonds.Several companies worldwide now offer services to families that have the notion, and the resources, to memorialize their loved ones in arguably the most permanent way possible. The Swiss company Algordanza is one of them.Using high-tech heavy-industry machines, engineers can transform the carbon from human ashes into diamond gems that are physically and chemically identical to natural diamonds. The geologic process that otherwise takes hundreds of millions of years can now be managed in weeks.It works like this: After the cremation, the bereaved family ships one pound of ashes to Algordanza’s laboratory in Switzerland. Scientists process the ashes to extract the pure carbon elements and remove other impurities. (The remaining ashes are shipped back.) From there, Algordanza uses the same tools Mother Nature uses to make diamonds: heat and pressure.In the next step, the carbon ashes are converted into graphite, a stable allotrope of carbon in which the atoms are packed into tight, flat sheets. Then the carbon settles down for a long bake inside Algordanza’s high-pressure, high-temperature (HPHT) machines. Temperatures rise as high as about 2,400 degrees Fahrenheit. For comparison, consider that cast iron melts at about 2,200 degrees Fahrenheit.Then there’s the pressure. Within the HPHT machine, a system of cubic presses exerts a force of 870,000 pounds per square inch on the graphite, gradually changing the molecular structure and transforming the carbon into pure diamond.To be clear, these diamonds aren’t just similar to a natural diamond; they are identical down to the atomic level. The gem that emerges can be kept in its rough state or cut and polished by Algordanza’s specialists.The entire operation—from initial receipt of ashes to final delivery of the diamond—typically takes five to eight months. The company processes approximately 1,000 memorial diamonds a year and has representatives in 34 countries.Algordanza offers packages with prices starting at about $3,000, says Christina Martoia, its U.S. representative. About that pricing—perhaps it’s impolite to ask, but we all want to know, right?“The largest Algordanza memorial diamond produced to date was a 1.76-carat brilliant cut,” Martoia says. “The price was $38,000.”While the hard science of memorial diamonds is fascinating—a billion years in a matter of weeks!—the price may be out of reach for us budget-minded afterlife planners. Death is already mandatory and largely unpleasant. Does it have to be expensive too?Happily, another company has stepped into this odd little marketplace. Headquartered in Barcelona, the Spanish start-up Bios Urn offers a much more affordable high-tech memorial option.By way of a smartphone app and a kind of interactive funeral urn, the Bios system lets grieving families turn their departed loved one into an indoor tree for their home. A capsule of cremains is bedded in a large pot, in which a seedling is planted. As the seedling grows, it sends roots into the cremains, and the Bios Incube automatically waters and cares for the memorial sapling. Built-in sensors monitor temperature, humidity, and soil conditions. Information beamed to the smartphone allows the family to nurture the sapling as it grows into a tree.The company offers two versions. One provides the basic biodegradable urn and planter for $145. The more expensive version, incorporating the sensors and the app, is around $700. I could swing that, and I kind of like the idea of making my kids take care of me through my oaken golden years.Katie Thornton has been thinking quite a bit about death. For the past few years, the cemetery historian has examined epitaphs and researched the “residents” buried at Lakewood Cemetery in her hometown of Minneapolis, with the goal of preserving stories for posterity. “A lot is at stake right now,” says the Fulbright-National Geographic digital storytelling fellow. Around the world, people are questioning whether cemeteries are a sustainable use of scarce land. “Without planning, the stories buried at cemeteries could be lost forever,” Thornton says—but technology may offer a solution. Thornton is launching a podcast, Death in the Digital Age, to explore how global urbanization and the rise of digital documentation are changing conventions for memorializing the dead, especially in England and Singapore. Thornton discusses her work on National Geographic’s Open Explorer platform. —Annie RothCandi K. Cann is one of the world’s leading experts on modern mourning. She teaches comparative religion at Baylor University in Texas and is the author of the book Virtual Afterlives: Grieving the Dead in the Twenty-First Century. She says that as a mourning custom, memorial diamonds and smart urns are really just modern iterations of much older cultural traditions. Both are associated with the psychological concept of continuing bonds.The idea is that keeping the decedent in one’s life, in some form, is healthier than the detachment of, for instance, putting Dad six feet under. The diamond or the urn reflects “the need for continued rituals that incorporate and acknowledge the role of the loss of the deceased person,” Cann says. “It allows the living to grieve without being forced to ‘move on’ or forget the dead.”If you’re interested in going down this particular rabbit hole, Cann suggests looking into the strange beauty of Victorian mourning jewelry. “The bereaved would take a lock of the decedent’s hair and turn it into wearable and functional jewelry,” she says. “Often the hair was woven into an intricate design and turned into a ring, a brooch, or a pin. Only the bereaved knew the origins of the hair.”Cann says such jewelry is meant to serve the same function as today’s diamond or interactive urn—or yesteryear’s death photography, for that matter. It’s about people turning to the technology of their era to navigate death and dying. The Romans did it. The Persians did it. The Maya did it. We’re doing it with delicate microchips and massive machines. The technologies change, but the basic human experience remains.Since I have some time (I hope), I plan to postpone any decisions until I’ve surveyed all my 21st-century options. Right now I’m leaning toward the tree. It’s more cheerful, and I’ve always admired the sedentary style of flora as a lifestyle choice.Besides, that diamond thing seems like a lot of pressure.",
"I grew up believing that my auntie had almost died because she ate an apple in South America.According to the family stories, the fruit had been contaminated, or maybe an insect had been crawling on it and had bitten Tía Dora. However it had happened, my family understood this: A New York doctor had diagnosed my auntie with Chagas disease. It meant my auntie could die. We didn’t ask questions. English wasn’t our first language. My parents worked in factories. We took care of my auntie as she went in and out of hospitals for decades. When I reached my late 30s, Tía Dora was rushed to the hospital one night. A week later, she died. She was 59 years old, and I thought Chagas was a rare disease. I was wrong.Named after the Brazilian doctor who discovered the disease in 1909, Chagas is more prevalent today in the United States than the Zika virus. And in the Western Hemisphere, the disease burden of Chagas is almost eight times that of malaria.Some 10,000 people die each year from Chagas disease. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) estimates that about 300,000 people living in the United States have the disease. Many, like my auntie, grew up in poor communities in South America, Central America, or Mexico. Few know they have Chagas disease because the parasite that causes it, Trypanosoma cruzi, is a cunning microorganism.It’s transmitted to people by way of a triatomine insect called a kissing bug. In the acute stage, people usually can be cured; unfortunately, less than one percent of infected people are diagnosed or treated. The parasite can live in the body throughout a person’s life without causing symptoms, but 20 to 30 percent of infected people will suffer cardiac damage. Chagas-related heart problems include irregular heartbeats, left ventricular aneurysms, and even heart failure.Just as frightening is this: T. cruzi can cross the placenta. It’s estimated that as many as 315 babies a year are born with Chagas in the United States. I think of them as the “no-name babies” because health officials don’t know who these children are. Pregnant women are not routinely screened for Chagas in the United States.In the United States, transmission of the deadly Trypanosoma cruzi parasite to humans is rare, but dogs appear to be more vulnerable. A recent study tested for Chagas disease among dogs that U.S. agencies use in tasks such as sniffing for explosives or helping with search-and-rescue operations. Though the dogs showed no signs of being sick, more than 7 percent of those tested were infected. “When we take a look at their hearts, then we see signs of heart disease,” says study director Sarah Hamer, an associate professor at Texas A&M University’s College of Veterinary Medicine and Biomedical Science. Similar rates of infection have been found among dogs in Texas animal shelters. Scientists say dogs might be more at risk for the disease than people because dogs may eat bugs that carry the parasite. However, they say, the risk of infection passing from dogs to humans is extremely low. —DHIn 2014, a few years after my auntie’s death, I traveled to Colombia. At the University of the Andes in Bogotá, biologist Felipe Guhl has been studying the kissing bug disease for more than four decades. There I learned that these insects are homebodies, often living where they don’t have to crawl far to reach prey. That might be a human, a dog, a marsupial, a raccoon—the bugs aren’t picky about which animals they bite. In rural areas of Latin America, they live in the cracks of mud houses during the day and come out at night to feed. The bite, though painless, leaves a small wound. The T. cruzi parasite is in the bugs’ feces and is transmitted when fecal material enters the bite wound.Guhl says that to eradicate Chagas, you’d have to do away with wildlife—obviously not possible. Also, given the beetle-like bug’s many species, “It’s like a baseball game,” he says. If you get rid of one, “there are other players on the bench.” And the parasite itself is ancient. Guhl and an international team of researchers found T. cruzi in 9,000-year-old mummies from the deserts of Peru and Chile.Having grown up hearing about Chagas disease and knowing that a dreaded bug could kill me, the last thing I wanted was to see one. And yet I did. Maybe I wanted to face my fears. Maybe I wanted to see the truth of what I only knew as family folklore.Off I went with Guhl’s research assistant to see their insect colony. The day was chilly, but when the graduate student opened the door to a room the size of a walk-in closet, I stepped into a world both balmy and dimly lit. Think of a mild summer night out in the woods of North Carolina.The room had shelves filled with glass jars of kissing bugs crawling on filter paper folded accordion style. Several were dark with pretty patterns of amber and black at the edges of their abdomens. Some, like the Rhodnius prolixus, were less than an inch long; others, like the Panstrongylus geniculatus, were longer. Kissing bugs tend to fly when they’re starving. Now they began scrambling up the filter paper toward the cheesecloth covering on the jars. The graduate student smiled at me weakly. “They think we’re going to feed them,” he said. Their dinner? Chicken blood.Kissing bugs are native to the United States, too. At Texas A&M in College Station, the entomology department has about a hundred specimens, collected years ago. In fact, Texas has the greatest diversity of kissing bug species in the country, and the CDC funded the start of the Texas Chagas Taskforce to raise awareness there.The CDC, however, estimates 75 or fewer cases of what could be called “homegrown Chagas”—cases where people have been infected by kissing bugs native to the United States.The World Health Organization lists Chagas, sleeping sickness, and Guinea worm disease among “neglected tropical diseases.” But there’s progress reining them in thanks to successful interventions: controlling for disease vectors, ensuring that people can filter their water, and getting infected people access to health care.Chagas disease
 1990: 30 million infected
2010: 6 to 8 million infectedThe blood-sucking triatomine bug transmits the parasite that causes Chagas disease. The insect is active at night, searching for a meal—and earned its English-language name “kissing bug” because it generally bites an exposed part of the body such as the face. The feces left by the bug near its bite carry the Trypanosoma cruzi parasite, which can be spread to the wound when the bite is rubbed or scratched.If we have kissing bugs aplenty in Texas and some 300,000 people in the U.S. infected, why do so few of us know about Chagas? “It’s a disease of poverty,” says Sheba Meymandi, a cardiologist whose team in California’s San Fernando Valley has screened about 9,000 people who were born in Latin America for the disease. Many of the people infected have other issues to worry about: their immigration status, diabetes, and jobs that vanish overnight. Patients come to her when their hearts are failing. Because Chagas isn’t easily transmitted between people, the disease stays largely confined to the Latino community—and that contributes to the lack of knowledge about it.Through word of mouth in the Washington, D.C., area, I met Janet, a law school graduate from South America who’s married to a U.S. citizen and who asked that we not use her last name to preserve her privacy. Janet had never been screened for Chagas, but her dad was infected and so was her sister. In 2015, pregnant with her second son, she found herself in an emergency room. Her baby, born at 30 weeks, was infected with T. cruzi. While babies infected with this parasite often don’t show any signs of distress, Janet’s premature son weighed less than four pounds and already had scar tissue on his heart. “It was shocking to learn that I could transmit this to my baby,” she told me.Doctors were able to treat Janet’s son. But the recommended guidelines for newborn screening from the Department of Health and Human Services don’t include congenital Chagas disease, even though there are more estimated cases of the disease than at least 15 other diseases currently listed.This is particularly devastating because the drug benznidazole can often eliminate the parasite in infected children. In 2017 the Food and Drug Administration approved the drug for use among children. It sounds like good news, and it is, except benznidazole, which was developed in the 1960s and ’70s, can have negative side effects for people with chronic Chagas. The other drug available for Chagas, nifurtimox, also has these limitations. Research funds continue to be scarce for this disease.I’ve come a long way from thinking that my auntie ate a poisoned apple and contracted an infectious disease. However, the real story—spanning borders and sitting at the intersection of science and social issues like poverty and immigration—has also become more complicated than anything I could have imagined when I was a child.",
"There may be nothing more self-defining than our tastes. Whether in food, wine, romantic partners, or political candidates, our tastes represent our identity. So it made sense to me that my likes and dislikes were formed through careful deliberation and rational decision-making—that is, through choices where I wielded some control.Then I became acquainted with Toxoplasma gondii. In my research at the Indiana University School of Medicine, I observed how the single-celled T. gondii parasite can change the behavior of the host it infects. It can make rats unafraid of cats, and some studies show that it may cause personality changes (such as increased anxiety) in humans.These studies made me wonder if there are other things happening under our radar that could be shaping who we are, programming our likes and dislikes. As I dug into the scientific literature, I hit upon this astonishing and unsettling truth: Our actions are governed by hidden biological forces—which is to say that we have little or no control over our personal tastes. Our behaviors and preferences are profoundly influenced by our genetic makeup, by factors in our environment that affect our genes, and by other genes forced into our systems by the innumerable microbes that dwell inside us.I realize that this sounds ridiculous. We’re taught that we can be whatever we want to be, do whatever we want to do. Intuitively, it feels like we pick and choose the foods we like, who we give our heart to, or which buttons we press in the voting booth. To suggest that we are just meat robots under the influence of unseen forces is crazy talk!Several years ago I would have agreed. But after being grilled at one too many cookouts as to why I don’t like many of the vegetables that most people find enjoyable, I felt like something was wrong with me. I am green with envy watching people willingly eat things like broccoli, because if someone tries to pass it to me, my body recoils in horror. Why don’t I relish broccoli?I wasn’t choosing to hate these vegetables, so I set out to learn what could explain my aversion. Luckily, science was on the case. Researchers have found that about 25 percent of people might hate broccoli for the same reason I do. These people—my people—are called supertasters. We have variations in genes that build our taste bud receptors. One of those genes, TAS2R38, recognizes bitter chemicals like thioureas, which are plentiful in broccoli. My DNA gives me taste bud receptors that register thiourea compounds as revoltingly bitter. This may be DNA’s way of deterring me from eating harmful plants. It’s clearly the reason that, as television’s Seinfeld character said of his frenemy Newman, I wouldn’t eat broccoli if it were deep fried in chocolate sauce.Technically, yes. But embedded within your genome, there are many potential versions of you. The person you see in the mirror is just one of them, fished out by the unique things you’ve been exposed to since conception. The new science of epigenetics is the study of how chemical changes made to DNA, or proteins that interact with DNA, can affect gene activity. DNA can be modified by environmental factors in ways that can profoundly affect development and behavior. Recently, it’s also been shown that the microbes in your body—aka your microbiome—can be a significant environmental factor that affects myriad behaviors, from overeating to depression. In sum, we are our genes—but our genes cannot be evaluated outside the context of our environment. Genes are the piano keys, but the environment plays the song. —BSThis explanation of why I hate broccoli is both vindicating and disturbing. I am relieved that my distaste for cruciferous vegetables is not my fault—I did not get to go gene shopping before I was conceived. But the relief soon turns to alarm as I wonder: What other things that define who I am are beyond my command? How much of me is really due to me?How about my taste in women? Surely that must be under my control. Let’s start with the basics: Why am I attracted to women instead of men? This was not a conscious decision that I made while sitting on the beach one evening contemplating life; I was born this way. The genetic components to human sexuality are still muddy, but it is clear that it’s not a choice.Regardless of our sexual orientation, we seem to have an innate sense of the attributes we find desirable in a mate. Features such as a shapely mouth, sparkling eyes, and lush hair are widely appreciated as attractive. And studies show that more attractive people are likelier to get a job, make more money, find a mate—even be found “not guilty” if on trial.Evolutionary psychologists remind us that at our core, virtually everything we do emerges from a subconscious urge to survive and reproduce our genes, or lend support to others (such as family) who carry genes like our own. They further postulate that many of the physical traits that we consider attractive are signs of physical health and fitness—in other words, good genes to let swim in our pool.Science has also provided a little comfort as to why your amorous advances are sometimes spurned. A famous study had women sniffing the underarms of T-shirts worn by men and then ranking the odor. The more similar the men’s and women’s immune system genes were, the worse the T-shirt stank to the women. There is a sound evolutionary explanation for this: If parental immune genes are too similar, the offspring will not be as well equipped to fight pathogens. In this case, genes used odor receptors as a proxy to size up whether a potential mate’s DNA is a good match. Studies like this affirm that chemistry between people really is a thing. Perhaps we should not take another’s romantic disinterest personally but view it more like organ rejection.Somewhat distressed at the level of control genes seem to exert over our choices in life, I investigated an area that I was sure would be impervious to the reach of DNA: our taste in political leaders. It’s easy to imagine genes playing a role in whether someone is right- or left-handed, but whether a person leans politically to the right or left? I thought not. Yet as unlikely as it seems, the votes are in, and DNA has scored another victory.Scientists have uncovered distinct personality traits that tend to be associated with people on opposite ends of the political spectrum. In general, liberals tend to be more open-minded, creative, and novelty seeking; conservatives tend to be more orderly and conventional, and to prefer stability. Identical twins separated at birth and raised in different environments typically find their political stances in agreement when reunited, suggesting a genetic component to our political compass. Several studies suggest that variations in our dopamine D4 receptor gene (DRD4) influence whether we vote red or blue. Dopamine is a key neurotransmitter in the brain, associated with our reward and pleasure center; variations in DRD4 have been tied to novelty seeking and risktaking, behaviors more commonly associated with liberals.Other research has shown that certain areas in the brain are different for liberals and conservatives, and this may affect how they respond to stressful stimuli. For example, conservatives tend to have a larger amygdala, the fear center of the brain, and have stronger physiological reactions to unpleasant photos or sounds. Considered together, these biological differences may partially explain why it’s so difficult for a liberal or conservative to get the other to “see the light.” You’re asking people not just to change their mind but also to resist their biology.These examples are just the tip of the iceberg. The truth is, every human behavior—from addiction to attraction to anxiety—is tethered to a genetic anchor. This is not to say that we’re destined to be slaves of our DNA, however. DNA has built human beings a brain so magnificent that it has figured out DNA’s game. And with the advent of gene editing, we have become the first species capable of revising our genetic instructions.Science has shown that you are not who you think you are. There are biological gremlins driving every action and personality trait that you assumed were of your own volition. This realization is disheartening at first, but knowledge is power. Knowing the molecular basis of our adverse behaviors should put us in a better position to curb or remedy them; accepting that other people have little choice in how they came to be should engender more empathy and compassion. Perhaps, with the confidence that we are not in total control, we can resist the urge to praise or blame and seek understanding instead.",
"On this wintry day along the shores of Canada’s Hudson Bay, five of us are rumbling over the tundra in a purpose-built vehicle, searching for polar bears. Outside, a snowstorm has created near-whiteout conditions; it is, observes one of our number, as if we are driving inside a Ping-Pong ball.Then the heat goes out in our Tundra Buggy, and despite repeated attempts at resuscitation, it refuses to sputter back to life. There is nothing but a thin layer of glass and metal protecting us from the elements.The sun is setting. It is cold.But we are perfectly safe; we’re within range of warm accommodations, even if we’ll be feeling the effects of the elements by the time we get there. We bury ourselves deep within our insulated parkas. We find a bottle of wine, and one of whiskey. We crack slightly hysterical jokes about our situation.It is cold, but we are happy, and I am in my element.Canadian ice fishing shelters, from the series Ice Huts by Richard JohnsonFrom crunching through Arctic sea ice on icebreakers to battling through Antarctic storms, from living in a cabin in Alaska to standing at the North Pole, most of my life highlights involve bracing against occasionally mind-numbing chill. These are the places and environments in which I feel most at home, the places where I choose to live and the ones I long to visit, the environments to which I always return.(Meet the scientists who are about to spend a year trapped in Arctic ice.)Which is not to say I embrace the cold without reservation. There are nights when I kick through the snow like a happy child, overjoyed at how beautiful winter can be. There are also days when I frantically train space heaters on frozen pipes and wish I lived in, say, Hawaii. I’ll not deny that there are times when my favorite part of winter is the fact that spring will soon replace it. I’m not alone in this, even among chionophiles (the scientific name for us cold fans). “I love the quietness” of life in cold climates, says my friend Alysa McCall—a scientist with Polar Bears International, a resident of Yellowknife, Canada (where winter temperatures can reach the minus 40s), and a fellow passenger in the aforementioned freezing Tundra Buggy. But, she confesses, “I have definitely been outside waiting for the bus in the middle of winter and wishing that the air didn’t hurt.”Another friend takes it further. Eric Larsen has skied to the North and South Poles, ascended Everest, and traversed the Greenland ice sheet. The tagline in his emails is “It’s Cool to Be Cold!” And yet, he notes with a laugh, “I don’t like to be cold, quite honestly. I hate being cold. I like being warm in cold places.”I hadn’t thought of that until Eric mentioned it, but he’s right. It may sound counterintuitive, but one of the great joys of being in the cold is keeping it at bay. Meeting that challenge engenders a special camaraderie: the reliance and partnership that teams feel when setting out on a polar quest; the knowing nod between strangers, bundled up to the eyeballs, passing each other in the frozen streets. Pushing through winter, to emerge on the other side, elicits a feeling of communal triumph.In a world that seems to move ever faster, where smartphones and social media demand immediate responses, the cold enforces a slowing down. It allows us—even compels us—to be aware of self and surroundings in a way that few other environments can.Life at low temperatures requires more thoughtfulness because of the “lack of safety that being in cold environments presents,” Eric says. He perceives “a level of severity in these cold environments that I find really attractive because it’s a bigger challenge.”It’s also a challenge that fewer and fewer of us may ultimately have the opportunity to accept. While there’s no danger of cold places vanishing from the planet in the foreseeable future, their extent, and the length and depth of their coldest periods, may be shrinking. The world is warming. And the cold is warming most of all.Since the turn of the 20th century, average winter temperature in the United States has increased by almost twice the rate of the summer temperature. Over the past five to six decades, the Arctic has warmed by approximately four degrees, substantially more than the rest of the globe; annual minimum Arctic sea ice extent is declining by about 13 percent per decade. As I write this in the northern summer of 2019, Greenland’s ice sheet is experiencing rates of melt that models had not predicted until 2070.Here I should correct what I wrote earlier about standing at the North Pole: To be precise, I stood in close proximity to it. When I was there in August 2017, the area around the pole itself was mostly open water.I think of Eric saying how different his last North Pole trip was from others—how he kept falling through ice thinner and more broken than he’d ever experienced. I think of another friend, who spent decades studying seals on Arctic sea ice, lamenting that his son wouldn’t have a chance to do the same.I think anew of my own experiences in the cold, and how impoverished my life would have been without them. I think of Antarctica’s Ross Sea in January 1993, of climbing up a cliffside with a fellow crew member of the M.V. Greenpeace and sitting at the top, looking down at the bay below. Ours had been a long and arduous expedition, scouring the ocean for whaling ships that did not want to be found. For several days previously, Antarctica had thrown its worst at us, bombarding our ship with screaming gales and freezing waves until the vessel was coated with a thick layer of ice. When the storm abated and after the ice had been chipped away, my crewmate and I took the opportunity to set foot ashore.The fierce wind bit angrily at the small patches of exposed skin on our faces, and we retreated into the scarves and hoods that cloaked our heads. And then, suddenly, the wind died down. For a moment there was silence. We looked at each other and grinned.We didn’t say a word. We didn’t need to. We just sat there, on a cliff top in Antarctica. Smiling. In the silence.In the cold.The cold regions of the globe can torment as much as they can transfix, as some renowned explorers have made clear.“The land looks like a fairy tale,” observed Roald Amundsen on his way to beating Robert Falcon Scott to the South Pole in 1911. Understandably, Scott saw it differently. “Great God! This is an awful place,” he raged into his diary after realizing that Amundsen had bested him.Jean-Baptiste Charcot had a love-hate relationship with Antarctica, which he explored in the early 1900s. “Why then do we feel this strange attraction for these polar regions, a feeling so powerful and lasting that when we return home we forget the mental and physical hardships and want nothing more than to return to them?” the French oceanographer mused. “Why are we so susceptible to the charm of these landscapes when they are so empty and terrifying?” —KM",
"A dark, windy storm is simulated at training pool in Germany. For those particpating in the first three legs of the MOSAiC expedition, this training was mandatory. Should they find themselves stranded, trainees must know how to battle rough ocean conditions to make it to a life raft.They will face some of the harshest conditions on Earth: polar night, complete darkness, heavy storms, and temperatures that can reach almost minus 50 degrees Fahrenheit.That’s why Markus Rex, the atmospheric scientist leading a 600-person-strong Arctic expedition— the largest ever—has thought of everything that could go wrong.“We have plans for all events, even possible loss of the vessel,” he says, though he doesn’t think that’s likely.MOSAiC expedition participants could volunteer to take a rigorous 55-hour survival course called the Polar Code Survival Training. Here, they arrive at their rescue vessel after finishing their training in Svalbard. Two of the three trainers, Simon Kraus (left) and Markus Breck help training participants board the Billefjord vessel.Named MOSAiC (Multidisciplinary drifting Observatory for the Study of Arctic Climate), the $150-million-dollar expedition will last for a full year and involve people from 19 different countries.It will be the largest and longest Arctic expedition in history and the first major Arctic expedition in a region that climate change is warming faster than anywhere else on Earth.Leaving from Tromsø, Norway on September 20, the ship will position itself in the transpolar drift stream and float, trapped in ice for a year, to northern Greenland. The expedition will mostly take place on a German ice breaker called the Polarstern, but four additional ice breakers supplied by Sweden, Russia, and China will periodically deliver people and supplies.Those participating in the leg that takes place over polar night will have to carefully conduct their research. The ecologists studying phytoplankton and algae will only use red lamps (white light could disrupt their seasonal patterns). Guards must wear night vision goggles to scout for polar bears. And days will be highly structured to ensure everyone aboard the ship maintains their circadian rhythms.Arctic temperatures are warming, and that influences more than sea ice.“The arctic is the area where much of the weather is made,” says Rex. “Understanding the arctic helps us understand extreme weather.”If a Polarstern passenger is somehow tossed overboard, they may need to be rescued by helicopter. Here, a trainee practices swimming into a harness and being hoisted into the air. Intense waves and strong wind were simulated in the training pool.Maria Josefa Verdugo will be conducting research for her PhD during her time on the Polarstern. Here, she suits up in a thick Arctic wetsuit for her training.From a 15-foot ledge, trainees plunge into the water.The contrast between cold air at the poles and warm tropical air, helps keep the polar jet stream evenly blowing across the northern hemisphere. When that temperature difference decreases, the jet stream wobbles, and a swirling mass of cold air called the polar vortex is able to send blasts of frigid winter air south.Experts say this weaker jet stream is partially responsible for the cold snap that made parts of the U.S. colder than the Arctic this past winter. Research has also linked a weaker jet stream to more heatwaves and floods.“Ultimately the whole design is to improve our models,” says Matthew Shupe, an earth scientist at the University of Colorado and NOAA’s Earth System Research Laboratory who will be on the expedition. “That’s why we’re out there. I think we’ll learn so much more about the physical processes that will help us in our predictive capabilities.”Shupe began pursuing a yearlong Arctic trip in 2009 after a six-week-long expedition in 2008 left him feeling like his time to conduct research was over before had begun.“I had no idea where the ice came from [and] where it was going after we left,” he says.It had to be a year, he and other Arctic researchers agreed. A year of taking precise measurements and watching seasonal changes could give them the raw data they needed to create the kind of climate models that tell us what might happen as the top of the world warms.At a shooting range in Cuxhaven, Germany, ecologist Susanne Spahic learns how to wield a shotgun. Polar bear guards will accompany scientists during research conducted out on the ice, but everyone must be prepared.This time Shupe will be watching the clouds.“There are all kinds of wonderful things about clouds in the Arctic—their radiative effects and effects on the surface energy budget that determines things like melting and freezing of the sea ice,” he says.“We’ll get to see the whole movie of how the ice cover evolves,” says Don Perovich, a sea ice physicist at Dartmouth who will be joining the fifth leg of the expedition at the end of May.He wants to know what happens to heat absorbed by the ocean. Does it melt the underbelly of the ice? The sides? Or maybe it stays trapped in the ocean, where it could affect the following year’s ice formation, creating a positive feedback loop that accelerates warming.“This is a question I posed when I wrote my PhD dissertation in 1983, so I’ve been thinking about it for a long time,” he says.Researching on the ice is physically challenging, and should an emergency happen on or off the ship, passengers could be days away from help. That’s why many boarding the Polarstern had to pass a rigorous training program where they were trained in firefighting, simulated ship evacuations, and shooting rifles in case of a polar bear attack.“Polar bears are nothing new to me,” says Hans Honold, a polar bear guard for the first leg of the trip.A maintenance worker enters the Polarstern's fuel tanks. The Polarstern is an icebreaker, a ship specifically made for moving through ice. Since it was built in 1982, the Polarstern has been used extensively in the Arctic and Antarctic.Honold served in the German Armed Forces, and later specialized as a mountain and polar guide. He thinks the polar night could be psychologically challenging, but says the extended time away from home will be nothing new.At every research station on the ice, Honold and his team will construct a two-mile fenced perimeter. There, he’ll sit perched with night vision goggles, scanning the horizon. If a bear is spotted, the party must immediately return to the ship. If they don’t have enough time, the ship will blast its horn in an attempt to scare off the bear.A non-lethal flare gun and pepper spray are the final attempts before a rifle shot is attempted, a last resort that no one wants to see, Honold emphasizes.“Everything is possible with a polar bear,” he says. “Some are dangerous, but most are only curious and want to know what’s going on—‘is that something I can eat?’”Other challenges during the expedition will come from living in close quarters, sharing space with strangers, and time away from loved ones.“We don’t have a psychologist on board, but our leadership has some training in dealing in high stress situations and people who are close to a crisis,” says Rex. “Everybody knows we depend on each other.”"A fire on board is the worst thing which can happen," says Captain Stefan Schwarze. Firefighting is essential training for those aboard the Polarstern. Because it's so physically demanding, a medical evaluation is required to enter the course. For photographer Esther Horvath, firefighting was the most difficult part of training to board the Polarstern: "I felt like I could just faint and collapse."Susanne Spahic (left) and Till Dürrenberger train to recover a person from the bow of a ship while surrounded by heavy smoke and wearing a full firefighting outfit. Participants were made to climb down two stories, find a human dummy, and carry it to the ship's deck.While training, participants cover their faces with a blue plastic mask that simulates the low visibility of a smokey ship on fire. Temperatures are high during the simulation, making the rescue effort physically exhausting.The Polarstern also comes equipped with a sauna, swimming pool, and gym to fill brief moments of downtime.Perovich likens the MOSAiC expedition to a famed 1896 Arctic trip led by Norwegian explorer Fridtjof Nansen, who set out to be the first to reach the North Pole. Though unsuccessful, Nansen’s ship floated along the same current the Polarstern will take.(See what Antarctica looked like 100 years ago.)One hundred years after explorers were racing to the North Pole, the Arctic has warmed significantly. Research suggests that the Arctic is warming twice as fast as the rest of the Northern Hemisphere.“It’s the first big Arctic Ocean experiment in the new Arctic Ocean,” says Perovich.“The legacy is the data. We’ll be collecting this incredible dataset in the hopes that people will use it for decades to come,” he adds. “We want to be able to predict what’s going to happen. To do that we first have to observe what’s happening and understand what’s driving those changes.”",
]